Tory donors could stop giving after no-deal Brexit  
It is quite likely that the Speaker and the Father of the House of Commons  had things to talk about other than Brexit as well. #DayJobs 
Why does Varadkar see himself as important in the Brexit negotiations!!Once Brexit is decided one way or the other Ireland will have as much significance as Malta or Luxembourg.They have been seduced by the EU and Varadkar will see trade with the U.K. minimised.  
I heard from a friend who works at the Scottish Government that Brexit is draining staff resources so much that other policy areas are falling behind "by months and potentially years".The british media will undoubtedly blame the SNP for this latest Brexit bonanza. 
When the spaceship fails to show – everything will be the fault of the heretical Remoaners, the false prophet Gove, or the wire in our bras but it will not be and never can be the fault of sacred Brexit itself.  via @BylineTimes 
The nationalist fury directed against #BBCQT because an ordinary citizen dared to mock and humiliate their shambles of a referendum plan is enlightening. Brings back memories of demos outside BBC Scotland and their vile campaign against Nick Robinson. 
Let's be clear - after brexit the gloves will be off and Scotland will made to be more subservient than ever before.Say goodbye to your culture.#indyref2 #brexit #DissolveTheUnion 
She ripped off her clothes, got down on all fours and barked like a dog . . . but they still wouldn’t agree to discuss her latest Brexit deal. 
I'm now pretty sure we will leave the EU without a deal and go in for unilateral trade disarmament for the simple reason that it's the most moronic thing we could possibly do and our parliament has neither the brains nor the talent to avert it.#Brexit 
Too soon?47 days to #Brexit.   
BREAKING: @BBCPanorama presenter @johnsweeneyroar exposed for making racist and class discriminate comments in undercover footage.Sweeney's journalism career is over.#Panorama #BBCNews #SkyNews #ITVNews #Conservatives #Labour #UKIP #LibDems #Greens #Brexit #TommyRobinson 
I just had way too much coffee and cut my own hair, and EVEN I think pushing ahead with Brexit is a really dreadful idea. 
Betrayal of Brexit manifesto commitments would be catastrophic for the Conservative Party: The…  #Brexit #Politics 
Observer: ‘Back May’s deal, then hold people’s vote: plan to end Brexit deadlock’  
Yes.  It could. My view is that whatever Deal is concluded should be put to the people for endorsement or rejection in a final say referendum.  
Breaking News: @Anna_Soubry joins cross-party calls for Theresa May to sack Chris Grayling after the collapse of a no-deal Brexit ferry contract handed to Seaborne Freight - a company with no ships  
Majority of voters want Theresa May to delay Brexit, exclusive Independent poll finds  
If you ever have imposter syndrome at any job, please remember that Chris Grayling MP gave a Brexit ferry contract to a company with no assets and a fast food takeaway terms of service, and then acted surprised when they couldn’t run the service. 
BREAKING: In tomorrow’s @thesundaytimes, @Keir_Starmer calls on Parliament to stop the Prime Minister from running down the clock on the Brexit negotiations.“There needs to be a day when Parliament says that’s it enough is enough,” @Keir_Starmer 
That hideous looking bird who stripped naked to show off her anti-Brexit credentials was called 'Cambridge academic' by the media. So that you know, #Oxford and #Cambridge did not produce academics for the past 100 years, just left-wing godless lunatics who peddle pseudo-science. 
Majority of voters want Theresa May to delay Brexit, exclusive Independent poll finds.53% of public support postponing Brexit.I suspect many would add "indefinitely!"@bremaininspain 
Don’t be so naive.  He’s Brexit all the way, just desperately trying not to get tagged with causing it.  He’s as cravenly opportunistic as any Tory Politician, just in a cheaper suit. 
Brexit is all about barriers. Between countries. Between people. Between families. Between rich and poor. It's about selfishness and isolation and shutting out the good. 
Here in rural Wiltshire I have people leaving cuttings about the effects of #Brexit in my letterbox. They know I'm chair of @Salisbury4Eur & they're desperate. How are they going to make their farms survive? How are they going to keep caring for their grandchildren in Belgium... 
The red Tories cant blame a split on JCs brexit strategy. 1) actually got the meaningful vote to prevent May wavin us thru to vassel status.2) demanded no deal be taken off table.3) detailed a specific plan that the EU has ratified as the exact way to end this chaos. 8/ 
@MarrShow Brexit is a British problem, not an EU problem. Perhaps you should cross question UK politicians first? Accountability lies with UK politicians, not with EU politicians. UK is sovereign. What would be the point of getting EU politicians onto the programme? 
A hidden government is preparing for Brexit… by keeping us in the dark | Nick Cohen  
He takes us home despite only getting half the fare he needed. What a hero. This is what I want to remember. Not shitty #brexit 
But all you have to do is run the bus engine until the fuel tank drains by about 100 litres. Send the lightest man out to collect rocks to balance the bus. then drag the gold forwards. Flag down a car, steal a van and return to the UK.I can't help you with Brexit. 
For many months, national polls have shown the same as we find talking to people on the street in Cornwall: more people think #Brexit is a mistake than see it as a sensible course of action. If leaving the EU was ever the "Will of the People", it clearly isn't now.#PeoplesVote 
#Panodrama If the media are prepared to lie about Tommy Robinson, what else will they lie about (apart from Brexit). They are the propaganda wing of the Establishment, controlling the political and social narrative, though increasingly less so now we have alternative media. 
The black man in Africa, especially those living in Nigeria, doesn't understand democracy nor it's principles in practice. If they do, why do people think IPOB & @MaziNnamdiKanu asking For a referendum to decide the Biafran Question is wrong? 
#Brexit is a huge confidence trick from the Tory far right, that's being enabled by an absolutely pathetic leader of the opposition. #RevokeArticle50 
Surprised not to have been overwhelmed with answers from Brexiters given they all think Brexit is so good.  
i'll be leaving anytime now  absolutely disgusted with my party. i'm only staying to help shift Labour's Brexit stance! 
Brexit: South Armagh locals describe the surreal reality of life in 'the most militarised area of western Europe' at the height of The Troubles  
It’s the weather and brexit, we are hurting.  
Brexit has become a Doomsday Cult  via @BylineTimes 
Black excellence has released us from the Brexit shackles we’ve been forced to deal with since Gerrard left  
My local @ChrisPincher MP voted in favour of Theresa May's disastrous #Brexit deal that was rejected in the House of Commons by 230 votes.#Deselect#Tamworth 
Work on the M20 Brexit barriers starts tonight.I live nearby and if the M26 is used as a lorry park the motorway traffic will be pushed through my village instead.Seriously, is there ANY tangible benefit of Brexit?It’s insult to injury.#StopBrexit 
African midfield > Brexit midfield.  
MPs may be cooking up a plan to back Theresa May's Brexit deal in return for a second referendum on implementing it, or staying in the EU. If Leave won, TM's deal would be immediately ratified. Intriguing idea, but I can see two main issues with it...  
Donald Tusk promised some Brexiteers a special place in hell. Here's Foreign Policy's guide to the Brexit Inferno.  
Wreckers on both sides of the Channel must not stand in the way of a #Brexit deal, writes @DominicRaab 
Trump, Russia, Brexit is only understandable in terms of what happened in Ukraine. (That's why Manafort is the key figure). I was in tears tonight not just because of the 100 or so killed in the #euromaidan - but because so few people in Britain have any idea what happened. 
The good news for the UK is that as soon as we leave the EU, everyone will totally shut up about "#Brexit"! You'll never hear that damn word again!Just like when Princess Diana died and we all forgot who she was the next day...  
A referendum campaign started by the Greater Los Angeles Communities Alliance last month has collected enough signatures to potentially block the construction of a 4.4-acre #cannabis cultivation and processing facility in #California. 
Lately, I sometimes wonder if it's a good idea to try to stop #Brexit. I'm not sure this UK deserves the privilege of EU membership. The horrors that I thought were gone from our values were just dormant for a while. It is heartbreaking to see racism, xenophobia, vicious rage. 
Seriously UK, if being a stupid, arrogant, antagonistic arsehole was the way to gain respect, my ex-husband would have friends #Brexit 
Hey just a thought but what if we hadn’t turned that food and medicine into a completely politicized Guaido vs. Maduro referendum. Or I don’t know maybe we could’ve been a little more judicious about sanctioning those Venezuelan people. Just a couple wacky ideas. 
#skypapers Scottish public voted to remain in the EU ... Having only been told 21 months before the Brexit ref to not only stay in the UK but lead it!! Now Scottish nation removed against its will. 
This is the reality of health care in the USA. And our future with Brexit, unless Scotland chooses a different path with independence.  
Good Lord #Brexit has really made some nasty throwback attitudes acceptable againRead this and weep  
Theresa May to urge MPs to give her more time to seek #Brexit concessions 
Sitting down tonight to pen a more detailed piece on the deterioration of the Good Friday Agreement right to choseLooking at the Brexit fall out & current Home Office position that all the people of Northern Ireland are British it's becoming clear that we have no choice at all  
The family behind one of the UK’s largest recruitment businesses bagged dividends of £4.1m last year as it shifted its headquarters from Malta to London in a sign of faith in post-Brexit Britain. #DespiteBrexit #StandUp4Brexit 
Germany‘s most popular news satire "heute show"’s spot-on take on ‘Brexit: deal or no deal’ (with English subtitles) - YouTube  
And yes I will post this again and yes I'm totally fucked off and tired of people that still think brexit is a good idea. I've tried to look for positives and all I see is my own country being turned in to some sort of right wing cesspit. pic.twitter.com/w8O1aDl0wz 
Brexit was supposed to be simple.Instead, it's a huge complicated mess that at best isn't working, and at worst is a complete mess.It's time for the UK to think again on Brexit now we know what leaving the European Union means.It's time for a #PeoplesVote 
Brexit means Brexit. And loads of companies fucking off, apparently 
Dec 7: Tory MP Priti Patel suggests using possible 'no-deal' food shortages to force Ireland to drop the backstop. This execrable MP is gleefully pointing us down the extreme nationalist path to mass suffering, conflict & war. #PeoplesVote #Brexit #FBPE 
We need to say this more and keep saying it. This is not referendum#2 it's a whole new referendum based on facts and circumstances. Essentially, knowing what we know now, do we want to do this?...or not? 
Please make sure you get the message out to young people to register to vote. It takes 5 mins here  #brexit #revokeA50 #stopbrexit #remainernow  
The Observer front page, Sunday 10 February 2019: Sack Grayling over the Brexit ferry fiasco, demand MPs  
Leavers reckon #Brexit is about 'hope'. For remainers, the opposite is true - #Brexit STOLE hope. It stole dreams and ambitions. It stole our wishes for our children's and grandchildren's futures. That's why we CANNOT and WILL NOT ever accept it. #RevokeRemainRebuild #StopBrexit 
Incredible. The Tory Brexit position called out for what it is, by the Irish.  
It’s not a second referendum. It’s a referendum with the facts. 
Loons in Parliament now convincing themselves the way forward is a Second Referendum offering: A) Theresa May’s Deal OR B) Stay in EU They imagine we can’t see both A and B are effectively remain.  
It is time to break free.  #Brexit  
Hi all Brexit supporters. This should cheer you up!!!  
May’s WA is a hostile takeover bid by #EUClear warnings of threats buried in small print, yet Mrs May still wedded to it.Why Govt lawyers & MPs so complacent?Leaving No Deal is not end of the worldSigning Mrs May’s deal might well be just that!#Brexit 
A wee bit of me hopes that ScotGov sits back and allows Brexit to be a totally unmitigated disaster.  This is what Scotland voted for, to be ruled by UKGov Tories.  So, let them rule.  Just for a while, just long enough for folk to realise what the SNP tried to protect us from  
Tomorrow's front page ... Revealed: Gove's Brexit plan to put the Union Jack on Scottish food labels + @NicolaSturgeon writes exclusively on her trip to the US and Canada 
READ: Majority of voters want Theresa May to delay #Brexit, leaving the door open for a #PeoplesVote: 
This compromise otherwise known as having another referendum.Just like the Malthouse compromise is a loosely disguised path to no-deal.At least both sides have a 'compromise' now*Hides to avoid flak from both sides*  
Ireland/UK: Northern Irish Social Democratic and Labour Party (S&D) approves a partnership with Irish Fianna Fail (ALDE) at special conference as proposal passes by 121 to 53 votes. #Brexit 
1) The £pound.2) Everyone got the oil price wrong but a) it’s back to $60, recovery is much cheaper, and b) EVEN IN DOWNTURN 5m not-run-by-Westminster Norway *still* got richer.3) The 670 page White Paper. How’s that Brexit ‘plan’ (1 web page & a red bus) working out for you?  
I've tweeted this previously and make no apologies for doing so today, or tomorrow, the day after that and every day  from then on until the result of the referendum is respected. A reminder that #17.4millionbetrayedPlease retweet if you feel the same, thank you.  
Now that’s what I call the sisterhood. I tweet that my pharmacist could only gave me half my HRT prescription due to ‘distribution’ issues because of Brexit & a woman I’ve never met sends me her supply that she doesn’t need anymore. Thanks @CathAguamia x 
Ignore Oliver Letwin – the Tories have nothing to fear from a no-deal Brexit - @oflynnmep 
Majority of voters want Theresa May to delay Brexit, exclusive Independent poll finds  
The basic problem with Brexit is ... Brexit  
Withdrawal Agreement was basically written by the EU for the EU. Numerous small print that effectively means a Customs Union, SM on goods, an Associate Membership, ruletaker relationship, to stop UK being competitive after #Brexit Just Leave, Leave now!  
May could win parliament’s approval for her controversial Brexit deal in return for guaranteeing another referendum. The new vote would give the British people a simple choice: to confirm the decision or stay in the EU. 
Can you detail the real, measurable benefits Brexit will bring to your constituents, Gloria?So far I have only heard you fall back on austerity tropes without bluntly pointing out that all forms of Brexit will make it so much harder to allieviate. 
My take in the Sunday Telegraph on the road ahead for Brexit ...Wreckers on both sides of the Channel must not stand in the way of a deal 
Thank you to @Another_Europe for paying for this first batch!! Follow (and join!) them if you're a lefty and you think Brexit is a pile of utter dog  
Another Tufton St. gangster, ERG's 'economic architect' Singham owns firm offering advice to companies on 'opportunities arising from Brexit.' He attended crucial talks with Brexit secretary, Stephen Barclay on Monday with approval from @10DowningStreet 
As an Irishman, I’m appalled by Leo Varadkar’s antagonism over Brexit - Adam MacCarthaigh  
Alex Salmond boasted that they would deliver Independence within 18 months of the referendum in 2014. They've had 52 months since the referendum and they still haven't given us a believable plan for a currency. 
Have a referendum of MPs by secret ballot asking ‘Is the U.K. better off remaining or leaving?’ My guess: 80% Remain. - MRI scan for presence of MPs’ spinal columns? My guess: 12% (max). 
Rees Mogg increasingly blames Ireland for his own Brexit fiasco. Fully understandable he wants to shift blame - his name is set to live in infamy. Sadly a few will believe his malevolent nonsense. Fortunately, most of our British friends are far too decent and intelligent.   
"I'm clear that I am going to deliver Brexit, I'm going to deliver it on time, that's what I'm going to do for the British public.."Except the British (English mostly) public now, clearly, don't want you to, you nutcase. 
‘What do you mean Brexit means I can’t move where I want to. I only voted to end freedom of movement for THEM.’  
Tory donors could stop giving after no-deal Brexit.Government haven't listen to experts, to parliament, to business.Maybe, finally, they might listen to voices from a group they care most deeply about - their financial backers.@Bremaininspain 
A referendum between Brexit-In-Name-Only and Remain may break the Parliamentary deadlock but it would also break the country.A completely outrageous suggestion which would effectively disenfranchise many millions of voters and plunge the UK into an existential democratic crisis.  
All of a sudden, after a massive media campaign to promote Tory Brexit,, the main players are being viewed as figures of fun. Ireland today crushed May in an extraordinary speech from which she will not recover, and Eire speaks for the EU. Bojo is toast, Mogg absurd etc etc.. 
Utterly brilliant and truly terrifying piece from Nick Cohen. Brexit is the most monstrous farce ever played out in the public arena. Words mostly fail now, but here are some that do not.  
"The cartoon patriots of the Tory right promised every kind of Brexit to every kind of constituency, smearing all reasoned opposition as fear-mongering and never once levelling with the British people about the sacrifice it would entail. "  
UK is looking at 1.2% GDP growth this year due to Brexit (growth recession) while independent Ireland's GDP will grow by 4.1% and little old independent Malta's GDP will grow by 5.2%.  Scotland could really do with being independent right about now.#DissolveTheUnion  
To MPs campaigning for their own vision of Brexit:Given all versions combined represent a minority in the country, what percentage of the population do you reckon support your vision?Why are you acting against the majority wishes in or country and claiming it's "democracy"?  
The irony being that Irish domestic politics can be fairly fractious but Brexit has had the effect of uniting everybody, across the political spectrum. I can't think of a single other issue that has had that effect in Ireland. 
The moment of actual Brexit, years after the ref, one of two things will be true: a majority in the UK will be FOR or AGAINST the chosen mode of exit. In no universe is it more democratic to do so on an old mandate based on sales pitch, than a new one based on delivered product. 
With just weeks to go, Brexit continues to fall apart.Now *is* the time.  
If only @theresa_may demonstrated the same capacity to admit she is being a dangerous fool as Prince Philip has. If someone with his history of dogmatism can back down, the prime minister should be less rigid on Brexit - rather than letting her brittle pride crash the UK  
Rees Mogg is so desperate to apportion blame it's quite clear Brexit is going to be marvellous. What kind of wonderful project requires a carefully crafted scapegoating narrative, festooned with such obvious lies? The kind you feed to the gullible and politically naive. 
People talking about their Brexit stockpiling are only making themselves targets for the hungry motorbike gangs that’ll roam from village to village eating all the tinned pies and dried pasta. 
Sunderland finds itself at the sharp end of the consequences of backing Brexit  
Back May’s deal, then hold people’s vote: plan to end Brexit deadlock  
Devil's in the DetailEnvironment rules “aim of ensuring proper functioning of single customs territory”This is most brazen element of treaty deception I have seen outside Soviet practices.It makes sure UK doesn’t become more competitive than #EU#Brexit 
This is your reminder that if England wants brexit, it can have brexit.If Scotland doesnt want want brexit, it WILL have brexit.If NI doesnt want Brexit, its politicians will ensure it still gets brexit.If Wales doesnt wake up soon it will be the new West Midlands Water Co. 
3) Skip Blair, focus on Labour:Most people, left or right, north or south, pretty much hate Blair. There's little new to say on him. But not enough people know about Labour's practical Brexit plan or manifesto policies. So push those more than comments about him. 
The morning after the referendum:-This is not what it looks like when you win an honest victory. This is what it looks like when your elaborate game goes wrong.  
Brexit Decision Day - Leeds Demo & March Tickets, Thu 14 Feb 2019 at 17:30 | EventbriteI accepted to speak at the Leeds Rally.It will be my final goodbye to the North of England as my move from Sheffield is the day after. #StopBrexitSaveBritain 
UK: MEP Steven Woolfe (NI) and MEP Nigel Farage, head of the EFDD group in the European Parliament, announce to stand for new 'Brexit Party' in case European election is held in the United Kingdom in 2019. #EP2019 #EUelections2019 #BrexitParty 
More bombshell figures from @IpsosMORI: in terms of net approval, Vince Cable is by far the most popular party leader amongst 18-34 year olds - because of the @LibDems fight against this embarrassing Brexit.Brexit cheerleaders May and Corbyn lag well behind on -40% and -31%. 
Labour caught in a huge lie (AGAIN!!!) over Brexit and immigration. They want to keep it quiet - so RT this video!  
Don’t believe all the car industry’s prophecies of Brexit doom - @julianHjessop 
It is not the British public - it is a minority of the British public @theresa_may That is why the largest protest this century and second largest protest in modern British history took place against #brexit and in favour of #PeoplesVote You conveniently ignore or dismiss that. 
There's incredulity about Brexit around the world  
First picture is an attention seeking naked woman who is going naked in an anti-Brexit message but loved by the feminists as “strong” Second picture is two ladies who enjoy what they were doing & this was stopped by feminists moaning about “equality”The mind boogles   
In tomorrow's Sunday National ... @Feorlean on the Brexit threat to Scotland's Highlands and Islands  
You really have to admire the dedication and hard work of Andrew Adonis. He's unrelentingly in his opposition to Brexit. He certainly has my sincere thanks.  
Eric Idle talks to Bill Maher about Brexit and how populism in Britain and America are taking them away from their leading and respected roles in the world. 
If brexit is delivered, the next generation will unwind it.  In the lifetimes of the sunny punks that cheated their way to it. This isn’t going away. 
Does anybody else worry that, because of #Brexit, alcoholism is in our future, but also because of Brexit, we won't be able to afford it? Asking for a friend. 
Change Britain, don’t Brexit - why Brexit can & should be stopped  
My @telegraph column: Brexiteers are rejecting exactly the sort of Brexit they used to want  
“It’s time for British politics to re-discover the lost art of compromise.”Stephen Kinnock MP believes that British politicians need to start compromising more to deliver Brexit, which his Labour colleague Rupa Huq MP believes should come in the form of a second referendum.  
The endless claim that there are no solutions to Brexit is pure insanity  via @telegraphnews 
A dark and insidious authoritarianism is creeping across the EU, with control becoming ever more centralised and abuses of power occurring at every level:  #Brexit 
When questioned, the man explained that he was raising awareness about how Brexit will leave Britain's economy exposed.  
If and when a Referendum on a United Ireland is held. And the people of Ireland - North and South - vote for our two lands to be peacefully joined as one. It is my wish to name a street near the Border as "Jacob Rees - Mogg: The street of unintended consequences." 
Farage is playing a worrying game here - threatening and I'd argue encouraging violence if Brexit is so much as delayed. Are you happy with this @lbc ??? 
Lets see now. Europe is a complete shambles. France is at war with itselfItaly is on the verge of financial calamityS Europe is all but bankrupt. Germany is fighting a slowdown. E Europe is rebelling. We need to take a tough line on Brexit.  No deal.  No more talks.  
Government tears up £14m no deal Brexit contract for ferry firm with no ferries 
A no-deal Brexit is our safest option to escape the EU police state. The closer Britain remains to this deeply compromised bloc the greater the danger. As this becomes increasingly clear, a ‘No Deal’ exit is the one option that actually delivers Brexit..  
Yes. Parties die and deserve to do so when they ignore clear instruction from the people. They gave us a referendum and then they gave us a second vote to confirm in the 3017 GE. They chose to ignore us. Democracy is a contract and they serve us, not us them.  
The United Kingdom of Absurdistan is at war, only Brexit is a war the British have declared on themselves and still do not realise they are fighting. 
We should not compromise on leaving the EU - sovereignty and self determination, which 17.4m people voted for is too important. Had remain won, would we have half stayed in the EU? Remainer MPs should accept the democratic vote & back a managed WTO Brexit.  
Corbyn says CU, Blairites say SM. If Corbyn said SM, Blairites would say “people’s” vote. If Corbyn said “people’s” vote, Blairites would say revoke Art. 50. If Corbyn said revoke Art. 50, Blairites would say no deal Brexit. They are a stain on the Labour Party. End of. 
“A strange chant is gaining in volume as the deadline closes in: There Are No Solutions. Unlike the Imperial Nostalgia smear, this lie has a clear practical objective: to discredit any attempt to find a way through to a deal that will make Brexit feasible” 
Yes, of course! A no deal #Brexit will be catastrophic for the UK. There will be referendums in Scotland and Northern Ireland. Both will then rejoin the EU, leaving England and Wales as third world economies. I'm serious. This will happen! #RevokeArticle50 
Winchester Remainers do their best to stop the Brexit madness - good stirring speeches from Andrew Adonis and Vince Cable. Let’s hope someone’s listening  
Fuck me, mate. Make the case against Brexit? Not seen anything about that in the last few years. #GoneOutOnLimb 
Will all @UKLabour MPs planning to vote for May’s Brexit be prepared to say “I (name of MP) agree that the EU is to blame for austerity, for the feeling of being left behind, for powerlessness and it’s not the fault of the British government”? 
I've been asked by Labour's Andrew Adonis to lobby my Labour MP not to vote for the Tories Brexit and I'm happy to have tweeted Bill Esterson MP accordingly. Politics is rather bizarre at present don't you think..... 
This doughnut of a Europhile believes that British people will be barred from visiting Italy after Brexit.   
You run that nice coffee shop up the road, right?  It's always packed at lunch time.  Your coffee beans are 100% British grown so you won't miss the 0% tariffs.All your lunch traffic comes from that big office there, yes?  You know that HQ is moving because of Brexit, I take it 
UK 'not ready' for Brexit warns former Whitehall chief Gus O'Donnell  
In Robertson’s Bar, Rose Street. Drunk Irish guy v bearded kilted guy talking WM & Brexit - DIG - ‘Ffs you lot had chance to ditch this shit without bullets/bombs but you blew it!’BKG - ‘Salmond sex pest. Jimmy Krankie’DIG - It’s all they have. #ScotRef 
A Senior Minister Says The Tories Have Been Taken Over By ''Zealots'' Who Talk ''Bollocks'' /#Westminster #Brexit  
Out campaigning, what we hear most often...• We should never have had that bloody Referendum.• Just make it stop. We hate Brexit.‘The people’ do not think what you want them to think Brexiters. You’ve blown it. They are sick of your shit. pic.twitter.com/8t3K6Nx7Kk 
Retweet for bigger numbers With regards to Brexit who is the most annoying MP 
I’m a Tottenham voter and am very happy with David Lammy as my MP. Your party is responsible for a decade of pointless austerity, and now the disastrous bungling of Brexit, so maybe you should address that before attacking one of the few excellent MPs in Parliament. 
The reality of Brexit is the opposite of what leavers expected in every area:-healthy "young" Poles & Romanians who paid their UK taxes and didn't burden the NHS comparatively, will leave the UK-while fat old Brits will return-thought NHS was stretched now..?Just wait! 
Your response is silly and therefore indicative of Labour are failing in Scotland. Had Labour offered cohesion and sense throughout the Brexit project they would have the keys to No 10. It is the SNP who have been fighting for the rights of their remain voting country. 
.@SteveDouble MP maintains that his constituents are just as keen on #Brexit as he is. So today we asked people passing by his office in St Austell to have their say on our #Brexitometer.The big majority turned out to have very different views from Mr Double. #StopBrexit 
Fab article by @NickCohen4 citing the 320 Brexit workstreams and the need for transparency on the UKs preparedness for Brexit. Government have refused to answer me and rejected my FOIs on this matter. At every turn the Conservatives have kept parliament & the public in the dark.  
#ChrisPatten who's  known  #JacobReesMogg since #Moggy was a boy:"'It is all very well having those views and being thought to be rather an eccentric but interesting lad when you are eight. But having the same views when you are 48 raises, I think, one or two eyebrows."#Brexit  
I remember the brain drain in the 1960s and early 70s. It was obvious that brexit would trigger a second brain drain. Brexit is hollowing out the middle class. Sneer if you like, but unlike brexit billionaires they pay taxes.  
Ex-Brexit #Ministers reveal how they were constantly undermined & sidelined by #Remain #civilservants in #Whitehall, all authorized by @10DowningStreet. As @DavidDavisMP perfectly concludes: We have a "#Remainer's #Brexit!"  #StandUp4Brexit #LeaveMeansLeave 
London yelling vest demo today belonged to the general public.Being called out at every turn by many passers by was a joy.A special mention to the three Muslim teenage girls laughing at the racesplaining old angry white Brexit man,treating him to some award winning eye rolling 
Dear @guyverhofstadt & @eucopresident please note that despite @theresa_may telling us that Brexit is the 'will of the people' - well, it isn't. Most people recognise that the referendum was fraudulent and indeed there never was a plan - just planned chaos for some to profit from  
A hidden government is preparing for Brexit… by keeping us in the dark | Nick Cohen  
"Brexit: Goverment secrecy is stopping the British realising how bad it could be" - me in @ObserverUK on why we won't know until it is too late 
Dilemma of a Leave constituency MP.My people will be poorer if we Brexit, especially without a deal.  Should I vote to go ahead with it?But they voted for it. Should I give them what they want?Think what you would do for an addict.Give them what they want, or what they need? 
We are less than 50 days from leaving the EU, crashing the economy, denying our people opportunities and you chant the slogan all options are on the table. This is an abrogation of responsibility, Labour have become the midwife to the Tories Brexit. A monumental betrayal.  
I've been on a bus from Cork to Dublin with "Express" written on its side for 4hrs & have another 40 mins to go.It was meant to take 3hrs.Got duped by the side of a bus. Now I know how #Brexit voters feel like.@eucopresident, is this my special place in hell? What did I do! 
The endless claim that there are no solutions to #Brexit is pure insanity, writes Janet Daley 
When the #SNP came to power my son was in primary one. My son's just sat his Higher prelims + SNP are still in power. Not many political parties enjoy that sort of approval longevity. SNP do a great job in difficult circumstances. Thank the Lord we have them. #indyref2 #Brexit 
Brexit is toxic.Brexit is embarrassing.Brexit is unilaterally-power-shrivelling.Brexit is corrupt. Brexit is “blemished”. Brexit is Mays personal choice. Brexit it unworthy of the U.K.  Down with brexit.  
Düsseldorf University Hospital recruiting EU27 NHS workers looking to ditch Brexit Britain:  
My Brexit plan1. Announce we've left on 29th March but actually remain in EU.2. When nothing changes Remainers apologise to Leavers and tell them they were right all along.3. Everybody happy as Hoey and her mates will be none the wiser.  
Bemused world doesn’t know what to make of #Brexit Britain  via @bpolitics 
Brexit: The gift that keeps on giving. >> Netherlands talking to 250 firms about leaving UK  
Dutch pal smirkingly sends me the lead story of the biggest daily paper" Brexit Goldmine" is the headline as the crafty hollanders boast of the jobs Bonanza coming their way as companies flee UK cos of Brexit.1/  
Post Brexit:The ability to make our own trade deals The ability to make our own laws without them being overridden by EU ones, including the removal of tampon tax The ability to set up a fair immigration system that doesn't discriminate based on where you are from   
This is what @theresa_may is doing to the U.K. She speaks of delivering what the people want. The people never wanted this. What she is delivering is what a minority of the people want and a handful of vested interests want. She is selling out the people #brexit  
@eucopresident    Why not just stop "brexit" right now Hilary ? After all, everyone now knows, thanks to the Electoral Commission Investigation , that the 2016 leave vote was procured by multiple crimes, and so was certainly valid 
Kenya won’t afford referendum, polls and census at one go: Ruto  
Dover MP DESTROYS Brexit border scaremongering - reveals WHY EU will CAVE into UK demands  
As Nigel Farage hints he may become leader of a new Brexit party, @CliveBull asks would you vote for it? 
BREXIT FIGHTBACK: May under PRESSURE as Farage's new party expects SHOCK EU election win  
Can Labour's customs union plan save Brexit? – cartoon  
Our ideas for Brexit can be embraced by both Labour and Conservative MPs: #brexit #bbcaq #marr #bbcqt  
Jeremy Corbyn says Labour could still back a new Brexit referendum amid party backlashBut when?   
One of our very favourite MPs @LouiseEllman:"Leaving the EU is not just an idea - an idea of sovereignty, an idea of not being told what to do - the reality is it will just make us poorer. People are beginning to understand that..Brexit is not a done deal" #RemainLabourRally 
Hmm.My neighbor's 8 yr old Grandaughter asked me:" Clare - this Brexit mess - why doesn't the Govt just construct an algorithm - that would fix it "(She was re-setting my laptop at the time ! )  
“There’s no such thing as post-Brexit, I think it will define us for the rest of our lives.”David Cameron’s former advisor Andrew Cooper and Resolution Trust Chief Executive Gavin Kelly believe the generational split on Brexit means it will dominate politics for years to come.  
"After two years of Trump and Brexit fantasies, sections of the British and American public appear to have decided that 'the truth is not expected to be spoken' in the White House or Westminster either." 
Nigel Farage Warns British Government Angry Brexiteers Could ‘Move Towards Violence’ If Brexit Is Delayed Or ThwartedToo bloody right! We have one chance to take our country back...for our childrens future we cannot let them take this from us  
"bReXiT GiVeS uS tHe ChAnCe tO WoRk fAiRLy wITh tHe WoRLd"   
Tony Blair triggered Brexit with CRAZY policy on unchecked immigration - Brexiteer  
Vince Cable is now a more popular party leader than Jeremy Corbyn. In no small part due to our strong position in fighting against Brexit - while Labour sit and offer their loyalty to the Tories. 
Thrilled to see so many people. If we reverse national suicide of #Brexit much will be owed to @Andrew_Adonis spending weeks criss crossing country putting the case - unlike any of the BREXIT mob who decline to debate. Pls come to New Forest and speak #StopBrexitSaveBritain 
Brexit killed Corbyn. One of those true existential moments in politics, and a politician revealed what he really thought - to widespread horror.  
Radiohead's Thom Yorke: Brexit like 'early days of the Third Reich'  
Firstly, what makes you think that the younger generation replacing those 1m would vote Remain because polls show opposite. Secondly, many previous Remain voters would now vote Leave because they have witnessed how bad the EU really is & think a second vote undemocratic #Brexit  
This is not an ideal Tory Party. They've made a mess of Brexit with their factional and stubborn views. Many who voted for them now seek a  broad church party fair to all rich and poor. But not hate-filled Labour with activists who scorn the elderly, better off and home owners. 
A few Brexit related pictures, for all those #Leavers who *think* #Brexit wasn't about immigration, foreigners or racism at all.Sorry, scumsters, you were so so so wrong about that as well as everything else! #stopbrexit #RevokeArticle50 #LeaveMeansLeave #WTOBrexit #fbpe 
Gutted that Wales voted for Brexit 
Now here’s a surprise. The government has now axed its post-Brexit contract with the ferry company that has no ferries. I’m shocked. Life is so unfair. 
An excellent morning with the Oswestry #Brexitometer - even those selecting 'no deal' were very polite & expressed themselves reasonably, we were able to agree to disagree. I reckon it's because we found the Brexit Unicorn! @brexitometerhq P.S. Nota bene your deal! @theresa_may 
Mogg never stops trying to frame Ireland & the EU for the fiasco he has unleashed. If British people die from lack of medicine in a no deal brexit Mogg will blame the Irish/EU for his irresponsibility and try to capitalise on it. A cynical thug in a suit, he's a British Milosevic  
Telegraph once ran pieces with headlines like ‘All hail, Sir Philip Green.’ As wrong about Green as it is now about Boris Johnson and Brexit 
The basic problem with where we are on Brexit is that we have absolutely no idea what our future relationship with the EU will look like because we haven’t even started negotiating it yet.  It’s like moving out of your own home before you’ve found somewhere else to live. 
Are you sure you have spelt your surname correctly Stu? It was the biggest turnout in history up against gov efforts supporting Remain. It’s a majority of the voters as in all votes! Followed by GE when 80% of MPs were elected on manifesto to carry out Brexit!  
"a project cloaked in the sacred cloth of the ‘will of the people’ is going to end up being the will of almost no one."@chrisgreybrexit is the most astute Brexit analyst I've encountered so far. Read his blog:  
For inching Britain closer to Brexit happening at all, and with Labour’s blessing, Corbyn deserves blame. This was May’s game all along: to keep dangling the lunacy of no deal over our heads until an agreed Brexit looked sane by comparison.By @Freedland 
Buses.... 
Heading off to Cowbridge soon for the @FinalSayForAll Beehive event with @ValeforEurope @WalesForEurope 7pm at the Bear. If you can't make it this evening there's another event in Penarth on Monday eve, 7pm at the Windsor. #Brexit is personal.   
This take is staler than my left-over mince pies, Andrew. The party voted to respect the referendum. The party campaigned on a soft-brexit in 2017.  The party's policies are now being shoved down the Tories' throats by the EU - Guy Verhofstadt called it "heavenly".Go. Now. 
Brexit negotiations have been conducted with the aim of NOT delivering what the people decided. An EU FTA without any political ties was on the table. Leaving the EU with a trade deal was offered & refused because staying closer to the EU was what May/Robbins/remainers want.  
I’ve taken a little look through your timeline, and seen some of the other things you’ve said, and that stupid point of view doesn’t surprise me. You are clearly a xenophobe, with a very skewed and misleading view of what Brexit is going to deliver. Now jog on. 
When Vince cable came to Winchester, we made sure he left with a simple message: Leave Means Leave.Help fight for Brexit @  
Dear @ElectoralCommUK @ICOnews why is a man under investigation by FBI & OLAF for UKIP activity allowed to start a new party? Where does he get his funding & data? #BrexitSyndicate #RevokeA50 @JasnaBadzak @resist_brexit @StillDelvingH @BrexitInspecto1 
What has happened to the countryBlatantly illegal and mendacious campaign gives slight marginThis gives permission for vile xenophobic and aggressive behaviourNo logic or reason as the Brexit we'll get appears worse and worseThere is no argument for itWhere is the sanity? 
Love Booze Hate Brexit  
Theresa, Theresa, Theresa.Your cabinet knows you can't deliver Brexit on time.Your civil service knows you can't deliver Brexit on time.Parliament knows you can't deliver Brexit on time.And so do we. And so do you.Just say so.  
A modest proposal: we hold the next Scottish independence referendum, and the referendum on Irish reunification *on the same day* - let’s see the British state fight on those two fronts simultaneously, whilst in the midst of #Brexit meltdown. 
No-deal Brexit would reduce our overseas freight capacity to TEN PER CENT of what it is now.That's not 'by' 10%. That is TO 10%.A death blow.  
The trouble with covering Brexit right now is that few seem privately to really think No Deal on March 29th is likely. Theresa May could yet frighten enough Tory ERG and Labour rebels to get her Withdrawal Agreement (it isn't a deal for the future) over the line. But (cont) 
Brexit: Netherlands talking to 250 firms about leaving UK  
Macron has organised “Le grand débat national”- 5397 meetings across France to discuss the future. It’s working. One man told The Times “We’re rediscovering the pleasure of talking together in the evening.” Another as collective national therapy.” An idea for a Brexit ravaged UK? 
This is Sinn Féin giving a powerful speech on the need for a referendum on Irish Unity if the backstop is dropped, spelling out the bad faith behind the move.  
Pressure grows on Grayling as Brexit ferry firm dumped with Labour saying he's the "worst secretary of state ever"  
Business overwhelmingly wants to #Remain.56% of the public and growing would now vote to stay in the EU.Every version of Brexit puts jobs, business and investment at risk.Stop being complicit in this shambles. It’s time to campaign to #RevokeA50 and #StopBrexit. 
The European Union unmasked as Leo Varadkar. "And I would have gotten away with it to if it wasnt for you meddling kids"#Irexit #Brexit  
Jeremy Corbyn says Labour could still back a new Brexit referendum amid party backlash.When you're ready, Jeremy.You can't keep competing with May to see who can kick their can the furthest down the road.  
WATCH | Ex-Brexit Ministers reveal how they were constantly undermined and sidelined by Remain civil servants in Whitehall, all authorised by 10 Downing Street.As David Davis perfectly concludes: We have a "Remainer's Brexit!" Support us at  
Caroline wants to 'listen' to Leave voters.48 days to #Brexit, she now wants to 'listen' to us peculiar creatures.What a patronising waste of £77k per year, UK.  
More than 40 companies last year moved, or said they would move, their operations from Britain to the Netherlands in response to Brexit uncertainties, Dutch authorities report  
Hey @BrineMinister Winchester overwhelmingly came out in support of a people’s vote today. Back your constituents and support a peoples vote to stop Brexit. @Andrew_Adonis @vincecable 
Kind of you to remind us indirectly that your investment outfit set up in Dublin specifically because of the economic risk and uncertainty of the no deal Brexit which you welcome for everyone else.  
Was Brexit really all about tax dodging for the rich? 
Brexit: Seaborne Freight no-deal ferry contract scrapped at last.But this fiasco is far bigger than a ferry.It’s symptomatic of so much that is rotten about Brexit.No plan. False promises. Wasted money.Write to your MP. Demand #RevokeA50 & #Remain. 
Today @yfg made history becoming the first branch of YFG in Northern Ireland. Now more than ever we need young people showing leadership and bringing about positive change in what are challenging times politically on this island. #cooperation #Brexit  
OK, now that everyone has had a good vent, I’ve removed the offending tweet. Still waiting for an answer to this one, though. Who are the racist “architects” of #Brexit - the people who campaigned for it (like me), or the people charged with implementing it?  
Petition:Order immediate adjournment of the Brexit process during the NCA Investigation into criminal offences relating to electoral law on the behalf of #Brexit supporting campaigners.   
Around 250 companies are in talks about moving their operations to the Netherlands from Britain ahead of Brexit , the Dutch Government has said  
Ian Blackford is right, Labour's failure to oppose Brexit is the scandal of my lifetime. I will never forgive Labour & Jeremy Corbyn as long as I live.@IanBlackfordMP is the true Leader of the Opposition while Corbyn fails and fails; utter betrayal, tory enablers@jenniegensec 
Anti-Brexit rally in Winchester. ‘What do we want? People’s Vote! Now!’  
'Obsessed with racism & Tommy Robinson'Oppose free movement & open borders you're a racistSupport Brexit you're a racistSupport Tommy Robinson you're a racistOppose your country being turned into a shit hole you're a racistSupport your own people you're a racist pic.twitter.com/ASV7PVKJUP 
Influential? Yes, perhaps. As the Guardian reported after the conviction of Jo Cox's killer: "Prosecutors acknowledge privately that the febrile atmosphere in which the EU referendum campaign was waged appears certain to have contributed to Mair’s decision to murder his MP"  
WHAT ABOUT BREXIT ???!!! 
Sure, the choice between ruining one country or ruining the entire planet is an easy one. Climate change bigger than #Brexit, says Green Party - BBC News  
Data Protection and Brexit - all you need to know here  
Queuing up to board my plane from Stockholm. This is my last trip to “Europe” before the predicted #brexit meltdown. I am European in my very bones, & It’s such a huge part of my personal & professional life. I want to go home, but I don’t want to leave...  
Germany is "prepared" if there's a hard Brexit, finance minister says  
Farage is a lazy chancer. In years on the EU fisheries policy committee where he could have argued for our fisherman, he virtually never attended. He was paid to represent interests of the UK and did nothing but whinge. Typical Brexit establishment. 
Brexit: Netherlands talking to 250 firms about leaving UK  
People I speak to every day want to wake up from this madness.Theresa May wants a blank cheque for a blindfold Brexit and to scare MPs into a blackmail Brexit by running down the clock and threatening no dealThe great British public should have a #FinalSay in a #peoplesvote 
With 50 days until 29th March, the clock is ticking and many of us are hoping for a WTO Brexit - Louise Mclean  
Read my response to the SNP's @IanBlackfordMP who has ludicrously accused Labour of supporting Theresa May's Brexit deal - a deal @UKLabour continue to unequivocally oppose. 
Have you had enough of seeing Dr Victoria Bateman's minge? #DrVictoriaBateman #Brexit 
Register today so we can be ready to deliver the #Brexit that 52% voted for in the #EUref 
If you want to hear the EU "explain themselves" the Commission holds a press conference at midday (11:00 GMT) every single week day where they explain what they've doing. Sometimes they discuss Brexit. Most of the time they have other stuff to deal with. 
#PeoplesVote #StopBrexit anti-Brexit March in Tory marginal seat of Winchester. Just a thought, Steve Brine MP.  
This Germany Plus option for Brexit is brilliant. We get an EVEN BETTER DEAL than Germany!Control of Borders and Laws!We stay out of Euro!Veto on any EU Army!Votes on laws!A court which treats us fairly!Fresh food!No Tariffs or Customs!No NI BorderIt's called Remain.  
We’re in Delyn today delivering leaflets & giving out postcards to send to @DavidHansonMP to demand a #PeoplesVote on Brexit. Even talking about no-deal is the most irresponsible thing any government could possibly do. @WalesForEurope @peoplesvote_uk @Gogs4Europe 
That’s it Mr pencil. It’s the Irish .. you better wind up your hedge fund HQ that you opened there to protect your profits from the negative impact that Brexit will have on your funds. Show those Irish and move your company back to the UK. Stiff upper lip man. 
@BBCNews & @bbcquestiontime should try holding the actual UK Government to account first!  Try some fact based journalism rather than the State mouthpiece/ Brexit Broadcasting Corporation approach that they have been taking for the last three years #BrexitBias #FinalSayForAll 
#Brexit has given a voice to the neanderthals that call themselves yellow vests. The government needs to get a lid on this extremism before it gets totally out of control. 
Young people don't want to spend their whole lives arguing about Brexit. Just accept the result, deliver on it and let us all move on.  
Not in my name...nor millions of others..26.5% of the Ppl is not the People37% voters do not represent a maj of the electorate.The Non-Binding opinion of 51.8% voting does not make #Brexit Binding.LiesIllegalitiesLost MandatesRights Removed w/o ConsentNOTHING TO RESPECT  
If you didn’t get to see ‘Brexit The Movie’ when it was released prior to the #Referendum in 2016, watch it now with the benefit of hindsight to see just how accurate a picture it painted  
Driven by Brexit, about 250 companies are in talks to relocate to the Netherlands  
New #Brexit party has more than £1 in pledges and slate of over 002 candidates, including Mr Edward and Mrs Tubbs. #TheBrexitParty 
Nobody cared about EU before the referendum it was ‘won’ by less than a 2% swing with proven criminal activity and lies by Brexit elites, May called the election to boost her majority to deliver a Hard Brexit & 60% rejected her plea & leaving looks nothing like it did 3 yrs ago! 
The whole point of democracy......is that the public retain the right to ditch bad politicians & policies when they fail.#Brexit  
Well, like, obviously...BBC News - Climate change bigger than Brexit, says Green Party  
Seen in London today #GiletsJaunes #Brexit  
The Brexit legal challenges that could force Britain to leave without a deal  
I hope Dave has a criminal record. He will be banned to visit the EU forever!EU ETIAS system will ban anybody with criminal past to visit the EU.This is the EU Brexit benefit - all UK former criminals living now in Spain will be returned to the UK. 
BBC bans EU flags at Eurovision event - and provides Union flags instead.#Brexit has revealed with brutal clarity the way in which the UK is ruled by a self-serving, interconnected and abusive elite of which the BBC top management is part. #PeoplesVote 
Sir Vince Cable MP: Brexit has fractured old alliances and is fostering new ones with each passing day  via @PoliticsHome 
An immensely powerful piece on how the establishment has been trying to stop the democratic decision of the 2016 Referendum.  
I’ve been insulted three times from the referendum and now for speaking French on the phone to friends or family. It never happened before the referendum and when I arrived in London back in September 2010. This situation is getting worse and worse... 
Theresa May placed the UK in all but one of these frameworks since the Brexit vote and aims to place the UK in the final one within months of the official exit date.Most MPs know next to nothing about these arrangements.3/ 
Stephen Hammond suggests he would quit government to vote against no deal Brexit.But when Parliament had a chance to vote against no deal HE DIDN'T QUIT THE GOVERNMENT TO VOTE AGAINST IT.No wonder trust in politicians is at an all-time low 
Driven by Brexit, about 250 companies are in talks to relocate to the Netherlands  
Study Concludes 100,000 German Jobs at Risk From No Deal Brexit2019-02-09 13:11:47.712 GMT(Bloomberg) -- The U.K. leaving the European Union withoutan exit deal would jeopardize 100,000 jobs in Germany. 
"Hell is empty and all the devils are here...."  The Tempest#Brexit #ERG #StopBrexit #PeoplesVote 
Brexit was always a coup launched by the Right, to enrich the Right.  
Climate change a bigger issue than Brexit, says Green Party NI leader Clare Bailey  
Years of us fighting to get our views taken seriously and you decide we need to get our tits out to be heard.Well done! Anti-Brexit Cambridge academic appears naked on BBC Radio 4's Today  via @MailOnline 
We all got distracted by talk of hellfire that we missed the main reason why Donald Tusk was so angry at the Brexit politicians who had no "sketch of a plan for how to carry it SAFELY". Watch   
Britain is bitterly divided over Brexit, it is beyond disingenuous to pretend otherwise, whilst 75-80% of people support public ownership of utilities. 
Rees-Mogg published a book on Brexit in 2015 saying there should be a referendum on the deal struck. He’s changed his mind on that, while still quoting the book to refute Tusk’s ‘no plan’ point. - So, where was this brilliant 2-referendum plan in the fraudulent ‘Leave’ campaign? 
When Remainers say to you 'Well David Davis/Dominic Raab were in charge of the negotiations', steer them to this.Brexiteers have been ignored, forced out and undermined at every turn in this process. It has been a shameless coup by Remain.#NoDeal #WTO #Brexit #GoWTO 
Wow!This is strong stuff but the logical consequence of #Brexit. Ireland will reunify & Scotland will gain independence. The #Brexit zealots will have done what no hostile goverment has managed, the break up of the United Kingdom. Just wow! #Brexit = end of the  UK  
Great report frm ⁦@naughtiej⁩ on ⁦@BBCr4today⁩ at 1.49 with former Scottish #CJEU judge David Edward on why #Brexit has made him consider supporting #independence. Policy development will be key to persuading more #indyref2 
Sir John Major: ‘If Tory Brexiters think I’ll move over, they’re making a big mistake’.Brexit is splitting the country and will hit the poorest hardest, says former PM.It’s time to #StopBrexit.Write to your MP to demand #RevokeA50 & #Remain. 
Absolute nonsense. Traders not ready to do the new customs arrangements in the UK or EU. Not all traders qualify for @HMRCgovuk simplified process - no info what they can do. #Brexit All hauliers will need 2 EORI numbers and impossible to get 2 now. @RHANews Transition essential 
Nashville voters approved a referendum to create a civilian police oversight board. Black community leaders had been pushing for it for decades. Now, the Republican-dominated state legislature may strip the board of some of its most important provisions.  
The new Brexit party backed by Nigel Farrage may well find a lot of LibDems rushing to join because they surely can't all be gagging to stay in the EU like their Pied Piper leader Vince Cable, who merrily dances to the Brussels tune as he leads them back over the Channel. 
Failure to deliver on Brexit will damage the UK's global standing.  
I’ll be welcoming SNP Westminster Leader, @IanBlackfordMP to the constituency for a talk on Brexit - a chance to put your thoughts and questions to us. Entry requires registration at the following link, the exact time and venue will be confirmed ASAP  
Spanish supremacists promoted by @guyverhofstadt march in Santa Colona against Catalonia’s Referendum. The Nazi SS Panzer Division banner leads the rally protected by the police. #HelpCatalonia 
Stewart Lee on Brexit  
Yup. Because this is what Brexit was invented for.  
“If they don’t deliver Brexit, what’s the point in voting? That’s the feeling on the street at the moment. Democracy is over. Brussels owns it.”Labour MP ⁦@GloriaDePiero⁩’s constituent Mark is right. This is a good and thoughtful piece. 
The British expats in Spain facing an uncertain future under no-deal Brexit 
I will also support a referendum if it is about redrawing the administrative boundaries of Kenya to remove such counties as Nandi, Taita Taveta,  Turkana, Samburu, Kisii n West Pokot  etc. We should  only have  counties which are not founded on ethnic lines. 
If Seabourne Ferries can have their contract cancelled due to it being impossible to deliver, then can we cancel brexit for the same reason?  
A young Brexiteer who’s fighting the Electoral Commission in court went back home to tell his nana about it all... and her reaction is brilliant Help fight for Brexit @  
Former PM Sir John Major is absolutely right - the poorest will be hit hardest by Brexit. It's why the only way forward is a #PeoplesVote. Please RT:  
Cold, wet and windy day but the only frosty reception was for the UK Gov and their handling of Brexit. @theSNP #ScotlandCan #ActiveSNP 
The Communist Party of #Cuba is urging the people to vote in a Constitutional referendum. For this reason alone, as an act of civil disobedience, the people of #Cuba should boycott this sham process. Do not legitimize the lawless regime by voting yes or no. #CubaBoicot #YoNoVoto 
As the government cancels Seaborne Freight's Brexit ferry contract over its lack of a financial backer, here's how the company's CEO responded to Private Eye's questions about funding last month. To stay ahead of the news, subscribe:  
Interviewed Tony Blair today on a wide variety of issues including Brexit, anti-semitism and the Middle East... you can watch it on tomorrow’s @RidgeOnSunday 9am @SkyNews #Ridge 
The ‘Backstop’ would tie the UK to the EU indefinitely and prevent bilateral FTAs. A trap to prevent a successful Brexit. If the GFA was the real Issue, Article 24 of GATT allows free trade to continue, as would a sea border with special status for ROI  
Brexit Britain, fighting over the corpse whose only use is as an organ donor. - The Netherlands has emerged as one of the winners in securing businesses that seek to leave the UK because of Brexit vying with countries such as Germany, France and Ireland.  
According to the Brexiteers anyone talking of this was just engaged in Project Fear - instead it’s reality..... Brexit: 250 UK companies discuss moving to Netherlands  
Wow, in Coatbridge? 75% (excluding undecided) prefer Indy #Scotref rather than #Brexit   
#Brexit - A Still Life  
*Brexit is a democratic decision which Gvt must deliver* is false.*The Gov't must act in the interests of UK* is true.The combo is a contraditionA false premise can lead to absurd conclusions, as it has with Brexit.So not Malthouse. No Brexit is best.  
More to the point, Farage is a Person of Interest in the FBI Mueller enquiry & his Brexit campaign is under investigation by the @NCA_UK for fraud.  Why the HELL is he allowed to participate in our democracy? In any other walk of life he would be suspended. 
#GiletsJaunes earlier today in #Paris carrying a banner that reads "EU = Miserable Treason" and "Referendum #Frexit".  #MSM completely missing in action. 
Brexit is a shambles. Brexit is illegitimate. Brexit is unstable. Brexit is unpopular. Brexit is a disgrace. Brexit is an insult to us all. Down with brexit. 
If you read one Brexit story today read this. And if you liked it remember to subscribe!  
We can’t wait for a people’s vote: make the case against Brexit right now | Jonathan Freedland  
Sometimes wish May had appointed Mogg as Brexit Secretary. At least for a month or so. That would surely have exposed how useless he is for all to see.#RevokeA50 
Would it be good for the Irish reunification referendum to happen at the same time as #IndyRef2? 
Man who spends his entire time getting angry & unbelievably tribal about Brexit has no comprehension why people get angry or tribal...   
Why? People keep saying "We have to leave because we voted to leave." What if we had a referendum right now and the country rejected the Brexit options which are actually available 3 years after the vote? Are you saying we should still leave, knowing that people don't want to? 
Farage called for a 2nd referendum if Remain won a narrow victory, as did Redwood and Raab. That wasn't a vote on the outcome of negotiations, just a straight replay.  #PeoplesVote 
A great day in Sutton!Thousands of leaflets delivered and many good conversations.It's a challenging place to campaign (70/30 at the referendum) but still lots of support. The mode is shifting as people realise promises are not being kept.#peoplesvote@GloriaDePiero 
“What the KFC chicken crisis tells us about Brexit food shortages”. 80% of veggies in the UK are imported. Think hard before ridding yourselves of grazing livestock (and count your chickens).  | WIRED UK  
Great @CandC_SNP #ActiveSNP campaigning this morning in Coatbridge Main Street. Not much confidence in the Tories handling of Brexit and lots of support for independence as the best option in this chaos. #ScotlandCan @theSNP 
If comedy has a message today, it’s that subversion isn’t cool any more. Almost everyone in UK comedy is anti-#Brexit and pro-establishment, defending the political status quo. Can anyone direct me to a topical TV show that actually does satire? 
I spend far too much time posting facts on Facebook re the disaster of Brexit, with little or no comment from any of my friends, until today. One of my mates has just told me that my posts alone have convinced him the he was wrong to vote leave and will join our campaign! Result 
The MSM likes to demonise Brexiteers but Labour MP John Mann reveals he has suffered death threats and threats of sexual violence against his wife and daughter for representing his 70% Leave constituency and backing Brexit.A principled, proper Labour MP. Stand firm, John!  
Yep it was sunshine on #Leith Walk again today - if a bit blustery! Thanks to all our @theSNP team today, enjoyed some terrific chats w folks on the doors - main topic of conversation, unsurprisingly, the bùrach that is #Brexit... #ActiveSNP #ScotlandCan 
It took years of relentless hate and lies in the tax-dodging #Brexit billionaire press to win a marginal victory in a referendum which was rigged to exclude those most affected from the vote. #PeoplesVote #FBPE 
The Dutch economic affairs ministry said it managed to lure 42 companies or branch offices and 1,923 jobs from Britain in 2018, ahead of Brexit. But that's just the Netherlands. There are another 26 EU countries all gaining from our Brexit loss too! 
Out in Nantwich and the @LauraSmithMP line of ‘people just want to get on with it’ did not ring true at all. They hate Brexit. They think it’s going terribly. ‘Just make it stop’ was heard over and over again.@brightsider123 @EUmoveMACC 
Imagine if a male Brexiteer took his clothes off, went on a radio show and said “I invite X female remainer to a naked debate about Brexit”. Brexiteers would be disassociating themselves with him (for good reason), and remain would be calling every single Brexiteer a pervert.  
Has Brexit made Britain more racist? This week Skin told us some observations she's made since the EU referendum.@skinskinny | @TheJeremyVine | #jeremyvine 
This is a must watch. “We are heading for a Remainer’s Brexit”  
That's what #Brexit looks like from the outer space. #leavemeansleave #SaturdayThoughts #SaturdayMotivation #StandUp4Brexit 
Game theory says Brexit negotiations are now all about avoiding blame  
“I think we have made the worst foreign policy decision since the Second World War and maybe for a good deal longer”: the former PM Sir John Major on Brexit 
I’m young, metropolitan, educated and multilingual – but proud to have backed Brexit - Lewis Feilder  
Campaigners in a blustery Bristol today demanding that Karin Smyth MP @karinsmyth backs a #PeoplesVote on #Brexit  
Brexit: 250 UK companies discuss moving to Netherlands 
Thought this was a nice picture following this morning. Thank for those who were able to spend time volunteering. It is important for us to continue to discuss Brexit. #Brexit #brexitometer #PeoplesVote 
Duplicity from Sinn Fein in this discussion is staggering. They say they don’t want a general election (48 days from Brexit deadline), but DO want FF to support a motion of no confidence...which causes a general election.  @SaturdayRTE 
European Court has ordered UK to provide a Somali woman and her children, who have no connection with the UK whatsoever, with a council house. What will the EU court order us to do if we do not get No Deal Brexit? 
this is a really important article from @RobDotHutton reminding us that leading Eurosceptics used to like the Norway-style idea of Britain staying in EEA after a referendum - a position they now decry as a Brexit sell-out 
Bill Keegan reviews his life as an economics correspondent and ends with Brexit "I am still hoping that, at the 11th hour, the country will come to its  senses. The oil crises of the 1970s were external shocks. This crisis is self-inflicted."  
If the Peers are asleep at least they are not trying to thwart Brexit. 
If the Conservatives fail to deliver a clean and proper Brexit by 11:00pm on March 29th 2019, will you leave the Conservative party and vote for @Nigel_Farage's new Brexit party?Please vote and retweet for a large and representative sample. Thanks. 
EVERY TIME someone takes a (well-deserved) shot at the idiots and egotists who CREATED Brexit, the spineless fuckers immediately turn to all the Leave voters and say “Do you hear what they’re calling YOU?”WE’RE NOT CALLING YOUR SUPPORTERS LIARS OR IDIOTS; JUST *Y O U*  
When the UK needs real leadership, we are stuck with the worst PM &  opposition leader in history. May & Corbyn are incompetent, anti British, unable to lead & neither have any vision for post #Brexit Britain. They can’t lead, won’t stand up to the EU & don’t believe in Britain!  
Millions of voters, many who’d never supported the Tories before, backed Mrs May because they trusted her to hold firm on her Brexit red lines. Many who voted Labour thought they were supporting a party that would respect the result. No wonder trust in our politics is at a low. 
Someone should ask Mrs May's BREXIT adviser, Olly Robbins, (1) does he now support BREXIT and (2) does he now support Northern Ireland being in the United Kingdom. Clarity on these two fundamental issues before one has confidence in the advice he continues to give to the PM!! 
One positive outcome of Brexit is how it brings international communities to work together. Let's hope that international academic collaborations can also survive Brexit. Tweet us your concerns! @polonium_org @ComunidadCeru @aisuk_info @PARSUK_ @BritishCouncil#Brexit  
May’s Brexit deal “a further recipe for division and dysfunction” says former Civil Service head.It provides “neither clarity nor closure”, says Gus O’Donnell.And it means leaving with no idea of where we are going.Write to your MP. #StopBrexit. 
Looks like they are hardly queueing up to sign trade deals after #Brexit. Of course, we will have herring and mackerel on our plates after we signed an agreement with the mighty Faroe Islands - time to end this act of self-harm!  
#Remain tried Compromise by allowing ALL voters a #FinalSay in a #PeoplesVote to CONFIRM the True Maj Will. Our Compromise was to accept the result either way.May & Corbyn opposed it.#Brexit vs #Lexit IS NOT A COMPROMISE.BOTH = BREXITMPs choiceUK FUBAR vs #RevokeA50 NOW 
Looking forward to all the political shows tomorrow celebrating Corbyn’s massive win; his Brexit plan letter to Mrs May, which gained the public endorsement of the EU and could unify Parliament and the country.#marr#Ridge#CorbynsCustomsUnion 
Winchester gearing up for pro-EU march. @BrineMP when will you see that a people’s vote deal vs remain is the only sensible way out of this Brexit mess @WinLD 
After all the abuse Scots got for complaining about the BBC in the indy referendum it's funny seeing all the Remainers in England starting to understand that the BBC has very definite political objectives of its own. Difference is we woke up and smelt the coffee a long time ago. 
I live in Spain and voted #Remain. Talked to a #brexiteering, British expat the other day, telling him he needed to apply for residency because of #brexit; it's now the law. He actually said to me "What's the law got to do with it?" 
TA TA BRITAIN! EU establishment happy to see Brexit UK leave asap.. for THIS reason  
Saturday ACT 6 #YellowVestsUK #YellowVests #GiletJaunes #Brexit #BrexitBetrayal #LeaveMeansLive #Westminster #Anony… 
The only thing that will bring our country back together @jeremycorbyn is to give people the #FinalSay once there is a viable Brexit and it’s clear what we’re letting our country and people in for #RightToVote 
Umu Igbo, chetakwa: There can be no referendum until you change the Constitution. Buhari cannot give you referendum. Atiku cannot give you referendum. No Presidential candidate can. Only NASS members can change the Constitution and give you referendum. Go & vote in NASS election! 
It’s no longer just about #Brexit. It’s about whether we live in a #democracy! #StandUp4Brexit #LeaveMeansLeave 
Only 1,152 hours until Brexit. No more @donaldtusk No more @guyverhofstadt No more @JunckerEU No more MerkelGood riddance to these unelected undemocratic puffed up megalomaniacs and their EU tyrannical hell Tick Tock  
Since there are so many foaming-at-the-mouth Remainers on my timeline, now would be a good moment to ask: Who are the racist architects of #Brexit? Who are the people behind Brexit who are motivated by racial hatred? It's a serious accusation. Any names? 
#LeaveLies have utterly perverted #Brexit as a democratic process. There are many of us who will work tirelessly to see these shameless liars jailed for exploiting democratic freedom in order to destroy democracy with their lies. 
Great @ASNK_SNP canvassing session in Aberdeen South today. Seems folk are a bit unhappy with Brexit - and their MP... #ActiveSNP 
Instead of Brexit lets just have an evening of Candace Owens and Ken Livingstine babbling about Hitler on BBC2, and then move on with our lives - thankful for what we, as Euopeans, have achieved since the last time fascists dominated 
A dark and insidious authoritarianism is creeping across the European Union.Britain is not leaving a beacon of freedom.A ‘No Deal’ Brexit is looking less like a risky venture and more like a desperately needed lifeboat at the scene of a tragedy. 
Colonialism 2.0: 'Some of the world’s poorest countries are being forced to agree potentially damaging trade deals with the UK by government “threats” in the rush to Brexit'  
French firms start to panic about no deal Brexit  
#Brexit has nothing to do with racism. Constantly using that word in connection with Brexit impugns the motives of everyone who voted for it, and it’s why the Remain campaign lost the referendum, yet they keep throwing it out there. You think they’d learn. 
Dear @Conservatives please explain why and how TM Remains PM? She has lied, obfuscated, deceived and ignored at every opportunity. Thousands, like me, joined the Brexit Party today. TM is leading your party to extinction. Congratulations on sitting idly by while she did it.  
Read between the lines. Jeremy Corbyn's Brexit tests are just his way of keeping Britain in the EU by the back door. The authentic Eurosceptic Corbyn of old has completely sold out to big business and the Blairite-led Remain campaign.  
I have four trips booked after the 29th March this year. One to Ireland, two to Ibiza, and one to Italy. I don't care if I have to queue a bit long, pay roaming charges to use my phone or the pound is a bit weaker. That's the difference between us Leavers and Remoaners. #Brexit 
@SNPgryffe powering through #StormErik today to speak to voters in Kilmacolm. The uncertainty of #Brexit a hot topic and lots of positive discussion about Scottish independence.#ScotlandCan #ActiveSNP 
Can anyone name anything about Brexit which has gone well and will improve people’s lives? Should be easy an easy one surely? 
This is the battle field for @MaziNnamdiKanu.This is where he is fighting his war. Telling you to boycott an election that will help you select leaders that will make life better for you. His children and wife is in UK. Stay here and be shouting no referendum no election.  
Good to be out and about in the ward, today listening to folks in Scone. Talking brexit, independence and of course any local issues. #activesnp 
This is exactly what’s so disgraceful about Brexit and the forces promoting it. Casual, insulting racism, thrown out, without a thought, to dismiss entire nations from a smirkingly superior perch. What do you actually know about Lithuania? 
Tory Brexiteers display a complete lack of solidarity, not only with our European friends but also with the rest of the world. Liam Fox is currently pressuring developing countries to sign up to dangerous trade deals post-Brexit. 
Brexit will happen unless the Government is toppled.Question, how does one topple a Government when the opposition want the same thing? 
It's past #Brexit now.It's about #BrexitShambles...and the #reputationaldamage that #NoDealNoProblem fanatics have caused. Those of us who chose this great nation to become citizens of ..and  are proud of it...many of us are appalled and upset.What's happened? #UKHorrorStory 
One of our teams out this morning in Chelmsford with Ella the East of England’s mascot Join the fastest growing Brexit movement @  
Activists out in Dagenham & Rainham today demanding a People’s Vote on #Brexit  Where are YOU campaigning today?  Tweet your photos and videos using #PeoplesVote  
Much has been made of Labour issues this week, but Theresa May's week has been far worse & it shows Jeremy Corbyn is still running rings around her. Her Brexit plan is as dead as ever. Her delusion is holding up a deal. The EU want Corbyn, who offers the common sense solutions.  
And this lot are running the country and negotiating for our future!  Heaven help us all!Halt the clock on Brexit now and put May’s deal to the people - the deal we have now (EU membership) or the deal she’s negotiated (out of EU) @LibDems @thomasbrake 
If that were true (hint it isn't) then why does Switzerland have a free trade agreement with China but the EU doesn't?! Why do Chile and Israel have far more extensive free trade agreements than the EU? Because the EU is a highly protectionist Little Europeans Club #Brexit  
The problem is not a distant bureaucracy in Brussels, it is a distant and uncaring government in Westminster. England is a hopelessly & dangerously overcentralised country. We need devolution to regional governments with powers like those of Scotland. #PeoplesVote #Brexit #FBPE 
Today, I will broadcast on  Radio Biafra with a live audience at the #IPOB London Family meeting.Time is at 8 PM Biafraland time and 7 PM UK time.Biafra Referendum is on February 16, 2019. Sit-at-home and be counted. 
Excited to announce our mini-series of film interviews with Balkan women directors, made possible by an Erasmus-funded exchange between Another Gaze and Tatjana Hoser (yay, fuck Brexit). It includes Teona Strugar Mitevska (Macedonia), Iris Elezi (Albania), Blerta Zeqiri (Kosovo). pic.twitter.com/tIgD4Z4ISN 
I've never studied politics, Alex, but I analyse businesses from helping them articulate their strategic goals to helping them implement tactical solutions. This is my thumbnail sketch analysis of Brexit. 
Brexit is 48 days away. #brexit 
Despite Brexit, the manufacturing industry in the UK is in good health and provides huge value to the UKs economy. UK manufacturers must continue to embrace the digital transformation  
BREXIT IN: 48 DAYS.The clock is ticking on #Brexit. You'd think the House of Commons would be busier than ever...  
“Brexit is incompatible with the devolution settlement in both NI and Scotland” - @patrickharvie on the importance of all devolved institutions having their say on #Brexit #GreenMeansRemain 
Days to go until Brexit - 48Alternative Arrangements - 0Trade Agreements this week - 1 (Faroe Islands) 
Nadine had to ask her mate what the Customs Union does. She’s campaigned for 15 years to leave the EU, and only 18 months after the Brexit vote did she think to ask what the f*cking Customs Union is. Absolutely massive donkey.  
Here's another fact.  The deal that the EU have just told Theresa May to adopt is the exact same deal Labour have had as a policy since 2016, and in our manifesto in 2017.  The lie that "Labour has no policy on Brexit" has been spouted endlessly, but the lie is now laid bare. 
I love facts. Facts are what keep us sane.  Wheeling out this particular muppet again just because Labour's soft-Brexit is winning the argument is hilarious, though.  They really do think we can't see what they're up to, don't they?  
He said the architects Pat, not the supporters. You can’t say he’s misrepresented Brexit and then misrepresent the article 
We need Theresa May to stop pandering to a small group of hard right MPs & get behind Mr Corbyn's Brexit plan, which the EU have welcomed as workable. He is the real Prime Minister, after all. Just need #GeneralElectionNow to formalise it  
I expect that we will have to fight off amendments to take “no deal Brexit “off the table again this week , anyone who supports ruling out “no deal” does not want the U.K. to Leave the E.U. 
Brits want to #Brexit.MPs don'tBrits want a #NoDeal #WTOBrexitMPs don't.Silly me, I thought I lived in a democracy.I thought I lived in the 'Mother of Democracy' 
“The government was reluctant to Leave. That has meant our entire negotiation has been fearful, conducted in a posture of supplication. The entire approach is suffused by a reluctance to deliver what the public wanted. ““The result is we have ended up with a Remainers’ Brexit.”  
'Thousands of Tory party members' to defect to Nigel Farage's Brexit Party as it gets official approval  via @Telegraph 
Just walked past someone carrying a ‘94 pack’ of toilet roll. It’s the most Brexit thing I’ve ever seen. 
That then is the essential background to the next few weeks of Brexit, you can have Brexit and close relations with the EU, preserving as far as possible arrangements in Ireland, or full-Brexit, meaning putting the US agricultural lobby first. Take your pick... 21/ end 
Large ⁦@scotlibdems⁩ team out in Aberdeen as part of our Exit from Brexit action day  
#MPs have had 1 job for the past 3 years & that is to deliver #Brexit. They have failed because most MPs still won’t accept the result, are actively trying to sabotage delivering Brexit & any deal won’t deliver what Brits voted for. If MP’s can’t do the job, quit! #StandUp4Brexit 
Always amazes me to see who people align themselves with. When Brexit was being was being punted, after seeing who was heading-up the Leave campaign, it took me 5 minutes to realise I had to vote Remain. 
"The cat's done a whoopsie on me Brexit." (One for our younger listeners here)  
They don't deserve a single penny. Retweet! #Brexit  
Sir Vince Cable MP: Brexit has fractured old alliances and is fostering new ones with each passing day  via @PoliticsHome 
The usual masterly weekly Brexit summary from @tconnellyRTE, with detailed analysis of Tusk's remarks and of the twists and turns that brought Theresa May's Brexit policy to the current impasse  
I see Chris Grayling is trending. I won't bother to look, I'm certain it'll be because he has eased all of our Brexit concerns with an impressive combination of innovative thinking, rigorous application of tested methods and unrelenting diligence in the performance of his duties. 
“With Eurocrats attacking Britain in ever more feverish terms, expect support for a proper No Deal Brexit to shoot up.” Read our newsletter analysing the week’s events   
Defence chiefs know this situation is wrong. Lt Gen Richard Nugee, MoD head of defence people, said the department wants min income thresholds waived for military families, but claimed the Home Office is now too “consumed” by Brexit preparations to engage further... 
If this arch-bureaucrat and Remainer is correct about us not being ready for #Brexit, it's entirely the fault of the senior civil servants who have tried to block it at every turn.Each should be sacked immediately, to make room for those who'll deliver. 
There are about 80 members of the ERG. They represent the views of a tiny minority of the British people (probably < 1%), but they are effectively holding our country to ransom. They want a no deal #Brexit for purely ideological reasons. They must be stopped. #RevokeArticle50 
The Brexit right now has a personality cult of its own. The leader commands the machine. Dissent will not be tolerated. All hail Farage!   
"A socialised healthcare system in the US would clip the wings of the American ‘healthcare’ corporations that are circling the Brexit negotiations like vultures. By advancing Medicare for All in the US, the UK may protect its own NHS."  
Brussels would like to force the UK Govt into a cross-party deal that would see Britain remain in a Customs Union. Remaining in a Customs Union is not what the British people voted for, not what we were promised AND simply not Brexit.#StandUp4Brexit 
This is fabulous. The search for the “sweet spot” and two regulatory orbits of EU and post-Brexit U.K. all vis-a-vis keeping open border in Ireland and an ERG that don’t really want to find it; while EU don’t trust U.K. enough to do so w/o backstop.  
First rule of no-deal Brexit: if you're not scared of no deal, you don't understand the no deal scenario.There is no second rule. 
Mr Gardiner, why is your party not opposing a criminally procured referendum ? May I suggest you speak to the Democrats in the US Congress who are investigating #TrumpRussia. They’ll tell you how it’s done!  #RevokeA50 #StopBrexit #DialMueller 
We KNOW how hard you are working for America sir! We appreciate not only the efforts, but the results as well!Record low unemployment, historic tax cuts, rolled back regulations, 4.1% GDP growth, renegotiating deals with foreign government to OUR favor, supporting BREXIT, etc! 
‘Buy your wine now’: the Bordeaux vineyards bottling before Brexit. Good to see my friend ⁦@GavinQuinney⁩ in The Guardian this morning. 
Where Europe Would Be Hurt Most by a No-Deal Brexit Trading under #WTO rules will leave many #Brexit-supporting areas of the #UK facing an economic shock that will last a full generation#Brexit in the @nytimes 
Chris Grayling faces calls to resign as no-deal Brexit ferry contract cancelledTeflon Chris Grayling. A place in the Lords beckons and a comfortable life will be his reward for a lifetime of blinding incompetence at the public's expense.  
Take heed, @theresa_may. Truly, Brexit could destroy the United Kingdom. Northern Ireland & Scotland could both choose EU over UK, & no-one could blame them. But do you want that to be your legacy, cementing your place in British history for ever as the worst PM of all time? 
"This government is a horrible mixture of malice, incompetence and failure."Corbyn takes a swipe at the government after a firm with no ships had its #Brexit ferries contract cancelled. Seaborne Freight had a series of blunders, full story here:  
The Brexit legal challenges that could force Britain to leave without a deal Now this is the best Brexit news I have heard in a while! 
“HOW DARE DONALD TUSK SAY WE SOLD BREXIT WITHOUT A PLAN TO DO IT SAFELY”[two days later]“Hi, about that ferryless ferry firm we hired to ferry medicine and food. Cancel it.” 
There's 100% a Brexit joke in here somewhere  
"If that [ring-fencing of #citizensrights in case of no-deal Brexit] can done for the EFTA countries, why not for the rest?" @mckinneytweets rightly asksvia @freemovementlaw 
Come work with me and help me study how events like Brexit or Trump‘s withdrawals from international treaties reverberate in the remaining member states.  
She doesn’t need the EU Gravy Train, it seems she has found one closer to home by screwing the country on her expenses, not to mention her attempts to derail Brexit.  
Fantastic team out in Kirkcaldy today. Kirkcaldy residents are unhappy with the Brexit deal and 64% want a People’s Vote. #peoplesvote @LesleyLaird 
He’s an elected MEP. His party won’t the EU elections in 2014 that forced the Tories to promise an EU referendum - a move which won the Tories enough votes in 2015 to form a majority govt and be forced to hold that referendum. Not sure that’s a good definition of “failed”. 
British government cancels a contract to ship goods to the country after Brexit with a company that turned out to have no boats and no experience running a ferry service.  
It's #Saturday! It's #FBPEParty Day!We are SIX WEEKS from disaster. The Tories & Labour are slowly imploding. There is NO majority for ANY form of #Brexit.The people did NOT vote to crash out with NOTHING.Add #FBPE, follow others, & join the fight for a #PeoplesVote!  
Nigel’s Comeback: Official #Brexit Party Recognised by Electoral Commission  
In the midst of chaos & confusion, a new Brexit Party set to add to the divisions. What is needed is a commonsense solution leading to a proactive UK at the heart of the EU -  . Imagine #Brexit being over and MPs getting back to looking after our country 
I repeat what I said leaving #JMC on Thursday - you couldn’t send this Tory @GovUK for the messages. Surely somebody will have the decency to resign over this? What about you Chris Grayling?   Brexit: Seaborne Freight ferry contract scrapped - BBC News  
if @theresa_may's deal tanks again, there should be an A50 extension & a general election. If @UKLabour go into it battling for Brexit, they will tank too. If they promise to have a bash at Brexit with a public vote on any deal vs remain, they might just pull it off. 
It will cost us a lot more than the financial crisis. How many people are going to lose their jobs or be forced to leave the UK or EU. Then you have the question of whether or when the UK splits.Brexit is a Titanic Failure. 
This is the #Brexit I want.  Germany +.  A better deal than the one Jerry has.  Come on Brexit voters , jump on board the #GermanyPlus ship 
This is rich from @CarolineLucas - the electorate were given power, we voted to Leave the EU, yet this MP has spent two years doing everything in her power to ensure that Brexit doesn’t happen, whilst fear mongering and bad mouthing Leave voters. Just unreal. Go away Caroline.  
TWO huge things are happening simultaneously 1. The historic struggle over Brexit2. The Establishment - including Tories, Press Barons, The City, BBC, Guardian, the 1% - are moving heaven and earth to stop the people electing a genuine Socialist 
And this from the same government that *assures* us vital medical supplies are guaranteed in the event of No Deal Brexit.What a Farcey McFarceFace.  
‘The Brexit shock will cost UK as much cumulatively as the financial crisis.’ - which is why Labour’s claim that it can deliver Brexit *and* improve public services is for the birds. 
Good luck to everyone campaigning for a #PeoplesVote today! All over the UK people will be holding street stalls, leafleting & engaging with their local community about the need to put the #Brexit decision back to the public.Make sure to take loads of videos & photos!  
Types of failure, in ascending order:ErrorCock-upFuck-upCalamityShit-showOmnishamblesCatastrofuckFyre FestivalTheresa MayBrexitChris Grayling 
Trying to buy supplies after Brexit.  
I didn't vote for you, none of my fellow British citizens voted for you &, more importantly, none of us can vote you out.What's interesting is you recognise your election with just half a million votes but choose to ignore the referendum where 17.4 million people voted leave.  
Too often, the Corbyn Left seems immune to self-doubt and baffled by the concept of honest disagreement. The response to criticism - on Brexit, Anti-Semitism or anything else - is to trash its motives, invoke dark conspiracies & call up the Cyber-Corbz for an online beating. 2/5 
How do you say ‘thank you Brexit’ in Dutch? government releases official figures saying 42 firms and 1,923 jobs moved to Netherlands in 2018 because of Brexit. Plus 250 firms interested  
Jeremy Corbyn’s Brexit Plan has made life harder for Theresa May. ‘The Labour Party and the EU are operating in tandem to some extent, which is worrying for us’ admits one Cabinet Minister  
I suppose May is in a position to give the people brexit in name only but it seems a dumb thing to do because the hassle won't stop. The people will still go on fighting to be free of the oppressive EU & the rapidly approaching new world order & the Tories will be wiped out. 
It's disgraceful of Tom Watson to intervene in CLP business. I think all the treacherous Blairites can feel the cold wind of deselection coming so expect some more desperate measures as they try to bring back Toryism to @UKLabour Party.#iStandWithWavertree#JC4PM2019#Brexit 
Its worth repeating. Today we learn Japanese trade negotiators are stalling over talks to” extract every advantage possible”. An “independent trade policy” is a myth: it is a synonym for being savaged. The Brexit shock will cost UK as much cumulatively as the financial crisis. 
“One of the most bizarre sub-plots of the Brexit era came to an end on Saturday morning when the British government stripped a no-deal contingency contract from a ferry company with no ferries.” via @financialtimes 
Ferry company with no ferries stripped of Brexit contract  
Did you vote for Brexit and feel discriminated against by your friends and family members? Read about the social club founded to help Brexit supporters fight hostility.  
That’s MI6, the Brits are hacking our brains through Harry Potter quizzes on Facebook in the lead up to Brexit to make us feel guilt. Everyone Irish is getting similar dreams. I dreamt that Loyd George was crying in a nightclub toilet and telling me he’s feeling bullied 
Chris 'reverse Midas' Grayling will again rightly be ridiculed, yet in this shitstorm of a Tory Government he is not the exception but the rule.  
My new Brexit party stands ready to defend democracy, says @Nigel_Farage 
The people, not the politicians, should have the final say on Brexit - with the option to stay in the EU. Demand the final say now >  
Absolutely inspirational speech from Kate Barry at #greenconference2019 on what Green means for social justice, environmental justice, equal rights, reproductive rights, speaking against austerity, against Brexit and how @GreenPartyNI are the only party who can deliver. 
Japan is seeking big concessions from the UK in post-Brexit trade talks - concessions bigger than those secured from the EU. This is a sign of the growing difficulties facing the UK as post-Brexit trade deals are negotiated around the world. Brexit will crush the UK, not free it!  
The EU elite is digging in like this because it is terrified of Brexit being a success, which would encourage other countries to leave:  
Kate Hoey is yet another metaphor for Brexit personified. You do something idiotic, have it pointed out to you, and rather than admit it, with humility and understanding, you double down and make things worse and worse. 
VIDEO: I’m glad to read today that Bertie Ahern has changed his mind regarding a referendum on Irish Unity. Lots of people are actively engaged with & coming around to the idea. We need to prepare for it, we need to work for it & we need to achieve it. 
'Nightmare scenario': French firms start to panic about no deal Brexit  
In the begining brexit meant brexit. Then May appointed someone to negotiate but he was too successful so she replaced him with herself. Then she negotiated and got nowhere and now is renegotiating and still getting nowhere & so it goes on & on ad infinitum. 
First reaction on seeing "Brexit Party" trending was that it was an event you'd have to bring your own food to. 
So basically Japan has said it will give the UK a worse trade deal after Brexit than the one we currently enjoy with them through the EU.We warned Leavers this would happen, but they hid behind English exceptionalism and called it "Project Fear".  
All smiles a @FoppByresRoad reopens its doors this morning - great to meet Matt & the team - and pick up some suitable Brexit-themed viewing and reading!  
To @UKLabour @Conservatives @theresa_may @jeremycorbynI will never vote for any political party who support gets brexit through, be they the government at the time, or another political partyFrom now, to the end of my life approximately 40 years in the future, I vow this  
Britain in a tailspin. My latest Brexit Blog post on the week's events including the Malthouse meetings, Nissan, Tusk's 'hell' comment and its implications, May's tactics or lack of them - and more:  
There's a special place in hell for MPs who 'respect' an illegal referendum. 
So we now have the "Brexit Party". To become a member you will need to  do one horse tricks, be a rabble rouser and skilled liar, have supporters in the electoral commission and police force, appear regularly on the BBC and have a bank account that accepts Roubles 
#Kent's MPs have been following this saga with a mix of embarrassment, irritation and despair. Recent meeting with Govt transport minister on #OperationBrock was farcical beyond parody! #brexit less than 50 days away.....#BrexitCrisis #BrexitShambles 
Right so immigration is bad for Britain yet in Glasgow, Orkney and Edinburgh bus drivers are from..........Estonia, Czech Republic, Poland...................they contribute to our GDP but the Brexit scum said we vote out to get rid of brown people. 
Thanks to those who have come to our Brexit meetings in last week.  The message was clear from Clay Cross & Dronfield: get on with it, no second referendum but, most importantly, don’t just settle for any deal. Residents want a deal which works for the long-term for our country. 
They’re not terrified of a successful Brexit, they’re laughing at anyone who still thinks there can be a successful Brexit.  
Brexit: Seaborne Freight no-deal ferry contract scrapped  
Just so that you are all aware@theresa_may sole purpose with brexit isto remain in power and to keep the Tory party togetherThe wellbeing of the UK and it's people did not even register with herAnd to her the ROI/NI border is a mere inconvenience she will ignore 
To avoid giving The Brexit Party an even larger mandate than it already has the possibility of garnering, and in order to simply survive, the Conservatives are going to take us across the Brexit line on March 29th, deal or not. They know it’s the only way they survive with power. 
Depressing that my party is such a weak Opposition. The reason for this is simple - the first requirement of an Opposition, when the government is doing something terrible like Brexit, is to oppose - it’s why it’s called the ‘Opposition’Alas, Labour isn’t opposing but appeasing 
LAB requirements for a Brexit deal This will ensure we don't get "no deal".Ensures no hard border in Ireland & protects the Good Friday agreement.Protects the economy & people's jobs.Ensures we leave the EU.Is supported by the EU.  
Government cancels Brexit ferry contract with no-ship firmSeaborne Freight which had won £13.8m contract despite never having run Channel service. This was a probable outcome, the incompetent, inept and useless minister strikes again!  
Portillo CORRECTS Alastair Campbell in HEATED Brexit row – ‘trying to REWRITE HISTORY'  
Unionists getting ready for a referendum on Irish Unity. If you’re not registered to vote, let this be a timely reminder to do so. Please share.  
UK Could Be Kicked Out Of Newly Launched Pharma Tech Security System Because Of Brexit /#EU #Brexit #PeoplesVote 
We Are Stunned Major the Feckless Hypocrite who signed Maastricht with out a Referendum,  wants to Stay or have an undemocratic 2nd Referendum!  
PM warned Tories face local election WIPE-OUT if Brexit is delayed beyond March Brexit delay or betrayal will deserve the wipeout 
Attention Brexit supporters. Japan is stalling on a trade deal because it thinks it can get concessions that it couldn’t get from us as part of the EU. A perfect example of how reclaiming sovereignty means losing power. Get used to this because it’s going to happen a lot.  
I think there's a bigger appetite in the party for a second vote on the Deputy Leadership than there is on Brexit. 
Today is the next #PeoplesVote day of action, with hundreds of thousands of leaflets being delivered in key areas.From #Folkestone in Kent to #Kirkcaldy in Scotland, and everywhere in between, people will be on the streets campaigning for a People's Vote on #Brexit.  
So Mrs May brings Olly Robbins along with her to Dinner in Dublin with the Irish Prime Minister. Do not hold your breath! Robbins is the adviser who has landed the UK in all its BREXIT problems!! 
Nigel's Back!Tory heads will roll If May asks for Article 50 extension as her Remoaner Cabinet is demanding.Frustrated pro-democratic voters now have a #Brexit Party where they can celebrate Leaving the EU & peel votes away from both Tories & Labour.#EU 
At the next election I will try to persuade people to vote for *anyone* who isn't a sitting MP. The whole lot of these ignorant wastrels need to be gone. #Brexit 
NIGEL: Brexit Party will rise if Article 50 is extended. “I sincerely hope that this prospect is recognised by both the Conservative Party and the Labour Party as a threat.”  
Farage ‘will stand’ for new Brexit Party if Britain leaving EU is delayedA party offering more hatred, division and endless distraction from real problems facing the country.The second referendum campaign starts today. Please play your part#LoveEU 
One of the most interesting findings in #Brexit is about Brexiteers (52%) revealing true information about how they understand immigration. For Brexiteers, a Spaniard leaving in the UK is an immigrant but hey UK citizens leaving in Spain are expats. Brilliant! 
We can’t wait for a people’s vote: make the case against Brexit right now We shouldn’t wait until Westminster makes up its mind to bring on a #PeoplesVote; we should be campaigning to win the referendum now.#LoveEU 
You won't be able to live in Italy after Brexit ..... yet Dickens could do it over 100 years before the formation of the EU..... & to think, they call Leave voters 'thick'.    
The UK is due to leave the EU next month, but is yet to agree the terms of withdrawal. We've looked at how a 'no deal' #Brexit could happen and the potential impact on key policy areas. Read our latest analysis  
Trying to extricate ourselves from the EU, and Brexit, is like a multiple transplant patient attempting to give all the donated organs back. 
We are not safe until the threat of Brexit has been thoroughly dealt with and removed from the UK.  
Amazing stats from @Facts4euOrg * A whopping 40% of Australia’s exports of goods and services to the #EU go to the UK* Without the UK, the EU27 is a much smaller market for * The UK is the ONLY EU country appearing in their top 10 export destinations#Brexit #NoDeal 
Brexit Anxiety Is A Very Real Issue Right Now: 'It's Causing People To Snap' | HuffPost UKPsychotherapists and counsellors are now all catching up with the emotional impact of Brexit. Depression and anxiety are rife in the country.#BrexitCrisis 
Brexit is like ‘early days of third reich,’ Radiohead frontman Thom Yorke says as he lashed out against Theresa May and her handling of the Brexit process –  even going as far as comparing it to the Nazi rule in Germany.       
Europe's Second Biggest Sundial(A Story of Anger, Brexit and Forgotten Britain, or Why We Need MPs Like @GloriaDePiero To Rise To The Challenge)(1 of 22) 
Could a ‘frontstop’ solve the Brexit backstop problem?  
Quelle surprise: “Over the past week tens of thousands of pounds has been spent on Facebook adverts promoting a No Deal Brexit.”  
Nigel Farage’s new Brexit party spells trouble for the Tories | Coffee House  
Is @Nigel_Farage making a political comeback with newly created #Brexit Party?  
It doesn’t matter if you accepted the referendum in your manifesto. We all now know the result was fraudulent. Fraud unravels everything.If you continue to say that you respect the result you respect fraud.#PeoplesVote #stopbrexit #FBPE 
Here is @siobhankennedy4 the first journalist to report #SeaborneFreight predicting its demise on Thursday in @Channel4News Brexit ferry company with no ferries may be stranded in a port that isn't a port  via @siobhankennedy4 
Morning all! Please sign this. #FBPE #StopBrexit Petition: Order immediate adjournment of the Brexit process during the NCA Investigation  
Government cancels Brexit ferry contract with no ship firm because, surprise surprise, it has no ships and no port and won't be ready for Brexit! Chris Failing Grayling is just a joke, a bad joke!Government cancels Brexit ferry contract with no-ship firm  
Theresa May give it up! You’re just going round in circles on Brexit. You’ve had over two years and have got nowhere.Less than two months to Brex and you’ve wasted another week humiliating yourself in Europe with nothing to show for it.Time to get real and accept Labour’s plan.  
With the 'news' that Seaborne Freight's pizza delivery service is to be cancelled....can we make sure that all money is returned?This whole saga was a rough template of brexit itself...charlatans winging it in the hope of quick buck to profit from the collapse of the UK. 
Bertie Ahern : Get ready for a referendum on uniting Ireland.#Brexit #BorderPoll #UnityRef 
Ludicrous. The government can't even negotiate a contract with a ferry company which actually has ships, and yet we are supposed to believe it is capable of striking global trade deals with the US, China and India. 48 days until No Deal Brexit. Please stop this national farce.  
Be prepared! #Brexit #Elizabeth II 
The first part of May’s stupid & dangerous trick is to take matters to the wire so that any Brexit looks better than utter disaster. The second is that the backstop is the only problem. It isn’t. Brexit must be stopped. #PeoplesVote 
Chris Grayling to swim Channel and bring in emergency medical supplies hmiself in event of a No Deal Brexit. #failingGrayling 
We are led by total incompetents.Government cancels Brexit ferry contract with no-ship firm  
Wonderful Nigel Farage prediction from @mrjamesob only 2 weeks after the Brexit referendum. Seeing some of the faces he pulls whilst at work, I often wonder what he keeps under his desk. Turns out it’s just a crystal ball.  
I once asked one of the EU27 Brexit negotiators what they did while they waited for UK to come forward with a proposal last year, he said: “some of us like cycling” 
Read this sentence Brexiteers, one you won't find in the Brexit UK press ..."Tokyo is confident that it can secure better terms from the UK than it did in negotiations with the much larger EU, and is not willing to duplicate the existing treaty." 
"This contract in no way encapsulates the utterly fucking astonishing level of ineptitude that has run through the entire fabric of our cack-handed mismanagement of Brexit like a continuous thread of pure dogshit, but we're going to cancel it anyway because of some reasons."  
'Brexit barriers' to be installed on M20 this weekend -  
The way EU leaders view our country is a disgrace. Why would we want to remain in a club that treats us like this?Join the fastest growing Brexit movement @  
4. The clique are FURIOUS that, despite more than 3 years of undermining the leadership at every levela) Corbyn is still leaderb) His Brexit plan is coming togetherc) He is being lauded by the EU 
I've just had the translation through. They're imploring with each other to stop worrying about Brexit because "Once Sergei has put his top on, he's going to help with the negotations." 
I've just joined the Lib Dems. Don't know why it took me so long, given the mess we're in. #LibDems #LiberalDemocrats #Brexit 
Just heard Dover MP, cheerful Charlie Elphicke, saying Brexit Dover will be ok, albeit after bumps in the road. Germany’s biggest trade partners are China  & US - which shows UK can do well outside the EU, says daft Chaz. No, it shows you can also do well inside EU- no excuses! 
Question for @BrandonLewis @theresa_may @Conservatives Why would people vote for the Conservatives in May, if Brexit hasn’t been achieved in March?  Hardly an endorsement of ability, integrity or honouring the electorate.  Local Associations must be worried. 
BREAKING: Chris Grayling appointed as new ferryman in charge of service across the river Styx, in that special place in hell for those who promoted Brexit without even a sketch of a plan.  
Someone's surely got to make a film about the guys who nearly got themselves a multi-million ferry contract despite not having any ships. It's basically the Brexit version of "War Dogs". 
Tick tock tick tock  Brexit deal may not be put to MPs until late March, officials say  
Change Britain, don’t Brexit - why Brexit can & should be stopped  
About 250 companies are in talks to relocate to the Netherlands because of Brexit  
After a forty year public debate, a referendum and a general election at which both parties pledged to deliver the result in full, it should be a done deal. It’s not.@Nigel_Farage⁩’s Brexit Party will hopefully hold our political class to account.  
Farage's new personality cult Brexit Party will not allow dissent against the great leader. So says Farage.   via @Telegraph 
No no-deal ferry deal for no-ferry ferry company #Brexit latest #seabornefreight  
If you've been here ten years or more and you didn't bother to get a British passport, I have no sympathy. #Brexit 
Gvt cancels #Brexit ferry contract with no-ship firm. How Chris Grayling ever reached the heights of Cabinet Minister remains an enduring mystery. #failingGrayling #brexitcrisis 
The top 40 horrors lurking in the small print of Theresa May’s Brexit deal | Coffee House  
Government cancels Brexit ferry contract with no-ship firm  
“The UK is too small to survive alone.”  Really? The facts say otherwise.  See our great example in this morning’s #Brexit Facts4EU : #GoWTO 
Last year’s tweeted Seaborne scepticism, rather vindicated by just announced decision to cancel brexit flotilla contract...  
Minister warns Rees-Mogg ERG's plans for hard exit could BACKFIRE - 'No Brexit AT ALL!' Ellwood is a Traitor to his Constituents, Manifesto & 17.4 M Voters!  
Let's have a better deal with Europe. It's to campaign for #GermanyPlus#Brexit #PeoplesVote 
A fantastic take down by @AOC. Both USA & UK currently suffering from a similar problem of corrupt and/or incompetent executives which congresswomen/MPs who do their job properly can expose but it’s very hard to stop them or bring them to book #Trump #Brexit  
Dear @theresa_may , will you sack incompetent Grayling after yet another masterclass in total ineptitude? 48 days to your #NoDeal Brexit. How do you sleep at night knowing that you'll be remembered by future generations as the PM who broke the country?  
The government’s contract with Seaborne Freight in the event of a no-deal Brexit has been terminated.  
Brexit is hurting the real estate market 1,000 miles from the U.K. as holiday home sales in Portugal suffer 
This is Brexit correctness gone mad. The BBC has banned the Europe flag at #EurovisionYouDecide  and handed out the Union flag in direct contravention of the rules of Eurovision. 
Second Brexit referendum would unleash protests 'in every town and city across the UK' | Press and Journal  
Days to go until Brexit - 48Alternative Arrangements - 0 
It is evident that whatever the outcome of the current #Brexit debacle, it is set to split asunder  the major parties and the country. The only glimmer of hope, love him or hate him, is #Cobyn. Why is this pg 11 report not headline news? #Socialism is the only answer. 
Make the case against Brexit right now | Jonathan Freedland  
Attn MSMNone of the General Public are remotely interested in the Menu of last night’s May/Varadkar meal!We know that our PM will as usual be gorging herself on chunks of EU Humble Pie ladled with Tusk’s Hottest Sauce from Hell!Watered Down with Corbyn’s version of Brexit! 
It seems to me that most of the evil geniuses have abandoned Brexit; and that those still promoting it are just the useful idiots left to their own bizarre devices. 
With 48 days until the UK is scheduled to leave the European Union, the government has cancelled a contract it had awarded, in preparation for a no-deal Brexit, to Seaborne Freight, a ferry company with no ferries.  
It is comforting at this time, 48 days from a possible no deal Brexit, to know that Chris Grayling is still the Transport Sec 
#VoteLeaveBrokeTheLaw Any word from @metpoliceuk about their investigation?Any word from @NCA_UK about theirs?The referendum was based on lies & illegal activity. The @UKEUchallenge case is not going away! Time for an honest, legal #PeoplesVote@BremainInSpain 
Our government appoints a firm with no ferries, no experience and no port to run a ferry service... then is amazed when it fails to deliver. Doesn't this just sum up the Brexit fantasy of believing things will be great just by 'believing'? #PeoplesVote 
The cost of Brexit is already apparent. We've crunched the numbers  
3 most significant developments this week: EU foolishly indicating negotiations on new legal text with Mrs May; Mr Farage’s new party; & near certainty of extending Art 50 to avoid no deal. The 3rd is the critical one which still makes a referendum likely, despite the other 2 
Nigel Farage is still under investigation by the FBI as part of the Trump/Russia investigation. Brexit Party that. 
At this point I no longer care if we leave without a deal. To me it looks like every major British institution has failed and we need to rebuild it all from the ground up. Might as well bulldoze the garbage away. #Brexit 
A Party Guide to British  Politics 2019UKIP: kid who got uninvitedBrexit:kid who likes what he knowsTory: kid who promised an epic present but brought f*ck allNew Centrists: kid who came dressed as Tony Blair Greens:nut allergy kid Commies: kid who nicks your stuff 
Note the selective use of part of the quotation, Salmond went on to say successive governments could hold another referendum at any time if they had the mandate.  
Reviewing post-Brexit options, I've been calling up a few different embassies to find out how complicated it would be to move our family (my partner and I have Irish passports, but our kids do not). Turns out that literally nobody knows what's going to happen.48 days to go... 
Somewhat inevitably, the company with no ships has its Brexit ferries contract cancelled...  
“an excellent and authoritative exploration of the roads to Brexit, one that is erudite, rigorous and highly readable” - ⁦@tconnellyRTE⁩On ⁦@kevinhorourke⁩ #Brexit  
Nigel Farage is to launch a new political party: The Brexit Party! He thinks this time he may even beat Flipper the Dolphin at the ballot box - if he can just get another 10 appearances on Question Time... #BrexitParty #BrexitShambles 
“If the EU wants a punishment Brexit, they’ll do so at the price of Ireland, which isn’t something that the UK want to see. Mr Varadkar has politicised the Irish border question for domestic political reasons and the EU has been very keen to go along with that” @Jacob_Rees_Mogg 
Brexit: Hell, High Water and the Return of Chequers via @RTENewsNow 
Watching the emergence of a multi-party system in the U.K. and the end of Labour:Tory two-party balderdashUKIP. Brexit Party. Tories. Centrist Labour. Greens. Hard Left CommiesNow all we need is proportional representation. Britain is changing thanks to brave Brexiteers 
So BBC bans  flags and imposes Eurovision has always been about symbols more than crap musicThe lesson of Brexit is you can't impose identityNo one, not even the BBC, can deny young Brits their feeling of being, more than ever, proud to be Europeans 
My #brexit prediction: Article 50  will be extended for the Withdrawal Agreement to go through. It will not pass UK Parl because it hasn’t changed. Leaving without a deal will require a new referendum: it has nothing to do with the promises made. The result? This I do not know. 
If that looks confusing: hauliers requested 11,392 permits to be able to keep driving in the EU post-Brexit in a no-deal scenario. The DoT only has 984 to give out. That's not even one per FIRM applying. Over half the companies that requested permits won't get any at all. 
SCOOP! Written Answer busts open the post no-deal Brexit disaster awaiting the haulage industry: "Department received applications for a total of 11,392 permits from 1,991 operator licence holders. 984 ECMT annual permits have been allocated to operators." 
The extent and sheer absurdity of Tory Brexit chaos captured in one headline.  
Our Brexit Masters demonstrate, yet again, the spectacular incompetence that has characterised the last three years and which is causing incalculable harm to our country. #JustMakeItStop 
What more evidence is needed of #Brexit debacle than fake promises of an emergency ferry service with no ferries? In weeks ahead, MPs will be lured by more phoney promises in the non-binding, unenforceable ‘framework for future relationship’ doc. They mustn’t be so gullible!  
Owen Jones SHUT DOWN by Brexiteer MEP on BBC Newsnight - 'I wont allow you to do this!'  #Croydon #Brexit 
I've tweeted this previously and make no apologies for doing so today, or tomorrow, the day after that and every day  from then on until the result of the referendum is respected. A reminder that #17.4millionbetrayedPlease retweet if you feel the same, thank you.  
If Theresa May really is dismayed by Tusk's remarks, then she can't handle the truth. Leave campaigners did promote Brexit without having a clue how to make it work. You couldn't run a whelk stall with that approach...let alone a country. We're being led by donkeys.  
Well that went well. Appoint an inadequate company to do a job, cancel it, and put us back to square one. It's almost as if someone in government/civil service doesn't want #Brexit to succeed, and is doing everything they can to scupper it.  
If I was a betting man, I'd put money on Farage's Brexit Party doing more damage to the Tories than Umunna's Remain Party doing to Labour. For one thing, we've already got a Remain Party. It's called the Lib Dems. Also, Farage has a ready-made loyal support-base. Umunna doesn't. 
A stupid idea, done stupidly, that ended up being cancelled after a waste of time, energy and money.The ‘Seaborne Freight’ farrago *could* be a perfect metaphor for Brexit, if only we saw sense..... 
Brexit firm with no ships has ferries contract cancelled  
No, Caroline, the country voted to leave the EU. If you and the rest of the Establishment considers itself kicked by that, so be it. Stop being patronising, either help Britain achieve a full #Brexit or get out of the way  
The no-deal ferry contract awarded to a firm with no ships has been terminated by the Department for Transport.#Brexit | #seabornefreight 
Stephen Barclay has been Brexit Secretary for 85 days...How often has he visited the EU in that time??? Zero times - he hasn't visited the EU since he became Brexit Sec! We are in this #BrexiShambles because of ideology and rank incompetence! #ShameOnYouTories 
Not multimillionaire warmonger Tony Blair on again to try and stop Brexit FFS. Never off TV & Radio banging on about 2 Referendum. We’ve had one 2016 17.4 million voted leave the CRUMBLING  EU. Go away & shut up   YESTERDAY’S MAN. Stop crying about Brexit everyday.  
If it turns out the contract you placed is undeliverable and you terminate it, why not do the same with Brexit?  
If, thanks to Ministers like Tobias, the Conservative Party kicks the Brexit can down the road in the hope that they can soften or thwart it in a few weeks time, they deserve to be wiped out in the upcoming local elections.  
48 days to Brexit and more delays. To those of us living in limbo, not knowing if our lives can continue as now, if our healthcare will continue, if our pensions will be frozen, the mental exhaustion is showing. It is time to ring fence our rights.  
REFERENDUMTHE EXCUSEWage BillTHE REAL GOALBring back powerful presidency, remove term limits, reduce powers of judiciary, dilute bill of rights, limit freedom of expression, and create jobs for "The Chosen Few."THE TOOLSUser-friendly tribally-charged voting robots. 
MORE on the termination of Seaborne Freight no deal ferry contact: a DFT spokesperson said “the Government is already in advanced talks with a number of companies to secure additional freight capacity – including through the Port of Ramsgate – in the event of a no deal Brexit”. 
Nigel Farage hints at Brexit Party leadership  Lets face it with both main parties working against the democratic vote of the people in our Islands, there is now a need for a party that does not identify with either of these two. 
NEW: Chris Grayling has terminated a contract with Seaborne Freight to provide ferries in the event of a no deal Brexit. No tax payer money has gone to the firm. A DFT spokesperson said: "it became clear Seaborne would not reach its contractual requirements with the Government". 
Now the government has scrapped the ferry contract with the company that’s got no ferries because it’s ‘unviable’ - can we do so with the whole of Brexit, which is equally unviable ?And get a viable Transport Secretary into the bargain! 
David Green: I’m a Brexit-backing Liberal who rejects the remote politicians’ project that is the EU  
This is an excellent read by ⁦@GloriaDePiero⁩ . Honestly astonished that more of her colleagues don’t get it. “I talked to my Leave-voting constituents about Brexit. This is what I learnt”  
The Department for Transport has terminated a controversial contract with Seaborne Freight to provide extra ferries from Ramsgate in the event of a no-deal Brexit. 
Grieve and others have been utterly obsessed with betraying UK over #Brexit but without noticing that their treachery has eroded the foundations of the #Conservative party. Angry hard working members, who put them in power in the first place will now migrate to a new Brexit Party  
#CANZUK is now officially the most popular international agreement after #Brexit.Support our campaign for free movement and trade between #Canada, #Australia, #NewZealand & the #UK at #cdnpoli #auspol #nzpol #ukpolitics 
First Minister of Scotland Nicola Sturgeon Discusses Brexit | Amanpour and Company | PBS  
Meanwhile, in the €urozone...Beef and cheese exports from Ireland to the UK could collapse by up to 90% in the event of a no-deal Brexit, according to a new study — with the loss of over 3,500 jobs, reports RTE News. 
Varadkar throws May's push for new Brexit deal IN HER FACE as he refuses to negotiate  
Whatever Brexit we get or don't get there will be angry Brexiters, at least around 7 million plus 16 million Remainers. The 'Will of the People' never really existed except as a political slogan  
‘Buy your wine now’: the Bordeaux vineyards bottling before Brexit  
Just overtook Farage sidekick @KateHoeyMP for followers. Next up @NadineDorries on 51.1k. Then @johnredwood on 52k, @patel4witham on 52.1k, then oddball Brexit ‘guru’ @SteveHiltonx on 53k... 
Some members of US Congress have issued words of advice for the UK as it continues Brexit negotiations: Anything resembling a hard border between Northern Ireland and the Republic of Ireland, an EU member, will not be looked upon kindly  
Corbyn’s six tests in full:1. Does it deliver the exact same electoral triangulation as we’ve been doing all along?2. Will it stop FoM?3. Will people blame the Tories for this disaster in 2022?4. [Insert something unrelated about busses]5. Is it Brexit?6. What six tests? 
When will this be revealed? Surely it's time to DO something to break the Govts death-grip on Brexit and immigration?The time for talking is over. 
I date it being seriously weird from the Brexit vote. That was when I first entertained the idea that he might win.  
Saudi17Leaked files reveal Iran's post-revolution crackdown on journalistsVenezuela says plane from Miami delivered weapons for use by enemies of MaduroUK, Norway, Iceland agree on citizens' rights if no-deal Brexit pic.twitter.com/KCv1A7vWqZ 
To be honest it was a very easy decision for me to vote Leave in the referendum. #Brexit  
As predicted, trade partners are not willing to copy-paste EU trade agreements into future UK agreements after #Brexit. Hence, Japan is confident it can get better deal with UK than it did with EU. UK will have to give more and get less!  
Jaguar Land Rover owner Tata Motors posts thumping loss in another blow to UK car industry buffeted by Brexit  
Editorial: Bullying smaller countries into taking trade deals is not the Brexit panacea we were promised  
You've been insulting people and trying to take away their rights for two years. You've stoked racism and hate crime by treating a wafer-thin win in an advisory referendum as an excuse to dismantle our democracy and ruin our country. Everything Tusk said was true. 
Brexit: making it up - to assert that "Change or Go" is evidence of an exit plan is to stand history on its head. That apologists seek to pretend that a plan did exist after all can surely only remind us of how flawed Vote Leave's strategy was...  #Brexit.  
Britain’s Electoral Commission has officially recognized the Brexit Party as an official and legal political party in the United Kingdom, which Brexit leader Nigel Farage has said is a force to fight back against the betrayal of the 2016 referendum.  
“We don’t want to leave at all, but we don't want to leave with no deal. But we're having to spend a lot of time and effort preparing for that eventuality,” says @NicolaSturgeon on the state of Brexit negotiations.  Full interview:  #brexit #scotland 
Irish prime minister says Brexit deal 'can be done'  
Why not England is about to go off the BREXIT Cliff Scotland and NI will gain their independence away from England a Scottish Stock Exchange will well & truly prosper.  
Baroness Warsi confirms Cameron only agreed to referendum ruse as he believed the Tories couldn't win and in a future continued coalition the Lib Dems would block it. 
And here goes the "Brexit will be good for developping nations" myth.  
#KDP thinks it has leverage over the US, puts on a display of celebrating Iran’s radical regime. They blame it on lack of US support during the referendum. Who told you to it? Did we not warn you it will fail? Best part of this is the sudden silence of its worshippers. FAIL. 
Brexit happened because democratic pressures forced Cameron to face up to a ref. Now we are facing pressures again, this time from the Brexit party. May must understand, it's a clean Brexit or an end to the Conservatives.  
Everyone should read this. Long read but evidence of Robbins & May’s treachery. WA must die. If it is passed we are betrayed. No Brexit ever. Civil disorder may follow. May’s Brexit deal: 40 rebuttals to Downing Street’s 40 rebuttals | Coffee House  
They will face total wipe out if it's not delivered n March 29th 2019 - preferably No Deal #Brexit  
Hmmm a Brexit Party only, with a leader who walked away job done ?I'll pass   
The only way out of the #Brexit mess is to #RevokeA50 #StopBrexit #Remain in Control in the EU with our Best Ever Deal & prevent the loss of Rights & further haemorrhage of time & treasure... 
Martin Rowson on the Tory party and Brexit #TheresaMay #Brexit #Hell #FinalSay #PeoplesVote #PoliticalCartoon #Satire #BrexitShambles #BrexitChaos #BrexitDeal #Brexit  - political cartoon gallery in London  
"This type of bad-faith negotiating – using implicit threats to get countries ‘over the line’ – is not a great way to start the UK’s independent trade policy.” 
After all the abuse Scots got for complaining about the BBC in the indy referendum it's funny seeing all the Remainers in England starting to understand that the BBC has very definite political objectives of its own. Difference is we woke up and smelt the coffee a long time ago. 
As my wife is Japanese we subscribe to a live Japanese TV service. We have 80 channels some of which are news. To be honest this isn't news. The Japanese are not happy and see Brexit almost as an insult after their £billions investments over 30 years. This is no surprise. 
Tory arrogance towards Scotland and Ireland since Brexit has been absolutely shameful. The gravity of the crisis has to hit home sooner or later. But the Tories don't even see it  
Irish prime minister says Brexit deal 'can be done'  
Lord O’Donnell, Lord Kerr and Lord Kerslake, all former top mandarins,  plus the German Foreign Minister today all decided that Britain isn’t ready for Brexit. The German suggested we might yet stay in the EU. Poor Remainers. They are all still in denial. Sad, truly sad. 
Brexit is already hitting UK household finances due to higher prices  
Give me a tangible benefit of Brexit immediately or you are a massive massive massive massive racist racist pig face gammon pig. If you don’t reply in the next three minutes you love the British Empire and slavery and you are a bad bad bad bad person. 
I find it infuriating how John Humphrys talks over @vnbateman's legitimate arguments for opposing #Brexit & at the same time criticises her for not making a serious argumentHE is the problem impeding this debateThe "Emporer's New Clothes" is a brilliant metaphor! Well done  
You weren't elected in Scotland but we have to put up with your Brexit bullshit?I'd take Guy and the rest of the EU over you any day. Jog on. 
While Trump & Brexit have thrown US & UK into chaos and distract us with gangster politics, Russia's mafia state stays focused on its priorities—churning out propaganda & using what leverage it can to harm the US & Europe. They don't even hide that they want to destroy Ukraine  
Nigel Farage's new Brexit party should scare the living daylights out of the Tories  
Nigel Farage Forms New Brexit Party  
The idea of a breakaway party would have absolutely no traction if Corbyn had opposed the right wing project of Brexit from the start, nailed antisemitism and shown more creativity, lustre and courage in standing up to government. He's a complete dud.  
Poll time: How would you vote if given the option today on Brexit? #FBPE #StandUp4Brexit #LeaveMeansLeave #Brexit **Check out my new pinned tweet** 
Our leaders have to be just as stern with the UK, it’s time to give England the Brexit it wants  
"I do not want to live in a country that doesn't want to belong to the European community."With the most common non-British nationality in the UK, what do Poles think about Brexit?  
Brexit or Remain?Would a referendum with 3 options on the ballot paper using the alternative vote system solve the impasse? Options being1. Brexit: accept deal2. Brexit: reject deal3. Remain: reject dealWhat would be your first choice?Please vote and RT, thank you. 
Ultra pro- #Brexit Legatum Institute Fellow  @VNBateman wants you to know that Russia does better for women than the UK Beware socialists bearing gifts! - CapX <~~ aka @Montie #ActiveMeasures 
Tony Benn ...the best Labour man ever..just telling it like it should be... #Brexit #NoDealBrexit 
There are only 48 days left until  #BREXIT and #FREEDOM for #BRITAIN ! #StandUp4Brexit #LeaveMeansLeave #NoDeal #WTO 
Japan says it will not rollover EU trade agreement to UK post-Brexit as it believes it can get better terms from UK in view of its weak negotiating position.Thanks, @michaelgove. (Did you leave this matter to windbag @LiamFox since you knew this was a lost cause?)#BBCR4today 
Report I compiled on a United Ireland for Good Friday Agreement Committee ‘#Brexit & the Future of Ireland: Uniting Ireland & It’s People in Peace & Prosperity’ members of Congress are supporters of the Agreement & consent provision including Congressman Kennedy, Neal and Boyle  
Whit! ‘The SNP lost that referendum’ .... Eh no mate it was never @theSNP ‘s ref it was the people’s vote! ... catching up on #bbcqt late to the party and truly despairing  #indyref2 bring it on  
You are deliberately misquoting Tusk. He did not say there is a special place in hell "for Brexiters", only for people who promoted Brexit without a plan on how to deliver it safely. That'll be you and the likes of Johnson, Gove, Farage, etc. For me, I'd rather see you in jail. 
Tommy’s on his coming expose of Panorama & the BBC. You will hear first hand on what they think of ordinary people & the lengths they will go to to create fake news. They are terrified of what Brexit voters might achieve if they organise, so they wanted to ‘take Tommy down’.  
#FBPE #StopBrexit #brexitshamblesIMPORTANT: Order the immediate adjournment of the Brexit process during the NCA Investigation. Please sign and share:  
Theresa May warned Tories face local election wipe-out if Brexit is delayed beyond March 29  
“Local government bosses and Cabinet ministers have warned No.10 and the Tory party’s chairman @BrandonLewis, that its vote at the council polls on May 2 will be decimated if they are seen to have broken the key Brexit promise”#StandUp4Brexit 
I don't think so but it's about time that independence/SNP  are exposed to some scrutiny. If Scotland has to endure a second referendum then these questions must be asked.  You lot were humiliated on the BBC and you don't like it.  
How dare the BBC confiscate EU flags at the #EurovisionYouDecide show - and replace them with Union Jacks.Shameful from the Brexit Broadcasting Corporation.#StopBrexit 
At least the Electoral Commission have requested that Farage’s new Brexit Party is renamed Nige’s Xenophobic Power Lust For Racists, Fruitcakes, Trump And Putin so that’s something I suppose 
'Thousands of Tory party members' to defect to Nigel Farage's Brexit Party as it gets official approval' | via @telegraph 
#SkyPapers explanation of rolling over trade deals after Brexit is shockingly wrong. Third country deals, such as Japan one, won't automatically get rolled over for the UK even under Theresa May's deal. The EU has promised to put in a good word on the UK's behalf, nothing more. 
Not one to have UK put down, @ajcdeane explains how UK is actually a more attractive proposition to many post #Brexit. A free & competitive UK, unhindered by the whims of 27 other nations.#SkyPapers Clip 2/2 
We can’t wait for a #PeoplesVote : make the case against #Brexit right now, says @Freedland 
A no-deal Brexit could spell disaster for its neighbors, including the Netherlands. With Valentine's Day just around the corner, there's concern about the impact of border checks on the flower industry.  
Am I the only one who thinks the Brexit Naked Woman is doing it because she likes being naked and shouting about Brexit provides a sort of post hoc rationalisation? 
*yawn* Seriously, this argument is bollocks. Especially post Brexit. The UK is going to be reduced to a virtual backwater. Is that really the best market Scotland can ever hope to be a part of. No wonder @scottishlabour are dying off. They spout so much crap 
These are British people. They voted to #Leave the EU.They live in .....#Spain. Their lives are ...in Spain.#Brexit  is going to happen in 49 days."Oh, we're too valuable to them. They'll do something." Expat.#BrexitShamblesvia @Channel4News 
Great speaking today at the Brexit event organised by @ChippBarnet4EU.Regardless of the Brexit outcome, we need to #RingfenceOurRights.@Andrew_Adonis and @nik_haidar look kind of thoughtful and worried (definitely not happy!) when hearing about #SettledStatus... pic.twitter.com/3bY5rLccBs 
My daughter is in exactly the same situation. It will only be the children of the rich who will be able to afford these opportunities after crashing out. She will NEVER vote for any Brexit party. Our children will have their revenge on the pro brexit alliance for years to come. 
Dear Britain,I’d like to get my country back from Brexit. In 2016 it came and devoured us. In 2017 it wallowed. In 2018 it blurred. However 2019 has seen jumping to panic stations. Stockpiling.Life is hard enough already.Most votes for Brexit was a vote for help not pain. 
Another week closer to Brexit and I am now at a complete loss what is happening to our country, the concept of society and the fabric of what it is to be British. In truth as I close my eyes tonight I am becoming increasingly distraught of what we have become as a nation. 
"The British People voted to leave the EU in the 2016 referendum, and we are implementing that instruction". So who needs a parliament ? C'mon, honest now, why do we need a parliament now that the PM acts on gerrymandered opinion poll instructions ?Anybody ? 
Chris Grayling has got control of the emergency measures for freight in the event of a no-deal Brexit.I feel much better now... 
The Brexit Party - The Brexit Party Register your interest to put pressure on the Tories and Labour who are trying to thwart our #Brexit 
Ciaran in anti-Brexit hatchet job you said Spain ‘yet to spell out’ what No Deal means.Reuters: Brexit won't affect Spain-based Britons' rights, PM Sanchez says. “Their rights will be preserved whatever the scenario”Why didn’t you mention this? 
Excl: PM warned Tories face local election disaster on May 2 if Brexit delayed by more than five weeks 
Agree that her Plan C has to be to reach out to soft-Brexiteers and Labour, and to abandon her Plan B of leaning to Tory hard right. She would split her party but deliver a Brexit that probably more than half the country could live with (though I would much prefer to remain).  
Amazing isn't it how the UK can quickly and easily strike deals with EFTA nations and Switzerland but the EU refuse to budge. Thank God we are leaving this pathetic Little Europeans Club. #Brexit 
Pro-Europeans “..need to make the anti-#Brexit case to the public right now, as if the referendum campaign had already begun. Don’t wait. Put up the posters, book the halls, spend the money right away. Do it now.”Could not agree more. We’re on it already!  
Theresa May’s entourage leaving Farmleigh after a two-and-a-half hour dinner with Leo Varadkar. A “warm occasion” (I’m told) with an overview of NI and Brexit. And before you ask: Salmon starter Beef main Cheeses for dessert(All of which may need border checks!…)  
Hi @JulianSmithUK . I hear you're again working with Theresa May to delay the next Brexit vote.You are holding the country to ransom just because the Tory party can't function. When do you say #EnoughIsEnough ? 
Register today so we can be ready to fight for our #Brexit  
Saturday’s Financial Times: "Brexit alert as Japan trade talks stall" #BBCPapers #tomorrowspaperstoday (via @BBCHelenaLee) 
'Thousands of Tory party members' to defect to Nigel Farage's Brexit Party as it gets official approval  via @Telegraph 
If Carlsberg did Weekend GMS ...Is time up for Question Time? Former SNP MP Angus Robertson, Shona Craven and Paul Kavanagh discuss.FM's USA/Canada visit ... Nicola Sturgeon speaks to Isabel Fraser.'Ross Indecency' and Brexit ... What awaits Ruth Davidson on her return? 
Liam Fox and his team are trying to strong-arm poor nations into harsh trade deals, using the threat of no deal on their exports to push them to fall into line. What a disgusting country Brexit is making us.  
Chris Dawson - billionaire behind ‘The Range’ stores said today: “Brexit is a waste of time. People have been sold a fantasy”. 
.@adamhillscomedy’s description of Brexit will hit the nail on the head for most people… #TheLastLeg #Lost 
Brexit rn. pic.twitter.com/6RDHHAq1wo 
Why is the white power structure framing the situation in Virginia as a referendum on whether racism is worse than rape?*turns to camera and blinks in centuries of Black women's experience in America* 
Reminds me of a UK radio presenter asking callers to name 1 law that the EU forced on them which they'd like to change after brexit and they couldn't name a single one. With big scaremongering campaigns it just becomes a buzzword with little actual real life meaning attached. 
The whole myth behind Scotland not being able to join the EU as an independent country DEBUNKED#YesWeCan #Brexit  
What's the point in having an Electoral Commission if over 2 years after the referendum, cases of alleged malpractice by the Leave campaign have still not been fully investigated? @ElectoralCommUK @carolecadwalla @metpoliceuk @LibDemEurope 
You'll give every family in the UK a real-world wage cut with Brexit. Any type of Brexit. 
#Brexit 1/2 Let me get this right British looking at an EU border solution in Ireland along a 310 mile length with a history of massive blood shed but ignoring even discussing a EU border on 96 mile and completely blood free Scottish border ?  
Looks like shit... Smells like shit...You can call it #Brexit...BUT IT'S STILL SHIT!  
Britain's empire was formed on exploiting other countries.And now we wish to forge this pipedream future, we are beginning to do so again. This is what #brexit is, not just harm to us, but those less fortunate. The selfishness of the leading class is pathetic.  
The Brexit Party - The Brexit Party  
I’ll try to answer a few questions cropping up in this thread.Sorry, but I don’t know where you can buy a witch bottle.Navel = bellybutton, Naval = the navy I really don’t know where you can get  oneNo, I don’t think opening this one unleashed Brexit.#SillySods 
'Thousands of Tory party members' to defect to Nigel Farage's Brexit Party as it gets official approval  via @Telegraph 
Disgraceful and increasingly open pro Brexit bias by BBC attempting to stifle peaceful protest and EU Remain solidarity by licence payers. This might be a breach of their charter.  
We are witnessing the ugly truth of western "democracy"In #Venezuela #RegimeChange, in France with the #giletsJaunes, in the UK with attempts to stop #Brexit and even within the "social democratic" Labour party & #WavertreeDemocracy is a sham 
Nigel Farage's new Brexit party should scare the living daylights out of the Tories - Reaction  
Farage’s NEW Brexit party launches with ‘THOUSANDS' of Tory members set to defect: THOUSANDS of…  #Brexit #ClickBait 
Impressively comprehensive breakdown of how Brexit will impact various EU countries (as well as the UK).  
In ten years time, when the UK is penniless, will the @BBC be running programmes about the corruption that delivered #Brexit, or will it still be in hock to the Tories/UKIP ? 
It will be interesting to see if Eurosceptic MPs flock to this Brexit Party - we will then find out whether they are for country or party.Nigel Farage Forms New Brexit Party  via @GuidoFawkes 
Not surprising but deeply irresponsible , politically arrogant  & infuriatingly damaging for every business in the country.  Uncertainty now costing jobs....Vote giving MPs chance to force May's hand on Brexit set to be delayed | Politics | The Guardian  
Just as a clue for MPs considering voting against no-deal Brexit, doing this 5 years or indeed 5 weeks after the event would probably not be helpful  
.@Tobias_Ellwood is right, he’s in the wrong party. #ERG MPs uphold the party’s manifesto, seek to ensure the EU referendum result is fully implemented & want a Withdrawal Agreement to benefit the UK not block an independent Trade Policy unlike Mrs May’s dire deal. 
Only one in five people trusts Jeremy Corbyn on Brexit, and even fewer think he is putting the national interest first. 
Nigel Farage Forms New Brexit Party  
Delighted to see Caerphilly CLP overwhelmingly pass a motion supporting an extension to art 50, and calling on @UKLabour to campaign for a public vote on Brexit with the option to stay in the EU and to include such an option in a GE manifesto @hef4caerphilly @WayneDavid_MP 
If Labour:• Change the leader• Get rid of the rubbish Corbynite MPs• Change the front bench• Stamp out racism/anti-semitism/misogyny• Boot out the bullying members• Adopt an anti-Brexit position• Become a proper OppositionI *might* consider voting for them. 
Alberta will have a referendum on equalization payments under the next government There will be a lot more discussion on Albexit #abpoli 
UK is currently fastest-growing #EU country while France’s growth halved, Germany’s set to halve & Italy in recession.EU is an economic basket-case with mafia instincts.How right Britain was to vote to Leave becomes clearer with every passing day#Brexit 
Wake me up when Brexit finally happens!  
“Theresa May has been warned by a group of Tory MPs attempting to break the Brexit deadlock that the Northern Ireland backstop is a ‘monumental’ issue that will not be resolved with a ‘few cursory tweaks’”#StandUp4Brexit 
350 THOUSAND PEOPLE have signed so far for a NO DEAL BREXIT how much longer can parliament go on ignoring this. Hundreds all over the UK are still signing it.   
This evening an Taoiseach, Leo Varadkar and Prime Minister, @theresa_may met at Farmleigh House in Dublin to discuss the ongoing political impasse in Northern Ireland and the latest Brexit developments following their respective engagements in Belfast and Brussels. #Brexit  
New Brexit Party main policy is “that the United Kingdom shall cease to be a member of the European Union and shall not thereafter make any treaty or join any international organisation which involves in any way the surrender of any part of the United Kingdom’s sovereignty”. 
Leave voters: Would you vote for a #Brexit Party headed by Nigel Farage?**Please retweet after voting **#WTOBrexit #Conservative #Labour #UKIP #ForBritain #SDP #Time #Sovereign #StandUp4Brexit #StandUp4Democracy 
35 years ago, Patrick Minford advocated for the closure of the coal mines and steel industry in Northern towns Many have never recovered, Selby, Recar etcThis is the same man who cheer leaded the Poll TaxThis is the same man who's words the Brexiteers use to support Brexit 
From the antisemitism smears to the threats of splitting from the party over Brexit, the PLP are still at war with Labour's leadership.#iStandWithWavertree 
May's Devilish WAEnviron protection “aim of ensuring proper functioning of single customs territory”.This is most brazen element of treaty deception I have seen outside Soviet practices.It makes sure UK doesn’t become more competitive than #EU#Brexit 
Completely outrageous.EU flags are being confiscated at the BBC’s Eurovision You Decide event - and replaced with Union Jacks.Please RT to help stop #BBCbias from the Brexit Broadcasting Corporation.#StopBrexit 
I gave up on the BBC when they muzzled David Attenborough for voicing his opinion on BREXIT. I mean David Attenborough FFS. 
Is this the party that will become a major political force at the next General Election if Brexit isn't delivered  
Very much in sorrow I predicted that Brexit would be a national tragedy and historic mistake and will carry on dividing the country and political class for years.  
I can imagine Mrs T's reaction to the Brexit vanity project. She have made short work of lightweights like Rees Mogg, Farage and Hoey.  
It's extraordinary to think that, whatever happens with Brexit, an outcome that no-one voted for will be enacted. Unless of course Brexit is cancelled, and then it will be an outcome with majority support. 
First thing I'd change is to get rid of politicians who want to block implementation of the referendum result.  
“Bring it on” says Arlene regarding a referendum on Irish Unity. Well I’m up for it. Let’s go.  #Think32 #Time4Unity 
We voted Brexit and we demand it now. Stop all those useless negotiations and just #Brexit  
The EU flag banned by the BBC for the Eurovision... if there's a perfect image of the profoundly self-humiliating effect of Brexit, it is this clumsy but serious attempt at censorship at such a proudly silly event as the #EurovisionYouDecide. 
What this illustrates is the way that, as @Dannythefink has noted, Brexit supporters now rule out as unacceptable things which less than four years ago they were saying were options. My full story is here:  
Spanish PM says his government will never accept a self-determination referendum for #Catalonia and ends dialogue with the Catalan government. Huge mistake. PSOE sides up with the PP, C's and Vox. 
London has been named the top city for tech talent again. Remainer scare stories yet again proved wrong. It's time to believe in our country and #GoWTO! Help stop the Brexit betrayal @  
"Lord Sugar: Jail Brexit liars – including Boris Johnson – and give misled public a new poll"Yep.....! 
Shows how worried BBC have become & that tide is turning against Brexit if flags bother them now this much 
Hey @BBC,If you want to avoid people thinking you've got a Pro #Brexit Bias you might not want to ban #EU flags from #EurovisionYouDecide... It's literally all about celebrating European music and our unity in diversity...Victory to The @EUflagmafia! 
We export about 75% of the fish we catch... and mostly to the EU.Brexit shafts our fishing community.   
Discussing my research ‘The True Running Cost of Northern Ireland in a Reunification Scenario’ Congressman Neal, Chairman of Friends of Ireland, as Chairman of Ways & Means Committee a strong supporter of peaceful Unity of Ireland under  Good Friday Agreement #Brexit #think32 
I’m amazed that you believe that by delivering some half arsed brexit, that this will satisfy the electorate. Let me tell you right now... IT WILL NOT.  We won’t forget, we won’t give up, we won’t settle for your half in/half out version.... we WILL get the brexit we voted for.  
The public figures who promoted Brexit from the start appealed to the working classes, but anyone who cared at all about the UK's poorest would NEVER accept anything that made them even poorer.  
This 1,000-page doorstopper was published in 2015 by Business For Britain, which was Vote Leave in its embryonic form. Rees-Mogg says it is the basis of a Brexit plan. What does it say?  
Brexit Broadcast Corporation 
#Cambridge Analytica swayed Polish elections 2015.#CambridgeAnalytica swayed British referendum 2016.Russians swayed US presidential elections.We need to turn back the tide.And we will.#FBPE #FPHD #FBR #facciamorete 
Arron Banks and Theresa May targeted by anti-Brexit billboard campaign  
So, inspired by Jacob Rees-Mogg's column in The Sun today song that there was a plan for Brexit, and that this was it, I've been reading "Change Or Go".  
Irish PM says deal 'can be done' on Brexit  
EU Flags have been permitted in past Eurovision event across Europe. The removal of EU flags by the Union Jack is a political act ie rejection of EU in favour of Brexit which breaks ESC rules. @Eurovision @bbceurovision - 
So Corbyn still lying, saying Labour can "bring UK together" and that the real divisions are "not between Leave and Remain, but between the many and the few. Sorry, but the "hopes and ambitions of millions" don't rest with a party that pursues Brexit. 
Tories asleep at the wheel, so what do you expect? Nigel Farage’s new Brexit party spells trouble for the Tories  
“Are you out of your minds?” 
Taoiseach @campaignforleo welcomes British Prime Minister @theresa_may to Farmleigh. It is anticipated the leaders will hold two hours of talks over dinner on the #Brexit impasse and restoring an Executive at Stormont. |  
FT Weekend: Brexit alert as Japan trade talks stall #tomorrowspaperstoday 
"... the Govt now appears to be treating as an afterthought the impact that #Brexit will have on people in poverty."-@Alston_UNSR For example 'hardest hit' #50sWomen 
I am really proud of my sister for sharing her story. It’s about time more people are made aware of the devastating impact #Brexit will have on people with long term illnesses. Maybe then calls for a rethink will grow even more.  
This is a good thing. Start campaigning now - the Brexit Party needs to WIN the next GE!  via @BreitbartNews 
1. The EU is NOT the 'world's largest trading bloc'. The USA is.  America's economy is one-third larger than the EU27's!2. 70 countries with EU trade deals have said they will morph these post-Brexit into ones with the UK.3. 45 Non-EU countries say they want FTAs with the UK. 
Friday! Gin o'clock! Brexit took a real beating this week so have a gin on me and remember, if the DUP are complaining about you then you're probably doing something right! #ff @Prof_johnbrewer @AvilaMedia @conalrs @kokotheflegger @SRBaldesco @DSchiek @PatrickClarke74 @zwitterio 
THE GOOD NEWSOne really good news is that such negative events like #Brexit, or the right wing governments in #EU and #US, are forcing those people that weren’t interested in politics to realise the danger that we are facingOne first consequence is that we started #FPHD 
I hope Nigel Farage knows what he is taking on with his new Brexit Party. It’s going to be a huge commitment being on Question Time every week. 
Sure. I’ll get behind Brexit. *unzips* 
Want rat shit in your food? Bugs in your peanut butter? Brexit - bringing it to a supermarket near you.  
1/ According to precedent, the A-G is NOT bound by solicitor-client privilege. If asked, the A-G must provide the House of Commons the advice she gave to the government. There's a precedent for this, and it’s recent: Brexit #cdnpoli 
Another #Brexit party for racists, xenophobes and halfwits. They really are spoilt for choice.  
RIGHTI'm calling for a #Boycott @bbceurovision this year!FUCKINGBREXITBROADCASTINGCORPORATION@Conservatives TORYPARTYPROPOGANDA MACHINEIt takes a lot to make me angry but you've done it @BBCWhen you fuck with @Eurovision you REALLY get in #EUsupergirl's bad books! 
Ireland has no problem with delaying Brexit as long as it serves a purpose, deputy PM says  
The launch of our new website this week was perhaps a bigger train crash than Brexit. Sorry everyone. For both. 
Calling out Mrs Villiers to come and debate #Brexit in #ChippingBarnet @Andrew_Adonis. The best alternative arrangement to the #backstop is #Remain 
Do you think a no-deal Brexit could lead to a vote on Irish unification (as several Cabinet ministers have told the BBC)?Let us know #bbcaq 
.@theresa_may Perhaps you could leave the Brexit turmoil for 30 seconds to read the demands of young people. We are invested only in our future and that of the planet and its magnificent wildlife.  
Impassioned & honest sharing of views with @EmilyThornberry this eve. Common despair at utter irresponsibility of a govt fast running out of time. We conveyed our view that @UKLabour must move to a #PeoplesVote PDQ or risk being complicit in #Brexit disaster  
JC's plan for Brexit unites the country and is actually achievable.He has got more out of the EU after one letter than Theresa May has managed in over 2 years of ineptitude....We need a General Election for #JC4PM 
Come on @KateHoeyMP - this is inaccurate dog whistle stuff. @guyverhofstadt is an *MEP* - elected. He is not an unelected bureaucrat. Yes, he was appointed to chair the @Europarl_EN Brexit Steering group - but that’s how it works. Just like u were appointed a Sports Minister once  
I imagine that many Tory members are waiting to see if Theresa May follows through on her promises to deliver REAL Brexit, not the watered down fake Brexit her “Withdrawal Agreement” suggests. Go on Nigel.  
Man on @Channel4News just now, voted Brexit, then bought a retirement home in Spain, didn’t realise he’d lose HIS freedom of movement, wishes he could vote again, Remain this time.- Do you think you might have shot yourself a bit in the foot. - A bit. Yeah. #jamoniberico 
Will a No Deal Brexit wreck Britain’s economy? Could it spark food and medicine shortages and civil unrest? In this special edition of the spiked podcast, economists @Phil_Mullan and Larry Elliott join @FraserMyers to take apart the Brexit scare stories. 
I still find it odd how its said that the UK youth are pro EU and feel Brexit has robbed them of their future. I thought the young valued freedom..? I think perhaps they ought to speak to the kids of other member states who cant get jobs in their country#EUYouthUnemployment 
The far-right racists we're seeing are the biggest enemy of Brexit-voters.Our country is in utter chaos because our London-centric politics ignored huge parts of the country for too long, yet it's THESE clowns getting airtime, and we're still ignoring those who screamed in 2016.  
Moving @C4Ciaran film about elderly UK citizens living in Spain & terrified of #Brexit Advised by a hopeless Tory Government to “take out private insurance” one man with Parkinson’s explains that he can’t sleep for fear about his future. 
Gov Minister calls for EU Single Market & EU Customs Union style solution.The manifesto he was elected on, and the referendum result he purports to respect, directly contradict him…Why doesn't he just go and join Jezza?PM has lost control of her Gov. 
As the Electoral Commission officially recognises Nigel Farage's new Brexit Party, the first images emerge of its inaugural committee meeting  
 Spain also said there was no police violence during the Oct 1 referendum and that the images where 'fake news'. #makeamove 
Great news!Second Referendum petition smashes through 60,000 signatures!Please SIGN & RT as many people don't sign petitions on THEIR first sighting!Let's get this to 100KSIGN this   Now RT it!#FBPE #FinalSayForAll 
UKIP has run into the ground so Farage sets up another vehicle for his ego, scapegoating and lies.Different party, same shit.His betrayal narrative is ready for whatever Brexit outcome we arrive at. We have to confront it, not run away from it. 
Which of the MPs who’ve pledged to #StandUp4Brexit does the Prime Minister think would vote to be locked in a permanent Customs Union?59 (not 30) MPs have pledged to only vote for a Brexit that sees the UK leave the Customs Union, Single Market and ECJ. 
Nigel Farage’s new Brexit party should scare the living daylights out of the Tories. (My latest for Reaction @reactionlife)  
For fishermen in #Cornwall & elsewhere who depend on their income from exports, #Brexit is not looking anything like the promised land they were assured was awaiting them.For Farage & co, fishing was just a source of stupid soundbites.For them, it's their living.#PeoplesVite 
Ready to defend democracy — you're seriously saying that with a straight face Farage?Still your Brexit Party should split the nasty right wing vote so thanks for that. 
Remarkable how Christopher Chopes principled position on Private members bills, doesn't seem quite so principled when its one of his mates & he doesnt "object" Nor does his desire for full debates extend to all the Brexit legislation being rubber stamped under Henry VIII powers 
So we now have a Brexit Party ... which means we need a Pro-EU Party (group). Labour & Conservatives are both falling apart as the extremists take over. The rest of us need to gather together in the middle where we can enjoy the company of decent folk!  
Well, who does want to live in such a country?! Perhaps you could soon begin to tweet about how the Brexit you once campaigned against is a right-wing plot that will damage working communities, or stand up for 63% of the electorate who didn’t vote for the debacle?  
Google and Apple planning new HQ in London.More people working in Hi Tech in the UK then anywhere else in Europe.Once we Brexit the U.K. will lift off, the spirit of independence will grow and the economy will flourish even more.That frightens the EU. 
It appears Juncker on 24 grand a month is committing a few deadly sins Greed - 24 grand a month Laziness - What does he do Wrath - Very angry at Brexit Gluttony - Excessive drinking So who's going to hell Mr Tusk, us for wanting freedom or Juncker for his deadly sins 
Chris is absolutely right that the dynamic has changed. In my heart of hearts I know that nobody on the EU side really wants Brexit to be stopped, and my European heart knows it’s now clearly better for the EU for the UK to go. I’m grieving for my lost hope. 
#iStandWithWavertreeYou can’t pretend to ‘deliver the will of the people’ on Brexit and then block this democratic process. 
The definition of Brexit   
We should extend Article 50 just to see this silly new Brexshit... sorry Brexit Party fail. Just as UKIP did and just as Farage did in his seven attempts to become an MP.  
Italy didn't show Eurovision in 1974, worried a song repeating "si si si" would subliminally affect an upcoming referendum on divorce. #Eurovision #YouDecide 
With everyone and their dog in the EU telling May that they will not renegotiate her brexit deal, will she now stop humiliating this country and simply just leave the EU with a little pride and decorum. How she ever got to represent this country will always be a miracle. 
I had lunch today at a restaurant in Lancashire, run for the last 22 yrs by an Italian husband and wife. We discussed Brexit - they hate Germany and France as being the only winners from the EU and hope Italy will follow our example. 
The hashtags most used by MPs today were #FinnsLaw, #FinnsLawFriday, and #Brexit 
Once upon a time @DUPleader threatened a border poll-yes indeed bring it on, says Arlene...a Brexit is a long time in politics.'Ok lets do it....lets have a border poll.....and be careful what you wish for'#EventsDearArleneEvents #UnityRef #Backstop 
As everything #FailingGrayling touches turns to , I vote we give him the Brexit Secretary job next time one resigns/tomorrow morning- whichever is sooner.Based on his experience with timetables the 23:00 to Brexit would be delayed repeatedly before ultimately being cancelled. 
Thinking of starting a Beavers For Brexit movement. Interviews start tomorrow. 
New Brexit party backed by Farage wins official recognition   
Just so my great, great, great grandchildren are clear. I voted to remain the in 2016 referendum on #Brexit . I deplore Trump for what he's doing to America and the world and @duponline for what they've done to the people of Northern Ireland. This is who your granny is. 
Please name your personal pinnacle of Brexit Insanity. Mine being the BBC banning European flags from a Eurovision show.  
The Telegraph is reporting that a new Brexit Party with Nigel Farage’s backing has been officially recognised by the Electoral Commission. Nigel says “the engine is running” and he stands “ready for battle”..  
Spotted on Woodstock Rd in Finsbury Park, London: Before the referendum, @vote_leave said, “We'll negotiate the terms of a new deal [with the EU] *before* we start any legal process to leave.”Great work by @ByDonkeys for highlighting *another* Leave campaign lie #LedByDonkeys 
Excl: centrists – crushed by EU praise for Corbyn Brexit – plan breakaway next week  
Britain Will Drop Out Of The "Safest Medicines System In The World". Fake Drugs Could But Patients At Risk In No-Deal Brexit. #Brexit #NHS 
Chancellor Philip Hammond is playing a murky game, underming the chances of a real and true Brexit from Number 11 Downing Street. The false prophets of Project Fear need to be rebuffed. Kick Hammond out, and get Brexit accomplished without delay..  
Worked very well for the other 51 countries that left UK since WWII. Scotland will be the 52nd. Brexit? No-one’s ever tried that before.  
Nigel Farage's "Brexit Party" make an early start to fighting new EU referendum......  
The BBC banning European flags at a Eurovision show is kind of ...I don't know what to call it. It's the absolute pinnacle of Brexit Insanity. 
The Electoral Commission have officially recognized Nigel Farage's New Brexit Party.  
'Thousands of Tory party members' to defect to Nigel Farage's Brexit Party as it gets official approval  via @Telegraph 
The BBC exposes us to EU Supergirl, Femi, and now a naked mentalist. It obsesses over trivia and novelty. It is incapable of interrogating events on an adult level. Their basic assumption is that their audience is as crass as they are. #Brexit 
With news of Nigel Farage’ #Brexit Party being formed. How would you vote in a future General Election if currently a Conservative or Labour supporter? #ManagedNoDeal 
The only way out of this Brexit mess is to extend Article 50 | London Evening Standard  
I’ve tried debating Chloe, I’ve asked who funds you and the TPA. I’ve asked about #55TuftonStreet. I’ve asked for tangible Brexit benefits. You aren’t interested in debate.  
Blindfold Brexit will mean “never-ending nightmare” for British businesses and citizens - People's Vote  
Looks like the Government is backing out of its earlier commitment to continue to fund the Erasmus study abroad programme for students accepted before Brexit Day.  
The customarily excellent weekly Brexit round up from @IanDunt which, dare I say it, is pretty much consistent with my own modest efforts in my Brexit Blog post on the week's developments:  
The Good (Remain), the Bad (Tory/Labour), and the Ugly (Brexit)  
The Irish leader has quashed Theresa May's hopes of breaking the deadlock on the #Brexit backstop  
Face it, this is the UK's future forever after Brexit. Going cap in hand around the world to be offered trade deals on far worse terms than the ones we're giving up as EU members. Endless special carveouts and exceptions, favouring their industries and penalising ours.  
A full house!ALL of the other FIVE EYES want post-Brexit bilateral Free Trade Agreements with the United Kingdom. For those in the UK, in Brussels and elsewhere who claimed we'd be isolated, this is a huge blow.United StatesCanadaAustraliaNew Zealand 
Vote giving MPs chance to force May's hand on Brexit set to be delayed  
'Thousands of Tory party members' to defect to Nigel Farage's Brexit Party as it gets official approval  
BREXIT: The British Government declaring war on its own country. 
She used to be aware of this (as she says here in April 2016). But post-Referendum she abandoned reality to save her political skin.  
Farage has registered a 'Brexit Party'. Remain Party anyone? Fuck Labour and the Tories. Let's go toe to toe with the Brexit manaics for a final showdown 
Labour want new Brexit referendum if May rejects our plan, McDonnell says So Labour reneging on their manifesto 2017? 
How ministers will try to protect UK economy in a no-deal Brexit  
There’s no time to wait for a second referendum. We need to make the case against Brexit right now. My column  
Another Leaver who can't/won't tell you what they wanted from Brexit and can't tell you why those who voted Remain are responsible for what has happened.  
Brexit as disruptive as disease outbreak, says farmers' leader  
Getting in the ocean is something I try and do every weekend after the stresses of a job I’m still adjusting to. I think we are watching the shortcomings of the career politician epitomised in BREXIT; politics is changing and it’s exciting. And overdue.  
Nigel’s Comeback: Official Brexit Party Recognised by Electoral Commission  
TONIGHT on #amanpourpbsSpike Lee on his Oscar nominations and the blackface scandal in Virginia...@NicolaSturgeon speaks to @NPRMichel about what Brexit means for Scottish independence...And Leïla Slimani on her ground-breaking novels.Check your local @pbs listings. 
With so many reasons to abandon Brexit, writes Mitch Benn, Remain is winning the battle by a significant margin  
UKIP was instrumental in driving the country off of Beachy Head and back to 1885 with no plan and no idea what Brexit truly entailed. It then destroyed itself through internecine infighting and now has no MPs or national support. 
After a week working in Amsterdam with brilliant people from all over Europe I feel renewed despair for the insanity of Brexit. 
Farage's new party's policy goes beyond Brexit - pledging “that the UK shall not [post-Brexit] make any treaty or join any international organisation which involves in any way the surrender of any part of the United Kingdom’s sovereignty” via @Telegraph 
So much for May’s deal bringing  closure and allowing us to move on from Brexit and focus on currently forgotten issues: if her deal passes we will do nothing but Brexit for years. No clarity = no closure  
The US is preparing to monster Britain in trade negotiations.Our health service, food standards and protections for products like Scotch whisky will be devastated.This is the reality of Brexit Britain.   
So Farage has his new Brexit party approved. Where the LIVING FUCK are the remain parties to oppose this? Fucking nowhere. I despair....I think we deserve to be fucked. 
#NigelFarage's New political Party is here...... We need a party which will deliver what the 17,410,742 Brits voted for.. A Real #BREXIT! If you believe in this country Vote for the #BrexitParty! @CCHQPress @TheConWom @ConHome @BrandonLewis @andreajenkyns @DCBMEP @theresa_may 
But of course they won't do anything, May is the beneficiary of the fraud and Corbyn believes he can win an election whilst we lose all our rights, freedoms and protections in what is now, whichever way you look at it, a banana republic....here's further madness of our laws. 
We finally get to find out what Brexit means?  
So let me get this straight.One misogynist backbencher can block a bill whose sole intention is protecting people, but all the Remainers in the Commons can do absolutely nothing to stop Brexit? How does that even work?  
.........Meanwhile in @Number10press!  @CCHQPress @ConHome @TheConWom @Conservatives @theresa_may @BrandonLewis #ConservativeParty #Tory #Tories @DCBMEP @andreajenkyns @BrexitStewart @ajcdeane @StandUp4Brexit @LeaveEUOfficial @LeaveMnsLeave #Brexit 
To be fair to the Electoral Commission Andrew, and we share your concerns, the Electoral Commission has investigated the 2016 referendum and found the Leave campaigns guilty of fraud to a criminal standard of proof. As seen here, it's now up to Parliament.....  
Neither major party represents my views on Brexit.Both of them can't even agree amongst themselves what views they actually have.Both leaders are the most ineffectual and disappointing politicians to have clung on to the leadership. 
This is something which should REALLY concern @Conservatives, because we, your members, are incredibly angry at the way you, @theresa_may and our members of parliament are plotting to betray the #Brexit we voted for.Deliver something other than the WA, or lose all support.  
Primary name: The Brexit PartyRegister: Great BritainStatus: AuthorisedDate registered: 05/02/2019Date last change to primary change authorised by EC: 05/02/2019 Financial year end: 31/12candidates in England: Yescandidates in Scotland: Yescandidates in Wales: Yes 
You'd have to be really thick to think that “...what that special place in Hell looks like for those who promoted Brexit without even a sketch of a plan of how to carry it safely...” refers to #Leave voters.It clearly refers to the ill-prepared leaders of #Brexit with no plan.  
A New Brexit party backed by Nigel Farage has reportedly been officially recognised by the Electoral Commission. The former UKIP leader previously spoke with @adamboultonSKY about returning to politics 
The few who get angry about a public vote on the EU Deal will be dwarfed by many thousands enraged from losing their jobs by Brexit if no vote is granted @Femi_Sorry 
This’ll snowball most likely. Now snap election is off table if May runs on her woeful WA BRino sellout. Too many Conservatives will tick #Brexit party. Lots of W-class Labour voters will likely do same up North. Huge backlash coming for main parties over this cosy CU stitch up!  
Ratings for @jeremycorbyn have crashed to their worst yet minus 55 % even worse than Michael Foot who lost by a landslide to Mrs Thatcher in 1983. Brexit dithering and antisemitism  two big factors against him says poll 
Last week Tory MPs were ready to give May another fortnight.None of the "yes to Brexit with a deal, no to No Deal" brigade backed Cooper-Boles Amdmt.This week May has achieved nothing. A Deal is no closer.So next week if you're a Tory pragmatist... you back Cooper-Boles..? 
Does the UK really want to go down in history as the country which walked away from the hugely successful European peace and prosperity project known as the EU on the basis of a dubious majority obtained in a fraudulent referendum? Surely not.#RevokeA50 
A rare exposure for  the voice of the Common Man in Scotland.  The Scottish media infrequently give space to such views about the practicality of the SNP's plans. Instead there is a constant whine about Brexit and obsession with constitutional nonsense.  
Freight ships setting sail from UK ports this week with cargo to far-flung destinations like Australia or New Zealand, have a voyage of about 50 days. They risk arriving after Brexit day (if it’s a no-deal Brexit) with no idea of the trade rules that will be in place. Insane. 
Get Judith to sort out Brexit!#thechase 
Breaking: Nigel Farage forms New Brexit Party called UKUNT  
We can’t wait for a people’s vote: make the case against Brexit right now | Jonathan Freedland  
China and India are lifting millions out of poverty, this one is saying Nigerians should not see rice as a staple under Buhari. We are big enough to be more than one country....a referendum for splitting us up may not be a bad idea after all.  
The fact the British Government are now using a democratic vote agreed in the Good Friday Agreement, as a threat to the DUP, means they know the conditions for its calling have already been met and it should happen regardless of Brexit  
We’re talking about Brexit all wrong - and it’s screwing our cause. Read my piece in @HuffPostUK about why we need to change the conversation. @OFOCBrexit 
A new Brexit party backed by Nigel Farage has just gained official recognition. Expect to hear a lot more noise from him going forward. Sigh. 
#Brexit backstop cannot be removed from Withdrawal Agreement, says @naomi_long after Taoiseach meeting.See more here - 
I've written a over a million words on Brexit and read countless books on trade and globalisation and covered the subject from every known angle. BBC invites=0.Demented remoaner gets her chuff out. BBC...  
At @Failte_Ireland we see #golf as an important component in our strategy to grow and retain the #Northern #Irish market in the face of #Brexit, and were delighted to see so many golfing enthusiasts at our #Golf #Ireland promotion night.. @IrlLinksGolf  
I say again. This was a bad week in Brexit. The success or failure of the Cooper-Boles amendment next week is critical for momentum of next phase. /22 
If the Unionists are so convinced that their Union is the way forward, why are they all clamouring for @theSNP to drop their next Independence Referendum?What are they afraid of, maybe not being able to fiddle another result and Scotland becoming Independent from Westminster? 
Let me tell you something, @Theresa_May; something of which - incredibly - you seem unaware. Your first duty is not to implement the result of a referendum. Your first duty is to protect the British public from harm. That you have not categorically ruled out no-deal is appalling. 
From a fortnight after the referendum...  
I know she does the vicar’s daughter thing. But she has a remarkable capacity to say the opposite of what she said before. She promised clarity. Another Brexit promise broken.  
Shock! Academics like @Prof_johnbrewer have personal opinions on Brexit. They are under no special responsibilities not to put easily-offended noses out of joint, and politicians should not be silencing them with letters to employer institutions:  
At the #GermanSymposium 2019 at the London School of Economics, I make the case for a strong and united Europe - despite the current debate about #brexit.  
Am loving @TheNewEuropean this week.  I hope the message in this photo sinks in with at least some of the #Corbynists.The thought that the leadership of @UKLabour is keen to get into bed with @theresa_may will seal the lid on @UKLabour's unelectability.#Brexit #Lexit 
So for all us Brexiteers... Nigel Farage is totally committed to see Brexit realized as we all wanted when we voted and thought we were voting for. Whether you like Farage or not...that doesn't really matter. If he helps get us out properly then support.  
Actually, he's talking about the people who "promoted Brexit". The ones who campaigned for Brexit without a plan to solve the practical problems it will cause.If you can't spot that simple fact, no wonder you fell for Leave lies.#ASpecialPlaceInHell 
But Brexit is going to be the saviour of our fishing industry? You know, taking back control of our seas and all that? What, oh we have to sell the fish somewhere too? Really? But... 
The sooner the better Nigel, time is of the essence!New Brexit party backed by Nigel Farage gets go-ahead  
The Electoral Commission have officially recognised The Brexit Party.It will fight the European elections if Article 50 is extended.I sincerely hope that this prospect is recognised by both the Conservative Party and the Labour Party as a threat. 
Lammy’s petrified. Brexit betrayal will lead to millions of people voting for Nigel. Brilliant. 
Brexit is "a spoilt brat masquerading as a political movement". A wonderfully blunt and brilliantly written piece by @jonlis1 for @Politics_co_uk. I'd quote the whole thing if I had room. Seriously: read it. 
1,000's Tory members to defect to New #Brexit PartyKey Policy: “UK shall cease to be a member of EU & shall not thereafter make any treaty or join any international organisation which involves in any way the surrender of any part of UK’s sovereignty”.#EU 
This guy is my fucking spirit animal.#Brexit #SNP #BBCQT pic.twitter.com/DuA9EHn4tE 
Nigel Farage is creating a new brexit party. To stay in line with his current political career, they will never get elected, never turn up to work, talk complete shit and then blame everyone else for their failure. 
Spygate is like Brexit - full of corrupt characters, convoluted procedures, no end in sight. But, above all, wholly unnecessary. 
Farage's new party - The Brexit Party - is now registered with the Electoral Commission......he's not as stupid as he looks.....  
 It's just been alerted to my attention that the security @bbceurovision event in #Manchester tonight are refusing to let anyone in with a flag @BBC #Brexit Broadcasting Corporation strikes again!The @EUflagmafia team have driven from #London to hand out flags! 
Feeling voiceless over Brexit? We're taking over Parliament on Feb 27, demanding to speak to our MPs.Join us   
.@Nigel_Farage: My new Brexit party stands ready to defend democracy  
PM "I have to deliver any kind of #Brexit by 29th March otherwise my husbands business will face hefty tax bills" 
A New European country:1 Parliament1 Govt1 Court of Justice1 Currency1 Flag1 AnthemThat's been plan all along.They knew people would never accept it & never willingly surrender their freedoms.So politicians kept truth from the people.#Brexit #EU 
The dreadful impact of #Brexit on Wales: 14 serious ways our country loses out if we crash out of EU #revokeandremain ⁦@peoplesvote_uk⁩ ⁦@WalesForEurope⁩ ⁦@Cardiff4EU⁩ ⁦@LabPeoplesVote⁩ ⁦@Remain_Labour⁩ 
Government working on plans to keep NHS working in a #NoDealBrexit situation.FFS #Brexit isn't compulsory. It isn't something that can't be avoided. It is self inflicted harm. If the consequences are a damaged NHS, that was never on the sodding bus. 
The top 40 horrors lurking in the small print of Theresa May’s Brexit deal are truly horrific!It would be a Brexit in name ONLY. The UK’s hands would be tied indefinitely. This document by the Spectator is a MUST READ for everyone interested in Brexit  
The Brexit Party's constitution says "the party may stand in all elections to public office from elections to the European Parliament (whilst the UK remains a member of the European Union) down to the Parish Council level, including Mayoral elections." [FAO @GuidoFawkes] 
Only one in five people now trusts Corbyn on Brexit. Only one in six thinks he gives strong leadership on it. And less than a fifth believe he puts the national interest first on the issue."Corbyn's leadership ratings crash to worst level yet over Brexit  
Remainers pose as free-traders, yet they cling to the protectionist EU. They whip up fears about imposing tariffs post-Brexit, and about *not* imposing tariffs post-Brexit. All this trade talk is just about scoring political points, writes @Phil_Mullan 
Corbyn’s weak opposition to Brexit has helped Theresa May get this far. Demand the final say on Brexit and the option to stay in the EU >  
Brexit is basically the longest ever episode of Keeping Up Appearances in which Uncle Albert from Peckham comes to stay. 
 via @GuidoFawkesNigel Farage is forming a new Party.It will be very interesting to see who he will get to join this enterprise.Whatever you may think of Nigel it’s great for Brexit that he’s back helping us leave this Demented Union. 
'Nightmare scenario': French firms start to panic about no deal Brexit  
“I don’t think Mr Tusk had me in mind... I set out very clear plans before the referendum and my plan now is that we should table a comprehensive Free Trade Agreement and we should leave automatically on the 29th March in accordance with the law we have now passed“ @johnredwood 
As Brexiteers thought... A new Brexit party forms. It had to happen. We are being sold down the river by May and weak Labour leadership and a truly awful Withdrawal Agreement where our eyes are being kept of the terrible clauses buried in the WA.  
Interesting new paper by Prof Patrick Minford predicting that the trade benefits of Brexit coupled with advantages of controlling our own regulatory environment could see growth "rise by around 0.5% per annum on average for the next decade and a half."  
Ingram Pinn on  a special place in hell for Brexiteers #BorisJohnson #TheresaMay #Tories #Brexit #BrexitShambles - political cartoon gallery in London  
Emmanuel Macron’s officials have threatened to block a Brexit delay      French destroy hopes of Remainer plot to kill off Brexit as they block plan for year-long delay  
Labour/Corbyn are praised for their sensible Brexit deal suggestions" Antisemitism" is all over the national pressAny connections noticed here folks? 
Corbyn scramble to stop Labour imploding over BrexitWhat a farce, Corbyn is a Long Term Eurosceptic , as many Labour Leave Voters Are! He is being pushed by Mad MAC & Sneaky Starmer!  
As good old British common sense begins to kick in re #Brexit-an analysis of how "there has been a modest but discernible softening of  #Leave vote: Today: #Remain 54%, #Leave 46%"Sir #JohnCurtice:Difference:Young people.#PeoplesVoteWake up,#Labour  
· @yanisvaroufakis : "I don't see any parallel between Brexit and Catalonia... First, [Catalans] aren't racists or xenophobes. And second, they want to be part of the EU. They just don't want to be part of Spain." 
If Brexit looks like a success to you, I would hate to see your idea of failure.  
"For anyone who had been paying attention, the shock Brexit result was not a bolt from the blue, but a reckoning for which we should have been prepared."Labour MP for Ashfield @GloriaDePiero on what Labour can learn from its Leave-voting constituents. 
North men, South men, comrades all. #Brexit 
An official complaint has been filed with the BBC over its misrepresentation of the "wrongdoing" on both sides of the referendum campaign during QT at the end of January. Will it make a difference? Who knows. But at least the complaint is on the record, backed by a weighty group.  
Finally a proper plan for a proper Brexit!  
EXCLUSIVE @Nigel_Farage: 'My new Brexit party stands ready to defend democracy'  via @Telegraph 
"The Brexit process, for many people, is the final capstone on the total failure of our British political system."Andrew Cooper, former adviser to Cameron, and Gavin Kelly, former aide to Brown, debate the likelihood of a new political party emerging after Brexit.  
The Brexit Party's extraordinary main policy. North Korea here we come.....  
It may be Friday afternoon... but I've been looking at how govt can get necessary leg/treaties through parly by 29 March in case of no deal #Brexit There are ways... but these risk damaging an already fractured relationship between govt & parl  
Another good news story for Port of Hull as an international Caribbean shipping service relocates to the Humber. With international trading-links being developed, it's clear Hull is leading the country Post-Brexit trading with the world  (not just eu!)  
. @Nigel_Farage tells @Telegraph his Brexit Party can win the 2019 Euro elections if Brexit is delayed and they are held in the UK: "Under my leadership, Ukip topped the poll in the 2014 European election... it would certainly be my intention to achieve the same result again." 
Just a reminder that Christopher Chope, who has blocked the FGM bill after last year's upskirting one, also denies climate change, voted against same-sex marriage and campaigned for Brexit.Received a knighthood last year for his services  
The Spanish Presidency says that "the Government of Spain will never accept a self-determination referendum" in Catalonia.  
. @Nigel_Farage: "If Theresa May and Jeremy Corbyn do not welcome the prospect of this electoral threat, and would like me to retire from frontline politics, they have a very straightforward opportunity to keep themselves happy. All they have to do is deliver a proper Brexit..." 
1. The people want it. Every poll shows that.2. The country is already more divided than 'last time'.3. Brexit = a far right takeover.4. It isn't. 5. No, it would give all of them the chance to vote leave again if they so wish.  
Ex-Japanese government official has some interesting + comments in @FT comments section re Brexit and trade negotiations. "only the British think international treaty negotiations are played like a game. The rest of the world don't think that." [Trump-type Americans might?] 1/ 
It appears the argument for Brexit that it might force an all-Ireland poll on the border issue appears slowly to be gaining momentum. Certainly one potential route to solving the EU border issue... 
So, if the UK takes part in the next European elections, Nigel Farage's new Brexit Party will be able to field candidates  
Just launched - The Brexit Party!Officially registered and ready to go... there will surely be a new Ukip-style vehicle. Will this be it?Nice scoop by @christopherhope 
Whoever managed to get this legally-binding clause on bacon bap sandwiches with butter (no margarine) and Heinz Tomato Ketchup and HP sauces (no alternatives) into a legal contract about a building construction project,put them in charge of negotiating the Brexit backstop NOW.  
Sadly that is the sort of idiocy the UK has had to put up with. Many MPs campaigned for Leave without knowing a single thing about the EU. Several ministers don’t know what they are talking about either. Most of what we get is lies. And unicorns. #StopBrexit #Brexit 
Ok, this is EXACTLY what people have been warning about, again and again, ever since the Brexit referendum. Other countries simply aren't going to offer the UK the same trade deal they've given the UK - period. Latest examples: Japan and South Korea.  
Unbelievably, soft headed people are actually stockpiling baked beans in case of a No Deal Brexit. Well I'm stockpiling food-bank vouchers for when Corbyn takes over.Who's got it right? 
The clearest, best analysis of BREXIT by the always-brilliant @RichardWellings 
The EU doesn't keep Britain safe. They do. Help save Brexit @  
Spanish ruling party .@PSOE:[Re: #Catalonia]"We will never accept a  #Referendum of #SelfDetermination" #Espanya#Spain#Spanien#Espagne#Spagna9 x#SpanishShowTrial#SpanishInquisition#Spanishjusticeisfake 
They won’t.  Because the fact pattern must draw us to conclude that @metpoliceuk & @NCA_UK are probably delaying the results of investigations into Brexit fraud til March 30th.  If true, this is the biggest Justice scandal in our history, and part of a coup d’etat. 
Last year in NI:3 deaths17 bombings36 punishment shootings53 punishment beatings166 arrests under the terrorism actFew get national attention, so when discussing brexit as a threat to peace it's worth highlighting that violence never disappeared  
'Very real' chance of united Ireland vote following no-deal Brexit say government ministers 
The incessant EU-blaming is the clearest indication we could have that those pushing Brexit unequivocally KNOW it is going to be an absolute disaster. They are railroading it through in full knowledge of the damage it will inflict on the UK. There's a word for that. 
Seeing as the DUP are in the mood for reporting individuals for their language around #Brexit im guessing they’ve been in touch with Newry, Mourne & Down Council about Henry Reilly??  
The obvious, but rarely commented on, reality of Brexit is that it will lead to the UK getting *worse* trade deals from other countries rather than better ones.  
Any Labour MP that leaves the party because they want a second Brexit referendum should resign their seat & stand for re-election. Their constituents should be allowed to have a ‘People’s Vote’ when they realise that what they voted for in June 2017 was not what was delivered. 
Narrator: There isn’t a Brexit deal that benefits the whole of the UK. There never was.  
'When Mr Tusk and his allies look at Brexit, they see the spectre haunting them at home. Understandably, they attack.' | @FraserNelson 
Donald Tusk’s comment that there is 'a special place in hell' for those who led the Brexit campaign with no plan for how it might work, raises the question of what hell might look like for a leading Leaver – Robert Shrimsley  
To be absolutely clear, @theresa_may, you are not doing this for the British public but for your rich buddies who managed to con enough people to squeeze out a tiny majority for their selfish project in what you know was a fraudulent referendum.Move on.#RevokeA50 
Don’t talk nonsense - how could there have been a ‘Deal’ before the referendum vote was even held? Does that mean you support #PeoplesVote on PM’s ‘Deal’? 
Game theory says Brexit negotiations are now all about avoiding blame  
#TheTerror should be required watching for everyone involved in animated films, Brexit, or anything else that's expected to fly powered mainly by positive thinking.(Still from the show, interpretive subtitles my own)  
Wondering what #EUCitizens can do now to prepare for #Brexit and #SettledStatus?  Read our new blog post from Director @jenanglaw for ideas on how you can prepare - and help others - deal or no deal. @EULondonRep @EUCommScotland @the3million @LawCentres 
After my visit to European Parliament more convinced friction of Brexit bad 4 UK, EU, NATO & Transatlantic relationship. Brussels is full of self obsessed little leaders obsessed with little game of power therein. What matters is strategic state cohesion given Gathering Storm 
Never felt more confident leave would win a second referendum  
Keep this in mind when voting in reunification referendum.  
What many of us want to know is why we are being made to wait until after Brexit. Why isn't the Scottish Government acting NOW to prevent us being stripped of our EU citizenship? #DissolveTheUnion 
At some point May and Corbyn are going to announce “Ta Ra! We’ve delivered Brexit!” and across the UK 66 million people will declare “We didn’t vote for this sh1t!”What happens then?” 
"People started saying nasty things out loud, as if the Brexit vote somehow legitimized what they were feeling but had always been unable to say out loud. Brexit has made them feel empowered to finally come out and tell those bloody immigrants what to do." 
Alright, I'm thinking we need Brexit advent calendars, to start opening on March 1.Ideas for the pictures behind each door - go! 
European farmers / agri-traders /  food makers lobbying EU to consider unilateral contingency measures for foodstuffs, as current plans wouldn't be enough to avoid harsh impact of no-deal Brexit 
The Brexit plan, leave the EU, no trade agreement with the EU, no trade agreements with any other country on the planet, default to WTO, the Worst Trade Option, result higher consumer prices, falling pound, rising unemployment, that isn’t a plan, that is an economic suicide note. 
Japanese Customs here tells Japan’s businesses that “conditions remain unpredictable” re UK & Brexit but the new EU free trade area low tariffs won’t apply to imports from UK, and to expect WTO tariffs in and out from March 30 with No Deal/ no transition  
This @FT scoop highlights the May government's irresponsibility in keeping No Deal Brexit on the table.  Completing bilateral free trade deal with Japan equal to what UK has via #EU not easy-peasy as Brexiters often claim  via @financialtimes 
Leo Varadkar: I will not negotiate Brexit with PM over dinner  
EU commission spokesperson: “We are exactly where we were yesterday when we discussed all issues related to Brexit extensively. Nothing new has happened since, and so I have nothing new to say to what we have been saying over the last couple of days – and weeks, if I may say.” 
Ah, Robbie Williams, backing Brexit from*checks notes* his mansion in Los Angeles.  
The Hitler gene is still alive in the EU. ‘You should be ashamed!’ German MEP attacks EU's Verhofstadt for Brexit rant  
#indyref2 #Poll #polloftheday #politics Does #Scotland need another #independence referendum?(doesn't matter if your Scottish or not, I'm just interested in what people think in general) 
When I was grilled on @BBCr4today, the liberal left had a meltdown because apparently I’m a racist fascist blah blah. But when a creepy exhibitionist wants to go on naked while campaigning against Britain’s democratic Brexit vote, that’s fine?Riiiiiiiighhhhttt.  
We have known since December 2016 how Trump's "America First" administration views Brexit.  
More Labour MPs need to recognise they can't call themselves Labour MPs while the party supports Brexit, the most hard right policy of all-time. Corbyn gets excited about Thatcherism, but it's so far to the right of that it's off the scale.   
Interesting suggestions by DP @WilliamsRuto.Will give the referendum debate an interesting twist.  
Why do you think a long-standing fringe controversy suddenly got mainstreamed in the aftermath of the Brexit referendum?  And how do you tolerate its being promoted by the same media sources with the same level of dishonesty?Trans and other women's  rights are not in conflict. 
I hate how brexit has become a Tory trick for getting away with everything. Behind the newspaper headlines, austerity deaths are at a record high, homelessness has increased, youth services savagely cut and teenage suicide at a new high - they will use brexit to get away with it 
It’s only weeks away and I haven’t done any of my Brexit shopping. Not even bought cards for people yet. 
Here comes our Referendum Baby. My door of fatherhood is unlocked.I got a Biafran Baby Boy (BBB).Mother & child are sound & healthy.@okafo_uche@EmekaGift@radiobiafralive@NkirukaNistoran 
... and the Electoral Commission will then do precisely nothing, as after the 2016 referendum  
"We're not ready for Brexit..."Three of Whitehall’s leading former mandarins today call for a delay to Brexit to prevent a “leap in the dark” departure from the EU. 
.@DUPleader Arlene Foster rejects the suggestion of a vote on Irish unification after a no-deal #Brexit, saying "there are many people engaging in Project Fear"  
So we are all clear - this is the view of the UK Home OfficeIrish citizens born in Northern Ireland are automatically British by birth irrespective of their GFA right to be IrishThis is in reference to our own court case #Brexit  
How does the new Labour party plan to facilitate Brexit stand up to the motion democratically passed at party conference – Labour's largest annual democratic event of the year?It doesn't.#FFS #PeoplesVote 
Ha! We just passed self-styled Brexit bad boy and National Crime Agency target @Arron_Banks for followers. Next up, @KateHoeyMP (48.5k). Then @JohnRedwood (51.9k) and after that it's @patel4witham (ex-tobacco lobbyist Priti Patel) on 52.1k. Chasing them down, one by one  
DUP's Nigel Dodds calls Jeremy Corbyn's #Brexit offer "a Plan F or G" - adding "the way to a majority for a deal in the UK is with the Conservative party and the DUP"  
Jeremy Corbyn's Brexit tests would keep the UK under EU rule and break his promise that a vote to leave would mean "leaving completely".  
Remain leads in poll of polls.The trend is away from Brexit.And this is in response to a general Leave v Remain Q.When Leave is defined (as in the real world it’ll have to be) the figures for Remain are even higher.Forging ahead with an unpopular Brexit will end v badly.  
That naked Brexit lady is clearly mad. Not because she's naked but because she's naked in February. 
Tory MP Dominic Grieve: "If people want a no-deal Brexit they'd have to elect members of parliament to go to Westminster to form a government to do it. I would absolutely refuse to do such a thing." But his voters thought they had as Grieve campaigned on a Brexit manifesto 
Just a reminder that DJ Hazard hasn’t released any new music in about 5 years. This is actually a more important issue than Brexit tbh. We need a referendum on new Hazard riddims. 
Anyone else up for going to see Theresa May to beg and grovel to her to accept our deal before we shoot ourselves in the head electorally for a few generations by calling for a 2nd referendum?  
What a statesman looks like. The EU have been the grow-ups during the whole Brexit fiasco. The British, in particular the English have been like quarrelling schoolchildren. (And that’s being unfair to schoolchildren!)  
Thom Yorke lashed out at U.K. prime minister Theresa May for "causing immense distress and suffering" in order to deliver a Brexit deal  
what if republicans make 2020 into a referendum on "socialism" and then "socialism" wins? 
Simple question Paul. Your party supports frictionless, and tariff free, trade with the Irish Republic over the Northern Irish border - .Why then, In the event of Scottish independence, do u not support it for your own country? Asking for (5M) friends. #independence #Brexit  
*Jeremy Corbyn calls for a customs union, close alignment to single market, alignment on rights and protections, participation in EU agencies and security arrangements*Opponents: CORBYN HAS NO BREXIT PLAN!Literal President of the European Council: Corbyn’s plan is promising. 
“I don’t think there’s going to be a another referendum...the campaign’s lost momentum” Labour’s @JonAshworth tells me  on the latest Political Thinking podcast. Now on @BBCSounds 
LEAD STORY: Shock as woman known for taking her clothes off to protest Brexit takes her clothes off to protest Brexit during appearance she was booked for because she takes her clothes off to protest Brexit.  
MUST-READ: Gus O'Donnell, former head of the civil service, on how the only way out of this Brexit mess is to extend Article 50 & why he's backing a #PeoplesVote. Please RT:  
Young people are being let down by this Tory government and its shambolic handling of #Brexit - we need to ensure we invest in our young people!  
BREAKING: The Spanish government breaks dialogue and negotiations with the Catalan government and affirms that it will never allow a self-determination referendum. 
The thing about #brexit is that the more you shine the light on it the darker it gets. #FBPE #PeoplesVote 
Short answer to the question is Yes. Nicola Sturgeon and her SNP will keep making the case for another referendum until they get the answer they want. If the people of Scotland want to end this there's only one realistic way. Kick them out of every elected office they are in.   
Taoiseach Leo Varadkar : "I am the European Union when it comes to these matters. The Irish Gov & EU are  all one when it comes to #Brexit.  If people haven't realised that over the past three years, they are coming to realise it now. "  
During the referendum campaign we were promised #Brexit would bring endless benefits to Wales, instead we are facing job losses and businesses relocating. That is why I support a #PeoplesVote and an #ExitFromBrexit, because Wales did not vote to be poorer.  
Amazing really that with 50 days until Brexit deadline these outcomes or a combination of them are all still entirely possibleMay’s dealCorbyn‘s dealNo dealReferendumGeneral ElectionRevoke Article 50Extend Article 50Norway+ 
"Today is not a day for negotiations" - Ireland's Taoiseach Leo Varadkar on what he expects from #Brexit talks with Northern Irish political leaders and - later - UK PM Theresa May 
'The failing EU' - you're now going full Trump Jacob, have you no shame? 
Arron Banks and Theresa May trolled by anti-Brexit billboard campaign  
Brexit: Labour Abandons Manifesto Promise to End EU Free Movement Migration  
The Spanish Government of Pedro Sanchez makes it official: they will NEVER accept a referendum + no rapporteur for the negotiations with Catalonia.The pressure of the right wing parties and half PSOE against dialogue had effect. Only repression is left. 
I wish Tusk had just come out & said "stick your Brexit up your fucking arse". 
We cannot negotiate free trade agreements (FTAs) in the #EU, Brussels does it for us.Polling by Perspective Research Services in August 2015 found that by 74% to 22%, SMEs want the UK Government, not the European Commission, in charge of negotiating FTAs.#Brexit #NoDeal #WTO 
Blogged: Our obsession with Brexit is distracting us from the fact that there are deep structural reasons why British capitalism is stagnating.  
The fallacy of #Brexit and #GlobalBritain in one sentence: "Tokyo is confident it can secure better terms with the UK than in negotiations with the EU."No-deal Brexit risks rise as UK-Japan trade talks stall -  via @FT 
Despite my fury with weak kneed UK politicians over the Brexit farce, they are the only Western European power to my knowledge that is doing what should be done about Russian aggression in Ukraine. Thank you.  
Labour to back fresh Brexit referendum if May rejects Corbyn's plan, John McDonnell says  
"Second referendum necessary if no Brexit agreement says John McDonnell".Good. Labour are holding to their PV-as-backstop line. If May can't get anything through Parliament, then her deal comes *back* to the public to evaluate against our current deal. 
Funnily enough. Sir Christopher Chope is also a no-deal #Brexit enthusiast.Who'd have thought it?  
Great to speak to students at ⁦@EsherCollege⁩ today about consumerism, social mobility, Brexit & free speech.  
- @FT scoop: UK-Japan trade talks stall, raising risks from no-deal Brexit - rpt by @RobinBHarding @Urbandirt. Signs here of a hardening position by Japan and how hard it will be for UK to strike trade deals    
New account. Lost my old one for calling a Tory a c**t. Think I had 'Brexit related stress'. Seems you can post videos of nudity, people/animals being killed but you can't tell the truth? Any Indy and/or Celtic supporters gives an RT please. 
If Remainers like free trade with the EU, why not with rest of the world? It's a pretty good question#BrexitCrisis #Brexit #RemainInEU #FridayFeeling 
No-deal Brexit risks rise as UK-Japan talks stall  
'Hello, Brexit Crisis Command centre. How can I help you?"  
And why shouldn’t they have self determination. If Brexit is all about “Taking back control” they surely that doesn’t just mean Westminster does it? If it leads to Irish reunification and Scottish Independence surely that’s a good thing! 
A no-deal Brexit is our safest option to escape the EU police state — let's go for it 
What ever you thoughts on Brexit you’ve got to admit that’s funny from the Spectator.  
What stupidity from #JohnMcdonnell. He believes that he can get a Brexit deal that has not been discussed with the #EU or more importantly with Ireland. Does anyone know on which planet he's living? 
MAJOR BREAKING: Catalan pro-independence parties set to derail Spanish government's 2019 budget proposal and prompt snap elections after Madrid refused to negotiate a binding referendum on independence. 
 And this, my friends, is why #Brexit is happening.(t's not tax avoidance, it's tax dodging; never forget that they only call it 'avoidance' to make it sound acceptable).#stopbrexit #RevokeRemainRebuild #ERG #fbpe #ExitFromBrexit #BrexitCrisis #tories #VoteLeaveBrokeTheLaw 
Political fights over health care continue to flare. In Utah, angry voters say lawmakers are disregarding their wishes by trying to limit the scope of a ballot referendum that expanded Medicaid. 
Heathrow stockpiling rubber gloves from EU for post-Brexit searches  
Coming up on #CallansKicks 6.30pm @RTERadio1 Simon Harris and Fianna Fáil on the ropes, 53-year-old Leo on Brexit and Children's Hosp, Nurses on Liveline, Trump's state of the union and Tommie Gorman. We're back! #FridayFeeling 
How Brexit is killing domestic policy  
Here's a hard border for you. Literally miles of trucks waiting to cross the Georgian Russian border. #brexit pic.twitter.com/1TDWhKinCW 
TM still thinks that her WA is both a “deal” and Brexit. She is dangerously deluded. IT IS REMAIN. If she delivers this binding Surrender Treaty she will have delivered Remain Minus. I, for one, am not going to stand idly by and allow the UK to be betrayed. Who is with me?  
Lord Trimble one of the architects of the peace process believes that the 'backstop' proposed by the #EU breaches the Good Friday Agreement. He should know, he helped write it.Support him and a true #Brexit below, if you can. Thank you.  
If the Govt sabotage Brexit the Tories will lose power. The momentum is now for Brexit, deal or no deal.Will the Tories risk the wrath of the people or will May go for a military coup? Like the little tin-pot dictator she wants to be.  
Leave voters who've changed their minds after seeing the inevitable mess of Brexit. What a noble crew.This lovely lot have a crowd funder page.   
So if brexit is reversed there will be blood on the streets of England.but its ok to ignore the scot`s and attack devolution cos the scots wont spill blood on the streets.Come on SNP get tough or get OUT 
No serious work was ever done  by Gov't on the of impact of Brexit. The People have spoken but you couldn't change the constitution of the local golf club on 52%-48% majority. Deeply shameful and embarrassing for a major world economy. 
I see a WTO Brexit shaping up like Black Wednesday, when we left the ERM. An anticipated disaster that rapidly morphed into a golden opportunity.  
Researchers are overwhelming pessimistic about the impact leaving the EU will have on their fields. #Brexit will be bad for our scientific community. It’s clear the #OnlyWayForward is a #PeoplesVote 
It's provided parliament with a deal that could command a majorityIt's forced Theresa May to choose between party or countryIt's virtually guaranteed No Deal won't happenIt's kept open the option of a 2nd referendumIt's annoyed Owen Smith, Chris Leslie and Chuka Umunna 2/2 
.@jeremycorbyn's letter to Theresa May has achieved several thingsIt's rubbished the idea that Labour doesn't have a #Brexit positionIt's rubbished the idea that May's deal is the only deal availableIt's rubbished the idea that Corbyn is chasing unicorns 1/2 
#Brexit “8 February:From this week, freighters setting sail from UK ports with cargo for  destinations such as Australia and New Zealand,  50 days journey, risk arriving after Brexit day with – no idea of the trade rules that will be in place”  
This is why Caroline Lucas has my bow, my sword and my axe.If the question on the referendum ballot paper had been "Is the status quo good enough?", people who voted Leave would be 100% correct! 
I've said for a long time that this would happen. Unable to deal with defeat, May will try to blackmail parliament into accepting her original deal, inclusive backstop, at the last minute.Brexit deal may not be put to MPs until late March, officials say 
You’ve a choice: remove the backstop from the withdrawal agreement or no deal #Brexit. It’s really that simple. The withdrawal agreement, as currently written, is dead. 
Anyone surprised? He must go, Labour must fight Brexit not enable it. “Jeremy Corbyn's leadership ratings crash to worst level yet over Brexit - Evening Standard  
If Govt. and Parliament can't agree, there may be no alternative than to hand the final decision back to the people in a #PeoplesVote - former head of the Civil Service Gus O'Donnell says the only way out of this #Brexit mess is to extend Article 50:  
Threatening to quit the Labour Party because it doesn’t want to overturn a referendum result after you stayed in that party when it chose an IRA/terrorist-sympathiser as leader isn’t a good look for Blairite MPs like @ChrisLeslieMP #wato 
For nearly three years our government has behaved as though the referendum was a 50/50 stalemate and they must appease both sides.  It WASN'T. Leave won.  Their only job was to obey the result.  Our Remain PM & Remain cabinet have done everything possible to disobey the result.  
#Brexit: 'Very real' chance of Irish unity poll if no deal  
.@Theresa_May you knows Brexit is bad for the UK, you know the EU ref was won by a £10m criminal fraud but you also know keeping the Brextremists happy keeps you in Number 10 longer. #Shameful 
The EU elite's drive towards ever-closer union and an EU superstate is actually not secret at all, as shown by recent steps to create an EU Army and a centralised Eurozone budget.  #Brexit 
It's this simple:If parliament rejects any kind of Brexit deal, but also rejects Brexit without a deal, then the only option left is to revoke article 50 and Remain.#RevokeA50 
President Emmanuel Macron could be set to organise France's first referendum in 14 years to end months of "yellow vest" protests, but analysts say the move is a risky gamble 
Brexit: Labour plan can get majority, says John McDonnell  
France recalled its ambassador to Italy. Matteo Salvini right leaning deputy leader in Italy say Macron is a terrible President! Merkel is bowing out! And they are worried about Brexit! 
Blindfold Brexit will mean “never-ending nightmare” for British businesses and citizens  via @peoplesvote_uk 
Brexit anxiety - not just very real in the UK, but amongst those of us who live and work in Europe, having exercised our rights to freedom of movement. 
CEO of Heathrow Airport confirms planes will fly even in ‘worst-case’ Brexit scenario as ‘real pragmatism’ has emerged. Will the idiots who tried to scare people about planes being grounded now be held to account? 2016 all over again.  
These 50 Europeans have made Scotland their home, and since 2016 have been trying to work out how Brexit will change their lives here. Read something from every single one of them in my special report in today's @HeraldScotland  
NEW: In statement @lucianaberger says nothing will deter her from campaigning against Brexit and antisemitism and Labour members in her constituency should judge her on her record. “I am deeply disturbed at the party leadership’s desire to brush [antisemitism] aside”.  
Good to see TV journalists now calling out second referendum campaigners' desperate propaganda terms.  
"If a patient of mine consented to undergo a surgical procedure in 2016 and new information of great significance to the individual had become available, I would be in breach of both medical ethics and the law on consent if I did not seek a new permission to proceed."#Brexit  
UK, Norway, Iceland agrees on citizens' rights if no-deal Brexit  
DP William Ruto: We need to ask ourselves: Do we carry out a referendum alongside the general elections? Do we have the resources to do a census in 2019, boundaries review in the next year and an election thereafter with a referendum in between?  
A third cabinet minister said: "A no deal brexit is the way that's most likely to lead to a border poll and to people questioning the benefits of being in the United Kingdom...” 
If Corbyn is asking for a 'better' Brexit deal from May he should also demand a #PeoplesVote.  Any deal agreed in Parliament should be put to the people for ratification. Sign my petition: now close to 50,000! 
What promised to be a chance to shape NS2 project &make it more digestible for the EU yesterday, proves to be cynical German-French game of interests today. I do fear for the future of the EU post-Brexit. Such a DE-F tandem will only deepen divisions.  
"For the sake of local jobs, local economies and local families... we have to have a People's Vote" WATCH: William Copley explains why his #business is already being affected by #Brexit and why he's calling for a #PeoplesVote#Biz4PV #OnlyWayForward 
French firms are in a panic about Brexit. Let them. We can get wine from Australia & the Americas perfectly easily now. Let’s level the playing field  - healthy competition harms no-one. EU & Macron have tried to bully & humiliate us.It’s Backfiring.  
The worst thing about the choking national death of a no deal Brexit is that the wave will take out the low ground first, leaving some people feeling safe for a while. Until, that is, they realise that wave is just going to keep coming. 
As hangover mantra “Beer before wine, you’ll feel fine” is debunked by Cambridge academics, critics ask if they can make any sense of “Brexit means Brexit”. 
#Brexit is like ‘early days of third reich,’ Radiohead frontman @thomyorke says. 
In 1973 we joined the common market with 5 countries to trade goods.It's morphed into millions of immigrants from 27 EU countries being able to claim British benefits & tax credits without contributing a penny. Utter self harming insanity. No wonder people voted for Brexit. 
We know Leo Varadkar is a big fan of “Love Actually”...today he’s at Notting Hill, in Belfast, to talk #Brexit with the parties. Is Arlene just a girl, standing in front of a boy, asking him to ditch the backstop?Don’t @ me  
SCREWED: Unprepared EU countries increasingly nervous of No Deal Brexit. “Likely that increasingly anguished cries from business executives will reach the political leaders’ ears.” 
For 35 years Christian has campaigned for legislation that improves lives in the LGBT+ community. He knows Brexit puts our hard won rights at risk and that our future is brighter and more secure in the EU. That's why he's calling for a #PeoplesVote. 
William Hynett OBE, the CEO, is a loud supporter of ABE, a Brexiteer and a brilliant businessman who believes in this country - Deal or #NoDealThis is excellent news for the company and the UK. And all #DespiteBrexit #Brexit #FridayFeeling #WTO 
Little wonder now Corbyn has finally sold out on a #PeoplesVote. We’re ready to welcome Labour members who rightly feel betrayed. Jeremy Corbyn's leadership ratings crash to worst level yet over Brexit | London Evening Standard  
UK, Norway, Iceland agree on citizens' rights if no-deal #Brexit  
The UK is assessing how British nuclear waste could be buried in Northern Ireland.According to this govt video about it, the location identified is on the Newry/Dundalk border.As part of Brexit the UK is leaving Euratom, so this nuclear dump would not be subject to EU norms  
Everyone agrees that Brexit is a mess. Come and tell us your thoughtsWe’ll be in central MK again tomorrow (Sat 9 Feb), 11am-3pm, outside shopping centre, by MothercareHave a go on the Brexitometer. Or stay for a while and help out!#PeoplesVote 
Disagree, there was pre-Brexit clarity for the 17.4 million and millions more now who see what the EU gangsters are like - 29th March is our Brexit closure - suggest you and the remoaners get therapy @campbellclaret 
I wonder whether there will be a 'Special Place in Heaven' for those MPs & public servants brave enough, with enough honour and integrity, to speak the truth and #STOPBREXIT ?#brexitcrisis #brexit #IAmEuropean #emperorsnewclothes 
Is that what it takes to get someone who opposes #brexit on @BBCR4Today?#r4today 
The BBC has received nearly €5million in funding from the European Union since 2015, BBC faces Brexit bias accusations over £4m in EU funding  
Farage right again .....Brexit news: Nigel Farage claims EU is 'fraudulent and ROTTEN to the CORE' | UK | News |  
Three of Whitehall’s leading former mandarins today call for a delay to Brexit to prevent a “leap in the dark” departure from the European Union  
Lord Kerslake: “The case for a second referendum is compelling. I didn’t start thinking a ref is the right thing to do but the catastrophic progress we made on Brexit has made it in my view unavoidable unless we have some miraculous deal in the next few weeks.”#PeoplesVote 
Before the EU ref there was no talk of hard or soft Brexit & we knew that to have the ability to make bilateral trade deals, control immigration & regain our sovereignty we would leave the SM & CU.Any MP saying  remaining in either the SM or CU is 'delivering Brexit' is a liar. 
Brexit latest: Let's embrace No Deal and see how the EU likes it, says FREDERICK FORSYTH  
Disaster capitalists do not care about "sovereignty", they want a No Deal Brexit bonfire of regulations so they can exploit workers, degrade the environment and dismantle our public services for profit. 
Brexit WAThe UK must promise never to tax former EU officials based here – such as Peter Mandelson or Neil Kinnock – on their E.U. pensions, or tax any current Brussels bureaucrats on their salaries. The EU and its employees are to be immune to our tax laws. (Article 104) 
It’s all fine.#ProjectAfterBrexit crisis command centre starts hiring civilians | Politics | The Guardian  
To be honest, remainiacs are frighteningly intolerant & aggressive, the media have been feeding their fear of Brexit for almost 3yrs, so yeah, I guess there will be riots - From remainers.49 days until we leave the EU   
This! I've been saying this for ages now.Seriously folks, look up who Christopher Chandler is, and how he'd benefit from the no deal brexit that his own shady think tank "Legatum Institute" pushed for..  
"Every warning is dismissed as Project Fear, with the jeer ‘you can’t prove Brexit will make that happen’; every time a warning comes true, it is dismissed as Project Fear Mark 2, with the jeer ‘you can’t prove it was Brexit made that happen’.  
The same opportunists who only talk about Austerity in relation to Brexit have only just discovered mental health awareness whilst rushing in to defend Luciana Berger. 
Thom Yorke compares Brexit to 'early days of the Third Reich'  
Has to be one of the most graphical representations of the current #Brexit debacle seen to-date. The people know it, our government knows it but more importantly the EU knows it.#GoWTO 
Corbyn has achieved more with just ONE letter than 3 Brexit Secretaries and Theresa May have achieved in 2 years with Brexit.He should be Prime Minister. 
You mean your colleagues who tried to remove you from the bar are lying? Your colleagues who’ve briefed press you were ‘under stress from Brexit’ were lying? 
Hi Amy, who won the independence referendum in Scotland in 2014?  
New analysis by John Curtice shows that nearly a fifth of Leave voters have now changed their mind! “Those who wish to question whether Brexit does still represent ‘the will of the people’ do now have rather more evidence with which to back their argument” 
If you want to make a complaint to the BBC. Screw going through the useless website. BBCQT the other night was absolutely disgraceful! Heres the director generals email address: tony.hall@bbc.co.uk | #bbcqt #scotref #indyref2 #brexit 
The Road to #Brexit: London is Europe’s biggest financial centre, with the EU its top export market, meaning that without contingency arrangements markets, banking, asset management and insurance across Europe would be left in chaos.  
I got to know @lucianaberger better when she was a valued member of my @uklabour Energy & Climate Change Team. We don’t agree on #brexit but Luciana is a caring, decent person who has experienced intolerable antisemitism. I hope nobody tries to force her out of our great Party. 
A sure-fire way to prevent further electoral fraud is for the police to be encouraged, with a degree of urgency and at the highest levels, to investigate the cases and evidence you pass to them, especially when the result could be of national and international importance. 
Just one of the richest and most advanced countries in the world recruiting thousands of people for a military-style operation that may last for two years, to mitigate the catastrophic consequences of its own self-inflicted policies.#Brexit 
BREXIT FEAR: Desperate Germany issue plea as they PANIC over UK's 'EXCLUSIVE' fishing zone  
Labour MEP Seb Dance MEP - "This shows how far the Tories have moved to the right. There was a time when they would have balked at being associated with a far-right party. Now they openly align with them." 
Brexit is 49 days away. #brexit 
Water bosses' £58m pay over last five years as watercharges increase 40% above inflation This is what lay behind the @labour @FineGael @fiannafailparty plan to Privatise our water Jobs for their cronies paid for by usWe demand our #R2W #Referendum Now 
@BestForBritain Cornwall is waking up to the impacts of #Brexit! I wrote to the Cornish Times to point out the grossly wrong views of my MP @sheryllmurray - and to my surprise got this spread! 
Hello #Brexiters. I'm at the #pharmacy. I have hip arthritis. One of the medication I rely on for pain control & to be able to walk, #Naproxen, is out of stock & there's no known delivery date. Thank you for this #Brexit crapshow to appease your pathetic jingoism. #RevokeA50 
TOMORROW (Sat 9th Feb) local activists will be out campaigning all over the UK calling for a #PeoplesVote on #Brexit.If you think Brexit is a mess and the decision should go back to the public come join us.Now is the time to make your voice heard. 
Crucial read by the great @GeorgeMonbiot on why a no-deal Brexit could create a "blank slate" fantasy world for disaster capitalists.  
Love these guys.. . Four men with a ladder: the billboard campaigners battling Brexit | Politics | The Guardian  
Seven weeks until EXIT DAY.Was there ever such a bunch of lily-livered politicians as those now joining hands to stop Brexit.Trouble is,The People *collectively* voted to LEAVE. Democratic decision.It's time MPs stopped being swayed by those with vested interests in REMAINING.  
Stay in the CU, stay in the EU, no wonder Tusk likes the sound of it!EU chiefs have urged Theresa May to accept Jeremy Corbyn's Brexit olive branch  
Dominic Grieve says he would 'refuse' to be part of a government pushing for no-deal Brexit  
Shame on you @Theresa_May you know you are dragging 50m Brits who didn't vote for the Brexit catastrophe out of the EU based on a referendum won by Leave overspending by £10m. Your every motivation is to keep yourself in Number 10 for as long as possible.  
A warm thank you to @irish_news for publishing my response to Theresa May's pledge & the deterioration of identity rights in NISetting aside the legislative gap there's the personal impact of a Brexit that infringes on our basic right to self determination #Brexit  
I often think about this. Brexit as backlash of people who felt popular culture of 90s and 00s was one long exercise in taking the piss out of them, which was kind of true. And the ascendent lib culture was v complacent that its victory was total, irreversible. 
Second referendum necessary if no #Brexit agreement, says John McDonnell - Politics live  
Is it too early to start drinking? X #Brexit 
Jacob Rees-Mogg challenged to debate Brexit in the nude  
Awful ratings for Jeremy Corbyn in new @ipsosMORI poll for @evening Standard today1 in 5 trusts him on Brexit1 in 6 thinks he gives strong leadership on BrexitUnder a fifth say he puts national interest first on EU exit.  
never forget that chi with a c factimed the news live on air during a brexit debate 
Lord Kerr and @SirBobKerslake warn once we have left, we have left. There is no backdoor to rejoin after March 29th. We would loose the exemptions we currently have and “start from scratch”. #PeoplesVote #Brexit #BrexitShambles 
NEWS! Migrating birds to be denied entry back into the UK in the spring following Brexit  
Brexit crisis command centre starts hiring civilians: Why the heck are we doing this to ourselves? Stop Brexit now!  
When Cameron went to the EU cap in hand and they sent him away with nothing THAT was the EU's first mistake. Even a tiny crumb from the EU would have secured a Remain win.But the arrogant arseholes didn't see it. And that's what swung the referendum to Leave.Thankfully.  
So,EU negotiations tell @theresa_May, it's her plan that's stopping an agreement. If she continues with it, there will be no deal. They explain to her that @UKLabour #Brexit Plan is workable and would help bring an agreement. This is how the UK right wing press will portray it.  
Today's #NovaraFM sees me joined by the home team – @AyoCaesar & @michaeljswalker – to talk about the possibilities of Corbynism beyond Brexit. Thought it wasn't possible to talk about anything else? Not so! Hit us up on @ResonanceFM//@ResonanceEXTRA at 1pm! 
US corporations want Trump to play hard ball over #NHS, food quality standards & consumer rights in post-Brexit trade deal. Many of us have warned of this for months. But here's another reminder of the dangers of #Brexit and why we need a #PeoplesVote 
So, now we have it officially: these are some of "those who promoted Brexit without even a sketch of a plan of how to carry it out safely".  
My Perthshire Advertiser Article. I will stand by my constituents in the face of this Tory Brexit chaos.  
Very glad that MPs are writing longer more considered pieces for us about the future of politics. This is thoughtful and interesting by @GloriaDePiero on the referendum result, Labour and more besides:  
A lot of polls out there asking people who they will vote for. How can this be answered truthfully, unless people know the outcome of Brexit. The result of Brexit and how it is achieved, will definitely influence how I will vote at the next election. Do you agree ? 
The Road to #Brexit: Britain is due to leave the European Union on March 29 but so far has no exit agreement with the bloc to ensure an orderly departure  For more coverage  
Should EU27 budge on #Brexit? EU27 have already made significant concessions –which we barely hear about in UK– it’s unfair to say the EU hasn’t been flexible. @theresa_may needs to put forward proposals to break the deadlock in UK parliament, @AgataGostynska tells @euronews 
Theresa May heads to Ireland, but the strain is showing as Britain and the EU talk past each other on Brexit  
Apart from underestimating the volatility of a future NI referendum on the backstop, underestimating the pooled sovereignty inherent in Strands 2 & 3 of GFA, and underestimating the chances of a trade agreement by 2020 this might ... no  
#Brexit will be nothing like the promises made in 2016 which is why I think the support for a #PeoplesVote has gone up. The sensible thing to do is to go back to the people and ask whether this is what they want. Lord Kerr shares his support for a #PeoplesVote 
No clarity, No closure.New report by the #PeoplesVote campaign on why this #Brexit deal will settle absolutely nothing. 
Great article by @faizashaheen about why Labour MPs should reject the bribes and vote against a Tory deal.Don't be fooled - propping up Tory Brexit will only enable more austerity. 
It’s now crystal clear every proposed flavour of Brexit is totally unacceptable to and would make profoundly unhappy all but a minority of the 17m who voted to Leave AND the 16m who voted to Remain. The government is pursuing, quite literally, the route of minimum utility. 
.@HackneyAbbott was right, Labour are neck and neck in the polls.Labour won’t get a clear lead until national conversation moves on from Brexit.It’s time to rule out hard brexit AND rule out remain.Me on @bbcthisweek 
Whatever your view, Labour’s current Brexit position is better than whatever else is on the table 
Our students benefit immensely from studying abroad, and the skills they bring home have helped many aspects of our society to flourish. We back @UniversitiesUK's call for @GOVUK to commit to funding study abroad opportunities in the event of a no-deal Brexit. #SupportStudyAbroad 
Vet started explaining the implications of Brexit on the kittens. If there’s no deal, pet passports issued in the UK will not be valid for travel to the EU. Seriously, if Remain had campaigned on this alone, they would have won.  
On Sharm El Shiekh meeting being a chance to talk Brexit - it is unclear at this stage which leaders will be there.  No concrete plans at this stage. 6/ 
Here’s why it would be madness to stay in a customs union with the EU  via @BrexitCentral #brexit 
We’ve done a poll of ROI attitudes to Brexit negotiations - little sign of pressure on Dublin to compromise:  
A no-deal Brexit is our safest option to escape the EU police state — let's go for it  
I keep hearing people saying how Leave voters didn't consider the impact of Brexit on Ireland, especially Northern Ireland, when they voted.Did Ireland give any consideration to the UK, especially Northern Ireland, when they lowered their business tax to 12.5%? 
'Labour backing free movement after #Brexit would be a betrayal of our voters and principles' – @BrendanChilton blogs 
Maths Teacher: "we might leave out the Brexit question because it's upsetting... My 9 year old last year said 'if everyone now thinks it's a bad idea why are we doing it?'... It really upsets me"...Turns out the guy sitting next to me is also a massive Brexiteer though...  
Brexit bulletin: if you remember one fact about Brexit, make it this one. The Irish border ‘problem’ is entirely an EU construct. Nobody wants a hard border except them.In any event there is an agreement predating the EU by 50 yrs allowing free movement across UK and Ireland. 
'People's vote' loon on Sky: 'we must go back to the people & find out what kind of Brexit they want'. Then, with a straight face, suggests a choice between May's 'deal'(BRINO) or Remain. 
Gordon Brown an appointed British PM who devalued democracy with a refusal to honour a specific Labour party manifesto pledge & hold a referendum on Lisbon.We've now had our much promised & desired referendum & the people have spoken, respect the result. 
Have I got this right? You wilfully misread a conversation between friends as it suits your masters to find  distractions from their broken promise on a 2nd referendum . When your mistake is pointed out, you don't apologise but continue with the wilful misreading. 
And once again for those at the back. Corbyn is the only leader in these Brexit discussion. Not petulantly screaming for another vote like @ChukaUmunna but instead getting the best for the country whilst adhering to the Referendum’s result. #JC4PM 
Brussels taunts May over ‘insane’ Brexit plan as she heads to DublinTime to tell Tusk to go to Hell! We’re Leaving No Deal, Tusk has pushed many over the edge! More Now want to Leave!  
There's no excuse for any Labour MP to prop up Tory Brexit and keep May's government in power.Our activists are in the Guardian today, talking about why they're campaigning in their constituencies this weekend. 
Lord Kerslake - The political declaration is waffle central.. we're literally going into a blindfold #Brexit.. this is going to be like groundhog day without the laughs.. a #PeoplesVote is unavoidable unless we have some miraculous deal in the next few weeks. @SirBobKerslake 
Brexit news: Nigel Farage claims EU is 'fraudulent and ROTTEN to the CORE' | UK | News |  
Why does it take a foreign broadcaster to report on the big advantages of a 'no deal' Brexit?@RT_com 
A key figure in compromise talks between @SteveBarclay, the hard Brexit ERG and remain MPs, @ShankerASingham, owns a private firm, Competere, which offers clients advice on the opportunities arising from #Brexit. He has declined to say who his clients are  
See what happened a day after Tukur Yusuf Buratai the Chief of Nigeria Army staff gave an order to Clampdown #IPOB who are Exercising their right of self  determination by peaceful referendum,military Shooting& killing Biafrans in the market Abia state #Boycott2019NigeriaElection 
Let's take our chances. Why Brexit provides Ireland with opportunities not just threats....  
Brexit 'no-deal' crisis command centre starts hiring civilians  
Wanted by Govt for #Brexit emergency planning:-'Unflappable people', pay £300-400 a day, start by end of month50 days to go. What a mess 
Eh up TwitterSos for me silence of late. Hit a major stumbling block in selling me flat. Got overwhelmed. Ended up taking a break. Hope everybody is doing okay? So 1. Brexit is a fecking mess 2. I want a General Election 3. Stop shrinking chocolate 4. Kindness rocks  
There's a special place in hell for those politicians who promoted membership of a supranational entity without even reading the treaty. #Brexit 
Remarks on Brexit  
Thom Yorke compares Theresa May’s handling of Brexit to “the early days of the third reich”  
"There were once hopes, wildly exaggerated, that Brexit would be some sort of dreamland. But it is now clear it will not be an awakening for our country. Instead, it threatens to turn into a never-ending nightmare with no clarity & no closure..." 
I for one am sick of these bas**rds, playing party politics instead of delivering what people voted for! Bring on the GE because Tories & Labour are history! I'm glad you've got the army on standby because anything other than brexit is unacceptable!   
Got to love the inconsistency of Scottish nationalists.If you support Independence from the European Union you are supposedly a "Brexit extremist".If on other hand you support Scottish independence for Scotland, apparently you are "progressive".Sick of the inconsistencies. 
***My latest daily column***George Orwell is alive and well in Labour as Corby insists that honouring Leave means Remaining! And the anti Brexit Fake News Media go with it!Amazing stuff, Can you give it a read and an RT please? 
Latest piece for th Post. ‘Labour backing free movement after Brexit would be a betrayal of our voters and principles' – @BrendanChilton blogs 
The wonderful @hartpublishing agreed to print my research on #EUcitizenship and #fundamentalrights (ft. #Brexit) in this book & I have the first copies! So excited to launch it in the next few months @CityLawSchool and solve the problem of Brexit (maybe)  
Theresa May insists timing of Brexit vote will not delay Brexit happening at end of March, with the most likely date now being March 546th.  
Missed the bit where John Major sought the legitimate agreement of the British people in a second or even a first referendum for this fundamental pooling of sovereignty.  
Less than 50 days to go until we walk away from the failing EU and re-establish ourselves as a strong, independent United Kingdom once more.. Unless the political class betray us. Only a complete exit on March 29th honours the referendum. #WTOBrexitNOW 
The handling by Parliament and HMG of Brexit has proven the entire establishment as inept and incapable of delivering the outcome of a democratic vote. Both main parties deserve to split and destroy themselves. We need a full system reset. The current one is not fit fo purpose. 
Jacob I'm sure you've got a copy of your pre referendum Brexit plan somewhere. Why don't you post it on twitter to spite your naysayers? 
Just a reminder, David Cameron took out an HSBC "mortgage" 8 days before the EU referendum. 
Stuff Billy loves: (1) Trump(2) Putin(3) Nigel Farage(4) Cromwell(5) Israel(6) Brexit(7) England(8) Definitely NOT the Pope  
At last - some SENSIBLE THINKING to kick start Independent Britain!Secret Plan To SLASH taxes and tariffs after no-deal Brexit. Bring it on.  via @Telegraph 
Monday I walked past 3 homeless sleepers on 200 metre walk to dentist. Today opened curtains to see homeless sleeper over road (will take over mug of tea). In centre of London, one of world's richest cities. Tories have created Brexit smokescreen to hide what they're doing to us. 
Sky have just rolled out another committed remainer, one Lord Kerslake, what they don’t deign to tell you is he has recently been working for the Lab Party.He wants a second Referendum.This ex Civil service chief isn’t all he purports to be. 
Here's the thing: It looks like less than 7m people are getting away with inflicting their dream of Brexit on the rest of us.And they claim that the rest of us are somehow trying to overturn democracy.We're living in a sick country and we should be on the streets.  
Despite telling Labour conference he would pursue a People's Vote if he could not secure a General Election, Jeremy Corbyn is now offering support for Theresa May's Brexit.Demand the final say on Brexit with the Liberal Democrats > 
George Monbiot: "If we crash out of Europe, the dark money that helped to buy Brexit will strive to use this opportunity to tear down our regulations..." 
Cornwall is waking up to the impacts of #Brexit! I wrote to the Cornish Times to point out the grossly wrong views of my MP @sheryllmurray - and to my surprise got this spread! @Anna_Soubry @peoplesvote_uk @StuartBudd1 @tfoale 
Major Betrayed U.K. with Maastricht, if we had been given a Referendum then, we would have rejected EU! What a Fecking Hypocrite Major is Now!  
The manufactured "furore" surrounding @Prof_johnbrewer & his Brexit comment is really tiresome. He's always been a transparent & enthusiastic Remainer, with views open to challenge. Do we want silent, bland academics? 
Labour leader hints at backing second vote on Brexit. 
I remember so well a lot of older Irish immigrants in London before Brexit being on the news talking about how the UK were letting too many immigrants in....like, can you hear what you’re saying? 
Lies spin or propaganda from @theresa_may ? So hard to know which. As she speaks of Brexit she had consistently signed away Her Majesty's Armed Forces to EU Defence Union (EU's own words) in Franco (EU) / German (EU)/UK Defence Deals Includes nucs defence industry & procurement.  
'Project After': Taxes and tariffs to be slashed under secret plan for no-deal Brexit' | via @telegraph  
Germany’s finance minister makes his government's position on Brexit clear  
EU chiefs have urged Theresa May to accept Jeremy Corbyn's Brexit olive branch 
Let's summarise Labour's Brexit stance: Keeping EU rules and alignment while limiting influence on them with only one goal in mind: ending freedom of movement for 65m British citizens. Brexit in a nutshell for both sides of the party divide.  
Demands on the NHS, data and food that could see the UK become an "economic colony" of America - Here's What US Lobbyists Want Donald Trump To Get From A Post-Brexit Trade Deal - HuffPost UK  
Check this thread – I watched it last night and thought I was being paranoid but, sure enough, it appears the bias on @bbcquestiontime was clearly orchestrated. They were absolutely instrumental in #Brexit too, of course. Goodbye forever, #bbcqt. Thursday night is film night now. 
Lab/Con are BOTH want to stop #Brexit.But a recent poll showed that 75% of voters were STILL going to vote for Lab/Con.That means that most of the 17.4m are STILL going to vote Lab/Con.Why?If you keep on voting Lab/Con they will keep on betraying you. 
German MEP Werner Kuhn admits a no-deal Brexit will have a "bitter impact" on German coastal communities as they would lose access to British fishing grounds and says this "must be prevented".The cracks are showing. No fishing waters and no £39bn if no deal - sounds good to us! 
So...the public, parliament, unions, businesses and the EU support Corbyn's Brexit proposals.About a dozen Labour MPs don't.Guess which group the media are focusing on? 
What do Brits think about divorcing the E.U.? @AlexanderSmith traveled the UK for @NBCNews to find out how regular people really feel about Brexit, visiting each of the U.K.'s 4 nations: England, Wales, Scotland and Northern Ireland. (1/8)  
Today's @thetimesIE cartoon on Theresa May arriving into Dublin this evening. #Brexit  
Huffington Post has an interesting report on the 130+ demands US business is making for a deal with post-Brexit UK.  They include changing how NHS chiefs buy drugs in order to suit US pharma companies, and scrapping our safety-first approach to food standards. 
This is excellent and illustrates very well why #Brexit has never been the "Will of the People"  
#Brexit deal may not be put to MPs until late March, officials say  
EU27 ambassadors meeting this morning:1) Corbyn's Brexit plan was described as interesting, and ambassadors were told it's a possible way out of the impasse in the Commons (story from yesterday on Tusk telling May just that ) 
Also, given the reference to Change or Go as supposed evidence of a Brexit plan worthy of the name, worth remembering that its 1,000 pages contained more references to Mr Bean (one) than to the Belfast Agreement (none) 
Never mind Brexit. Here's a bit more pretentious riding around London at night in the company of T.S. Eliot and Chopin.  
Second referendum necessary if no Brexit agreement, says John McDonnell - Politics live  
Come on, Labour Your voters & members overwhelmingly support it - it's time to break the Brexit deadlock & bring on a #PeoplesVote. 
Former head of the Civil Service, Lord Kerslake makes it clear that the nightmare will not end if #Brexit goes ahead - "there are still many, many issues to be resolved."New report: No clarity, no closure: Why this Brexit deal will settle nothing:  
'Project After': Taxes and tariffs to be slashed under secret plan for no-deal Brexit  via @Telegraph 
Only thing agreed in Brussels yesterday was more talks. @Theresa_May is still insisting she'll deliver #Brexit on time. We now run the risk of crashing out without knowing what’s next. MPs must make sure that doesn’t happen and demand a #PeoplesVote 
Switch Off @BBCNews switch on  news 1pm today as we cover the real news & what is really important with guest David Scott @Albion_Rover Northern Exposure. From Brexit without an exit to the scale of @cabinetofficeuk disinformation Join us Bring some friends 
I'd rather be wrong and called an idiot than be right and a member of a diminished nation because our politicians are too afraid of admitting that they are idiots and brexit is idiocy.  
Prof. John Curtice says there has been a significant shift in public opinion towards staying in the EU: "Those who wish to question whether Brexit does still represent ‘the will of the people’ DO NOW have more evidence with which to back their argument":  
"Brexit is not impossible. But if we abandon the idea, and declare it impossible for our political system to deliver, then we are effectively declaring to the voters that the political system itself is not fit for purpose."  
Did you vote Brexit in Hull? Your three Labour MPs think they know better. In Parliament, they've actively voted to impede, delay and stop Brexit on March 29th. The people of Hull deserve better than this.  
"Anxiety levels are heightening across the board but EU citizens are bearing an extra load"@Elenauk, founder of #InLimbo,  is one of the interviewees in this article about the impact Brexit has on people's mental well-being. 
Daily Briefing:EU gives UK PM May glimpse of hope for a new #Brexit dealFinland says basic income trial fails to spur unemployed to work moreFrance recalls its ambassador to Italy, as diplomatic tensions rise 
Theresa May facing ministerial resignations over Brexit as Brussels sends her away empty-handed 
Want to forget about #Brexit for a bit? Then here’s some #Penguins. Feeling better and that #FridayFeeling already? ....That’s the #Falklands effect. 
I'm noticing lots of veiled threats on far right accounts that boil down to "you'll be sorry after March 29th". It's looking likely there will be a big spike in violence and open xenophobia if Brexit happens on that date. What civil security preparations are in place for this? 
If Theresa May's *job* is to deliver Brexit, then who is the sender?Not the British people for sure. Is it those who corrupted and used the referendum to set Britain on a course against its interest, damaging the Union and Western democracy itself? 
Disagreeing about stopping Brexit altogether is one thing. Voting through,  or allowing through,  a Tory deal is quite another. It's just inexcusable, and MPs who do so will, quite rightly,  be held accountable by members.  
MUST-WATCH: John McDonnell on #r4Today this morning confirms Labour's policy of going back to the public in a #PeoplesVote if they can't secure a compromise.This blindfold Brexit is not what we were promised & will break Britain. Please RT:  
#Brexit threatens the livelihoods & wellbeing of *all* of us, with the exception of its ultra-rich backers such as @Jacob_Rees_Mogg & @Arron_banks.Here's a fisherman in #Cornwall speaking to us yesterday.Fishermen, like the rest of us, were lied to by crooks.#BrexitCrisis 
Not forgetting repatriating our fishing worth a potential £6-8bn.Especially significant to rural coastal communities.With the right post-Brexit policy, to rectify the failings under the CFP, Britain can become a world leader with a sustainable industry for generations to come  
Hard-hitting: The British could disappear down a "nationalist rathole" in a no-deal #Brexit, says @davidmcw - and it's an opportunity for Ireland 
Theresa May's deal will create 'never-ending nightmare', former top civil servants warn.“There were once hopes, wildly exaggerated, that Brexit would be some sort of dreamland. Instead, it threatens to turn into a never-ending nightmare..." 
It is being reported that the Government is preparing measures to cope with the "nightmare" of a "No Deal" Brexit in a document called "Project After"These include cutting taxes and boosting investment.I say, bring it on! 
Theresa May's Brexit deal will create 'never-ending nightmare', former top civil servants warn  
What would my great great great grandfather Charles #Dickens have made of #Brexit? @mrjamesob @TheNewEuropean @guyverhofstadt #Thread 
#LBC Got James  O’ Brien on now. Biggest Remoaner crybaby    In . Spends all day talking bollocks, trying to derail Brexit. How does he steal a living on the Radio. Talking same  rubbish every show. James O’ Brien the worst Radio Presenter EVER no contest.   
If you’re asking yourself ‘What can I do to stop the Brexit disaster?’, and assuming the Prime Minister’s motorcade is not passing your way soon, here is the answer:Rather than speaking truth to power, it’s making the Brexiteers responsible for their own lies.Please chip in!  
READ: Ex-civil service chief Lord Kerslake calls for a #PeoplesVote to end the crippling Brexit uncertainty. Please RT:  
READ: Ex-civil service chief Lord Kerslake calls for a #PeoplesVote to end the crippling Brexit uncertainty. Please RT:  
Mr Two Face!Coup against Corbyn, views of membership worthlessSecond referendum, views of membership vitalNo Confidence Votes in disloyal MPs, views of membership are an outrageI suggest the views of the membership are only important when they suit you#RedTories 
Most over-used words/phrases on MSM:'Chaotic''Chaos''Catastrophic''Cliff-edge''Driving off a cliff''Devastating' 'Blind Brexit' A bit of:'New opportunities''Independence''Faith' 'Pride''Fighting for Britain' Would be nice, would it not? 
Second referendum necessary if no Brexit agreement, says John McDonnell - Politics live  
An Irish citizen has sent a thank you card to the EU Commission president because she was worried about what would happen to Ireland post-Brexit.  
Greatest fear of brexiters is a delay beyond 29th March means no more tax avoidance."The likes of Farage, Mogg & wealthy Brexit donors are unlikely to warm to ATAD. It fact, it MIGHT be  reason why Brexiteers are hell-bent on pushing for no delay hard Brexit"#BrexitCrisis 
Self-regarding remainer smarm is more likely to deliver no deal than anything the ERG ever did. #Brexit 
While half the trolls flame me for suggesting Brexit is anything to do with a rose-tinted view of past glories, the other half bombard me with WWII jingoism.   
Corbyn's letter to May is further proof that a vote for Labour is a vote for Brexit. With just 49 days to go till we lose our EU membership, we need more than 'hints' from the Leader of the Opposition that he is prepared to fight for the country's interests & back a #PeoplesVote 
So just 7 weeks now until #Brexit and there's still no idea what it actually is, less still how to deliver it. What a shambolic way to run a country and plan for future generations.... #BrexitCrisis 
Belter of a article by Co-Ed @KathyConWom at today's @TheConWom.The UK's principal foe in the #Brexit negotiations is *not* Donald Tusk, but PM Theresa May herself.?Nail on head. 
BAE Systems to invite Indian Air Force to co-develop 6th gen stealth fighter aircraft ‘Tempest’ Post-Brexit we must pour concrete in the foundations of our special relationship with our friend of old.Britain and India are a global force for good   
Let’s be honest the #brexit debate is now over:1 May is winding down the clock2 MPs won’t vote for no deal3 Labour wont take no deal off table4 Labour won’t back a #PeoplesVoteSo only outcome is May’s deal unless Labour do something.The rest is just shouting & politics. 
The govt's failure to announce in advance what tariffs there will be in a no deal Brexit means it will now miss out on most of the short-term gains of having such tariffs or removing such tariffs. The govt's handling of this situation is hapless beyond comprehension. 
This was perfectly put by the Maestro @afneil on #bbctw."#Brexit has hardly been the political elite's finest hour, but it's not been a triumph for much of the media either"  
* A gerrymandered referendum* An illegal campaign* 3yrs of ineptitude, lies, bribery and corruption* Manipulation of democracy * Blatant nationalism* Loss of rights* Economic harm* Societal harmYou want me to 'get behind' THAT? Not a chance. #RevokeRemainRebuild 
MPs from the two big parties saying they might quit them in a protest against Brexit is cringey.Either do it and earn a hearing or stop the running commentary. Nobody is quaking at the possibility of losing the junior minister for paper clips. 
None of us can imagine Thatcher getting us into this hopeless mess,Kate. After all she was a leading champion of the EU single market & QMV, advocate of enlargement etc, but never pro Brexit 
You've not read the conference-approved Labour manifesto then? Couldn't be clearer. No spin. No fudge. Here's a link to the section on negotiating Brexit that still determines whole Labour approach: You're welcome. 
Thousands of people died in a conflict in NI. The Good Friday Agreement brought an end of the conflict. Let’s change the language and not talk about avoiding a hard border but upholding a peace agreement! As in “how do we uphold the peace agreement” #Brexit #BrexitCrisis 
A naked person being interviewed live on #bbcr4today about #brexit the sort of thing that makes you do a quick mental check to ensure it isn’t April 1st. 
Things unacceptable to the public that will lead to political oblivion for the Tory’s 1. May’s Deal with the Backstop.2. May’s Deal without the Backstop. 3. May’s Deal in any shape or form.4.Delaying Brexit in any way.5. Ruling out No Deal.6. Any form of customs union 
THIS. It's truly bonkers.The remainer-middle-class are convinced it's not going to happen, while the very rich are hedging and preparing to exploit disaster capitalism. The no-deal Brexit cliff is only weeks away and everyone's asleep at the wheel.  
"I invite jacob rees mogg to do a naked (brexit) debate with me" is one of the most terrifying sentences i've heard on the Today programme 
Think you might be getting a bit confused. Corbyn is the one propping up a Tory Brexit; last time I looked Chuka was campaigning for a #PeoplesVote to try and stop that. It’s Corbyn who is offering to help May get her deal through which will be hugely damaging to Labour voters 
Remainers... tell me you don’t regard this oddball on @BBCr4today who thinks Brexit is an excuse to get her kit off in public and feel virtuous about it as some kind of spokesman for you? Daft exhibitionist unlikely to make people take you seriously... 
We heard all of this and more at our meeting with EU nationals in Perth last night. The insecurity this Tory Brexit is creating for our friends and colleagues who now call Scotland their home is the most sickening part of their Brexit.   
For those who vandalised the office overnight with ban Brexit stickers. You’re on CCTV ! 
Meat and cheese exports from the Republic of Ireland to the UK would collapse by 90 per cent if there were no deal BREXIT and 3,500 Irish Jobs would be lost. The RoI would need EU economic support to overcome this economic blow. Time the EU and Republic agreed BREXIT Terms!!! 
A good piece. Corbyn is offering a deal to May.If she accepts it, she gets Brexit at the cost of splitting the Tory party.Labour helping Brexit pass would also split Labour.So it’s a bit of a MAD (‘mutual assured destruction’) gambit.Ideal is: May rejects. Labour -> PV.  
When we used to call the BBC the Brussels Broadcasting Corporation, it wasn’t a joke..It was a serious criticism of their heavy bias in favour on an undemocratic set of institutions..Judging by this obscene bias on their shows since the referendum, things haven’t improved..  
Remain now leads 54-46 in Brexit poll of polls according to John Curtice  
Donald Tusk:"...special place for those who promoted Brexit" Liberals:"Tusk is amazing, we should listen to him!"Donald Tusk (as reported), something along lines of:"...I like Corbyns workable proposals"Liberals:*silence**silence*"Corbyn has no plan!" 
Why #Labour cannot afford to back #brexit: (via @PoliticsHome) 
A number of Conservative MPs have said @jeremycorbyn Brexit letter is a good basis for a cross-party agreement. They include: @NickBoles @oletwinofficial @GeorgeFreemanMP @Sandbach Shows that there could be a strong parliamentary majority for this kind of Brexit 
UK draws up secret plan to boost economy after no-deal Brexit  The Prime Minister is basically lying to the UK about maintaining standards after Brexit. We become a pink-slime eating, privatised island. 
I’m afraid the BBCs inability to acknowledge the perception of bias will only see hostility towards it grow (routine 4-1 Remain Brexit inbalance).  
Today we release our latest report, No clarity, No closure, laying out why this Brexit deal will settle nothing.This blindfold Brexit is not what we were promised. If it goes ahead, blindfold Brexit will break Britain.  
Jeremy Corbyn's new Brexit tests would rule out any form of Brexit that would honour the result of the referendum.He's sold out to big business and the London-based Remain lobby.RETWEET if you agree  
Yes, and it’s also a scandal that you are prepared to support this Tory government in delivering #Brexit, who will make the poor even poorer. Shame on you. 
Brussels is terrified of Brexit being a success – no wonder they’re threatening hellfire  
I’m kinda loving this #Brexit campaign!   #LedByDonkeys @ByDonkeys #BrexitDeal #BrexitCrisis 
Delighted @sg_donnelly was elected last night. He did so because he’s a fantastic local activist and campaigner. The 23.1% jump in the LibDem vote and 18.2% drop in our vote wasn’t down to him but @UKLabour’s incoherent Brexit policy. It constantly came up on the doorstep.  
House of Commons briefing paper on #Brexit timelines. Skip to page 42 and witness the absolute chaos of @theresa_may's handling.file:///C:/Users/Asus/Downloads/CBP-7960.pdf 
And we will be arguing about it for the rest of our lives. No pre-Brexit clarity = no post-Brexit closure. No clarity. No closure.  
End uncertainty over no-deal Brexit, says ex-civil service chief  
I hope others agree with me that the constant sniping that the vagaries of BREXIT has solely damaged growth in U.K. - MPC downgrades this year from 1.7% to 1.2% - is deeply irritating! Look around folks - Germany, France Italy etc are economically hanging rags - Be balanced/fair! 
PROJECT AFTER: Government plan to slash taxes and tariffs after No Deal Brexit. UK must be ready to Leave on 29th March.  
...met the man when campaigning with #SODEM. Sneered at us, looked at me as if I was s**t under his polished brogues(I have 3 professional qualifications & have had 17 novels published, but hey.)Love the billboard ~ love this also.#brexit #dominicraab #RevokeArticle50 #fbpe 
Another Brexit complication: US lawmakers say U.K. must have soft Irish border to get US trade deal. (EU has other ideas on compatibility those two things, but that's a different story).  
Thing is, anyone who voted to trigger Article 50 in early 2017 was voting for either a Tory Brexit deal or no deal, because at the time there was a majority Tory government, with no election due for three years and a two year time limit on the Article 50 process. 
8 FebruaryFrom this week, freighters setting sail from UK ports with cargo for Australia and New Zealand, a journey of about 50 days, risk arriving after Brexit day with – in the event of a no-deal Brexit – no idea of the trade rules that will be in place  
In negotiations you should know your strengths... do we ever act like we’ll become the EU’s largest single customer & 5th largest economy post Brexit?  
Stunning Brexit poll by @SkyNews of Irish population this morning:- Just 7% think Ireland should give some compromise to help the UK- 60% think Irish Gov doing a good job- 84% think UK Gov doing a bad job- 64% of RoI would support unity with N.I. 
Corbyn’s Brexit plan betrays younger voters – and they won’t forgive him | @ChukaUmunna 
If there were an STV vote available and I had a vote I’d go for the half-unicorn ‘Corbyn plan’ on Brexit as second choice. Better than May, infinitely better than no deal, nowhere near as good as staying in the EU. 
The Spanish State has an elected Govt. & civilians AS #PoliticalPrisoners & forced exiles A #FakeTrial against #1Oct #Referendum is to start 12FEB in #SpainAGAINST the #SelfDetermination MANDATE of The PeopleIN the midst of a #DEMOCRATIC? #EU#Catalonia#JoAcuso 
“The Dutch are dreading a no-deal Brexit, Calais port authorities are already seeing customers making alternative plans and the Irish are fretting... If Tusk’s objective is to agree a deal, his behaviour this week has been unfathomable”#StandUp4Brexit 
A Post-Brexit Trade Deal with the US literally wipes the floor with protections afforded to us from the EU. This is, and will continue to be for generations to come a fucking disaster. #BrexitCrisis #BrexitLeavesBritainNaked #brexitreality #EUsendhelp  
If this doesn't tell you everything you need to know then nothing will.Open your eyes Scotland. They are terrified you leave the UK.#BBCQT #DissolveTheUnion #Brexit  
'Decisions about what costs we can bear must be taken by those who bear them.' @catherine_mayer president of @WEP_UK  Women look set to be the shock absorbers of #Brexit, just as they were for austerity. That's why we need a #PeoplesVote#MyVoiceMyReason 
By increasing the chance of recession through Brexit we are gambling with people's jobs and livelihoods and risk pushing more families below the poverty line. The "fog of Brexit" has suffocated Britain for too long. 
The Brexit legal challenges that could force Britain to leave without a deal | Coffee House  
#Brexit is a downgrade. There is NO form of Brexit that is beneficial to us - we LOSE a lot and gain nothing. There are NO benefits to going through with this, and it's certainly NOT something that should be celebrated. Going backwards isn't progression, no matter how it's spun. 
And finally, when asked who they would rather cut ties with, the Republic of Ireland answered: 81%19%#Brexit #SkyData  
If anyone with half a grey cell wants to avoid a heart attack, don’t read this list.  It is the worst #Brexit thing ever. I feel ill. What is to become of us? #BrexitCrisis #nodealnightmare 
We all need to bear in mind that @jeremycorbyn ‘s plan is slightly better than @theresa_may ‘s plan.  It’s soft Brexit instead of hard Brexit. But it is still BREXIT and will break Britain. We now know much more and can do much better. Time to oppose Brexit all together.  
BREXIT ULTIMATUM: Verhofstadt offers May BACKSTOP ESCAPE –but only with Corbyn's SOFT EXIT. Go to HELL Verhofstadt!  
In contrast, the vast majority think the UK government has played its hand poorly Brexit negotiations... #SkyData #Brexit  
For what it’s worth, I understand your profound internal crisis. You campaigned for an EFTA-sunny-uplands Brexit and have ended up cheer-leading for a no deal crash out. I sympathise. You’re lashing out. You feel responsible and you should. Yours was a tragic miscalculation. 
Six in 10 think the Irish government has done a good job in #Brexit negotiations, with just 17% saying it has done a bad job... #SkyData  
No-deal Brexit BOOST: Scrap import tariffs to ‘cushion’ UK economy - ‘a very smart trick!’  
PM heads to Dublin today for dinner with the Taoiseach. A Downing Street request. Irish gov keen to emphasise this is not a bilateral negotiation on the backstop. Polls indicate big majority in Ireland doesn’t want Varadkar to budge on the issue despite fears of a no deal #Brexit 
And there is little appetite to give ground to the UK in negotiations to help facilitate a deal... #Brexit #SkyData  
Ex-head of the civil service talking down the ‘no deal’ exit. If Brexit is betrayed then the danger is not riots on the streets, it will be a complete loss of belief in the democratic system. There will simply be no point in voting. Fight back, join UKIP.  
Britain will cut taxes and slash tariffs under secret plans drawn up by officials to kick-start the economy in the event of a no-deal Brexit. The Cabinet Secretary has led a team examining the "economic levers" to make Britain more competitive.  
Germany struggling: - Factory orders down 7% year-on-year- 2019 growth slashed from 1.8% to 1%- Investor morale lowest since 2012- Deutsche Bank: “Drifting towards recession”Merkel really going to oversee No Deal Brexit?  
My piece on Tories trying to buy off Labour MPs with regional funding. Bottom line, never trust the Tories.Labour MPs must not be fooled by Theresa May’s Brexit promises  
Friends! So, it gets worse!My daughter has just been warned she won't get her year abroad - the only reason she chose to study 'Gender-Neutral Anti-Racist EU Climate Scientist Psychology' - if no-deal Brexit, and may have to do something useful instead.Talk about deprivation!  
Many want closure on Brexit. TM’s Deal is a deal in name only, so it will not deliver closure. We will be in permanent negotiation with our hands tied behind our backs. And we will end up weaker & poorer as a country.  Sensible to pause & take stock of where we are going.  
Donald Tusk thinks Theresa May should consider Jeremy Corbyn’s permanent customs union plan.... Can we talk about this? Can we have MSM say this line all day so that the public know that Labour have a credible plan unlike the Tories?! #Brexit #BrexitDeal 
Is anyone else keeping screenshots of this kind of #ProjectFear nonsense? Even when each story is debunked they move onto something else.We might need to open a virtual museum post #Brexit. ‘The Museum of Metropolitan Middle Class Hysteria’ sponsored by Wetherspoons.#WTO 
Yes. One of the most popular Brexiter lies is the need to get Brexit over so that the Government can concentrate on other things. In practice, Brexit is going to be the most dominant concern for the next 20-30 years. The marathon's still to come... this is just the warmup lap.  
Trade negotiations are a series of choices, of which the decision to launch talks is by far the easiest.How prepared are the UK public for trade-offs they can't wish out of existence or shut down debate on by pointing to a referendum result? 
Labour have no intention whatsoever of ending open borders & free movement. They lied to the British people in their 2017 Manifesto & intend to betray us over Brexit. Only UKIP stands for a controlled & limited immigration policy. Join UKIP now.  
Brexit minister @SteveBakerHW confirming what we already know number 10 have been very reluctant to deliver brexit and have even hidden good offers and as I'm interpreting this, pleaded to stay in EU's dictatorship!? Shame on you @theresa_may 
That's more like it!Brexit means freedom to compete, beat and prosper.Just 49 days to go.   
“We are in an incredibly grave situation with people who - frankly - I wouldn’t send for the messages”Scotland’s #Brexit Secretary, Mike Russell ⁦@Feorlean⁩ on UK government’s handling of EU departure 
I've tweeted this previously and make no apologies for doing so today, or tomorrow, the day after that and every day  from then on until the result of the referendum is respected. A reminder that #17.4millionbetrayedPlease retweet if you feel the same, thank you.  
No need to panic! French farmers, German manufacturers & Italian designers will have a smooth transition after #Brexit if they persuade their EU masters to implement WTO Article 24 on 29th March & continue to trade tariff-free. #NoDealNoProblem #LetsGoWTO 
The HMRC-led Border Delivery Group is today finally due to brief Northern Ireland businesses on post-Brexit border arrangements. This meeting has been cancelled on three previous occasions. 
Thank you Lord Kerslake @SirBobKerslake for speaking out in favour of a 2nd referendum on Brexit #PeoplesVote & making it clear that the 29 March will not be the end of Brexit & the UK is just not ready.Also for tackling a badgering John Humphrys head on #r4today@Suewilson91 
Europeans can’t understand the existential drive behind the British wish to leave the EU.  “Nothing is certain in a sea-fight, but the proof of Brexit lies in the leaving”..  
No surprise to see the EU gleefully seizing on Corbyn’s toxic proposal for a permanent customs union (ie no Brexit). If Verhofstadt welcomes it, that tells you all you need to know. Labour are simply trying to damage the Tories rather than propose a serious plan for Brexit.  
Nice ⁦@nytimes⁩ piece on the regional implications of Brexit, highlighting the work of the @ukandeu team headed by ⁦@r_ortegaargiles⁩ ‘Where Europe Would Be Hurt Most by a No-Deal Brexit’  
There's incredulity about Brexit around the world  
Why disaster capitalists are praying for a no-deal Brexit | George Monbiot  
Brexit unravels progress  in so many areas.  
Former head of the civil service @SirBobKerslake says the government and police are preparing for "riots on the streets" in case of a no deal Brexit #r4today  
Public opinion in Ireland . Brexit has done nothing to enhance our standing in the world, it’s done lasting damage.  
‘Former head of civil service says Whitehall & the state are not ready for Brexit & it should be put on hold from the end of March’This is the general view in the civil service, as will come out in the public enquiry after the collapse of Brexit 
Where Europe Would Be Hurt Most by a No-Deal Brexit  
Brilliant stuff. “You’re losers and you need to be voted out!”Watch as the Glaswegian in red rips into the SNP on #bbcqt for its rank hypocrisy over Brexit and briefly enlivens one of the worst Question Time remainfests in years.The SNP panellist’s face is a picture!  
And I am to have those citizenship rights removed because of a referendum called to try to solve internal problems of a political party and achieved by outright repeated false statements central to the Leave Campaign. #BrexitCrisis 
No, the sad thing is whenever anyone points out the utter recklessness of #Brexit leaders like Dan, those same leaders try to stir up the mob by shouting "look, the elites are calling 17.4 million people stupid"It's debasing our politics & its shameful and dangerous  
(a) Tusk did not condemn Leave *voters* to hell, but the Brexit charlatans who pushed it without a plan(b) Those are stickers. Stickers. You know, stickers.  
The sunny upland. Taxes and tariffs to be cut under no-deal Brexit plan  
In case you're wondering...The Brexit Bill: Here’s the Damage So Far 49 days until Brexit  
The ideal situation is that the government or Parliament, belatedly responding to the accumulated evidence of massive fraud and cheating, declare the results of the referendum null and void. But sadly I see no prospect of that between now and March 29. 
“The Brexit nightmare won’t end when we leave” #BobKerslake is right we haven’t finalised our security & trading relationships w #EU rows & uncertainty will continue for years #Today @BBCr4today #BlindfoldBrexit 
Lord Kerslake puts case for referendum this morning and sees off Humphrys. 
I'm a Remainer, but I would much rather see a negotiated Brexit than No Deal. I see little realistic prospect of a 2nd referendum - there's simply not enough public pressure. So, reluctantly, I see Corbyn's offer as more or less the only way forward. 
Days to go until Brexit - 49Alternative Arrangements - 0 
J-C Juncker tells us Jeremy Corbyn’s plans for BREXIT have merit. He must think the U.K. is as a daft as a brush. If the UK accepted the rules of the single market & the customs union it would be worse than remaining in the EU. U.K. under that system would have no vote! PLEASE! 
#Brexit appears to have affected  relations 66% of Irish now have less favourable view of UK (26% say no difference) 81% would cut economic ties with UK rather than EU 64% support #UnitedIreland (16% oppose) 
Why they want a no-deal Brexit.And why, in these 49 days, we must do all we can to stop that happening.  
What they wouldn't admit to, a low tax, small state, deregulated economy - if you don't understand the problem, you are the problem. 
The only person who should be ashamed is Bernard Jenkin for the mis selling of Brexit. You couldn’t get away with it were it PPI or pensions but the country seems fair game  
'Project After': Taxes and tariffs to be slashed under secret plan for no-deal Brexit 
UKgov were attempting to slip legislation through - with no debate or scrutiny - that would allow pharmacists to change your prescription WITHOUT consulting your GP in times of shortage (i.e. after Brexit).Sleekit, dangerous and democratically devoid. 
No deal Brexit.Less than WTO terms.Tax haven.That’s the plan.Don’t say you weren’t warned.#ProjectAfter 
Thank you, The Guardian!! Four men with a ladder: the billboard campaigners battling Brexit  
New @skydata poll: overwhelming 79% of Irish back the backstop EVEN if it risks no-deal #Brexit 60% think Irish govt doing good job on Brexit 73% say no-deal bad for Ireland  
Fraser Nelson:  The EU is lashing out because it's concerned about its survival #brexit  
Let us not forget, we are in this #brexit position because of the treasonous acts of Major, Blair and Brown. The lied, deceived and manipulated the British people whilst surrendering us to ever increasing #euCentralism 
Labour campaigned on a soft Brexit in 2017. Labour continue to campaign for one now. And the bulwark against the disaster of No Deal? It's the Labour Party. So what does someone like James O'Brien do? Lie through his teeth about that. The lies are coming from everywhere now. 
Early stop by @BBCRadioScot. Here for a quick chat about the UK Govt’s warnings this week of the potential loss of EU protection on some of our most important food & drink exports. Another #Brexit No Deal problem.  
Popular Austrian Leader, who banned burkas in his country, @sebastiankurz Will Visit @realDonaldTrump at White House in Late February!this is the first visit of an Austrian leader since 2005!#ArrestSoros #Brexit #MEGA #Austria #MAGA  via @gatewaypundit 
But centrists (for want of a better term: many FBPEers are, in practice, left of centre: in how they see themselves, at least) don't see this. They see someone shambling through his leadership. Who's unclear in his policies. Who is letting them down over Brexit. 
Pick a side #FBPE.The unelected, unaccountable bureaucrats with their PR machines or the ordinary people of Southern Europe who have suffered crippling austerity because of a failed political experiment.Bring on #Brexit.#NoDeal #WTO 
Countdown to Brexit: the key dates as UK's EU exit approaches  
1,176 hours to BrexitJust 49 days now until the great escape from the EU, the most audacious fraudulent scam ever perpetrated on British taxpayers.Just call immigrants citizens to enable millions of them from 27 countries to rob Britains higher lucrative benefits blind. 
The simplest answer to "why can't Labour stop Brexit?" is: "Because you didn't vote Labour in enough numbers in 2017". British system gives absurd amounts of power to the executive. Yet government have been defeated more times than under Major, Blair, Brown and Cameron combined. 
Labour MP Owen Smith: Brexit ‘totally at odds with our values’ – Channel 4 News  
EU regions hit hardest by Brexit: article @nytimes about project by @r_ortegaargiles  … @EUinmyRegion @EP_Regional @EP_ThinkTank @VasilisMargaras @PeterBerkowitz1 project on 22 Feb for a workshop @EU_CoR:  
Brexit could reignite violence - unlike the car bomb the other day which scattered rose petals and glitter through the street.  
Brussels is terrified of Brexit being a success – no wonder they’re threatening hellfire' | via @telegraph  
Politicians have hijacked the referendum agenda and selfishly made it about them and positions for them.Stay woke tupunguze mizigo.#WageBillFromHell 
Nationalists urged to bide time on independence. Will you please give this nonsense a rest? We do not want another divisive referendum. The Union is many things to many people but breaking it apart isn’t going to make us better off. Forget it.  
Saddened to hear of the death of Prof Subir Kar,formerly of Assam University,Silchar. I admired his research on the Sylhet referendum of 1947 which removed a lot of misconceptions and cemented Assamese-Bengali amity. Om Shanti 
Grannies against the right: older women are rising up - could they bring down Brexit? || Via Guardian  
Brexit Britain - Tory MP Chris Green outraged at a few stickers on his constituency office shutter yet remains silent over an illegally procured referendum in which his party is complicit and is using as a device to steal our rights, freedoms and protections. Hypocrisy much?  
Brexit voter registration website may have suffered DDoS attack at the hands of Russia or China  
Yana Gorokhova. Translator for the Agalarov's. She was hanging around Rob Goldstone days after the Trump Tower meeting & was with Goldstone in London during the Brexit vote. She's fluent in Arabic & Englishcc@thespybrief@LouiseMensch@ericgarland 
Whatever Brexit may cost us, we can't afford not to leave. The people must claw back their own sovereignty from an idle and narcissistic ruling class.#Brexit  
What a load of cobblers.The fact that you provided a platform for a third time for this failed UKIP candidate, British nationalist and religious bigot is highly questionable. And who knew that SNP/Indy supporting Motherwell was a Tory and Brexit stronghold#ExtremelyDodgyAudience 
This is very good news! It means we prepare for a WTO Brexit. No "crashing out", just a smooth and orderly transition.This is what the British people want - make it happen - Mrs. May.  via @BreitbartNews 
Mr Kenny given that 60% of Albertans support Separation if you are elected Premier of Alberta will you immediately call for a referendum on Equalization ?#albertaseparation 
Scottish friends told me about the BBC bias during the independence referendum. I flatly refused to believe the BBC could be as bad as they described. Well Brexit has taught me how right they were. Apologies to all Scots. 
A remain-supporting MP was literally gunned down in the street, but sure, a few stickers and a flag are the true symptoms of toxicity in the Brexit debate.  
There are very few true Holy Shit moments in politics. This is one.Take Brexit and Trump, multiply them by 1000, and you’re still nowhere near it  
Will the EU stop a no-deal Brexit?  
The President of the European Council Donald Tusk has described Jeremy Corbyn's latest Brexit proposals as a "promising way out" of the current deadlock. What has Jeremy Corbyn's suggestions done to the Brexit process? #DarrenOnLBC 
Imagine, for a moment, if a Labour leader in the 1980s had said “Mrs Thatcher, I accept that Tories won more votes than Labour, so I will assist you in closing down the mines, steel works and other industries.”Now understand why I despise Corbyn’s approach to Brexit.  
No deal Brexit and slash taxes for the rich. It's what we voted for, after all.  
Financial firms have been setting up legal entities in the EU so that they can continue to provide services such as lending, currency trading and asset management, even after Brexit  
May humiliated by the EU again. The EU made no concessions to May, in fact it was total capitulation. Despite Parliament voting to replace the backstop May agreed that it should stay, she didn’t even try to remove it! What’s the point in a spineless PM. Sack May & No-Deal Brexit.  
FBPE types call Corbyn supporters part of a ‘cult’ despite acting like a cult themselves.A second referendum is a bad idea which would undermine faith in politics and alienate voters.Revoking Article 50 with no mandate at all would also make a mockery of British democracy. 
When people state that Labour's divided over #Brexit alongside the Tory divisions please bear in mind it is not a parallel. The overwhelming maj of Labour MPs, members & voters are pro EU & want this #BrexitShambles reversed & to #RevokeA5 & #Remain in the EU. Corbyn's the block! 
If you listen to this former BREXIT Minister, you'll see that May betrayed the people's vote and intended to make BREXIT appear impossible. She should be ousted. You can NEVER expect a positive solution from the folks who support the problem!  
“A website which allowed Britons to register to vote in [the EU] referendum might have been targeted by foreign hackers causing it to crash before the deadline, a committee of British lawmakers said...”  
Mark Sedwill, the cabinet secretary, according to the FT, is heading a secret working group of civil servants known as ‘Project After’ tasked with plans to boost the economy in the event of a no deal Brexit. Best news from the FT that I can remember since the referendum result. 
Dear @theresa_may Time to move over and move out.The only politician who can clear up the chaos you’ve created is @jeremycorbyn We need a people’s #brexit for jobs, peace, and security. JohnEU parliament chiefs welcome Jeremy Corbyn’s new Brexit plans  
Never forget those who caused a total collapse of 'trust in politicians and politics' filled a vacuum they themselves created and managed to convince just enough that they would 'take back control' for the 'ordinary' people they had continually shafted. That's the BrexitScam. 
No end to brexiters stupidity is there.You asked for it, you got it.We told you this would happen, you said we were scaremongering.One benefit of brexit I've just realized will be watching you planks getting a reality check of what you voted for. 
Must surely win the Dominic Raab Award for Brexit Cluelessness, no?  
Watch @michaeljswalker explain the @UKLabour position on Brexit.He’s absolutely correct about the position of @jeremycorbyn - consistent, seeking compromise, principled.#BBCTW 
Hate to say it, but if the UK does votes to leave, Scotland gets its referendum and votes to stay, I see asking to relocate up to Scotland in my future, stunning place, great people ... 
What kind of Govt expects this level of disruption in peacetime? If this is what they expect post Brexit then they are duty bound to protect the public by revoking Art. 50. 
Brexit: Young people 'will neither forget nor forgive' Leave campaigners, warns John Major'It will make our nation weaker – and our people poorer.’56% and growing want to #Remain. Politicians need to listen.Write to your MP to demand they #StopBrexit 
Gauke is one of the treacherous cabal of Remoaners in the cabinet who wants to scupper Brexit. But he’s also pushed through the appalling.death tax. What a disgrace the man is.   
"You told us oil would be a million pounds a barrel"..  So true, whatever you think of brexit or the state of British politics.. This guy gets it.  
America in 1776 declared independence and fought a war. We had a referendum and voted Leave. We activated Article 50. May was duped into signing a bum deal. (The EU never accepts hostile referendums.) We must kill the deal, walk away, resist collaborators and remain independent. 
Every time I hear the term “Back Stop” it brings back past memories and has nothing remotely to do with #Brexit  but let’s not go there  
One more time: for those  spreading the lie that #DonaldTusk's #specialplaceinhell referred to everyone who supports/voted for #Brexit.No.His #Inferno is a very select place:A few denizens include the supporters of: #NoDealNoProblem#ERG#LeaveMeansLeave...etc. 
"A second referendum was not voted on because no-one was willing to put it forward" Michael Portillo claims @campbellclaret is trying to re-write history over the so-called People's Vote #bbctw 
Just for fun, if you know anyone who thinks bananas will be more bendy or fish will learn to stay within UK waters after Brexit, tell them their continental quilt will cease to work at the end of March. A run on blankets could help the textile industry. 
Cut-price Australian beef could flood UK market under no-deal Brexit - The Sydney Morning Herald…  #News #Politics 
Worth another listen!Make Corbyn pay dearly for his complicity in this Tory #Brexit...#RevokeA50 #StopBrexit & #Remain in control in the EU with our BEST POSSIBLE DEAL 
Who would you vote for in a General Election? #SNP #Brexit #UKIP 
I rather enjoyed the Novara media / Portillo United Front against Campbell & #PeoplesVote on #bbctw Ain't Brexit politcal complexitiesgrand? Fascinating and refresshing how everything is thrown up in the air rather than stuck in a predicatble, technocratic rut @bbcthisweek 
The silly man obsessed with a second referendum @campbellclaret thinks he’s being smart on #bbctw claiming that @theresa_may has lured @jeremycorbyn into supporting her #brexitNo silly man, she now has to move to his peoples #brexit or risk the collapse of the Tory government. 
'The Mash Report' the only Brexit Broadcasting Corporation show to give Carole Cadwalladr a reply to the abuse from its Brextremist presenter Andrew Neil. #BBCTW 
Brexit will not dominate politics for long if we genuinely leave. We'll instead be pro or anti a US-UK FTA, or pro or anti Communist or pro or anti AI taking jobs. #bbctw 
Should Parliament block Brexit we will have a constitutional crisis. The will of the people will have been overturned. Parliament will be like Maduro, pretending to speak for a neutered democracy. Political theory could justify civil disobedience as a response. I hope not but... 
Audience member brilliantly points out the SNP hypocrisy over Brexit. No plan, no strategy for a "YES" result in 2014. #BBCQT 
Brexit MEANS leaving the Customs Union.  Corbyn’s plan IS NOT BREXIT. 
Hmmm. There seems to be a diary clash with the next Brexit votes in Parliament.   
I remember the snp produced a white paper containing their plan for independence, it wasn’t perfect, but it was a plan. I felt way more informed in Scot ref than brexit,despite no camp telling us we were running out of oil, we would be out of Europe etc 
The People's Vote campaign should just accept defeat as a second referendum is never going to happen. The British people voted to leave the EU and Brexit will happen. #bbcqt #bbctw #StandUp4Brexit 
Corbyn has done with one letter that which 3 Brexit Secretaries and 1 PM has failed to do with Brexit. Also asked for extension on article 50. He has made compromises for leave and remain. Yet MSM, Blairites and other parties attack him for it. Damned if he does or doesn’t  
I was absolutely shocked watching @bbcquestiontime tonight. Every panel member was asked a question by an audience member, allowed to respond but presenter Fiona Bruce asked 3 audience members questions before allowing @FionaHyslop to respond. #brexit @ScotGovFM @scotgov #bbcqt 
Michael Walker: "Labour don't want to spend the next decade fighting a culture war about the EU"Labour AND Tory Brexit mean we're bound by the EU rules but we give up our powerful position in setting those rules PERMANENTLY.You think Brexit voters will ever accept that?#BBCtw 
Brussels is terrified of Brexit being a success – no wonder they’re threatening hellfire' | via @telegraph 
50 days to Brexit is being cited. Yes, 50 days to 29th March, but it will not be Brexit. I fear the fight will continue for many years to come. @ZacGoldsmith got it right in the HoC, voters will be driven to Brexit Parties due to inaction, who will that Party be? 
He's doing the job that Brian Taylor & Co continually fail to do, exposing the absolute hypocrisy of their stance on #brexit and the lies at the heart of their discredited white paper. Bravo sir, bravo...  
Well this is going well, isn’t it. “No-deal Brexit: UK exporters risk being locked out of world's harbours”.“Shipments sent over the next few days to far-flung ports face an uncertain reception”. 
That was a most enjoyable #BBCQT . Several good questions and points raised about the hypocrisy of Nicola Sturgeon and her positions on Brexit and Scottish Independence. 
Cancel Brexit?Indict Trump?I don't mind which. I just need a boost. 
The public know that Brexit is a disaster. 56% now want to #Remain.It’s time for politicians to come clean and #StopBrexit.#bbcqt 
Political suicide by the @Conservatives party. No10 admits @theresa_may is considering Jeremy Corbyn's Brexit proposals by staying in a customs union. There'll be HELL to pay at the ballot box if she colludes with Labour with a fudged fake Brexit in name only.  
You've got a choice Theresa Either don't deliver Brexit and be remembered as the worst Prime Minister ever or Leave without a deal and be remembered up there with Churchill.Do it for your country Theresa and the people will love you  
Only in Brexit Britain can saying someone doesn't know what the Single Market is be interpreted as calling someone an idiot. Rocket scientists/ brain surgeons don't study EU law!The BBC made the same mistake you did until I called them out.I'm sorry I corrected you publicly.  
Scottish-African Eunice Olumide playing a total blinder on #bbcqt compared to the politicians. Daring to address some of the huge issues from #Brexit, to #indyref2, racism & slavery & the nature of capitalism. 
It is a damning indictment and a severe dereliction of duty that such a calamity as a no-deal #Brexit is a possibility, no matter how unlikely. It’s time to rule out no deal, once and for all   
The UK that begged to join the EU was the Sick Man of Europe, ravaged by economic dysfunction, petrol shortages, three-day weeks, had to ask the IMF for a bail-out. Leavers were told to tick a box and get a dream. Reality will never measure up. Brexit is a corrective. #bbcqt 3/3 
It’s precisely this gulf that #Brexit cannot bridge and results in so many unhappy Leavers - “winners” still acting like conspiracy victims; the gulf between the romantic idea that sovereignty would translate into power and the reality it actually results in weakness. #bbcqt 2/3 
Forsyth’s superiority crystallises this thought: For many Brits “sovereignty” equates to “dominance”. It’s not about the UK deciding for itself, but imposing its will on others (eg. Ireland). Anyone not submitting is “inflexible”. It’s a post-imperial hangover. #bbcqt #Brexit 1/3 
Pleased @JasonJHunter is coming to speak and party for the EU, in solidarity with our musicians who rely on #EUMembership for touring and creative projects.  Make Brexit History @StopBrexitMarch @Liverpool4EU @Music4EU @JFairhurstMusic @AdrianCoxMusic @MadeleinaKay #RIPBrexit 
Complete disgrace of an unbalanced crowd and panel tonight. Turned off eventually One guy presses tory on indy silenced and told we are talking about brexit bbc usual orange man allowed to rant Brace yourselves Scotland they havnt changed they are in full propaganda mode. #bbcqt 
What drivel. It’s what EU has become since Maastricht - without UK citizens being given a say - that lead to Brexit.I really wonder where this blind overzealous faith in the EU, and the propensity to put one’s own people down comes from.Orwell had a theory I think.#bbcqt 
Isn't it funny but everytime BBCqt is on they always have folk in the audience who voted yes in 2014 but would now vote No if we have another Independence referendum.... I smell a Yoon rat....  
I was recently chatting with a Scot about the view from Scotland on Brexit. He mentioned that Motherwell has suffered the same political neglect as left-behind areas in England. But they knew Brexit would only make things worse.#BBCqt 
Tory Brexit Man on #bbcqt says the Irish border isn’t an issue.Audience laughs at him.Total derision.Again, get used to it. 
Just a reminder that Motherwell voted yes to Scottish independence and no to Brexit   Because if your watching #BBCQT #bbcquestiontime you would never know 
'Is it best out of 2, best out of 3, do we just keep doing it until she gets the answer she wants?'This audience member says he does not want another Scottish independence referendum. #bbcqt 
The cognitive dissonance of Fiona Hyslop is excruciating. Her 'escape' from Brexit is to wrench Scotland out of the UK, oblivious to the fact UK market is four times more important to Scotland than the EU.Not in the people's interest but in the interests of nationalism.#bbcqt 
#Brexit: More progress on #EU preparedness. Provisional agreement reached on new maritime connections between #Ireland & continental Europe. #EU financing will also be made available for the adaptation of transport infrastructure for security and border checks to cope w/ #Brexit.  
'I'm an EU national myself and I think independence will be better at the end of the day'This audience member says EU nationals would be better off living in an independent Scotland even in the event of Brexit. #bbcqt 
My Son turns 18 on the 25th of March. He'll enjoy the freedom to live, love and work anywhere in the EU for four days. A million people who voted in the referendum that stripped him of his rights have since died. How can this be right? He'll NEVER vote for a Brexit party. #BBCQT 
Thank you Scotland (Motherwell) for make the #BBCqt Brexit segment bearable. 
Every single Brit who hasn't lost their minds over Brexit is side eyeing the US because we want/need our own AOC. OK, OK specifically your AOC. Giver her to us damn you!! 
It’s not an uncommon position to have voted Remain but think demanding the referendum be overturned sets a dangerous precedent, yet many people refuse to accept that. Many people would prefer the focus be on scrutiny of the Withdrawal Agreement. 
Did someone just say “Surely we are Stronger Together” about not wanting a referendum on Scottish Independence but also supporting Brexit. #BBCQT 
#bbcqtI can't remember the referendum question being Remain a member of the European Union OrLet's allow a Remoaner to negotiate a deal with the EU. If the Remoaner doesn't get a good deal we can't leave so will have another referendum 
Nicola Sturgeon said contingency plans for Britain's departure from the EU with no deal were "genuinely astonishing". Giving a speech at Georgetown University, Washington on Monday, she called for a second referendum on EU membership.  #bbcqt 
‘If she’s not willing to listen… then we will need to let the population have their say again’@AnnelieseDodds says that Theresa May has to rule out the possibility of a no deal Brexit and compromise on the issue of a Customs Union. #bbcqt 
Amazed that some still think campaigners for a second referendum should have attacked Corbyn *more*: they simply appeared as an anti-Labour astroturfing group, praising *Anna Soubry* the unrebellious “rebel” and alienated any possible base. 
Thanks to @DLidington for speaking at a @CER_EU dinner tonight @StanChart. He spoke off-record; but I can say many companies around the table, including foreign firms, were in despair about the Brexit uncertainty & said they'd cut investment further than they'd admitted in public 
Durkin who made Brexit the Movie - equating The EU to the Warsaw Pact countries. What a revolting individual. The EU hasn't built any walls or put up barbed wire or enslaved, tortured, shot people who leave it. You're an idiot Martin. But then you're a Spiked acolyte aren't you  
The hard right ERG and their hedge fund chums aren't just driven by ideology, they are driven by greed and cruelty. Behind the veneer of twee public school niceties, they are savage predators. They are NOT on your side, Brexit voters.#bbcqt 
Model Eunice Olumide says Brexit requires strong leadership. #bbcqt 
"The agreement will not be renegotiated" Dutch MEP Sophie in ‘t Veld, the vice chair of the Liberal group led by the European Parliament’s chief Brexit negotiator Guy Verhofstadt, tells Mark Urban@SophieintVeld | #newsnight 
Working class people fought hard to get the right to vote & to control our destiny. The elite handed over many of those decision making powers our ancestors fought for to unelected bureaucrats in Brussels. If Remainers want to know why we feel so strongly about Brexit, that’s why 
If you ever read Douglas Adams, you may remember the anecdote where the two strangers stare each other down as they both eat out of a single bag of crisps, each assuming the bag is theirs and the other man is out of his mindIt's terrifying to consider Brexit in THAT light  
‘Brexit will ruin the country’ This audience member says that the promise of an extra 300 million pounds for the NHS is not going to happen. #bbcqt 
Fundamental difference between #indyref and #EUref: #indyref: 600+ pages of White Paper with detailed plan, civilised debate, long campaign#EUref: big lie on the side of a red bus, no plan whatsoever, dark money, and architects of Brexit went into hiding. #bbcqt 
Donald Tusk: 'I've been wondering, what that special place in hell looks like for those who promoted #Brexit without even a sketch of a plan how to carry it safely'  
Jeremy Corbyn's letter setting out his party's demands for supporting a Brexit deal has been welcomed by the European Parliament's Brexit co-ordinator. Guy Verhofstadt said "cross-party co-operation is the way forward".  #bbcqt 
Lots of fishermen voted for #Brexit. Not many of them knew it would threaten their livelihoods, as this guy explained to us in Cornwall today.Donald Tusk - unlike the Brexit fraudsters & crooks - was speaking nothing but the truth.#bbcqt 
FH: "In the independence referendum, we were told if people voted No, they would stay in the European Union." #bbcqt 
Can everyone stop saying Brexit is right wing. What about all the other countries that aren’t in the EU? Are they right wing??? #bbcqt 
Actually, Brexit is the combination of two very British stereotypes:1) Refusal to admit to any fault2) Fear of confrontation Just keep calm and carry on as though nothing is going wrong and maybe the engine of empire will start itself back up on its own accord, perhaps 
A map that gives me yet another reason to be proud of being Scottish.#bbcqt #Brexit #EUReferendum 
Journalist @hugorifkind says Britain must accept responsibility for Brexit. #bbcqt 
I'm the British public (or a part if it)I don't want Brexit.People don't want Brexit.There is NO mandate for Brexit (#NothingToRespect in referendum)So just #RevokeA50 and #StopBrexit 
‘The people of Scotland voted to remain, we are fed up being ignored’@FionaHyslop says that there should be an extension to Article 50 and another referendum on leaving the European Union. #bbcqt 
50 days to Brexit. No problem. God made the world in seven days. 
‘I don’t think I would ever vote for another referendum in my life’Conservative Politician Michael Forsyth says that referendums create division and are not a healthy way of solving complex issues such as Brexit and Scottish Independence.  #bbcqt 
Barnier “We agree in principle with Labour’s Brexit proposals, can we arrange a meeting in the next few weeks to tie up loose ends?”The boss “Sure, Michel. Just let me know when.”Delivering #Brexit really is as easy as that.  
Watched @SkyNews before #BBCQTReport on Brexit showed @DerbyChrisW backing the labour leadership position. He spoke for 12 seconds. 12.Meanwhile Rupa Huq had 5 minutes to argue for a second referendum.Why can't we just have balance like during election period? 
Well said @OwenSmith_MP If Labour facilitates Tory Brexit and evades a public vote, many of us will ask whether our values have been undermined so much as to consider our membership.We desperately hope that's not the case, yet the evidence suggests it's where we are headed.  
Corbyn played it right for the last 2 years and the timing of this is outstanding! The Tories want to fight a GE with labour being the remain party. And labour to be the author of a 2nd ref. He sidestepped both - Tory’s Brexit, Tory’s ref, tory’s delay to art 50, Tory’s no deal 
Critics Consensus: With acerbic wit and a mesmerizingly eccentric performance from Benedict Cumberbatch, Brexit energetically renders recent history with unflinching poise.#Brexit is now #CertifiedFresh at 83% on the #Tomatometer, with 40 reviews  
Ireland needs no advice from our neighbours about how to handle #Brexit negs. The backstop will not be reopened but Ireland will continue to be constructive. As for own goals!!  
Delusion is a cigar called Brexit  
“Britain will cut taxes and slash tariffs under secret plans drawn up by officials to kick-start the economy in the event of a no-deal Brexit. “The plans include a series of aggressive policies to help the UK ‘steal a march’ on the EU.”#StandUp4Brexit 
‘It is very alarming that the shadow Brexit Secretary is mentioning continuing a qualified form of freedom of movement.’ It would be a total breach of our manifesto pledge and would be a betrayal of our voters. @BrendanChilton @LBC @Keir_Starmer 
Friday’s i: "Corbyn faces Labour revolt over Brexit offer to PM" #bbcpapers #tomorrowspaperstoday (via @AllieHBNews) 
‘Remaining in a customs union is not what people voted for in the referendum. And there are 5 million Labour leave voters around the country who are looking at what has been proposed and are very worried about the consequences.’ @BrendanChilton @LBC 
Corbyn & LAB have stood firm on its Brexit policy despite attacks from all sides. What is clear is that the policy is the right one & is being backed by the EU. We need a general election. We need Corbyn & Starmer to negotiate Brexit for people, busineses & the economy.  
If the stories are true of a post Brexit plan to slash taxes and tariffs, the Brits may have to 'build the wall' as a load of us rush to get over it  
So why are you supporting Brexit given it’ll make things worse?  
What do pesky experts know about the consequences of #Brexit, eh? Why listen and heed the warnings of internationally renowned cancer experts when you have the reassurances of people like @Nigel_Farage, @Jacob_Rees_Mogg and @BorisJohnson 
Loving the fact the british PM is having to go to Dublin with her tail very much between her legs! 800 years luv, 800 years! We’ve been waiting for this #Brexit disaster 
Labour’s Brexit position has been praised by Donald Tusk as a way out of political deadlock. Nick Cohen can still hate it for not being Remain, and he can gnash his teeth at being cursed with the face of a cantankerous peanut, but neither of those things are Ian Dunt’s fault. 
"We know what happens to people who stay in the middle of the road. They get run down"Bevan was right. This lack of Leadership on Brexit is limiting, splitting, wrecking our Party and keeping the Tories and their policies of austerity and inequality in power.  
Jeremy Corbyn gets criticised when he does not try to engage with the government on Brexit. Jeremy Corbyn gets criticised when he does try to engage with the government on Brexit.Maybe all this fuss has less to do with Brexit and more to do with criticising Jeremy Corbyn? 
So, Labour Party Brexiter MP Kate Hoey who represents a Remain constituency is taken to task for her #Brexit views. A taste of things to come. ***** Brexiteer Labour MP Kate Hoey suffers vote of no confidence from her constituency members | The Independent  
When the fog of Brexit clears, one thing is guaranteed - people will come to view the Tories with unprecedented revulsion. Any MP who facilitated Brexit, did not do enough to oppose it, or simply relied on the alibi of a constituency Leave majority won't escape the blowback. 
Hey Remainers? Guess what: CORBYN WAS RIGHT.Despite everything, Corbyn & Labour have managed to develop a workable Brexit plan, prevent a split in the party and keep the party's poll rating at around 38%. Meanwhile, centrists have only managed to organise a protest march.  
If you got in from work & watched BBC News at 10 to see what’s happened today - as millions do - you’d have learned nothing about Labour’s Brexit proposal except it’s “infuriated” members. No mention of the EU’s positive response & no explanation of what the proposal even is. 
The EU has not caused any of the dreadful things you mentioned. Not one. After Brexit the North will be starved by Westminster, left to rot. People will turn to the far right because solidarity is dead in their hearts. 
Poland, poll for GLOBSEC:"How would you vote in a [European Union membership] referendum?"Remain: 92%Leave: 8%Field work: February and March 2018Date of Publication: 5 February 2019Sample size: 1,000+#Brexit #Poland 
Brussels is terrified of Brexit being a success – no wonder they’re threatening hellfire:  
Brexit Vote was gerrymandered. Millions of most affected people were deliberately kept off the ballot.The Leave campaign never campaigned for a no deal crash. Cameron had no legal basis to promise binding vote. Leave campaign hugely overspend & broke the law. Russia meddled.  
A FM not afraid of challenging Brexit ?  
POLL: Is @UKLabour's stance on #Brexit more important to you than getting rid of this corrupt, incompetent and heartless Tory government that is literally killing 100,000s of people with their ideologically-driven austerity policies? #bbcqt #bbctw #thisweekPlease vote and RT 
The moral of #Brexit is that in 2019 I definitely trust Brussels more than I trust the UK government. I think Brussels cares more about our rights and well-being than our MPs do. And I include the opposition. I'm frankly disgusted. 
I mean, really, #snowflakes ...What HARM has #brexit done to us?  
I was trashed by many on Twitter last July when I wrote this. Even now, a lot of people seem to believe Corbyn will block Brexit. It’s exactly the opposite. He is more pro-Brexit than May!  
Czechia, poll for GLOBSEC:"How would you vote in a [European Union membership] referendum?"Remain: 73%Leave: 27%Field work: February and March 2018Date of Publication: 5 February 2019Sample size: 1,000+#Brexit #Czechia 
Another week, another Brexit problem #HowardHour 
It is astounding that when the UK Govt strips citizens of their Rights w/o Consent there is no Law that can hold them to account.#Brexit Britain FUBAR NOTHING LEFT or RIGHT TO RESPECT #RevokeA50 #StopBrexit & #Remain in Control in the EU. 
Telegraph reporting government plans to scrap tariffs and cut taxes in the event of a no deal Brexit.  Where’s the downside? 
Ian Dunt has been, no question, the best journalist on Brexit since the referendum was called. You, and the Observer, have followed. Sometimes it's made you look good. Graft v grift. 
Yeah, I know of the far right in those places. And Lexit voters who have forgotten the motto 'workers of the WORLD unite'. My daughter will survive without Erasmus, the North East on the other hand will be dead in the water after Brexit. Wake up, comrade! 
What never ceases to amaze me about Brexit is the discovery that "the British public" has shrunk to a pitiful handful of hateful tossers and everyone else has simply ceased to exist. It's a sort of miracle.  
Brexit. It gets even better (from a comedy standpoint only)...  
Prof David Blake "Theresa May is the “Manchurian Candidate” – a Remainer who is just going through the motions of exiting from the EU by agreeing to a WA that is so absurd that people will say that if this is what Brexit means, we might as well stay in."  
Good luck. #Brexit is a travesty and I only wish those that voted for it were the only ones to feel the pain. So unfair on 50M people. Our Government and Opposition are mad. 
Today's tea:                (       )     (      (     ( _(___(___)___(___(__ __ | Only talking about    |   | | austerity in relation   |    | | to brexit makes        |   | | you opportunistic    |_|  \  not progressive   /     \_______________/ 
Why hating bruv? Join the endorsement train let’s step up to the #NextLevel. You can do better than Brexit bro...  
Inctedible but true #Brexit fact : after next Thursday shipments from Asia by sea of parts for , say, cars will be sent on their journey without any knowledge of what tariffs will be payable on them when they arrive in the UK six weeks later. That is the depth of this Tory chaos 
That naked feminist is just looking for any excuse to get her kit off because she’s an exhibitionist. It’s nothing to do with Brexit. She’s just trashy. 
So why should we listen to @CBItweets and @cbicarolyn on Brexit.  Wrong then wrong now #LeaveMeansLeave 
The big advantages of a 'no deal' Brexit are that the UK could quickly remove trade barriers to cheaper goods from outside the EU, and also remove the hugely costly EU red tape that strangles businesses:  
Self righteous twaddle. Brexit has made the UK an international laughing stock.  
No matter what stance Corbyn takes on #Brexit, self-indulgent Labour members will throw their toys out the pram. Remainers won't be happy unless Corbyn opposes Brexit. Leavers won't be happy unless Corbyn supports Brexit. Those who care about humanity will vote Labour regardless. 
'Project After': Taxes and tariffs to be slashed under secret plan for no-deal Brexit  
The May gets MORE obvious by the minute."Brexit deal may not be put to MPs until late March, officials say"She will then present her half baked #WithdrawalAgreement or offer #NoDeal.Enough Labour will rally to her side. That is the big plan. 
Only amongst hard-core Brextremists. As usual, May assumes that the half of the country that didn’t vote for Brexit doesn’t exist!She is hopelessly incorrigible. A lost cause. 
Every time you think you have reached peak Brexit, there's one more level.  
Neither do I, so I won't vote for any politician who'd do anything to exacerbate either scourge, like supporting Brexit. 
Brexit has shone a light upon our body politic and we are all appalled at what we see. The first post-Brexit general election could - it's possible at least - be a wonderful and monumental moment in the life of this United Kingdom. 
Jeremy Corbyn lays out Labour’s five Brexit demands in letter to Theresa May -  via @uklabour 
Who knew that Brexit would mean an endless three year conversation by our pathetic politicians about a decision that was made in 2016. The inability to deliver by the establishment in general,and the tories in particular shows none in Parliament are trustworthy or worthy a vote. 
Labour members are united in not wanting to back a Tory deal and keep this government in power, says @anaopp on @Channel4News.Corbyn and his allies should be campaigning for both a general election and another referendum.   
Steve Bell on Jeremy Corbyn's Brexit offer to Theresa May – cartoon  
Corbyn’s Brexit plan betrays younger Labour voters - and they will not forgive him.His five tests are nonsense and Labour’s policy is all over the place.He’s mocking the 56%+ who want to #Remain & his own party’s policy.Write to your MP. #StopBrexit. 
UK, Ipsos MORI poll:CON-ECR: 38%LAB-S&D: 38%LDEM-ALDE 10% (+1)UKIP-ENF: 4%SNP-G/EFA: 4% GREENS-G/EFA: 3% (-2)PC-G/EFA: 1% BNP-NI: 0%+/- vs. 30/11/18 – 5/12/18 Field work: 1-5 Feburary 2019Sample size: 1,005➤ #Brexit #BrexitVote 
The Brexit legal challenges that could force Britain to leave without a deal. Brexiteers have had enough of Remainers trying to frustrate Brexit. So now Brexiteers are going to use the law to ensure we leave under a managed WTO deal, the default option..  
MP Owen Smith says he can't be part of a Labour party that 'waves through a Tory Brexit'  
Never mind brexit, just waxit. 
“The fog of Brexit is increasing the chances of recession”, the Bank of England governor Mark Carney has warned. 
What is Labour playing at? Jeremy Corbyn has made his final Brexit move- a trap to split the Tory party. Yet he risks ensnaring himself and Labour too. My piece.   
Oh for fuck's sake. If businesses are now expressing "fury" that trade deals won't role over post a brexit then they should have fucking said so. They've only had close to 3 years...   
LIVE: Former #Brexit minister Steve Baker appears before MP committee  via @YouTube @piersmorgan A MUST WATCH - a clear insight to how we have been totally and utterly sold out by No. 10 
Brexit: UKGov told to uphold Belfast Agreement if it wants US trade.  
France will not support a British extension to #Brexit, unless they have a credible plan. 'We oppose an extension without a plan...We won’t accept it,' an official told Reuters   
UK (GB), YouGov poll:CON-ECR: 41% (+2) LAB-S&D: 34%LDEM-ALDE 10% (-1)SNP/PCY-G/EFA: 5%GREENS-G/EFA: 4%UKIP-ENF: 4% (-2)BNP-NI: 0%WEP-S&D: 0%+/- vs. 13-14 Jan 2019Field work: 3-4 Feburary 2019Sample size: 1,851➤ #Brexit #BrexitVote 
Labour MP Owen Smith: Brexit ‘totally at odds with our values’ 
I support John Major on BREXIT. The TORIES are making a huge mistake pushing through this BREXIT, and in due course they will pay the price for this error of judgement.  
The Case for Brexit is like a vast labyrinth of logically interconnected passages. Each passageway contains a point, a fact, a quote, or something else supporting the argument against EU membership.  /1 
Labour's Owen Smith tells @itvnews he can't stay in a Labour Party that is 'complicit in waving through a Tory Brexit'  
You can take that as given. She has a German passport, she won't stay in a country devastated by Brexit. 
As May kicks the can further and further down the road. The brexit clock is still tickingWe need to call a halt to this madness!We should Hold a second referendum on EU membershipAgree?Then SIGN and then RT this petition #FBPE #PeoplesVoteNow 
When Brexit is really hurting, people will remember the 700k demo and the Remain campaign. When Labour MPs are looking for a hiding place, they won’t find one. Iraq wasn’t forgotten. Brexit won’t be forgotten either. The casualties will be all around us. #Brexit #peoplesvote 
Growing Brexit uncertainty is cascading through Britain's economy, delaying business decisions and hurting consumers, Mark Carney says  
Why do we have to accept the referendum, which has been proven to have been won on lies? Why should we have to accept and respect a tainted result, how is that democracy? And why is nobody challenging the result on this basis, it’s a fair first vote we need  
Peter Brookes on Theresa May’s visit to #Juncker #TheresaMay #Tories #Brexit #BrexitShambles - political cartoon gallery in London  
Brexit ferry company with no ferries may be stranded in a port that isn’t a port 
Work to turn M20 into car park in the event of post-Brexit chaos begins this weekend  
The fact that the UK failed to do this before triggering Article 50 is the fault of a government that was unprepared & MPs who failed to properly hold that government to account before authorising it to trigger Article 50. The blame sits squarely with London. #Brexit 
Absolutely. We all stood on the same manifesto that accepted the referendum and said we would work to get a deal — but it must be a deal that benefits the whole of the U.K. PM’s red lines are pushing U.K. towards a No Deal disaster. We may need a public vote to stop her.  
The important thing is to never shy away from telling people #Brexit is a full-blown scam. They attempt to shame us into silence with a false narrative of the liberal elite seeking to crush the voice of the underprivileged. It's all bollocks, our own government is gaslighting us. 
a) Pour yourself a glass of something nice; b) forget politics/Brexit/Armageddon; c) tune into @BBCFOUR right now for some lovely music and history xx 
Agree @lucianaberger is a seriously impressive MP who has campaigned tirelessly on mental health issues & against Brexit, despite the appalling abuse she’s faced.  
Why does TM keep saying we want a "close relationship" with EU post-Brexit?Why would we be friendly with an anti-democratic hellhole that's spent the past two years trying to cripple our economy when leave?EU can burn. I want us to pursue real alliance with actual allies 
Our country divided by a bent referendum instigated by the RW of the @Conservatives. Thanks 
Scotland, you’ve been treated appallingly by Westminster & deserve so much better than being forced into a ruinous Brexit you didn’t vote for. Let Denmark be your model of an equitable, progressive society thriving next door to a large neighbour. I’m ready to campaign with you  
Second Meaningful Vote on Brexit may not be held until late March, just days before Brexit Day. Expect businesses to step up implementing their contingency plans. This is all SO unnecessary. Collective madness. 
Another poll puts Tories 7 points ahead of Labour as voters punish their ever changing stance on Brexit 
Very interesting from @nytimes “Britain’s economyis nearly five timesmore exposed to#Brexit than the rest ofthe EU”  
Beyond irony- a leading Brexiter complains that after Brexit she will no longer enjoy the benefits of being in the EU. WHAT DID YOU THINK LEAVING THE EU MEANT?  
French officials believe The UK is running down the clock in the expectation that the EU will cave in on the backstop. The official said this was a fundamental mistake and underestimated the EU's resolve to protect Ireland & its own credibility. #Brexit  
Barely 30 sitting days remain until Brexit. This week MPs spent three hours discussing subjects like a new rugby ground in Nantyffyllon   
I have now watched it three times & it still comes out as mostly bullsh1t all I hear WE WILL GET BREXIT ON THE DATE PROMISED what I do not hear is UNDER WTO TERMS  
A prominent socialist remainer tells The Canary why Labour could be walking into a Tory Brexit trapby @JoshuaFunnell2 
Guy Verhofstadt is not a bureaucrat. He’s an elected Member of the European Parliament. This is the problem with Brexit. There’s way too much disingenuous messages flying around from people who should know better.  
All of our research into Brexit dark money over two years points to exactly this. Disaster capitalist oligarchs paid for the Brexit campaign. They are desperate for a hard Brexit. Spot on from @GeorgeMonbiot 
EU chiefs have urged Theresa May to accept Jeremy Corbyn's Brexit olive branchBut some Labour MPs - mostly Blairites - are furious about Jeremy Corbyn’s plan to help deliver Brexit 
This is what you get when you enable Brexit... own your shit!  
Discussion in the Observer newsroom about @IanDunt 's descent into happy clappy Pollyannaism about Labour Brexit "position". Printabe comments include "he should be sectioned", "absolutely barking" and "it's his wife I feel sorry for" 
#BrexitExpectation: private islandReality: Private Eye-land 
The identical device being used by left and right is to attempt to gaslight the population into believing that #Brexit is democratic and legitimate.It is not.A policy mandated by a vote manipulated by proven industrial-scale illegal disinformation has zero legitimacy. 
Brexit, ‘spineless’ Labour and a grannies’ revolt | Letters - the guardian  
Stephen Hammond: Minister hints he could resign to vote against no-deal Brexit - Sky News  
Check the people selling Buhari to you. Most of them live abroad. They think PMB is doing a fantastic job but in the last four years, all of them have moved to another country. An election is a referendum on competence. We enable them when we don’t vote them out. Be wise! 
Genuinely think Brexit has been the biggest affirmation of democratic supremacy over the inexorable trend towards autocratic/technocratic governance in many years. Those in positions of power within this system in the EU don't like it one bit and it's a joy to behold... 
Farage: EU ‘Scared’ of WTO Clean Brexit  
Read this powerful letter of resignation from @UKLabour. Written today, in reaction to the appalling behavior towards @lucianaberger, antisemitism & Brexit. #Labourantisemitism 
Brexit is separation.How do you bring the country together by enforcing separation on half the population that don't want separation? While the other half do want separation.You wont create unity by appeasing those who want divisions. 
So Corbyn is inching towards one side of the fence by backing a very soft #Brexit.I think he has made a very bad decision.  Islington remainers will just see him backing Brexit. Working class leavers will just see him backing remain by another name.  
Spotted at Downing Street. Just in time for the words "I'll deliver Brexit on time" to be heard.  
Let's have a look at what Tusk REALLY said, shall we? If youa) Didn't lead the #Brexit campaignb) Weren't responsible for coming up with a planc) Didn't promote a no-plan #Brexitthe #specialplaceinhell remark isn't aimed at YOUWhat do Green's constituents think of his lies? 
A French official has said that France would not allow a delay in #Brexit with no plan  
Robert Preston’s assumption (see previous tweet) is that Brexit is a tragedy not only in itself but in its probable break-up of the two major parties. My personal view is that both of these have emerged so badly  that neither deserves to survive. I’d prefer to drain the swamp. 
The job of 'Leader of the House' is obviously too big for Loathsome; yet another run in today with honourable members and her weekly clash with the speaker. It's pretty difficult to sully the bad name of the Conservatives further these days, but Mother Leadsom achieves it easily! 
The EU slashes its growth forecasts for all the euro area's major economies and warns Brexit may make things worse  
Donald Tusk Told Theresa May That Jeremy Corbyn's Plan Could Be ''A Promising Way'' Out Of The Brexit Impasse.Jeremy Corbyn is #TheRealPrimeMinister 
The Real Face of the European Union  #Brexit  
Just look at the Highlands and Islands, what we get back rarely hits the press but has changed lives here:CPMR analysis: UK to lose €13bn regional funding post Brexit  
Thousands of bankers are suddenly faced with the prospect of relocation because of Brexit  
Local Government is under enormous pressure. Now we can see the impact of Tory cuts, not just on our local services, but on Brexit preparedness too. This Government must now commit - as @UKLabour will - to give our councils the funding they need. 
Important from @GeorgeMonbiot on no deal Brexit and the environment Why disaster capitalists are praying for a no-deal Brexit 
A must watch when it comes to Brexit! Excellent as always from @Femi_Sorry 
I voted to scrap mobile phone roaming charges across 28 member states a few years ago. Sad that this government is so inept that roaming charges will return for UK mobile users after #Brexit. 
My employer here in Germany has written to me to:• remind me the UK is #brexit|ing• to encourage me to apply now for a residence permit• and to ask me to provide them with the permit once I have it.This is what happens to Brits when their #citizensrights are lost 
The Electoral Commission has lost the plot since the EU referendum.Now they’re even teaming up with partisan political pressure groups like the ERS to publish reports.This is completely unacceptable.  
The voters looked from Tory brexit policy to Labour and Labour to Tory; Tory to Labour's again. For remainers it was already impossible to tell which was which. 
Theresa May trying to clinch her Brexit deal. 
Never mind what you voted and how you’d vote now, ie Brexit. We now have the benefit of hindsight. Do you wish the referendum never happened and we could go back to how we were before, as a country? 
It's crystal clear: What the Labour Party demands for a Brexit that will protect jobs and trade, retain market access,  grow our economy, avoid a hard border in Ireland, guarantee our security, protect workers and consumer rights and safeguard our environment @jeremycorbyn 
Why does Theresa May keep saying *Our job is to deliver Brexit*? Has she read the Ministerial Code?  Annex A: her job is to stop Brexit.Has she heard of the Electoral Commission? Brexit is a crime.Has she heard of the Secret Services? Her job is to protect UK, not stop them. 
WATCH: There is no ‘good’ #Brexit, and any deal must be put back to the people for a #finalsay. The best deal is the one we have now as full members of the European Union.@LabPeoplesVote @peoplesvote_uk @BBCWorld #Beyond100Days 
George Eaton articles for the 2nd half of 2019:Centrists wanted no-deal BrexitWe all know why Labour's polling at 8% - IraqWhy won't Blairite Corbyn stop trying to undermine McDonnell's Labour? 
Stephen Hammond: Minister hints he could resign to vote against no-deal Brexit  
What about if you feel a change of leader to someone with a personal rating above 19% would increase the chance of  " a Labour government ... to end austerity, the health & housing crisis & stop a Tory  Brexit"?  
A big #Brexit decision is yet to be made...It’s 10.50pm on 29th March 2019. A #WTOBrexit is just minutes away.What music should be played up and down the country to commemorate and symbolise this historic moment? 
Striking retweet from a sitting minister in support of Corbyn’s Brexit demands, this.  
People who think Britain can cope with a no deal Brexit should know I'm on a train that's been broken down for 20 minutes and we've already eaten the conductor and fucked his shoes. 
Theresa May’s claim that she will deliver Brexit on time should be as worrying as having a builder tell you they’re going to finish your extension on time; when it’s the last scheduled day of work and they haven’t even managed to draw a plan. 
Millions of Remainers will never forgive you for Brexit. You and your party have betrayed our country. Millions of Leave voters won’t forgive you either when they realise what you have done. History won’t be kind to you. 
Brexit BOMBSHELL: How John Major ‘LACKED HONESTY’ over Maastricht Treaty  
Memo to Donald Tusk: Those who campaigned for Brexit did indeed have a plan...It was for the United Kingdom to leave the European Union. 
Throughtout this entire Brexit process, people need to understand that Theresa May has done her utmost to deliver the best possible deal - for the EU. 
Brussels chiefs have urged Theresa May to accept Jeremy Corbyn's Brexit olive branch 
Both Mr Juncker and Mr Tusk have welcomed Mr.Corbyn's letter to Mrs.May on breaking the #Brexit impasse, it's obvious May's negotiations are finished, she must now make a decision, she either backs it or call #GE or a public vote, she/MSM cannot blame #Labour anymore. 
“Rather than do what we agreed to do at conference, let’s ignore 89% of our membership and the majority of people in the country and usher in Tory Brexit, which will impoverish us for a generation.”What you’re really saying is “why lead?” 
Corbyn wants to deliver Brexit and end Freedom of Movement. That isn't heaven. It's another shade of hell.  
By the way, Labour's Brexit plan is strikingly similar the 'Shared Market' plan devised by the @IPPR thinktank, chaired by @TomKibasi - so kudos to them! 
Brexit has shown how fragile democracy really is.  A wafer thin majority obtained by gerrymandering and criminality has brought one of the strongest, most proposerous, and advanced countries on the planet to its knees and we may never recover. 
Piers Morgan SLAMS EU 'CLOWNS' and claims Brussels will push UK towards HARD Brexit  
Anna Soubry, the darling of the #FBPE #PeoplesVote #PV voted against the only proposed amendment last week which would have allowed parliament a vote on a 2nd referendum. She doesn't care about Brexit, in fact she voted several times for a referendum on EU membership.  
So Labour's plan for a soft Brexit has EU support. There's no Parliamentary majority for a 2nd referendum, even if Labour backed it. Rather than look for excuses to create a new party and split the anti-Tory vote, which will mean a harder Brexit, why not unite behind this plan?  
Brexit — The Flag Will Do  
If you are a Labour MP and don’t want a Labour government led by Jeremy Corbyn to end austerity, the health & housing crisis & stop a Tory Brexit, then party members are 100% entitled to hold you accountable under the party rules. Also, you should probably find something else. 
If Britain wants to delay #Brexit, it will need the approval of all other 27 EU members. France would oppose a delay without a plan, says one official  
In light of the complete dog’s dinner May has made of #Brexit and the fact that her proposals have been roundly rejected by both Parliament and the public, this poll is clearly bogus.  
Lots of outrage over“the people who promoted Brexit without a sketch of a plan deserve a special place in Hell”from people who promoted Brexit without a sketch of a plan.Get used to it. You’ve been called out. This is how the world sees you, and always will. 
The centrist trilemma:A) EU negotiating positions are basically laws of nature.B) Corbyn's Brexit plan is an entire bakery of unicorn cakes!C)  
One of my rules of business - after 7pm, anything that can wait until tomorrow should; before 6pm, anything that can be done today shouldSo I’m not writing my column on why it’s such a bad idea for Labour to propose hard-lite-Brexit until the morning. But early! 
May gave Tusk a telling off for his 'offensive' hell comments about Brexiters ...but when Boris Johnson compared the French to Nazis, May laughed it off as 'Boris' banter.That's Brexit Britain all over...it's ok for us to be offensive but no one can offensive about us. 
Why haven't you mentioned the EU fully supporting Corbyn's Brexit plan @jonsnowC4 ?Going on about that poxy turncoat @OwenSmith_MP being in despair instead. The crying little mole can do one, Jon. He doesn't speak for Labour & members don't want him. 
A majority of MPs in parliament don’t believe Brexit is in the country’s  interestA majority of the House of Lords don’t believe Brexit is in the country’s interest A majority of British Business does not believe Brexit is in the country’s interest. 
Keep your nose out, stop trying to split our country in two you nasty, nasty dictator. Corbyn is a fool, as is his idiotic suggestions. We voted LEAVE #WTOBrexitNowBBC News - Brexit: EU's Guy Verhofstadt welcomes Jeremy Corbyn's offer to Theresa May  
Sitting down with @RGrosjean earlier and he jokingly blamed Brexit for the absence of French media at today's Haas launch. I think he might be a Remain Grosjean. 
I was not in the least dismayed. I was rather amused. The way the #Brexit brigade have behaved is a disgrace. Tusk & rest of EU have been remarkably restrained. 
John Major is absolutely right. A generation of young people (and many older people too) will never forgive #Brexiters & others who facilitate #BrexitYoung people 'will neither forget nor forgive' politicians responsible for Brexit, warns John Major  
BREXIT IS NOT ONLY ABOUT TRADE, FFS!Why is nobody talking about peace and security in Europe? About the threat Brexit poses? It could be a catalyst for the disintegration of Europe, a real threat to peace.Our behaviour is unacceptable. 
Utterly deluded.We waited over 40 years to finally have a referendum and have our say…. and we had our say at last.Biggest vote in history and one of the largest turnouts.It  deserves  respect  
.@jonsnowC4 on fire  on @Channel4News asking tough questions of #Labour politicians defending #Corbyn & his facilitating @theresa_may #Brexit He wont thank me but well said @OwenSmith_MP being honest about the harm Brexit will do to the UK & making case for a @peoplesvote_uk 
It won’t deliver a stable majority in parliament as long as you are planning to leave the EU. The referendum was fraudulent and un-democratic.  We have been held to ransom for far too long.  EU citizens in the UK and Brits in Europe have been ignored. This cannot go on.  
Theresa May went to Brussels and was told Jeremy Corbyn’s plan for Brexit was better than hers.  
When your bitterly divorced parents are forced to pose together in your wedding photographs. #Brexit pic.twitter.com/l2BB6AlrxQ 
Liam Fox's solution to eliminating a hard Irish border is to install a massive surveillance apparatus Big Brother would be proud of. Yet another secret Brexit plan being cooked up behind closed doors.  
 We're only 50 days away from Brexit. The UK government still has no viable plan for breaking the impasse, Labour flip-flops and abdicates responsibility, while we're clear and united: we oppose this job-wrecking, isolationist Tory Brexit. 
It turns out that #Seaborne has no ships, no official T&Cs and now we hear no port, but they was given the contract on Christmas eve! This stinks of #Corruption - who were they competing with? #BrexitShambles #Brexit #indyref2 
'We're in a FOG!' Bill Cash LASHES OUT at EU's attempt to 'manipulate' Brexit outcome  
Owen  Smith on channel 4 news “why are we not opposing Brexit?   
Once we've scuppered the ridiculousness of Brexit how do we help the poorly educated English nationalists to stop being such serfs  and stand up as citizens with rights rather than be cap doffing subjects celebrating their ignorance 
Theresa May and the Conservatives have taken the UK on a path which has the primary purpose of benefitting the Tory Party.National Interest, in spite of what they claim, has always been a secondary issue. The Brexit mess is on them - no one else. #ShameOnYouTories! #bbcqt 
Young people voted for Labour in their droves in 2017. That had very little to do with Brexit (whether Remain/Leave) and everything to do with the fact that our generation is being shafted by the Tories and that our quality of life is pretty shit...  
Chris Leslie tells @Channel4News that his “patience has now worn very thin”, he is on the vergeNext up, ice cream vendor, Owen Smith, goes all left-wing “against a Tory Brexit” and for equality, and apparently is staying in Labour after all #RedTories 
The referendum was called by a liberal EU-supporting prime minister who dubbed himself the 'heir to Blair'. And then 17.4m people voted to take us out. It is dishonest to portray this as the exclusive project of a small band of hard-right Tories.  
If Corbyn wanted to help deliver Brexit he would have offered May things she could accept but he offered her things she can't agree to without splitting her party. Both Owen Smith and Jon Snow know that but pretend otherwise for their own agenda. #C4News 
A global laughingstock. The NHS being eyed to be sold off. EU nationals who have lived and worked here for years being told they aren't our countrymen. Neo Nazis roaming the streets. An MP murdered in coldblood.This is the vandalism I found in my country under Brexit. 
Is there ANYONE in the UK who can hold May, Corbyn, Farage, Johnson / Gove and the rest of the Brexit liars to account?They all need to be in prison. 
Owen Smith on #C4News quite rightly calling out Jeremy Corbyn for ignoring the Labour membership, the Labour Conference and the PLP. Corbyn wants Brexit more than May wants Brexit, and will do whatever he can to facilitate it, without taking responsibility for it. 
Every single British politician whining on about Tusks remarks please answer these questions. What investigations are ongoing with regard to the promoters of Brexit and the illegality fraud and manipulation? What was the plan? In what way does #Brexit make the UK safer. 
Make this one big please by voting and retweeting.POLL: Should Theresa May adopt Jeremy Corbyn’s 5 point Brexit plan, involving a Customs Union, which received plaudits from Mr Tusk and Mr Verhofstadt earlier today?#BBCQT #BrexitChaos @theresa_may @jeremycorbyn 
Labour's split widens when Owen Smith denounces(correctly) Brexit as a "nativist right wing ideological programme" while Jeremy Corbyn backs a soft Brexit after his 2009 Ukipish European Frankenstein/empire attack emerged. David Cameron's wrecking two political parties 
NEW Donald Tusk tells Theresa May that Jeremy Corbyn plan could end Brexit deadlock  
Congressman David Joyce of Ohio supporting the Irish Governments postion of the importance of no return to a Hard Border in Ireland due to #Brexit  
It really is time for the grown ups to take over..Donald Tusk Told Theresa May That Jeremy Corbyn's Plan Could Be "A Promising Way" Out Of The Brexit Impasse  
The #MaastrichtTreaty was signed 27 years ago today. #JohnMajor, who is now demanding a #SECONDreferendum, refused to give the public a say...  Here's his much superior predecessor #MargaretThatcher ripping Maastricht to shreds!  #StandUp4Brexit #BREXIT 
Fred @Frederika_R chose to build a life in the UK because she loved its openness & inclusivity. Being an EU citizen, she never had to think about taking British citizenship. But since the referendum, she’s now concerned about her family and all others living in uncertainty.   /1  
BBC faces Brexit bias accusations over £4m in EU funding 
France would oppose any British request to delay Brexit unless presented a credible political solution, a French government official says  
Steve Bell on Jeremy Corbyn's Brexit offer to Theresa May #TheresaMay #Tories #Brexit #BrexitShambles - political cartoon gallery in London  
The only way the country can come together is if politics focuses on the things we ALL agree on: Fixing the NHS, regional inequality, poverty...Any Brexit option means we spend the next 5 years negotiating a trade deal with the EU (+ decades for others), making that impossible. 
You might call it hell, but this is post no-deal Brexit Britain Theresa. There's a way out of it though & today the EU have been pointing it out - Jeremy Corbyn's Brexit! Take his offer, #CorbynsLetter is a pathway to a deal that is capable of passing in Parliament. 
Labour should-Keep pushing 5 demands on Brexit-If May doesn’t accept then vote down Brexit deal-If deal is defeated then call vote of no confidence-Keep repeating (unless May accepts)-If we end up with no deal because of Tory stubbornness then call vote of no confidence 
Don't believe it when Brexiters tell you #Cornwall's fishermen are all raring for #Brexit. Many are now well aware that it threatens their livelihoods - see video above.@Scientists4EU @MollyMEP @DeborahMeaden @Andrew_Adonis @GuitarMoog @DavidLammy @Haggis_UK @JasonJHunter 
Imagine an Opposition that knew & owned the EU relationship was central to our future. BrItain, an open trading nation,is in 50 days to trade with no substitute for the EU and its deals. Brexit promises - nothing could be easier -were lies. Fox et al deserve shredding. Instead? 
The FM is currently promoting Scotland’s name globally in both America & Canada. Articulating on gender equality, and on Women World Leaders. Truly a Scottish workhorse. Whilst the PM takes her rejected Brexit deal back to the EU. Promoting isolation. Truly out of touch globally! 
Described as ‘heavenly’ by @guyverhofstadt and now this. Get rid of the Tories and let’s have @jeremycorbyn & @Keir_Starmer round the table instead.Donald Tusk Told Theresa May That Jeremy Corbyn's Plan Could Be ''A Promising Way'' Out Of Brexit Impasse  
Brexit BETRAYAL: Theresa May 'CONSIDERING' Jeremy Corbyn's customs union plan admits No10  
This horror show that is Nigeria {} is not a dimension but a dementian. Not a spiritual space but a zone of terror against Christians and Jews. #StayAtHome16Feb2019Boycott #Referendum Make your silent vote work. All eyes on #Biafra! 
Unfortunately when Labour enabled their Tory friends in Scotland to keep out the SNP, the result was imbeciles like Ross Thomson ending up in Westminster.  Any stress now is mainly due to being out of his depth rather than anything to do with Brexit. 
EU objectives:-1 Keep UK paying as much as possible for as long as possible.2 Prevent UK implementing competitive trade deals.3 Discourage other EU countries from leaving.Shackling the UK to a CU is a win for the EU, a humiliation for the UK, & isn't Brexit.  
You div Iain - he was referring to the organ grinders of brexit not the monkeys  
Before Brexit happened, I really didn't know much about the people in charge of the EU. But now I really like Donald Tusk.  
John Major says Brexit is the first time a UK Govt has presided over a policy of impoverishing its own people. This from the man who ran the ERM fiasco which impoverished millions and gave up economic sovereignty too. 
Good article in The Spectator today by Thomas Kielinger of Die Welt saying the EU needs a Brexit deal and knows it - but fails to understand why our seafaring, adventurous nation which they love, wants to go it alone. Land-locked continentals sing from a different hymn sheet. 
Tusk and Corbyn appear to be colluding to deliver a fake Brexit that nobody wants and nobody voted for.  
Today in Bodmin, we spoke with a fisherman from Looe, who was delivering his catch to a wholesaler.He exports most of his catch to the EU and is not optimistic about the prospects for his business if #Brexit disrupts shipments of fresh crab & lobster & puts tariffs on UK fish.  
BoE cuts growth forecast to 1.2% - lowest rate since financial crisis. One in four chance of recession on back of Brexit and global slowdown   
This is true. There’s nothing socialist about Brexit. ‘Workers of the world unite’ - except for those in the 27 nations that we’re walking away from in this boneheaded disaster zone.  
.@Telegraph cartoon#TheresaMay #Juncker #Brexit  
Anyone got a view re the Brexit point of no return date?ie The date after which the U.K. will HAVE to get an extension from the EU EVEN IF a deal is agreed.Needless to say, after this date virtually all negotiating leverage will be lost. Spoiler: It will be quite soon. 
Owen Smith: “Brexit is a right wing ideology.”Would you say that to Dennis Skinner’s face? 
Theresa May went to Brussels to achieve the impossible and - guess what! - she found that it was beyond her.Sketch here, on yet another record shattering Brexit low point  
A Downing Street official says Theresa May's office is looking at Labour leader Jeremy Corbyn's Brexit proposals but there are considerable points of difference 
The Queen's chaplain said it's only since the Brexit vote that she has experienced racist abuse in the UK.  
Jesus I'm tired now. Alongside the misogynistic comments about my "outburst" I'm banging my head against the wall with people who think current austerity and Brexit are exclusive. I know austerity well enough to know it will only get massively worse thank you. 
Why disaster capitalists are praying for a no-deal Brexit | George Monbiot  
British public don’t want your deal or any brexit at all. The majority are #remainYou triggered A50 w/o a plan & spent the last 2.5yrs with contradictory red lines & no consensus. You’re a hypocrite ruining the UK & stripping rights#specialplaceinhell 
To those comparing Corbyn to ERG: Donald Tusk backs Corbyn's proposals to block the Brexit impasse, while reserves a 'special place in hell' for those on the Conservative right without a plan. Can you spot the difference now?! 
Labour MPs must not be fooled by Theresa May’s Brexit promisesCorbyn is making a monumental mistake and it will cost Labour dearly 
'Brexit is ultimately a nativist, nostalgic, rightwing, ideological programme, that was sold on lies, that was deceitfully won, and unfortunately is going to go through.' 
No wonder Tories want to deflect from #Brexit warnings right now. Check the words and forecasts from the Bank of England. U.K. treasury know the economic damage that will be inflicted on the UK & Scotland of a no deal Brexit. @scotgov constructive proposals repeatedly ignored. 
In one letter, Corbyn's made more progress negotiating a deal than three Brexit secretaries and one UK Prime Minister over two and a half years. #GeneralElectionNow #GTTO 
The year is 2049. Wangland is in its 30th consecutive year of recession. The Tories are hobbling into their 39th year of government.Labour MPs announce that, unless their 100 year old leader backs a referendum next year, that's it, they're definitely going to be very cross. 
The Bank of England has downgraded our growth forecast this year from 1.7% to 1.2%. That’s still higher than the Germans expect of their economy. They have cut back their growth forecast this year to 1%. In fact world growth is facing a slowdown — but hardly due to Brexit. 
.@yanisvaroufakis responds to @eucopresident: "Yanis Varoufakis nails why Donald Tusk belongs in the same place in hell as Brexit leaders" 
Don't give any ground. We don't want this deal,  she is ignoring UK electorate and the  2016 referendum involved illegal activities, which should have nullifified the result.  
One really has to step back and be impressed that despite the Tory clusterf**k of Brexit, more than twice as many people want May to remain as PM than want Corbin to take over.  
I have signed the People’s Vote Petition to demand a vote on the Brexit deal.We, the people, have the democratic right to determine our own future:  #PeoplesVote via @peoplesvote_uk 
BIAFRA: NO REFERENDUM, NO ELECTION IN BIAFRALAND: NO REFERENDUM, NO ELECTION IN BIAFRALAND PREAMBLE: Here is a resolution reached on Sunday 3rd February 2019 by the Coordinators and Representatives of Biafran Students in Abia State Polytechnic in Aba,…  
BREXIT IN: 50 DAYS. 50 SECONDS.@theresa_may is hell-bent on delivering Brexit but the EU insists the #backstop is non-negotiable. Is she stuck in a purgatory of her own making? #Brexit  
May spent an age telling us she was the one to handle #Brexit, she mocked & ridiculed the idea of Corbyn leading talks with Brussels.  Today the EU effectively told her that's exactly what they want. The importance of this moment cannot be underestimated. #TheRealPrimeMinister 
Mum, who voted Leave: "They've been going after Tusk all day on the radio. But he's right."Me: "I'm curious. What do you understand him to have said?""That people who voted for Brexit are going to hell.""...Oh no. No no no no no!" 
Was ‘on the verge’ then ‘poised’ now ‘considering’ : BBC News - Anti-Brexit MP Owen Smith 'considering' quitting Labour  
Jeremy Corbyn’s proposed Brexit deal is is not in accordance with Labour policy & would threaten British jobs & security. It’s trying to split the difference with May & Rees-MoggI don’t think it’s a good idea to split the difference with right-wing Tories when they are wrong 
THAT #bbcqt formula in full:1 x audience of leavers demand we "get on with Brexit NOW" 4 x MPs toe the party line1 x right wing populist spews nonsense: Hartley-Brewer, Farage, Oakeshott, Ferrari 1 x host lets populist whip the audience into a gammony frenzyNO THANKS   
2. But political belief in much of govt is that if May moves to softer Brexit to get it thro House she would not be able to govern after - getting deal thro that way would lead to core of Brexiteers pulling stumps - game over 
There's been a lot of talk today about a possible breakaway party forming to stop Brexit. Listen again to @lucianaberger's comments to @peston last night, could she be about to leave?  
The crucial part of @jeremycorbyn letter to Labour members tonight... May can't sign up to Labour customs union proposal because it would split Tories. Hence general election and all other options including second referendum still on the table...  
I don’t support Jeremy Corbyn’s proposed Brexit deal. It would be economically harmful, make Britain a rule taker & jeopardise our securityBut there’s no chance of Mrs May supporting it either, because it involves too much co-operation with the EU.  So it isn’t going anywhere 
The #MaastrichtTreaty was signed 27 years ago today. John Major, who is now demanding a SECOND #Referendum, refused to give the public a say.. Here's his much superior predecessor Margaret Thatcher ripping Maastricht to shreds! #WTO#Brexit#WTOBrexitNow 
Breaking News: Donald Tusk advises Theresa May to adopt Labour's Brexit plan as detailed by Corbyn’s letter, to get out of the Brexit hole she has dug for herself.This is huge and a massive humiliation for May. But that won't stop @OwenSmith_MP @ChrisLeslieMP et al slating JC 
Sky Sources: European Council president Donald Tusk has told Prime Minister Theresa May Jeremy Corbyn's plan to remain in a Customs Union "would be a promising way out" of the current Brexit impasse 
Currently in Venice, where no one seems to think I’m a bigoted little Englander and most of the Italians I speak to are slightly jealous of Brexit.  
Martin Wolf: The Brexit delusion of creating ‘Singapore upon Thames’  
So Euro Council President Tusk has had a proper job? Spiv metal trader, Nigel Farage, famous for losing elections, PFL's & fiddling expenses, once told MEPs that none had ever had a proper job, before giving them the benefit of his Toytown economics; little wonder they laughed! 
The best thing you could do for the British public is to #RevokeA50 given the crime and corruption that forged the referendum result and the obvious destruction that your Brexit has brought upon the UK. 
hence why so many CLPs submitted motions calling for an emergency conference to update Brexit policy, but Labour have refused to allow one. is that so they can just make up a new policy themselves yeah? so much for 'the membership will determine policy, not me' eh @jeremycorbyn? 
Exc: The UK government has fallen well short of recruiting the 1,000 border staff it promised to hire for no-deal Brexit because there’s confusion over where they’ll actually be needed  Great story from my colleague @tpgcolson 
Is Brexit destroying the international appeal of British universities? No. According to the head of UCAS: ‘in this time of uncertainty, it’s welcome news to see more EU and international students wanting to come and study in the UK.’ Chinese applications are up by one third. 
EXC Home Office has failed to hire 1,000 Border Force officials it planned to hire before Brexit, leading to concerns about serious staff shortages in the event of no-deal.  
Farage The Man........ EU FEARS: David Davis warns Brussels are scared to DELAY Brexit because of FarageBrexit news: Brussels are scared to DELAY Brexit because of Farage | UK | News |  
“Cameron -the father of #Brexit, May the mother and Corbyn -the midwife!” @campbellclaret always worth a read. 
You do have to laugh when you see media outlets use the phrase “BREAKING” to announce that Juncker has told the UK that Brexit negotiations will not be reopened. It is quite simply the opposite of breaking. It is UNbreaking. In every sense of the word  
If Owen Smith and other dissatisfied Labour Remainers do (at last!) leave the party, journalists owe it to their audience to ask about more than just Brexit. What's their economic platform? What's their plan to tackle climate change? What do they think about university fees? 
Is a "public vote on a deal or proposition that can command the support of the Commons" a referendum on Remain? Or a further opportunity for Corbyn to flip the bird at Labour Party members?  
Labour MPs must not be fooled by Theresa May’s Brexit promises | Faiza Shaheen  
2/ @IanDunt demolishes the idea that all you need to do with Brexit is simply believe harder. #BBCRadio2 
The far right is attacking Europe and attempting to destroy the peaceful co-operation that has characterised European life for the past 70 years. Brexit can't be seen in isolation from this - it's part of a far right internationalist putsch.   
Please don’t on my behalf. Thanks. Can you at least acknowledge #Brexit us NOT the will of the people and that is damaging to the whole of the UK. You have a duty of care to act in the best interests of the country. Do so. #remain is the only answer 
There just weren’t enough Brexit unicorns to power the sun over those uplands.   
"I think we're in an incredibly grave situation with a group of people who, frankly, I wouldn't send for the messages" - Scotland's Brexit Secretary @Feorlean has called on the Prime Minister to rule out a no-deal #Brexit and extend Article 50.  
NEW: Donald Tusk told Theresa May today that Jeremy Corbyn's Brexit plan could be a promising way out of the current impasse  
Some more YouGov Brexit tracker polling of LAB voters for Corbyn and Milne to ignore.  
Breaking: Labour now has a - 7 point Brexit plan.  
Great to meet business leaders in Cumbria this afternoon. The same concerns about Brexit resonate up and down the country. All want reassurance on the route to remain. The logical way is a #PeoplesVote 
I am now on annual leave and heading to Japan for two weeks for a belated honeymoon/to investigate JEFTA Geographical Indication compliance on behalf of @alanbeattie.My Brexit prediction: withdrawal agreement still not resolved by time I get back. 
So… Labour’s Brexit offer to Theresa May1) Fails Labour’s six tests because it doesn’t offer the ‘exact same benefits'2) Says nothing on free movement.3) Presumes you can trust Theresa May. Who it props up.4) Makes us a rule-taker with no say so what’s the bloody point? 
The British public do NOT want Brexit! Stop this madness. You are betraying the 63% who did NOT vote for this. Exit from Brexit. #peoplesvote is the only way forward #stopbrexit 
The French government has published the emergency decree (ordonnance) setting out rights of British people living in France in event of  a "no deal" #Brexit. We will be given time to obtain carte de sejour and access to health care for up to two years.  
A little glimpse into why JC and Labour have moved on BrexitInternal polling app shocked Team Corbyn - people didn't like his refusal to talk  
.@JLongworthLML: A WTO Brexit would be "very good for the many, not the few" Save £39bn and walk away from the Brussels bullies @  
Jeremy: Hi. Anything you need me for?Seumas: Don't make me laugh. Oh! There is something. Sign this.J: OK. What is it?S: Since your letter to May's gone down like a cup of cold sick with the members, this one trots out Keir's 2nd referendum not ruled out guff.J: Clever. 
Tánaiste @simoncoveney did a #Bloomberg interview with @VonnieQuinn today on his current visit to the US, on Brexit & on engagement with prominent Irish American politicians on the need to protect the Northern Ireland peace process  
Ladies and gentlemen, class warrior and arch #Remainer @DavidLammy with a casual £175,635 of expenses last year.Including claiming for four items under a quid. That £77,000 salary clearly ain’t enough for Dave.Do as I say, not as I do #brexit #NoDeal #WTO 
Kate has it spot on.The whole Brexit debate centres on the CU. The thing they promised we’d leave.How many ways can politicians devise to disguise continued membership of it? Backstops, codicils?The political dishonesty is revolting. There are so few of them like this  
Welcome to Brexit, lady. This is what you campaigned for. Enjoy higher prices and less freedom. 
You have got to be kidding me.You campaigned for this, you and your Brexiter cronies are to blame for this. We said this would happen, and all the other million inconveniences and ridiculous own goals of Brexit.Now you need to own it#YouWonGetOverIt 
Ahead of the second vote on May's Brexit deal, we're going out campaigning this weekend. We'll be running stalls, knocking on doors and writing to MPs. Find an event near you and join in!  
Alex Morton: If Brexit is impossible, what is the point of politics? | Conservative Home  
She's lying again (the Brexit disease). Most of us agree 100% with Tusk. 
Donald Trump is an important example of how quickly human rights can be rolled back. The LGBT+ community and its supporters have worked tirelessly to ensure that their human rights are extended and protected. WE will not allow #Brexit to strip that away.  
“Does [Labour] enable a Tory Brexit, which will harm young and working class people, or does Labour follow the wishes of 100K members like me, & support a #PeoplesVote.”@ChukaUmunna quotes #FFS co-founder @Just_RichardB on Labour enabling Brexit.   
Brexiter MPs and enablers - deny us a say and you will get your crappy Brexit, your pompous (and with this Parliament) dangerous ‘sovereignty’, your dishonest, mean immigration policy, your costly, shaming isolationism. It will be all yours. The stink may never wash off you. 
Luciana Berger: "I believe my constituents will judge me on my record and skills in representing them in Parliament.  I will not hide my long held view that Brexit will be a disaster for the people of Liverpool Wavertree and wider country."  
Today's been solid..- Corbyn's put immense pressure on the Tories with his #Brexit letter- Berger's constituency are holding her to account- A new poll suggests the idea of a Tory 7 pt lead is wrongSo you can be sure you'll hear nothing about any of that on #bbcqt tonight 
No, that’s not true. Pontypridd voted to Remain. And the Remain majority has grown since. We’re Labour in Pontypridd and we know the Tories’ Brexit project will only benefit the Tories.  
Top German economists have told the EU to tear up the Irish backstop and ditch its ideological demands in Brexit talks, calling instead for a flexible Europe of concentric circles that preserves friendly ties with the UK.@gerardjasper@aley_aa@BrexitKnight@MsmAnti 
Didn't you vote to trigger Article 50, rubbish a second referendum, talk about internal immigration controls and once argue to scrap the single market. that sounds all over the place to me? How's about you back the policy of the party of which you are a member? 
The 2nd referendum brigade think they can magically make a 2nd ref happen despite the maths in Parliament not adding up, and then seem convinced Remain wld win by a landslide. They are the epitome of arrogance. As a remain voter, I'm embarrassed to be associated with them. 
I love the fact that so many people see the point I was trying to make! @eucopresident @donaldtusk - check out how much respect you have here among those who see through Brexit-peddlers lies and false promises! #Brexit  
Labour MEP Julie Ward has said on BBC that we’ve seen a massive drop in our GDP in the last two and a half years as a result of Brexit. On the contrary, the economy has grown since then and next year the IMF predicts it will grow faster than Germany, Italy and Japan. Idiot! 
YOU’RE ALL INVITED TO A VERY SPECIAL PARTY.OCCASION:The independence of the UK, AKA #Brexit.DATE:29th March 2019.TIME:11.00pm on the dot.VENUE:Every single street, open space and building in the UK.FEEL FREE TO SHARE AND BRING ALL YOUR FRIENDS! 
if you'd told me 2 years ago that a cambridge head of economics would be stark bollock naked doing a ted talk to fight brexit I'd.... well I'd probably have nodded and said "yeah, 2016 was pretty crazy that sounds plausible" 
. @guyverhofstadt on the EU welcoming last night's letter by Jeremy Corbyn on #Brexit 
Blairite @OwenSmith_MP hints he could quit Labour over Jeremy Corbyn's Brexit stanceDon’t let us stop you, Owen Your constituency voted Brexit by 62%, which you have ignored, showing that you are out of touch with your voters   
Boycotting of election, is another way to stop tyranny regimes, and send a strong message to the international community's that, you can't force an indigenous people to stay in a forceful union.Referendum is a democratic process recognizes all over....., 
i don't want Norway Plus; i want to Remain! this is the trouble. we can't have a #PeoplesVote until we have a viable Brexit deal, BUT having a viable Brexit deal removes the government's motivation for giving us a #PeoplesVote. 
"I'm clear that I am going to deliver Brexit, I'm going to deliver it on time, that's what I'm going to do for the British public - I'll be negotiating hard in the coming days to do just that." – PM @Theresa_May 
I won’t be watching the horror show that is #BBCQT tonight, but I can guarantee, even after Labour’s Brexit position finally being understood, at least one audience member will moan about Labour’s Brexit silence, to a large cheer from an audience of Gammonistas. 
From Brussels to Dublin and Belfast, Greens stand together in solidarity against climate change and the devastating threat of a no deal #Brexit  
This week Theresa May was meeting with millionaires as Brexit chaos continues. Meanwhile @jeremycorbyn is meeting people across the country. Today he’s in Redditch - with crowds signing up to campaign for @UKLabour and @redditchrebecca. #ByTheMany 
Why don't you like the EU? #Brexit #StandUp4Brexit #LeaveMeansLeave 
Looks like she's lying again, the only people I've seen dismayed are thin skinned tory MPs, you know the same ones who've been throwing disgusting abuse at the EU for years, the ones who promoted #Brexit without a plan, actually their plan was no deal all along. 
Corbyn’s Brexit plan betrays younger voters – and they won’t forgive him | @ChukaUmunna 
Many people (inc me) WANT to trust in Corbyn's vision... to believe Jeremy's socialist policies will put the welfare of British families before pure ideology.Corbyn knows ANY Brexit makes us poorer so if he wants our trust...No more "here's how to do Brexit"; PUBLIC VOTE NOW!  
1. Tusk condemned the promoters of Brexit, so that’s you, not voters. #OwnYourShit2. ‘Vandalism’?nonocantbreathestoppitstoppithitmeonthebackorsomething 
Theresa May looking relaxed and comfortable in her own skin in Brussels today. Either that or she's in the process of rebooting. Difficult to tell really!#Brexit  
Dear @theresa_may No, Daddy in Heaven won’t love you more if you “deliver Brexit on time” by driving the country over a cliff-edge. You will go down in history as the most selfish, headstrong and reckless Prime Minister the country has ever had. 
The Prime minister has been through HELL trying hard to work with these jumped up EU poundshop bean counters.The nation now stands resolute with the Prime minister to deliver her promise of Brexit means Brexit on 29th March.Go Brexit!  
37 seconds that will make every opponent of Jeremy Corbyn weep. The EU just gave a massive thumbs up to Corbyn’s Brexit Strategy  
Farage: EU ‘Scared’ of WTO Clean Brexit  
Stand up for Brexit and Stand up #ForTheNation 
"I'll do anything for Brexit, but I won't do that"  
I’m proud London has been named the top city in Europe for international technology talent once again. Whatever the outcome of Brexit, I'll do everything I can to ensure London continues to attract the very best in global talent & innovation. #LondonIsOpen 
President of the #EuropeanCouncil Donald #Tusk, is talking about people having worked for #Brexit having a special place in hell. Dear British people, Tusk doesn’t represent #Poland, he represents #Germany & has been a lapdog of #Kohl/#Merkel since the early 1990s. #Bribes 
Brexit is like a couple of 46 years getting a divorce on a dare. 
Owen Smith, who lost on a second referendum platform during the #ChickenCoup, seems to have a very short memory. 
Apparently if you’re anti-brexit, you’re a Tory. Wow. I don’t think a lot of people hassling me truly understand how frustrating it is to have not had a say and to watch a highly flawed vote fuelled by the right explode & jeopardise my future. My whole life has been Tory mistakes 
The EU is trying to play UK politicians against each other in the hope that the government surrenders and conducts a 'Brexit in name only', like the one Jeremy Corbyn is calling for, where the EU makes the rules but the UK gets no say.  
I'm *maxit* with *Brexit* today !Taking a rest from politics this evening.Out for supper & a trip to the Theatre (well the local Am Dram Society actually who are very very good ) 
Tusk suggested that Corbyn’s Brexit plan might be a way out of the impasse.  May did not respond to this point. 
just saw a tweet comparing soft brexit to ‘soft apartheid’. it’s very much a losing battle against these people isn’t it 
Widespread dismay ?? My god I hope he could hear the majority of us in the UK cheering. Bravo Mr Tusk. Mrs May has ignored the #Remain voice completely and is prepared to push through an unsafe unplanned Brexit at any cost. She does not speak for the majority 
Labour will be punished by voters if it gives any backing at all to Brexit — Labour would lose 11 leaver seats by opposing Brexit, instead of 45 if it supports it. 
In Spain, trying to dialogue with Catalonia is considered as "high treason". Thus you should not be surprised that organizing a referendum is considered a "rebellion", and that tuesday begins a trial where sentences of up to 25 years in prison are asked. 
May has today once again to deliver Brexit "on time." She said the same thing to cabinet on Tuesday. If she means it, it's dangerous and delusional but seriously what one Earth are the sensible members of her Cabinet doing? No resignations? Nobody daring to speak out? 
If there were a Referendum on the NHS in which 52% of the public advocated abolition, following illegal spending on the anti-NHS campaign by private healthcare providers, I assume Corbyn would shrug his shoulders and support a 'health first' private insurance system. No? 
What about a Windfall Tax for all those rich MPs that voted for Brexit and profited from it? Could set it at say, 150%? 
As well as #brexit - there's anything to fix - housing, domestic violence, food banks, education, Universal Credit, disability discrimination, frozen pensions, environmental &  online laws, NHS - 'Commons finishes four hours early despite Brexit turmoil'  
Theresa May says Donald Tusk’s "hell" remark "caused widespread dismay" in the UK - and says she has held productive talks with EU Commission President Jean-Claude Juncker over reopening Brexit discussions.  
Owen Smith says he might quit Labour over Brexit stance  
Nnamdi KANU at the Battle front.No referendum!!!No election!!!He took his family abroad enjoying himselfStay here and be shouting sit at home.Enjoying his egusi soup in the comfort of his house o, and be telling his gullible supporters to boycott election? Fraud  
“It would be easier to understand the anxiety surrounding Brexit if the majority of UK students who study abroad actually depended on Erasmus+. The reality is, most UK students who decide to study overseas go to countries outside of the EU”READ MORE |  
Enabling a Tory Brexit isn’t representing your communities, it is damaging them. 
you can still go roam in the EU at no extra cost #Brexit #DealOrNoDeal 
Since the referendum, the government has shrouded itself in secrecy regarding Brexit and it has a poor track record on transparency; from the attempt not to publish impact assessments, to the resistance to giving parliament a meaningful vote...... 
Over 60% of the Brexit Statutory Instruments have now been laid. I would like to thank Sir Chris Chope MP for his kind words and all of the civil servants @UKCivilService and Ministers for their work in helping us ensure our statute book is ready for #Brexit  
The people want to get Brexit all over with. But any #Brexit means years of wrangling by MPs followed by years of negotiations with EU.MPs must back a #PeoplesVote, with the option to stay in EU, now they know what an endless Brexit future looks like. 
My mentions are lit up with wingnuts since I dared to criticise Peadar Toibin. Nearly as many as during the referendum campaign. Lads, I didn't argue with loopers then. Why would you imagine I will now? Away with ye, loons. 
She didn’t ask me what I thought of Tusk’s remarks, she told me I was a citizen of nowhere and she won’t hold a people’s vote. However, she’s quite correct, there is widespread dismay - over her handling of the Brexit fiasco,  from start to eventual finish. 
I've written 3 books & a PhD, raced a quad bike in the Sahara, argued with my father about Brexit on several occasions & lectured on Tennyon while ripped to the tits on post-surgery drugs and ABSOLUTELY NONE of this required as much STEELY DETERMINATION as growing out a pixie cut 
Many of us never campaigned before. Right-wing movements, injustice, Brexit, violation of Human Rights, xenophobic rhetoric or the birth of a child were triggers for many to get involved, to speak up. What was your #TriggerToGetActive - where, when & how? Pls tell us about it 
An angry Leave voter admitted "I don't know what I'm talking about" before accusing James O'Brien of having God Complex.@mrjamesob | #Brexit 
Labour MPs have just been sent this on Whatsapp by Corbyn’s office, trying to reassure them that 2nd referendum is still on the table  
When your Tinder date is going really badly but you’ve already agreed to go for dinner. #Brexit  
Brexit BOMBSHELL: How John Major ‘LACKED HONESTY’ over Maastricht Treaty  
This morning the Friends of Ireland met for a briefing with Irish Deputy Prime Minister and Minister for Foreign Affairs @simoncoveney on #Brexit and its implications on the Irish border, the current status of the Irish peace process, & Irish-American relations. Photo: @martykatz 
Don't worry, citizens. This is only a prediction. Unlike all those Brexit doom stories, which are definitely true. 
French warning on #Brexit: France would oppose an extension to Article 50 if Britain was simply procrastinating and didn't have a credible plan, a French source tells us  
EU official close to today’s talks in Brussels tells me the Prime Minister did not make any « concrete proposals today on a way forward », and that she gave no clear answers on how she imagined a « timeline » going forward #Brexit 
You advocated #Brexit.You knew the consequences of #Brexit.You still went ahead and voted for #Brexit.You won. Get over it. Suck it up, buttercup.(You've ruined it for all of us. Don't expect any sympathy.) 
Labour literally telling members a Brexit Deal comes first and only after that might there be a PV.Umm dudes that’s not what they thought Conference agreed. 
May facing awkward questions upon her return from Brussels as Guy Verhofstadt mocks the 6,7,9 votes with which May is claiming a mandate, praises the cross-party approach suggestion from Corbyn, which will cause him trouble, before launching a veiled attack on the ERG lunatics. 
No surprises here.The one fantastic thing about Brexit is that Alyn Smith's gravy train will have well and truly hit the buffers.  
I am not wanting to frighten or worry people but this piece of legislation was being slipped out with NO debate or discussion and no felt I needed to highlight what is going on - #Brexit is a real democratic concern! 
We voted to escape from Brussels telling us what to do.“A cross-party cooperation is the way forward. We welcome the letter Jeremy Corbyn’s written today to offer such a cross-party exit”... because it’d mean staying in the Customs Union. Brexit in name only.#StandUp4Brexit 
Things I am bored of hearing about: Brexit, Chronological Instagram Feeds, ASA Guidelines. 
Tired of weak Labour leadership refusing to back a People's Vote?Liberal Democrats are clear: we oppose Brexit and we want to give the people the final say on the deal, with the option to stay in the EU.Get involved now > 
Poland in solidarity with Great Britain. Is Brexit will be another EU exit indicated in the picture below is the end of the EU @ Nigel_Farage @ theresa_may @ TimmermansEU @ JunckerEU  
The Blairites are planning a split if we don't back a 2nd referendum because they know a 2nd referendum is their chance to kill off the Corbyn project and stay on as Labour MPs. 
Not saying Labour’s Brexit policy is confused, but they’ve just had to send out an explainer to their MPs telling them what it is.  
Why do people keep saying people need to believe in Brexit for it to work?Do lightbulbs stop working if we cease to believe? I think we should be told. 
"You're bombarding us with jargon that makes [no deal Brexit] sound as if it's really easy." That was the challenge @Krishgm put to leading Brexiteer Shanker Singham. 
Memo to Sky’s Beth Rigby: There is no such thing as “a Customs-Union-style Brexit”.  Quite simply, a contradiction in terms. 
So Chuka - can you explain to me - HOW - the five points set out in Corbyn's letter to the PM today - can possibly be described as a Tory Brexit ?It cuts across most - if not all - of May's *red lines*#JustAskingI think - with respect - you need to pause & reflect. 
A no-deal Brexit using WTO rules would be disastrous and Brexiteers claiming otherwise are engaging in make-believe, says @Andrew_Adonis 
With the EU welcoming Labour's brexit, it will put some serious pressure on May to accept it, or call a general election, either way, the Tories are now in a no win situation. Once again Corbyn has done an absolute belter. 
My essay on The Lessons of Brexit in @CER_EU's annual report. UK damaged its own already weak hand by having incompetent ministers & a disunited govt that took 2 years to come up with a plan. EU put politics, principle and precedent ahead of economics. 
The UK would be entitled to €13bn regional funding between 2021-2027 if we stayed in the #EU according to @CPMR_Europe analysis. For #SouthYorkshire this could mean at least €687.5m across that seven year period in our region.Read more here  #Brexit 
The EU are stating what we have known for two years, that it should have been @UKLabour and the @ShadowBrexit Team that should have been negotiating for the country and not @theresa_may the @conservatives and her Brexitshambles. We need a General Election. #Brexit #JC4PM2019 
Theresa May tells reporters: “I’m clear that I’m going to deliver Brexit, I’m going to deliver it on time, that’s what I’m going to do.”Meanwhile the Bank of England comes to *shocking* conclusion no deal will bring about a recession by the end of the year.Obvious stuff, no? 
Brexiteer doesn’t understand the reality of Brexit, part 94... #RoadtoHell 
2016: students, don’t post embarrassing things on social media, you could really harm your career and academic prospects2019: the economics fellow at Caius Cambridge is on stage with her vag fully out to explain why Brexit is bad 
Liam Fox says zero tariffs a ‘possibility’ in no-deal Brexit 
'Brexit is very bad for Polish people'Poland is the most common nationality and non-UK place of birth in Britain. What do Poles think about Brexit?  
But what can you do? Everyone in Brussels think Brits are against Brexit and have simply been duped into voting for it. It’s part of the unsularity of the place 
This has been my experience in Chingford and Woodford Green. Most people also worried about a second referendum as don't want to start arguing with their family members again!!! That said, we shouldn't act like there are no downsides to a soft Brexit, it is damage limitation  
This should be played far & wide..."The ONLY person with a thought through plan is Nicola Sturgeon the First Minister of Scotland"No wonder Westminster HATE'S the SNP!!!Tory MP Says No.10 Should Have Had Brexit Plan  
That's widespread dismay with all those who fit the description of shamelessly promoting #Brexit without a sketch of a plan to carry #Brexit through safely. #PeoplesVoteNow #FinalSayForAll #FBPE 
New piece by me on why it was always going to be difficult to replace all the existing EU free trade agreements post-Brexit, and why the government should have been a bit more honest about this. 
In case of a hard Brexit, the 8,000 Britons living in the Czech Republic will be exempted from regulations for non-EU people until the end of 2020, as long as UK enacts a similar law for the 40,000 Czech nationals residing in Britain.#Reciprocity 
#Tusk will know from social media how many Brits cheered what he had to say about the #Brexit high priests who had no plan. Their place in hell is actually in jail. 
I’ll be on @bbcthisweek tonight telling @campbellclaret why I think that, by blaming Corbyn for brexit, the #peoplesvote have got remainers barking up the wrong tree. (I really hope the puns are worth it, because my trainers are already ruined ) 
a) I voted for Brexit with a plan.( @EFTA4UK )b) I do not believe in hell anyway. 
You raise some interesting points about Brexit.I’d also like to thank you for your solidarity boycott of Gillette, it means a lot. 
European Council president Donald Tusk says there is "no breakthrough in sight" on Brexit and talks will continue 
good of David Lammy to admit it's Remain politicians like him - a majority in the House of Commons - who are frustrating delivery of the Brexit they promised to implement.  
In almost every interview on #Brexit, Q’s focus on what the EU can do to be flexible towards the UK now. Answer: we can’t solve the UK’s disagreements and challenges for them. In fact I thought the whole promise of Brexit was that the UK would be so much better off alone... 
Jeremy Corbyn would have got us a good Brexit deal had he been PM. He wouldn't have insulted our allies, he'd have guaranteed the rights of EU citizens and would have negotiated a UK-wide customs union agreement. The reason why Brexit is a mess is because of this Tory government.  
He wasn't. Those responsible for cheer leading the Brexit vote A) had no expectation of winning, B) had no plan of implementation and C) never came up with one.I believe he is genuinely saddened by our leaving and genuinely angry at the fools who have led us to this juncture. 
No-deal Brexit could revive mobile roaming fees, minister confirms  
When you talk to people in the real world who voted Remain, "Would you settle for a soft Brexit?", they generally regard that as a sensible, reasonable compromise. Only on twitter, and amongst a small grouping of Labour MPs, is this seen as some sort of outrage. 
Meeting PM @theresa_may on how to overcome impasse on #brexit. Still no breakthrough in sight. Talks will continue.  
Foreign Minister @simoncoveney & Congressman Boyle and Former Tainiste ( Deputy Prime Minister) Fitzgerald discussing what he told @FT essentially no Backstop in #Brexit then he as memeber of the Ways and Means ctte who ratify trade agreements,won’t support UK US trade agreement  
U.K. side of the negotiating table. All 6 voted Remain. This is the fundamental problem. #Brexit  
Is this what people really voted #Leave for? Lower standards, less taxes, lower labour laws? 'civil servants examining areas to boost economy through deregulation — environmental standards & reforms to labour laws' after #NoDeal #brexit  via @FinancialTimes 
Factbox: Brexit - What will happen in the British parliament on Feb. 14?  
MAY: I’ll deliver Brexit on time. 50 days to go.  
In the last 24 hours the Labour leadership have 1 - set out their terms for agreeing a Brexit deal with Theresa May2 - ruled out a People's Vote3 - then said a People's Vote is still on the tableConfused? We don't blame you  
I have Brexit speculation exhaustion syndrome. I can no longer bother to even idly speculate on what will happen and when. I don't know, you don't know, the whole thing has been a nightmare of confusion and pointless crystal-ball gazing, time to let it wash over you & wait & see 
Congressman Daniel Timothy Kildee a great support of Ireland and a member of the powerful Ways and Means committee. He is a supporting the BackStop to protect the peace and ensure no hard border in Ireland as part of the Brexit treaty. #Brexit  
Brits travelling in EU will face immediate return of mobile phone roaming charges under no-deal Brexit, government reveals.  
German TV: If the only choice is between no deal or dropping the backstop, shouldn’t the EU give in?Me: There are millions of people in the UK who fight against the spin that these are the only options left. If they are not giving up, I won’t either.#Brexit #PeoplesVote 
A must read for those heading for the cliff. EU has serious capacity when it opts to deploy it. A no-deal Brexit won’t result in a siege. The EU will be more clinical than that | Tom Kibasi | Opinion | The Guardian  
But he didn't, did he? Whether they bothered you or not, his comments were aimed at people like you, rather than the public who voted for Brexit. 
UK Public: Half of us want BrexitEU: You mean youUK Public: Muslims outEU: We don't actually contrUK Public: Also, we're not sending you moneyEU: But we send *you* moUK Public: You heard me, Mohammed. Out. And write a check when you go.EU: ...May: I'd like another drink  
FACT-CHECK: FACT 1: It is Councils who now have the power to decide whether they want to implement workplace parking charges. FACT 2: Levy to be paid by employers, not employees. FACT 3: A Brexit cliff edge is days away which is the real threat to people’s personal finances  
"Let's be clear: the Labour party didn't call the referendum, it campaigned for remain, it delivered the remain ..."  
It's become obvious the US and the UK no longer believe in the Democratic process. The US is trying to overthrow an election and the UK refuses to brexit. Maybe it's time for an intervention. Should the UN step in?  But Venezuela? Really ? Fix yourselves first. Yep  
My dog could also have delivered Brexit by 29th March, by being a shit negotiator at international level, chasing a ball for 2 years, and basically doing fuck all to sort it out. This isn’t an achievement. What do you think @ottocrat @GuitarMoog? 
"I am going to deliver #Brexit, I'm going to deliver it on time" UK PM Theresa May on "robust but constructive" discussions in Brussels 
It must be great to be a Scot Tory, when Brexit threatens to destroy Scotland’s economy, Sinn Feinn are proposing Irish Unity, Ross Thomson is accused of sexual misconduct yet all you can talk about is car parking  in Scotland. A policy ALREADY in place in Tory led England. 
Dear @guyverhofstadt - the team at @LeadNotLeaveUK hope you and your team will also welcome the letter to @theresa_may from our Founder @thatginamiller'Dear Theresa May, your Brexit plan is doomed. Here’s a deal that will work' - Gina Miller  
Theresa May says today she’ll deliver Brexit “on time”. PM has repeatedly promised exit on 29th March. That must happen, Deal or No Deal. 
BRITISH PM MAY SAYS CLEAR THAT I WILL DELIVER BREXIT ON TIME 
UK PM Theresa May says she has told @eucopresident Donald Tusk his "special place in hell" comments are "not helpful and caused widespread dismay" #Brexit  
The BBC has received nearly €5million in funding from the European Union since 2015:  #Brexit 
We can't be too many days away from the sight of a pale-faced Keir Starmer solemnly reassuring us all that ruling out a second referendum doesn't rule out a second referendum. 
"I'm going to deliver Brexit and I'm going to deliver it on time"  says Theresa May after  Brussels talks 
* BREAKING NEWS *@theresa_may confirms she will deliver Brexit and on time.Only 1,200 hours to go. Tick Tock 
David Lammy unwittingly hit the nail on the head when he admitted that - rather than Brexit being the problem - it's politicians who are preventing the UK from taking back control.Labour reneging on its commitment to end free movement is the latest manifestation of that.  
Once again, Corbyn is backing Brexit.Labour's weak opposition has helped the Tories deliver this disastrous Brexit. Corbyn's supporters deserve better. Demand the final say on Brexit now >  
Influential Democrats on Capitol Hill have told @SkyNews that a hard Irish border after Brexit could cost the UK a trade deal with the United States.  
Not Brexit voters. If you’re insulted by “those who promoted Brexit without a sketch of a plan to carry it safely” u saying “that’s me!”  
Let’s have a second ReferendumYes the second Referendum would only have Leave alternatives and would only be voted on by people who voted Leave in the First ReferendumQuestion to askedHow to exit1. WTO NO Deal2. The Appeaser’s DEAL3 Invasion of EU countries (kidding) 
Corbyn's Brexit while not perfect is worth consideration, CU (which respects the #GFA) closely aligned to the Single Market which will protect jobs and allow frictionless trade, and another public vote is still on the table, its a compromise, something we greatly need #Labour 
Hello UK media.For the 5th time in two years.Do you journos not think it would be wise to find out how many UK MP`s have an offshore account?Surely this is hugely relevant to thier support for brexit is it fucking not? 
In July 2017 Guy Verhofstadt told me that Jeremy Corbyn should be involved in Brexit negotiation process - 18 months later, having been ignored, he is telling Theresa May that "cross-party cooperation is the way forward"  
Jeremy Corbyn is suggesting remaining in the Customs Union which would betray the referendum result and mean the trade policy of the UK would be controlled by a highly protectionist Little Europeans Club. Unacceptable and it would never clear Parliament. WTO Brexit now please 
Corbyn's 2017 manifesto said: "Labour accepts the referendum result".Some people claim they thought Corbyn really meant: "We don't accept the result".And now they're accusing him of lying.Work that one out.  
Before the referendum Remainers said we’d be deep in recession by now, with 800,000 job losses with our financial services fleeing to Frankfurt.Actually, we’re growing faster than Germany, we’ve record employment and hardly any firms are willing to move!  
Theresa May's demands to renegotiate Brexit deal rejected by EU, saying it will not reopen talks on the withdrawal agreement — It did offer to add new words to the accompanying non-legally-binding "Political Declaration” 
Four men with a ladder: the billboard campaigners battling BrexitHistory will look back and wonder why people strolled casually by without a care in the world  
The Governor of the Bank of England on how Brexit keeps him awake at night!  
This was the stand out (grim) chart from the @bankofengland Inflation Report for me. What the Bank thinks the Brexit referendum has done to UK business investment...:  
Owen Smith says he is 'considering' quitting Labour over Jeremy Corbyn and Brexit 
It's up to Britain to explain how to avoid a no-deal Brexit, European Commissioner Pierre Moscovici says  
The EU welcomes Corbyn's Brexit letter. Strange considering the hardest of Remainers in our Party have been threatening to leave over it. It's like they have some other agenda on the go.  
One is a political elitist member of the establishment who sold the UK BrexitThe other is a man who came from the former eastern block school of life and hard knocks, and is a European patriot 
WATCH | The Maastricht Treaty was signed 27 years ago today. John Major, who is now demanding a SECOND referendum, refused to give the public a say... Here's his much superior predecessor Margaret Thatcher ripping Maastricht to shreds! #ThrowbackThursday 
The MSM:Labour want to stop brexit!oh hold on..Labour wants brexit!oh hold on..Labour hasLabour didLabour doesLabour willand on and onThe Tories are in Govt and throwing our country in to the rubbish bin of the worldNot Labour.So sick of it now. 
Considering @jeremycorbyn’s letter would mean that we don’t get a proper #Brexit, it isn’t a surprise that @guyverhofstadt ‘welcomes’ it! Thank #EU, next.  
British wish? It's clearly not the wish of Scotland & NI voted also voted emphatically to remain. Brexit is an English affair. 
Just to be clear the Government’s own analysis has shown that any Brexit deal will be bad for the economy, bad for jobs, bad for livelihoods and bad for the country. Any deal MUST be put back to the people for a #finalsay @LabPeoplesVote @peoplesvote_uk 
Heh, I usually do. The push for a base-level single market deal can walk hand-in-hand with the push for a second referendum though. They're fully compatible and should be pursued in tandem. 
While we’ve been focused on Brexit: France has withdrawn its ambassador to Italy. One step short of breaking off diplomatic relations. Last time they did that, Mussolini was in charge in Rome. 
But on the bright side, at least he's not heading in the same direction as Farage :-) 
Varadkar, Harris, Brexit and Joe Schmidt would be top of the agenda if I was on the airwaves today!! 
From Motherwell in North Lanarkshire. A pro-independence, anti Brexit region of Scotland. Yet the panel is overwhelmingly pro union, pro Brexit. BBC Bias knows no shame 
We are weeks from an economic and human catastrophe. This is the reality of a no-deal Brexit.The European Parliament has done its part and we need to continue to work together to avoid it.  
In 2016, @ChukaUmunna was against a 2nd referendum. He said it would be disrespectful to those who voted Leave. He also advocated leaving the Single Market in order to end freedom of movement.There is no principle Chuka isn't willing to change to further his personal ambitions.  
No-deal Brexit: UK exporters risk being locked out of world's harbours  
Solidarity with Owen Smith, Brexit not compatible with my values either.Jeremy Corbyn and the rotten cabal around the Leader's Office are destroying Labour. Corbyn  is a toxic failure. 
Owen Smith - I might quit Labour- Tells @Emmabarnett of the “betrayal” of pushing thru brexit- Confirms he is considering quitting the party but hasn’t made a decision yet - Calls brexit “a nativist, nostalgic, right-wing, ideological programme”Smith left shad cab in March  
Riding in behind @lucianaberger who refused to rule out resigning on  last night. Smith a big supporter of the second referendum campaign. Labour is just as split as the Tories over Brexit and Corbyn's move on CU has opened it up  
BREAKING NEWS: Unemployment will rise as a result of a ‘No Deal’ Brexit, as hundreds of pro-EU activists will suddenly find themselves out of a job.  
You could subtract de-industrialisation, immigration, the tabloid press, the financial crisis, Corbyn from the politics of the past decade, and still imagine a path to Brexit. Subtract "The Conservative Party", and Brexit is simply unthinkable. 
**POLL** Only one of these MPs has ever tabled an amendment to Brexit Related legislation where his amendment included provision for a 2nd Referendum. Do you know who it was? 
I've read a lot on Brexit over the past two and a half years, but I still struggle to believe there will ever be a better explanation for what's happening than "The Conservative Party" 
2016 @ChukaUmunna v. 2019 Chuka2016:A 2nd ref would be a betrayalWe must leave SM and end freedom of movementI've never encountered antisemitism in Labour2019:Brexit would be a betrayalWe must stay in SM and keep freedom of movementLabour is institutionally antisemitic 
Labour MP - and former leadership challenger - @OwenSmith_MP tells 5 Live that he is considering quitting the party for what he calls a "betrayal of our values" on Brexit. "I think it's something that I and lots of other people are considering right now". #emmabarnettshow 
To anyone who thinks a softer Brexit (outlined in Corbyn's letter), or some Norway+ arrangement is possible:MAYWILLNEVERDOTHISIt's smashes her red line (ending FoM), and more Tories would oppose it than opposed current deal. And May is *heavily* partisan! 
Why did @Keir_Starmer accept the role of Shadow Brexit Secretary?He has no intentions of respecting the 2016 referendum result. He must have a direct line to Blair & Co in order to strategise. Labours Little Finger.  
“Vote Labour. Get a Tory Brexit”That’s almost right. It will be a Tory/Lab/DUP Brexit. Labour members can’t really claim it would be anything else, if they continue to back Corbyn’s pro brexit agenda. 
#Brexit: What's behind Corbyn's letter to May?  
As an MP you have made cheerleading speeches in parl in support of Brexit, you have voted for it on multiple occasions (which is a lot more power than a voter like me has) & you have repeatedly, publicly supported your friends Johnson, Rabb & Gove's position on Brexit since 2016. 
EU Tells Theresa May Brexit Divorce Deal Will Not Be Renegotiated. Great, easy decision then, we just walk away a great deal richer and trade using WTO, offering free trade to the EU if it wants it using GATT Article 24..  
"The truth is that Brexit is not compatible with my values. It is a right-wing ideological project, it is a nativist project, it is fuelled by lies and it was delivered deceitfully in 2016”Well said Owen Smith   
Any Labour MP falling for the spin PV is still "on the table" while Corbyn gladly sets out his Brexit desires and wants are bloody gullible idiots. 
What a mess your two parties are in. Which means the whole country is in a bloody mess. Where are the political  leaders who will stand up for the currently United Kingdom?! Who will call Brexit our for what it is. Who will act in the national interest? We have run out of time 
No. We. Didn't.We had a #CriminalsVote in 2016.I want a vote on #Brexit where both campaigns abide by all electoral law. We need a #PeoplesVote to RESTORE DEMOCRACY in the UK.I refuse to respect a vote won by illegal activities.#VoteLeaveBroketheLaw#StopBrexit 
EU parliament chiefs welcome Jeremy Corbyn's new Brexit plans. Of course they do, we would be tied to the EU forever, in the customs union with no say or ability to conduct bilateral trade deals. Great for the EU, the worst possible option for the UK..  
If Tusk’s comments make you uncomfortable or angry, then you have placed yourself amongst the subjects of his comment. You have self identified as one of the ragtag of liars, grifters, crooks & swindlers who have promoted #Brexit with no idea how it can work. #WeAreAllDonaldTusk 
What are you talking about? The details were worked out. In a #Brexit deal that took 18 months to negotiate. Why isn't it sealed? Chiefly because Theresa May forgot to consult anyone outside the Tory party (a tactic one may view as intransigent) and now the deal can't land  
No you haven't, Billy. You were spouting rubbish about the "long game" when the rest of us were calling on Labour to stop Brexit  
Why UN supervised referendum could not be held in J&K. How Sheikh Abdullah and Nehru blocked the road for plebiscite.  
.@spikeh40 Remain did lose the referendum. This tweet is incorrect on so many levels it barely even qualifies as words 
While the backbencher challenge to Brexit is a serious one. The internal sabotage by @PhilipHammondUK and the Treasury department is one that is far more serious. We cannot let it slip! Check out our newest piece in @TheCommentator 
Mary Lou McDonald to the British government: "Stop placating the hardliners and work to avoid no deal Brexit."  @MaryLouMcDonald pic.twitter.com/JvQ7pCOlZF 
It’s hard not to be impressed by Jeremy Corbyn and the team around him. They are the only people putting forward a sensible compromise which respects the result of the referendum, but also secures us a customs union. The Corbyn proposal can get a majority. Your call @theresa_may 
Our #Brexit research leader @r_ortegaargiles and investigator Philip McCann's project @CityREDI @unibirmingham  features in today's @nytimes 
‘Project After’, Civil Service ‘No Deal’ planning, is characterised as an agenda to set the UK’s relations with the rest of the world after Brexit — through tariff setting and a competitive tax policy.Sounds ideal to me! It sounds like Brexit to me!  
On the day May goes to Brussels, Jeremy Corbyn attempts to undercut her offer to the EU by calling for Brexit in name only.Music to EU leaders' ears and the London-centric Remain lobby - but abandoning Labour's Leave voting communities outside London.  
The @Independent covers our research on Brexit and inflation. @cage_warwick @CEP_LSE "Brexit has already cost average UK worker more than week's wages due to post-referendum price rises" 
Brexit is a disease of the Tory party that metastasized  
50,000 Labour members abandon Corbyn over Brexit shambles and failed promises 
.@andreajenkyns: The only certainty we have is that the PM will come back with her awful Withdrawal Agreement Join the fastest growing Brexit movement @  
Are we now seriously saying that due to Brexit protocols put in place by UKgov, pharmacists are allowed to change the patients prescription without the knowledge of the GP?That runs many health risks 
"Do you have a plan?" #Irish farmer-local politician Enda Stenson asks Brexiteers. "It is time for the Brexiteers to stop blaming Brussels & stop blaming the Irish", he tells #CoRplenary in #Brexit debate with local and regional leaders.  
The EU says no, again, to renegotiating Brexit as Theresa May arrives in Brussels  
Labour is ramping up its political bipolar disorder to an excruciating degree. Last night, Corbyn's letter practically offers to kill a 2nd EU referendum. Today, Keir Starmer has been interviewed and said that a 2nd referendum is definitely an open possibility. Christ  
Mobile roaming fees may return in event of no-deal Brexit, documents reveal  
No, Sarah. It’s down to the foolishness of people like yourself who cheered for Brexit without having the slightest notion of how to untangle 45 years of UK enmeshment in a complex international framework of deep interdependence. EU position has been absolutely same since Dec 17  
Interesting study of economic impact of hard Brexit.  Note that the UK will be the worst off.Where Europe Would Be Hurt Most by a No-Deal Brexit  
Walk away .... Only way .....Tear up the cheque. They have had their chances !!!!!    Brexit news latest: Jean-Claude Juncker tells Theresa May withdrawal deal will not be renegotiated at Brussels summit | London Evening Standard  
British politicians pushing no-deal are "irresponsible", it would be a "disaster on both sides of the Channel" - Guy Verhofstadt, European Parliament's #Brexit Coordinator  
EU parliament chiefs welcome Jeremy Corbyn's new Brexit plans 
So @owensmith2016 has hinted he may quit because #JeremyCorbyn believes in respecting the #Brexit referendum result #ByeBye Owen, you won’t be missed #JC4PM2019 
'We need a new meaningless catchphrase, guys... Bangbang Brexit - no, too meaningless. Cor Blimey Brexit - too cockney.. BLINDFOLD BREXIT. Yes!! And we'll all go to Brussels and stand there with blindfolds on. My God, it's perfect. A second referendum will definitely happen now.'  
European Parliament Brexit co-ordinator Guy Verhofstadt says Prime Minister Theresa May has reassured the EU there will be an Irish backstop after Brexit 
"We welcome the letter that Jeremy Corbyn has written to [Theresa] May" says @Europarl_EN's #Brexit Coordinator Guy Verhofstadt - "cross-party cooperation is the way forward" 
So here is May and Juncker's akward handshake. I know she intended it to look tough, but again Theresa May is struggling to look human. #TimetoTalk #Brexit  
The #brexit political declaration could be made “more binding” says @guyverhofstadt 
The economy is tanking, Brexit is a shambles and the Bank of England now say there is a one in four chance of UK going into recession and @theresa_may is quaffing champagne with Russian millionaires and clocking up the air miles on wasted journeys #GTTO 
He asked ppl to boycott Anambra elections, they listened! We lost an opportunity to have someone like Obaze or Chidoka in the govt house. See who we got? Obiano! The biggest saboteur of Igbo interest and aspirations. No Sir, sit at home for a fake referendum is a fraudulent call.  
The British people demonstrated unparalleled foresight in deciding to Brexit. The EU is a rotting carcass. The forces of globalisation, mass immigration and climate change extortionists are collapsing. Let’s go WTO!  
Good analysis of Labour’s Brexit demands from @IanDunt  “it is the closest thing to a credible plan we've seen from Labour since this thing began” 
The same people who said electing Corbyn as leader of the Labour party would lose the party 90 seats at a General Election are now saying backing Labour's Soft Brexit proposal would lose the party 45 seats at a General Election.I kid you not. 
.@guyverhofstadt: Mrs May has accepted there has to be a backstop in the Withdrawal Agreement. Again Verhofstadt says the only room for manoeuvre is on the Political Declaration. Welcomes Corbyn letter to May offering a cross-party approach to Brexit 
Is this the ice-cream man who accepted a job in the Shad Cab (even though Labour campaigned on a Brexit platform) then constructively resigned by going against party policy at a crucial time when Starmer was trying to sort out a cross-party agreement on Customs Union? That Smith? 
Watching #politicslive you'd have thought this whole #Brexit shitshow was the fault of @UKLabour judging by the going over Shami Chakrabarti got from Mr.Neil, Bernard Jenkin who wants to take us over the edge with a #NoDealBrexit and is part of the shitshow had a free pass. 
Heya you fine mugs!You've been absolutely amazing in helping me amass a gargantuan stash of cash, which I promptly blew on a totally fruitless quest to stop Brexit!So here I am again, begging you for more, as for some reason Our Soros won't stump up!Talk about desperation!  
Carry on BrexitJoan Sims as Theresa MaySid James as CorbynPeter Butterworth as Michel BarnierJack Douglas as GraylingCharles Hawtrey as Rees-Mogg 
Kenya welcomes Britain's assurance that Brexit will not disrupt trade relations between the two countries. Continued engagement and use of technology to deepen collaboration on areas of mutual interest will boost our manufacturing sector; stimulate industry; drive the Big Four.  
Just a reminder that Brexit isn’t the only problem the EU has right now  
"Why can't Remainers accept Brexit?"For many reasons. Though being told from day one "YOU no longer have any say in the running of your country!" ranks pretty high.No one would respond well to that. 
"I sent the card because I was worried about what might happen to Ireland after Brexit" #liveline @joeliveline 
Another consequence of Brexit, why are Brexiters constantly amazed that Leave means Leave, wtf did you expect to happen. There's strength in numbers as we'll find out if we Brexit. 
Britain’s economy is (unsurprisingly) nearly 5 times more exposed to Brexit than the rest of the EU – but parts of southern Germany and northern France are especially vulnerable, where certain goods and services will cross UK borders multiple times.  
Christian Adams on Theresa May’s trip to Brussels #FinalSay #PeoplesVote #PoliticalCartoon #Satire #BrexitShambles #BrexitChaos #BrexitDeal #Brexit  - political cartoon gallery in London  
How long before ‘brexit’ is just a minor issue to the EU in comparison to all their other problems?   
Liberals have to learn that if they keep stamping their feet & putting their fingers in their ears they won't get a 2nd Referendum, they'll get a No-Deal Brexit. In the adult world, you don't always get what you want. That's why Jeremy's strategy, above, is mature & sensible. 
So listening to ‘World at One’ on Radio4.The first 30 mins was handed over to Brexit the interviewees were Lucy Powell talking about a Customs Union, Ben Bradshaw (Peoples Vote), Shami Chakrabati (overthrowing Brexit). All Labour spokespersons. BBC impartial as ever ! Thoughts ? 
Failing UK! B of E announce further cut in forecast growth for U.K. This will be the “Brexit Dividend” the Tories bleat on about? Not a whisper from Brexiteer #scottishconservatives on behalf of their remain voting constituents. 
Asked at a presser if he wakes up each morning regretting that he's the @bankofengland governor in the age of Brexit, @markcarney1 replies: "I don't wake up in the morning any more ... I wake up in the middle of the night." @Brexit 
Last week May decided that her best route out of her Brexit mess was to ally with DUP & ERG & play Russian Roulette with a No-Deal Brexit. The purpose of today's letter from  Corbyn is to show her there is another way. A close co-coperative deal with the EU including CU & SMA. 
Ultra Remainer and #PeoplesVote campaigner @Anna_Soubry claimed an eye-watering £198,820.76 in expenses between 1 Oct 2017-30 Sept 2018. Even minus travel and staff costs this was £43,891 of taxpayer’s money.@Jacob_Rees_Mogg claimed...£900.#Brexit #NoDeal #WTO 
The EU is furious with Theresa May and will leave her empty-handed - as accidental no-deal Brexit looms. Let’s do it deliberately then, a managed WTO exit is by far the best option, her deal just keeps the UK tied to the EU indefinitely. It’s not Brexit..  
Remember also that the GFA was published in final form before the two binding referendums and passed with a super-majority in both Irish jurisdictions 71% in NI and 94% in IE. Totally different to the advisory Brexit Referendum with a slim margin - probably obtained illegally. 
With the EU rejecting Theresa May's demand to reopen negotiations on a #Brexit deal, what happens next? Tonight in @smockalley join Green MEP @ph_lamberts as he outlines the EU's position on Brexit with @EamonRyan & @ClareBaileyGPNI. Come along & be part of the discussion!  
"Is this Hell Prime Minister?" A journalist nailed the awkward exchange between @theresa_may and @JunckerEU .Or was it because an anti-#Brexit protester had just jumped in front of her motorcade?   
. @IanBlackfordMP "Labour under Jeremy Corbyn has shifted from being the Official Opposition to the official facilitator for a Tory hard Brexit that will hit jobs and living standards across the UK."  
Exactly. This is very tough and very difficult.Labour - under Corbyn and Starmer - are impressively on top of Brexit issues and highly focussed, unlike the shambolic Tories  
Juncker insists Brexit deal will not be renegotiated in talks with May. Fine, May should now resign and allow a Brexiteer PM to implement a managed WTO exit, to deliver what the people voted for..  
The Bank of England forecasts only 1.2% growth in 2019. The worst growth figures since 2009 and the financial crisis. But there are those amongst us who will tell you that this has absolutely nothing to do with Brexit.  
Grannies against the right: older women are rising up – could they bring down Brexit?  
Why is there all this speculation about people quitting Labour and none about a leadership challenge, which is a far more rational way to respond to concerns about Brexit, antisemitism, Venezuela, factionalism and general uselessness?  
As if May’s Brexit negotiating stance was insufficiently absurd, Corbyn weighs in with a dog’s breakfast of empty slogans dressed up as serious policy. What did this country do to deserve these two calamitously useless party leaders? 
Fifty days to #Brexit. #Labour say 'oh, we might still back a referendum'. Do they think people are thick or something? 
There won't be a UK by 2030 - Ireland will reunite; Scotland will be independent. Brexit will kill the UK. The stark choice for Wales is incorporation into England or independence - devolution won't hold. We can't continue to wait for permission by Westminster - we need to act. 
SNP outrage at Labour supporting "a Tory Brexit" is a bit rich. Corbyn's five-point plan is very close to the kind of Brexit that Nicola Sturgeon herself was punting to the PM up until a few weeks ago. 
The government is exploiting a legal loophole to avoid the 2016 referendum being voided because of crime. Con-tricksters and their ilk exploit loopholes. Governments must adhere to the spirit and not merely the letter of the law. #PeoplesVote #Brexit 
Jeremy Corbyn's terms do not bring the country together: it's a recipe for a Remainers' Brexit that ignores Leave voters.He is breaking Labour's manifesto promise to honour the referendum result. 
Labour: your ‘leader’ wants to make you the party that enabled Brexit.How does it feel to be May/Tory/UKIP/Farage supporters? 
British Prime Minister Theresa May and EU Commission President Jean-Claude Juncker spar during "robust" talks on the UK's Brexit plans, agree to hold more negotiations until the end of the month. 
Shadow Brexit Secretary @Keir_Starmer is in #Birmingham today. He insisted Labour's six Brexit tests do still apply, despite concerns they had been ditched following Jeremy Corbyn's call for changes to the Government's political declaration. 
Britain's government concedes it's powerless to prevent roaming surcharges from EU mobile phone companies if there's no Brexit deal  
Jeremy Corbyn's #Brexit offer to Theresa May "does not rule out the option of a second referendum", says Shadow Brexit Secretary Sir @Keir_Starmer[tap to expand]  
Young people 'will neither forget nor forgive' politicians responsible for Brexit, warns John Major - The Independent  
Are you angry that we are only 50 days from inflicting the disaster of #Brexit on our people, but that no one seems to be speaking for us? Then show it. Wherever you are, contact your local group & take to the streets. If you can get to #Leeds next Thursday for 5.30pm please do! 
Backlash from Labour supporters and voters at Corbyn letter apparently helping May enable Brexit. Why any hint of Labour owning any kind of Brexit is calamitous for Labour:  
'The central planks of Project Fear are entirely false. A 'No Deal' Brexit would rip up the worst deal of the century - our EU membership - and allow the UK to take back control of its own fate.' | @LukeBrandonUK 
So @Keir_Starmer says #Labour might still back a referendum. Yeah, and I'm 44, and I might still play in the Cup Final at Wembley. Could happen.  Do me a favour. We didn't all come down with the last rain shower. 
PM May takes demand for Brexit renegotiation to Brussels  
Not just the young!The young will “neither forget nor forgive” the politicians responsible for Brexit if they end up being its biggest victims, John Major has warned.#RevokeRemainRebuild #StopBrexitSaveBritain 
Looks like a betrayal to me @Keir_Starmer betrayal of the 6 testsbetrayal of the composite motion plans A and Bbetrayal of Labour members will decided policy promisebetrayal of the people of the UKMay will renege as soon as she can= Labour facilitated Tory Brexit 
Sorry, how on earth does it "guarantee" workers' rights to leave them up to the EU? If the EU wants to slash workers' rights it will do, there won't be a damn thing Remainers can do. When did the 'benevolent dictator' become so fashionable in progressive circles? #brexit  
#Brexit: UK jobs 'attracting less interest from EU workers'. Construction and healthcare hardest hit. This might push up wages in the short term, but labour shortages will reduce economic growth, meaning fewer jobs and lower tax revenues.#PeoplesVote 
"It's up to the British side now to say how to avoid a no-deal [Brexit]," says European Commissioner Pierre Moscovici  
The betrayal. Corbyn signs conciliatory to Mrs May to help her Brexit through. He effectively has ruled out a People’s Vote. It’s the ultimate betrayal of Remainers and we knew it was coming. Sad day. #FBPE #PeoplesVote 
Jeremy Corbyn has turned his back on the millions of Labour members and voters who want to fight Brexit, and ignored the will of the Labour conference. Join the Liberal Democrats' fight for a people's vote >  
Once Brexit is sorted, let’s focus on getting Conservatives back into Government. 
Britain's economy is nearly five times more exposed to Brexit than the rest of the European Union  
Oppose Brexit @uklabour not because of lost seats but because so many people (who’s lives are hard already) will suffer terribly because a series of dishonest misrepresentations about the EU have been treated with respect they do not deserve. 
As a member of the LGBT+ community, Kirsty feels like her voice hasn't been heard in the Brexit debate. That's why she wants a #PeoplesVote. What's your reason? Send a 30-second video to LGBT@peoples-vote.uk 
Losing citizenship is a very unpleasant experience, I can assure you. Not everyone in the UK agrees with #Brexit and those of us stuck #inLimbo in the EU still have no idea what will happen to us on March 29. @AgiBergman @bassguitarrock @BritishInEurope @the3million 
This is Brexit right here.These two lines represent the entire narrative screaming every single day. Yet these two lines are never spoken. Quite. Silence.. then more screaming GET CORBYN!!!! He’s the only one who tried but nobody cares.  
No-deal Brexit could revive mobile roaming fees, minister confirms  
Today in the @nytimes: a piece about the potential Brexit-implications for European regions. Partly based on our @UKandEU-funded work published in Papers in Regional Science and here: . @r_ortegaargiles @frank_oort @MarkThissen 
Brexit Secretary allowed to negotiate with opposite number in Brussels. That hasn't happened in a while. Maybe Mr Robbins is refusing to get involved, seeing as he reportedly advised no reopening of the backstop?  
Shout out to those worried about Brexit who manage not to sexually harass anyone!  
NEW: Former Labour leadership challenger Owen Smith hints he could quit over Jeremy Corbyn's Brexit stance 
Donald Tusk is entirely correct. Leading Brexiters – like Boris Johnson, Michael Gove, Jacob Rees-Mogg and Nigel Farage – led the United Kingdom down this destructive path, with no plan or any idea how to deliver Brexit without harming the country.#FFS #PeoplesVote 
Britain’s May meets again in Brussels with skeptical E.U. leaders on Brexit deal  
"Why Britain needs a second Brexit referendum" (@TheHillOpinion)  
Umm it literally offers to Brexit if May agrees.  
Remember when Brexiters promised lots of new trade deals on 'day one' after Brexit. I'm going to shock you now but that was a load of bollocks. The truth is they haven't even managed to roll over the ones we already have. Bravo, Liam. 
Essentially make half an hour of calls while you're in Europe post Brexit or do a few minutes of data roaming and you've spent more than your entire annual tax contribution to the EU. 
After it’s revealed there’s just #100DaysToEurovision, nationwide support for a hard Brexit rises by 6000%. 
Pro-Frexit MEP @f_philippot: “Yellow Vests have just shown the strength of the people. In the United Kingdom, I know the people are as strong and resilient. “They have chosen freedom and they will make a success of Brexit.” 
This should be required reading for anyone who thinks that continued constructive ambiguity on Brexit will serve Labour well. 
#UKGovernment continues to sneak out significant #Brexit legislation WITHOUT scrutiny or debate! #BrexitShambles 
“We are not at the stage of Theresa May and Jeremy Corbyn being able to play nice, gather round, sing Kum By Yah and find a way through this” @bbclaurak tells @afneil about Labour’s Brexit offer#politicslive  
Can You Imagine That?!Got my hands on a DELETED SCENE from #MaryPoppinsReturns Exclusive... #Brexit@RemainerNow @snb19692 @Andrew_Adonis @acgrayling @euromove @campbellclaret 
Your daily @DealBook Briefing:• The biggest bank merger since the financial crisis • Germany seeks to put limits on Facebook's data use• Coming up: Another Brexit impasse 
Young people 'will neither forget nor forgive' politicians responsible for Brexit, warns John Major  #lbc #fbpe #conservatives #labour #snp #libdems #plaidcymru #PeoplesVote #StopBrexit #brexit #itvnews #bbcnews #PoliticsLive #c4news #5news #skynews #bbcqt 
Economy as a whole is "not yet prepared" for a no-deal #Brexit - Mark Carney gives details of current UK economic uncertainty  
The people of Scotland are about to be stripped of their #EU citizenship against their will. Please remember this when we vote for #independence after #Brexit & come to seek our rightful place alongside #Ireland in the #EU. #ScotlandsPlaceInEurope. Thank you 
Labour's Brexit Secretary confirms the fight's not over for a second referendum within Labour...  
Tusk did not insult the 17.4m Leavers. He insulted the self-serving charlatans who campaigned for Brexit without having a credible plan. In other words, you. 
Labour will be punished by voters if it gives any backing at all to Brexit | Polly Toynbee  
The economy is 1.5% weaker today than the Bank had been projecting before the referendum - Carney 
The biggest fallacy in the Brexit debate today, sadly being peddled by Opposition and Govt, is the idea that "getting on with it" will end the Brexit debate. It will not. It will be just the start.  
Every day another long piece in a UK publication setting out Brexit outcomes that would be read with complete incomprehension by people in EU27 states.Expecting Brussels to allow London to co-manage Europe is like expecting DC to allow Ottawa to co-manage the United States 
Normally citizenship is for life.... How about inviting those who want it, to apply for lifelong EU citizenship? #Brexit #BritishEuropeans 
The Tory Brexit divide is like a porcelain vase with a massive crack that's been there for decades, yet somehow it's still standing.The Labour Brexit divide is a porcelain vase that has been immaculately pristine since the late 1980s, but which is about to be thrown at the wall  
This letter sets out in robust terms that the Prime Minister must abandon her Brexit red lines. It does not take the option of a public vote off the table.  
Sick of seeing people referencing Labour Party policy on Brexit agreed at Conference whilst willingly misrepresenting Labour Party policy on Brexit agreed at Conference. 
This whole mess is entirely the structure of those who sold a Brexit they cannot deliver. To go through with it would be the greatest failure by parliament ever. Stop it now for the sake of your constituents and country. @Devon4Europe 
Poland's PM on Tusk: "Instead of sending anyone to hell, let's find a solution together that is good for the EU & also allows us to have a strong economic partner in the UK after Brexit. Everyone's aim got to be the interest of Poland & the future of the EU, whatever its shape"  
“We think it’s a blind Brexit” Shami Chakrabarti tells @afneil about government plans for a future relationship with the EU #politicslive  
“Theresa May saying: ‘I need you to budge on the withdrawal agreement’… Jean-Claude Juncker has again repeated his determination not to budge” @bbclaurak on #Brexit meeting on Brussels#politicslive  
Seumas: Here's a Brexit plan, JezJez: Will it stop or at least mitigate the worst effects of Brexit?Seumas: Nah, but it'll get rid of the BlairitesJez: That's why I employed you. You never lose focus of the important stuff 
In a spectacular c*ck up, the BBC created its very own Brexit hellby @ElfreaLockley 
#BREAKING UK economy 'not prepared' for no-deal Brexit: BoE chief  
Brexit is inconvenient for the EU’s defence powermongers because 2016 was the year they started tying up member states in military schemes ahead of formal unification from 2021 once it becomes irreversible.Yet UK ministers are going along with that as if Brexit isn’t happening. 
First @Another_Europe attempts to argue that @LenMcCluskey is collaborating with the Tories on Brexit, then one of its leading members calls for the "stringing up" of our chief of staff. Unite members should ignore this organisation at all costs   
Anti-brexit protester jumps in front of Theresa May's motorcade – video  
Thank you @eucopresident . You are right,, it is not the will of the people. It was never the will of the people. 37% of the adult population who were allowed to vote is not a majority of that population who will have to live with their regime.#brexitisacrime #StopBrexit2019 
#Brexit wouldn't be around today without 1 of these:1. Putin2. Tax dodging millionaires3. Racists4. Biased BBC5. Liars6. Artificial intelligence7. Stolen private data8. Breaking spending laws9. FPTP10. Social media11. UKIP entryism in Tory/Lab12. Apathy. 
We’re days away from a hard Brexit that will send the Scottish economy into a potential tailspin and the Tories have used all their questions to the Deputy First Minister to rant about parking . First Carlaw, now Fraser. Tinpot stuff. #FMQs 
Corbyns Lexit forsaw these current problems two years ago. Corbyn solved these problems, two years ago. Corbyn has played a blinder on Brexit. Corbyn for PM. Mainstream Nordic style policies.  
On reflection - it is like last week's Brexit votes and debate never took place. The PM has ignored absolutely everyone who opposes her deal. Her way or nothing, everyone else is wrong. No plan B, no extension, no softer Brexit, no criticism allowed. 
Merkel says Brexit solution is possible without reopening divorce deal  
"The fog of #Brexit is creating tensions for households" - Bank of England Governor Mark Carney gives update on UK economy  
BREAKING: The "fog of Brexit" is creating tensions and Britain's economy isn't ready for a no-deal split, Mark Carney says  
 Love it when a plan comes together..May's demand to renegotiate Brexit has been rejected Sent via @updayUK 
Blimey the Bank of England has cut the UK growth forecast to lowest rate since financial crisis and they reckon there's a 25% chance of recession. Global slowdown and Brexit uncertainty  are noted as the reasons for the gloomy forecast. 
You keep laughing at us, you clowns. All it will do is harden the British people’s resolve to hard Brexit. Even Remainers like me find this devil/hell rhetoric appalling.  
The difference between Jeremy Corbyn and Chuka Umunna - Corbyn is not willing to ignore the vote of 17.4 million people, Umunna is. The ONLY reason Chuka wants a 'people's vote' is because he thinks it will somehow overturn Brexit. And when it doesn't...?   
Spain’s Supreme Court refuses to reserve seats for international observers during Catalan referendum trial.   
As my first retweet ended up in the other person blocking me (no clue why), her we go again! Berlin's newspaper predicting the break up of the UK in 2016, classing England as the patient. Right they were then and are now! #brexit #indyref2 
Owen Smith “considering” quitting Labour over Brexit  
He says: "following the decision and the will of the UK authorities". In EU they know that what is happening is a coup of the British ruling class over the British people. It is the authorities' will not the people's will. And those authorities one day will be held to account. 
Sir John Major on #Brexit: “I believe Brexit is regressive. The campaigners for Brexit promised better times, but Brexit will deliver worse times... year after year after year”.#neechamberevents @NEEChamber 
“Very disappointed that all the inevitable consequences of Brexit about which I was clearly warned a hundred fucking times are actually going to be happening.”  
First Minister's Questions.To ask the First Minister why she's on a jolly when Brexit is a few weeks away? 
 Bank of England's Mark Carney explains why Brexit damage has risen  
Today is a big date:50 days until Brexit27 years since Maastricht Treaty was signed67 years of Queen Elizabeth II's reign100 days until Eurovision 
How did we ever end up with such a useless Prime Minister? The only reason she got elected was because she promised faithfullly she would carry out the Brexit we voted for. That turned out to be a complete lie. She is like a tar stain on cloth you cant remove.  
And for those who, like me, want references to check accuracy, here is the  Government's own 'partnership pack' for no deal Brexit - published a day later: .  New barriers to trade for agriculture & fisheries start on P71. 
We are BEYOND sick of Democrats, Eric. At the rate they’re escalating things, they seem more like an invading hostile foreign power than “fellow Americans”.They’re intentionally using your father as a referendum on capitalism to push a suffocating #cultLEFT nanny state. 
My cousin is one of those people that believes the referendum should be rerun and the vote taken away from old people. I asked him if he'd tell this to our grandparents, but he remained silent and didn't answer.These people are total cowards. 
When you really, really desperate for a 'No-Deal' WTO Brexit and to kiss goodbye to £39,000,000,000...  
Pound Tumbles After BOE Slashes GDP Forecast, Warns Of Rising Brexit Damage  
I wrote to the Cornish Times after I read my MP @sheryllmurray 's grossly ill-informed comments about no deal Brexit & WTO rules. I thought my comments may make it into the letters page but here's the full page (with a heads up on P1, too)! #Brexit #Cornwall 
#PoliticsLive Shami Chakrabarti on again BBC. The Labour bore best friend of disgraced lawyer Phil Shiner. Talks bollocks everytime on TV. Going tell us Labour on Brexit. In Out In Out In Out In Out In Out In Out. No ones knows especially Jeremy Corbyn the man that hates EU.  
Latest: I hear Brexit Sec Steve Barclay will meet Michel Barnier in Strasbourg on Monday to begin a new backstop negotiation. 
Not a single firm new Brexit proposal from May and her central demand to renegotiate the backstop was rejected even before she got there. What exactly was the point of her visit to Brussels today? 
Man pushes for £10/hour minimum wage whilst simultaneously pushing a Brexit that will make millions unemployed. 
Days to go until Brexit - 50Alternative Arrangements - 0 
#BreakingNews The BoE has cut the UK's growth forecast in 2019 to 1.2% which is the lowest level since the financial crisis in 2009. They also say there's  a 1 in 4 chance of the UK going into recession. #Brexit is already affecting UK growth#politicslive #PeoplesVote #FinalSay 
Good for him!  We’re all sick of not being listened to! A corrupt referendum, built on lies, with a narrow majority, that will break the UK and leave ordinary people far worse off.What other avenues do we have to stop this imminent disaster? #WeAreAllMarkJohnstonLD 
Amid all the sound and fury yesterday about a “special place in hell” for Brexiteers, @eucopresident's real killer blow was missed. He buried the #FBPE and second referendum campaign 
Those claiming the EU is undemocratic, could you remind me the last time you directly voted for a UK Secretary of State?#peoplesvote #FBPE #Brexit 
Who's fed up with Brexit? Come join us in Parliament on 27 Feb to tell your MP - sign up below  
Young people 'will neither forget nor forgive' politicians responsible for Brexit, warns John Major  
Let Corbyn have Labour, It’s now a toxic hard Brexit party that fails to represent the wishes and interests of the voters or the members, It’s time for a new party free of the toxicity of racism, misogyny, homophobia & bigotry, It’s time for a new pro EU party  
Emerging from his 16th JMC meeting on Brexit, Mike Russell says Scotland is in a worse position after two and a half years, and he wouldn’t send UK ministers for the messages, let alone to Brussels 
LIVE: Juncker tells May he will not reopen Brexit deal talks.Think we all saw that coming, perhaps even May herself.@Bremaininspain 
I have a grudging admiration for the SNP chutzpah when berating the tories for not having a planned Brexit.They are on independence draft proposal version 355778 and they don’t even know what fucking currency to use. 
James O'Brien is one of my Brexit fighting heroes.@mrjamesobThank you very much#StopBrexit 
Donald Tusk not only unfairly attacked Brexiteers yesterday, but reminded us the EU is anti-democratic  #brexit 
Today's joint statement on behalf of Juncker and May:* The Withdrawal Agreement was defeated by a historic margin of 230 votes* The EU27 will not reopen the Withdrawal Agreement* 50 days before #Brexit with or without the Withdrawal Agreement* This is what hell looks like 
Why does @BBCNews insist on misquoting Tusk? What he said was there was a special place in hell for those Brexiteers who brought about Brexit without a plan as to how to do it SAFELY. The word ‘safely’ is rather key, surely? Yet in all BBC reports it is missed out! #PoliticsLive 
BREAKING: Bank of England cuts UK growth forecast to lowest level since financial crisis.  Expect Brexiters  to queue up to tell you that this is nothing to do with Brexit. 
Number of Amendments Jeremy Corbyn proposed that could have enabled a Second Referendum = 1. Number of Amendments proposed by Chuka Umunna, Chris Leslie or anyone else for a 2nd Referendum = 0. Corbyn proposed a vote making space for a Second Referendum. It did not pass  
Pound falls as Bank of England says Brexit damage to Britain's economy has risen  
Brexit is really important, but nowhere near as important as the climate emergency. Yet every day it is Brexit Brexit Brexit extreme weather Brexit Brexit Brexit where are the polar bears? Brexit Brexit Brexit help we are dead. 
BREAKING: Bank of England says uncertainty in the economy has 'intensified' because of Brexit 
.@theresa_may statement on @JunckerEU talks (attached) represents her ripping up hope she can get Brexit deal through with support of her ERG Brexiter MPs. She either wins support of Labour MPs or it’s no-deal or no Brexit. @jeremycorbyn in driving seat  
BREAKING:  European Commission spokesman: Juncker tells UK leader that EU won't reopen Brexit agreement during 'robust' talks. 
BREAKING: Bank of England warns damage to Britain's economy from Brexit has increased as it cuts growth forecast and holds rates  
WATCH: "If like me you voted for Brexit, you probably know by now that you're a stupid, ignorant, xenophobic, racist, bigoted moron who shouldn't be allowed to vote at all - you can read all about it in the Guardian." Brilliant rant!Catch the whole vid:  
Things #FBPE cultists agree with:Denying ‘old people’ their right to voteEuthanising ‘old people’Celebrating the death of Brexit votersEU ArmyEU Super State52% > 48%DemocracyFactsSupporting the UKUK SovereigntyRemain lost 
Breaking: @BankofEngland cuts UK growth forecast to lowest rate since financial crisis. 1.2% growth this year and a one-in-four chance of a recession(!) Blames Brexit uncertainty and global slowdown. Signals only one rate hike over the next two years. 
Labour are now backing down from wanting to control our borders. Free movement was resoundingly rejected in 2016, anything but full control over our borders is a betrayal of Brexit. Join the fastest growing Brexit movement @  
Brexit is 50 days away. #brexit 
Joint statement from May and Juncker: "The Prime Minister and the President will meet again before the end of February to take stock of these discussions."It is 50 days till Brexit. 
if you've resigned your Labour membership, or are thinking of resigning because of their Brexit stance, do contact @LabourNoLonger so we can add your story to the list!it's getting urgent!!  please RT!!! 
YouGov - how well or badly is govt doing at negotiating Brexit?Well - 14%; Badly -78% - don't know 8%Is Labour's Brexit policy clear or not?Clear: 12% Unclear: 70% Not sure: 17%Not sure Corbyn's 5 points will help this 
Re-upping my very first @TheNewEuropean piece, pointing out soft-Brexit is a barely polished turd that gives the people who voted Leave almost nothing they want, while still leaving us worse off.  
Donald Tusk seems to have reached the anger phase in the stages of Brexit mourning - the unexpected and shocking realisation that it might actually happen.  
'My view is we stay and fight in Labour until Brexit' says Owen Smith but ⁦@bbc5live⁩ when asked if he could remain a @uklabour member he said 'its something I and lots of people are considering right now' 
Labour MP Owen Smith suggests he is considering quitting the party over its Brexit stance.Asked if he could stay in the party, he tells @Emmabarnett: "I think that is a very good question and I think it is something that I and lots of other people are considering now." 
Tens of millions of British holidaymakers face the return of huge and unexpected roaming bills in the event of a no-deal Brexit. The @DCMS_SecOfState has caved into the telecom giants and ignored the consumers. My Urgent Question to the House.  
If this blindfold #brexit goes ahead, it will break Britain. Today we were in Brussels saying no to this blindfold #Brexit. Demand a #PeoplesVote on the #Brexit deal:  
Listen to @Hugodixon on LBC yesterday as he discusses Donald Tusk's comments on Brexiters.And says "Brexiters have a hell of a lot to answer for" for not being "on top of the detail".#Brexit #PeoplesVote 
Lab/Con are BOTH trying to stop #Brexit.Poll shows 75% of voters were STILL going to vote for Lab/Con.That must mean that a large chunk of the 17.4m are STILL going to vote Lab/Con.Why?If you keep on voting Lab/Con they will keep on betraying you. 
OMG. Iraq killed trust in one prime minister. Playing fast and loose with Brexit promises has killed trust in the Tory Party, the Lab Party and MPs in general.Britain desperately needs a new political force that is down the line pro-Brexit but not tainted by extremism @TheSDPUK 
Ooh. Bercow v Leadsom row reignites dramatically. He objects to her suggestion he is 'muddying the waters' on Brexit votes. "No one is going to tell this Speaker...how to stand up for the rights of Parliament." 
I hear that the UK and EU #Brexit negotiating teams have agreed to hold further talks.  
Etonian car crash Boris calls the EUropeans Nazis. Not a flicker. Solidarity campaigner, over thrower of communism, friend of Lech Walsea, Tusk says Boris and his Brexit fuds are going to hell.Cue panic positioning from Brexit fuds. 
John Bercow concerned that, when he saw the draft business for next week, it did not include the promised Brexit debate. He said it was very important for the government to honour its promises to MPs about the Brexit vote. 
Err... didn't Chris and his mates read the Lab 2017 election manifesto? Or did they read it and assume those pledges to voters on Brexit could just be disregarded from the day after the election? 
Read my article in @timesredbox about Whitehall's best-kept secret: The #Brexit workstreams that tell us just how ready the UK is prepared to leave the EU, but the government refuse to publish the analysis. @UKParliament must demand they be published. 
Hi @NickyMorgan01 it would be great if you could discuss these alternative arrangements directly with the various business groups in NI who are impacted most by #Brexit and any such alternative proposals. Happy to meet, ideally in NI and discuss further  
Jeremy’s letter to May will flush her out & prove she won’t move significantly from her awful #brexit deal#Labour doesn’t want a no-deal Brexit, the only deal on the table is bad, so if there’s no prospect of an alternative deal, we’ll have to stop the #BrexitShambles via a PV 
Are you tired of hearing that students will not be able to study abroad post-Brexit? If so, share the facts by RT our video! #Erasmus #SupportStudyAbroad #StudyAbroad #Brexit #GlobalFuture 
"We are a nation in Wales. Keep the doors open for us as a Welsh people."A passionate and powerful speech by @bethanjenkins during #Brexit Committee of the Regions debate in @Europarl_EN #CoRplenary on keeping the door open for Wales in Europe and to preserve peace in Ireland. 
Why is the fact that Labour put forward an amendment with the option of a second referendum, which was then voted down by the House of Commons, including by Tory Remainers, completely missing from the discussion on Brexit right now? 
Mr Tusk reminds voters that the EU is an undemocratic institution run by overpaid, unelected officials often in the twilight of their careers. He is the very embodiment of EU bureaucracy: accountable to no one  #Brexit 
The chief executive of one of Northern Ireland’s key export firms, Norbrook, has called for a no-deal Brexit to be taken off the table & for industry to be given the transition period it was promised. 
Walking in front of cars to own Brexit supporters.  
Speaking to a government Minister yesterday they said: "How is it we're seven points ahead of Labour? How is it possible? How can they be more s**t than we are". This is how. Corbyn still trying to pull the trick of being all things to all people on Brexit. 
Is this the moment anti-Brexit Labour MPs act?  
With just 50 days to go, have we finally reached peak Brexit mayhem?  
Brexit wrecking Europe? The 'nationalist onslaught' is a symptom, not a cause of Europe's crisis  — #AJOpinion, by @culturejamming 
Did you make that clear during the referendum campaign Stephen? It wasn’t the prospectus the Leave campaign offered. Btw I’m sure you are aware that our constituents heavily rejected Leave, and they meant it. 
This is the woman who made 'blonde' jokes about  her opposite number in SF, and labelled Nationalists as hungry, back-for-more "Crocodiles". #ShunTheDUP#TodaySOR #Brexit #DonaldTusk 
Protester jumps in front of UK PM Theresa May's car as she arrives in Brussels for #Brexit talks 
Seems @jeremycorbyn letter cd  prove a tipping point for anti brexit  Labour MPs. Some mulling over whether they shd walk. 
Senior EU official: “It is not only the hour of truth for Madame May it is also a rendezvous with history for Jeremy Corbyn.”  So what does the EU think about Labour’s Brexit plan? 
There are 4 types of Brexiter.1. A cynical & ruthless tax and regulation-hating faction of the rich.2. Their venal political & journalistic lackeys.3. Fascist & bigots. 4. Fools duped by the first two groups. The great majority of Leavers.#PeoplesVote #Brexit 
So @ScotTories are defending Ross Thomson by claiming Brexit stress. Fuck off.In Cromarty rEU citizens, including my wife, now feel so powerless due to Tory Brexit that they are having to campaign to boost morale and try to stay here . . pic.twitter.com/DNPQvGZ35x 
They lost the referendum, they demanded a second referendum, now they want a peoples vote. . . .these people don't seem to get a lot right at all do they. They lost but Britain won and even those who tried to stop brexit will benefit enormously from it. Seems unfair doesn't it ! 
Almost everything you’ve heard about no-deal Brexit is wrong. Britain is completely clueless about the EU response.It won’t be nearly as bad in the short-term as Remainers say, but over the next decade it will be far, far worse than predicted.My take: 
Let’s face the facts Jeremy. You are a facilitator for the Tories Brexit. You are appalling as an opposition leader. No wonder millions of traditional Labour voters cannot vote Labour whilst you remain leader. Just go for goodness sake. Your not up to it in any way. 
Lab/Con are BOTH trying to stop #BrexitDespite that, a recent poll showed that 75% of voters were STILL going to vote for Lab/Con.That must mean that a large chunk of the 17.4m are STILL going to vote Lab/Con.Why?If you keep on voting Lab/Con they will keep on betraying you.  
Theresa May won’t be putting forward any firm new Brexit proposals to EU leaders today, her official spokesperson confirms. There are 50 days to go until Brexit. 
This is why in a Twitter survey in which almost 10,000 people voted 87% said they trusted Sky News over the BBC to report truthfully on Brexit.  
Downing Street confirms Theresa May is taking no new proposals for breaking the Brexit deadlock into her meetings with Juncker and Tusk today: “This was never going to be easy.” Nothing has changed. 
The newly renewed position the UK Home Office is taking to Irish citizens born in NI is in complete contradiction to the pledge Theresa May made this weekWe're looking at the fast deterioration of our rights as EU citizens. "Second class" is fast becoming a reality #Brexit  
The govt has slipped out a policy change in the event of a no-deal Brexit, revoking the law that ended mobile roaming charges for Britons travelling in Europe - ignoring the voices of the consumers. Today I have asked an Urgent Question in the HoC. 
Heartfelt message from Therese, a constituent of @jeremycorbyn.It’s time to respect and nurture our country, stay in the EU and then focus on the Labour project to rebuild Britain.Delivering Brexit would only rebuild the tories.Use the app today !!   
This is the true test: Are Labour supporters willing  to take their votes elsewhere? The only way to force Corbyn to back down on Brexit is to terrify Labour that it will suffer if he doesn't   
One of these Brexit headlines from the Express has surely got to be right.  
Today we were in Brussels telling @10DowningStreet why we don't support this blindfold #Brexit which will provide us with no clarity or closure.Tell your MP you want a #PeoplesVote:  
#Corbyn #Labour #Brexit Six TestsFive DemandsFour Well What About This ThensThree Ah, Come OnsTwo Fingers To Labour MembersOne Deluded Leader 
Tusk has not insulted even one voter, nor the country, not even parliament. His comment was aimed at those who endangered us as a country by “promoting #Brexit, without even a sketch of a plan how to carry it out safely.” If this is you then be offended. @LeaveMnsLeave 
On this day anti-#Brexit John Major signed the Maastricht Treaty the dawn of the EU expanding it far beyond EEC trade & all without a UK public mandate. Margaret Thatcher handbagged him accusing him of 'putting his head in the fire'. Even she knew it had warranted a referendum.  
Important reminder that the decision to call the Brexit referendum was NOT driven by an overwhelming public concern about the EU.Calling the referendum was about intra-party politics, not responsiveness to voter demands.  
THIS is why we need a #GEnotPV.This is happening while UK is IN the EU.Stopping Brexit is no solution. Only a #GenealElectionNow & a transformative Labour Govt will stop Tory austerity in its tracks. #GTTO 
I see that the PM's inability to accept a soft Brexit proposal, due to her party's commitment to a set of economically disastrous red lines, is yet more evidence of Labour's opportunism and cowardice. 
John Longworth: A WTO Brexit would be good news for the economy and would guarantee a clean break from the European UnionHelp us stop the Brexit betrayal:  
Someone just texted into Radio Kerry to say their English neighbour - who immigrated here - flew back to vote FOR Brexit, in case you're wondering why I've put my head through the desk 
This is the moment an anti-Brexit protester jumps in front of Theresa May's motorcade.The Prime Minister is in Brussels as she tries to reopen talks over her Brexit deal.  
One of my favourite quotes this week is from Mark Francois MP - ‘I hope I’m not going to hell, but if I do, that is a decision for the Lord Almighty and not for the president of the European Council’ #Brexit #Tusk 
Labour HQ clearly a bit panicked by reaction from MPs/ members to Brexit letter - am hearing a letter from Jeremy Corbyn will be sent out to members shortly that makes clear a second referendum *is* still on the table, as per party policy. 
 Jeremy Corbyn, with his letter to Theresa May, edged closer to supporting the UK government's Brexit deal. It would be a real betrayal if Labour enables a job-wrecking, isolationist, right-wing Tory agenda against Scotland's will. 
'They would divide Hell': Another Brussels boss takes aim at Brexiteers as Guy Verhofstadt follows Donald Tusk in scathing insults at vote Leavers  #Brexit  
A no-deal Brexit won’t result in a siege. The EU will be more clinical than that | Tom Kibasi  
Day after Donald Tusk’s comments we’ve seen an anti-Brexit protestor jump in front of the PM’s motorcade and a Tory MP’s office vandalised.   
You know, I was stupid enough to go to bed thinking that some people might acknowledge that we may have forced a much softer Brexit and that Labour would get the credit for it.Been a while since I left naivety get the better of me. 
he still knows how to make an argument —- Tony Blair: We all want Brexit closure – but May’s deal won’t supply it | Opinion | The Guardian #NoClarityNoClosure 
When is the BBC going to quote it in context and in full...and remind people that millions of us are already in Brexit hell...given that you are so keen on “balance” and “lack of bias”. 
I suppose we all know this but it's worth repeating. Brexit emerged from a split in the Conservative Party. Since 2016 we have been asked to position our politics around one side or the other of this Tory split.  
Listening to @mrjamesob playing every single one of the lies made by the people who promoted Brexit without even a sketch of a plan for how to execute Brexit to prove why Donald Tusk was right.  Hell's too good for them. 
WORRYING: Tory MP's office vandalised with anti-Brexit stickers and EU flag. @CGreenUK: “The European Union leadership are toxifying the debate over Britain’s democratic future.” 
I think they all got so bogged down in the "Corbyn is a secret hard Brexiteer operating a dastardly scheme to enable Brexit" conspiracy theory that they never stopped to consider the possibility that Labour's plans were in fact precisely what they said they were all along. 
confess your unpopular opinion: while it's not an outcome that I want or think is good, Labour's position on Brexit looks politically quite clever 
We should be buying British and boycotting EU produce and products.Hire British, Buy British and back Brexit Britain to the hilt   
Am feeling stressed about Brexit am off to a pub to get drunk and start a fight and do a bit of ‘light groping’ 
Following Donald Tusks remarks that #Brexiteers should have a special place in hell we made him this as a reminder of what we think of him & the EUThe establishments working flat out to thwart Brexit. Please help us fight what's aheadAll help welcome -  
There's a lot of bad takes on Corbyns letter to May. It isnt facilitating a Tory Brexit, it's actually softening it quite dramatically. A lot of people who seemed to be angling for this as a compromise have suddenly found it quite unpalatable now it has LOTO support. Why is that? 
Mobile roaming charges could return after Brexit after 10 operators refuse to rule it out.  
I get really aggrieved to hear #Brexit linked to 'the Irish Problem'!!In the PAST there was an Irish Problem...but this #BrexitShambles is aBRITISH PROBLEM for the Irish, 26 other EU states & a majority of Brits who know it's an ideological unworkable CLUSTERF*CK!#RevokeA50! 
#Brexit reminds me of that time I saw a monkey shit in its hands and clap..... 
Your rudeness is shocking, your lack of intellect even more so. Try looking at facts before shouting your mouth off. It’s clear the charges are nothing to do with Brexit. Brexit is merely being used as an excuse to possibly charge.  
We had the Brexit deal in November.It would've been logical to then say "The old relationshipto the EU was rejected. We negotiated a new one. Let people decide which they prefer."The time you've wasted on party politics won't be accepted as an excuse@Theresa_May @JeremyCorbyn 
What does Brexit mean?Brexiters: No idea. Blame them over there. Bloody foreigners.Government: No idea. Blame them over there. Run down the clock.Labour: No idea. Blame them over there. Have an election.Brexit means: No one having any idea what it means. Blame someone else. 
Clear proof that the referendum was purely an internal Tory Party brawl that spilled out onto the street. 
BREXIT PANIC: The Netherlands scramble for UK's 'critical medicines' at risk from no-deal  
You campaigned for Brexit. This is down to you. In human terms, roaming charges are likely to be the least serious consequence of the sort of no deal apocalypse championed by mendacious, jingoistic, chinless Brexiteers.  
No sympathy - this is what happened to UK’s fishermen after EU stole our fishing #BREXIT NEWS: French fishermen warn of 'DEATH of profession' if EU fails to secure UK deal | Politics | News |  
I was about to write a thread on why a so-called "People's Vote" is such a bad idea. Then I realised it was dead in the water, so its a waste of time. All the energy that has been wasted promoting EU Ref 2 has been utterly futile and should have been spent influencing Brexit. 
Delaying Brexit would be a betrayal. MPs have failed to deliver on democracy - it's time #ToGoWTO and save £39bn. Sign up now @  
We're not wondering, We know exactly what #Tusk 's doing and we don't need a lying Unionist hack to explain it to the thick plebs.  You and your corrupt BBC pals have done enough damage to the country, by allowing the brexit fanatics to spout their lies without challenge. #BBCQT 
Clearly, smoozing the mega-rich is more important than sorting out the mess she's made of Brexit.Theresa May - prioritising the few, not our country. 
Brexit means lying your arse off to fool people into voting for something that is against their own best interests. Brexit means wasting almost 3 years without any plan whatsoever.Brexit means a totally unnecessary crisis.“Special place in hell” indeed.  
British fishermen may end up having Europe’s richest waters all to themselves after Brexit. But who's going to eat all the fish?  
WATCH | Anti-Brexit nutter jumps in front of the Prime Minister's motorcade as she arrives in Brussels. Brexit Derangement Syndrome is real, folks... these people need help! pic.twitter.com/XWkARH79Ud 
While this appears to be a clever parallel, it's an insult to compare the UK Prime Minister to Yasser Arafat. Theresa May's fallback position on Brexit negotiations has never been to unleash a campaign of terror against EU citizens. What a horrible and immoral equivalence.  
Friends! I am a self-employed Climate Scientist in the greater greater Manchester area, i.e. Hull!And #Brexit means that 97% of my funding from Our Reformed EU will dry up, with the impact being that one day I may have to get a real job!Talk about a special place in Hull!  
Corbyn's proposed objectives would mean the UK does not take back control of anything. We'd be stuck following EU rules, while our trade policy is entirely at the mercy of the EU.It's Brexit in name only - it does not honour the referendum result. 
Leaving aside the content of the letter, by talking about Brexit in polite and constructive terms to Theresa May, Corbyn (and Len McCluskey) are creating a permissive environment for Labour MPs to help her deal over the line. Which is another reason why pro-EU Labour MPs hate it  
Remember, Jeremy Corbyn (net worth £3 million) wont feel the pain of brexit, but the poor will.Plus: "Once he retires, he’s set to earn £1.6 million pension." 
I wish I could use every single story I am now having emailed to me - or told to me on Twitter-  about the BBC's Brexit bias. In an ideal world, this would have been an investigation @Ofcom would have begun a long time ago. 
Big move from Team Starmer this morning. Matthew Pennycook, a shadow Brexit minister, says if Theresa May fails to accept Labour's five demands then the party must move to officially supporting a second referendum. 
Dear Mrs May,I'll be here outside parliament when you come back empty-handed.Brexit is broken.Time to #StopBrexit #REVOKEArticle50NOW@RemainingKind #Sodem @theresa_may @10DowningStreet 
What the hell is going on with Labour's Brexit policy? Part 132,476  
Britain deserves better than this embarrassing Brexit mess.Liberal Democrats are fighting to give the people the final say on Brexit. Get involved now > 
Most #viral News Now: Dear Theresa May, your Brexit plan is doomed. Here’s a deal that will work | Gina Miller  
WATCH: Anti-Brexit protestor jumps in front of May's motorcade in Brussels.What an idiot.  
President ⁦@JunckerEU⁩ welcomes Prime Minister ⁦@theresa_may⁩. Meeting underway to review the next steps to achieve the UK's orderly withdrawal. #Brexit  
Anti-Brexit protester jumps in front of Theresa May's car as she arrives in Brussels to try to salvage her deal - follow live  
Tusk said, "... for those who promoted Brexit without a plan."To work out if you should be insulted, take this quick quiz:a)Were you a Brexit leader?b)Did you promote Brexitc)Did you have a plan?If you answer 'NO' to those questions, #specialplaceinhell is not aimed at YOU! 
Britain imports 99 percent of insulin. Diabetics worry that a no-deal Brexit could put their lives at risk.  
Any vague “guanrantees” that May provides now won’t be worth the paper they’re written on.The only way to lock-in any sort of soft Brexit compromise would be to put it to a public vote to ratify it.Everything else will likely fall apart within months.  
Strange how prominent Brexiteers go on about invoking the spirit that made Britain defeat the Nazis if there’s a no deal Brexit, when you can quite easily imagine every single one of these cunts standing in the background at a Hitler speech 
Labour MP supporting @peoplesvote_uk tells me an attempt by a group of them to persuade PM that they’ll back her deal if she puts it to a referendum is gaining some traction. No 10 listening. Would be her deal versus EU membership on ballot paper. 
.@BarryGardiner is wrong. For over 18 months polling has shown that a majority think #Brexit is a mistake - and their number has grown steadily.Facilitating this mess on the basis of lies will do terrible harm to Labour & to the country.Where's @Keir_Starmer by the way? 
Says one leading Remainer: 'For many years a regular contributor to various BBC programmes, since the referendum I’ve been asked only twice, and one of these contributions was spiked. Coincidence?'  
That look...#TheresaMay #Juncker #Brexit  
The false prophets of Brexit are furious that @eucopresident should suggest they didn't have a plan. Today @theresa_may goes to Brussels to champion their cause. Without a plan. 
The Brexit fallacy is like the World War One fallacy: we assume that because everyone has an interest in averting the worst outcome, the worst outcome won’t happen. Meanwhile we all watch the ratchet continue to click.  
“When they trebled [tuition fees], young people and students mobilised - and in 2015 the Lib Dems were all but wiped out.The Labour Party now has the same existential threat before it.”#FFS co-founder @Just_RichardB if Labour enable Brexit.#PeoplesVote 
Can people stop crying over Tusk now? Let him carry on, the poor thing is stressed that the EU is collapsing before his eyes. Let's focus on a decent WTO Brexit and leave *them* crying. Besides, I would rather go to hell if heaven is inside the European Union. It's boring me now. 
Corbyn wrote to May to make clear 5 demands the she would need to meet for Labour to support a Brexit deal.The media are spinning these as "new" or a change by Corbyn and Labour. They represent what Labour has been saying for ages. See Thread for what Labour's already said..  
America is our biggest trading partner.UK does not have a trade deal with America.So why would trade stop after #Brexit?It won't.It will increase, because the UK can reduce or eliminate some of the tariffs that the EU levies to protect bloated EU companies from competition.  
Thoughts re Brexit:Sometimes s*** happens.And you can’t go back, however much you want to.#PeoplesVote is going back.Corbyn has a grown-up plan to move forward, reunite the party and retain close relationship with EU.Let’s back it!#CorbynsCustomsUnion 
"We're currently part of the best trade deal.. Its like Man City announcing we're leaving PL and moving to the bottom of league". #Brexit  
I cannot agree with the idea of leaving the EU but staying in the Customs Union and Single Market.By doing so we would lose the opportunities opened up by #Brexit, denying us the chance to tailor our immigration policy and the ability to properly strike our own trade deals. 
Shame on Labour for offering to help the Tories enable Brexit.This is not opposition. This is a disgrace that will make the country poorer and put jobs at risk.Millions of Remainers will not forgive Labour for backing Brexit.Write to your MP today.   
In London, United Kingdom to advance bilateral trade and investment, education, tourism; cement existing cooperation frameworks and explore new opportunities ahead of Brexit.  
Prime Minister Theresa May has arrived in Brussels for talks with EU officials on Brexit 
Breaking:  Labour sets out new Brexit demands for a deal, including 'whatever it takes to split your party more than it splits ours'. 
"If Brexit is impossible, what hope is there for other difficult tasks in politics, such as reforming public services, controlling immigration, increasing living standards? Will it all be parked in the ‘too difficult’ box?"  
'I’ve been cancelled at short notice twice by the BBC. Once, the show I’d been booked to do went out with just a Leaver on.' The case against the BBC mounts over Brexit bias.  
When Donald Tusk was risking his life liberating his country from Soviet Communism, you were smoking pot at Eton. But sure, you go ahead and smirk at him because he speaks an uncomfortable truth about you and your Brexit pals.  
This is a compromise May is unlikely to accept, but neither Leavers nor Remainers voted for this form of Brexit. The only way to make it legitimate would be for the public to ratify it in a People's Vote which offers the option to remain in the EU. 
Five demands which @jeremycorbyn has made to Theresa May. Not surprisingly, they are @UKLabour Brexit policy. At the moment she is in Brussels being told by the EU that they will not move until she agrees to Labours Brexit plan. Pretty simple really. To everyone but @theresa_may 
"To say that we might crash out, is irresponsible. It demonstrates those who argued for #Brexit, didn’t have a plan"Hilary's face at end   
It is 50 days to Brexit. So little time, so much to do.But we have had 959 days from the referendum680 days since Article 50 was triggered. So much time, so little done! 
As explained to @adamboultonSKY this week the only way I'd consent to any Brexit deal is if it were subject to a #peoplesvote with the option to remian so te public could be given a #finalsay to ratify the deal 
I can see that many of the positions taken up around UK and EU have rational arguments but what is the rationale for saying ‘we will ignore the result of the referendum’ ? ( Btw I’m against referendums ) ( no insults and abuse please) 
Five problems with Labour's five changes to #Brexit deal:1. It depends on fantasy 'close alignment' with single market.2. It puts jobs at risks.3. It takes away free movement rights.4. It enables a damaging Brexit.5. It disregards Labour members who want a #PeoplesVote. 
Speaking in European Parliament about Brexit. I urged people to keep door open to Wales. I mentioned i represent a steel town and the potential impact of tariffs on us, as well as stating that our Leader @Adamprice had been in Brussels yesterday to discuss ongoing relationships. 
Brexit, global slowdown to weigh on Bank of England  
I don't condone violence. I'd always condemn violence but for the 1st time in my life I've understood the motivators behind civil war.The #BrexitShambles has exposed a deep divide in the moral, philosophical & political soul of the UK.#Brexit = OTHERING#Remain = TOGETHERING 
People who suggest that we should remain in the EU and reform it.Are they watching the Brexit negotiations? There is no reform, there is no change, it's their way or the highway. Even with no deal staring back at them they won't budge.YOU. VILL. OBEY. 
Theresa May is likely to return empty-handed as she meets EU officials @mariatad has the latest from Brussels: 
"But a large majority of Labour members and supporters don't want Labour to enable a Tory Brexit""Yeah - fuck em."  
Please note the Government is preparing for a No Deal #Brexit.  If it has confidence in its preparations, it must now start to reassure us and drop Project Fear Mark 2. If it does not have confidence, it must raise its game.  
#BBCR4today  R4 lost 750,000 listeners in a year. Anyone surprised after their rabid Pro Brexit Coverage. Humphries and Sands need to be given their marching orders. 
A public housing construction drive can help us mitigate a bad Brexit – increasing investment to cushion any Brexit-induced downturn while meeting people’s housing needs.  It can be win-win.   
Aw bless.Screaming Lord Adonut has finally realised his #PeoplesVote con is over.Watch these lemmings literally fall apart over the next few weeks.A perfect antidote to the hate & division they have sewn.50 days to #Brexit   
There was a plan in the referendum. The plan was to frighten the electorate into voting remain. Backfired spectacularly. Thank God we are leaving the EU #JeremyVine #brexit 
He wants it to happen, and even if he doesn’t vote for it himself, he’s sending a signal to Labour MPs that they can do so.  Corbyn lays out Labour’s terms for backing May on Brexit | Politics | The Guardian  
So we've got Brexit looming, universal credit still being rolled out to many and energy companies are increasing their prices again. This could make heating a home impossible for many. Looks like Theresa mays #hostileenviroment is going to plan. 
Might as well reiterate that Labour's position is still the correct one, A soft Norway-esque Brexit that doesn't entirely bankrupt the country but does honour the 2016 referendum result is a safer, more sensible, more democratically justifiable position than PV or anything else. 
1. There was no plan to deal with the Irish border and the Northern Ireland peace process2. Donald Tusk attacked "those promoting Brexit" not the UK or 17 million people3. On another matter, can you show me where on pre-referendum Vote Leave literature it mentions WTO terms? 
According to professional snob James O’Brien, the lower orders in Sunderland were brainwashed into voting Brexit by rich posh people like Jacob Rees-Mogg. Remoaners really believe that ordinary people cannot think for themselves. 
Labour's new offer on #Brexit would "secure a majority in the House of Commons" and help "move on from the present impasse", Shadow International Trade Secretary Barry Gardiner tells @BBCr4today 
Senior EU officials have told me bluntly they know Brexit was won through illegality and cheating by Leave. Leaving the EU is not the ‘will of the people’. Brexit is the will of a British government complicit in ignoring data crime, electoral crime and Russian interference.  
"The thousand mile stare" often associated with war veterans, made even more poignant by yours truly. The horror. The ironic thing, just like a Japanese soldier hiding on a distant Island cut off from reality, I still don't know the war for Brexit is over and we lost. #OBINGO 
Co-leader of @scotgp @patrickharvie will be joining our #brexit debate tonight. What happens in Scotland if the UK crashes out? We will be streaming via facebook live and tickets are still available for those who want to attend. Smock Alley Theatre 7pm:   
⁦No deal on Brexit would be catastrophic for British farming,⁦@Minette_Batters⁩ tells the Norfolk Farming Conference #norfolkfarming 
Astonishing thread re Marshall Plan Kawczynski and how Brexit is simply a plan to create as much chaos as possible so certain people (with a special place in hell) can make money.  
"[Tusk's] incendiary and juvenile commentaries of the Brexit negotiations have acted as a gift to Brexiteers", writes @toryboypierce.Brussels is getting frustrated, desperate and has resorted to lashing out as the British cash-cow edges closer to the door!  
Am I missing something here? So May asks Corbyn what she needs to do to her Brexit deal to get Labour's support. Corbyn: "Adopt all of Labour's policies, give or take a few words."  Centrist Twitter: OMG LOOK, CORBYN'S ENABLING BREXIT 
BBC faces Brexit bias accusations over £4m in EU funding' | via @telegraph 
Hard to see Corbyn ever walking through a Brexit aye lobby with May. But getting easier to see Lab MPs, with tacit approval from leader, getting a deal over the line. Permission, but no fingerprints. 
Regarding @eucopresident’s “without a sketch of a plan” comments, here’s Change or Go, 1000+ pages produced before the referendum 
Brexiteers talking about “if we can get through two World Wars we can get through Brexit”Most of you couldn’t even use the self service till at Tesco without losing your shit. 
Oh christ the Brexit Dr with the hairy chuff is all over my timeline again. If you can't get attention for your argument without getting your gargling ewok and spaniels ears out and scrawling over your gunt with a felt tip pen you might want to reconsider your argument. 
Labour's ideas for Brexit are sensible (and I voted remain) but I can't see May going for a customs union because her party is so split on it. It would need Labour votes to win.So I see her rejecting this & giving Labour the excuse to pivot to a new stance.  
I think Labour’s brexit position can be named after the tasteless spread in my fridge: Labour’s “I can’t believe it’s not Norway” plan  
I see we've entered the passive aggressive card sending phase of Brexit  
DUP MLA confirms this morning on @BBCNolan that party did not discuss the impact of #Brexit when deciding to throw their lot in with the Leave campaign - they just wanted out at all costs, no matter the consequences 
This is NOT what we were told 2 weeks ago; Minister said repeatedly  the “majority” of deals will be signed. “The UK govt has told businesses it cannot guarantee the British economy will be covered by ‘most’ of the EU’s global network of trade agreements immediately after Brexit”  
As Brexit Day nears, expectations of a second referendum are dwindling.% who think each is the most likely Brexit outcome, 18 Jan v 5 FebSecond referendum: 22%  12%Some deal: 25%  35%No deal: 31%  33% 
You missed a few crucial points:5. Makes Labour look as if it is enabling Brexit6. Renders Labour unelectable (see "secret" Momentum analysis; a pro-#Brexit Labour loses seats)7. Hastens a split in the Labour partyYou're welcome! 
Don't forget the £4.3 billion for No Deal Brexit planning which is only necessary because May herself has set a cliff-edge deadline. And did I mention the £420 billion Quantitative Easing? No magic money tree, Mrs May? Don't make me laugh.  
Just had a wee in a Wetherspoons without buying anything. Take that, Brexit! 
IT'S NOT A COMPROMISE AND IT'S NOT BREXIT!   
Just to be clear - I won’t be endorsing any form of #Brexit that doesn’t go back to the people for them to have the #FinalSay with an option to keep the deal we already have @peoplesvote_uk 
Tory MP experiencing Brexit hardship by living on just £10,000 a week  
Mobile roaming charges are coming back under a no deal Brexit. Government tried to sweep it under the carpet, but someone diligently dug it out.  
Of the 35 Conservative-held marginal seats where Labour is less than 5% behind the Tories, a total of 28 (80%) voted Leave.Labour MUST win these seats to form a minority government. If Labour campaigned to reverse Brexit, the Tories would become unbeatable.  
I'm not coming 'together' with the racists/ xenophobes / Tory spivs / Far Left / Far Right / thugs / wingnuts (delete as appropriate) who still want #Brexit and I won't be voting for any pro-Brexit party.  
Ignore hell. The significant thing Tusk said is he doesn’t think there will be a 2nd referendum because there’s no Remain leadership. Hence he & Selmayr have in effect agreed to negotiate on the backstop via a ‘codicil.’ I am amazed Varadkar has gone along with this 
The five points in Corbyn's letter are not remotely a 'Tory Brexit'. They represent a far softer version of Brexit, which respects the referendum result, whilst protecting our rights and keeping close, mutually beneficial ties with Europe. In other words, Labour's agreed policy!  
I think the low esteem our people have been taught to hold themselves in should now end. For too long we have played third fiddle to those who live in ivory towers. Brexit will prove beyond doubt that our people are more than capable of making good balanced & informed decisions. 
Tusk is wrong in every way. It's not true that leading advocates of Brexit had no plan for what to do after we left & it's not true that it would have been in any way improper for them to advocate leaving without such a plan had they done so. 
It wasn't during the news breaks, Nick, it was while you were chatting about it and you said, 'Brexiteers'  which in my view means people who voted to leave rather than people who promoted Brexit without a plan. It's a small but important difference. 
Accidental / on purpose slip of the tongue by the Eurostar train guard as we pull into Brussels: “The Brexit, sorry exit, is at the front of the train” 
As @PhantomPower14 says this clip shows the bit about a referendum on Irish unity that the pathetic @BBC left out 
If @UKLabour and in particular @jeremycorbyn facilitates Brexit they will be out of power for a generation. They will lose Scotland, young people and millions of progressive people. 
Brexit has exacerbated a collapse of trust. "How much trust, if any, do you have in the following when it comes to #Brexit?"Net "Trust"Conservative Party under PM May: -42The European Union: -50Labour opposition under Corbyn: -66MPs in Parliament: -69YouGov Jan 31 
#Brexit will be an economic disaster for the UK. Some desperate fools are even calling for an Trump to negotiate. Russia did its job well attacking the EU via UK but no other country will dare leave after seeing what happens to John Bull’s purse.  
Jacob, what you wrote in the Sun about Tusk ("He is saying that 17.4million people are stupid and got it wrong") is a DELIBERATE LIE. He did *not* criticise voters, but he did attack politicians like you who sold Brexit without a hint of plan about how to safely do it. Retract. 
(*Brexit rant alert*) Settled status application rejected last night (after trying to find people with the right android device), because this stupidly crude system only checks against tax records. 
Donald Tusk is absolutely right - the likes of Johnson, Gove, Farage who campaigned for Brexit without a clue how it could be achieved without damaging the country were irresponsible beyond words 
Corbyn's letter to May does four things:1. Shuts off claim that Labour wants to block Brexit2. Erases Labour's previous unworkable six tests.3. Puts blame on May for no-deal Brexit if she refuses offer.4. All but kills off a second referendum. 
No brexiter need be upset by Tusk’s comment. After all, all the #Brexit leaders need to do is show them their brexit plan - problem solved.Unless, unless... 
The UK has told businesses it can't guarantee that most trade agreements the EU has with countries around the world would roll over in time for Brexit  
Former SNP MP scandal: "SNP civil war, independence dead".Serving Tory MP scandal: "Bar incident, stress of Brexit". 
Will our Scottish scribes in the 5th Column Media now be penning pieces saying that due to Ross ThomsonMP and his antics that the Brexit vote will have to be delayed indefinitley and Article 50 revoked? 
"No form of Brexit is better than the deal we already have as members of the EU. May’s bad Brexit will be as damaging for the North East’s economy as when Mrs Thatcher shut down our collieries." Read my article on Nissan's recent announcement 
Remaining in the EU — i.e. "No Brexit" — would satisfy every single one of those requirements. 
WATCH : Our friends @fishingforleave produced a great video overnight. If you're pro-#Brexit and a patriot you might enjoy this. See it in full here : #GoWTO 
Jacob, you've hit a new low by retweeting what you know is a grotesque distortion of what Tusk said. His target was *not* Leave voters but unscrupulous politicians like you who sold Brexit without a thought about how to deliver it, which has led to the current dangerous shambles. 
British Prime Minister Theresa May travels to Brussels in a new attempt to reopen talks with the European Union on the Brexit divorce agreement.  
A challenge to the centrists out there.What do you want to see from a new, breakaway party if you're inclined to support it?Stop Brexit is not a valid answer coincidentally. That's implied if you support the idea of a breakaway. I want to hear what policies you support. 
Bit embarrassing for the BBC. Member of the EU negotiating team on 5 Live this morning praises Corbyn's letter setting out Labour's position on Brexit and implies that it could be the way forward (and that it could command a majority in Parliament). His point was swiftly ignored. 
Nigel Farage’s day:9am: Call BBC anti-Brexit.10am: On BBC talking Brexit.11am: Call BBC anti-Brexit.12pm: Back on BBC. Tell a few fibs, seem to get away with it.1pm: Call the BBC anti-Brexit.2pm: Preparing for my 417th appearance on Question Time. ...repeat to fade  
'If the British want to consider any type of trade agreement with the US, it's important that that soft border be maintained' @RepPeteKing #Brexit  
Hell is not real. It’s not a place. It is figurative not literal. Figurative speech for a wrong/bad place. A ‘no deal Brexit’ - which is the kind referred to - is thought by many people to be one such bad place. 
About time the British people backed brexit.  As a nation we've always stood up to bullies...! The EU is nothing without us it's just pure jealousy they know we'll succeed without having to fund them..! 
EU: What do you want?May: Brexit means Brexit EU: Made your mind up yet?May: Backstop EU: OkMay: No backstop EU: Eh?May: Backstop, yeah but no but yeah.EU: You ok hun?May: National interestEU: WHAT DO YOU WANT?!May: I don't know. You tell me.EU: FFS.May: I blame you. 
Right that’s it. This brexit thing has gone too far.  
Not opposing Brexit could lose Labour 45 seats, says leaked report  
Spin by the Tories and their media mates: Theresa May is too busy with Brexit it’s not her fault she doesn’t have anytime for the NHS, schools etc.The reality: 
We’ve now set out in detail the changes needed to secure @UKLabour support for a deal. Either May accepts them in full and commits to enshrining them in law before exit day or we must move to support a public vote. No other credible options left to prevent a 'no deal' #Brexit.  
Chief Medical Officer:  "I do worry about a hard Brexit and whether we will have all the drugs we need to save lives."@NickFerrariLBC | @CMO_England 
The subtleties of diplomatic language - we know this isn't the will of your people, we know the decision on this madness is yours and yours alone, just because you can't face up to your responsibilities don't you dare ask us to be complicit in your criminally procured result. 
Former head of the British Chambers of Commerce, John Longworth says it isn't Brexit Britain who is in hell, "it is those poor, innocent souls trapped and tangled in debt-ridden Italy, mired amongst the unemployed of Greece and Spain."  Support us at  
Theresa May’s meeting @JunckerEU over there in an hour or so. First of three meetings with EU big guns. I may regret suggesting this, but all qs on Brexit welcome. And we’ll work through them as I report on @BBCNews all the way to @BBCOS much much later on. #BrexitQs 
An excellent @nytimes profile of @mrjamesob and the uniquely British phenomenon of viral radio argument videos in the era of Brexit.  
Theresa May hasn’t got a clue what to do. She doesn’t take a definitive position on anything. She’s clouded by vagueness. All she’s concerned about is blaming everyone else while running down the clock to spook MPs into voting for her deal to avoid a no-deal Brexit.  
Tusk didn't insult our country, he insulted you, the pedlars of snake oil, & unicorns. This is what he actually said: "I've been wondering what that special place in hell looks like, for those who promoted #Brexit, without even a sketch of a plan how to carry it out safely. 
Corbyn’s customs union where you get to control the EU trade deals doesn’t exist. It’s not clever because May can’t accept, it’s a unicorn.It also doesn’t fool Labour Remainers who see him offering Brexit.The final vote will be Deal or No Deal and he will be blamed. 
Fighting Brexit, One Caller and 100,000 YouTube Clicks at a Time  
So the BBC is still misrepresenting Tusk via Nick Robinson this morning, implying he meant all Brexiteers? When this is all over a very serious conversation needs to be had about how the Beeb has facilitated Brexit and spread lies with taxpayer's money. 
Theresa May today has meetings in Brussels, again. This whole Tory Brexit mess is like an amalgamation of Mad Max and Apocolypse Now, using B grade actors, with an unlimited budget for special effects, trying to disguise the fact that the storyline is absolute crap. #GTTO 
Using your mobile in Europe is going to cost a fortune again in future - another hidden Brexit bonus, eh?  
Brexit latest: The government is spending millions on ferry services that will never run from a port that can't afford to run them.  
The referendum was corrupt. 
One day Theresa May says she’ll work hard to address the concerns about Irish citizens asserting their GFA rights in the North post-Brexit.Literally the next day, the Home Office (in answer to a PQ) prove otherwise. British are imposing their citizenship universally on us all.  
No, he was off his nut and acting like the Arsehole he is. What stress over Brexit is he in? Is he in the cabinet? In the negotiating team? What? This again highlights the different standards to which Tory and SNP members are held. It's a disgrace. 
With Brexit looming, everybody Is now discussing theology and 14th century Italian epic poetry. 
Saying millions of people were conned is an outrageous insult. Brexit voters are NOT stupid Anna.  
Brexit is the joke with a thousand punchlines. Designated port for no-deal Brexit ferry company that does not own ferries may close.  
Remember Anti Brexit day of action THIS SATURDAY in #Winchester Great speakers include @Andrew_Adonis @JasonJHunter @vincecable 
BREAKING NEWS Join @MoyerLee @Manuel_TSSA @KatiaWidlak @maritzacalle12 @nurseboothroyd & other trade unionists on 21 Feb for a discussion on how Theresa May's Brexit is a threat to workers & on how we fight back! #TradeUnionsAgainstBrexitMore info 
Theresa May is wasting precious time pretending to make a deal that cannot be made. It's time for everyone to wake up before Flight Brexit to Sunny Uplands smashes into a hillside  
Scotland’s First Minister is getting international recognition for her work.The UK’s Prime Minister is the subject of international ridicule for her work on Brexit.  
#RevokeArticle50 The majority will of the people is to #Remain There is a better future without #Brexit -- #FBPE #StopBrexit #TimetoTalk #BreakingNews #Tories #labourparty @Grey_Wolfcub @Suewilson91 @voiceseurope @acgrayling @PaulKay16 @Labour4EU @emmyzen @LeedsEurope 
Donald Tusk's hatred for Brexit and tantrums show his disregard for democracy  
'Aristocrats are anarchists': why the wealthy back Trump and Brexit  
If King Eurocrat thinks there’s a special place in hell for 17.4 million people I wonder if the Remoaners still want a Second Referendum. Who on earth wants to be run by a group of Brussels bully boys? 
Walk away .... Only way .... Tear up the cheque......   With 50 days until 29th March, the clock is ticking and many of us are hoping for a WTO Brexit | BrexitCentral  
Dear Billy Smart - your circus is missing one of its clowns .........Boris Johnson dumps Brexit parliamentary paperwork in fuel station bin  
Regardless of whether we Brexit or not, centrists are still centrists and right-wingers are still right-wingers. They've nothing to offer politically that I haven't already rejected. 
Brexit is like watching a boat careen over a cliff 
No it’s about getting the Brexit Jeremy has always wanted. Keir was a comfort blanket for Remainers. It’s over.  
A piece in @NewStatesman of the @politybooks 'Down to Earth' by BL  written by Hettie Obrien tying Brexit with the key political question of landing somewhere. Realpolitik needs some 'real' turf. 
Are you coming to join us at #Sodem today to make a stand against Brexit?Wrap up warm it's wet and windy.#StopBrexit@RemainingKind #ThursdayMotivation (Thanks to @ChrisHa33342711 for this photo from last week) 
This headline is outrageous, deliberately inflammatory & NOT WHAT @donaldtusk SAID! THIS IS WHAT HE ACTUALLY SAID!“Ive been wondering what a special place in hell looks like for those who promoted Brexit without even a sketch of a plan how to carry it out safely.”  
This is very serious. The entire Corbyn project was built on a promise to make it a member-led party. This latest move on #Brexit is an affront to members and the policy we democratically agreed at #Lab18.#Labour voters and members deserve so much better than this. 
In a car in London on the way to meet with the head of the National Health System. A politician on the radio:“There’s a special place in hell for people who promoted Brexit with no plan on how to do it.”Mmmm. 
The #Brexiters who seek to trade with the rest of the world, should really take heed of the concerns the rest of the world has when it comes to #Brexit & protecting the #GFA 
The impact of a no deal Brexit doesn’t care how you voted.It’s time to get over yourselves. 
‘@f_philippot: Brexit is a wonderful opportunity - Frexit will be even better. “They shudder because they know the whole world – and all the people in Europe – will soon see you can leave the European Union and live on”  
Yesterday:"HOW DARE HE SAY THAT WE PROMOTED BREXIT WITHOUT A PLAN"Less than a day later:"Hi, me again, I'm back with no plan."  
President Tusk needs to understand we still want to buy German cars, French champagne and Italian Prosecco post brexit- and we can’t buy any of these things in a special place in Hell ..... so stop being offensive and arrange a deal in interests of both EU 27 and the U.K.!  
50 days til fuckin #Brexit and the whole of the uk still have no fucking clue what we are going into #indyref2 
This is a big development. Corbyn offering May clear support for a customs union Brexit. No 10 will use this as leverage with Brexiteers to back her deal or face this option. Welcome relief after a difficult few days with both Brussels and the ERG  
The EU will risk a no deal Brexit to preserve the integrity of the single market, Belgian MEP @ph_lamberts tells @bbcnickrobinson #r4today 
Tusk made wholly correct comments on #Brexit Leaders (not voters) and the lack of united tangible #Remain leadership in #Westminster. Chapeau Donald! I don’t recall #Tusk #Juncker or #Verhofstadt bleating when faced with Wartime and Racist abuse from #Johnson, #Farage etc #Remain 
“We’ve got 6 tests for your Brexit Deal, Theresa. If it doesn’t pass all of them we won’t back it”- “Well ‘exactly the same benefits’ is impossible” “You’re right. Forget that one. We’ve got 5 tests for your Brexit deal....”  
Has anyone heard from @Keir_Starmer ? His silence in the face of @UKLabour 's collaboration with a blind Brexit and the mess it will bring is stunning. 
Can we organise nationwide industrial action in protest at the rise in the energy cap, announced 2day? This is unacceptable. On top of the Brexit fiasco, the Windrush scandal, Universal Credit, austerity deaths, privatisation of NHS etc. We need to show our govt we’ve had enough.  
Union poll shows 'backing Brexit would be worse for Labour than Iraq invasion' - ITV News  
Are you an upset #Leave MP? Are you a delicate, sensitive flower? Prove #Tusk wrong! Simply publish your original detailed referendum plans to prove that you aren't a clueless charlatan. 
Brexit: UK told to uphold Belfast Agreement if it wants US trade deal (via @IrishTimes) 
VIDEO: UK politicians react angrily after European Union leader Donald Tusk injects hellfire into the Brexit crisis, damning British leaders for their failure to plan for the divorce  
Railroaded through without a referendum in the UK. Bye then.  
Corbyn’s Brexit not good for Britain.The silenced majority is not represented by compromise.We want to hear an official acknowledgement that the referendum was corrupt and that Brexit is a mistake. We want to see article 50 revoked and relationships with the EU repaired.  
Brexit will fail and it has made the UK realise that leaving is suicide. It costs just £20 per year to be a member with all the benefits from Erasmus to Euratom. The UK no longer wishes to leave, thanks to brexitears  
Corbyn lays out Labour’s terms for backing May on Brexit: So ⁦@jeremycorbyn⁩ has unilaterally abandoned his party test - they wouldn’t support any deal that failed to deliver the “exact same benefits” as single market/customs union membership. Fail! 
In a joint statement, the First Ministers of Scotland and Wales called on the Prime Minister to ask Brussels for a new Brexit deadline. 
Back in shops today for £2.50 - support our anti-Brexit journalism by buying a paper!  
Wow. This shocks even cynical old me. @SkyNews with a supposedly 'people's panel' on Brexit which hides the fact it consists of two Tory councillors.  
It’s almost as if teaching people about reconciliation after thirty years of brutal sectarian violence between neighbouring communities is a different thing to expressing a hyperbolic distaste for a reckless Brexit plan.  
The radio news here in Luxembourg has taken to playing the Laurel & Hardy theme in the background during Brexit news items. Brutal. 
Brexiteers promoting Anglosphere & Empire Mk2 model for global Britain to replace EU27 & who display indifference to #Ireland & GFA peace process by rejecting WA backstop will have overestimated London's pull in Washington if contrary to Dublin's. Tragic where Brexit is taking UK  
Hmmmm.... “Bearing false witness.” Is that like domiciling your hedge fund in Ireland whilst telling the British electorate that Brexit is good for business?  
Brexit latest: True believers are taking denial & delusion to dizzying new heights.Corbynites: Hold my carrot juice. 
We now have a clearly Brexit supporting Labour leader and a clearly Remain supporting majority of Labour Ms and members. How long will the Labour majority remain silent?Corbyn will back May on five conditions  
This is how ridiculous every single Brexit lover looked yesterday responding to Donald Tusk.Bring on the blitz spirit my butt pic.twitter.com/nEvmrDr9R9 
Billions of assets transferred, exchanges lost, the pound devalued,  inflation up, investment halted, growth lost, jobs lost, housing market weakened and international status dealt a blow in Britain's self-inflicted Brexit hell.  
One of the revelations of Brexit is to see how many of our fellow citizens pledge loyalty to a foreign power and hold our British Sovereignty in contempt. 
Jeremy: I signed the letter to Theresa May.Seumas: Good boy.J: But won't people be cross and say I'm a Brexit enabler going against conference policy?S: So what? Who else are they going to vote for?Intern: Latest membership figures Mr Milne, sir.S: GET OUT!#r4today 
Brits travelling in EU will face immediate return of mobile phone roaming charges under no-deal Brexit, government reveals  
Germany knows. #brexit   
At December’s European Council, Theresa May was asked what is it exactly that she wants, in concrete & realistic terms.Two months later, the prime minister still cannot answer this question.50 days to Brexit. 
How Germany's morning newsletters are covering Brexit:Handelsblatt: Today a visitor comes to Brussels who knows what she does not want, not what she wants. FAZ: As in Belfast, the mood in Brussels is probably rather frosty. Steingart: May is the tragic figure of our time. 
Dear Brexit leaders,If you feel insulted by @donaldtusk's comments on Hell, then it means you are admitting you have no plan for your Brexit.Which can't be true because you could never be so incompetent or irresponsible to push for Brexit without a plan.Could you?Regards,Tom 
UK Government has basically admitted that fresh food exports to the EU will cease after a no-deal Brexit until such a time as they manage to get "listed third party" status for UK. This little bombshell is buried on p.72 of the Brexit Partnership Pack. 
As phrased this Labour letter on Brexit appears to be deliverable. "A UK say on future EU trade deals" is not a high bar and "shared institutions" on single market = single market institutions  
#Brexit : Senior US congressional figures tell UK to uphold Belfast Agreement if it wants US trade deal as Irish foreign minister visits Washingtonvia @IrishTimes 
Donald Tusk is correct. Those that have brought the UK to this point with no plan do deserve a special place in hell.He was not commenting on voter's.#peoplesvote #FBPE #Brexit 
Because two and a half years after the referendum the Conservative Party is still arguing with itself about the colour of unicorn it wants. 
Brexit - making a special place hell 
Yeah too bad#brexit  
The worst thing about Brexit is all those wasted years learning Flemish 
No Beth, Tusk tactless but a statement of the obvious, I’d have thought.  Unless you know a Brexit leader with a plan who has been keeping it a secret until now. Gosh, I’ve just realised: the Mogg plan is to filibuster and go over the Hard Brexit cliff - then to emigrate 
We can only dream Henry. It would mean our Prime Minister finally showed the courage to call Brexit as it is: a con pushed by charlatans happy to destroy jobs and send the country into recession and global isolation.  
RT I’m wondering why @Skynews & @NickFerrariLBC haven’t chosen this Huge Public Interest Story to airGotcha! A QC claims Theresa May is bang to rights under the Bribery Act 2010 @Bbcnews #R4Today #PoliticsLive #Bbcqt @LBC #Brexit @bbc5live #Skypapers 
Don’t waste too much time comparing a Tusk rant with a Merkel conciliatory remark. The EU will tell Theresa May today they’re speaking with one voice on #Brexit  
Moral and economic arguments aside, failing to oppose Brexit would be a strategic error that would keep Labour out of power for a generation. 
The way Theresa May interpreted the EU referendum result was "the most extreme" says Belgian MEP @ph_lamberts. "That's prevented her from building bridges to find a majority in the Commons" #r4today 
Once again Nick Robinson, Theresa May cannot exercise the 'democratic decision' of the British (what about N.I.?) people when that decision was a narrow majority in an illegally funded, corrupted referendum.When. Will. This. Be. Challenged?#r4today 
Do read this article by @cliodiaspora It has caused anger & bitter comments from #Brexit supporting Tory MPs, hard-line leavers, and the serially prejudiced.Howerver, it is right; its analysis & comment is sound; and it is worrying. 
No one with a brain believed Corbyn wanted a second referendum, but many of us assumed he would honour his pledge to party members to obey their instruction and follow party democracy in policy making.He's betrayed them, and @UKLabour voters.@lbc #r4today #PoliticsLive #bbcqt 
The Brexiteers keep chirping on about the "Spirit of WWII" as some kind of rallying call for #Brexit - Scots would be well advised to remember exactly what that means - namely "If the crap hits the pan shove Scotland under the bus!" | #Scotref #Indyref2 
I’ve been saying this for a while now. Labour’s best hope of winning the next general election is to wholeheartedly oppose Brexit. The current strategy isn’t working. 
Donald Tusk says there’s a “special place in Hell” for those who promoted Brexit... What’s your reaction? @JuliaHB1 |  
...that’s us! ‘It also suggests any new centrist party vowing to oppose Brexit could hoover up Labour voters, with 17% of Jeremy Corbyn's 2017 supporters saying they would be "very likely" to back a new party that came out against Britain's EU exit.’   
Donald Tusk’s hatred for Brexit and tantrums show his disregard for democracy  
"TUSK’S POLAND - the most heavily-subsidised country in the EU."  Read our #Brexit summary on this unelected EU president's home country and its reliance on the UK : #GoWTO 
A hard Irish border after #Brexit could cost the UK a trade deal with the United States, according to Democrats  
Except it wasn’t about the 17.4m who voted leave. It was about people like you. Politicians who irresponsibly advocated Brexit without a plan -  knowing full well it would hurt their constituents.  
"PLAYING WITH FIRE?" Another unelected EU President insults UK and humiliates British Prime Minister.  Read our #Brexit response : #GoWTO 
Barry Gardiner: "It's not about tests now." RIP Keir Starmer's six tests for Brexit. Penny for his thoughts right now. 
This is the actual reality @ChukaUmunna Corbyn accepts the referendum result but is the only leader working to ensure an orderly exit with a strong EU relationship. Only Corbyn has the answers.He is the grown up in the room.The true Prime Minister.#JC4PM2019 
Here’s the challenge to Brexiters. Tell us your plan - your safe plan - for Brexit, and then you’ll know Tusk isn’t talking about you. And if you mention a smart border in Ireland, you’re going straight to hell! 
Boris Johnson was paid £51,000 for one speech, MPs’ register reveals.Tories aren't affected by their own horrific policy making. Tories aren't affected by their horrendous Brexit management. They donot walk in our shoes. When will people realise?   
Brexit gives Ross Thomson the horn? That’s the best defence the Tories can manage? 
So true from @rafaelbehr Corbyn's deceits will do for him.   The pretence he would campaign for a 2nd ref. His secret support for Brexit. He's made fools of Labour voters, and they won't forget  
Brexit: Budget cuts threaten Ramsgate ferry plan - To call it a ‘plan’ is being overly generous! Just another example of the chaos surrounding Brexit.  
Mr Tusk was very restrained considering the lies told by Leave and the chaos Brexit has created, not to mention the insults regularly thrown at the EU by Leave politicians, Brexiters & the pro-Brexit press. You 'won', get over it! 
BBC's Nick Robinson is deliberately mischaracterising the words of @donaldtusk by omitting the caveat and declaring it an insult to all brexit voters on #r4today when the EU guy said clearly #noplanbrexit was the problem #bbcnews is a platform for Tory policy. 
We will soon be seeing this in Scotland. Post-Brexit we can expect fracking to be one of the first things to be part of a "UK-wide common framework". This is the price of delay that The Postponers don't consider. #DissolveTheUnion 
We keep on hearing that business cannot make plans because of brexit.The truth is it is not brexit which is the problem .It is our self serving inept third rate politicians that is the problem .These politicians are still fighting the 2016 referendum & refuse to accept the result 
Morning all! Hell of a morning to each and every one of you, but particularly for those who endorsed Brexit without a plan. ;) 
"@UKLabour will get a lower share of the vote in every seat in the country if it has a pro-#Brexit policy than if it has an anti-Brexit position" says a report and poll by the @TSSAunion that were recently presented to the shadow cabinet. 
Still the best Brexit tweet ever!  
If you wanted write a satire about Government incompetence @transportgovuk this is where you'd start. BBC News - Brexit: Budget cuts threaten Ramsgate ferry plan 
I'm not sure who is hurt by Tusk's words and why. Surely if you object, you're identifying yourself as a Brexiter without a plan.Or acknowledging that the UK was sold Brexit by people with no plan.#r4today 
Ireland’s Foreign Minister is in Washington, where he has met with the Congressman whose committee oversees US trade. Some Democrats have told @SkyNews that a hard Irish border after #Brexit could cost the UK a trade deal with the US.  
And because of their relentless #Brexit bashing I'm one of them.  
Tusk called out Corbyn for enabling Brexit alongside May.Hours later Corbyn responds by...publishing a letter about how he can best enable Brexit alongside May. 
NEW: Backing Brexit will cost Labour more votes than Iraq war, leaked poll warns 
Meanwhile, in the €urozone...German business seriously worried about prospect of a no-deal Brexit. Car industry trade body VDA says no deal could have “fatal” consequences; the Federation of German Industry (BDI) says it could cause a “massive crisis”, reports the Telegraph. 
No deal becomes ever more likely.This is 100% down to the Tories.Their referendum.Their red lines.Their awful aggressive & ineffective negotiations.The Tories have destroyed our country. A no deal Brexit is the final nail in the UKs coffin. #GTTO 
Who is Seamus Milne? Why is he allowed to over ride the wishes of the majority of @uklabour members and voters? He has never stood for election, made a statement or addressed the public yet is allowed to back brexit which he knows will destroy the #NHS the economy and the country 
Four men with a ladder: the billboard campaigners battling Brexit  
Government announces binding referendum: Free beer on Saturdays & abolition of tax. No plans exist for how to run the country without tax (or pay for the beer). Nevertheless PM pledges to uphold the vote, even if only 51% support it. “It’s the democratic will of the people.” 
Tusk is right. The Brexit adventure was conceived and delivered behind the bike sheds of Eton. A conspiracy of ruling class warriors, the purveyors dark and dirty money and a gang of right wing thugs. 
Talking @GMB about hissy fit on Brexit by Donald Tusk one of 5 presidents of EU. Unelected, unaccountable. & unacceptable 
After Feb 22nd any attempt to cancel Brexit ("extend Art 50" ho ho ho) would be unlikely to succeed because no-dealers could vote down the govt & force a general election that wouldn't take place until post-March 29th.  
John, what’s up matey, you’re sounding all upset & wobbly?...No need for the abuse matey, surely you don’t ALWAYS have to resort to petulant temper tantrums, stamping your feet is never a good look for a grown up.Now, try and be brave, Brexit will be amazing,  
"Considering #Brexit is just 51 days away this is totally irresponsible!" - Commons finishes four hours early   
The EU has 40 trade deals that cover 70 countries - that's around 37% of the  economy. All of them are better than WTO terms no-deal would force on .  51 days out from Brexit most have not been replicated by the UK . To protect UK trade we need to avoid no deal at all costs  
The truth is Donald Tusk is our friend. It's Brexit that has caused the problems not Donald Tusk. I voted to remain, have not changed my mind and Donald Tusk has just energised me again.  
Brexit: What awaits Theresa May in Brussels after 'hell' jibe?  
Corbyn sends May Labour's demands for a sane Brexit. Never has it been more clear that Jeremy Corbyn is the only party leader working for all the people, not just the half who voted leave or the half who voted remain.  via @skwawkbox 
BBC News reports that $1 Trillion worth of Assets have been moved out of the UK since the 2016 referendum. Brexit dividend they never mentioned on the brexit bus. Fees & profits and tax no longer being paid in UK. Project fact. 
Removed FoM;Removed the #SingleMarketAgainst conference policy on the #PeoplesVoteWill cost the UK approx 3 million jobs;Lying on having a say on trade deals;Backing Tory hard right BrexitGo to hell Labour, along with the Tories.#FinalSayForAll 
European Council president Donald Tusk has said there is a "special place in hell" for those who promoted Brexit without a plan to execute it. For many lawmakers searching for a way out of the UK's Brexit stalemate, his words rang true  
Brexit, global slowdown to weigh on Bank of England  
I've never seen HELL apart from doing my EU job – #Juncker on #Brexit negotiations  
If I grab anyone inappropriately today can I apologise in advance,  I'm a little stressed out, The constant worry of Brexit and being dragged out of the EU by snivelling little shits who don't represent their constituents wishes and betray their country has me all flustered. 
Labour dilemma. If they get the election they want then do they (1) back #Brexit and lose 45 seats, or (2) oppose brexit and only lose 11 seats?If they'd acted on behalf of the many instead of the few (or the one) then Labour would have gained power in 2017.  Now? Not a chance. 
“The United States under President Trump is on a nationalist tear. Britain’s leaders seem determined to drag their people over a Brexit precipice. France is distracted by protests. Germany is preparing for succession. So Canada is stepping up.”  #unpoli 
Brexit: UK will not be 'trapped' in backstop, May to tell EU  
Brexit, global slowdown to weigh on Bank of England  
You voted to trigger article 50, argued against a 2nd referendum and against staying in the single market. Why should the voters you speak of trust anything you say? Why not go and set up your own party if your views have changed so dramatically? You’d make a good Nick Clegg 2.0 
Brexit: Budget cuts threaten Ramsgate ferry plan  
What's the problem matey?He shone a light on the brexiteers who sold brexit to the British public without any basic plan on what to do if they wonHe did not criticize the voting publicHe criticised the pro brexit MPs 
Work urgently with me on Brexit: Britain's May appeals to EU  
Attn Donald Tusk!You ridiculed and sneered at the Brexiteers’ plans Post Brexit !!As Ringo Starr summed it up following the EU Referendum Result....“To be in control of your own Country is a good move!”Yeah!  Yeah!  Yeah!                    Yeah!!!   
Trump and Brexit have ended up remarkably similar. Here’s why  
Congratulations @KFC_UKI Very funny ad in today’s @TheSun >> #Brexit @theresa_may @Number10press #nom 
No. He spoke the truth about the crooks and charlatans that conned the British people into supporting Brexit. The rest of the world knows it was a fraud and wonders why the government or the judiciary have done nothing about it. 
Holding a Scottish Independence referendum at the same time might just be too much for the UK establishment propaganda machine to counter! 
Says woman who 2 days after referendum was moaning that Remainers weren't giving them ideas.. 
The Tusk/Cameron package ceased to be on offer the moment the Leave result of the 2016 referendum was announced. This was in the Council Conclusions on it.  
May's time is running out, as the sordid psychodrama of Brexit rapidly approaches an end  
Brexit A Delusional Decision, Says India’s Minister Hardeep Singh Puri  
Shameful by @JasonGroves1 from the @MailOnline lying and misquoting Donald Tusk as saying there is a special place in hell 'for the BRITISH VOTERS  [my capitals] who wanted rid of him'.#specialplaceinhell#Brexit  
Not opposing #Brexit could lose Labour 45 seatsWe've said this for mths. For #Remain supporters stopping this #BrexitShambles trumps electing Corbyn by miles.We don't see Labour as the only alternative to the Tories.Magic Grandpa is toast.#RevokeA50 
This is where I have come to: every check and balance in the British system has failed. Brexit has shown the fragility of a constitution (and institutions) based on unwritten norms, but the rot had already set in. We need root and branch reform @AnthonyBarnett 
The EU was responsible for calling the Eu referendum? NOThe EU was responsible for the UK demanding the backstop? NOThe EU waS responsible for the UK trying to back out of the backstop which the UK had demanded? NOWho will be responsible if the UK crashes out? THE UK is 
"The complete collapse of our political system." The current crisis is not just about Brexit. It is about an even more profound process of political decay in the UK.  
I respect that she worked her butt off, but she wasn't elected by a majority in her district. About a sixth of the people in NY 14 voted for her. That's not a referendum.Her victory directly correlates to how little time her opponent spent defending his seat. He didn't care. 
Diehard Remainers scrape the barrel of Project Fear but no-one is listening anymore. Some #FBPE living-deaders think Brexiteers will just roll over in apathy. Not a bloody chance. 50 days, folks. 50 days for the DEMOCRATIC vote to be honoured. #csm #brexit  
If I made a Venn diagram of "Brexit," "Awesome ideas," and "Venn diagrams," this particular Venn diagram would be in the little triple intersection in the middle. Super effort, @rdanielkelemen! 
I've been wondering what that special place in hell looks like, for those who promoted Brexit, without a sketch of a plan how to carry it out safely.D.TuskThis devilish Euro maniac is doing his best to keep the UK bound by the chains of EU bureaucracy and control.S. Wilson DUP 
okay @WichitaState if you cancel school tomorrow we WILL vote YES on the referendum 
This is basically the Brexit plan in one tidy meme........  
Talking of plans for post Brexit, I’ll just remind you of these.6 Minutes of Leave Campaign Lies  via @YouTube 
This is a softer Brexit than what you were calling for up until the moment that you realised Corbyn couldn't be removed from the leadership and that you'd never be anything more in Labour than a back bencher. 
Theresa May is planning to delay her 2nd #Brexit deal vote  
It wasn't Labour who gave us Brexit.  It was your friends the Tories and Lib/Dems.  Don't you forget it.Btw, have you got enough super rich donors to launch your new RW Party yet?  The sooner the better 
How do you feel about #Brexit?we asked 120 families with EU27 nationals living in the UK to describe it in three words...  
No, the majority of your party members want to remain and if you’d support a people’s vote you’d find out the majority of the people want to too. I’m 65 and always been Labour but I’ll never vote for you or any pro Brexit party. 
Brexit: a special place in hell - what really must hurt is the simple fact that Tusk is right: we had the leave campaign refuse to commit to an exit plan and then Mrs May launched Article 50 with no idea where it was going to take us...  #Brexit.  
UK: 50 days until Brexit. #Brexit #BrexitDeal 
Canada is "emerging as a moral leader of the free world......is on a nationalist tear....seem[s] determined to drag their people over a Brexit precipice. is distracted by protests. is preparing for succession.So  is stepping up" @NickKristof 
Since the day of the referendum result. All Remainers have done is sneered at those who voted Leave. For me #Brexit has become more about those against it than the actual outcome itself. I despise most Remainers with a passion. You're a snidey, unpatriotic, bunch of losers! 
All these people saying they'd vote leave now, leavers aren't a vindictive bunch we welcome all to the cause of completely exiting from the EU, we knew what they were like before the vote doesn't matter if you voted remain in the referendum it's what you think now that matters 
Six Tests -- GonePlan for a 2nd Ref if no GE - GoneOpposition of Immigration Bill - Not so muchBacking May's Brexit - Yep, no worries!This is a betrayal of the highest order. And yet, still he leads. We are now the definition of good people standing around doing nothing. 
"It's also a masterful political move, painting May into a corner and putting firmly on the record that it will be her responsibility if she fails to turn against her hard-Brexit fringe for the sake of the country" 
Newspaper headlines: Donald Tusk's Brexit 'hell' comments on front pages  
So, am I correct you only hold referendums when you're 100% sure you can win them. Which means. what's the point of a campaign period, might as well go from announcement of referendum right to the vote. 
Brexit campaigners have reacted furiously to the claims of the European Council President Donald Tusk, that there is a "special place in hell" for them. What is wrong with what Donald Tusk said about Brexit campaigners? #DarrenOnLBC 
Difficult to fathom that Cruz/Vote Leave/Trump/the NRA and the UK Tory party all deployed the same data scraping app linking directly to AIQ and Cambridge Analytica. And yet it is 100% truth:cc @carolecadwalla @peterjukes @chrisinsilico @VickerySec 
Corbyn sends May Labour’s demands for a sane Brexit  
The National Institute for Economic and Social Research argues that a No Deal Brexit Britain will escape recession since the government will introduce a £40 billion emergency surplus package and the Bank of England will keep interest rates on hold. 
Sorry... Let me rephrase that.The number of people who have zero religious belief and yet are somehow less offended by politicians promoting a Brexit they had no plan for, than by another politician insulting them for it. #specialplaceinhell ...  
So you admit you promoted Brexit - the most massive upheaval of the UK's socioeconomic structure in peacetime history - without even a sketch of a plan how to carry it out safely?And you really think a few words of his are the problem? 
Not opposing Brexit could lose Labour 45 seats, says leaked report.The biggest political movement in the UK is now #Remain.And Remainers will not forgive Labour for being complicit in Brexit.Write to your MP to demand they vote to #RevokeA50. 
Corbyn’s position - a Norway style deal is the only way through. Whatever direction you want to take in the future - from lexit to returning to the EU, or even if you are a Tory Brexit voter, those are things for future governments to decide. With a democratic mandate to do so. 
Brexiters have brought our country to its knees.They had no plan for Brexit - just shameful ideology and naked ambition.Donald Tusk is right to call them out.Every MP must examine their conscience and vote to #RevokeA50 and #StopBrexit. 
Ah, Corbyn the enabler has put his Brexit support in black and white in a letter to Theresa May. One key ingredient missing: any mention of a second referendum. At what point will his followers get the message that he isn’t the saviour, he’s just a very naughty boy?  
Yep. @ChrisLeslieMP has consistently opposed Labour's anti-austerity policies. If he'd been Labour leader during the 2017 GE, Theresa May would have a 150 seat majority and getting her #Brexit deal through parliament would be a piece of piss. 
Our motive is simple. We are democrats; we voted to give  people a vote, they voted to leave.  Whether it is an election or a referendum I trust the British people to decide on their future.  
Tusk: I've been wondering what that special place in hell looks like, for those who promoted Brexit, *without even a sketch of a plan how to carry it out safely*.Telegraph: Brexiteers have special spot in hell, says TuskNot a truthful representation of his words, is it?   
Only those that had no Brexit plan would be touchy about his words. Getting angry is an admission of guilt. 
#Brexit is wrong & misguidedIt was wrong when 52% voted for it, it would still be wrong if 92% voted for it.People with adult belief systems fight for what they believe to be right, not what is popular 
I supported Better Together's avowed aim of staying in the EU. I also felt that in a future financial crisis there would be strength in numbers.Brexit has changed all that. The only reasonable strategy for Scots now is independence followed by re-admission to the EU. #SNP 
At what point will the commentariat work out that respecting the referendum result and supporting lexit are not the same thing? 
The Government would be gone if it wasn't for Fianna Fail  - Brexit outcome down to Brits, not us  - no excuse. The people know that the Nurses are not being treated fairly + the cost over runs for Children's hospital is a scam. Gov looking clueless but still have FF support...  
Internal contradiction in labour’s Brexit policy:1. The main left-wing reason for leaving the EU is to leave state aid rules2. There can be no permanent customs union without signing up the EU state aid rules3. So…what actual reason does labour have to support Brexit? 
Watch and listen again. He's addressing you directly:#Tusk 
People who confidently predict the outcome of Brexit are being rather foolish I think. Anything could happen. The one thing I think I will dare to predict is that whoever gets their way on the matter, will - righty or wrongly - be electorally toxic for a very long time... 
Donald Tusk, who as a young working class lad help bring down totalitarian rule in his country,  is now castigated by aristocrats, the super-rich and media moguls for his elitism. His crime? To point out the self evident fact that they, as architects of Brexit, had no plan. 
WATCH: EU's Donald Tusk meets with Irish premier Leo Varadkar over fears of hard #Brexit  via @ReutersTV 
There was a referendum, you cretin. You stood on a manifesto that respected the result on certain conditions. Corbyn is simply stating what those conditions are. You clearly don't want to be in the Labour Party. And your own CLP doesn't want you either. Just bloody go.  
All you need to know about #Brexit.  
1. We’re backing brexit as we’re democrats and your lot haven’t persuaded anyone. 2. Ignoring a democratic vote is not a good way to defeat a Tory government. 3. So long as hard brexit is avoided, socialist industrial policy can ensure strong, equitable growth.Hope that helps.  
Brexit: What awaits Theresa May in Brussels after 'hell' jibe?  
Tánaiste @simoncoveney is meeting with members of the US Congress on Capitol Hill tonight. @RepRichardNeal & @RepPeteKing have expressed their concerns about any return to a hard border & the impact this could have on a future UK-US trade deal. #Brexit @rtenews 
#Brexit has amplified all the worst traits of both sides in our politics. The crass jingoism and exceptionalism of the Tories has brought out all the worst snobbery and authoritarianism of the remainers. Trapped in between are ordinary people who are infinitely better than both. 
Backing Brexit - even on these terms - would still shrink our economy, cost jobs and lost investment, indulge nativist nostalgia and isolationism...and pave the way for another austerity Tory Government. Remind me why we’d do that?  
Rather than trying to enable a Tory #Brexit, we should be honest with the public.  There isn’t a deal better than the one we’ve got.  
Brexit is a complex issue. But on this there is clarity. There are people who believe Jeremy Corbyn supports Brexit. And there are people who don’t, and are wrong. 
Still, suspending disbelief to get your much-desired Brexit over the line  has become commonplace on both sides of the House now, so it shouldn’t be a surprise Corbyn would be happy to do so. 
Chuka voted to activate article 50, he passionately denounced a second referendum, he called for abandoning the single market to scrap freedom of movement. We’re all entitled to change our minds on things (I have!) But this is all about him founding a new party and nothing else.  
U ever really wanna die but then remember brexit is happening and u have to stay alive long enough to see Ireland reunited 
Hi @PanasonicProEU, apparently you’ve announced a couple of new cameras with XL Four Thirds sensors in them. As I wasn’t invited to the recent press event (is it Brexit?) I would like to ask if it’s possible to borrow 1 to make a video review please, thanks. Won’t drop it  
Thread. Labour reveals terms of its capitulation to Tories.It not only contains more unicorn-based policies, but includes demands for the future relationship which have to be negotiated post-Brexit, so Labour would have to trust May or her successor to not go back on assurances  
Where Labour is failing on Brexit is to make the case for immigration and migrants. They know migrants have been scapegoated for all the injustices caused by the elites, and now they need to stop equivocating and yelling it from every single rooftop. 
Corbyn's new Brexit tests would bind the UK into EU institutions and regulations as if we'd never left at all.He's sold out to Remain MPs and the big business lobby - it's a far cry from the authentic Corbyn who didn't want to live in a European empire. 
So will you do the right thing for the British people and denounce #Brexit as a scheme built on right-wing lies, cheating and crime with the purpose of creating a British tax haven for the rich? 
The truth at last. Jeremy Corbyn has committed to backing Theresa May's deal.But while Labour is hell-bent on propping up the Tories, the @LibDems will carry on our fight to exit from Brexit. 
Corbyn’s 2 years of Brexit fence sitting is about to get him in hot water on the basis that if you stand in the middle of the road, you’ll get run over. Alienated Remainers by refusing to support 2nd ref. Alienating Leave voters this week by proposing soft Brexit/remaining in CU 
One (but not the only) reason I want Brexit is to leave the Customs Union. Remaining in the CU is a betrayal to the vote. Politicians seem to not understand that it wasn't just about an end to free movement, but also regaining our ability to form FTAs with the rest of the world.  
Donald Tusk did not criticise the people that voted for Brexit. He criticised the people that conned the people that voted for Brexit.Which should be fair enough to anybody that truly values democracy. 
Thatcher and Churchil would have horrified at Brexit. Read your history books! 
70 Labour MPs back a second referendum. There aren’t the votes - there never were.400 seats voted leave.It would be led by the same people as first vote - and in my view likely lose.  
With Theresa May going to NI, Brussels & lastly Dublin on Fri and Leo Varadkar going to NI & meeting May in Dublin on Fri, @tconnellyRTE and I will talk to each other from Brussels and Dublin respectively for the #Brexit Republic podcast on Fri. Just. To. Be. Clear. About. That. 
Dup says Donald Tusk's language was wrong today..and dismissed the idea of a 'UnityRef' in the event of no deal brexit....Scub that ...it was  @MichealMartinTD leader of the Republican Party!.. #Newsnight .. No wonder @fiannafailparty are politically lost with such leadership. 
There is no majority in the country for reversing the referendum result. You can keep kidding yourself, but MPs aren’t, which is why they won’t back it   
And one of them should be Corbyn’s. “Not opposing Brexit could lose Labour 45 seats, says leaked report | Politics | The Guardian  
Look at my homework daddy!  Aren't a good boy?#Cringe #Brexit #Irexit #Juncker 
Said it before. I will say it again. It looks like Theresa May is going to deliver a No Deal Brexit either by incompetence or design. Either way. Suits me.  
The TRUTH that Brexit MP's have absolutely no idea what they are doing is going to smart....and your comments prove just how truthful they are. Grow a backbone and stop misleading your constituents! 
Lucy, there’s no such thing as a “Brexit which protects the economy” and you know it. There’s only one way to ensure a consensus like this could hold and that is to put it to the test of public opinion against remaining in the EU. 
Jeremy, the country will be forever divided especially under a Tory Brexit. How dare you support the Tories and May. You have betrayed the Labour Party and the majority of members that want to remain in the EU. You should be utterly ashamed 
The British people now need to know how May stopped the Metropolitan Police investigating her for bribery, in December 2017, after a four month investigation 
Donald Tusk is bang out of order to  say Brexiteers should go to hell for not having a sketch of a plan about how to deliver BrexitThey did loads of sketches look at this one FACT  
This "plan" requires UK membership of THE Customs Union and THE Single Market. Anything else is just Unicorn thinking by politicians not competent to know the difference. Totally pathetic.#Brexit #PeoplesVoteNow #Finalsayforall #JustMakeItStop #FBPE #StopBrexitSaveBritain 
This typifies Brexit, a huge clumsy dopey, dim-witted lurch into the past, causing expense and inconvenience to millions. The sooner we ditch Brexit the sooner we can restore stability and start to rebuild. To hell with Brexit! #tuskisright 
Thanks for your support Twitters love to you all  United we stand  bring on brexit   
David Davis 'changed his mind' on his previous support for the Customs Union... but the British public aren't allowed to change their minds & have an informed/clean referendum.  #PeoplesVote 
5/5 If May accepts even 50% of Corbyn's demands, the Tory party splits and it's out of office forever. That's why this is a good move. But if it fails, Labour has to revert to No Confidence votes and fighting for a Second Referendum, and it has to whip its MPs for these aims. 
Is this official @UKLabour policy as agreed by its members at Conference? I must have missed that news  So the 2nd of @Keir_Starmer's 'tests' no longer matters and we're now happy to accept a Brexit that is significantly worse that the current arrangements?  #PeoplesVoteNow 
4/ If May tells Corbyn to get stuffed, he can justifiably whip the right-wing Labour MPs who want to support her Brexit plan, expel them from the party and replace them forthwith. He's gone as far as he can tonight. 
Well they didn’t care about the U.K. when they decimated our fishing industry did they?BREXIT FEARS: Desperate Germany issues fishing plea - UK 'could have an EXCLUSIVE ZONE!' | Politics | News |  
Brexit is the work of a ruthless wealthy elite and their pet politicians & journalists subverting democracy in order to win disaster-capitalist profits and a low-tax, low-regulation & low-welfare #Brexit tax haven which will make them even richer while screwing the rest of us. 
This already setting lots of cats among many pigeons, clear signal that Labour frontbench wants to get serious about making a Brexit deal work, rather than blocking it for blocking its sake but.....a thousand buts  
It’s a softer brexit than you backed two years ago mate. It’s also a serious proposal that can bring the country together. Corbyn’s doing adult politics, you’re a precocious child in MPs clothing.  
Last week Theresa May and I met to discuss how the Brexit deadlock can be broken after her botched deal was rejected by MPs.Today I have written to outline Labour's five demands for a sensible agreement that can win the support of parliament and bring the country together.  
Corbyn isn’t just complicit in Brexit.He’s literally helping to drive it.Millions of voters will never forgive Labour for backing Brexit.56%+ of people now want to #Remain.Write to your MP to demand they vote to #RevokeA50 and #StopBrexit. 
This is the clearest sign yet that Corbyn really wants to back a deal. No mention of those 6 tests. Nothing about a new referendum.   
It’s an electoral risk, but Labour now have an unambiguous position on brexit. Its the only one that protects our economy and can bring the country together. Now let’s do everything in our power to bring Labour’s base with us.  
Jeremy Corbyn lays out Labour five Brexit demands in letter to Theresa May -  via @uklabour 
Thursday's Guardian: "Tusk: special place in hell for those who backed Brexit without a plan"#bbcpapers #tomorrowspaperstoday (via @BBCHelenaLee) 
In 2017 many remainers voted Labour. Corbyn has used those votes to ensure we get a Tory Brexit. We have all been sold down the river.  
So where in Corbyn letter does he mention a Public Vote to give the people a final say in a referendum on the deal ? Congratulations on your sophistry  
The Tory Brexiteers have brought Britain to the brink of disaster. We have to find a way to build the biggest, broadest coalition we can on resolving Brexit, and start focusing on the housing crisis, public services, poverty, public ownership, a living wage, and workers rights. 
Corbyn letter to PM sets out terms for support of Brexit - a permanent customs union. Five points, not six tests, with no mention of “exact same benefits”  
For those of us who didn't want Brexit, trying to reconcile the referendum result with the country's best interests - from protecting the economy to safeguarding hard-won rights - has been the main challenge. Corbyn's proposals make sense to me.  
And if May can't agree, our position is to bring her down and/or fight for a second referendum. 
You are so deeply disingenuous. Obviously May won't accept Corbyn's terms because it would make it a far softer Brexit than she could bear. This is clearly a move to show Labour have a coherent position if they can't get an election. Please stop lying 
Here we saw Eurocrat elitism in all its rawness and nastiness: contemptuous of ordinary people, disdainful of democracy, and hateful towards the critical press.  #Brexit 
Corbyn is playing the long game, they said.... of delivering Brexit.  
Corbyn's demands on Brexit1. A place where the unicorns can roam free feasting on a job first Brexit under the eternal light of endless rainbows. 2. Ehm, that's it.....  
Well said @paulmasonnews Time for the shadow cabinet to look at the real trade offs around Brexit, not only for the country but also for the Labour Party.Current stance of the Party not working well if recent polls and falling membership of the party are decent yardsticks  
Corbyn lays out Labour’s terms for backing May on Brexit  
Brexit is a project that aims to dismantle workers', environmental and consumer rights. It is Thatcherism on steroids. We should oppose it. 
I don't need reminding. I know we're leaving because of those who promoted Brexit without even a sketch of a plan how to carry it out safely. 
Oh brilliant. Here's David Davis once again bloviating away, detailing how everyone else was to blame for the failure in negotiations - yet never once making reference to the fact that David Davis was our chief Brexit negotiator for two years.A slippery coward. 
If you are upset by Donald Tusk today and you were a leader of the Brexit campaign then you are admitting you had no plan. If you had a plan, it’s fine, he didn’t criticise you. No need to be offended. #Newsnight 
"The Labour leader’s five Brexit demands are serious, credible, and put the Labour party on a path to backing Brexit": @stephenkb on tonight's letter from Jeremy Corbyn. 
The hardcore Brexiters' various "plans" for Brexit are about as poorly thought through as when a five year old declares they're "running away from home", but can't get past the bottom of the garden. 
Boom. Corbyn sets out five demands for (soft) Labour #Brexit - shows May the way out (or shows ERG what their real choice is here: May’s deal or Labours). Big move.  
Corbyn's letter to May: customs union, shared EU institutions or no support for Brexit. Could not be clearer.  
Big victory for Nick Boles, Lucy Powell, Stephen Kinnock, et. al in that this is a Brexit that can only be met through something like the EEA's Efta pillar:  
Thisinterests me more than anything.*May also shut down an NCA request to investigate Arron Banks before the EU referendum.*Why would May obstruct an inquiry into Banks/Kremlin money for Leave campaign, thus enabling a corrupt vote? Why hasn't this question stopped Brexit?  
Corbyn outlines Labour conditions for Brexit: they are unmeetable without a split in the Tory party. Bring it on. Any Labour MP who undermines this stance should have whip withdrawn: the key is customs union and shared institutions. See @guardian breaking now... 
Regarding Brexit, Corbyn has asked for:-Customs Union-"Close alignment" to single market-Alignment on rights and protections-Participation in EU agencies and funding programmes-Agreements on future security arrangementsIt would mean a good Brexit deal.May should accept.  
Photo du Jour LATE EXTRA: @jeremycorbyn writes to @theresa_may outlining Labour’s five Brexit demands. By Stefan Rousseau/PA  
I understand the desire to seek a parliamentary consensus to resolve the #Brexit crisis. Not sure backing May’s botched deal in return for non-binding promises about the future is sensible or would work. #brexitshambles #peoplesvote 
Labour says it respects the UK decision to Brexit.Corbyn now says the UK must stay in a permanent Customs Union, align to the Single Market and commit to funding EU agencies. In other words, Remain. 
This is not Opposition, it is the facilitation of a deal which will make this country poorer.A strong, coherent Labour alternative to this shabby, Tory Brexit is absent - it has been since this Parliament began.Totally demoralising. /1   
Never forget that if there is any kind of #Brexit the Tories will, at the first opportunity, use it as a launch pad for a much harder #Brexit which will force the UK to become the low-tax, low-regulation, low-welfare tax haven economy they crave. #PeoplesVote #FBPE 
Speaking to @Channel4News after meeting with British PM Theresa May, Sinn Féin deputy leader @moneillsf said the backstop is the bottom line and can’t be renegotiated #Brexit  
Not opposing Brexit could lose Labour 45 seats, says leaked report  
Mike Russell on TV just now complaining that “Scotland didn’t vote for [Brexit] and Scotland doesn’t want it”.But, @Feorlean, more Scots voted for it than for your party. So I guess Scotland doesn’t want the SNP either. 
I think Donald Tusk was just stating the truth about the People who Promoted Brexit with no Sketch to do it safely.  A fair criticism. Compare, here we have one of those people calling the French President an actual Nazi with no justification whatsoever  
This is a really significant move to break the Brexit paralysis and deliver a Brexit which protects the economy and gives us a strong partnership for the future.  
Seriously? Offering to help Tory Govt enable #Brexit?It’s not just Labour’s conference policy in the bin  When the jobs go & revenues for services dry up as a result - Labour’s leadership will have ZERO right to complain: they share responsibility 
Is there a special place in Hell for those who wouldn't let us burn the bondholders and piled the debt on to the Irish taxpayer? #DonaldTusk #Brexit 
Tories accused of ‘robbing pensioners’ over ‘sneaked in’ pension credit cut @IanBlackfordMP accuses the government of “sneaking in” the cut while “the chaos of the UK government’s shambolic Brexit negotiations dominated the headlines.”  
#Corbyn is betraying Labour party members, who overwhelmingly back a #PeoplesVote, but has also dropped his key demand for the exact same benefits as staying in. He is clearly looking for any reason to support the deal and enable #Brexit. Disgraceful!  
We should be looking after our #NHSWe should be taking serious action against Climate Change.Instead our govt is bickering about #Brexit - the most selfish act of national self-harm ever.There were 28 countries in the EU.27 of them have the sense to stay there.  #bbcnewsten 
Has there been a calculated decision to try and stop Brexit by making Brexiteers so apoplectic that they all explode?  
If Labour are not seen to respect the Referendum result we will forever be known as a Liberal elitist remainer, London centric party that sneers at working class leave voters and treats them with contempt. If that's what people want, go right ahead. But I won't be joining you. 
The UK has told businesses it can't guarantee that most trade agreements the EU has with countries around the world would roll over in time for Brexit  
Call a referendum now Nicola.What's keeping you?  
I hope the Irish Government is fully prepared for what comes after Brexit. The next page of the script. Which will be "Europe showed solidarity with Ireland, why does Ireland now refuse to work with Europe on corporate taxation?" 
Labour's new Brexit stance: as important as "permanent customs union" is single market access "underpinned by shared institutions".  Means EEA membership or similar - and means free movement or similar.   
And thanks for reminding us of the greedy lying rich bastards and their pet politicians and journalists who are trying to con our country into granting them massive disaster-capitalist profits and a #Brexit tax haven which will make them even richer while screwing the rest of us. 
My regular reminder that a Customs Union is a hard Brexit, just less hard than No Deal and a bit less hard (if comprehensive) than and FTA.  And will leave the path wide open for any Govt with a majority to rip it upDim.Bugger the 6 test and policy 
Labour should oppose Brexit not because it’s the right thing electorally, but because it’s the right thing for this country and to protect the people Labour should be fighting for and oh look, it seems it’s the right thing electorally too. 
Just muted a few people suffering from Brexit derrangement syndrome. Life is already better. 
Brilliant The Thick of It offering here matched only by Ross Thomson’s Tory pals blaming his zipper fingers on Brexit stress. Truly, Iannucci,  you are redundant.  
Not opposing Brexit could lose Labour 45 seats, says leaked report | Politics | The Guardian  
Never voting for the arrogant Donald Tusk or that puffed up popinjay @guyverhofstadt ever again. Oh wait... We never voted in these unaccountable Eurocrats in the first place.Brexit. Now.  
Labour members.Corbyn has, again put two finger up to you and your best judgment.What are you going to do about it?  He is busy losing you what you want.  Losing the country.Losing the next election.He is going to have to fully own Brexit.  
No Mr Tusk, 'hell' is being trapped in the wretched European Union:  #Brexit 
On my timeline today I've seen the Tusk comments about hell, Verhofstadt about Lucifer, and a Remain-supporting Cambridge academic walking around naked saying Brexit is taking Britain down the Yellow Brick Road.I have no idea what stage of grief we're in now. 
Donald Tusk’s frustration is fair -only saying what many of us feel - that Tory/other Brexiteer leaders hadn’t a plan when they glibly talked of “taking back control” in 2016. Leave hadn’t a clue then & they’ve no workable plan or clue now & risk us going over Brexit cliff edge 
17m voters: We hate Europe, We hate Europe, We hate Europe.Europe: Go to hell.17m voters: How dare you say nasty things to us!#Brexit #shambles 
Another belted by @GuardianAnushka, leaked TSSA polling suggest Labour loses seats in remain areas by backing Brexit - but does not pick any up in Leave areas  
“If you see something that doesn’t look right...” says the train.So I called the number and said we appear to be hurtling towards a Brexit date with no idea how to meet it or stop it or prevent a disaster.And they said “we deal with unattended backpacks really”. 
[WATCH] Swiss Welcome Brexit  
Tomorrow’s front page: Tories under pressure to suspend Ross Thomson after he’s kicked out of a bar for ‘groping’. MP colleague bizarrely tries to blame ‘Brexit stress’  
It's just a matter of time until Tusk walks out for an EU/Brexit press conference with Varadkar following behind on all fours, on a leash, in a gimp mask. 
WATCH: President of the European Council Donald Tusk fiercely criticizes Brexiteers, and hopes to avoid a hard #Brexit  via @ReutersTV 
Cover of @TheNewEuropean Oh! Jeremy Corbyn! Duvet want Brexit after all? @jeremycorbyn & @theresa_may as  @liamgallagher & @patsy_kensit 
Big stories on Labour in tonight’s @guardian -  Corbyn writes to May setting out terms for backing Brexit deal DROPPING opposition to withdrawal agreement but demanding new clauses, including customs union in Political Declaration & written into UK law  
NEW: This Leaked Report Reveals Liam Fox’s Favourite “Technological Solutions” To Keep The Border In Ireland Open After Brexit  
How DARE a forriner criticise our brave Brexit Leaders for having no plan! Outrageous!...............What was the plan?#specialplaceinhell #DonaldTusk #LedByDonkeys 
Brexit is a right-wing Tory ideological project. We should not be nodding it through.Not opposing Brexit could lose Labour 45 seats, says leaked report  
Tanja clearly got to him, he felt he had to react and yet all he could come up with was to question her academic credentials?? Greg you wrote an article for Conservative Home that tried to argue that Brexit was a nasty German plot. Sit down. 
No, he insults the f*ckwits like you who promised that leaving would bring Brexit benefits.Even now you can't stop lying. Deceit is all you know.#specialplaceinhell 
The Eu President just said there is a special place in hell the people who campaigned for Brexit without a plan. IF I FOCKING SCRIM.  
I suspect today’s outburst by Donald Tusk just made it slightly harder for those MPs conspiring to keep us bound in a customs union.  Signifies Eurocrats not really fighting to stop Brexit - just bind us into satellite status.  Will Boles and Clark still try to help them? 
Since the referendum London has added 5,800 finance jobs. Over the same period New York has lost 900. 
.@jeremycorbyn lays out Labour's five Brexit demands in letter to Theresa May  
Imagine being that irrelevant that the news overtakes the football game your team is playing...When we went to ET at Southampton we moved the Brexit speech. We’re massive. #dcfc #dcfcfans #wba #wbafc #bhafc #saintsfc 
Guardian front page, Thursday 7 February 2019: Tusk: special place in hell for those who backed Brexit without a plan  
Brexit Latest: If they are moving in, I'm moving out, warns Satan  
NEW: Jeremy Corbyn has written to the PM setting out 5 demands that could see Labour back a Brexit deal. Wants Government to commit by enshrining them as objectives in domestic law... 
I just wonder if Donald Tusk's eruption today about "hell" and Brexiteers shows the pressure is getting to the EU leaders. Pehaps Theresa May is successfully using the huge Commons defeat to her advantage in the Brexit talks? #Brexit 
While the nation is preoccupied by #Brexit, I thought a reminder about our crumbling public services, homeless people dying on the streets, a failed universal credit system putting livelihoods at risk, rising in-work poverty rates, & the impending collapse of the NHS, was overdue 
Remarkable. After all the claims that the City would go into meltdown in the event of Brexit, let alone no deal, a tiny story reveals that, in fact, nothing will change.  
What about the arrogance of not being able to guarantee that Brexit won't kill people, but pushing ahead with it anyway? If we're comparing arrogances, that would seem to be the runaway winner... 
BBC News - Brexit: Spain and France oppose Scotland EU talks  
Krishnan Guru-Murthy nails the IEA's Shanker Singham, 'you're making this up' he tells a flustered Shanker who finally admits food prices will rise....it's pure cakeism....we're leaving EU but we'll both recognise all regulations and standards, okay EU? 
There will be a "special place in hell" for British politicians who promoted Brexit without any plan for how to deliver it, says the European council president  
If you missed this thread in March 2017, you should probably read it. It’s the second one of two Brexit threads from all that time ago and it covers no deal, blaming the EU, and amendments, etc.  
Stress? @RossThomson_MP should try to walk a mile in our shoes @the3million . He asked and campaigned for Brexit, I didn't and yet I don't know if I'll be allowed to remain in my own home amongst my family and friends of more than 35 years  
Listen Jane ‘gobby’ libtard  it’s not your right to be angry with anyone.It’s because of Remainers telling Barnier they had the power to halt Brexitthat EU Bureaucrats think they can talk this way.Every time they call us it’s their position that weakens. 
To be fair, after his dealings with the UK Government over Brexit, for whom the ninth circle of hell is reserved, Donald Tusk probably looks back on his time painting chimneys with a certain degree of fondness. 
It is beside the point to defend him by asserting how the Tories are to blame for Brexit. Of course they are. The problem with JC's position is way it has been shrouded in a kind of dissembling mist. 3/ 
If only...Boris Johnson & David Davis are both now griping from the wings, convinced that they could deliver the 'best Brexit for Britain'. When they were in charge, all they exhibited was clueless ineptitude!  Donald Tusk is right, there is a #SpecialPlaceInHell for them! 
UK PM MAY PREPARING TO DELAY A SECOND VOTE ON HER BREXIT DEAL UNTIL END OF FEBRUARY - THE TELEGRAPH 
Theresa May delays vote on deal until month before Brexit amid warnings Article 50 extension is inevitable  
MUST-READ: Not opposing Brexit could lose Labour 45 seats, says leaked report - it's time for Labour to throw its support behind a #PeoplesVote. Please RT: 
Those who advocate an ideology that causes others harm knowing that is so - and there can be no doubt that Brexit has and will continue to cause much harm - do deserve a special place in hell. 
FT EXCLUSIVE: Most major EU trade deals - including Japan, S Korea, Canada and Turkey - won't be rolled over to UK after Brexit, EVEN under May's deal, trade dept warns businesses:  
I think, regardless of one's position on Brexit, the fact that the government has (a) no idea if all non-EU trade deals will roll over, and (b) won't inform business which ones they have yet to sort out, ought to be considered an utter dereliction of duty.  
Not opposing Brexit could lose Labour 45 seats, says leaked report.It’s time...#PCPEU #GTTO #DonaldTusk #LeaveMeansLeave #specialplaceinhell #LetsGoWTO #FBPE 
Fwiw (and I know many will dismiss my judgement on this) I think Corbyn's defenders are misunderstanding how his Brexit position is damaging. Yes, some ardent pro-EUers wish that had been his view too ... 1/ 
The faux outrage of Brexiters over this comment is absolutely telling.They never complained about hyperbolic language from their own side, and none of them dare address the central complaint that they had no plan for how to actually do Brexit.  
Cheap imitations of iconic British foods like Cornish pasties and Melton Mowbray pies could flood supermarket shelves as a result of Brexit.  
Vital infoLabour have maintained “constructive ambiguity” (to my frustration) all the way to the point where the base have shifted so far from Brexit that it can safely go pro-EU.....and there is absolutely *nothing* to gain or preserve by letting Brexit happen.It’s time.  
Business fury at UK failure on post-Brexit trade deals  
I’ve found it - it’s called Dover and Calais .. invite mogg and his cronies there after March 2019 and get them to tell the transport industry how good Brexit is . Bet you they won’t last long . 
“Never seen so many UKIP members attend a meeting in Strasbourg before… the subject? Members entitlements after Brexit!” 
Keeping Brexit anger at bay is getting increasingly difficult, as I keep seeing new ways everything is going to be much worse. No EHIC, no free data roaming, extra custom checks, extra insurance costs, no freedom of movement - what a bloody horror show. 
Peter Brookes on Brexit #Farage #BorisJohnson #TheresaMay #Tories #Brexit #BrexitShambles - political cartoon gallery in London  
The special place in hell will be Dover and Calais - let’s get mogg & Co Down there telling truckers how good brexit is and see how long they last . 
The inferno was started and continued to be stoked by Brexit advocates like you @FraserNelson. @eucopresident and @guyverhofstadt care more about the british people than our corrupt gov and totally deluded opposition. 
BREXIT FEAR: Desperate Germany issue plea as they PANIC over UK's 'EXCLUSIVE' fishing zone  
European Council President Donald Tusk says the European Union will not make a new offer on #Brexit, and that he has been wondering 'what that special place in hell looks like for those who promoted Brexit'  
Tusk says ‘special place in hell’ for those who promoted Brexit without plan  
Great to be invited to address a meeting of Windsor Labour Party. Really wide ranging discussion covering #Venezuela, #Brexit, redistribution, #WASPI, democratising the economy, the fourth industrial revolution and a policy programme to avoid climate catastrophe#ChangeisComing 
TSSA polling, shown to Momentum leadership last week, shows that if Labour facilitates Brexit it loses seats in Remain areas and gains none - zero - in Leave areas. My @LMDiplo article  
Been saying this for a long time: Labour’s path to power lies through stopping Brexit.  
I would encourage ANY brexit MP / broadcaster / no deal maniac / WTO morons - get your arse on the seat of a van and see for yourself how important the freedom of movement of goods ( and yourself ) really is .. you don’t have a clue what’s coming . 
If people knew what ramifications of No Deal Brexit would be, believe you me, they'd be wondering if there was a special place in hell for those who'd advocated for something as destabilising as Brexit without any plans. 
If they force a crooked criminal #Brexit on the UK without a #PeoplesVote and against the will of the majority, there will be many of us who will regard that as a crime against democracy and will work tirelessly to jail the culprits. 
I’m in Spain where the UK ambassador is urging Brits to register legally with the authorities before Brexit. Funny how relaxed everyone seems to be about undocumented migration  when it’s UK citizens doing it.. 
“Politicising it”! Mr Ball Brexit has always been the most Political of projects. That’s not my fault. Blame it’s  architects, Farage, Johnson and Rees- Mogg.  
Donald Tusk is right. Brexiters lied and cheated their way through the referendum.They had no plan and no clue beyond their own naked ambition.Brexit is a shambles. Brexiters are a national disgrace.And the best way out of this mess is to #RevokeA50 and #StopBrexit. 
I am currently reviewing the origin of everything I buy with aim of eliminating as much EU produce and products as I can. No point in buying from a near federation that wishes you harm. Post Brexit I look forward to American chicken, African vegetables, Chinese cars & SA Wine. 
Tusk's arrogant comments are so typical of the EU elite. They take pleasure in pulling at the British Lion's tail - "we who defeated or rescued half of Europe|". But, he has over-stepped the mark: many people who weren't pro Brexit are disturbed by the EU's attitude now. #LIBERTY 
The impact of no deal Brexit begins next week. My client, who exports to Japan under eu rules, stops exporting next week as it takes 6 weeks for goods to arrive and there is no paperwork to support the import from a non EU UK.  Will only take weeks before job losses. 
I wonder at times, if the people who voted for Brexit, would do so again if given the choice. I’m not asking for a huge debate here. I’m just openly voicing my concerns for the future of British and Irish people.2/2 
This is my first and possibly last political tweet.I believe the majority of educated people are fearful of the affects Brexit will undoubtedly have. As a British tax payer and an Irish citizen, I worry for what is to come. 1/2 
Brexit Britain: a man in a clown suit with his trousers round his ankles repeatedly punching himself in the balls, in the belief that if he STOPS punching himself in the balls, people will laugh at him. 
Sinn Féin has demanded a referendum on Irish Unity! It has been made clear that this is the only way now to save the Good Friday Agreement.  
Man involved in Brexit campaign wonders if others have been bearing “false witness.” Can anyone remember any lies, mis-statements, untruths, deceit, falsehoods, fibs or porkies associated with Brexit to help @Jacob_Rees_Mogg ? 
This hasn't got the coverage it deserves by @uk_tpo (@ilonaserwicka & @NTamberi). Similar to the work by @JohnSpringford on GDP, but shows much bigger effect on investment - some 20% lower than might have been the case without #Brexit  
“It is perverse for Irish observers like Fintan O’Toole to accuse Brexit Britain of being nostalgic for empire. It is Brexit voters who are revolting against empire — the EU empire — while O’Toole and the Irish elite suck up to it”, says Brendan O’Neill 
Failed Brexit Sec, David Davis, wants a No Deal Brexit at any cost...ANY COST! This idiot 'Brexiteer' should not be allowed to further influence the mess, much of which is his making...for the sake of the UK keep him out of the news! #BrexitShambles  #SpecialPlaceInHell 
Le Brexit...  
.@moneillsf says the UK crashing out of the EU without a deal is grounds for a referendum on Irish reunification  
Donald Tusk’s #specialplaceinhell comments don’t apply to me, because I was prudent enough to prepare a detailed implementation plan for Brexit:  
So what of the snowflakery & pearl-clutching in Britain after Tusk's #specialplaceinhell presser?It may have cost May's Brexit deal some votes from wavering Brexiteers.... & he also threw Remainers/ People's Voters under a bus, telling them to give up and back the deal.1/ 
Me on Mighty Mouse Macron and Cardinal Tusk #Brexit #French riot law criminalizes protesters, Yellow Vests  via @YouTube #GiletsJaunes 
Apparently not opposing Brexit will cost Labour 45 seats. For a brief moment when the Glastonbury crowd were singing his name, Jeremy dared to believe he wasn’t a sad and pointless old white man.Oh dear! Reality catching up Jez. 
EU not looking funny or clever after today's childish diplomatic outbursts. Member states will be watching their antics and asking themselves if they really want the Commission to be driving them hard into a Brexit outcome none of them want.  
Soooo I've just had a sneak peak at @joshua_pieters's prank on @Joe_Sugg and @dbuzz6589 and you are IN FOR A TREAT.  They're going to have re-open the Oscar Nominations and it'll probably solve Brexit.  That Good. 
7 weeks to Brexit and you are asking questions like this.What the hell are you doing to stop it given it is already crystal clear it will harmour country A LOT.What are you doing apart from cow-towing to hopeless Jez against your better judgment? 
Important this. If There's no deal by 29th March it is up to he UK to extend the deadline they arbitrarily chose, or to revoke #Brexit.It was not the EU who triggered A50 without a plan.It is not the EU running down the clock.  
Brexshitters for years: "We can do anything. Jumping off that cliff will be FINE. Go on plebs JUMP! We are right behind you. A no deal Brexit won't hurt at all"Yet they are having a tantrum over Donald Tusk saying a few words. Hypocritical wimps#ButthurtBrexiters 
The British people want to #RemainInTheEU. This #Brexit is a horrendous scam. Do not cooperate with the criminals that are doing this to the UK. 
Brian Feeney: DUP should be firmly challenged when they spout nonsense about Brexit #premium 
Growing fears over a no-deal Brexit are colliding with a wider slowdown in the global economy, putting Britain's growth in peril  
what are you talking about?  My friend @DavidLammy 100% right - time for sensible people to speak up and show that this Brexit nonsense is a total abject disaster being driven by right-wing crackpots and fools who never had any sort of plan and have been found out -Brexit=debacle  
Who would you like to see as Prime Minister?**Please retweet after voting **#Conservative #Labour #UKIP #SDP #ForBritain #Time #Sovereign #Brexit #WTOBrexit #StandUp4Brexit #StandUp4Democracy #PM 
@DeborahMeaden Just to say thank you for your tireless efforts to promote common sense and the practical realities associated with Brexit. It is appreciated. 
Tusk: Special place in hell for those who promoted Brexit 'without plan'  
You know when Theresa May said she'll guarantee the rights of EU citizens in the UK even after a no deal Brexit? The truth may be more nuanced...  
How has #EU become a signatory to Good Friday Agreement?It seems EU can interfere at will with agreement’s 3-strand relationship between UK, NI & Republic of Ireland– even though it's not a sovereign state, was not involved in negotiations & signed nothing.-Tele Letters#Brexit 
UGH. hearing that two Tory Brexiter MPs have privately spoken of how 'thrilled' they are about Remainers attacking Labour, because they reckon if Labour knows they've lost the Remain vote, they'll back May's deal.don't you dare @UKLabour!! oppose Brexit and we'll vote for you! 
He didn’t say or infer that at all. He was speaking with the Irish Taoiseach about preserving peace and security in Ireland, and was referencing PROMOTERS of Brexit who did not have a plan how to do it safely. 
Not opposing Brexit could lose Labour 45 seats, says leaked report.“If there is an election in 2019, Labour will get a lower share of the vote in every seat in the country if it has a pro-Brexit policy than if it has an anti-Brexit position.”  
Immigration minister took the wind out our sails today after Theresa May's pledge to 'urgently' review Irish citizens rights in NINI-born Irish citizens cannot apply to retain their EU rights under the Settlement Scheme due to being British Citizens #WeAreIrishtoo #Brexit  
This is bollox & anyone blaming Brexiteers for "no plan" is simply not telling the truth.David Davis etc were working fine, towards a sensible #Brexit.Our duplicitous PM & her cohorts run a dual plan & dumped that work in favour of this sham capitulation #WithdrawalAgreement. 
What do you suggest we do with those who have lied and cheated their way through the referendum and are prepared to shove millions of us off a cliff? Prison I thinkWTO? We will be 4th League. £39bn? Who will trust us if we don't pay our debts? 
I’ve come to the depressing realisation, that whatever happens with Brexit - whether we leave with a deal or not, if we end up remaining or not - this nightmare will NEVER end, because all the tedious idiots on every side of this interminable debate will still be here regardless. 
.@UKLabour’s Deputy Leader @tom_watson responds to our leaked @TSSAunion document that says not opposing Brexit could be worse for the Party than the Iraq Invasion.  
At every stage of Article 50 talks the EU has called the shots. The first defeat for the UK was on sequencing which has been the foundation of every subsequent defeat. That's why it might have been an idea to have a plan.#Brexit 
"How dare Donald Tusk talk about a special place in hell for those who promised Brexit without a plan!" say people who 3 years later and with 51 days to go still don't have a plan. 
My hat’s in the ring for the John Humphrys gig. ‘More on Brexit later, but first, members of the European Commission as biscuits.’ 
Every Labour member should take this leaked TSSA poll analysis seriously - it shows that if Labour is seen to facilitate Brexit it loses the next election. And Scotland. It could be wrong - but let's see the polling evidence of those who dispute it?  
The genius of the Donald Tusk insult is that to be offended by it, you have to admit to having no credible plan for delivering Brexit, despite being full-throated in your support of it. You can't be offended without proving yourself ignorant at best, fraudulent at worst... 
EXCLUSIVE: Secret union poll shared with @PeoplesMomentum and Shadow Cabinet Members shows "backing Brexit would be worse for Labour than Iraq invasion"  
WATCH: Steven runs a boxing club in Sunderland. But his first job was at the local Nissan factory. Brexit means it will no longer produce the new X-Trail SUV. He wants a #PeoplesVote on the #Brexit deal. Demand a #PeoplesVote now:  
Germans are familiar targets of post-war British populists. But now, @cliodiaspora writes, Brexit leaders, wallowing in an entirely misplaced sense of English exceptionalism and entitlement, see Germans as easy targets to blame for the deepening crisis  
Looks like the pressure was getting to Donald Tusk today when he said Brexiteers will go to hell.I think the EU never believed we would leave but as we get closer to the date they are realising they are losing control and Brexit will cause the EU to collapse 
Alex Salmond:      “Sexual Assault”Ross Thomson:     “Stress induced groping due to Brexit” 
"Brexit has shown the world a British parliament and a political class that resembles a ship of fools without a captain."  
Ruddy ‘ell Frances how do you sleep at night with all that fear running through your head. Brexit will be the best thing to happen to this country for many years and the corrupt and dying EU know it. 
At one of the Liaison Committees, PM also acknowledged and bemoaned the lack of Brexit plan that she inherited in Downing St... 
This is a remarkable admission of guilt.‘Baroness Sayeeda Warsi, who served in David Cameron’s Cabinet, concedes that the promise of a Brexit referendum was not something the Conservatives thought they would have to deliver on.’#Brexit#ItWasAllALie 
Former Brexit Secretary @DavidDavisMP says May could get her Brexit deal through as the EU have always said No until they say Yes.  
BREXIT FEAR: Desperate Germany issue plea as they PANIC over UK's 'EXCLUSIVE' fishing zone  
Donald Tusk ponders "the special place in hell" for those who campaigned for the divorce without planning the finer details  
Jeremy Corbyn will not be remembered for his bloviating about Latin America or the Chagos islanders or Palestine - despite talking about them for decades. He will be remembered as the enabler and facilitator of Theresa May’s Brexit and all the jobs that are lost as a result. Nice  
I'm about to have my family torn apart, my right to free movement taken away, my research funding halved and my colleagues leaving, and I've managed not to grope anyone#RossThomson #brexit  
Tusk's theology. Cuddly Trudeau has special place in heaven. 'Unsafe' Brexit supporters have a special place in hell  
... also see a year after the referendum in the House of Commons the then Foreign Sec and chief Leave campaigner for example actively boasted about having no plan for No Deal “There is no plan for no deal, because we are going to get a great deal”  
'Sometimes the Truth Hurts'Another day another Brextremist makes an arse of himself. Watch @joannaccherry expertly take down blundering Bone. Arron Banks will no doubt particularly enjoy this after the little financial misunderstanding he had with -ahem - 'Boneglove'  
Not opposing Brexit could lose Labour 45 seats, says leaked report  
France, Ifop poll:European Union membership referendumRemain: 60%Leave: 40%Field Work: 18-21 January 2019Sample Size: 1,210#Brexit #France 
1/4 .@uklabour In advance of the PLP motion on antisemitism, JVL wrote to all Labour MPs to lobby them on behalf of the Labour leadership...They suggested the timing of the motion was a plot to sabotage @jeremycorbyn playing his ‘vital’ role in Brexit.  
Whether or not you personally like Zoe is irrelevant to this principle. And any attempt to turn it into a referendum on Zoe personally is to feed into the idea that it's only wrong to mob-harass someone and threaten their life if you approve of them. 
Party Policy to CAMPAIGN for a public vote is being treated with contempt @jeremycorbyn @Keir_StarmerThere's no GE, no Labour Brexit, no chance of our tests being met. We're headed for a Tory 'enabled by Labour' Brexit or a devastating no-deal.Members will leave in droves.  
This is what Brexit really looks like; hard hitting & impacting real people right now. The #onlywayforward is clearly a #PeoplesVote 
Do you want a #PeoplesVote? Why so/not? #Brexit #FBPE #StandUp4Brexit 
What did @eucopresident say that was insulting or even incorrect? Those who promoted Brexit without even a sketch of a plan of how to deliver it should go to hell. I applaud him. 
Magic Mushrooms Could Solve Brexit, Claim Desperate UK Scientists  
What Donald Tusk said today has put the final nail in the coffin of a second referendum or #PeoplesVote It's now looking more than likely we leave without a deal with a spring in our step singing "Rule Britannia" watching as we do the EU starting to crumble and burn.  
No he insulted you not the 17.4m that you misled. It was you that promoted Brexit without a plan. 
Brexit, in one image.  
Backing Brexit Worst amongst their membership ?But not in the country I suspect .. their Northern base will be eviscerated 
17.4M people voted Brexit trusting that the politicians who gave us the choice would have a good plan for getting us out of the system we rely on for 1/2 our trade, billions in farming aid, 1/3 our food, medical supplies & a disproportionate no. of UK doctors.#SpecialPlaceInHell 
Brussels says Tusk wasn't joking, Brexit really is hellOfficials close to Tusk said he was just speaking his mind. 
.@krishgm asks @iealondon’s Shanker Singham: “If we have a no-deal Brexit, food prices are going up, yes?”Singham: “They may go up for a temporary period, yes, but I think there are ways of mitigating that.” 
Sinn Fein leader in Northern Ireland @moneillsf tells @krishgm that it's "incumbent on the British government" to bring about a "unity referendum" in Ireland if the UK leaves the EU without a deal #C4News #Brexit 
Bob Moran on #DonaldTusk #TheresaMay #Tories #Brexit #BrexitShambles - political cartoon gallery in London  
Nigel Farage LASHES OUT at BBC over Brexit - ‘Biased Brussels Corporation!’. Hardly a revelation, the BBC has displayed its anti Brexit bias since day one of the campaign..  
A poll shown to Momentum and shadow cabinet members shows 'backing Brexit would be worse for Labour than Iraq invasion', @Peston has learnt 
Leave or remain, the details of any plan were always to be decided post-referendum, via constructive negotiation. That this hasn't happened is entirely down to the intransigence of men like Tusk, and their determination to force Britain to overturn the result of the referendum. 
I've got the giggles now. All I can see is a bunch of angry people hearing Donald Tusk say there's a "special place in hell for those who promoted Brexit without even a sketch of a plan of how to carry it out," and thinking, "Wait a minute, he's talking about me!"  
Hated Brexit backstop is ILLEGAL under EU rules, top lawyers warn. Quite right, and as the only side threatening a hard border is the EU, it’s time to bin it. Article 24 of GATT allows free trade to continue for up to 10 years in any event..  
To all brexiteers - listen very carefully. This is a heartfelt message to the UK - he could have said much worse about those who still can't agree a plan to leave the EU over 2.5 since the referendum. And he could have suggested that those responsible should be locked up in jail  
If you’re a brexiter who is purposefully (or ignorantly) pretending that Tusk was referring to *all* Brexiters and not the select few in positions of power who shouted for Brexit with no clue how to deliver it, then you’re every bit as Fucking pathetic as he thinks they are. 
Secret union poll shared with @PeoplesMomentum and shadow cabinet members shows "backing Brexit would be worse for Labour than Iraq invasion"  
You are the EU’s Main Brexit Negotiator @guyverhofstadt ! Beyond belief that you could be so openly aggressive & hostile to a nation that democratically made a decision to leave the EU. Beyond appalling; you & @eucopresident should be ashamed. The rest of the world is watching. 
Tusk is right - and Brexit is destroying the political fabric of the party system: my ⁦@LMDiplo⁩ feature... 
The #Sodem vigil #nightwatch night shift is go!If you can't make it down during the day why not come down after work?Make a plan with with friends and make a stand against Brexit.#StopBrexit@RemainingKind @rnaunton 
UK  |  |  |  |  |_ _ _ _ _ _ _ _ _ _ _ _ _ _ _ _                                              |   Finding sensible                |   solution to Brexit          |  _ _ _ _ _ _ _ _ _ _ _ _ _ _  _ | | | | | |Blaming the EU and the Paddies 
He wasn't speaking about Brexit voters, he was speaking about the divisive liars and cheats who promoted Brexit. Like those who now pretend a catastrophic no-deal was put to the British people.Like you.  
"I've been wondering what that special place in hell looks like, for those who promoted Brexit without even a sketch of a plan how to carry it out safely".This is what European Council President Tusk said at a presser with the Irish PM in Brussels. 
Joanna Cherry nails the Brexit snowflakes and the speaker bones Mr Bone - this would be a funny item on a pier end show but is tragic in the self claimed "mother or parliaments"  
Donald Tusk's 'hell' jibe risks turning Britain towards a no-deal Brexit. An unelected EU President showing his distain for the 17.4m Brits who chose sovereignty and self determination over the ‘European Project’’.. #ManagedWTOBrexit 
The more unreasonably the EU behaves, the more reasonable #Brexit becomes 
The specific point about not planning for Brexit before vote though is not really controversial at all - as I was told the weekend after the vote...“There. Is. No. Plan”.  
On Tusk - needless calculated display of trolling re “hell” - obvious point of it, combined with Varadkar was to try to communicate EU ready for & not to blame for No Deal and UK lack of readiness. Now up to UK, MPs, “pro Brexit” Labour to choose if it wants No Deal Brexit or not 
Tusk has quite clearly lost it.He should remember that most of the political figures who campaigned for Brexit were not in government, and their task was restricted to winning a Remain/Leave referendum.What really angers him is that they succeeded.   
I've been saying for years that the route to Remain required Labour to come on board, and the way to cause it to was to maximise the political cost of Labour adhering to Corbyn's support for Brexit. I still believe that strategy is right and if A50 is extended it can be executed. 
When Donald Tusk referred to the “special place in hell” for Britain’s Brexit campaigners, it reflected a growing fear and frustration in Brussels that Theresa May is hostage to hardliners in her party  
No journalist dares ask the biggest question of our time...Why is the UK government pursuing a Brexit strategy aligned with the foreign policy objective of our enemy Putin; to simultaneously weaken UK and EU?Brexit works for the Kremlin but not for Britain #FBPE 
Hold a referendum on England leaving the United Kingdom.The Scottish have had the chance to vote for independence, it’s about time the English had the same right.Well..... Seems only fair!  
The BBC One show are showing a segment on brexit and stockpiling. 1 woman stockpiling food and another on about drugs.Wtf, the media should be saying that everything will flow normally.Shows how stupid people are and how the media are manipulating everything.#ridiculous 
Donald Tusk is right. There has never been a plan, or an attempt to confront the choices any Brexit must entail. This from way back in Oct 2017. Not a message you hear from most MPs. 
Regular visitors to countries outside the EU will know the significance of this.In 2017 on holiday in Florida, my data charges were £5 per MB. I switched all data off but had I not, using as little as 1GB would have cost me £5,000.That's what's coming with #Brexit 
Lawyer Who Won a Brexit Case Targets Uber Over $260 Million a Year in Taxes. 
Let’s be honest, the people Tusk was talking about, the people who promoted Brexit - Farage, Johnson, Rees-Mogg, Davis, Raab, Hoey, Galloway, Lawson, Redwood, Gove etc. - are all complete and utter tossers.Even if I’d voted for Brexit, I’d be honest enough to accept that. 
Pls can those entitled to a #specialplaceinhell tell us what your safe Brexit plan is, because so far we haven't seen it? It wd appear Tusk is right to accuse you #borisjohnson #jacobreesmogg #nigelfarage #ids #andrealeadsom etc etc of leading us, & the EU, over the cliff edge. 
For me that's a reminder that the most crucial form of left internationalism is not defending economic integration on neoliberal terms (i.e. demanding another Brexit vote), but building solidarity between left democratic leaders in the South & North, from AMLO to Corbyn to Bernie 
"Since the referendum, Giulia @GiuliaSavini1 has felt scared when walking through the town she's made her home. She's even been called a ""another f***ing immigrant"". #BrexitIsPersonal  /1" 
It does. It alters the constitutional status of NI without the consent of the populace. Any alteration must be put to a referendum. It's not difficult to figure that out. It's the consent principle and clearly brexit is against the consent of the electorate  
Upset Leave MPs, get your revenge and prove Tusk wrong by simply posting your original detailed referendum plans online to show how you aren't all charlatans without a fucking clue, driving an entire country to destruction in the hope of profiting from the hell you create. 
Good meeting with the Speaker of the Riksdag @andreasostgote  and his delegation, #ruleoflaw #Europe #Brexit and the importance of strong bilateral relations, also between Parliaments. @AsaWestlund 
These days, the Tories will even use Brexit to excuse a colleague's alleged sexually predatorial behaviour. Astonishing.  
Let's tweet this photo every night to #Catalonia's leaders imprisoned by #Spain's #FakeJustice for the #1O #1Oct #Referendum #InquisitionToCAT trial. It quotes the 'night night' wishes shouted LIVE EVERY NIGHT to our leaders by #JoanBonaNit & 100s gathered outside prisons 
This is insanity. The Brexit ref was advisory, stop section 50 
Jeremy Corbyn will go down in history as the handmaiden of Brexit, the Ramsay McDonald of his day, the objective ally of W R-M, Boris Johnson and Nigel Farage,  via @TheEconomist 
You promise unlimited freeloaders a free lunch ticket then wonder why it’s not sustainable. That’s exactly why we voted brexit 
Aww. Do you need a safe space, Fraser?Meanwhile...... How can they think such language will be helpful? 
#Brexit#BrexitDEAL#BrexitChaos WE THE PEOPLEWONTHE RIGHT TO LEAVE THE EUTHIS WASN'T A REQUESTTO PARLIAMENTIT WAS A FCUKING ORDER pic.twitter.com/Yg1FiacApK 
When Donald Tusk referred to the “special place in hell” for Britain’s Brexit campaigners, it reflected a growing fear and frustration in Brussels that Theresa May is hostage to hardliners in her party  
#specialplaceinhell for #Brexit bullies who have taken time out from calling other people snowflakes to collapse in tears over a remark by Tusk. Still expecting Ireland to sort out their problems.  #BrexitShambles #WeAreAllDonaldTusk 
Note he says “...those who promoted #Brexit, without even a sketch of a plan...safely” ie. the campaign LEADERS, not Brexit voters. And I agree with him.  
@eucopresident has not insulted the UK. He has not even insulted those who voted for #Brexit . He has rightly criticised the irresponsibility of advocating a course of action with no plan to achieve it. As for @PeterBoneUK , he needs to grow a thicker skin. RT this please. 
Colleagues of MP Ross Thomson 'worried about stress he was under from Brexit' Tories defend his sexual assault incredible.  
"[On #citizensrights] this is the last opportunity to do the only thing that is morally right: to salvage what has been agreed on citizens’ rights through the article 50 procedure, before Brexit day.” says @maikebohn 
We should all sympathise & empathise with anyone who is suffering from stress. But why doesn't Tory MP Ross Thomson reflect on the stress he & his ultra-Brexit fanatics are inflicting on millions in pursuit of their ill-thought out #Brext dogma? 
This is unbelievable. The Herald defending this wee cunt. Stress my arse. What about all the European Citizens who don't know if they can stay in their own homes with their families? What about all the folks who don't know if they will be in a job post Brexit? Disgusting.  
Boris Johnson compared the EU to the Nazis, Jeremy Hunt compared the EU to the USSR and that's all fine but the Brextremist nutters go apeshit when Donald Tusk points out they had no Brexit plan.@LBC #wato #newsnight #r4today #PoliticsLive #c4news  
Thank you #DonaldTusk on behalf ofEvery EU citizen who's been spat at, shouted at, sworn at, punched, told to speak English, go back to your own country. Who's been called a queue jumper, an 'illegal immigrant', who's been refused a job, a flat, a mortgage!well done!#BREXIT  
Disgusting behaviour from AWL members here. Heard there’s been no apology for these threats to kill a senior trade unionist. Tommy Robinson-esque behaviour - all in the struggle to stop Brexit...   
#Brexit #BrexitShambles #PeoplesVote We're running out of time, running out of options. No deal would be a disaster for Britain. @RemainerNow @LabPeoplesVote @Labour4EU @ct4europe @EK_EuropeanMove @labour4europe 
The eve before a key #Brexit meeting and you guys are piping up with stuff like that?! Seriously. What is wrong with you? Grow up and get some professionalism. You are embarrassing.   
June 2016. Michael Gove and Boris Johnson wait excitedly to show the country their detailed Brexit plan. The result of 1000s hours of hard work. #DonaldTusk 
.@donaldtusk Thank you for reminding us why we voted to leave! To be rid of bullying, tin-pot eurocrat idealogues like you. #BelieveinBritain#Brexit 
Mr Tusk is a factually correct good Christian.The Referendum was a scam to solve Tory politics.Leave campaigners were convicted of fraud, & further arrests expected.  The campaign was based on lies, as Elliot admitted.  Dantes 8th Circle of Hell is reserved for Fraudsters.  
For EU Freedom of Movement to be removed without an appropriate constitutional process such as a supermajority referendum vote should be regarded as a crime. Let us vow to campaign tirelessly to ensure the orchestrators of this crime are put behind prison bars.#Brexit #FBPE 
Looking forward to appearing on tonight’s . Will be talking about latest #brexit developments as well as hearing more about David Davis’ FTA proposals. @ Television Centre, London  
Some seem to think the Tusk comments reflect EU weakness. Rather, the herd-like stampede of Brexiteers expressing faux outrage with lack of awareness of own conduct demonstrates a certain clutching of straws in the face of the complete fiasco that their Brexit process has become.  
European Council President Tusk's 'place in hell' remark targeting Brexit promoters stirs backlash  
How long would it take to replace Jeremy Corbyn in a leadership election?Is it possible to do it before #Brexit ?Remain needs political leadership and Jeremy Corbyn has made Labour the handmaiden of a Tory, far right hard Brexit. 
The one truth they couldn't face up to was that Brexit could not be done with a magic wand. It has to be done gradually and with care. But after a long campaign of industrial scale lying they couldn't tell the grunters that so they set about promoting no deal as optimal. 
Some flexibility is starting to be demonstrated on the Brexit issue in Brussels...  
The PM has a route to a real Brexit but must avoid any customs union, says @OwenPaterson 
People who want to stop Brexit: -Tony Blair -Alastair Campbell-George Osborne -Lord Adonis -Jean Claude Juncker And they wonder why we want to #GoWTO? Join the fastest growing Brexit movement @  
Sneering at Brexiteers is a masterstroke by Tusk. By appearing arrogant and aloof, I'm sure Brexit voters will see us as their natural superiors and change to support remain. Guaranteed. 
Sakes! Could he no' just have started hoarding lavvy paper like everyone else feeling Brexit stress? 
"Fintan O'Toole's knowledge of Britain is reliant on clichés":@David_Goodhart hits back at the self-righteousness of @fotoole - and grapples with the meaning of Brexit and the English Question... 
Rather pessimistic wouldn’t you say Gary? In our long history we have overcome civil war, economic depression, world war, a three day week... Brexit will be a very minor footnote. Very pleased you’re not batting on my side pal. 
"You will be fine," they told @the3million."You will be fine," they told the @BritishInEurope."Brexit will make no difference!" they said.Well, guess what: It does make a difference. We have now been #inLimbo for 957 days, and there is no end in sight.#AlreadyNotFine 
NEWS! Man with no plan whatsoever for Brexit outraged by someone pointing it out  
Far-right populist lies. We all know there will be no cheese after Brexit. Even if there was cheese, no one would be alive to eat it. Except maybe Nazis. 
Neither does a Brexit plan. 
The Tories have just admitted 7,990 people died within 6 months of being rejected for PIP, since 2013. Their current Brexit shambles will make sure hardly anyone gets to know about this.Please retweet this if you think Tory Ministers should hang their overpaid heads in shame. 
Lol, the PM’s spokesperson just described the referendum campaign as ‘robust and lively’, which is Tory fucknozzle for ‘dishonest and racist’. 
Time to sort out this Brexit mess!Donald Tusk is right.  There is NO plan for brexit there NEVER was!Time for the people to decide their futureTime to "Hold a second referendum on EU membership."Agree?Then SIGN this petition Now RT it!#FBPE 
He is not talking about Brexiteers...many of whom voted to leave for good reason. He is talking about those who misled, lied,paid illegal cash to influence and promote Brexit without any idea of how to actually achieve it. This is not about Brexiteers. This attacks Charlatans.  
Look. Let's all cool the rhetoric down.  #Brexit  
Donald Tusk once described the giving of a free and democratic EU referendum vote to the U.K. electorate as “dangerous and stupid”.  Here he goes again..  
If anyone would like training in BDD, Agile / Lean leadership and coaching, Kanban, or just a bit of help on the ground to get things flowing, I've got some days free this month and next. London preferred but all EU possible. Last chance before Brexit! 
Somehow, Britain has ended up in an abusive relationship with the European Union – and Britain is the abusive partner, says @JonnElledge Oh, and there are 51 days to go until Brexit.  
I worked for the BBC for 25 years, and risked my life for it. It's failed on Brexit.  
MAD Brexit fool Peter Bone gets a total slap down from Bercow and Cherry  
Looking for your Brexit questions for this evening in Chester #CH4euask @Andrew_Adonis sorry to be missing you this evening.... 
That rather demonstrates how out of touch you are with millions here in the U.K.But, of course, that is your preferred modality.  As before Brexit.Stick fingers in ears.Sing “Lalalalalalalalalala” over everybody in the vain hope it will change opinions. 
As the decades long route to Brexit nears its conclusion the often used phrase “First they ignore you, then they laugh at you, then they fight you, then you win” may well be apt. 
New from ⁦@paulwaugh⁩ - Brits travelling in Europe will overnight face the return of mobile phone roaming charges in the event of a no-deal Brexit  
The exposure is almost cruel.What @eucopresident Donald Tusk said today is something any responsible politician should have been saying loud and clear prior to the referendum. And every day since.#RevokeA50 
Watch the European Council's Donald Tusk say there'd be a 'special place in hell' for those who advocated for Brexit without knowing how to deliver it. Read more:  
You know this degree of outrage from the Brexit brigade about Tusk’s comment? I would love to see it every time BoJo actually insults foreign politicians, or when prince Philip opens his mouth and says something racist. 
The whole of Scotland is in one way or another stressed by the prospect of Brexit but the vast majority of us tend not to sexually molest young men in bars.  
A genuinely extraordinary Man with no axe to grind and real sadness when he speaks of Brexit. I seriously admire him.  
Tom misses the rather obvious point here. If the Leavers had outlined a plan *before* the referendum, the EU would simply have said "not possible," because they wanted us to stay. Which is what they're doing now on UK proposals for similar reasons.  
These 'alleged' sexual assault complaints should be taken seriously. I can't actually believe that the stress of #Brexit has been used as a genuine excuse.There is no excuse, what the actual f! 
.@BBCNews getting on its high horse about Donald Tusk calling out the liars who wilfully misled the British people in the EU ref. The Brexit Broadcasting Corporation wasn't so uppity about Jeremy Hunt comparing the EU to the USSR or Boris Johnson comparing it to the Nazis was it? 
When Theresa May entered Downing Street, the country was still smouldering from the referendum. Rather than applying foam, she poured on petrol.  
Don't underestimate the remain backlash. There will be a price to pay. Many of those MPs that support or enabled Brexit will lose their seats. You can't alienate millions of voters and think nothing will happen.#brexit #PeoplesVote 
Perhaps surprisingly, ITN and Sky are reporting it objectively. ITN in particularly seem to have risen to the occasion, no longer making any bones about Brexit being a shambles. But BBC News are just... no words. 
'Guy Verhofstadt, who serves as the European Parliament’s representative in Brexit negotiations, has said ,'the devil himself would turn Brexiters away from the gates of the underworld for fear they would “divide hell” too',You've just lost 39 Billion euros ! 
Sooo.- Grayling has been banned from Calais for being an eejit.- Erstwhile Brexit negotiator Raab clearly had no idea where Calais was.and- Thomson has been ejected from a Westminster bar for inappropriate groping.Things are going swimmingly for the Tories, aren't they? 
Tusk has been very measured until now. So, I read this as a strong signal the EU feels ready for a No Deal Brexit. If so, it could get really nasty, eg. UK refuses to pay, EU ups customs checks, etc. The consequences for the UK are potentially catastrophic  
Brexiteers talking about “if we can get through two World Wars we can get through Brexit”Most of you couldn’t even get through a Donald Tusk press conference ffs. 
Revealed: Brits WILL face mobile data roaming charges in a no-deal Brexit. Govt has quietly slipped out new draft regulations. 
Jawdroppingly, the party of government has finally found something that it is willing to blame on Brexit.  
Donald Tusk has, for me, just said what needed to be said, on behalf of the millions of us who have been suffering for nearly 3yrs through the uncertainty of Brexit, the steady trickle of companies leaving the UK, and the general deflating of the British morale. 
If the proponents of Brexit had a viable plan, they would be able to rise up against Tusk’s comments, confident in their own competence. But they are angry because they haven’t, the truth hurts. They are pretending no Deal is an actual deal it’s not, they failed, they own it 
Clearly outrageous for Donald  Tusk to wonder what the "special place in hell looks like for those who proposed Brexit without a sketch of a plan" 
Donald Tusk is being a little unfair - some of the leading brexiteers actually have had a sketch of a plan for brexit all along: #specialplaceinhell 
The EU have made it clear to Brexit politicians (and they include Corbyn in this) they hold you responsible and they despise you.It’s over. Negotiations are over.Deal or No Deal and don’t expect any favours at trade deal time in EU or US with their Irish lobby. 
And don’t I know it! My bar tab is already sky high tonight & it’s not even 7pm yet. I’m sat here in the bar; ale in one hand, red wine in the other, whisky on standby, debating with friends if this is what heaven looks like for remainers who warned about the dangers of #Brexit.  
Legally, there is NOTHING stopping the Government from refusing Parliament a Meaningful Vote (if the PM feels she cannot win one, or can only do so by destroying her Party) & simply defaulting to a No Deal Brexit on March 29. The Commons needs to fill the process void. Quickly. 
2/2 If they arrive after a no deal Brexit on 29 March, what tariff will they have to pay and what customs declarations will they need? Just asking for everyone in the UK who makes cars for a living. 
“I’m not sure sorry’s enough.”Baroness Sayeeda Warsi, who served in David Cameron’s Cabinet, concedes that the promise of a Brexit referendum was not something the Conservatives thought they would have to deliver on, in the latest Ways to Change the World podcast.  
Remainers... ''Leavers did not know what Brexit would look like''.Leavers... ''Well, we sure know what the feckin EU now looks like! Vile unelected Technocrats, who are hell-bent on punishing the UK.'' 
Donald Tusk has lashed out at the politicians who promoted Brexit without any plan for how to deliver it safely.  
Do you two realise how deliberately offensive you are being toward people supportive of Brexit of a religious belief.You are being casually offensive to a deliberately discriminatory manner.You should both apologise and withdraw. 
#specialplaceinhell A new low for the @BBCNews. Tusk is a villain and not one voice permitted to say otherwise.The @eucopresident is 100% correct in saying that Brexit was promoted by people without a hint of a plan as to how to do it safely.  Way to miss the point, guys. 
Andrea Leadsom accused of making "misleading claims" on her CV.Surely a leading Brexiter would never set out to deliberately mislead people? Perish the thought!#Brexit #RevokeArticle50 #PeoplesVote 
So far the British government has got through just five of 11 major laws needed to make Brexit workable  
The utter stupidity and viciousness of these idiotic remarks is a timely reminder of why people voted for #Brexit. @guyverhofstadt and @eucopresident represent a political elite out of touch with the people they claim to represent. Roll on #Brexit! 
Any of the delicate Brexiter snowflakes who’ve taken personal offence at Mr Tusk’s words today are by definition accepting that they promoted Brexit without even a sketch of a plan of how to carry it out safely. What a thing to admit. 
Okay, so let me get this straight, the ones who want us to stick with a referendum where there was proven cheating and never vote on it again are “pro-democracy” and the ones who want another vote on it are “antidemocratic”?Got ya. How Orwellian. 
Who needs @Brexit4Students when you have @guyverhofstadt to promote the Brexit cause?!   
Such a brouhaha over @donaldtusk’s colourful language today. But when this normally mild-mannered man erupts in frustration, we must ask why. Maybe #ChrisGrayling’s inept comment has something to do with it, that if there is no #Brexit deal, it will be *their* fault. 
I think this goes too far. #Obama threatened, #Tusk damned, but #Verhofstadt mocks and scorns. He seems to be trolling the entire country. It's the sort of tweet which cements #Brexit, strengthens the resolve of #Brexiteers, and wins converts to the cause. #specialplaceinhell 
Even hell would feel like heaven after being stuck with these two idiots. Thank god for #Brexit. It can’t come soon enough. What a pair of horrors. 
Disappointed to see @BBCNews at 6pm still headlining with a truncated version of what @eucopresident actually said followed up with comments from 3 of the very #Brexiteers he criticised & no opposing view. Is this really what passes for balance? #Brexit 
A refreshingly frank and blunt Ways to Change the World from Baroness Warsi in which she admits the referendum was done to keep her party together, that it was appalling and reckless and that the Tories have a major problem with Islamophobia and prejudice - including amongst MPs  
You are out of order @sajidjavid Capitalizing on a deliberate misinterpretation reported gleefully by a pro Brexit @BBCNews. Sajid, it is time to stop playing childish games and save this country. GROW UP. 
Nobody wants to follow the UK! Not after the disastrous and incompetent handling by the vulture capitalists, and the cause being taken up by the Lunar (Extremely Online) Right.EU approval is up across the Continent since the referendum!  
BREXIT IN: 51 DAYS. 51 SECONDS.Hell hath no fury like an EU scorned... #DonaldTusk #Brexit  
Was #DonaldTusk correct in what he said about certain #Brexiteers? #specialplaceinhell #BrexitRT after you Vote. 
.@Nigel_Farage: Tusk’s comment shows the EU are scared of a WTO Brexit.Let's Go WTO @  
Fun fact: While we do indeed place no upper limit on how much you can hold in your euro account, we do have a €25,000 daily transfer limit. If only the Brexit payment was that much!  
Brexiters: “You’re bullies! You’re like the mafia! The Nazis! The Soviet Union! We fought you in the war!”Tusk: “What is the place in hell like for those who promised Brexit without a plan?”Brexiters: “How dare you use insults!" 
Tory colleagues have cited Brexit for the stress that Ross Thomson was under...  
Pray continue Guy and Donald. You are doing more for the Brexit cause than any of us mere voters ever could. Allez!  
Donald Tusk's comments about Brexiteers going to hell are insulting and shows how scared the EU are. We want a World Trade Brexit, saving £39bn! Let's Go WTO @  
The English language has yet to invent the words to describe how uniquely incompetent Theresa May’s Brexit negotiating strategy has been. #brexit #BrexitShambles #BrexitDeal 
Thanks Guy, thanks Tusk you really are going to make it a landslide for vote leave if we ever do have another referendum  
If you’re offended by what Tusk said about the people who pushed Brexit without having a clue, you’re going to hate Dante’s take (Via Wikipedia)  
Now that a 2nd referendum is almost impossible ,the EU do not have to hide their attitude...They thought they’d got our Remain MPs to stop Brexit & make us vote againIts now about trying to make themselves look the stronger .. but with their economic woes and riots #NotTheCase 
Donald Tusk's 'hell' jibe risks turning Britain towards a no-deal Brexit  
Dear Theresa May, your Brexit plan is doomed. Here’s a deal that will work | Gina Miller  
Tusk managed to be very clear that he was talking about Brexit leaders who lied and had no plan. He did this in his third language. Stop misleading people.  
Exactly. No Brexit supporter is going to look at these comments and think "well, perhaps I better change my mind". Remain voters and centrist MPs on the other hand...  
Medieval picture of the day. Donald Tusk explains we have reached the circle of Hell reserved for ill-prepared promoters of Brexit who are spending all eternity arseing around ineffectually.  
Brexiteers feeling insulted by Tusk are implicitly admitting they didn’t have a plan to carry Brexit out safely. Which circle of Hell was it again? 
Dear @theresa_may, your Brexit plan is doomed. Time to restart the talks your predecessor began with @eucopresident. They are our last hope. Yours, @thatginamiller.  
At 5.40pm you #bbcpm said that Donald Tusk said "There's a special place in Hell for Brexiters".Mr Tusk did NOT say that.Mr Tusk specifically referred to those who advocated Brexit without having any plan for its delivery.Please correct before the end of the programme. 
.@policescotland officers in my constituency have informed me that no new officers' annual leave is being granted for about a month as of Brexit day (29 March). This demonstrates the sheer madness and mis-management over how #Brexit has been handled by this Tory Govt.  
BREXIT BOLLOCKS @dave5wol REMIX #MiriamMargolyes @BreakfastNews  
EU now sees Brexit unstoppable, aims to avert 'fiasco'  
Blimey- @iainjwatson reports govt considering new legislation to get Labour MP s on board for the Brexit deal - a new Employment Bill might tempt some over.... well worth a read here  
he does not say that- he's talking about the Brexit leaders with no plan...this is blatant clickbait bollocks  
Steven runs a boxing club in Sunderland. But his first job was at the local Nissan factory. Brexit means the factory will no longer produce the new X-Trail SUV. He wants a #PeoplesVote on the #Brexit deal. Write to your MP now to demand a #PeoplesVote:  
Frankly most of us are well past that,  we just laugh at their campaign knowing that it just drives the harder #brexit . Welcome to your 3rd recession in the euro zone in 10 years Donald and Claude 
And this is equally as bad. The majority of Britons votes to leave and they hate us for it. It’s time to walk away. #Brexit  
It is a bit rich of pro-Brexit people to appeal for more moderate language from Tusk. He’s angry. A lot of us are angry. There are people who cheerled for Brexit who never had a plan, only ideology. We have a right to be angry with you. 
Great comment from @campaignforleo on how #EU solidarity with Ireland resonates for other small countries. For Scots its also a striking contrast with the U.K. attitude towards #Scotland #ScotlandsPlaceInEurope #Brexit #indyref2 
We must break free from the EU on trade after Brexit - because if you're not at the table, you must be on the menu  
John Bercow calling Peter Bone a delicate flower is a thing of joy, and Joanna Cherry ensuring Donald Tusk's words are registered in Hansard tops it all off beautifullySolid British humour ftw, even in the face of the Unbearable Shiteness of Brexit#MakeItStop #JustMakeItStop 
Was a pleasure to speak at @PoliteiaUK event this morning. Brexit and Beyond- Unfinished Business. I was clear we need to respect the referendum result and bring an end to the current paralysis in politics.  
We may be dropping out of the biggest free trade area in the world plus trade agreements with 70 other countries including the new one with Japan but who cares because we will still have trade with the Faroe Isles.And blue passports.And the Brexit 50p. 
In the age of Brexit division, one man on Planet Earth has succeeded in uniting parliament - Mark Zuckerberg. I believe there is a cross-party consensus to tackle online harms brought about by the failure of Facebook et al to act responsibly. #ProgressiveUKTech @carolecadwalla 
A special place in Hell exists for unelected bureaucrats who push for an EU Army but stumble around like a drunk at NATO summits and cannot put on matching shoes. But thank you @eucopresident for reminding me why I voted leave; to not be free of awful people like you!#Brexit  
EU President Donald Tusk takes a swipe at politicians who campaigned for Brexit without an idea of how to make it happen "safely"  
this is great because he just decided to casually admit that he campaigned for Brexit without having any sort of plan on how to actually make it happen  
Today the Commons adjourned at 3.29pm, after around four hours work. Not to worry- it's not like they've 500 Brexit related statutory instruments to pass or six outstanding Brexit bills to get through parliament. And it's not like there's a ticking clock to all this either. 
It says it all that the words Tusk used today are so shocking for the Brexit con men. If there had been any effective opposition to Brexit in this country, they'd have been battered with like condemnation night and day for nearly three years. #specialplaceinhell 
How can the BBC be fair about Brexit when it takes money from the EU? We need answers  
What a nasty little man ........   Brexit news: Tusk caught LAUGHING on microphone as Varadkar GLOATS at EU chief's HELL jibe | UK | News |  
No, we're all in purgatory. Families don't know whether they will be allowed to stay together, sick ppl worrying about medicine. Brexit is by the rich for the rich. My family's income has collapsed. Want an inquiry.#specialplaceinhell #WeAreAllDonaldTusk 
The only good thing about this is imagining all those brown skinned IT and financial experts coming over here and hiring unemployed racist Brexit voters to clean their houses. 
That awkward moment when no deal Brexit happens because everyone involved in the process is exhausted and fractious. 
Watching senior Remainers siding with Tusk, I’m genuinely starting to wonder why Brexiteers don’t start campaigning for a 2nd referendum themselves. Just for the giggles. They’d have a gay old time, and end up smashing it 70-30 or 80-20. Remainers literally don’t have a clue. 
#Brexit#specialplaceinhell"Prime Minister, You can't let the people have a vote, they'll vote for what they think they want, not what we want them to think they want, we want them to vote for what we want them to want, which is what we all want isn't it?" 
EU President Tusk's remarks weren't "a completely outrageous insult" as Tory MP Peter Bone claims, they were a slap in the face, delivered with a dose of reality, aimed at this Tory gov. for the absolute selfishness & incompetence in the handling the Brexit process 2016-19. #GTTO 
not Brexiteers- the liars who lead the Brexit movement without having a plan. Stop misleading people.  
@eucopresident I'm one of millions who not only want to remain, but also want to retain my EU citizenship and the FoM rights. Why should we have our rights taken from us against our will? We didn't ask for Brexit or vote to Leave. 
'There will be no Brexit vote until this Thomson affair has been dealt with'As Gerry Hassan might say if he decided to get all high and mighty about it....surely? 
The downside is, as we all now know, Britain has spent the subsequent 2 and a half years tearing itself apart over exactly what the 17.4m who voted for Brexit want from it (4) 
Sinn Féin leader @MaryLouMcDonald accuses Theresa May of 'playing a game of chicken' with Irish interests over #Brexit  
I'm a civil servant. Trust me, we're nowhere near ready for no-deal Brexit | Anonymous  
In the last week, groups have spent tens of thousands on micro-targeted digital ads pushing a no-deal Brexit. Where did the money come from? Important story from @PeterKGeoghegan 
Unearthed Video: Corbyn Slams ‘European Empire’, Referendum Re-runs  
The Leave campaign took the conscious decision at the start of the #EUref campaign in 2016 to keep both their definition of Brexit and any plan to deliver it vague (2) 
BBC news - radio & TV - *only* asking Brexiters to respond to Tusk’s ‘place in hell’ comment. Apparently, according to BBC, no one in the UK agrees with Tusk’s assessment. Our State Broadcaster in all-out Brexit propaganda mode this evening. 
He’s absolutely and utterly spit on. Parliament let us down by promoting an undeliverable Brexit and triggering article 50 with no plan. In relation to the Irish Border they KNEW there was no answer. So yes, hell 
See how smug he is if he loses his 2nd highest export country!BREXIT LIVE: Now gleefully SMUG Varadkar rubs multi-million pound trade deal in UK's face   
Just a reminder to MPs that the PM's motion/statement next week is your last chance to put down markers on what should happen next on Brexit. After that the Govt will have exhausted all its Section 13 obligations to Parliament. The PM has total control of the timetable after that 
While the British economy grows, Italy & Germany fall into recession and #Brexit will mean our 20% contribution to the overall #EU budget will be gone and, with it, the risk that others will follow increases.Can anyone be surprised that the @eucopresident is so bitter and upset? 
Theresa May's speech yesterday showed that she has no new ideas on how to break the Brexit deadlock. These talks are nothing more than her kicking the can down the road again.Demand the final say on Brexit >  
Well that’s Brexit put on hold then.  
If Donald Tusk is wrong and the people that campaigned for Brexit DID have a plan, isn't it about time they let the rest of us in on the secret?:-/ 
How many of our followers are scientists in the greater Manchester area? Would you be happy to share stories about how #Brexit will impact you, your funding or your scientific collaborations? Please reply and retweet 
"Donald Tusk" is absolutely right!#Brexit is a corrupt project inaugurated by arrogant Tory MPs and racist swines like Farage & UKIP.The whole country has been sacrificed.Hell to too special for them! #Brexiteers #voteleavebrokethelaw #ERGs #bbcpm #DUP 
The world knows it was a corrupt referendum.Only May’s Government is in denial, plus a complicit Labour Party. 
Looks like farmers south of the border will get some help from the EU post Brexit. Will the Ulster farmers @UFUHQ be left out of pocket after being pulled out of the EU? 
Juncker says EU won't reopen Brexit deal, Britain's May knows that  
Heartfelt from Tusk - not only was there no plan - no economic impact assessment of the effects of #Brexit on Merseyside, for instance - but also those that instigated it have walked away, low paid women in Merseyside don't have that luxury  
Mr Tusk didn’t go far enough with his comments. It goes well beyond Brexit. Tory policies have been linked to 120,000 deaths. They have made the poor and disabled pay for the mistakes of the champagne sipping bankers. They have demonised migrants. Hell deserves better than them. 
May fiddles even as the plane runs out of fuel. Me on impending Brexit doom.  
Donald tusk was bluntly honest about the brexiteers who have sold the UK brexit, they had no plan and do deserve a special place in hellThey also lie a lotSo they have already misrepresented what Tusk said in order to deflect blame from themselves already 
As far as I can tell, Brexit is like cooking eggs. Some like them soft, some prefer hard. But we should never jeopardise the Good Fried Egg agreement 
Nail hit firmly on head by this remainer #eu #brexit  
Leaving on WTO terms means saving £39bn. This money could be spent on our priorities, let's trade with the rest of the world instead of giving billions to Brussels. Help save Brexit @  
After meeting Martin Selmayr, I know why the EU is confused about Brexit, says @andreajenkyns 
It's time to send some  at this "single tax form" idea. As I see it, this is simply a non-starter. This is Brexit-style idea; big bold idea with no details.Let me briefly explain why.... 
Donald Tusk, President of the European Council, says there's a "special place in Hell" for people who "promoted Brexit" without a plan  
Not responsible for Brexit:The media who drip-fed the public dog-whistling racism about immigration for yearsMillionaires creating division with claims about "the elite"Leave campaigns illegally using people's data to target adsResponsible:"bug-eyed EU federalists"Got it!  
The whole of Europe is well aware that the Brexit fiasco is based on criminality, cheating, ignorance and prejudice. It's good that Donald Tusk expressed this widespread feeling and hopefully more will do likewise. Brexit has already caused Europe huge disruption and harm 
A shame for the BBC to be losing wise and experienced broadcasters like John Humphreys whose overview of recent political history allows for commentary like [checks notes] suggesting Ireland might want to rejoin the UK to facilitate Brexit. 
In conversation with @GilmourUN, #Scotland First Minister @NicolaSturgeon says #Scotland won’t fall behind on #HumanRights protections in event of Brexit, and will continue to welcome refugees.  
"the pro-Brexit stance of the Prime Minister and the leader of the opposition rules out this question; there's no effective leadership for Remain"Spot on!.. sadly. But hey, at least Corbyn cares about buses.. that's more important, apparently (according to his worshipers). 
"I think it was deliberately provocative, I have to say. Very disrespectful to those of us who wanted to leave the European Union." Arlene Foster reacts to Donald Tusk saying there is a "special place in hell" for those who backed Brexit with no plan 
For the record Tusk isn’t having a go at people who voted for Brexit. He’s having a go at the dicks who sold them an undeliverable unicorn and then scarpered. So chill out everyone. 
Im a remainer, I'd rather we stay in the European Union but Donald Tusk's constant sarcasm and distain   of brexit isn't exactly endearing or winning over any hearts or minds in my opinion.I find him annoying and I'm on his side so god knows what he does to the brexitiers 
This Tusk affair perfectly sums up Brexit - Leavers completely misquote him and then say "See, look how nasty the EU is...". As Larkin would have said - it is intensely sad. 
The genius of the Donald Tusk insult is that to be offended by it, you have to admit to having no plan for delivering Brexit, despite being full-throated in support of it. You can't be offended without proving yourself ignorant at best, fraudulent at worst. 
You smug, hypocritical fuck.Can we see your Brexit plan please?  
My latest for @DissentMag. If you want a glimpse of post-Brexit future, look at ‘national liberation’ struggles around the world. The people sacrifice whilst profits maximise!   
Considering many of us know British people with non “white” skin who have been told “you’ll be sent home after Brexit”. I doubt this will sit easily with most leavers idea of what Brexit meant to them. 
Dear Mr Tusk, I voted for #Brexit - those that "promoted" it were those that convinced me to vote to leave the #EU. I  was convinced by @JunckerEU, Shultz & by YOU. I don't think you deserve that "special place in hell". We simply disagree, the #EU isn't THAT special Sir. 
This is beyond farce. Brexiters that claim to be appalled by Donald Tusk today are admitting that they promoted Brexit WITHOUT EVEN A SKETCH OF A PLAN HOW TO CARRY IT OUT SAFELY.If they don't like being called idiots, then perhaps they should stop behaving like idiots  
Just off phone to a friend who transports DNA machines for sale and installation ( USA origin ) - he told me the import duty on one machine is between 15-20,000 GBP when taking into Switzerland - I’d say good luck to any high end company selling into  the  EU after brexit . 
Ending dual citizenship. This is quite possible if far-right activists like Mr Woolfe get their hands on Britain amid the fallout from Brexit.  
If you remember my October intel thread on Brexit, please refer back to the one about the British / US trade deal being more advanced than stated and see this in the Irish Times which has just come out:  
Did Donald Tusk's tweet make you angry? If so, why?A) It reminded you all too bluntly of your role in starting the dumpster fire that is BrexitB) It reminded you of all the spineless politicians who blagged and lied their way through the referendum and beyond, without a plan 
Here's @Coldwar_Steve who gives a better picture  of Brexit Britain than the evening news 
How is it right that Stephen Kinnock, whose parents are deeply involved with and receive money from the EU, is on the Brexit committee? Surely this a clear conflict of interest.Congratulations @DominicRaab 
HOW DARE YOU SUGGEST WE SHOULD HAVE HAD A PLAN FOR BREXIT. 
Our next #Brexit info session with EU citizens will be in #Salisbury on 21 Feb at 6pm. If you have questions about #SettledStatus, #EUcitizensrights, #NoDealBrexit register for our FREE event with an immigration lawyer  
Food labelling changes after Brexit. Yesterday the UK government released advice for food producers, manufacturers, retailers and suppliers on the changes to food labels if the UK leaves the EU without a deal:  #nutrition #labelling 
Everyday we learn more and more about the disaster that is #Brexit. Everyday we learn more and more about why we need a #PeoplesVote Today's lesson? Brexit means a early years #childcare sector in crisis says @emma_saynor in @LeftFootFwd 
Scottish and Welsh First Ministers on #brexit: 'The point hasbeen reached where there is now no time to waste. We therefore renew our call for the Prime Minister to make clear that she will ensure ‘no deal’ is taken offthe table. ' 
God Bless John Bercow.Again.@RenewParty #Tusk #Brexit  
You conveniently forget Leviticus 19:11;“Do not steal. Do not lie. Do not deceive one another.  Do not listen to posh, Latin quoting politicians who moved their business to Dublin and who will benefit massively from a crashing pound in the event of a no deal Brexit”. 
Jacob's whole Brexit business case is completely unaware of the 10th Commandment.What is the 10th Commandment?You'll have to watch out for my next thread...  
Does this mean that there is a special place in heaven for British women since our voices, demands and plans were barely heard during the referendum? #DonaldTusk 
To me Brexit is just one big willy wagging event by the English, who seem to be grossly lacking in that department. 
Are you someone or do you know someone who is having cancer treatment and is concerned with the changes after Brexit? Please feel free to private message us about your story. Thank you. 
Sometimes it's hard to hear the truth, but Tusk is entirely correct. Perhaps it is time to open your eyes and see the fraud and lies of those pushing for brexit, and to stand up for what is clearly right. #Remain. 
Wyke Farms cheese-maker doubling Somerset capacity to increase presence in export markets "ready for post-Brexit trade and launching new export targeted products throughout 2019".Haven't seen much coverage of this one either...  
10 years after the financial crisis:Bundesbank: German GDP growth below 1.5%IMF: Italy GDP growth below 1%UK: Brexit barfECB: Negative rates + a 4.7T Euro balance sheet.If that doesn't concern you, nothing will. 
I honestly think years from now when a new government is in place and we have a proper investigation into the whole nonsense that is Brexit, we will find out many conspirators within the BBC and many others in the media. It is appalling the lack of investigations into Brexit lies 
Well done @LeeRoyPot fighting for your local community and for a Brexit Britain!Read now:  
Donald Tusk actually said:"I've been wondering what that special place in hell looks like, for those who promoted #Brexit, WITHOUT EVEN A SKETCH OF A PLAN HOW TO CARRY IT OUT SAFELY."If that's you, stop whining. You are a reckless vandal/profiteer. Own your idiocy  
Brexit means losing access to the single market and also 61 free trade deals around the world but gaining a monster of a trade deal with the Faroe Islands. Buccaneering Britain. 
Labour officially calls for Brexit to be delayed with Article 50 extensionThis is welcome leadership from @UKLabour 
Mrs May is going to allow the abuse of the British people by Tusk and Varadkar, and do or say nothing. Does she realise that Brexit aside. We are disgusted with her, and a lot of us will never vote Conservative again..they make us feel ashamed. 
Going cheap:2 x Mercedes factories3 x VW factories1 x Porsche factory4 x BMW factories2 x Audi factoriesReason for sale: Sharp downturn in sales following No Deal Brexit, USA trade war, global downturn in car sales, Donald Tusk's bad attitude. 
If you are offended by Donald Tusks words and you actually promoted brexit - what is your plan for leaving the EU whilst simultaneously safeguarding peace and keeping the GFA solid in the island of Ireland.  It’s a simple question.  We are all ears #FBPE 
Spotted by The Highway in East London. I claim my prize, @ByDonkeys - the prize being a second referendum.  
MP Peter Bone lying in Parliament over Tusk comment “ place in hell”. Bone said “Brexiteers”Not true. Tusk said “For those who promoted Brexit without a plan.” Bone is just another lying bastard in Parliament pretending to serve the country. If there is a hell he deserves a place 
The EU's Donald Tusk ponders "the special place in hell" for those who campaigned for Brexit without planning the finer details  
Centrist dad says: it's possible to assert both that the UK has made a mess of #Brexit, *and* that the Commission and EU27 haven't exactly covered themselves in glory. 
If there is so much Brexit legislation to get through why did Parliament adjourn at just after 3? 
Thanks Donald, you've just converted another million Brits to Brexit.  Another totally-clueless, unelected EU president.#GoWTO 
Tusk: The EU27 is not making any new offer... I’ve been wondering what that special place in hell looks like for those who promoted Brexit...Varadkar: (The British press) will give you terrible troubleTusk: Haha#StandUp4Brexit 
A second referendum is the only democratic way to solve the Brexit “mess”, Sir Patrick Stewart tells LBC @SirPatStew | #PeoplesVote 
This weekend it's up to you.You could chill out, sit back, relax and put your feet up.Or you could take a stand.If you want the Brexit decision to go back to the public there is still time to campaign for a #PeoplesVote where you live. Details below. 
Did those who promoted Brexit have a plan? Please enlighten us. 
Tusk: 'There's a special place in hell for the *promoters* of Brexit...'Brexit promoters: "Brexit voters! Tusk said *you* are going to hell!"Brexit voters: "How dare Tusk say that about us! Damn the EU!!"Remainers:  
Once and for all he wasn’t talking about the people who voted for Brexit he was clearly talking about the people who promoted Brexit without a plan! Shameful misrepresentation. 
It is driving me mad that you, @MichelBarnier @EmmanuelMacron @guyverhofstadt @HouseofCommons & MSM accept Brexit as a democratic decision when it was fuelled by corruption & breaches of law. Only a Banana Republic would proceed as May is. We British are trapped & no-one hears us 
European Council President Donald Tusk: "I've been wondering what that special place in hell looks like for those who promoted Brexit without even a sketch of a plan on how to carry it safely."  
Tusk has insulted our country & 17.4 million Brexit voters.There is a plan for Britain and that is to leave & move to trade on WTO, saving £39bn & allowing the UK freedom to embrace the world and prosper. Sounds like heaven on earth.Help save Brexit @  
In 2016, shortly before the EU referendum, Yanis Varoufakis warned that the UK was destined for a “Hotel California Brexit”: it could check out but it could...  
If no-deal Brexit is so great why are the Brexiters trying to place blame rather than take credit ? Surely they’d want to shout about their personal contribution to this great national liberation. 
Stop Brexit in the rain.In the sunshineIn the snowJust #StopBrexit.#Sodem @RemainingKind @rnaunton 
DUP leader Arlene Foster says @eucopresident Donald Tusk was "deliberately provocative [and] very disrespectful" when he said there was a "place in hell" for people who "promoted #Brexit without a plan to carry it out safely" 
So looking forward to spending that extra 8p a day once we brexit. Sure it'll be worth it... #specialplaceinhell #StopBrexit 
"Vote Leave because 3 years later and with 50 days to the exit date we still won't know what sort of Brexit we're getting." 
Is it time for those who can see the utter shambolic folly of Brexit (now a big majority of voters) to speak out as clearly and forcefully as Donald Tusk? No Peoples Vote, just get MPs to do their job & save our country by cancelling Brexit themselves. What should we do: 
I and every single brexiteers have promoted brexit in our own way. By a chat over coffee/over the garden fence/at the pub with friends, and families!? His attack was aimed at ALL of us!! #WTOLETSGO 
This is Gove and Boris the day after they “won” the referendum.Do they look like they have a plan?Do they even look confident?Within weeks one stabbed the other in the back which resulted in neither of them becoming leader and owning their shit.Tusk is absolutely right. pic.twitter.com/fVvoyGfZt9 
Welcome to fascist UK whereIf you don't agree with Brexit, you're not patrioticIf you're a democrat, you're a BrexiterLying, cheating, breaking the law, accepting Kremlin interference all okayWhere May's purpose is to deliver BrexitAnd God tells her what voters meant by it 
For example: Brexit news rarely gets the attention of EU foot soldiers these days, but Tusk's comment is getting plenty of e-mail love this afternoon. People like hearing their leaders say it like it is. 
When people told me Corbyn wanted Brexit and would never turn, and that some at the top of @peoplesvote_uk were only there with an eye to being seen to fight, failing and using it to springboard a new party for 2022, I knew there was a ring of truth to both. 
"I've been wondering what that special place in hell looks like for those who promoted Brexit, without even a sketch of a plan how to carry it out safely," said President of the European Council Donald Tusk  
Five reasons Americans are flocking to #Asia. Is it the low taxes, sunny weather, practicing Chinese or escaping #Trump and #Brexit? You choose! Read more in #TheFutureIsAsian  And my article at @CNN  @CNNI #travel #economics #expats 
Together I find these 3 facts pretty astonishing:It's 51 days until #Brexit.February Recess has been cancelled because of Brexit.Commons adjourned at 3.27pm today.  
Don't worry, Sammy. Hell isn't real. And even if it was, you'd be going there for being a rancid homophobe, not for supporting Brexit.  
I just want to amplify this:Commons has just adjourned (15:30) *because Government brought NO Business for it to debate*.Business all week is extremely light. The Government is wasting time, while 500 Statutory Instruments & 6 Bills (ALL REQUIRED before Brexit) await debate. 
Brexit. AntiEU govs: Italy, Hungary, Poland. AntiEU growth: Austria, NetherlandsMerkel resigns 2022. German recession. France burnsEco stagnation, failure of EU neoliberalism & EuroMass migrationThe EU is dead. Its now decomposingTusk laughs. He wont be laughing soon 
From Brexit to Bar Exit. Just another day in the life of Ross Thomson! 'Drunk' Scottish Tory MP 'removed from Westminster pub by police'  
Finishing up in #Brussels by sitting down with @PhilHoganEU to discuss @EU_Commission supports for #Ireland and securing a good #Brexit outcome  
Funny thing... See, Donald Tusk only attacked "those who promoted Brexit without even a sketch of a plan how to carry it out safely". That's pretty specific. So if you're getting so upset, the obvious inference is that you see yourself as one of that target group... 
Great to see a European leader set out BREXIT home truths - May, Corbyn, DUP, BREXITers need to take notice and face up to the realities created by their lack of leadership and planning.   
House business finished early at 3.30pm. Not as if we haven't got the small matter of #Brexit to deal with.Zombie Parliament! 
What the Brexit alliance wants is best described as ‘Thatcherism in one country’, a form of nationalist neoliberalism, writes @paulmasonnews.We're at a crossroads. We can either accept their agenda, or defeat this project and make space for alternatives. 
Our vile @campaignforleo fails to realise that the #UK will remain our neighbour either way, and that 60% of our export to mainland #Europe goes through the UK.Let us not forget our history re referendums and the #EU. #JonathanSugarman#Ireland #Brexit  
People who promoted Brexit, didn’t have a plan for it, passed up the chance to lead their party and country through it then spent 2 years hurling insults of intransigence and bullying at the EU now take umbrage at being told they’ve done exactly all of the aboveHow very Brexit 
"HOW DARE A FOREIGN MAN SAY WE HAVE NO BREXIT PLAN""What is it, then?""I DON'T KNOW, BUT IT'LL BE FINE WE WON WAR" 
BREAKING The division bell sounds at 3.27pm signalling that the House of Commons has adjourned for the day. Its's a Wednesday - normally one of the busiest days of the week for MPs. Shocking. #Brexit 
Been thinking about my dad a lot because Brexit. Here's a bit of something he wrote about his journey to Scotland when he was trying to perfect his English. Solidarity to all immigrants who left home with hope in their hearts + are now having to prove themselves all over again.  
Piece on Donald Tusk's "special place in hell" comments here. Because Brexiteers have handled their abysmal project so abysmally, they are angry because they think Tusk is gloating. But he speaks as a victim of Brexit, just like the rest of us are.  
Donald Tusk: There's a 'special place in hell' for those who promoted Brexit without plan  
Criticising Donald Tusk for saying the Brexit campaigners have a special place in Hell for promoting Brexit without a plan is like criticising someone for saying there is a special place in Hell for the driver who voluntarily took his bus full of passengers over a cliff 
Thank you Mr. Tusk for finally putting it as it is - the irresponsible, morally corrupt and sometimes plain stupid #Brexit promoters led the country to the cliff edge of economic and national harm. Bravo Mr. Tusk! 
I held my tongue about Corbyn, so as not to alienate his supporters who claimed he was playing a “long game” on Brexit.I held my tongue as self-appointed Remain leaders made the same mistakes as 2016, so as to keep “unity” in the movement.I was wrong to do either.  
I mean seriously. ‘They started it,’ ‘no he said it first’ is now where we’re at with the Brexit debate. 
The Brexit Backstop, explained 
Donald Tusk "I've been wondering what that special place in hell looks like, for those who promoted #Brexit, without even a sketch of a plan how to carry it out safely."Just close your eyes and imagine last Friday night at the Tullyglass House Hotel, that!  
Juncker asked if he agrees with Tusk that there’s a special place in hell for Brexiteers who had no plan.“Well, I’m not as Catholic as him” he says with a smile. #Brexit  
You can take issue with the language Tusk uses, but for his comment to be untrue you’d either have to be a) Fine with people promoting Brexit without even a sketch of a plan how to carry it out safely or b) Claim that a plan does in fact exist. Neither option is sensible. 
Looks like those in Brussels still expect UK to swallow a bad deal that's already been rejected. Delusional. Wonder what German industry and French agriculture make of hardline EU stance that will mean No Deal Brexit. 
.@EU_Commission president Jean-Claude Juncker says the EU "cannot reopen" the #Brexit withdrawal agreement or reopen discussion on the Irish "backstop" 
99.5% of insulin is imported from the EU. At PMQs today, I raised the prospect of a no-deal Brexit disrupting vital medicine supplies as raised by Rachel from my Constituency and asked for A50 to be extended. I was told that "sensible contingencies" were in place - but no more.  
That went well. The EU fans said Tusk's comments weren't surprising because the UK was so offensive. Brexit fans said Tusk's comments were disgraceful and I should condemn them.Let me know when anyone wants to negotiate anything. 
But given Brexit has been a story where many lies have been told, it's not surprising that the lies continue. 
Sorry Nick I disagree entirely. Tusk very undiplomatically just said what at least half the UK thinks - the Referendum was won on fraud, lies, undeliverable promises and fear. 
After hearing and watching EU President  "Donald Tusk" inflammatory words to the people of the UK regarding Brexit.Poll.Do you want to leave the EU or remain? 
Just next door to the special place in hell for those who fought for Brexit *without a plan* is the special place in hell for those who are now wilfully and disingenuously misquoting Tusk to wrongly claim he meant all Leave voters. Everyone can see you doing it. 
European leader Donald Tusk warns there’s a "special place in hell" for Brexit backers who don’t know what they’re doing  
Me thinks Tusk is just thoroughly peed off with the UK government and its handling of #Brexit.He's washed his hands of the entire debacle and is now getting on with the business of an EU no longer dragged back by a eurosceptic UK.#CantBlameHim 
Alt headline: Super rich man leaves Britain over 'Brexit uncertainty' and moves to France, where there have been non-stop riots for three months  
James O'Brien asked for people angry with Donald Tusk's comments whose Brexit plan they voted for. This was the only man who tried.@mrjamesob | #DonaldTusk 
But an inevitable consequence of becoming a third country is that the UK is going to be talked about, and treated by the EU, in the same way it treats Turkey and the same way the US treats Mexico and Canada. Don't like it, don't Brexit:  
Enraged Brexiteers aren't disputing Donald Tusk's central assertion that "many Brexiteers promoted Brexit without a sketch of a plan how to carry it out safely."That they condemn the 'use of language' rather than the point he made is absolutely telling. They know he's right. 
Heaven for the climate, Hell for the company If you would be happy to join me in the hottest place in Hell feel free to drop a  or  into this thread.@JunckerEU @guyverhofstadt Not welcome feel free to RT let’s see how many  into the thread #Brexit  
Spare us Brexit snowflakery. Johnson likened EU to Nazis & Hunt to Stalinists. Brexiters have gratuitously mocked and traduced EU for years. EU’s responded to our insanity with super-human courtesy. So don’t reach for smelling salts when an EU figure tells the truth. Thank them. 
With 17.4m people sharing that #Brexit vision and voting for it, it looks like hell is going to be a very busy place. Thank God, we are leaving the oppressive control of EU maniacs like this man  
Remainers seem to be allowed to inject poison into our political discourse. We're even labelled extremists by our own MPs for wanting a WTO Brexit. What a strange world. Parliament isn't representative of public opinion, and clearly doesn't respect it either. 
Paris's most expensive apartment ever sells for £34million - to tycoon leaving Britain because of 'Brexit uncertainty'  
The #DUP & #ERG didn’t like my point of order setting out what @eucopresident said in full not just the truncated headline read out by Peter Bone. Sometimes, the truth hurts #Brexit  
.@KateHoeyMP hits the nail on the head: "We're paying far too much far too quickly" Join the fastest growing Brexit movement @  
Tusk is right, of course. The two leaders of Vote Leave, Michael Gove and Boris Johnson, played with the lives of the electorate, promising all things to all people. With not a clue how to deliver Brexit, come the day of the vote on May's deal, they voted against each other.  
A furious row has erupted between Brussels and British MPs, after an EU chief said there was a "special place in hell" for those who campaigned for Brexit without a plan on how to deliver it  
A lobby group called @the_tpa also conceded to claims in my lawsuit that the IEA was one of 9 entities that launched disinformation campaigns against me and were coordinating Brexit-related media opportunities. No self-respecting channel should be platforming people like this. 
UK Furious After EU's Tusk Says There Is "A Special Place In Hell" For Those Who Backed Brexit  
Donald Tusk was undiplomatic, but he is perfectly right that there is a special place in hell for people who promoted Brexit without a plan. People are turning this into "everyone who supported Brexit" like hysterical ladies in old films. 
EU Council president Donald Tusk had extremely strong words for those who pushed for Brexit without planning for its consequencesRead about the fallout from this intervention here:  
Only the british media and its state broadcaster could shrug its shoulders to the fact that the british political class has lied and conned folk for over 2 years about Brexit, and still have no plan. There are actual ongoing courtcases and investigations into Brexit, but hey 
Brexit ultra @michaelgove has quite literally been sent to Coventry 
On trade deals, amazingly, the clue is in the name. You need something to put on the table that other people will pay for. If you unilaterally abandon tariffs you surrender leverage for no return. (But frankly I would not put this past some in this government). #Brexit 
67 years ago today this magnificent woman became our Queen. Thank you for all your years of service, dedication and although we know you can’t say it, so we will, well done for supporting Brexit!  
Leavers frantically misquoting Tusk.No, he did not insult Leave voters. He merely pointed out the recklessness of those who *promoted* a fantasy Brexit without the foggiest idea of how to carry it out safely. The evidence of that is all around us today.  
I think it must be time to start my No-Deal Brexit stockpile:40 tins of tuna;20kg of dried pasta;40 tins of vegetables various;30 packets of plain oatcakes ....20 cases of I Bloody Told You This Would Bloody Happen  
He's trying to save his bacon. The Brexit obsessives in his local association are trying to deselect him. He has to pretend to hate the EU to appease them. What a vulgar, dreadful party. 
Worth making a screenshot of the Tusk tweet, for posterity. Just something to refer back to in 20 years, when anyone asks why more Brits voted for Brexit than for yielding control of the UK to The EUtopia Project.Not that we plebs are really allowed to make decisions, of course.  
Shelagh Fogarty and Nigel Farage do battle as Donald Tusk says there’s is a “special place in hell” for the Brexit leaders who supported leaving the EU without a plan@ShelaghFogarty | @Nigel_Farage 
Sign the petition to say that you won't stand for a Brexit which opens up our NHS to privatisation As part of the EU, we have seen off threat of privatisation before. But alone, we would be more vulnerable.SIGN HERE 
Irish Taioseach Leo Varadkar came to the Parliament today for a meeting with Brexit coordinator Guy Verhofstadt.  
2.37pm - Commons has ended its main business for the day...as clock ticks towards March 29 Brexit Day...Govt has ordered emergency sitting of Parliament in half-term..six key bills for Brexit still need to go through...the mind boggles about political shambles gripping UK  
Special place in hell - looks a lot like a hidebound European Union stuck-in-the-mud usurping national sovereignty and having us pay billions for it...Brexit. Now.  
I wasn't conned Anna.  I was a 'Brexiteer' and proud of it. The Brexiteers I voted for were democratically elected, unlike Tusk. And they were re-elected after the referendum on a ticket to Leave! #|Brexit 
This is bang out of order the Commons has finished its business for the day and it’s not even 3 pm! Considering Brexit is just 51days away this is totally irresponsible! 
All these old doffers getting excited about #Brexit "being like the war".It'll be NOTHING like "the war".In the war we had allies. 
I really don't get the outrage in response to @eucopresident words. He stated the obvious. The issue of Northern Ireland was swept under the carpet during the referendum campaign. If anything, #Brexit implications for NI were constantly downplayed 
It’s 2.37pm on a Wednesday, and the Mother of Parliaments is about to adjourn because it has literally nothing to do. Brexit paralysis in action.  
Labour: only 'sensible' option to delay Brexit by extending article 50  
Seumas appears in today’s Eye. #Lexit #Brexit #SeumasMilne #JeremyCorbyn #StraightLeft 
17.4 million British people ‘promoted’ and voted for #Brexit and Tusk wants us to burn in hell.This was designed as a direct and personal insult to our country and we won’t stand for it.These people are egomaniacal, imperial bullies. No more compromises. Out, now!#NoDeal 
Theresa May has once again been told, in no uncertain terms, Ireland will not be collateral damage for the British Govts reckless actions.The days of pushing the Irish about are gone, and they will never return! #Brexit #Ireland 
It’s 51 days to #Brexit - and at 2.30pm business in @HouseofCommons is coming to an end for the day.... seemingly the Tory government think there’s nothing worth debating on discussing.... 
No, Westmonster - Labour are being responsible.There’s not even time to pass basic legislation for your crazy job-wrecking crash-out Brexit to happen next month.Labour are fighting your madness.#GTTO @Rachael_Swindon @ThomasPride @mattzarb @paulmasonnews @AaronBastani 
Tax cuts can be 'rocket boosters' for UK economy after Brexit, says Dominic Raab 
Labour officially calls for Brexit to be delayed.Labour take a stance. Let's hope it's the start of something!@Bremaininspain 
Politicians would be stupid to ignore the changes going on in Britain today. We are straining at the leash for our freedom and our ability to survive and create. We are confident, we need a confident government, not one scurrying about for EU favours #brexit #nodeal #greatbritain 
And what Sammy is your post #Brexit plan? Less of the faux outrage & take some responsibility, you haven’t exactly been angelic with your own interventions either....  
Irish nationalists warn May: no-deal Brexit means a unity referendum  
Shocked to hear the UUP now calling for BREXIT to be delayed after 29 March 2019. The UUP lost many votes after it agreed with SF; Alliance; and SDLP to remain in EU. Then it changed its policy to support BREXIT. Now a new policy to delay BREXIT. This is all very damaging for UUP 
EU FEAR: Jacob Rees-Mogg reveals REAL reason EU are unable to risk NO DEAL Brexit  
“The Council President has hit the nail on the head with his remarks. The charlatans and chancers who led the Leave campaign did not even have the decency to set out their plans before the vote": @StephenGethins #Brexit  
"I realised it was a massive mistake because I was lied to. It can't be done this thing that you've put to us."@MrDDyer speaks out about why he's changed his mind on #Brexit. It's time for a #PeoplesVote. Please RT: 
You don't have to succumb to the zero-sum logic that would have you believe the Brexit mess is 100pc reducible to Tory failings. At moments like this, Oppositions can change the debate. But Labour's inaction & blank politicking has been part of the grimness too. Walk, chew gum.  
Project Fear - there will be massive food shortages post Brexit. How come? Many UK farmers are paid £thousands (eg Heseltine £90,000?) not to grow food on their farms. Presumably not to damage French farmers. 
Anti-Brexit Wetherspoon staff turn on their no-deal-backing boss  
Hell for Brexit: EU's Tusk lashes eurosceptics  
How typical of .@PeterBoneUK to tell a bold & disgusting lie.What Peter Bone said: "There is a special place in hell reserved for Brexiteers."What Pres.Tusk said: "...for those who promoted Brexit without even a sketch of a plan of how to carry it safely"Thx .@joannaccherry 
EP Brexit chief @guyverhofstadt after meeting Varadkar: ‘We‘ll never abandon Ireland. We‘ll never prioritise demands of minority of Eurosceptic MPs from a departing Member State over interests of a MS. It’s UK's obligation to propose a positive & viable proposal on way forward.’ 
Strange isn't it. You tweet unfavourably about Leave and Brexit and suddenly loads of account recently created or dormant for years , with few followers, anonymous and with no media or profile, appear to abuse you. 
Well said @StephenGethins #Brexit  
Varadkar - They'll give you terrible trouble in British press for that.Tusk - Yeah I knowVaradkar - But I know you're right. . #Brexit  
Don't think anyone is going to take lessons from Sammy Wilson of the duplicitous DUP on contempt, corruption, fanning flames and cabals! You ready to tell everyone where that £435,000 you used in the Brexit campaign, which the Tories helped you hide, came from yet Sammy?   
Tusk was right about Brexit because of his reference to the absence of even a “sketch” of a plan. And the Taoiseach was right about the anticipated reaction of British media. No big deal. 
Brexit: The EU is evil! It’s a dictatorship! They’re all nazis! They smell of wee! EU: Brexit never even had a plan.Brexit: … … … HOW DARE YOU?! 
"I wonder what the special place in hell looks like for those who promoted Brexit without even a sketch of a plan how to carry it out safely.”- Donald Tusk on #Brexit  
Plaid’s message to European leaders is that the @GOVUK doesn’t speak for Wales says @Adamprice. The Welsh Assembly does and it voted for Article 50 extension & a #PeoplesVote. Time @jeremycorbyn stopped enabling the Tories’ Brexit plans & followed Wales’ example.  
Tusk didn’t say that!!!!! Lies in Parliament being read from a BBC headline!!! ⁦@Femi_Sorry⁩ ⁦@SpillerOfTea⁩ ⁦@JimMFelton⁩ ⁦@mrjamesob⁩ ⁦@Anna_Soubry⁩ ⁦@eucopresident⁩ ⁦@BrexitBin⁩ ⁦@brexit_sham⁩ ⁦@OFOCBrexit⁩ 
Dear @BBCPolitics,Don't know about Brexit leaders, but I'm certain there's a special place in Hell for so-called professional journalists deliberately misquoting people in headlines for clickbait and to push political agendas.Regards,Tom  
It can never be pointed out often enough that this is the real reason for #Brexit. If you voted Leave, you've been had. There is indeed a #specialplaceinhell - not for you, but for those who hoodwinked you. 
Any post-Brexit free trade agreement between the UK and EU will be almost by definition less liberal than what exists today. This is basic stuff.  
Gotta love John Bercow and @joannaccherry... #Brexit #specialplaceinhell 
When they do “Brexit the Movie” I hope they get Christoper Walken to play @eucopresident just so he can do the “special place in hell” speech... #specialplaceinhell 
Britain's Brexit freedom will be heavenly, Nigel Farage tells Tusk  
Fake outrage from "those who promoted Brexit without even a sketch of a plan of how to carry it out safely". 
Not only did I see it, I listened to it too. He condemned those who promoted Brexit without a plan for implementing it. Not unreasonable, many will think. 
The Brexit politicians have been criminally reckless. Never any detailed plan. What's their plan, for instance, for preventing lorry hold-ups affecting drugs that need refrigeration, and importing radio-isotopes for cancer treatment, which will decay in queues? People will die. 
 @StephenGethins is completely spot on - how can the UK government justify running down the Brexit clock, while its own analyses show no-deal would be catastrophic? This impasse is the worst peacetime crisis in the UK, exclusively made by the Tory civil war.  
I wonder if you realise, Donald that these stupid tweets you and your mates frequently send, more often than not actually strength people’s desires to leave you #Brexit  
And there’s no left-wing argument for Brexit. You can’t polish a turd. If your ‘socialism’ isn't grounded in internationalism, if you're willing to concede on freedom of movement as a scapegoat for our people’s difficulties, then you aren’t as progressive as you think. (6/10) 
More Brexit corruption. This time, the US-funded neoliberal think tank, the IEA: 
The backstop and indeed the entire Border ‘issue’ in terms of Brexit has been a politically motivated campaign to try & keep Britain in the EU. As Karlsson’s Smart Border report proves, the technology & precedent already exists. This isn’t an issue. #wtobrexitnow 
Theresa May wants a compromised Brexit to keep her party together, Corbyn wants a messy Brexit to get him into No 10. We the people will be the collateral damage. 
Maoist turned Stalinist turned Corbyn's right-hand man, but always, always, solidly opposed to the EU: why the man who accompanied the Labour leader to his meeting with May will ensure the party never makes a move against Brexit. Details in the new Private Eye, on sale now. 
A great way to prove Donald Tusk wrong would be to publish a thought-through, practical, costed plan for Brexit. 
It is YOUR responsibility & that of @BBCPolitics to report & emphasise what #DonaldTusk actually said. Special place in Hell for those who PROMOTED Brexit without a plan. Boris, David Davis, Dominic Raab, Peter Bone, Jacob Rees-Mogg,  Andrea Jenkyns,  Bill Cash, Kate Hoey, #DUP 
EU's Donald Tusk says Brexiteers deserve a 'special place in hell' and the European Union will not make a new offer on #Brexit  
EU now sees Brexit unstoppable, aims to avert 'fiasco'  
Not before time. I know you're a "my team right or wrong" Tory, Laura, but surely even you can see the truth in his words?I'm sure many of the 49mn who didn't vote #Brexit & are now held hostage by it, having rights stripped, prosperity eroded & prospects dampened, agree.  
Why incendiary? It’s fact. The UK has been let down en masse by a parliament who did not question Brexit and triggered article 50 with no plan. 
... And there’s plenty room for those who aid and abet a Brexit which hurts working people #PeoplesVoteNow 
Are you an EU citizen living in the UK?You'll need to apply for #SettledStatus so you can stay in the country after Brexit. Find out more about how to apply, what documents you need & when the deadline is: Via @IMiX_UK 
Brexit supporting politicians and commentators have called their opponents "Traitors", "Enemies of the People", "Saboteurs", "Citizens of Nowhere", "Mutineers", etc. 
As we approach No Deal - despite the dire warnings and the job losses and the preparations for armageddon - all polls show support for Hard Brexit rapidly increasing. Is there going to be a point when Remainers stop screaming at the Brexiteers, step back, and ask themselves why. 
PM not doing PMQs, Parliamentary business consists of general debates on sport and pubs, recess cancelled for nothing meaningful while May runs down the clock and runs up the bill (eg no deal bogus ferry firm).   51 days to go. Truly a zombie government paralysed by Brexit  
BREXIT FURY: EU’s Tusk sparks glee from Soubry and remainers with Brexiteers in HELL jibe. All British People Must Now Realise, What the EU Think& Want, Just Our Money  
The Brexit legal challenges that could force Britain to leave without a deal | Coffee House  
Question; will the EU consider allowing Brits who wish to retain duel citizenship, but have no direct relatives in other member states, on, if nothing else, than on humanitarian grounds? We feel utterly abandoned by our national govt; probably at least 30 million of us! 
As someone who voted remain but believes in democracy I stand by & accept the result of the referendum & the decision of the people of my country but it is total arrogant idiots like Tusk & Juncker that really does aid the leave side & will now turn many Remainers into Brexiters 
Labour officially calls for Brexit to be delayed - so why the fuck didn't they fully support the Cooper amendment?? Idiots!!  
To be clear Donald is talking about the people who ‘promoted’ Brexit, those who lied and used illegal methods to hoodwink the British public. We are all their victims.  
Scotland isn't surprised at BBC dangerously twisting words of Donald Tusk to attack Brexit voters  
The Brexit logjam cannot hold back the important work of naming and shaming companies that fail to pay the minimum wage. We must demand better for labour rights.#PMQs 
Labour officially calls for Brexit to be delayed with Article 50 extension - The Independent  
I absolutely love Donald Tusk's blunt verbal slap.Seriously brilliant stuff, and I'm glad European politicians are being increasingly bluntly honest about behaviour around Brexit.It's even better when you see both sides of the Brexit debate taking it out of context. 
TUSK - "The UK is leaving the EU, many people in the UK wish for its reversal, I have always been with you with all my heart, but the pro-Brexit stance of the Prime Minister and the leader of the opposition rules out this question; there's no effective leadership for Remain'  
How can the BBC be fair about Brexit when it takes money from the EU? We need answers' | via @telegraph 
It has been reported that if a general election is called local associations will be blocked by Tory HQ from deselecting MPs who supported May’s deal. MPs who didn’t support the deal have not received the same guarantee.The Tory party has completely split.#BlueOnBlue #Brexit 
Migration Minister @BenMacpherson & Health Secretary @JeaneF1MSP today met reps from Social Care sector to discuss the impact of Brexit and concerns over UK Gov's proposed changes to immigration rules.  
.@donaldtusk didn't show contempt for voters but for the reckless politicians who sold Brexit without any plan to deliver it. It's they who show contempt for the electorate with dark money, lies on the side of buses, barely concealed xenophobia & lack of any substantive answers.  
I have been wondering what the special place in hell looks like for those who promoted Brexit without even a sketch of a plan how to carry it safelyDonald Tusk 
Ireland's Taoiseach Leo Varadkar has a word in Donald Tusk's ear - after @eucopresident says "a special place in hell" is reserved for "those who promoted #Brexit without even a sketch of a plan of how to carry it out safely"[tap to expand]  
"Huuuge trade deals"WATCH: today David Davis made yet another Brexit promise, saying negotiating a trade deal with the EU will be 'faster' than in the past 2 years. Nobody can keep the undeliverable promises made for Brexit. Please RT:  
Ugh.Today, in the Knock-On Effects Department: if the UK crashes out of the EU with no formal Brexit deal, the UK small press scene is gonna take a serious body shot.  
So could the @BBCPolitics team report his words accurately rather than pandering to #BBCBias with regard to Brexit. Thank you 
You've reported that Donald Tusk said Brexiteers (widely understood to include voters) should go to hell. He actually said "those who promoted Brexit" which refers to the politicians behind it.You implied the EU Council president said 17 million Brits should go to hell#FakeNews 
Donald Tusk: special place in hell for those who backed Brexit without plan  
The lawyer who won a landmark Brexit case wants Uber to pay as much as $260 million a year in value added taxes  via @business 
Eu leader Donald Tusk says that"There is a special place in HELL for those that want BREXIT"If you ever needed proof that Brexit is the right decision this arrogant dictator gives it!!#shutit 
He only said what millions of people in the UK have been saying for a long time. But You don't listen to your own people so now Mr Tusk has stood up for them. This whole Brexit thing is a shame and only makes the UK a laughing stock to the rest of the world. 
It was a stupid referendum.Sold to Parliament as advisory, then Cameron makes a political pledge to be bound by it.A binary choice on a non-binary decision.No proper plan for what Brexit should look like before voting.It was a stupid referendum. 
If the referendum was fraudulent and the leave voters were misled how come it's only remain voters who are whinging about it?  
Finally realising UK is not Greece, there will be no second referendum, UK Parliament will implement the result.  Not used to not getting their own way 
Boris Johnson compared the EU to the Nazis, Jeremy Hunt compared the EU to the USSR and that's all fine but the Brextremist nutters go apeshit when Donald Tusk points out they had no Brexit plan.@lbc #wato #newsnight #r4today #PoliticsLive 
Brexit: Donald Tusk's planned outburst  
THEN he says. (Having said out that preserving Peace is the aim) “I have been wondering what the special place in Hell looks like for those who promoted Brexit without even a sketch of a plan as to how to carry it out safely”I.E. With no deliverable plan for preserving peace 
Has anyone tried asking that guy that got Rage Against The Machine to number one at Christmas if he can stop Brexit? 
I am utterly surprised you are surprised. Those of us working on Brexit and citizens' rights in Brussels and the EU27 capitals have been warning of this for months. England and Westminster are totally detached from reality. 
Without the British press’s divorce from reality - and dedication to causing terrible trouble - there would have been no Brexit. They both know this.  
It’s part of Brexit  
LOL. A reminder that Trump’s one idea about how to negotiate Brexit was to sue the EU.  
Now on to the ⁦@Europarl_EN⁩ to meet with its special #brexit coordinator ⁦@guyverhofstadt⁩. He’s stood firm on the need to avoid a hard border. Great to see that support is still there 
Andrea Leadsom with complete ignorance of facts on #PoliticsLive tells EU 'to knuckle down and start negotiating a deal'. The deal has already been agreed and signed off by her leader and PM May. Now the Tories want to tear it up. Exactly whose fault is that? Brexit fantasist!  
I voted remain but if there is another referendum the leave campaign should have a large bus with photos of Tusk, Barnier and Juncker on the side with the caption, "do we want these unelected dictators ruling us", I would now vote leave. 
After Donald Tusk asks "what the special place in hell looks like for those who promoted Brexit", the London Palladium has the answer:  
“The government is in danger of sleepwalking the country towards leaving with no plan and no deal at all.”Emily Thornberry asks whether the government has a better Brexit plan – but David Lidington says if Labour is worried about no deal, “they have to vote for a deal”.  
Donald Tusk:  the people who backed Brexit without having a plan to deliver it deserved “a special place in hell”.  Andrea Leadsom told the BBC that Tusk was a man with “no manners”.Coming from the woman who claimed she would make a better PM than May because she had children. 
Diabetics in Britain worry a no-deal Brexit could put their lives at risk  
The people who encouraged you to vote for Brexit are angry at Donald Tusk for reminding you that they have never had a plan, whilst simultaneously have made plans for themselves. 
So what was the Brexit plan before the vote then? I’ll wait... 
thank you for laying the blame with those who promoted Brexit. millions of us have been against it the whole time, and many more have realised they were lied to and are actively calling for Brexit to be scrapped as well! WE WANT TO REMAIN!!  
We've been crying out for help for nearly 3 years @eucopresident Not having a 'sketch of a plan' only ranks highly in the multitude of severe issues caused by Brexit. Please note our democratic process has been hijacked by corrupt & illegal practices & the govt are complicit  
Our friends at @labourleave here admit that Lab is taking the mick out of Brexit voters. Come and join us in @TheSDPUK instead - a social democratic party that supports the collective decision of the British people to take back control. 
The president of the EU Donald Tusk says anyone that promoted Brexit is going to hell.So Mr Tusk thinks God won't let us into heaven on the basis we wanted to leave the EUHa ha ha ha ha what a nob  
Perhaps they made the mistake of thinking the EU would act rationally and not suborn itself to Putin’s asset @JunckerEU. We will not be blackmailed by a drunk Luxembourg dwarf. #Brexit 
It's that sort of bitterness and anger from the #EU, contemptuous of democracy in the #UK where a clear decision to #Leave was made, that makes me even more determined to achieve a clean #Brexit.  
Of all of the statements made about #Brexit over the last 3 years, Donald Tusk's are, IMHO, the least outrageous. 
'It is completely outrageous for Mr Tusk to point out we lied to people in the referendum and that he hates us for manipulating the electorate.' 
Tusk wasn't insulting the British nation, he was insulting the self interested fascists who hijacked the country for their own gain.Remain is now the clear majority in the UK and they will all agree with his comments on brexit today.#indyref2 #brexit #DissolveTheUnion 
Er, it’s not the EU who are going to be damaged the most by Brexit. 
He didn't say Brexiteers, he said those who promoted Brexit your quote is designed to enrage voters, where is your impartiallity 
The most revealing part of Tusk’s press conference wasn’t about Brexiteers going to hell – instead, most significant are his comments on a second referendum:  
Whatever you think about #Brexit or those who promoted it, this language is unworthy of the office of @eucopresident 
Watch: Donald Tusk says there is a "Special Place in Hell" for BrexiteersLive Brexit updates:  
Don’t you ever shut up running  down 24/7. This is all you do everyday crying about BREXIT. 17.4 million voted leave the EU were leaving 29 March. Hurry up you haven’t tweeted 5 minutes Project Fear tweet. Fantastic yesterday Sajid Javid giving you a mauling in Parliament.   
Labour officially calls for Brexit to be delayed - @EmilyThornberry, Shadow Foreign Secretary, officially calls for extension of Article 50.Next step on the way to a #PeoplesVote#PMQs#FFS 
Everyone surprised by Donald Tusk's comments. He's really upset ignorant politicans & journalists who traded in simplistic rubbish about how easy Brexit would be. But he's been consistent with the direct, truthful language. Isn't that what people want? Not everyone obv.  
Having been sent images of tanks and Hitler countless times I know anti-German dogwhistling has plagued the pro-Brexit camp since those 'Halt Ze German Advance' billboards. But as the Brexit chaos intensifies that populist jingoism is becoming increasingly shrill. My latest   
This hectoring is why #Brexit is more acceptable than staying in the EU.Who on earth would change their mind and decide that Remaining in the EU was more attractive with such undiplomatic language? 
Sinn Féin leader Mary Lou McDonald on her party’s meeting with Theresa May at Stormont: “We are now 51 days from the Brexit deadline and the British Prime Minister has come here empty handed; with the same old rhetoric, with no plan, no credibility and frankly no honour” 
Nigel Farage, whose salary is paid by the EU, asks "How can the BBC be fair about Brexit when it takes money from the EU?"  via @Telegraph 
The President of the European Council says there's a "special place in Hell" for people who "promoted Brexit" without a plan  
a few months before the referendum I talked to my Parisian aunt and her stance on it was something along the lines of "oh for the love of fucking god I really hope they finally fucking leave" and let me tell you, I'm really coming round to that point of view 
Bang on Mr Tusk. Westminster triggered Article 50 with no plan knowing it shafted the GFA and the whole of Ireland and have resolutely refused to investigate the illegality, fraud and foreign manipulation surrounding the referendum. #Brexit is hell on earth. 
Hell for people voting for Brexit would look a bit like this Donald old chap. I do hope this helps with your recent query.  
January 30th 1649 was a glorious day when the British dealt with a ruler who had divided the country in his attempt to exceed his rightful powers. A narrow advisory referendum victory is no more a mandate for the abuse of power than the Divine Right of Kings. #Brexit #FBPE 
"The man has no manners, I think it's extremely regrettable, not at all helpful"@AndreaLeadsom on @eucopresident Donald Tusk's "special place in hell #Brexit comment#PoliticsLive  
“They can go to the chippy” –  that this is the extent of your contributions to solving complex Brexit problems, for you to accuse Donald Tusk of extremist rhetoric is jaw-dropping hypocrisy. Your political career is evidence of the moral & intellectual poverty of NI politics. 
I’d bet you everything I have, that if we put it to a referendum. The majority of people would rather deport this Tory government than they would the Windrush generation. 
A desire for self-government is racist and far-right? Somebody has hit the bottle early. If he reacts like this to #Brexit, imagine the tantrum when #Ireland leaves the #EU. 
On way to #Washington for meetings with @SecPompeo and Irish American friends on the Hill to discuss #BREXIT #MEPP #ISIS #Venezuela and launching new Irish Strategy for North America.    
Well said Mr Tusk however I wish you'd also mentioned the fact that the referendum was illegal and should be declared void.  
More outrageous desperation from the unelected EU ideologue, @donaldtusk. He states; "wondering what that special place in hell is like for those who promoted #Brexit without even a sketch of a plan of how to carry it out safely." Look to your dogmatism trying to overturn Brexit 
"Brexit Has Made Britain anti-German Again" says Tanja Bueltmann.There's something quite foul about UK academics lying to foreign media.  
This what he said: "I've been wondering what that special place in hell looks like, for those who promoted Brexit, without even a sketch of a plan how to carry it out safely."He didn't deride voters. He showed contempt for those whose job it was to have a plan. People like you. 
The overwhelming truth about ##brexit is the total lack of:A credible planProject managementHonestyEconomic credibilityBusiness acumenHumanityUnderstandingIntelligence@Jacob_Rees_Mogg@BorisJohnson@jeremycorbyn@LiamFox#specialplaceinhell#Tusk 
He’s bang on the money. Leavers can suck it up. I don’t give a shit anymore! But what he specifically said is it’s the fault of  politicians who lied before the referendum then invoked Article 50 with no clue what the hell they were doing particularly about the Irish Border 
"Which bit of 'replaced' was not clear?" Conservative Brexiteer Mark Francois asks Cabinet Office Minister David Lidington if the government is committed to replacing the Irish backstop with "alternative arrangements"#PMQs updates:  #Brexit  
The Irish Taoiseach was caught on a mic saying “they will give you terrible trouble in the British press for that" after the European Council president said said he wonders what the "special place in hell looks like for those who promoted Brexit" without a plan.  
Dangerous misrepresentation of what @donaldtusk said from @BBCNews.Designed to make Leave voters angry at the EU instead of those who encouraged them to vote for Brexit with no plan on how to deliver it. Shameful.#SpecialPlaceInHell 
I’m guessing that the “special place in hell” which the EU Commission has reserved for those who supported Brexit might look a bit like that “special place” they created for Greece, @YanisVaroufakis? 
THERE isn't a special place in hell for those who pushed for #Brexit without a sketch of a plan of how to carry it out safely... there's a big mansion in the countryside with a consultancy for a hedge fund investing in Europe 
He's very obviously showing his contempt for the people at the top,who promoted and promised a fantasy Brexit  with no way of actually providing it. You know, those people who are responsible for the utter farce that is currently occurring,not those that voted for it. 
In the event of a Tory crash out Brexit Theresa May must begin preparations for a referendum on Irish unity in line with the Good Friday Agreement  - @MaryLouMcDonald 
YES!!! at last, they've done something right!! there's surely a majority in parliament for an extension now too; the longer we stay in the EU, the more time we have to stop Brexit!  
Brexit creates a lot of uncertainty for financial services. To protect our customers on both sides, we took a proactive approach to ensure that it's business as usual.   
'The EU is first and foremost a peace project.' Absolutely right. Brexit, by contrast, is first and foremost a confrontation project.And it's mean, petty, nasty and self-destructive.  
Sinn Fein says if UK ‘crashes out’ without a deal then the PM must begin preparations for a referendum on Irish unity 
I too have been wondering what that special place in hell looks like, for those who promoted #Brexit  
“Ireland will not be the collateral damage of the Tory Brexit” @MaryLouMcDonald tells media after meeting with Theresa May 
.@mrjamesob: "What Brexit plan did you vote for?"Caller: "The Jacob Rees Mogg plan"Oh good grief.@LBC 
Confused about borders are border checks? Want to know what all the fuss is about? Do we need to have a border after #Brexit? This text might be a good place to start. Questions - let me know. #BorderSecurity #customs 
Labour officially calls for Brexit to be delayedFor what reason? That's what the EU will be asking  
The govt really need to rethink this, they're putting our lives at risk . Brexit is literally a matter of life an death. #PeoplesVote 
BLOCK: Labour’s Emily Thornberry calls for Article 50 extension, Brexit delay. 17.4 million voted Leave, they’ve already waited years but Labour don’t give a damn!  
Sinn Féin leader Mary Lou McDonald says we had a very direct meeting with Mrs May. She was empty handed. No plan. No credibility. Frankly, no honour. Running down the clock profoundly unacceptable. Days of dictating to the Irish are over. #Brexit  
President of the European Council Donald Tusk criticised those who pushed Brexit “without even a sketch of a plan.” 
Their recklessness knows no bounds and the younger generations in the UK who overwhelmingly want us to remain will prevail. Brexit will be as transitory as a sandcastle taken by the tide. It looked pretty to some but was based on foundationless fantasy #StopBrexit #PeoplesVote 
Can anyone be surprised that the most angry and bitter about Brexit among Europe's leaders are its greatest anglophiles? Tusk, Stubb, Verhofstadt, etc.  
BREAKING NEWS: Labour officially calls for Brexit to be delayed with Article 50 extension. 
This is utterly appalling.May’s Brexit will cause more people to lose their jobs and sink into poverty. A no deal Brexit even more so.With an increasingly firm bedrock of attitudes like these - now put into school curricula - the combination could be horrific.We must fight  
Really important story from @PickardJE - Len McCluskey does Corbyn’s dirty work, lining up a deal to give Labour MPs cover to save May’s Brexit deal  
A very large number of people around the world, and a majority in UK, are now nodding in agreement with Donald Tusk and his statement about the inept Tory Brexit planners (etc) should go to hell for what they have caused. The truth hurts - and that is the truth.  
SNP's Ian Blackford accuses the government of "sneaking through" cuts to pensions credit during #Brexit "chaos"#PMQs updates:  
Any Brexiter who feels insulted by this tweet only admits that they indeed promoted #Brexit without even a sketch of a plan how to carry it out safely. 
Donald Tusk has been entirely consistent for years that there will be no winners from Brexit, only losers. The UK loses, the EU loses. And that's what is about to happen. He has absolutely every right to say this.  
EU Council president Donald Tusk had extremely strong words for those who pushed for Brexit without planning for its consequences  
Private Eye Brexit latest  
There’s no denying it @eucopresident. But I take solace in the fact that Brexit has woken up future leadership to get us back into the EU one day. Names like @LaylaMoran @SebDance @Femi_Sorry @lara_spirit spring to mind. 
It is easier to leave hell than the EU. #Brexit  
Another reason to leave the EU. The EU and its leaders really do hold the United Kingdom and 17.4 million voters in contempt. I am beginning to not be bothered if it is a WTO Brexit or not - so long as we leave the damn thing behind. 
Emily Thornberry: "The sensible cautious thing to do at this late stage is to seek a temporary extension to Article 50"David Lidington: "It would simply defer the need for this House... to face up to some difficult decisions" #PMQs updates:  #Brexit  
At this point, the EU isn't trying to help people seeking a second referendum, and it isn't of the mind to pander to the ERG, it just wants the UK to sign up to the deal on the table. 
Donald Tusk wonders out loud ‘whether there is a special place in hell for those that planned Brexit without a plan’.That’s what he and the rest of the Bureaucrats think of the 17.4m of us that voted to leave the EU.I think he deserves our response. 
Taoiseach Leo Varadkar and European Council president Donald Tusk were caught on tape moments after Mr Tusk said Brexiteers have a "special place in hell":* Varadkar: They'll give you terrible trouble in the British press* Tusk (laughing): Yeah, I know #Brexit #iestaff 
“Bridgen Would my Right Honourable Friend join with the leader of the opposition to dismiss once and for all any prospect of a second EU referendum and reaffirm that we are leaving on 29th March?” @ABridgen#StandUp4Brexit #PMQs 
BBC received nearly €5million in EU funding since 2015Nigel Farage: Why on earth does it need these funds?Can’t the BBC see the conflict of interests?How can the BBC be fair about #Brexit when it takes money from EU?We need answers.#EU via @Telegraph 
The President of the European Council, Donald Tusk, says that he wonders "what the special place in hell looks like for those who promoted Brexit without even a sketch of a plan how to carry it safely...”  
SOS from the majority of the UK. Brexit is hell x 
"Government treading water in the Niagara River while the current is taking us over the falls.” - Emily Thornberry #PMQs Brexit belter 
David Lidington must not forget his promise that the referendum result would be binding. #RightTheFirstTime #PMQs 
British politics today: Emily Thornberry arguing for a form of Brexit (when she personally opposes Brexit) and David Lidington opposing a customs union (which he personally supports) #PMQs 
Thank you for your leadership @MarshadeCordova Great to see another #Labour MP with the courage to stand against #Brexit & call for a #PeoplesVote.With more MPs like Marsha standing up for their constituents, we can win a campaign to #Remain in the EU. 
A disgraceful attack on the 17.4 million U.K. citizens  (a majority who voted in the referendum) who voted for #Brexit The EU don’t like or do democracy.  
The plan is to honour the referendum result and get out of the special place in hell that is the anti-democratic #EU, but our politicians don’t want us to. That’s the only problem. 
Today our most important task is to prevent a no deal #Brexit. I hope that tomorrow we will hear from PM @theresa_may a realistic suggestion on how to end the impasse.  
Pro Brexit Leader of the Opposition. And there it is.  
This may annoy a few who politically orchestrated Brexit however it unfortunately happens to be based on reality. My issue has never been with Brexit voters, it’s always been with reckless, shallow politicians who promised a Brexit they’d no credible plan to deliver #RightToVote 
Anyone surprised by the strength of Donald Tusk’s language should see his interview for Norma Percy’s @BBCTwo documentary on UK and EU. He said he told David Cameron that the Brexit referendum was stupid  
Tusk says those who backed Brexit with no plan deserve 'special place in hell' - Politics liveStrong words. Well deserved. Shudder to think what those calm and reasoned people at the Express/Mail/Sun will make of them.  
Tusk has said he has wandered what kind of 'special' place in hell awaits those who promote Brexit.Shocked? Not really, he and the EU are BULLIES.Let's get on with it, leave and watch the EU destroy itself from afar:  
After Brexit we will be free of unelected, arrogant bullies like you and run our own country. Sounds more like heaven to me.  
How will #Brexit end austerity, please? 
Tory benches strangely subdued & front bench looking worried as @EmilyThornberry demonstrates what an effective leader of the opposition might achieve with close questioning on the #Brexit timetable & #Article50 extension #PMQs 
It's colourful language but he's right. Those who promoted and cheer led us into Brexit had no idea what the consequence were, had no plan, fundamentally misled the people of this country with unfulfillable promises. 
European Council President Donald Tusk blasts Brexit supporters with no ideas:  "I have been wondering what a special place in hell looks like for those who promoted Brexit without even a sketch of plan how to carry it safely."   
This despicable man @jasonjhunter is scamming Remainers out of money by claiming he cam stop Brexit. He's already scammed £120k. I'm fuming and i want my £20 back.  
NAILED IT. And worth remembering that MPs across parliament:* voted to hold a referendum with no plan in event of Leave majority* voted to trigger A50 with no plan* with 6 weeks to go there is still no plan  
"The withdrawal agreement stands... it is the best deal possible"Ireland's Taoiseach Leo Varadkar says recent "instability in British politics" demonstrates why the EU needs the "legal guarantee" of the Irish backstop  #Brexit  
Hey Piers @piersmorgan, you realise that Patrick Minford is the ERG's top economist. One of the EconomistsFroBrexit (rebranded EconomistsForBritain) lot. Many of the Brexiters numbers/forecasts on Brexit come from him. 
Vote Leave's secret agent Donald Tusk is turning out to be nearly as helpful to the Brexit cause as Jeremy Corbyn. 
Did you vote Brexit in Hull? Your three Labour MPs think they know better. In Parliament, they've actively voted to impede, delay and stop Brexit on March 29th. The people of Hull deserve better than this.  
Looks like there’s still no chance of #EU throwing Ireland under the bus despite the ardent hopes of some little Englanders. The #EU unlike the U.K. is a partnership of equals #Brexit #ScotlandsPlaceInEurope   
We've been continually impressed with the EU's gentle tact, diplomacy and neighbourly spirit. It is truly the world's greatest 'peace project'. #brexit  
Big business wants nothing to change, but the majority of British businesses want to leave the EU so they can start to embrace the benefits of Brexit#LeaveMeansLeave 
Wow. Tusk just said ‘there’s a special place in hell for for those who promoted Brexit without any plan of how to do it safely’ Mr Tusk thankyou. And SOS from the majority of the UK. #brexit #RevokeArticle50 
Donald Tusk, 11:41am: "I strongly believe a common solution is possible and I will do everything in my power to find it"Donald Tusk, 11:42am: "I've been wondering what that special place in hell looks like for those who promoted Brexit" 
Donald Tusk, president of the European council, says he's been "wondering what the special place in hell looks like" for those who promoted #Brexit without a plan. Follow his Brussels speech here:  
Jo Stevens MP: "Brexit is clogging up the pipes of our democratic institutions, with mountains of legislation and statutory instruments being dumped on Parliament without much-needed time for proper scrutiny or transparency." 
TUSK: Special place in hell for those who promoted Brexit 'without plan'. What an absurd intervention.  
There we have it this Reptilian un-elected B*stard basically saying that #Brexiteers should go to Hell....... those who promoted #Brexit are the 17,410,742 Brits who voted for it you little political TURD #DonadlTusk! @CCHQPress @Conservatives @ConHome @TheConWom @DCBMEP 
"We will not gamble with peace"@eucopresident Donald Tusk says the EU's top #Brexit priority is the Irish border and the need to maintain the Good Friday peace process 
European Council president Donald Tusk says he wonders what "special place in Hell" there is for the people who promoted Brexit without any plan to do it 
Tusk is, traditionally, the least likely of all the players in the Brexit talks to use language like this. Clearly at the end of his tether, which doesn't bode well for PM.  
"I have been wondering what the special place in hell looks like for those who promoted Brexit without even a sketch of a plan how to carry it safely"@eucopresident Donald Tusk says he and Ireland's Leo Varadkar are planning for no-deal #Brexit "fiasco" 
LEAVE LIES keep returning to keep the Brexit fantasy alive amongst Britons that are too busy or lazy to fact-check what Brexiteers & MPs say in public & the media. A lie that won't die is using Art24 GATT in the event of no deal.As things stand its rubbish #peoplesvote 1/5 
and who then abdicated all responsibility for delivering it  #Brexit @Nigel_Farage @BorisJohnson @DavidDavisMP @DominicRaab @SteveBakerHW @SuellaBraverman 
You don't have to respect a fraudulent referendum. It's an affront to democracy. 
“Ive been wondering what the special place in hell looks like for those who promoted #Brexit without a sketch of a plan of what it would look like” @donaldtusk sitting on the fence as ever ... ! #TellingItAsItIs 
Tusk says he has been thinking about the "special place in hell" for those who promoted Brexit "without even a sketch of a plan of how to carry it out safely". Varadkar said the "instability" in London shows why a backstop is need. Pure fury from Brussels and Dublin. 
Nigel Farage says, how can the ⁦@BBC⁩ be fair about #Brexit when it takes money from the EU? We need answers  
Yowsers. Donald Tusk says there will be "a special place in hell" for those who advocated Brexit without defining what it really meant. I suspect he might mean you Boris. 
Wow. EU Council President Donald Tusk says there's "a special place in hell" for the people who promoted Brexit "without even a sketch of a plan of how to carry it out safely." 
Tusk: I wonder what the special place in Hell is for those who pushed for Brexit without a sketch of a plan 
I've been wondering what that special place in hell looks like, for those who promoted #Brexit, without even a sketch of a plan how to carry it out safely. 
Donald Tusk pours ice-cold water on the idea of the UK reversing Brexit, citing "the pro-Brexit stance of the prime minister and leader of the opposition."He adds: "There is no effective force or political leadership for Remain." 
Tusk opens statement saying still plenty of people who wish Brexit could be reversed but that there is not political force or effective leadership for Remain - ‘the facts are unmistakeable’ 
Breaking: Donald Tusk says the pro Brexit stance of the PM & leader of the opposition mean there is little hope of reversing the Brexit process 
BETRAYAL: Labour Shadow Minister calls for second referendum. Will Corbyn sack her or is this now Labour policy?  
Unite has a perfect right to talks with May - but nobody has the right to undermine Labour conference policy. Which is Customs Union and "participation" in Single Market. Without a legally binding Treaty current EU labour rights are not worth toilet paper in U.K. after Brexit  
‘Don’t want to see you again’: Calais port boss bans UK transport secretary amid no-deal Brexit row — RT UK News  
TODAY AT PARLIAMENT SQUARE.TAKING OUR GRIEVANCE TO THE SEAT OF BRITISH POWER!1PM TO 4PMVOTE WITH YOUR CABS THE #CONSERVATIVES TRIED TO SELL US AS SLAVES.#LABOUR ARE TRYING TO STARVE US OUT.THE LABOUR #MAYOR IS HIDING BEHIND #BREXIT TO ASSASSINATE US BY THE BACK DOOR!  
People have asked if this is only for people in Perth and North Perthshire. If you are represented by A Brexit Tory who supports Brexit and voted to end freedom of movement in South Perthshire or Angus you are more than welcome. See you there  
Pity there is no way of isolating the consequences of Brexit. I'd be quite happy for Leave voters to have sole benefit of any positives, provided they shouldered all negatives. 
Irresponsibly opening floodgates for cheap zero-tariff ceramics, farming produce, lamb, beef, manufactured goods etc could undercut British producers and jeopardise thousands of jobs. But @LiamFox confirms it is a “possibility” !! Another #Brexit nightmare on horizon...  
If Brexit goes ahead, by December Britain will be on on its knees, begging Donald Trump for scraps in a future trade deal. We need to remember who our friends are before it is too late.  
Theresa May is playing a "risky game of poker" on Brexit, London Mayor Sadiq Khan says  
Regular reminder that it's not just the Tories who are split on Brexit. 
"A prominent rightwing thinktank has been accused of “misconduct and mismanagement” and issued with a formal legal warning by the Charity Commission after using its resources to campaign for a hard Brexit."Shock horror. 
Students @MiddlesexUni benefit hugely from study abroad. Many can't afford it without Erasmus+ & they're the ones who benefit most from how study abroad boosts attainment & employment prospects. MPs please press for a replacement post-Brexit @Offord4Hendon #SupportStudyAbroad 
"Borders work, you just have to find the creative solutions." @AskAdamTaylor gives a view on #Brexit from the Canadian perspective and says there are solutions to a hard border that stop restrictions to trade and people. Latest on #Brexit here:  
How can the BBC be fair about Brexit when it takes money from the EU?"The BBC CLAIMS that none of the millions it has received from the EU over the last decade find their way into its editorial budget." Leavers do not believe the claim via @Telegraph 
Things that will be unacceptable to the public & lead to political oblivion for the Tory’s 1. May’s Deal with the Backstop.2. May’s Deal without the Backstop. 3. May’s Deal in any shape or form.4.Delaying Brexit in any way.5. Ruling out No Deal.6. A second referendum. 
The EU has 40 trade deals that cover 70 countries - that's around 37% of the  economy. All of them are better than WTO terms no-deal would force on .  51 days out from Brexit most have not been replicated by the UK . To protect UK trade we need to avoid no deal at all costs  
What a great speech by a great President. An honest President. Wish we had him over in the UK, especially during Brexit. 
(Thread) BEYOND BREXIT: Catching up with Pub. Acc Committee report into local govt funding. Takeaways: Since 2010 councils have received a funding cut of nearly 50%. At the same time there's been a 33% increase in homelessness Number of children in care at 25 year high 
BREXIT WARNING: No-deal to 'tilt Eurozone over THE BRINK' - Andrew Neil's EU analysis   
There are FORTY land borders between the EU and non-EU countries.There are no hard borders.So why would there be a hard border between N. Ireland and Ireland after #Brexit.It makes no sense.This is a fake issue being used to try and stop #Brexit. 
Sky’s political correspondent pumping out his relentlessly skewed view of Brexit. Ireland is not Britain’s equal. It is the EU’s patsy and will learn it’s place the moment it has outlived its usefulness.  
There were this group of German people speaking to each other and they were deep in conversion, the only word I understood was "Brexit" and then everyone just laughed, I laughed too, think we're all going for a pint later 
Finally someone takes action against Chris 'Failing' Grayling for sheer incompetence - a pity it had to be Port of Calais officials, who are apoplectic at the lack of preparations being made by the Transport Minister in the case of a No Deal Brexit.  
Don't believe the Brexit scare stories - investment in the City is UP. Join the fastest growing Brexit movement @  
Confederation of British Industry (CBI) warns of “hugely damaging implications” as Liam Fox’s department for international trade looks woefully unprepared for Brexit. 
Back in Brussels today for a series of key #Brexit meetings, starting with ⁦@eucopresident Donald Tusk⁩. I’ll be thanking him for the ongoing ⁦@EUCouncil⁩ support for #Ireland and discussing current situation 
NO NO NO We have waited long enough No delay..........     UK ministers hold secret talks of delaying Brexit by eight weeks: The Telegraph | Article [AMP] | Reuters  
Belfast-born actor Stephen Rea (Cyprus Avenue) explores the impact of Brexit and the uncertainty of the future of the Irish border in this @FinancialTimes short film written by Clare Dwyer Hogg. 
Need one of these for Brexit, or whenever Murdo Fraser is on TV.  
Now is the time for Parliament and Government to hold their nerve. I am confident a deal can be reached that can deliver on the opportunities Brexit presents.   
He stood on a manifesto promising to deliver the result of the referendum - the biggest democratic decision ever taken in this country - and to leave the Single Market and Customs Union. He is now reneging on that promise. His association is completely right to deselect him.  
'Universities are warning that Erasmus student exchange scheme will have no more funding for UK students in event of a no-deal Brexit.17,000 UK students would not study abroad as planned next year'What sort of country does that to its young people? 
Zero UK #tariffs, across the board, overnight, after #Brexit?  no consultation w/UK business no impact analysis on firms/jobs no plan to help affected biz/areas no thought to long-term impact on UK #trade or #investment ... no, thank you. 
What I predict TM will try next:Bring back some bullshit codicil regarding the backstop from EUPut it to Parl & threaten, like she always does, that if Brexit MPs don't support it she'll add in the Customs Union & try to pass it with Lab support Brexit MPs must not support 
WATCH | @KateHoeyMP: "The backstop is a dagger right through the GFA... I have no truck with extending Article 50 - that's a ploy by people who want to stop Brexit... A managed WTO is possible, more work is going into it and the scare stories are being blown out of the water!"   
Tomorrow's front page from The New European focuses on Jeremy Corbyn's efforts to push Brexit through.  
Utterly outrageous that a sitting Conservative Cabinet minister who stood on the Tory 2017 manifesto is even floating the possibility of revoking Article 50 (ie calling off Brexit). Incidents like this show why no Brexit voter should trust the Conservatives.  
BBC invites two right-wing think tanks on in a row to air industry-crushing Brexit policyThe IEA should not be given endless airtime to spout neoclassical nonsense that threatens the jobs of farmers and factory workers I represent 
I was at the hospital yesterday. The doctor prescribed some eye medication. The pharmacy tells me it hasn’t been available since October due to manufacturing issues at the sole global supplier.  Anyone who thinks a hard Brexit will not affect the supply of meds is a fool. 
UK Steel director Gareth Stace: "Let us be clear, there are no benefits to be had from Brexit for the steel industry. This merely an exercise in damage limitation with the various different shades of Brexit ... representing various degrees of harm." 
How can the BBC be fair about Brexit when it takes money from the EU? We need answers - @Nigel_Farage 
Wake up, Britain. Wake up, Parliament. There is no *will of the people*. There is no *duty to deliver Brexit*. This is manipulation out of Goebbels' Handbook. And like pregnancy, there is no such thing as a Brexit compromise. Let's Remain & fix Britain. 
This might help explain his apparent status as a High Priest Grand Bull Moose in The Cult of Brexit?  
BBC pushing scares from a registered referendum Remain campaign (UniversitiesUK) with no balancing views, here. 
Brexit latest.May seems determined to make amendments to the #WithdrawalAgreement get the DUP on board and then try and ram it through the Commons.She is a lunatic. 
Does make you wonder why some want to delay Brexit, read up on the Lisbon Treaty  
Really ? So what was predicted and called project fear - happens - and now it's not to do with brexit . Comedy gold  
Brexit is also a local issue that will impact our community - our local businesses, public services and the people who live and work here. @MarshadeCordova@wandsworthnews @WandsworthRadioAlso check out our own Brexit Audit:  
Greg Clark says that the deadline for a Brexit deal is not March 29. He suggests it could in fact be as soon as next Friday for those exporting to places like Japan who need certainty about the tariffs they will face. 
This is Nicola Sturgeon from the day before the referendum in 2016 saying that it was not SNP policy to adopt the Euro. How exactly are they hoping to join the EU as a member state? Why would they suggest keeping Sterling as it would give no control over fiscal policy? Shambles.  
Among the @iealondon's charitable activities are: Campaigning against tobacco regulation (while taking money from BAT etc)Campaigning against controls on junk foodSeeking to privatise the NHSDemanding the hardest possible BrexitVery charitable, I'm sure 
Some people in my family voted for Brexit and I have no idea what to say to them when it all goes inevitably wrong. ‘I told you so’ isn’t kind or encouraging, but not saying that would, to my mind, ignore, to an intolerable degree, the fact that I did actually tell them so. 
If anything deserves criticism in EU policy, it's the CommonFisheriesPolicy. EU slowly now acting; more needed. New @FoodreseachUK briefing by Miriam Greenwood punctures UK hypocrisy (it sold its quotas). Gives excellent overview ways forward for UK Brexit  
#Liam Neeson is a reminder of racial violence in Britain. 'Nigger hunting' and 'Paki bashing' were common in the not too distant past, and still continue today. Post Brexit the rise in this kind of violence explode across the country, it is not something in the nations past/3 
Boris Johnson: EU goal similar to Hitler'sBrussels Eurocrats use “different methods” to unify Europe under 1 “authority”#EU “disastrous” failures fuelled tensions & allowed Germany to grow in power, “take over” Italian economy & “destroy” Greece.#Brexit 
Not 8 weeks, 8 days, or even 8 minutes.By 29th March, they'll have had 2 years & 9 months.Any delay, whatever its ostensible reason, will just be used by this untrustworthy Remainer Govt an excuse to defer Brexit indefinitely, then eventually drop it. 
In anticipation of a No-Deal Brexit my lab is actively stockpiling high-quality researchers from all over the world 
Sterling to slump on no-deal Brexit, rise a bit on orderly exit - Reuters poll  
Labour must stop playing games over Brexit.Jobs are being lost. 56% and growing want to #Remain.A #LeakyWhip where Remain is defeated and Tory Brexit passes with a handful of Labour votes is an outrage.Voters will not forgive or forget Labour backing Brexit.  
. @M_AndersonSF hosts the 6th and last legacy delegation to the EU Parliament as a result of the north loosing its representation due to Brexit. A packed room of MEPs heard the families stories. #TimeForTruth 
'European health workers are staying away from the UK amid uncertainty over Brexit, according to a Plymouth nurse.'  
Glad to give a couple of quick comments to @BBCr4today for this morning’s segment on post-Brexit free trade Eliminating import tariffs would increase competition, drive innovation, and make costs lower for consumers, including exporters who import: 
"Extremists on both sides"? So are the majorities in the other 27 EU countries who want to maintain their Freedom of Movement and wouldn't accept being dragged out of the EU by a referendum won by large scale criminal electoral fraud "extremists" too?  
The IEA’s report pushing hard Brexit - championed by David Davis and Jacob Rees-Mogg - has earned the think tank an official warning for breaking charity law  
Actually 50,000 have been gone for over a year and another 30,000 have also left if they haven’t renewed for six months.It takes a year to register the loss so you haven’t seen the Brexit loss YET.The Tories have large donors and Labour don’t under Corbyn. They are in trouble.  
Waiting for the EU to realise that a No Deal Brexit will be extremely damage their economy. If they want to avoid it then they need to come to the table ready to deal.  
EU and UK used to throw around the threat of a no deal #Brexit in order to pressurise the other side during negotiations. Now - with political brinkmanship the order of the day and with parliament so splintered - Brussels sees no deal as an ever more real possibility 1 
Are you trying to define 'stupid'? Orwell warned of a totalitarian state which lies (like Brexit); pumps out misinformation (Newspeak) & considers dissenters the enemy of the state (Brexit). May is Big Brother (Sister) who gets messages from God about what the People meant. 
Congratulations to Dr Fox on concluding a trade continuity agreement with the Faroe IslandThe biggest advance for Brexit this year 
If this Brexit interview doesn't terrify you, nothing will. 
Outstanding on why the Irish elite have lost it over Brexit. With panache O'Neill argues the failure of the 20th century rulers to make nationalism work means they preferred the EU's colonial project...and go berserk when the Brits opt for self-rule!  
Would the 37% of respondents who think they'll be better off after Brexit please tell us how? Someone must know!  
In 2014 I was blasted for drawing up a boycott list. With weeks to Brexit we are about to be trapped in the English single-market. Radical steps have to be taken now.  
One solution to the Brexit impasse is the Goodbye Lenin one: the Daily Telegraph and Daily Mail are fed a steady stream of information about naval flotillas defending Gibraltar, as noble Tommies distribute food on the home front. Meanwhile, Britain remains in the Single Market. 
It's a bit weird we're only now talking about what the UKs tariffs are going to be post Brexit.Hundreds of tariff lines, hundreds of thousands of potentially impacted workers.Feels like the kind of decision you might want more than a week of industry consultations on. 
Chris Grayling told he is not welcome in Calais' after being 'completely disrespectful' during Brexit planning meeting  
The Remain establishment will continue dismiss the 'little people'."I came to mistrust our establishment so much that I continued to campaign even after we won the referendum with Leave means Leave."Help save Brexit @  
"If we are to take our democratic duty seriously, then this year’s election has to be a referendum on the ANC.We cannot continue on this path any longer." - @MmusiMaimaneWe desperately need CHANGE that build #OneSAforAll now! #SONA2019 
6. However Brexit was never an off the shelf product. It was never a predefined destination. So what we do as a country and how we mold the future is really up for grabs. Brexit isn't a silver bullet to solve anything but its a bridge we have to cross to start. 
Walk away ....Only way .....Theresa. We are better than that .............     Brexit news: EU blame game starts – May leaves bloc staring at no-deal abyss | UK | News |  
5. We desperately need UK reform within our voting system, constitution and politics if it is going to survive. Being in the EU has made our politicians lazy and it painted over the cracks, Brexit gives the UK the urgency it needs to reform. 
Me too. You can stuff plan B - making the best of Brexit. I will never waste a moment of my time & energy on anything other than plan A - to keep the great deal we have. Do we need contingency plans? Perhaps, but there are plenty working on those. I will never be one of them.  
Let me be absolutely clear - if there are any costs to Policing as a result of Brexit, these must be picked up by the UK Govt, this is not Scotland's Brexit. 
For heaven's sake Caroline, these people are here illegally or are criminals. This is partly what Brexit is about …. we want to control our borders and reject those who would not benefit our nation or do us harm. What are you thinking of? You are just another Corbyn and Abbott.  
The Charity Commission has demanded written assurances from the IEA that it will not engage in further political campaigning. The think tank has  been at the forefront of efforts to secure a deregulatory hard Brexit:  
Difficult childhood, some career issues, oh, and a desire not see the country that I love destroyed by bigotry, xenophobia and a collection of wealthy ideologues determined to destroy rights, protections and alliances so they and their friends can make money out of Brexit. 
Also today Cabinet Brexit cttee discussing what to do about tariffs in event of no deal - paper being presented by Fox and Hammond - hear they hope to make decision but may not - as per @HuffPost story yday as @DavidHenigUK thread this morning 
Should the people of NI have a referendum on a NI Backstop? Please vote & retweet. 
My new video shows how May has lied again yesterday about the backstop.  When will stop trying to screw us over on Brexit?  
Cat’s advice on #brexit  
Possible niche market after Brexit: burgundy passport cases to hide the embarrassing blue? 
Today's office complete with tricolour. #Brussels #Brexit  
Does anyone know with just 51 days to go till Brexit have Seaborne managed to lease any ferries yet?Is Ramsgate Harbour dredged to accommodate said ferries?Is there a Ramsgate Custom infrastructure in place? 
 There will be a press point at +/-  16:00 (CET) @EU_Commission following today’s meeting between @JunckerEU and @campaignforleo  #Brexit Watch live here:  
The EU cannot unilaterally postpone 29th March. Automatic no deal Brexit unless agreement of both U.K. and EU to postpone.  
.@DamianHinds, If we can’t stay in Erasmus+, will the UK government fund a national scheme to enable students to study abroad after Brexit? #SupportStudyAbroad 
"It would be very foolish of them to go against the will of the people", says leading Brexiteer Tim Martin who also calls time on May: "We need someone who can lead and argue the case for Brexit - that is not Theresa May.”Hear, hear!  Support us at  
Putting all of this together, the best projection is that unilateral tariff reduction will deepen the economic shock from no-deal Brexit, at the cost of growth and jobs. We can also expect significant currency devaluation in the short term 8/ 
Britain wants to lead the world in having no-one behind the wheel.No Brexit jokes please.  
Politics has failed policing. In this Brexit moment, is anyone listening? @Jonny1Byrne @ChiefConPSNI @NIPolicingBoard @RayHaydenAW @NewsDuffy @KenReid_utv @julianoneill@kevinhkelly 
Govt should be supported in getting on the front foot on tariff liberalisation - it can be done in a sensitive and smart way, that protects vulnerable sectors & boosts consumers. Liam Fox weighs cutting UK import tariffs to zero in no-deal Brexit  
Imagine waking up to a world where Theresa May, Jeremy Corbyn and their offspring, Brexit, had totally disappeared into thin air. 
Our Leader @Adamprice is in Brussels today with @Dafydd_Wigley to meet representatives of the Brexit Steering Group, @EFAparty & @sinnfeinireland #WalesAway  
Based on the information given by Lord Gresford QC regarding @theresa_may offering MPs money to back her Brexit deal, I have submitted a Report to the Serious Fraud Office - @UKSFO in relation to  bribery and corruption in public office.The "confirmation ID" is: "siYrO" 
Some EU officials and diplomats flinch at the thought of the UK hanging around in the EU for even a little bit longer. In my latest insight I write about EU's frustration with UK gov & why extending #Brexit deadline would be difficult:  
After Brexit, the EU wants a hard border in Ireland.Nobody else does.Any ideas how Juncker's troops will be received by the local population when they land at Dun Laoghaire and march north to build it? 
Things that Brexit has shown .Politicians think their view is more important than millions of voters.The EU isn't just a trading bloc.That leave voters are people who care about the UK.That remain voters only look after their own self interests 
HMG must get 600 Brexit-related SIs passed before 29/3. At the time of writing, just 117 had gone through & nearly 40% weren't even laid down. To speed things up, ministers are quietly using tactics to dodge scrutiny. @johnmcdonnellMP & others raise alarm. 
51 days to Brexit. What’s the chances Jeremy Corbyn quizzes The Prime Minister At PMQs over her encyclopaedic knowledge of local bus timetables. Again 
The simple question now for all leavers is this.We gave away FOM for UK citizens and sacrificed future economic growth by leaving the EU. What did we get in return?#peoplesvote #FBPE #Brexit 
Picking up on the idea of the UK removing all tariffs after a no-deal Brexit on which I was briefly quoted on this morning's today programme - this would be a big decision with far reaching consequences... thread 1/ 
Tom Harris, an AWL member and leading Another Europe Is Possible activist, talking about murdering pro-Corbyn trade union officials because they don’t want a second referendum. Sounds like something a Tommy Robinson supporter would write.  
BOOST: Wyke Farms cheese-maker doubling Somerset dairy.“Increasing brand presence in export markets in preparation for post-Brexit trade and launching new export targeted products throughout 2019.”  
Looking to me like May will present Commons with "My deal Brexit or No Deal Brexit" in late Feb. Enough Lab MPs could back her to let it through with Corbyn turning a blind eye, happy to blame the Tories for "Hobson's Choice" while complaining she never took no deal off the table 
Very disappointed my mobile provider ⁦@VodafoneUK⁩ refusing to rule out roaming charges after Brexit, saying it hopes ‘arrangements will be made’ to keep it free. If ⁦@ThreeUK⁩ doesn’t need any ‘arrangements,’ why do you, Vodafone? 
'Get rid of him NOW' Farage calls on May to SACK 'eurofanatic' chief Brexit advisor  
Thank you to the v sensible lady from the British ceramics industry who argued so effectively on @BBCr4today this morning against the loony proposition of self-harming unilateral UK zero tariffs after #Brexit. 
A reminder of why the Charity Commission is investigating the IEA, which claimed to be in the "Brexit influencing game"...  
I spend a lot of time thinking ‘Is it just me, or is the inevitable failure of the Brexit trajectory nominally charted by the intellectual and political minnows we laughably call a government clear to all but the daftest of the daft?’ Turns out it’s not just me .....  
“It isn’t Brexit Britain that is nostalgic for Empire — it’s Ireland. The Irish elite’s uncritical devotion to the EU suggests they long to be ruled over once again. They are selling off their national sovereignty for EU handouts”, says Brendan O’Neill 
Xenophobia and anti-intellectualism. Out for all to see, just like 1930's Germany. THIS is your Brexit, my British friends.Just when are you going to wake up?!  
My Sky Views column: Theresa May’s over a Brexiteer barrel and the price of their support for her Brexit could be her own orderly exit from No 10 >  …? ? 
It is an absolute scandal that with only 51 days to go Zambrano carers, non-EU citizens caring for EU citizen family members in the UK, still have no legal certainty on whether they can stay after Brexit.  
Brexit WARNING: ‘We WILL deliver backstop-free Brexit even if YOU can’t!’ ERG tells May  
Theresa May angers eurosceptics by saying she is 'not proposing' to replace the Irish backstop, but merely ‘change’ it: Brexit News for Wednesday 6 February 
Kaletsky outlines a smart play that would diffuse Theresa May's run-down-the-clock-to-no-deal-Brexit strategy...Just remove the Art50 deadline on the EU27 side. Then 29th March could only be a self-imposed deadline by May... and no Labour MPs would have reason to back that.  
The ERG’s border plan isn’t designed to work, let alone stand up to scrutiny. It’s designed to be dismissed & so give people clinging to the wreckage of Brexit some new nonsense to spout & something else to blame Brussels for. 
Why doesn't @theresa_may put the #Brexit issue back to the People, in say, a vote of kinds. Seeing as though parliament can't agree on a way forward. We could call it a #PeoplesVote. I reckon that would catch on. RT if you agree. 
Every household received a booklet from Cameron, it cost us £9million, before the Referendum explaining everything! The Ballot Paper Said: Remain or Leave! What’s not to understand?  
“Angela Merkel is preparing a last-minute attempt to rescue Theresa May’s Brexit deal by pressuring Dublin to abandon its insistence on the existing Irish backstop” ...let’s see.#StandUp4Brexit 
Sunderland voted emphatically to leave the EU despite warnings about the future of its biggest employer 
SCOOP: EU ambassador whose advice May ignored in 2017 welcomed back to Whitehall for private meeting with the Brexit Secretary, who presumably served platefuls of humble pie...  
Hate crime victims left suicidal and afraid to leave home because of attacks 'unleashed after Brexit referendum' 
The Government ran and offered Nissan £80m in a panic just after the referendum; good luck with all those trade deals they’re going to do with whole countries when we’re out of the EU, on our own and more desperate for investment....  
Exc: Government accused of upping efforts to avoid scrutiny on swathes of Brexit legislation. Ministers have quietly: • Failed to produce numerous impact assessments • Given MPs just a few hours to assess 100s of pages of major statutory instruments  
Thanks to the Telegraph for summing up the current ”Eton mess” of Brexit. Please don’t retweet in case it annoys @BorisJohnson 
Living on the border, I'm genuinely fascinated by "high tech" solutions. We have neither mobile reception nor reliable internet connection so HOW will high tech cope on both sides of current border. Surely we aren't an anomaly in Tyrone? What of other places on border? #Brexit 
This could be the #Brexit windrush scandal; with nearly less than 50 days to go Zambrano carers’ have still yet to be given settled status. The Home Office have not replied to me for months on the matter. Theresa May’s hostile environment continues.  
Some people have argued that, IPOB should not boycott elections, rather they should help & vote out bad leaders. And I ask them, who are the good leaders?Atiku in his interview back herdsmen & said anti grazing bills unconstitutional.Do U think he will support Referendum? 
And while you're at it, why not...> blame the poor for welfare cuts? > blame Remainers for all the job losses? > blame immigrants for underfunded services? > blame Poland for being invaded in 1939?> blame the ill-informed for swallowing Brexit lies?#FailingGrayling 
If you think a No Deal Brexit isn’t something to worry about remember that it’s being brought to you by the same people who brought us the universal credit rollout, the Heathrow airport runway fiasco, the dodgy Settled Status Android app for EU citizens, and now this:  
Polls: The closer the UK gets to Brexit the more the country hates it  
#brexit Message to 3 leaders of Parties. Theresa May grow a backbone,stop pussyfooting around and waving white flag, to EU with Brexit. Jeremy Corbyn stop trying to derail Brexit everyday you idiot. Vince Cable give up with People’s Vote you old dinosaur . All 3 PATHETIC.  pic.twitter.com/uhimTZGlMZ 
As far as I am concerned the Brexit Tory govt are engaged in criminality, acting on the basis of a slim majority in a corrupt, unrepresentative ref nearly 3 uears ago pushing for an extreme, ruinous Brexit in clear defiance of public opinion in 2019. The reckoning must come soon 
Just a small EU country of 2.8m hoovering up opportunities as a result of Brexit   
In the last week, tens of thousands of pounds have been spent pushing a “no deal” Brexit - and we don’t know who’s paying for them. Important from @PeterKGeoghegan: 
A Conservative MP said: Opposing Brexit will destroy the Conservatives. Supporting Brexit will destroy the UK.Is anyone in any doubt about what the Conservatives have chosen to save? 
Chris Grayling has been banned from the Port of Calais by port officials who are furious with his 'no deal' Brexit plans. The port's chairman  Jean-Marc Puissesseau refers to Grayling as #FailingGrayling.  
Brexit has destroyed any hope of that ever happening. 
From #Brexit with love: Lithuania sees its chance  
All this focus on backstop deflecting from two big Brexit issues:1) there is no benefit from any Brexit. Where are the impact studies and debate about good of country?2) main reason now is "we voted for it". #NothingToRespect in the result of that fkawed and fraudulent event! 
Well, here we go. Another day begins, and yet more precious time is being wasted by our two main political parties. @jeremycorbyn WILL YOU LEAD.  #Brexit will devour our great nation, unless you act, NOW. There is no time to lose, we are on the brink of disaster. 
Union leaders are “at war” over how to respond to Number 10’s Brexit overtures.“If Len wants to carry on pissing in the wind then that’s his call, but the union position should be co-ordinated by the TUC . . . Unite is freelancing on a grand scale.”  
The British public wants to see Brexit get done. Parliament's vote last week was a step in that direction.  
Theresa May trying to get her #Brexit deal through Parliament with it's inevitable conclusion #WednesdayWisdom 
Parliamentary gridlock, economic uncertainty, businesses leaving, security concerns, job loses, food and medicine stockpiling. Brexit is a mess. And for what exactly? Bendy bananas....Which we’ve always fucking had. 
Total fiction Ian Birrell.This story you tell is one where you change locationand country .Heard you tell this anti Brexit tale many times.Here you are overhearing again in a restaurant!!I think you are a teller of untruths. 
People traffickers & contraband smugglers of the world! Special offer! Bring your cargo in unmonitored! Brexit Govt No-Deal special! PLUS zero tariffs on imports to destroy UK manufacturing competition & tank value of local currency! Unmissable! Roll up, roll on!  
Did you know that from 29th March some UK #foodlabelling will be inaccurate? Stay up-to-date with the latest information on labelling after #Brexit:  
Another set of establishment cronies working against the people - “Where is the investigation into the charity ‘Hope Not Hate’, ...are campaigning against Brexit with Gina Miller’s radical campaign group ‘Best for Britain.’”  
Looking forward to discussing all things dairy and Brexit @Dairy_TechUK today - on stage at 11.35 with @BarclaysAg @pkendallfarm - plus #milkpintchallenge of course... 
Theresa May travels again to Brussels this week. Why? She‘s never asked for the NI Backstop & all the other debilitating terms to be taken out of the legally binding text of the #Brexit Withdrawal Agreement. What will she discuss with the EU?  
Days to go until Brexit - 51Alternative Arrangements - 0 
Another one bites the dust #Brexit #Ireland #irelandsfuture #Think32 
Parliament debated “Brexit re article 50 it must not be suspended/stopped under any circumstances” Watch the debate:  #Brexit 
“Outlook for #Africa”: The topic of a lively panel discussion yesterday at @InvestAfrica1’s #MiningIndaba dinner in Cape Town. Discussed inter-Africa trade, debt, value-addition, reforms in #Ethiopia, Brexit, etc. Thanks for inviting me to be a speaker. Great networking event.  
Attn Mrs May!Definition of a Pledge! “A Solemn  Promise or Undertaking!”Would you please stop making the above especially regarding Brexit and the EU negotiations as we have now lost all credibility!I’m afraid all sides have completely lost trust in your word! 
Brexit WARNING: ‘We WILL deliver backstop-free Brexit even if YOU can’t!’ ERG tells May  
Wasn't remainers that wailed about that. We always knew that would be the outcome. It was the unicorn, fantasy Brexit types who cried about that. They thought they could just use their British passport to knock Johnny foreigner aside. 
Everyone has rights to his/her own opinions. Likewise me, I do not believe in voting in Nigeria's fraudulent elections.Biafra Referendum: He is more interested in securing the freedom of his Igbo people from what he rightly considers to be a vassal state 
UK–US TRADE: Two agreements to maintain the flow of wines and whiskies between the US and UK after Brexit have been signed by both countries.  pic.twitter.com/yLTJqOQ6Xv 
The #UK's close relationship with #Canada, #Australia & #NewZealand makes #CANZUK the best option after #Brexit.Contact your local MP and ask them to support CANZUK freedom of movement: #cdnpoli #auspol #nzpol #ukpolitics 
There is no such thing as a manageable no deal Brexit.@cbicarolyn  
Good morning my frothing Remoaner pals.Here's some great news, to cheer you up this fine morning.Oh, and it's only 51 days to #Brexit   
Is Brexit now unfolding as the doomsayers predicted?  
There are still people in the Labour Party seriously tweeting to me that Corbyn is a socialist and a believer in the EU single Market. There is NO socialist argument for Brexit or shooting kids at the British Land Border; 
EU prepares for no-deal Brexit — and ensuing blame game  
PM May denies 'shafting' Northern Ireland over Brexit backstop  
Opinion: Theresa May’s backstop travails show Brexit is the pursuit of the impossible  
Why is this UK Brexit problem being reported so much in India?... Its a stupid problem of a tiny country... and has no relevance to us... Only has relevance to moronic media obsessed with White-Skin's problems>> @Republic @Timesnow @ndtv @Indiatoday @CNNnews18 
Remainers blame Brexit. Brexiteers blame the pressures facing the global car industry. Nissan says both are right  
As we all face the #Brexit end game, I make no apologies for being an #Remain purist. I am not interested in party politics or in fighting. I have found my tribe. People from all walks of life who have a shared vision. Of cooperation unity and a UK safer and stronger in the EU  
Of course democrats only want their food and need them to depend on government assistance. #Brexit@RealCandaceO 
'Brexit is the problem that every other country in the world is glad not to have.' 
Strange you seem to have forgotten we had a general election after the referendum, where we voted again to leave EU, plus the single market and customs union, and that No-deal was better than a bad deal, which Parliament also enshrined into UK law as default option. No confusion. 
A multi issue GE would be a wholly undemocratic way to resolve this #BrexitShambles unless Labour stood clearly to #RevokeA50 #StopBrexit & #Remain in Control in the EU#Brexit Britain FUBARWhy there should not be a GE 'about the EU'  via @LSEpoliticsblog 
the UK is still going through with Brexit, tho  
Max Keiser: "#Brexit disaster means Brits need to load up on Bitcoin right now" - Coin Rivet  via 
Petition: Hold a second referendum on EU membership.  
Huge opportunities for PPC to take advantage ofMainstream parties have failed Politically around the world UK BrexitTrumps WallFrench Yellow Vests Belgium Government tossed out Brazil huge majority for Populist New Italy government Hungary Poland @MaximeBernier 
The impact of a no deal Brexit is expected to add £70 million a year of costs to the UK steel industry, according to a new report.  
Breathtaking how @SteveReedMP dismisses views of 41% of #Croydon North voters who voted Leave as “Tory divisiveness”. People voted proudly to Leave, not to play silly political games. Arrogance one has come to expect from too many of our MPs. #Brexit @CroydonGuardian @mysouthldn 
Just in time to trial on 29 March, coincidentally:here’s the first out of the tech gates in the race to milk the #Brexit @BorderIrish cow: the ‘Drive Through Border Concept’ from Fujitsu.So. What does it contain & how does it measure up? 1/10 
#Ludlow |  | Hereford plea for second referendum A LEADING campaigner for a second referendum attracted a big audience to Hereford Cathedral to argue the case for a People's Vote. Lord Adonis ...  
UBS has been given the legal all-clear to move 32 billion euro of assets out of the UK ahead of Brexit, with the transaction expected to clear on 1 March.  
Spotted in #Torquay#FarageOnLBC #Brexit #TommyRobinson #StopBrexit 
Idaho's Supreme Court has just rejected a conservative group's challenge and it has upheld November's referendum expanding Medicaid:  
ASUU conducts nationwide referendum on suspension of ongoing strike  via @daily_trust 
Chris Grayling not welcome in Calais, says port's chairmanThis global Britain thing's off to a shaky start. I think they are taking out an ASBO on him.Anti Social Brexit Order.  
Is a 2nd referendum going to bring down the cost of renting? Is it going to increase wages? Is it going to fund public services?Remainers always say "Brexit solves none of these things". Correct. But neither does a "People's Vote". You know who would solve these things? LABOUR. 
Is there any part of Leave that WASN'T breaking the law?Institute of Economic Affairs issued formal warning over Brexit report which breached charity law  
UK can avoid no-deal Brexit recession, says economic forecaster  
What happened to Labour’s six tests for Brexit or Labour’s conference motion to support a referendum if they were unable to get a general election? What happened to all those @jeremycorbyn fans who told me I was attacking the wrong person? Silence is telling. 
BREAKING NEWS No Deal Brexit will cause 1000s of job losses in MSM due to having no more Brexit scare stories to make up! 
Has been - a term only used by those who never were. What relevance does child sexual abuse have to Brexit?  
Bloody hell, this thread. We deserve Brexit.  
Anyone wondering why Labour hasn't provided much in the way of opposition over Brexit, watch this:  
Brexit - 52 daysDemocracy was bypassed in 2016...and we’ve been steam rollered ever since.@theresa_mayPlease miss! May I have an inquiry?5.2.2019 
"So, what will you do tomorrow @theresa_may?""I'm going to run down the Brexit clock by pretending to look for unicorns" "But why?""Because my pride and clinging to power is more important than the people of the UK." 
What a coincidence, Brexit expected March 29th and Pwc report on children’s hospital due the same day. You spin me right round baby! 
Thersa May is starting the sell out - Retaining the back stop - next, delay withdrawal date - finally, cancel Brexit - ANY BETTING ODDS ? 
I see another ‘stop Brexit’ grift doing the rounds...ppl are trash, don’t care if you a remainer, if you are doing that, you are taking advantage of ppl stupid enough to give you money. You never account for what you are spending the money on & have the audacity to keep asking 
A referendum on Irish unity might be the best way to solve the Brexit border issue | Coffee House  
She puts the backstop inthe backstop outin, out, in, outshake it all aboutBrexit means Brexit and she u-turns aroundthat's what it's all aboutWoah, the hokey cokeyWoah, the hokey cokeyWoah, the hokey cokeyBrexit means Brexitra-ra-ra 
Can't wait for Nicola Sturgeon giving @theresa_may the knock out punch that we don't need your permission for referendum, the Union will be running about like headless chickens. 
Labour membership falls 10% amid unrest over Brexit stance.It is hard to see Corbyn, who called the EU an "empire" and a "Frankenstein", ever giving up on #Brexit, no matter how much damage it does. #PeoplesVote 
Firstly, show me a picture of the editorial team who decided to survey this. Secondly, next 'poll' should find out how many of the 44% voted for Brexit.  
The IEA breached charity law by campaigning for hard Brexit. How many breaches of the law do our political elite need before they accept that #Brexit has been unacceptably corrupted by law-breaking? #PeoplesVote 
Fyre Festival - “We proposed something totally beyond our ability to implement, hoped for the best and acted surprised when it all unraveled.” Brexit - “Hold my drink”. #FyreFestival vs #brexit 
If only we could ban Chris 'failing' Grayling from Britain! 
Fed up with empty slogans and barefaced lies? Want to find out what #Brexit *really* means for citizens and businesses?Don't miss this event on Friday 15th Feb - 7.30pm, St John's Hall, #Penzance.#Cornwall #StopBrexit #PeoplesVote 
Rightwing thinktank breached charity law by campaigning for hard Brexit  
.@HFLabour have opposed austerity since it was introduced by @David_Cameron @Nick_Clegg in 2010. It caused untold harm and contributed to Brexit. Here's a debate that sets out how  
In 2020, @UKenyatta & @RailaOdinga hold a fake referendum based on fraudulent census and @IEBCKenya's gerrymandering of boundaries. They form a coalition as @WilliamsRuto clings to the @JubileePartyK shell. In, 2022, @UKenyatta neuters RAO and executes a Kabila-style KAPUTIN. 
John Humphrys is planning to leave the Today programme. But before you get too excited over the headline, it's only going to be sometime "this year", so we're not rid of his daily dose of Brexit bias just yet... 
Millionaire's Brexit:"I told her my dad was loaded& that I'd profit if the pound implodedThat's when she criedBecause her visa had expired.I told her, I wanna keep out foreign people like you.But I didn't understandWhy she refused to shake my hand" 
UK MINISTERS DISCUSS PLANS TO DELAY BREXIT TO MAY 24: TELEGRAPH 
I’ll say it’s insane. We’ve gone mad, as a nation! “The collective madness behind Britain’s latest Brexit plan” - The Washington Post  
An interesting talk from @Andrew_Adonis at Maldon Town Hall on the issues of Brexit and the argument for a second referendum. Even a challenge to @JWhittingdale for a debate! Read about it in this week's Standard. 
A brillliant interview with the lovely ⁦@NickBoles⁩ Whatever shape we emerge in from BREXIT, we start losing people like Boles, we’re in trouble. A modern compassionate Conservative.   
Remainers are the biggest political force in the UK.700,000+ of us marched against Brexit. 56%+ of the country want to #Remain.Every Remainer should join a political party and vote for pro-EU leaders, MPs and policies. 
British PM May denies 'shafting' Northern Ireland over Brexit backstop  
Ms. Foster makes an honest point clearly and honestly. Mrs. May resorts to formulaic and dishonest bafflegab to disguise that she is neutering Brexit as she claims to achieve it. Her deal should be rejected.  
The corrupt, unelected of Brussels do not wish to be cross-examined on TV. All you need to know #Brexit   
It's WRONG to say #Nissan's decision over the #Sunderland car plant was made because of Brexit.Sunderland ISN'T losing any jobs, and the decision ISN'T because of #Brexit...it's because of diesel!Learn the TRUTH about Nissan's Sunderland U-turn:  
The Prime Minister is, very sensibly, NOT removing "no deal" from the table because to do so would be the most idiotic negotiating tactic ever. It is only the EU's fear of "no deal" that is encouraging them to the table. Geez @DavidLammy this is basic stuff! #Brexit  
Every country in the UK, every county, every city, town & village; the stench of #Brexit will pervade everywhere. The effects will be felt by everyone.Jobs lost. Investment pulled. Prices raised. Quality lowered. Democracy tainted. Society split. Lives ruined.And for what? 
Theresa may will say and do anything to stay in downing St, she's a very dangerous & a f**King liability. #skypapers #bbcpapers #Newsnight #bbcnews #skynews #brexit  
The inconvenient truth. EU Socialism taking wealth, we pay for the privilege & they throw is crumbs back & remainers think theyre some kind of UK sugar daddy! How daft can you get almost 3 yrs down the line & you STILL dont get #Brexit   
Have been away from news today. Don't know what's happening with Brexit. It's tremendous. We might have introduced rationing and be at war with Haribo and I'm blissfully unaware. 
Since the EHIC won't be issued to UK residents after a no deal Brexit, I wonder if not being able to use the EHIC in the UK will put some EU27 tourists off coming here too? 
Just to back up my earlier tweets peeps. Those that want EU passports beware! Don't say later that we didn't warn you! Like the ones who said the ballot paper 4 referendum didn't mention details! LEAVING the EU means leaving all the bad bits! No one has yet told me the good bits!  
Absolutely true, backing the Referendum result & Tory Manifesto, so why is @theresa_may & the Cabinet trying hard to pass their BRINO Withdrawal Agreement - which at best will see the Tories decimated at the next GE & at worst could cause serious trouble on streets & a civil war. 
I've said it before...& I'll say it again...CORBYN is no friend of Scotland or the Scottish peopleIndependence referendum was "once in a lifetime" vote says Jeremy Corbyn  
If London is too far for you to go to protest on 14 Feb then come to Leeds & show that opposition to May’s Brexit “deal” spans North & South. We will meet in City Square (in front of Leeds...  
There’s more perceptive analysis of Brexit and the state of British politics in this video than you’d get in six months of @BBCr4today or the @AndrewMarr9 Show 
@libdems went into 2010 election ready to invest in public services, then threw themselves into austerity with @Conservatives and now bemoan austerity and the Brexit result it helped deliver. It must be hard remembering what you believe and demand when you have no values.  
EU may help Ireland alleviate the impact of a no deal Brexit on its farming industry with a long-term support plan. Whereas UK farmers are at the mercy of our own Government, who are unlikely to be as pragmatic.  
Worth pointing out the new date for the completion of the #ChildrensHospital PwC review, after Gov involvement in recent days, is now March 29. This just so happens to be the day when media coverage will be obsessed with EU and Britain's #Brexit divorce day.What a coincidence. 
Everything this man touches turns to shit.Chris Grayling banned from Calais after Brexit row with port's chairman  via @Telegraph 
The majority against #Brexit is growing relentlessly, but our political elite doesn't care. They want to drive through a crooked criminal #Brexit against the will of the majority. Our leaders are subverting democracy.  #PeoplesVote #FBPE 
- oh, nearly forgot, proposed emergency motion to my CLP calling for special conference on Brexit policy. Got that passed tooWhat more would you suggest I do, Billy?At this stage, I’ll try anything to get @jeremycorbyn to listen to members. So if you’ve got any ideasEnd/ 
He was elected on a manifesto, made promises to his constituents and then ignored them for his own vanity - he is morally bankrupt over Brexit and should go and that applies to any Tory that ignores the manifesto they were elected on @NickCohen4 @NickBoles @LeaveEUOfficial 
Those that are spending all their time and energy fighting the referendum result have failed to engage with the real question, which is the type of Brexit and what type of nation we want the UK to be in the future. The Stop Brexit crusade is a counterproductive distraction. 
After the referendum result in 2016 I cried for at least 2 days (I voted Remain). After the last 3 years of constant attacks on older voters, the pure condescension & arrogance from Stop Brexit politicians, celebrities and campaigners I will cry with happiness when we Leave. 
We do not want an election, we want Brexit NOW! Frankly, I don’t care what pro-Corbyn Labour supporters think!  
Rightwing thinktank breached charity law by campaigning for hard Brexit - says charity commission ..This clearly constitutes political activity & does not further the “educational purposes” of the IEA.  IMO should be obliged to set out who funds them too  
@DamianHinds Is this appropriate material to be handed out in English schools? @theresa_may @Andrew_Adonis @Kevin_Maguire @faisalislam @euronews @carolecadwalla @guardian @CNN @France24_en @AlJazeera_World @Brexit @BenPBradshaw @lucianaberger @DavidLammy @guyverhofstadt 
Here are the jokes other Europeans are making about the UK over Brexit  
Please understand that if you voted for Brexit and you're complaining about the deal, what you've done is vote to turn our 27 closest allies into our 27 closest economic rivals and then complain that they haven't bowed to our wishes. 
Billboard featuring Brexit quote from Arron Banks appears outside his own building  
Managed to grab an hour with @SODEMAction and as we did the #StopBrexit shout down with Steve, it struck me that inside Westminster were a bunch of liars, cheats & crooks. The lack of integrity & moral compass is shocking. Whether we Brexit or not, our country is in crisis. 
This man has systematically lied to party members and supporters since the Brexit referendum. Apparently, he has been ‘playing the long game’ ‘Keeping his powder dry’ but the real plan was to watch the clock tick down to Brexit day. You've been had guys. Well done!  
The moment of truth is almost here.Will our Leadership stand with the many of us who are pro-EU and favour collaboration, co-operation and internationalism, or with the few who choose Brexit?The answer will define Labour and the country.#PeoplesVote 
Says the CBI, which was wrong about the ERM, wrong about the euro, & wrong aboutBrexit, and is now reduced to a lobbying & political-campaigning organisation for pro-Remain, crony-corporatist big-business.  
Chris Grayling has been banned from Calais by port officials who are furious with his 'no deal' Brexit plans. The port's chairman refers to him as "failing Grayling.” (21:00 – 21:30, ITV2, Contains adult humour)  
This is the best tweet ever whatever side of Brexit you are #tweetofcentury 
Imagine we had the Brexit vote in 2014 then the Indyref in 2016. We would've been gone from this shambles of a UK by now. 
“It’s time for Govt & Parliament to hold their nerve. Our proposal for an FTA is not only what the British people voted for but what they expect to be delivered. That is why they have not wavered in their support for Brexit” @DavidDavisMP#StandUp4Brexit 
Jeremy Corbyn and Nigel Farage as Mr #Lexit and Mr #Brexit @Nigel_Farage @jeremycorbyn 
Can you smell a General Election coming? May's red lines boxed herself into a corner from day one and two plus years on she's still stuck there. Only way out now is a mad No Deal Brexit or a General Election. This Thread on clues that an election maybe in the air...  
David Davis: 'We must hold our nerve with the EU to get the Brexit deal we really want'  
Lying Toad Theresa May now says Backstop will stay!She has put herself on collision course with Eurosceptics & DUP by saying she was “not proposing” to get rid of the Backstop, but only to make “changes” to it.#NoDeal #Brexit #EU via @Telegraph 
The Irish Government has been hosting civic conversations on Brexit since 2016. The DUP, which is of course representing a minority in Northern Ireland on the subject, has never shown up.  
You can't be serious, Chris Grayling just has been banned from Calais by port officials who are furious with his no deal Brexit plans. This is precisely why we cannot trust our government to deliver #Brexit. It's time to #RevokeArticle50 - the official called him Failing Grayling 
Earth shattering speech from Betty Boothroyd on Corbyn, Brexit & the Conservative party.."What is the govt afraid of in refusing a #PeoplesVote?"."Backbenchers arise & forget party interest. National interest demands it!". 
Thanks to @CumbernauldSNP & their excellent  MSP @jamiehepburn for a great night of discussion about #Brexit.  Glad to be part of my very first #PiePintAndPolitician evening ! And very grateful to old friend @demipip for the lift … 
Your going to need it - remind me again .. what does it feel like seeing 109 people lose their jobs at crantock bakery , then today monocole print said they are off - is this your brexit dividend Steve ? Explain the benefits of brexit to those that have lost their livelihoods 
Theresa May give it up! You’re just going round in circles on Brexit. You’ve had over two years and have got nowhere.While the Tories waste time with their Groundhog Day reboot, the economy gets worse. 4 million WORKING people living in POVERTY. #GENow 
Peter Brookes on #ArleneFoster #DUP #TheresaMay #Backstop #IrishBorder #BrexitShambles #ReesMogg #TheresaMay #BrexitShambles #Brexit #apocalypse #MeaningfulVote #NoDealBrexit - political cartoon gallery in London  
NI businessman Declan Gormley on Brexit: ‘DUP do not reflect majority in Northern Ireland 
I may blame the erg for brexit and am livid with Tories for caving to these reptiles  but i am incandescent with rage at  @uklabourbfor failing to fight this with every ounce of energy, tool they have. That members still back @jeremycorbyn is reason I can't support forgive 
Yet another @matthew_elliott right-wing sewer connecting straight to @10DowningStreet found to have breached the law. He's consistent, give him that..... 
SMR: The government still thinks it's in the national interest to respect the result of a referendum based on lies, funded by illegal money benefiting no one.We disagree and so do our friends at @FbpeCiaran  Take a look at this, RT and sign!  
In hindsight, maybe following long years of austerity with a referendum that gave people a scapegoat wasn't the best idea. 
Last year I was in Newquay for a week- and offered to meet the local MP @stevedouble who thinks brexit is a great idea - not so great now is it ? .. first crantock  bakery went because of rising raw ingredient costs then monocle print has just gone - is brexit still worth it ? 
We say something is a Brexit must read far too often, but this thread really is, the realities of the Irish border with real examples  
POLL | How would you describe the Conservatives' position on Brexit? 
A busy day. We stood with the workers on picket lines & in Dáil. We'll keep it up..Govt MUST engage without preconditions Amarach: Belfast-bound, meeting w T May. Will challenge RE failure to honour agreements&need for unity poll if crash #Brexit #Think32 
The head of our elections in Canada says he’s “really disappointed” that the Liberals new election bill doesn’t require political parties to protect the massive amounts of data they collect on Canadians safe. Brexit, the Trump election, etc all started w a breach. 
A key story in labour membership number row. Recent scoop by @paulhutcheon - number of members in Scotland below 22k and falling. Labour needs to take a lot of seats north of border to stand a chance at next Westminster election. Corbyn. Brexit. Machine disintegrating in Scotland 
Actor who plays Ian Beale in Eastenders fumes about Brexit  
The Theresa May Brexit strategy.  
More brexit bad news from a part of the world that can least afford job losses .  
We should form an 'Alternative EU' #AEU after #Brexit.Include all those European countries who want to trade freely with each other,which was what Brits voted for in 1975, not a European Dictatorial Superstate.  
Chris Grayling 'banned' from Calais over Brexit spat  
Getting rather pissed off with seeing anti-Brexit ‘activists’ begging for money, just so they can go on a jolly around Europe, taking selfies in front of EU institutions. 
As much as I want to feel vindicated by this, it’s disappointing that Brexit was the red line for so many Labour members, but not antisemitism.  
Perhaps more concerning is the question of just how deep the UK’s self inflicted brexit recession will be and for how long? 
Owen Smith tweeting a video of Corbyn commentating on the Irish EU referendum in 2009, insinuating he is a liar, will doubtless cause every FBPE fetishist on social media to spontaneously ejaculate. I already considered Smith a disengenuous MP. I now also consider him a coward. 
Ok this is it. The end. This has to be it. The pinnacle of the madness. Surely #brexit can’t get worse I thought. Then this came through:Brexit MPs “have demanded May call Donald Trump in to solve Britain’s #brexit crisis”.This is beyond embarrassing. 
On the balance of probability, taking into account this latest video clip, his lukewarm campaigning and his performance since, it's likely Jeremy Corbyn lied about how he voted in the referendum...well isnt it? 
Even fucking Serbia now....The UK is headed for the dull, racist, badly dressed, monolingual, dog shit everywhere 1970s #brexit #stopbrexit 
As UK remains focussed on its interminable Brexit debate, the Eurozone is hovering on 3rd recession in 10 years. Made more likely by fiscal and monetary policy tightening into the downturn. A no deal Brexit could tilt tottering Eurozone over the brink. Will Brussels take notice? 
Martin Selmayr-European Commission, has told UK that we must pay the £39 bn Brexit bill even if there is a no-deal exit. What do these retarded technocrats take us for! 
so proud. whole family round the laptop, littluns cheering me on. doing it fer are baz, are nige and Brexit. Love you all fellas   
'A referendum on Irish unity might be the best way to solve the Brexit border issue.' And this is in the Spectator. '...as things stand...Northern Ireland is preventing the rest of the UK from leaving on the most favourable terms...'  
Positive engagement with @theresa_may @10DowningStreet today in Belfast along with other sector colleagues Clear point made and understood  that a backstop for NI to protect all-island trade and supply chains must be part of any withdrawal deal #Brexit  
Moreover, while none of the above is, per se, about Brexit, the Brexit context does make the use of the worksheet even more questionable. Why did nobody think of the welfare of the Polish student in the class? The student's parents are probably faced with having to 12/ 
NEW Ireland discussing EU Brexit bailout to compensate for long term damage to farmers in no deal. Precedent -  Baltic states got this over Russian ban on certain EU foods. Begs Q. Will UK farmers won't get such a bail out from Defra?  
Here is a list of @ByDonkeys Brexit Bullshit Billboards for you to share here & on Facebook - with a handy link to the crowdfunder at the end. #LedByDonkeys #MakeItStop#JustMakeItStop 
Rightwing thinktank breached charity law by campaigning for hard Brexit  
Off to do @SkyNews #skypapers again tonight.  See you at 10.30pm / 11.30pm should you wish to tune in.  @steverichards14 and I will no doubt argue about #brexit , but in a civilised fashion, and mull over other news stories, some of which we might actually agree on 
Basically, we have run out of time to get a Brexit deal ratified before 29th March. This is not the fault of the EU or “Remoaners talking the country down” or opposition parties. It’s the fault of Theresa May - who has squandered nearly 3 years by wilfully running down the clock. 
Nigel Farage - “Jeremy Corbyn is more #Brexit than I am!”For the first time ever... I agree with Nigel #PeoplesVote #FinalSay 
Organising a local grassroots anti-Brexit campaign? We want to know about it  
Supermarket shelves WON'T run empty after No Deal Brexit, new report says as experts rubbish Project Fear  
Trump's SOTU will be a referendum on whether he can escape a series of self-created policy traps -- and whether he understands how fundamentally things have changed for him since the midterms.“Facts are stubborn things.” — John AdamsMy column: 
Brexit truce among Conservatives shattered as May says there is 'no suggestion' of scrapping Irish backstop  Why do MP's keep quiet about the FACT that PM May's deal means UK cannot trade on any World trade deals it makes without the EUs permission? 
This is your daily reminder that #Medicaid repeal in Utah is not about the money, it's about a power struggle for #utleg, and an informal referendum on the actual power of the ballot initiative process and the ability of the people to govern themselves. #utpol 
Secretly financed groups are now outspending anti-Brexit campaigners on Facebook, to promote no-deal.Despite its promises to make the ultimate funding sources transparent for political advertising, Facebook has not done so.Read this for more  
In 2016, I opposed Brexit because it was a bad idea.In 2019, I oppose Brexit because it represents the antithesis of everything I am. Its peddled by liars and frauds, the Far Right, and hostile governments and organisations. And supported by bullies and thugs. 
So much for taking back control.First May’s government tried to block publishing the Brexit impact reports.Now they are trying to keep Brexit readiness information secret.Draw your own conclusion. #StopBrexit. 
This dismal saga of #Brexit is already a textbook study in how not to govern an internationally open democratic country in the complex global political economy of the early 21st century. Fascinating.. except that it happens to be our country. 
In October 2018, @peoplesvote_uk mobilized 700K people to march in London and demand a final #vote on the controversial #Brexit deal. Read about the tactics and tools this grassroots coalition used to organize the historic march here:  
this is hilariousChris Grayling banned from Calais after Brexit row with port's chairman' | via @telegraph 
mr bean your silence on brexit is deafening 
What haunts me most is the knowledge that the vast majority of people aren't paying attention to the #Brexit details. What on earth are they going to think if we crash out? Very, very unpredictable. 
This is incredibly sad...and I recognise the feeling, as a fellow EU national who’s lived here for many years, but with the referendum result, felt I’d overnight been redefined as an outsider, someone who didn’t belong here and wasn’t welcome. 
Watched an episode of Mock The Week from Summer 2016 last night. So, post-referendum. Not one mention of the B-word.It was like watching the girl going skinny dipping at the start of Jaws. 
Businesses relocatingJob losses Shrinking economy Plunging poundParliamentary gridlockFood and medicine stockpilingHundreds of M15 security officers now stationed in Northern IrelandHow on earth is Brexit taking back control? 
When DUP show openness on donations (esp around Brexit referendum), address lessons from RHI, and acknowledge their failure to comply with FoI rules, then they can be listened to around transparency.  
Brexit is not £350m a week for the NHS. Brexit is a threat to the founding principles of the NHS.  
A tangible benefit of being in the EU is that I can live, work, study or retire in Paris or Berlin or Amsterdam or Barcelona or Rome or the Algarve or anywhere in 27 other countries.#Brexit would literally take that away from me. From all of us.And offer nothing in return. 
Has anyone heard a single pro-brexit MP explaining the upsides of #Brexit for the 16 million voters who wanted to #remain, or those who abstained because weren't given enough information to make a choice or were happy for nothing to change. I call them the #TheForgottenMajority. 
I met Danny Dyer and we talked about: his newfound spirituality, dark thoughts, drinking with Pinter, clubbing in Kidderminster, Dani and Jack, Brexit and, well, King Edward II's arse  
Austerity caused brexitBrexit will cause even more austerity, possibly a very lot more.Even more austerity will cause...I fear what even more austerity will cause if it can cause something as stupid and damaging as brexit. 
Hi, I'm Tim Martin. I'm an arsehole. I've been using my position as the owner of a business to force my employees into pushing pro Brexit propaganda on my unsuspecting customers. Don't come to my pubs, cause you'll just put more money in my pocket. #boycottwetherspoons 
I hope Brexit ends the same way Trump's wall has. Silly idea that never happens. Focusing on borders, demonising outsiders, has never served humanity well. We need to come together,  not retreat and  cower behind walls in selfish ignorence. There are world issues the solve. 
Enjoying Brexit so far guys?Just a reminder that if the Brexit process were getting laid, the WA would be getting into a club past a grouchy bouncer, and the future EU FTA negotiations would be LITERALLY ALL THE STEPS AFTER THAT. 
Chris Grayling 'BANNED' from Calais over Brexit 'disrespect' 
After a video surfaced of Jeremy Corbyn attacking the EU and the idea of second referendums, Nigel Farage declared: “He is more Brexit than I am!” @Nigel_Farage | #Corbyn 
If a no deal Brexit is a good thing as many Brexiters are saying, or at the very least won't be that bad at all, why does anyone need to blame anyone at all if it happens? You don't need to apportion blame for positive events - do you?  
Latest #TheresaMay contradiction on #Brexit: she claims her commitment to no hard border 'unshakeable' ... but doesn’t want the #backstop (safety net) that guarantees it! 
In Belfast the only consensus on Brexit is a huge, collective groan  
IRELAND BREXIT ULTIMATUM: EU to enforce hard border or KICK DUBLIN OUT of single market  
So we are genuinely interested in what you REALLY think about Brexit, UKIP, Nigel Farage, Tommy Robinson and the issues that matter to YOU!We have produced an easy survey and we would welcome your input.Click here to take the survey now:  
Those who are loudest in trumpeting "Brand Great Britain" as the magic spell that will ensure Brexit is a success (or at least not a horrific failure) have done the most to damage that brand beyond all hope of restitution. Not clever as only Brexit can be not clever. 
Chris Grayling banned from Calais after Brexit row with port's chairman  
Media is often soft in covering Barrack even though he picked Manafort for Trump's campaign, employed Rick Gates, & ran the inaugural fundAnd I broke this news MSM hasn't covered - Barrack's Colony Capital was a big partner of Brexit funder Richard Tice 
This is a super thread by one of the best Brexit journalists around.  
#FailingGrayling banned from Calais after Brexit row with port's chairman proving he is not only utterly incompetent,but also offensive.It’s a reflection on May’s Cabinet that this man holds his job despite being unemployable in private sector #Newsnight  
McVey: WTO Brexit is default option  
Secretly filmed: Mark Littlejohn of hard-Brexit "thinktank" the IEA offers undercover reporter the chance to influence report on “green Brexit” for @michaelgove plus meetings with UK ministers. No wonder @ChtyCommission finally taking an interest 
The Guardian view on Brexit and Ireland: the forging of folly | Editorial  
Parliament voted to get a Brexit deal done now. So let’s make it happen | Caroline Flint  
EU’s Brexit Punishment Tactics Working as Swedish Eurosceptics Say It’s Frightened Them Off Independence  
To recap:Our (old) Brexit Minister didn't know we needed Calais for trade.Our Transport Minister didn't just fail to organise a traffic jam when trialling a No-Deal scenario, but he's actually banned from Calais.This can only end well."Chris Grayling" 
Theresa May give it up! You’re just going round in circles on Brexit. You’ve had over two years and have got nowhere.Meantime education for our kids is getting worse after the Tories cuts of £7.7 billion.We need to fix Brexit AND our schools #GENow 
How any of this squares with Brady amendment is another matter. But as a text it's mostly welcome and appears to kill off the more deranged brexit stuff stone dead. 
This is peak Brexit.  
Because Chancellor Merkel and Germany know that a no deal Brexit would be devastating for the European Union.  
UK politics is failing & in deep crisis from the self-harm of Brexit, the lack of political voice for the remain half of the UK public, & the collapse of political & democratic standards. Time for political, moral leadership but from where? my latest blog  
The idea there is a mandate for No Deal is TOTAL garbage. Boris Johnson said talk of No Deal was insane a week before the referendum. @BorisJohnson @andreajenkyns peddling nonsense when they say "people voted to leave with no deal"! 
Robert phoned @LBC to make the case for Brexit as a young person - this was @Will_DryOFOC's response... 
Howard talks about his Dutch brother-in-law who’s lived & worked in the UK for 35 yrs and feels the referendum has removed his identity. Howard has seen the huge emotional impact this has had on him, and also on a friend who’s lived here for over 40 yrs. #BrexitIsPersonal  /1 
How will London function as a financial center after #Brexit?  via @ReutersGraphics 
Remember their names (7): Please share @Reasons2Remain series of posters this week to remember some of the courageous Parliamentarians who spoke against #Brexit two years ago. #StopBrexit #FinalSay Link on Facebook:  
"The state of the British environment is now at a historic crossroads. Brexit must not be a gateway to a future of lowered standards that would put our environment at risk" - @SueHayman1's full speech today: 
Much talk in the #brexit debate about recovering the UK's sovereignty from external intervention. What about the fact that sovereignty is primarily about a state's responsibility to protect the individuals within it? THAT is what we should be talking about. *drops mic* 
Irish presidential voting rights referendum delayed  
There is something poignant about mining villages with no colliery. There are so many in Durham with lonely winding wheels like markers on a pauper's grave. You are either on the side of Brexit or on the side of the victims of austerity, you can’t be both.  
Chris Grayling in an interview in today’s Telegraph reveals that the cabinet has never discussed postponing Brexit: ‘Brexit will happen on 29 March’. He also says that only 7.5% of our food enters the U.K. via Dover. There will be few delays at borders.The French are cooperating. 
The closure of the Oxford Street HMV is really sad. And I say that as someone who does actually go there quite a lot.Imagining, forty years from now, campaigning for it to be reopened gives a brief glimpse of what many Brexit votes must have felt like. 
Hello mate. I wonder if you've seen the reports about #Brexit? It's just, I'm not entirely sure where you've been, but Britain is currently in big trouble. Are you sure it's wise to be galavanting off around the world when we have the largest issue in peacetime history imminent.  
Brexit's going well then  
This thread  from @HeleneBismarck is worth reading in full. Once upon a time there was a Bismarck who called politics “the art of the possible.” Sadly Brexit demonstrates that populism is the art of impossible promises from charlatans who know they can never deliver.  
It is just worth pointing out that, unless I've missed all the reports, there have been no companies landing on the shores of the UK, ready to invest and show faith in our country since the vote to leave. I wonder why that might be. #Brexit #ZeroInvestment 
Bullying EU bosses threaten to cut off Ireland if it doesn't put up hard border after Brexit  That’s what you get, Ireland! The EU are NOT your friends! 
Exclusive: Chris Grayling has been banned from Calais by port officials who are furious with his 'no deal' Brexit plans. The port's chairman refers to him as "failing Grayling." My latest:  
Theresa May's Belfast Brexit speech "full of old rhetoric and no solutions" - @MaryLouMcDonald  #Brexit  
Brexit is wreaking havoc with Mr Corbyn’s plan to turn Labour into a mass movement   
Further fears from outside UK of the vandalism that is being inflicted on our HE sector by #Brexit...Norway urges students to avoid UK universities in Brexit warning | Politics | The Guardian  
Why is it that the U.K. Public cannot see that the Tories are very frightened? They draw up secret plans for Martial Law and secret plans to evacuate the Queen in the event Brexit blows up in their faces .Wake up folks. 
You’re in the advanced stages of Brexit Derangement Syndrome.  Step away from the keyboard and seek medical assistance  
I want English cabbages picked by brexit voting English men and women - cabbages picked by cabbages   
If Brexit is betrayed do you think this could happen in the UK?Read now:  
Brexit BETRAYAL: How John Major 'turned his back on Margaret Thatcher over EU policy' Traitor Major should have gone to the People On Maastricht! He was too busy on Currygate!  
That effectively rules out technology to *create* a border, even if May doesn't rule out some applications of technology to help with de-dramatising downstream consequences of Brexit. But the ERG/Shanker Singham ideas of tech (and drones) to fix border dies. /3 
Brexit is being implemented by a minority 'zombie' govtIts propped up by the DUP who got 292K votes in 2017. The ref outcome was procured by corrupt and illegal practices How can anyone claim we are living in a democracy under the rule of law?#RevokeArticle50 #PeoplesVote 
“We deserve an honest vote” - yes! “The left-wing case for a second referendum” - New Statesman  
An important report from @PeterKGeoghegan on shady Facebook ads on Brexit that are running right now. This is going to get worse in the run up to the European elections, I bet.   
“I think delay is a proxy for stopping and that is being proposed by people who never liked Brexit in the first place and are seeking to prevent it taking place." 
Nearly all of those calling for a second referendum haven’t learned the lessons of the first. Many who voted leave wanted to shake up the broken settlement of our national politics. Listen to them. @GoodwinMJ writes for @unherd 
So Liam Fox finally has a #trade agreement lined up for a post-#Brexit era. ...with that trading super-power, the Faroe Islands! It would simply keep what we now have via EU. What celebrations are planned for this great triumph?  
It’s quite disconcerting watching the UKGov knowingly countdown the short, medium & long term economic harm of #brexit (only possible with an incompetent complicit Labour opposition) as they stockpile excuses for when the inevitable catastrophe impacts on people’s lives. 
So when the Eurozone was growing faster than the U.K. everyone said “see Brexit has slowed our economy down and the Eurozone is now benefiting” now the Eurozone is in crisis (again) the same people are blaming Brexit uncertainty  yet the UKs growth remains pretty much unchanged 
NB: Arron Banks, the #Brexit campaign's biggest donor, met the Russian ambassador 11 times in months before & after the 2016 referendum. The ambassador brokered a lucrative Russian "business opportunity" for Banks. And we still don't know where the £8m in offshore cash came from.  
Good article on what @michaelgove @DefraGovUK must include in #Fisheries Bill to follow up good decision to heed  advice to ban Electric Pulse fishing post #Brexit To protect our environment & the livelihoods of coastal communities that depend upon it. 
In my opinion, far too little attention has been paid in the Brexit debate to how the hell we are going to redesign vast domestic policy domains (eg agriculture, fisheries, energy). Rebuilding efforts will take many years and cost huge sums. 
Theresa May just lies constantly, she is untrustworthy & does not want to deliver a real BrexitTheresa May says she is 'not proposing' to scrap Brexit backstop  
Brexit food riots.... priceless!  
Anyone who supports Brexit doesn’t care about the poor,disabled and vulnerable. Anyone who doesn’t wholeheartedly campaign to remain in the EU is happy to see the death of the NHS,further austerity and swathes of job losses. Time to stand up for the UK  
But if they erected a 500 foot tall sign saying 'It's not because of brexit', you'd still say it was.  See how it works? 
FOM must bite really hard with some MP'sI seriously believe they cannot handle the fact that a right, normally reserved for the wealthy is available to everyday people.People like us. These are our rights that are being removed.#peoplesvote #FBPE #Brexit 
That ‘PAC’ website was showing positive antivirus hits on 2 PDF files starting in MAR 2016. Listed creation date of said malware was FEB 2016. Brand new, never before seen malware just in time for the Brexit referendum, and the US election... “Weird.”  
Whatever the weather, we will stand up for Democracy, for Brexit and #ForTheNation (Even if we only had 15 minutes notice!) 
Am I campaigning to overturn the referendum result? You're damn right I am.There should never be a situation in our democracy where cheating, lying, law breaking and deceit on an industrial scale should stand. So, yes I'm working to destroy Brexit, and destroy it we will. 2/3 
I will never accept anything less than full membership of the EU, with our current deal. I want a United Kingdom in the European Union with our own currency, our rebate, and our vetoes. Am I campaigning to stop Brexit in its tracks? Absolutely.  1/3 
British PM May to visit Brussels in search of a Brexit deal  
Good news for Ireland! The EU will kick Ireland out of the Single Market and Customs Union after our WTO #Brexit, meaning Irish businesses can continue to trade freely with the UK if the EU refuses to implement WTO Article 24. #NoDealNoProblem 
Nicola Sturgeon: "The case for independence... has only got stronger through the experience of Brexit." But this isn't what the movement is asking. The movement wants action and it needs leadership. Are you going to give that?  
That didn't take long...Reading @theresa_may speech, it seems clear the #MalthouseCompromise tech unicorn is now slain. So as you were then: back to time-limits, sunset clauses, objective criteria etc. #Brexit 
Due to popular demand we are pleased to report that our #Brexit Decision Day Demo will now include a full march through #Leeds city centre! Assemble 5.30pm on Thurs 14 Feb in City Square.Sending a message from the north to Westminster: 
Rudd argued making public official briefings about dire impact of no deal Brexit would also help persuade MPs to take no deal off the table and back the PM's deal.Gauke, Gove, Hinds and others made supportive interventions 
Arlene Foster's been on news all day pretending to be defender of #GFA- worth remembering that the DUP are up to their armpits in electoral fraud in this far right #Brexit. You know the saying- No smoke without a dodgy renewable heat incentive. 
‘We ruled the world, didn’t we?’ What a viral 1978 vox pop tells us about Brexit  
If there was a #General Election in the near future what pro #Brexit Party would you vote for if all stood in your constituency?**Please retweet after voting for a wider audience **#UKIP #ForBritain #SDP #Time #Sovereign 
Read that article, then remind me again why studies that tell us that in a no deal Brexit we'll lose 8% of GDP in under a year, run out of food & medicine, & have to evacuate the Queen, should be regarded as the infallible pronouncements of "experts"? 
Cabinet...Meanwhile Michael Gove suggested there shd be TV and internet bulletins about No Deal every dayAnd Amber Rudd told cabinet the gvt is negotiating with its MPs as well as EU and they need to see dangers of No Deal to make them vote for brexit deal  
Those gloomy about Brexit told us, 2 years ago, that 230,000 City jobs would relocate to the EU because of Brexit. With a bit over a month to go, shall we check in how many of those 230,000 have gone so far...?  via @telebusiness 
I don’t really care how you voted in Brexit.And nor will the consequences of no deal.I don’t really know how else to explain it to you. 
Queen and Royal family to be evacuated in case of #Brexit riots in London Will it be MI6 that will take care of the monarch? Where will she stay then? Tell us what you think in the comments.  
Brexit truths.  
5pm Cabinet readout- May told colleagues to stop talking about delaying brexit as it was counterproductive - Rudd Hancock Gove & Hinds suggested spelling out why no deal would be damaging- Rudd said gvt had to be “straight with British ppl” 
That is desperate drivel and you know it. Labour could do nothing to help the poorest people if the economy is trashed by Brexit. And the opinion polls show we won’t put up with that ridiculous posturing. 
Imagine a man-made tsunami, scaled sufficiently to wash over the whole of Britain, and the aftermath of that.In essence, this is what a no deal Brexit is. A self-generated natural disaster.There’s a reason nations don’t recreate volcanic eruptions and earthquakes by choice. 
5pmBackstop will be part of Brexit deal, says May, riling brexiteers- No10 desperately trying to contextualise her comments in cabinet  
I am so sick and tired of "remainers" saying they still support Corbyn even tho they now accept he is a brexiter because he sticks up for the poor!BREXIT WILL DEVASTATE THE POOR!And YOU are NOT remainers! You're either liars or idiots! 
This is a message that must be reiterated to voters.  Brexit is an assault on our national security.  No-one voted to be less safe and secure.  #RevokeA50 #StopBrexit 
Brexit, final chapter in ‘Decline & fall of the British Empire’, with loss of Scotland, Northern Ireland, Gibraltar & The FalklandsGoodbye Union Jack, hello new flag of ‘Union of England & Wales’MPs not voting to stop it will be guiltyUnless they #RevokeArticle50 fast 
Flipping it around and looking at the angle that Deripaska and Browder are behind all these set ups to get Trump out of the way for a Clinton presidency it’s much clearer. It had a name:Project Rome. I’m pretty sure Brexit was Project Charlemagne. Empire building. 
Liam Fox mulls cutting UK import tariffs to zero in no-deal Brexit  via @financialtimes Go on Liam - why not destroy jobs just for the sake of your dogma? It's only your political vanity (or maybe insanity)  versus people's livelihoods, after all 
Backtracking quite considerably Mrs May.  #StandFirm and fully deliver #Brexit  
"I doubt very much whether she expects to return from Brussels with anything more than her duty-free" @thomasbrake. Theresa May is making a mess out of Brexit and a people's vote with the option to Exit from Brexit is now the only way forward >  
A referendum for independence may be on the table within 4 months. Watch this space! 
Looks like Margot Wallström has heard: “You should not promise referendums if you don’t prepare them properly.” 
My piece on the way forward in the Brexit talks, for the House magazine.  
So, the way the next week is likely to play out as regards Brexit:The intransigence line is pushed hard everywhere teeing up the anger and aiming it wrongly at the EU. May asks for a backstop concession which doesn’t exist and comes back empty handed. The EU wrongly gets blame. 
They "cancelled" the parliamentary recess to focus on important Brexit issues, yet they found time to debate letting teenagers have a lie in? 
To be perfectly honest if the best argument for brexit is that Tommy Robinson will kick me in the bollocks if we stay...then for the sake of everyone's future prosperity and peace...I'll happily take one for the team.Bring it on Tommy. 
Every time a politician/journalist uses the phrase 'the will of the British people', they're telling half the country that they're not part of our society and telling the other half that anyone opposing Brexit is opposing the whole country.Then they speak of healing divisions  
Just heard on the grapevine that RBS are moving £120 BILLION worth of assets OUT of the UK. Announcement expected in the next couple of weeks.This is not because of diesel, or the EU, it's not the fault of Remainers or the Man in the Moon. It's because of one thing: #Brexit. 
Swedish minister: I can’t forgive the UK for #Brexit  
Here it is, verbatim, as my Westminster source said it would come back at this time in 2017:“EU 'intransigence' could mean no-deal Brexit, says DUP”  
We are crowdfunding for a judicial review of the backstop, & are the only show in town seeking a pathway to Brexit & a Withdrawal Agreement that respects the integrity of the Good Friday Agreement. All contributions grateful received.   via @CrowdJustice 
I need to do something with my fucking life instead of sitting here ranting about brexit. It's incredibly bad for my mental health.Can politicians please wake the fuck up and and say no more. 
Sadly my application for a debate on #NoDeal was rejected. We are leaving the #EU in 52 days. Parliament has rejected May’s deal. The EU won’t budge on the backstop. Currently, we are headed for a chaotic no-deal #Brexit. This is a great matter of urgency.  
SCOTS BACK the Scottish Parliament’s right to call for a second independence referendum, a new poll has found, in a blow to the UK Government. The Survation survey also found that a majority of Scots oppose any attempts by Westminster to oppose a vote on the country’s future.  
"Wanna leave the Common Market!"  makes a catchy song. With a few changes in the text, this could become a Brexit anthem 
It seems to me there must be a modest risk that the EU tires of its role as Brexit hostage negotiator, faced with the warring wings of the Tory party, and says: "Go ahead! Pull the damn trigger! You've been pointing that gun at your head for so long..." 
Latest Brexit fear is that Continental Quilts will stop working after Brexit. 
What an asinine thing to say!a) it's possible to care about 2 things concurrentlyb) wanting to #StopBrexit is proof of caring abt poor, disabled & vulnerable, 'cos #Brexit will harm them most —indeed concern for them is main motivatorc) who appointed YOU arbiter of morality?  
With bonus quote from Niall Sweeney @neildelamere #SoftBorderPatrol! "The problem with relying on technology is that it gets very old very very quickly. So it's kind of like the #Brexit secretary, in that you have to update it every couple of months." @mariemcdonaldtv 
A quite brilliant analysis on the psychology behind Brexit. An insight into what is essentially an English psychodrama that has turned into a crisis. Worth reading. 
Red Arrows aerobatic team should fly over Houses of Parliament on 29th March, as celebration of Brexit Day, suggests Conservative Nigel Evans in Westminster Hall. 
Stopping #Brexit is the most patriotic thing any #British person can do right now....  
Interesting footage, showing Corbyn denouncing the EU and urging Irish to vote No in 2nd referendum - but warning them that, if they do, there'll probably be a 3rd referendum because the EU doesn't take no for an answer.  
Gatehouse's Brexit lead Jack Lambert has assembled this roadmap with *indicative* probabilities... Masterpiece? Monstrosity? @anandMenon1 @Jack_Blanchard_ @Brexit @CER_Grant @IanDunt @MartinSelmayr 
Can someone please point us to a single example of a Brexit fan - ERG, UKIP, Tufton Street patsy, talk radio twat - ever taking an action, or casting a vote, that benefited ordinary humans?Why are we to believe that Brexit has suddenly turned them into champions of the people? 
How about this.We negotiate a mulligan with the EU... We agree to live with No-deal Brexit for one year.  One.  After one year, we vote if it’s what “we” really wanted, & the EU agrees to let us come back on the same terms as we left.  A political “Amish Rumspringa.” 
37.  HQ, Bristol"Leave campaigner Arron Banks referred to National Crime Agency after investigation into Brexit campaign funding." - @BBCBreaking 
House of Lords today debating Health Bill whose sole purpose is to continue reciprocal EU health care rights which are destroyed by Brexit 
#Brexit Update:Tomorrow Tusk meets Irish Taoiseach @campaignforleo. Press statements at 12h30.Thursday Tusk meets British PM @theresa_may at 15h00 in Brussels. Full @eucopresident public weekly schedule here:  
How dare you suggest that those concerned about damage that Brexit would do to the country, don't care about the poor, vulnerable, disabled. If Brexit happens, those people will be even more disadvantaged, & Labour will be partly responsible.How to win friends & voters, not!  
Ralph Klein screwed Albertans for a whole generation.He hurt people by cutting services and stopping infrastructure expansion.He wasted tax money be giving you a refund we couldn’t afford.He created the worst law to ban a PST without a referendum.#KleinSucked #ableg 
33. The Old Post Office, Cannock"In a 52-48 referendum this would be unfinished business by a long way." - @Nigel_Farage 
Nissan snubs Sunderland. Is Brexit to blame?  
May risks another bitter clash with anti-EU Tories by saying she's "not proposing" to replace Irish backstop in her Brexit deal. PM appeared to go back on last week’s vote – to replace backstop “with alternative arrangements” – she's only seeking "changes" 
It's interesting to observe how the Sunlit Uplands of Brexit Club has gradually morphed into the Black Death Appreciation Society:  
Adele rowing to Ireland to escape Brexit  
#Brexit#FBPE"European Parliament accidentally blocks UK web domains"#HardShade 
The UK Tory Government's bungled Brexit is causing uncertainty for businesses across Wales.@MarkDrakeford 
"If the Republic of Ireland has a referendum and leaves EU too, it would be a lovely solution for Brexit and we would not need a hard border"The above really takes 'stupid' to a whole new level.  
No matter how much preparation trusts put into a no-deal brexit, it will never ever be of any benefit for the NHS. #PeoplesVote 
When there is a shortage of food in no deal brexit the pets will get it - in a State of Emergency gov can make what laws it likes @TheKennelClubUK @CatsProtection#revokeA50 
Just 2,000 jobs have fucked off. You do realise brexiters promised brexit would be *better* than we had now? 
Despite bank bosses sounding the alarm over a hard Brexit, fewer finance jobs have left the City than feared. According to a Reuters survey, just 0.5pc of the 400,000 people who work in financial services in London have been relocated so far 
"I don't know if you read Waterford Whispers," Paul Murphy tells Paschal Donohoe, "but they had a good headline last week: 'Government confirm intention to use Brexit as an excuse for everything'…" 
Faced with an awkward and difficult question?No worries.. Just quickly have your aide unplug the 'live feed' cable . #Brexit #Ireland 
Nick, the "hard liners" have the support of 17.4m because they are wanting to deliver the result of the Referendum & your party's manifesto!!!You on the other hand don't even have the support of your constituents or Association - think it is you on the wrong side @NickBoles 
Former Brexit Secretary @DominicRaab discusses the opportunities and risks of a WTO rules Brexit - and makes the point that the decision of whether we go down that route is now in the EU's hands.  
ORB find record-high 80% of Brits disapprove of government’s Brexit negotiating strategy, 62% reject May’s deal. Major changes are needed or we Leave with No Deal.  
The ultimate Brexit betrayal from @LiamFox His plan to set zero tariffs would wreck the UK steel and ceramics industry and would mean no motive for other countries to negotiate trade deals with Britain. Sheer lunacy. 
The message is on the placards:Stop the Brexit mess.The best deal is with EU.Brexit: Not going well, is it?#Sodem @RemainingKind 
If Theresa May thinks she can distract the attention of the Great British public away from her disastrous Brexit with a shameless appeal to the football-loving masses then she is absolutely right Alexa play it's coming home  
11. Kirkstall Rd, Leeds"We could have two referendums. As it happens it might make more sense to have the second referendum after the renegotiation is completed." - @Jacob_Rees_Mogg 
10. Stanningley Rd, Leeds"In a 52-48 referendum this would be unfinished business by a long way." - @Nigel_Farage 
Chris Grayling will LITERALLY blame anyone but himself for his own faults. The only people to blame for the mess we’re in is the Brexit Elite, for promising things they knew couldn’t be delivered. The #OnlyWayForward now is a #PeoplesVote#FFS 
Theresa May arrives in Northern Ireland to sell her Brexit plan:  
Remember when @jeremycorbyn blasted the idea of a second referendum, blasted the European Union, and blasted NATO? He should be having phone calls with @realDonaldTrump, not @AOC! #Brexit  
Theresa May's face when she's told she's "shafted" Northern Irish business leaders over Brexit:  
Question: Which TV station is MOST biased against Brexit?It matters because too many young people, and folk of all ages, from all walks of life, are being wrongly/illegally subjected to, and influenced by, pro-EU propaganda.Please vote and RETWEET 
#EU leaders must save Europe and Britain from a No Deal #Brexit. This is how they can do it:  
the rights of EU migrants to live+work in the UK after Brexit aren’t a bourgeois concern just bc FBPE campaigners are annoying. people will be deported (or will live more precariously & w fewer rights) bc they’ll be unable to navigate the UKs expensive+punitive immigration system 
Hate crime victims left suicidal and afraid to leave home by attacks 'unleashed after Brexit'  
"I understand what a hard border would mean" - Theresa May tells Northern Ireland business leaders she will not agree any #Brexit deal that risks disruption at the Irish border  
PM says there will be no hard border; lives will continue as is. Great. That means NI will follow EU customs rules & large part of single mkt.Her commitment to have no barriers between NI and GB mean only one thing: GB will have to follow same EU rules.Great. But why Brexit? 
Theresa May's Brexit speech summed up in one still.  
Some very pointed observations about the Brexit-blocking antics of some of her Lab parliamentary colleagues from Caroline Flint here. This piece will cause ructions.  
“To export fish to EU if no-deal, you’ll need :-catch certificate- export health certificateYou may also need:- prior notification form- pre-landing declaration- storage document- processing statement”#Brexit ‘slashes bureacracy’, huh?It’s EU membership that does that  
Theresa May is giving a Brexit speech in Northern Ireland  
HEY BREXIT FANS.Just a heads up.Having conversations with our suppliers & producers at the moment.Bottom line is you are going to very quickly end up paying more to have a nice drink.Haven't spoken to the food traders yet but highly likely ingredients will go up too.Nice one 
#Brexit is dead. Zero of the promises from 2016 will come to fruition. This is solely party politics, @theresa_may & @jeremycorbyn have weaponised Brexit, and don’t care about the impact it’ll have on people’s lives, so long as it means the other doesn’t assume control. #shameful 
They Information Commissioners Office (ICO) are now looking into whether the HMRC should disclose their Brexit Impact assessments covering a number of scenarios including no deal.Hopefully a ruling will be made soon and I'll get them to you straight away 
‘Brexiteers demand Theresa May ask Trump to solve Brexit talks’I think I may soon run out of WTFs.   
I hold the view that the government's treatment of EU27 nationals living in the UK has significantly violated human rights and mandates penal sentencing. #PeoplesVote #Brexit #The5Million 
In search of a Brexit deal, May to visit Brussels  
Of course they want to delay Brexit. It's so they can have more time to try to overturn the referendum result as most of the Westminster swamp don't want us leaving at all.  
Parliament voted to get a Brexit deal done now. So let’s make it happen | Caroline Flint  
Hi @MrMarkDolan you have a nice little income getting lots of appearance fees being the 'Remainer who now fully backs Hard Brexit' don't you? I note your most recent RTs include Michelle Dewberry and Julia Hate-Spewer multiple times.  
We have reached the Brexit equivalent of kids pretending they can get to Mars if they carry on building their rocket out of fairy liquid bottles. Send help...or if you can’t send help ...send gin.  
All of these bonkers policies of waving goods through unchecked or applying zero tariffs are for one purpose, and that is to hide the enormous damage caused by Brexit while causing all kinds of other damage.Its a game of hiding the matches while pouring petrol over the house. 
Yesterday: NHS England decides it can't afford Orkambi, a wonderdrug for children with Cystic Fibrosis.Now: Government to spend £800k on 'highly likely' Eurotunnel Brexit legal case  
Following the reports of potential Government Brexit bribes to opposition MPs, @EdwardJDavey has secured a meeting with the Justice Minister David Gauke. 
The majority of people believe the Government's #Brexit deal is bad for Britain. A #PeoplesVote is the #OnlyWayForward:  
Just recently, @D66 proposed a change to Dutch law to allow British citizens resident in The Netherlands dual citizenship after Brexit. A bold, liberal policy from a bold, liberal party. Dankjewel, @RobJetten. 
Theresa May give it up! You’re just going round in circles on Brexit. You’ve had over two years and have got nowhere.Meanwhile the #NHSCrisis is getting worse, 4.3 million people stuck on waiting lists!We need a #GeneralElectionNow 
He wants a #PeoplesVote because he's worried about the high cost of living and threats to the NHS and feels we should be focusing on mending this country, rather than on #Brexit.Join him. Write to your MP to demand a #PeoplesVote:  
Labour refuses to reveal membership numbers after claims Corbyn support is PLUMMETING: LABOUR…  #Brexit #ClickBait 
Yet another press release about Brexodus. This one 'Tech companies join Brexit exodus, says GlobalData .' I assume this will be going on for the rest of our lives. Well done, British people! But I'm sure we can all eat turnips, if we can work out how to grow them 
Nicola sturgeon or snp have not taken a pay rise for a long time - have you ? Nicola sturgeon is in USA promoting Scotland - you are fighting for a brexit wanted by Englishmen not Scotsmen ! 
Eustice has said a drop in £ value will offset the cost of no-deal Brexit tariffs, & farm groups aren't happy:'To suggest a fall in currency value would go anywhere near offsetting the cost of a 45% value tariff is misleading''This sounds like gambling'  
Not hard to understand why there is so much EU obsession with Irish border. Today both sides is a lawless zone in which the writ of law does not run. Focus on imposing order post Brexit is opportunistic only. 
Have I missed a meeting?Why haven’t parliament been given the full legal advice for Brexit as demanded? Perhaps somebody Maybe in contempt of Parliament for not producing it? Why hasn’t bellicose Bercow berated someone? #WTO 
With Theresa May offering money to Labour MPs to get behind her Brexit deal is she at risk of violating the Bribery Act? What a farce. Demand the final say >  
Any Hard Working British Brexiteer Still Handing Over Their Hard Earned Money Each Year To Fund Their Anti Brexit Bollocks ?I've Been Denying That Anti British Broadcasting Corporation Since The 90's My Hard Earned Money.Never Again Will They Ever Get A Single Penny Out Of Me.  
#skynews30 Once great years ago load of rubbish now. Gone the same way as Bias BBC, Brexit bashing & Donald Trump bashing all the time. Used to love paper review at 22:30 & 23:30 that’s hopeless now. To many Remoaner bores on slagging off Brexit, & Donald Trump.  
Shame Labour’s GE17 manifesto did little for the poorest. Not much different from the Tories.That is a very good reason to vote for parties that offered more.Then there is the Brexit betrayal by this hapless LP Front Bench. 
So lets get this right , Labour respects the referendum result . But wants to stay in single market , customs union and keep mass gimmigration .STARMER ABANDONS LABOUR’S MANIFESTO PLEDGE TO END FREE MOVEMENT 
If Labour facilitates a Tory Brexit, you will be responsible for impoverishing the people you claim to be trying to help. You will be Tory enablers, who care more about power than the welfare of the vulnerable. 
In 2016 I asked Gavin Robinson on the Nolan show why the DUP (and UUP) wouldn’t attend the All-Ireland Brexit Forum. He said there was no need to discuss any issues with the Irish Government beyond their usual engagements. A missed opportunity? I certainly think so.  
EU goods will be waved through British ports in case of No Deal Brexit to avoid massive jams 
Couldn’t get out of bed until 12noon today (So unlike me!) and now I just want to get straight back in it Instead, I’m gonna catch up on the latest ridiculous #Brexit shenanigans...#surgeryrecovery #tired #sleep #rest #listentoyourbody #spinalsurgery 
WORRIED: Merkel talks of 'creative' Brexit solution as No Deal threat grows. British government must stand firm ready for WTO Brexit!  
Just heard a nurse on Liveline tell Joe Duffy she had to go to Luxembourg to have hip replacement surgery.  After 8 years of FG driving the health service into the ground, it is now well and truly broken. Steven Donnelly says if it wasn't for Brexit FG would be gone. Yeah, right. 
When Nigel Farage is praising you on Brexit then that really isn’t a good place to be but it’s just another reason why I was right to leave Labour - don’t want to be part of a pro-Brexit, anti-immigrant party where the leader is praised by fascists and nationalists#CorbynOut 
Labour's members were right about a Second Referendum - right to fear the battle it will unleash and right to go for it anyway... my analysis for ⁦@LMDiplo⁩ 
Food labelling after #Brexit is changing. Find out what changes are required for the day we leave the EU:  #foodlabelling 
There are many opportunities for the UK’s financial services sector after #Brexit. Thank you to all the industry leaders who joined me in @hmtreasury today to discuss how we’ll enhance our links with financial centres across the world. The UK's future is bright. 
It's because he prides himself on never changing his mind that many believe he probably voted Leave, and that his strategy now is to make Brexit happen but not get the blame when it goes tits up. P.s his recent backstop comments went down badly with his former Irish friends  
Concerns have recently been raised that the Conservatives want to use the cover of Brexit to roll back citizens' rights.I'm proud Labour introduced the Human Rights Act. Today I told the Commons that we will fight any attempt by the Tories to undermine it.  
"Labour Party members have already discussed whether to have a second referendum... It is the commitment to the outcome of that debate that must be honoured now." 
Dartford, on the UK trade artery that leads to Dover. A town in Kent. With a port. In case you’re a former Brexit Secretary who’s never heard of it.  
Theresa May in Belfast today proposing her alternative solutions to the backstop #Brexit  
Here was Samuel West @exitthelemming on the dangers of #Brexit to the creative industries in Oct 2017..... and here we are, with it actually looming next month, nowhere further forward. ESSENTIAL VIEWING for the catastrophe that awaits our second biggest sector.  
spot on by Lord Chris Patten, former UK EU Commissioner, "Maybe the only way we can get out this mess is through another referendum" spot on - #PeoplesVote @peoplesvote_uk will get us out of this complete mess of #brokenpromises 
Brexit is a whodunnit where you only realise at the end that the English vicar was the murderer all along - and not the swarthy European man in a cape. 
After Brussels’ obsessive hostility & intransigence in the Brexit negotiations, I will always choose a comparable non-EU product when available. Let’s start with wine from the Americas, South Africa, Australia/NZ.  
Brexit hits hard. Dr Who drives a van now.#drwho 
The only people to blame if there's a No Deal Brexit are this government and the Brexiteers who promised the world in the referendum and then walked off the stage when confronted with reality in the negotiations.  
Never thought that I'd retweet anything posted on Twitter by Nigel Farage. But let's see duplicity, manipulation and dishonesty for what it is. Corbyn is unelectable and I invite his supporters to try and defend his performance during the Brexit referendumVoters must reject him.  
No deal Brexit risks: "Putrid rubbish festering in the streets, a plague of rats. Sheep will be slaughtered. Supermarket shelves will empty. The NHS may lack medicines. The army and police stand ready for riots."Unlike Our Venezuela (not real socialism) 
EU stands for European Union doesn’t it?Not much of a Union when a German newspaper states that if there is a NO Deal Brexit that the Irish will have to impose a hard Border or if it refuses it will be kicked out of the EU’ Customs teritoryThe U.K. wants no part in such a Union  
@JuliaHB it’s really very simple1. The only economist to predict an upside from Brexit is Patrick Minford 2. Minford predicts and accepts that Brexit will mostly “eliminate” manufacturing in the UK3. Brexit is beginning to do what he said it wouldYour argument is dead  
Northern Irish kingmakers demand 'toxic' Brexit backstop be replaced  
I know basically nothing about Northern Ireland and the Republic of Ireland but even I know that safeguarding peace there should be a top priority in Brexit negotiations, and the fact that it’s treated as such an afterthought is disgusting. 
Theresa May give it up! You’re just going round in circles and wasting time. The only sensible Brexit plan is Labour’s customs union one. May should adopt it or get out of the way and let Labour get on with it. 
"officials are haunted by what government ministers still can’t or won’t admit: that any Brexit is going to hurt the country, but a no-deal Brexit is going to rip our arms off, disrupting almost every aspect of British public life except the weather" 
No one asked any of us if we wanted to be like Singapore, did they?Maybe that's what the referendum should have been about 
Operation blame game seems fully operational. Brexit is a UKproject. Tories and DUP own it, with all of its contradictions, unicorns andincompatible red lines. 
Bizarre spin being put on the EU-Japan trade deal, with warning it could threaten British industry. It took 6 years to negotiate, i.e. started LONG before Brexit referendum. It's only because we're stupid enough to leave that we won't benefit from it too. 
In so many ways I don’t want to RT this. But playing the video does explain what we are seeing from the Labour leadership. How can such a sharp about face happen? This is why he never wants People’s Vote. Note they didn’t vote again on Lisbon. It was settled. As would Brexit be.  
Chris Grayling says EU should be blamed if there’s a ‘no deal’ Brexit. So: the EU negotiates + agrees deal in good faith with PM May, PM then rejects deal. ‘EU to blame’. As Grayling can hardly believe this stuff, he must see blame coming down the line towards where it belongs 
Built on fraud, deceit and lies, #Brexit is rotten from the core. The rot will ineluctably ooze to the surface, the stink become unbearable. This is the future the UK faces unless we#RevokeA50 
I'm a civil servant. Trust me, we're nowhere near ready for no-deal Brexit"Operation Yellowhammer from the inside? It’s like The Office meets The Poseidon Adventure, with a Benny Hill soundtrack"Sunlit uplands! Taking back control! Strong and Stable! 
Given up on "Take back control of our borders" have we Nadine? Now it's let's have anything through, we don't care. Diseased meat, illegal arms, drugs, forced prostitutes, terrorists, all welcome, because Brexit. This isn't what anyone voted for. #RevokeA50 #StopBrexit 
Putin stooge Farage praises fellow Putin stooge Corbyn. Now add all the Tory Brexiters who have investments in Russia like Rees-Mogg and who have taken Russian money or hobnobbed with Russian spies like Matthew Elliott. #PeoplesVote #Brexit 
Brexit and the "white working class" | Richard Seymour on Patreon Why, if the government is so weak, is the Tory vote still solid? 
Nissan's decision to pull X-Trail production from Britain raises questions about government funding and Brexit  
I'm part Austrian, German, Italian and Scottish I have a home in Italy despite that I voted for #Brexit  in good part because I've seen the mess and suffering the EU has caused in Europe In particular Greece and Italy.The UK can do a lot better alone but only with a full brexit. 
From Brexit and migration, to gentrification and fair pay - we need policies that protects the rights of musicians and venues. Our music culture is powerful, but it needs supporting at the grassroots.  
EU 'intransigence' could mean no-deal Brexit, says DUP Get it into your head @DUPleader, English nationalist Brexiters couldn't  care less about Northern Ireland, & Remainers want rid of you DUP lot ASAP. You have destroyed the Union. #Brexit #PeoplesVote 
Great to meet @BoDPres & @JoelofSalmon today for wide-ranging discussion on the political situation, Brexit, the Labour Party and antisemitism.  
Withdrawal agreement – it’s not just the backstop - Article 156 of the Withdrawal Agreement states that “Until 31 December 2020, the United Kingdom shall contribute to the financing of the European Defence Agency   #Brexit #Croydon 
Significantly less than your previous Prime Minister spent. Maybe we should have a jet for Scotland's First Minister too? Air Force Wan? Of course you've seen the whole speech so you know it was actually about warning of a No Deal Brexit thanks to your incompetent government?  
PM doesn’t have a strategy. Only way to avoid a hard border is either for whole UK or for NI to be sufficiently aligned on customs & regulations. So options are either no Brexit, a UK-wide soft Brexit or a special deal for NI. Any WA requires backstop. 
Shares higher, pound down: what impact has Brexit had on the markets so far? 
Latest @iealondon briefing from @MissVHewson: 'Fears of empty supermarket shelves after no-deal Brexit are overblown' 
#Brexit has already cost the UK taxpayer £17 billion according to Thinktank 
Exclusive: Britain's financial heartland unbowed as Brexit risks deepen  
"Imagine you're trapped in a burning building with your friends and family while two posh people who hate each other stand in the doorway going, "After you"; "No, after you!"" It's @PennyRed on #Brexit at @PacificStand - 
There's an interesting & informative video exchange between the Electoral Commission and the DCMS committee - essentially the decision on the result rests with parliament and as this government and the DUP are beneficiaries of the referendum scam they're not going to do anything.  
2. How strongly do you agree or disagree with the following statement? "I think the Prime Minister has got the right deal for Britain in the Brexit negotiations"Strongly agree 3% Agree 16%Disagree 30%Strongly disagree 31%Don't Know 20%  
The number of available jobs in London's financial services industry has continued to fall with recent lows not seen since 2012. How has #Brexit shaped the City?  
The UK Prime Minister is waging a war of attrition against the UK. Pushing the same universally hated deal again & again to wear us out.But we're still where we were in November: a deal that'd permanently break our society, an unvotable National disaster Brexit or #PeoplesVote. 
Always was, always is, always will be - about the money! : Pay up £39bn Brexit bill or put UK's future relationship with EU in peril, Brussels' top bureaucrat warns MPs' | via @telegraph 
Did a little review of part two of #InsideEurope, which was on last night, and all about the Greek debt crisis. It sets the patheticness of Brexit in its proper, babyish context, and contains a salutary lesson at the end...  
Could be she’s thinking of her cars.........I’m not buying them anymore.....    Brexit: Angela Merkel says 'there is still time' to get deal in olive branch to UK - Mirror Online  
'The EU has got to realise there is no majority for the Withdrawal Agreement' - DUP MP Nigel Dodds urges Brussels to re-open negotiations with Theresa May in order to avoid a no-deal Brexit scenario  
"It’s like The Office meets The Poseidon Adventure, with a Benny Hill soundtrack."I'm a civil servant. Trust me, we're nowhere near ready for no-deal Brexit - by Anonymous  
"As a Protestant, not a unionist, I attended this conference because I am interested in the future of this land. I am glad I did." Frazer McCammond outlines his hopes following the recent 'Beyond Brexit: The Future of Ireland' conference.   
Still time for Brexit solution, says Merkel  
Liam Fox is considering using executive powers to drop all UK import tariffs to 0% in an emergency after a no deal Brexit. And if your immediate reaction is "Won't that destroy all domestic manufacturing?" you'd be dead right. He could limbo under a snake. 
in the interests of balance: reminder that @theresa_may is an absolute monster prepared to throw pretty much everyone in the UK under the bus just so she can keep her shitey party together and this whole Brexit mess is her party's fault. 
Today, Chris Grayling, "who can't even organise a traffic jam, despite being Minister for Transport", argued the EU would be to blame for no-deal. @joannaccherry is spot on, hitting out at the Tory Brexit delusions & red lines causing the Brexit impasse. #politicslive 
Nigel Farage now endorsing Corbyn’s anti EU hard #brexit stance. Labour remainers wake the F-up!You’ve been used.You’ve been screwed.  
Fact of the day: Jaguar Land Rover alone uses 25 MILLION parts in its UK car plants every single day. They’re trying to stockpile but in the event of a disruptive Brexit, given the volume they need, any supplies can’t last for long. 
Another excellent piece debunking fishing and Brexit here. As with so much else, the problem is largely UK-made.  
Interestingly, the statutes that provide those legal protections in the context of elections/local Government referendums expressly prevents the parallel application of the common law.  Those common law protections are not however, expressly excluded by the 2015 Referendum Act. 
FREE THE BREXIT ONE  
Remember their names (5): Please share @Reasons2Remain series of posters this week to remember some of the courageous Parliamentarians who spoke against #Brexit two years ago. #StopBrexit #FinalSay Link on Facebook:  
恭禧發財  - Happy Chinese New Year -It's the year of the pig in china but the year of the pig's ear in Brexit UK..... 
Just sang “Arlene, Arlene, Arlene, Arleeeeene / I’m begging of you please vote through my plan” to myself, and I think this signifies Brexit Derangement Sundrome has finally claimed me. 
Just been sworn and screamed at by hysterical woman after I took a wrong turn in Waitrose car park.Then inside the store she shouts how foul and disgusting I am while shouting, swearing and giving me the finger.Jeez some people take my stance on Brexit way too seriously! 
Talking to Jon Ronson has convinced me that whoever understands+ controls data will rule the world.Whatever happens with Brexit our major politicians are all looking backwards & the UK is going to get left behind. Our whole parliamentary system is hopelessly archaic. REVOLUTION? 
Despite the uncertainties over Brexit, the City remains resilient.  
7 Reasons Brexit is Great for Business - featuring businessman @LanceForman WATCH the full video here -  
Interesting move from Chris Grayling this morning saying that Brussels will be to blame for a no-deal Brexit. Brussels has been openly and publicly preparing for the possibility of a no-deal since 2017. 
The best thing about the utter flustercuck that the current Brexit negotiations are, is @mrjamesob calmly and hilariously shutting down the flood of morons calling @LBC in the mornings having a go at him So cheers @mrjamesob , you bloody legend. 
Poll suggests wide generational gap over attitudes to Brexit and @LeadNotLeaveUK  via @MailOnline 
Facebook on terror, child abuse and terror: sorry we’re trying our best to get it down Facebook on Holocaust denial: freedom of speech Facebook on breastfeeding and jokes about Brexit: INSTANT BAN 
Labour campaigned to remain in 2016; Labour now seeks a Brexit that does not cost a single job.If it were possible for Brexit not to cost jobs, why would you ever have recommended remaining? You make a mockery of your own judgement and then expect us to trust it. 
While everyone focuses on the Withdrawal Agreement, The EU Withdrawal Agreement Implementation Bill has been completely overlooked. Only 7 weeks until Brexit and the government haven’t published it yet. Britain cannot leave the EU with a deal until this legislation is passed. 
The Tory government are pushing us closer and closer to a disastrous no-deal Brexit, ignoring parliament’s warnings. This elected dictatorship cannot go on. @theresa_may - let parliament have a say, let the people have a say. #SaveourDemocracy #ExitfromBrexit #PeoplesVote. (3) 
I see #politicslive are going with “what Jeremy said in 2009” and not what May said before the referendum in 2016 . Funny that. Seems only some* people are allowed to change their minds. *Tory PMs 
DUP's Sammy Wilson says his party will not back the #Brexit deal unless the backstop is removed, as it "does not honour [Theresa May's] own manifesto or the outcome of the referendum" 
MAKE BREXIT HAPPEN. DO NOT LET US BE BETRAYED BY THE ONCE AND LIFETIME VOTE. WE MUST ENSURE OUR FREEDOM AND FREE SPEECH IS RETURNED THIS IS CRUCIAL!! 
Chris Grayling says Brussels will be to blame for a no-deal Brexit. James O'Brien: "Was it Brussels who weaponised free movement, put lies on the side of a bus and considered Chris Grayling worthy of high office?"@mrjamesob | #Brexit  
Will the EU hold the line on Brexit? What happens next? Join us on Thursday in @smockalley for a public discussion on Brexit with Green MEP & member of the Brexit steering group, @ph_lamberts, @ClareBaileyGPNI, and @EamonRyan. Book your free ticket now  
There are no changes needed for a No Deal Brexit. Which is what we voted for.  
Facebook have banned adverts for my tour because it has the word Brexit in the title. Given what they let Cambridge Analytica get away with, I clearly should have offered to harvest the personal data of my friends in return for an advert instead  
The depths of the PM's denial of what is happening are actually becoming dangerous. The Brexit date cannot change, but neither can Brexit legislation be brought to Parliament for fear of defeat. The PM is barely talking to those MPs who would inflict the defeats...  
Pierre Poilievre wants to take Donald Trump's America national. These Brexit loving, climate change denying, privatizing, tax cuts for rich giving neo-con myopians have already ballooned our national debt - now they want to finish the job. #cdnpoli #cdnmedia 
Jacob Rees-Mogg has a message for the Common People   Sheer brilliance from @PoliticsJOE_UK.#Brexit #StopBrexit #RevokeArticle50 #PeoplesVote 
Great to have our TV studio at @QUBelfast now up and running - live interviews direct from campus this morning with @DPhinnemore and @bbcnews and @SkyNews #brexit #backstop #journorequest @Globelynx 
A few months ago, I took the decision to leave @UKLabour and join the @LibDems  Watch the short speech that explains why I did it, and if you agree with its sentiments come and join me.  @Femi_Sorry @thatginamiller #Brexit #PeoplesVote #Liberals 
Theresa May is scrambling to get last-minute support from NI for her botched Brexit deal. She’s playing a dangerous game by threatening No Deal. There is no deal better than the one we already have. Fight for an Exit from Brexit >  
No Referendum, No Elections in #Biafraland.COAS Buratai can mobilise the entire Battalion of #Nigeria Army to our Land if he wishes, WE ARE  SIMPLY NOT VOTING! #Boycott2019NigeriaElections #SupportBiafraReferendum Let's Keep #Winning. 
These people voted to remain, now they would vote to leave. Why? They respect democracy, and have now seen how the undemocratic EU works. Join the fastest growing Brexit movement @  
Pay up £39bn Brexit bill or put UK's future relationship with EU in peril, Brussels' top bureaucrat warns MPs 
Brexit is 52 days away. #brexit 
What #Brexit fears? The UK's FTSE 100 Index is up 6% in the last six trading days...  
Not only predictable, but longstanding and persistent. Brexiters have been complaining of EU punishment since the process started e.g. this from April 2017 calling it punishment to lose EMA/EBA, rather than being an inevitable consequence of Brexit:  
Along with Danny Dyer’s “trotters up in Nice” rant, this is the best thing to come out of the entire Brexit shambles.   
"The case for independence, for Scotland being an independent member of the EU and the world community, has only got stronger through the experience of Brexit." 
If Labour is serious about internal democracy, about being a movement and not just an electoral machine - it has a responsibility to listen to its members and come out firmly against the right-wing project that is Brexit.Good article by @lea_ypi.  
Just in case there is any functioning industry left post-Brexit, they have a cunning plan to destroy that, too.  #StopBrexit #RevokeA50 
You, a Conservative, wants to talk about bills? If I didn't laugh I'd cry. How much has Brexit cost taxpayers thus far? How many billions? Our First Minister is representing her Remain voting country on a Women's platform in the USA. What a representative to have. #Lucky 
More trouble for the EU - Eurozone investor confidence falls to a four-year low. Naturally Brexit is being blamed, despite the fact the UK economy is doing better...  
Just asked my MP @andrealeadsom NCA & EC are investigating criminal activity related to Leave campaign; some high profile individuals in crosshairs of wider police investigation. If it is found 2016 EU Ref was illegal, will you withdraw support for #Brexit & call for #RevokeA50 
Can John sort Brexit out on his way home please? 
#Brexit: Theresa May to return to Brussels on Thursday  
Brexit Explained  
"At the beginning of World War II, a government pamphlet led to a massive cull of British pets. As many as 750,000 British pets were killed in just one week."The true cost of the "Blitz spirit".Still want to #Brexit?@mrjamesob 
Grayling predicts trade will carry on "relatively normally " in event of no deal Brexit. So he means like new railway timetable last May-June for which he had the ultimate responsibility  
.@tinamckenz speaking to @annita_mcveigh on @BBCNews explains that to support small firms and the UK economy we need to find a way to avoid no deal #Brexit on the 29th March.  
I am told Theresa May told Cabinet that Brexit must and will still happen on March 29, and offered no respite to the A50 extenders round the table - who were unusually silent today. Maximum denial mode . 
 “In the midst of all the Brexit chaos, it’s more important than ever that we send a message to the world that we are open for business.”  Read @NicolaSturgeon on her official visit to North America. 
Oh you silly boy. Sony and Panasonic left because of falling demand for diesel powered televisions. Nothing to do with Brexit.  
I wish my old friend Angus Robertson well in his new venture but the mere necessity of it is further evidence the SNP is not ready for a second independence referendum.   
£12,000 expenses for Tory MSPs in Brexit-Israel pact  via @TheCommonSpace is the true Jamie ? 
Swedish foreign minister: I 'cannot forgive' UK for Brexit  
"All this talk of Brexit, hard borders, soft borders, has no bearing on our actions and the IRA won't be going anywhere."  
Yesterday: NHS England decides it can't afford Orkambi, a wonderdrug for children with Cystic Fibrosis.Today: Government to spend £800k on 'highly likely' Eurotunnel Brexit legal case.It's time to take no deal off the table and focus on real priorities 
Thi is the completely inadequate response to my query about one Party's MPs (the Conservative Party's in this case) being  facilitated by Civil Sevants  to resolve a dispute inside that party. Is it unconstitutional or not? See the Brexit Dept quoted below:  
 via @GuidoFawkesInvestor confidence in the Eurozone has dropped severely for the sixth month running to a 4 yr low.It is weakening dangerously  is a phrase used.And what are they blaming ??  Brexit of course.Although U.K. economy is strengthening 
How embarrassing for you! Your party has 2 TRILLION in debt& rising, Brexit costs through the roof, 1.5 BILLION to DUP, 14 millIon to a ship-less company etc etc.Why are you happy with the tax payer for Tory failures?? Well done Nicola for promoting Scotland. You certainly don't! 
The First Minister is in North America promoting Scotland - to strengthen trade and cultural links. Y'know, because of the absolute state your own party has managed to make of Brexit. The USA remains Scotland’s top export destination country. We'll take no lectures from a Tory.  
UK economy flat-lines as Brexit nears, firms cut jobs: PMI  
Irish govt’s response to this is: “the Irish govt is always willing to discuss the Good Friday Agreement and peace process with the DUP.“However, negotiations on Brexit take place through the European Commission.” 
how? we're all but banned from discussing it in our CLP. we went to see jeremy corbyn and were warned not to criticise him on Brexit. we went to Labour HQ and were given a bunch of excuses for our voices being ignored at every level, with no suggestions of how to make them heard. 
Do any of our followers live in South Northamptonshire - the constituency of @andrealeadsom?Please do go along to her next public #Brexit event to air your views on the chaotic situation we now face as B-Day looms - booking opens from 8pm tonight  
Love this speech by Corbyn on the second Irish referendum, he is a real Eurosceptic. His role will be crucial over the next few weeks. Will the real @JeremyCorbyn please stand up? 
if you actually knew anyone poor, disabled, and/or vulnerable, you'd know that Brexit is set to make their lives even harder, and people will rightfully reject any party that enables such hardship. wake up. 
Turns out that EU official has told MPs that nobody asked #EU to remove from #WithdrawalAgreement the notorious #backstop If true the treachery of No 10 team is astonishing. Whats more German Car makers panicking. What a tragedy that May/Robbins are leading this shambles. #BREXIT  
"Brexit is turning the UK into a country of dual citizens. An Irish grandparent is now the most prized possession in the land."'The UK no longer feels like home’: the British Europhiles racing for EU passports 
I shouldn't torture myself, but the fact that Scotland had a referendum on whether or not to leave the EU, 68% of its citizenry voted to remain and yet we're still getting dragged to the abyss by a bunch of spivs, crims, flat-out liars and useful idiots is quite the piss-boiler 
And if you're part of the media, providing a soapbox, a megaphone, a platform for politicians and influencers to disseminate utter falsehoods about Brexit, WTO etc. then Brexit is your fault and your responsibility too. You can do better. You should do better. You must do better. 
If you voted Leave, Brexit isn't your fault. But if you continue to circulate lies, continue to support policies that would destroy our economy and the future of our young people, continue to refuse to look at the facts, then it jolly well is! 
Leavers are getting very, very nervous. They know Brexit will be a total disaster, and they know they'll get the blame.  
Nicola Sturgeon working hard to promote Scotland. Fixed that for you.  In the meantime, any sign of my MSP @RuthDavidsonMSP making statement on Brexit. Norway advises students to avoid U.K. Dreadful news for Edinburgh Unis and Edinburgh Central. Ruth oddly silent. 
Are you wondering why Corbyn seems so devoted to #Brexit. Just watch this video of him pouring out hate and bile against the EU. #PeoplesVote 
The great global diesel crash is the main reason Nissan won't make its X-Trail model in the UK, NOT the fears of a no-deal #Brexit  
The government have spent £45,637 printing out copies of the Withdrawal Agreement. If you want to save taxpayers' money and the environment then #LetsGoWTO. Join the fastest growing Brexit movement @  
REALITY: UK Transport Secretary says trade flow will be 'relatively normal' after No Deal Brexit. “It’s not a case that once we leave the EU that food supplies will suddenly dry up.”  
Brexit has uncovered the most arrogant treacherous unpatriotic EU enemy within traitors at the heart of Parliament.None of these Hardline Remainers can be trusted to serve the tremendous people of our proud island nation after we Brexit from the EU.We MUST drain the swamp. 
There are hundreds of workstreams across government preparing for a 'no deal' Brexit.But we have to rely on v patchy of information about readiness.Is it not time that Parliament - @CommonsPAC @CommonsEUexit - asked for complete picture? How many are Red/Amber/Green? 
£1Bn leaves this country every day since the referendum. No longer available for business or Government borrowing, does not earn taxable UK income or anything else for the benefit of the British people... Brexit will shackle Labour. 
The Tories have a creepy obsession with wartime metaphors over Brexit, so I’ve a new one for them: Theresa May is a kamikaze pilot who’s about to crash her plane into a ship called Britain  
Things that would win a referendum that would be a bad idea:Dissolve parliamentBring back hangingAbolish TV licenceAbolish income taxClosing all cycle lanesMurder legal if you think the other person looks at kids funnyInvading France 
Warped and twisted-because of Brexit. 
Just realised that Brexit is Fyre Festival. 
UK economy ‘stalls’ over Brexit and global economy fears  
Brexit is a joke. People should’ve been made aware of all the implications of leaving the EU, before putting forward a referendum. Now that they’re seeing how catastrophic it’s all going to be, I think another vote should be held. And if people are still choosing to leave...  
And please note: I still think that #Brexit is mad and foolish.But worse than that is *how* this is being done.I struggle to think how it could be approached in a much worse fashion - ill prepared, belligerent, partisan, antagonizing everyone.It's spectacularly bad. 
For the past few yrs we've consistently been told there's 'no money' for issues the UK NEEDS funding for, but also consistently, we've seen OUR money being by used by TM for bribing and 'buying' votes and favour. #Brexit aside, ANYONE who is ok with this should be ashamed  
Quexit? Britain has a Brexit emergency escape plan for the Queen  
The Brexit Effect and how it's affecting the auto industry in the UK. Read here...  
Nicola Sturgeon calls for fresh vote on Brexit during Washington, D.C. speech. 
We are rapidly approaching the time when we have to either fight for Brexit and democracy or accept the lies and bullshit which are supposed to pass for it. It's as simple as that. 
Jeremy Corbyn vilified for any and everything again. Remember brexit is tory policy. No one expects Labour to sort out Universal Credit or Windrush scandal for tories, unless Labour were in government. So why is it Labour's job to sort out brexit for the tories  ?It isn't. 
Deal or no deal, Martin Selmayr told the Brexit Select Committee our divorce bill is £39 billion  via @BrexitCentral 
Both front benches want May’s deal -a de facto hard Brexit, even if the tory zealots will oppose it to the end. It will tear the guts out of British manufacturing - see Nissan, steel industry,aerospace- and diminish our services irreparably. Prolonged stagnation lies ahead. 
I voted remain, I don't support a second referendum, I proudly vote Labour and want Jeremy Corbyn to become Prime Minister.  
If these Brexit ultras are so confident that their alternative customs arrangement will work, they could just vote for May's deal and then implement their plan in transition. Hey presto, no backstop! 
It seems the referendum is only binding/binding whenever it suits Leave & the ERG. If they get one challenge, it's binding. If they get another, it's non binding. 
Referendum: EU citizens: It's only advisory! After result: It's binding! Try to challenge result: It's not binding! What a fucking swizz. 
Out of curiosity ... if this result was *declared void* by the Electoral Commissioner - due to corrupt & illegal practices that might reasonably be expected to have influenced the result - then why doesn't the same apply to the referendum?#CriminalBrexit 
LET ME MAKE IT CLEAR! Your Mess,your shambles! You own the state you made the UK! You own the state of BREXIT! You OWN it! It's nothing to do with LABOUR or the EU! People of the U.K. Know it's the Conservative party and its useless PM!the UK know when it's over! Whose to BLAME!! 
So Irish American US politicians making it very very plain they will not accept the UK reneging on its backstop agreement with the EU and DublinI said it ages ago that the Irish border would be the problem that scuppers brexitIt was true then, it's still true now#GFA 
Many of the left are extremely critical of European institutions and the way they have acted (e.g. treatment of Greece) but still voted remain in the 2016 referendum. I was one of them.I remember that EU referendum campaign and Jeremy Corbyn's message resonated with me.  
EXC: Liam Fox secretly planning unilateral import tariff cut in move dubbed "the ultimate Brexit betrayal" of British manufacturers.  
Formerly homeless, disabled, widowed pensioner with zero savings here.Don’t dare tell me whom or what I care about, you nauseating hypocrite, who doesn’t care about the entire country being destroyed by Brexit.How dare you?  
@StevePeers Re: similarities b/w NoDeal Brexit & Y2K(h/t/ @polnyypesets ) 
The BBC deliberately covered the referendum like a party political debate, ensuring the indy supporters were outnumbered and given less air time than all the other pro-Union political parties.         -The BBC where the Truth goes to Die-   
I'm a civil servant. Trust me, we're nowhere near ready for no-deal Brexit | Anonymous  
Brexit could see a return to the days of the 'Costa del Crime'. Leaving the European Arrest Warrant will allow terrorists and mobsters to escape the law simply by crossing the border - and stopping attempts to bring them to justice. Read the scoop: 
I’ve never seen a photo more perfectly sum up Brexit. Print this thing on the side of a bus!!!  
On my visit to Nissan recently it was clear how disruptive Brexit would be to their just-in-time supply chains. I also met former Redcar steelworkers who moved to the car industry after the closure. By threatening no deal, Tories are playing fast & loose with jobs again   
It’s a week since the Prime Minister received a “mandate” from the House of Commons to go to Brussels and renegotiate the backstop. In that week neither she nor her Brexit Secretary have actually gone to Brussels. Extraordinary really. 
UK Transport Secretary: “I’m expecting the flow of trade in and out of the country in the event of a No Deal Brexit will carry on relatively normally.”Less hysteria please.  
.@John_Mills_JML says Labour's idea of ruling out no deal is a terrible negotiating strategy, it is "throwing away your best card" to get a good deal. #brexit  
Leave campaigners must stop being in denial and must accept responsibility for the looming disaster that is Brexit. To 'Blame Brussels, NOT UK' for no deal Brexit meltdown is not good enough and failing Chris Grayling must be made to account for himself. 
I’m pretty confident that I can tell how a man voted in Brexit by the way he talks to women. You see, misogyny and voting to Leave are so intertwined. The sense that you are better than someone else and the inability to move with the times.I could be wrong but I don’t think so! 
My article @Telegraph about the Brexit Committee meeting in Brussels yesterday.   
Dunkirk nonsense: delusions of wartime spirit. Read Kynaston. British pluck keeping calm in Brexit chaos? No chance. Now risk is any deal looks OK after no-deal scares.But any Brexit is a bad Brexit 
Investor morale in the eurozone has hit a 4-year-low. Recession in Italy, turmoil in France the German economy slowing. When will the EU accept their euro dream has failed?Help save Brexit @  
How would we go about raising the average IQ of people in the UK?Half the country have below average intelligence and we need to raise the bar.   I've just read about a Brexiteer who will climb mountains to get bananas post Brexit.Do we start in schools?  If so, how? 
#EU Demands £39 Billion 'divorce' fee even with No Deal or Brussels will sulk & sour any future trade talks.In that case, let's keep the £39 Billion as EU will never forgive us anyway for spoiling their Political Union project.#Brexit via @BrexitCentral 
It’s ridiculous to blame Brussels for a no deal #Brexit because the EU agreed a withdrawal agreement in good faith with the UK PM and her cabinet. The Tories have a majority in Parliament with help of DUP. The Tories will be the only ones to blame if there is a no deal.  
EU citizens! I too would rather cut off my arm than live in the far-right Brexit Britain. Populists roaming in bands attacking at will, Tommy Robinson (not his real name) leading a fascist coup, no cheese and the added threat of falling space debris.  
Where are you now on Brexit?Please Retweet 
About to give evidence to Commons Transport Committee on #Brexit @RHANews we need transition, businesses not ready. @HMRCgovuk expect us to do miracles. Hauliers can do impossible, miracles take longer than 7 weeks. @theresa_may @CommonsTrans 
Today's Twitter poll: There is much newspaper chatter about people stockpiling food and medication in preparation for potential post Brexit short term supply shortages.Yet how many people are actually doing this. Are you stockpiling? 
So let us remember. Let us discuss #Brexit , the EU, German foreign policy. Just bear in mind that words matter. And so does history. 10 
I wish that Brexiteers who like to invoke ww2 would take a moment to consider the irony that the only political faction in Germany which has cheered on the idea of #Brexit from Day 1 are the same people who are disgracing my country by trying to whitewash its history. 9 
The very memory of this horrible period in European history is the best reason not to make light of it, not to speak of war when you are really talking of peaceful, if fraught, #Brexit negotiations, not to glorify death, destruction, fear and pain, when there is none. 7 
That Grayling interview is mind-bendingly awful. The next chapter for these charlatans will apparently be warning that postponing or calling off Brexit will lead to a rise in precisely the sort of racist 'populism' they embraced to get their Brexit over the line. 
Those “ERG hardliners” are simply standing up for what people voted for. May’s useless deal (with or without the backstop) is a million miles away from Brexit.  
Investor confidence in Euro area hits 4 year low. Reason: Brexit, of course. Not recession in Italy, collapse in Germany, premature ECB tightening or widespread political turmoil. No none of this, must be ⁦@kitmalthouse⁩ Compromise 
Not sure why, but the fact that British people don’t eat British fish - and the EU market is incredibly important - seems to be lost in the Brexit fishing debate. 
24/7 anti-Brexit propaganda, fake news Project Fear scare stories and unchallenged biased opinions of paid -for talking heads briefly punctuated by sports news.#SkyNewsRaw 
My grandparents told their children how to survive a war.My parents told us how to prevent a war.I sadly admit I should have taken their messages more seriously.Peace is not an obvious thing.The EU is a peace project.#Brexit is a crime.#StopBrexit 
UK economy stalls as services flatline and Brexit fears mount  
Second Brexit billboard in Bristol asks Arron Banks where £8m came from 
What has happened to the £92 million share of the Brexit preparation fund handed to the Scottish Government by the UK Government?  
the pet shop boys....have released....a song about Brexit.....  
I'm a civil servant. Trust me, we're nowhere near ready for no-deal Brexit | Anonymous  
After a week in the UK, I can safely day that they are absolutely, in no way ready for Brexit and March 20 is going to be a disaster. 
"Today #TheresaMay will assure the people of #NorthernIreland that she will deliver #Brexit"-#r4todayBut ....they voted by almost 56% to 42% -#Remain Kafka presents #Brexit#BrexitChaos 
We're in the middle of the most absurb and farcical period of UK history. A ukgov led by a hard right agenda dragging Scotland into the oblivion. Yet you would never know it if you watched the country's BBC Scotland news.Any news BUT Brexit 
There's a shock. It's almost as if Theresa May continually misleads her own cabinet and the country. She cannot be trusted at all. #brexit  
Concerns about a no-deal Brexit are the same as the over-the-top worries about the so-called "Millennium bug" in 1999, spread betting millionaire Stuart Wheeler says in today's @telegaph @lettersdesk 
Forget Brexit for a moment - ongoing squeeze on councils has big impact on millions of lives - latest financial settlement out today  
I admire @CarolineFlintMP for saying she will back a reasonable Brexit deal. Breaking the party line to pursue what you believe is in the national interest is never easy and deserves respect.  
'To argue that the British public did not understand EU membership when fatefully asked to pronounce on it in a referendum is not to dismiss people as stupid. It is to recognise a decades-long failure of education and honest information.'  
I’ve written for @TheNewEuropean on how the Labour Party’s position on Brexit leaves me wondering what we stand for.  
I’m also looking to chat to individuals in the video games industry who are being affected by Brexit too.Suffering immigration related nightmares?Forced to relocate, or thinking about it?Turning jobs down?Email me - george@go-editorial.com - or DM me here. 
The US farming lobby wants a deal with Britain that moves away from EU standards. Standards that include rules governing antibiotics and hormones in meats. Just another reason the #backstop is essential. #Brexit  
Anna, the trouble is that the poisonous ERG *WANT* a “No Deal”.They have literally invested in it. They paid a heck of a lot of money to convince people to vote for Brexit and they need their money back *AND* the all important profit; ... cashing in on disaster.  
Friends! Three examples of Hate Speech:"Maybe Brexit won't be as bad as Our BBC says?""Unlimited immigration has its drawbacks.""I'm not altogether convinced that criminalising people's opinions is the hallmark of a free society."Talk about inciting hateful hatred!  
Germany just slashed its 2019 growth forecast. Investor morale lowest since August 2012. Merkel on Brexit: “To solve this point you have to be creative and listen to each other”They need a deal.  
BBC Panorama gave arch Remainer, Adrian Chiles, a national TV platform to bash Brexit for one whole hour last night.Will the BBC give a Leaver the same opportunity to explain the positives behind Brexit?Don't hold your breath.  
*Triggers article 50 without a plan then spends nearly 3 years building and agreeing to a brexit plan they end up voting against*"BLAME THEM NOT US"  
Queen Elizabeth, royal family to be evacuated if Brexit unrest breaks out in London, reports say  
TM⁩ can visit, but she knows she can’t secure a new Brexit deal.  Negotiations ended months ago!Many UK MPs are vehemently opposed to striking a ‘deal’; not caring of the impact as they are financially secure & living out a ‘rule Britannia’ fantasy   
#Brexit explainedHaving spent 30years pretending much of UKs influence, trade & wealth didn’t come from its EU membership the political-media class couldn’t then tell the population the truth when it mattered without looking stupid.So they went for a weakened Britain instead. 
“This showdown with EU hardliners requires fresh thinking and shrewd advice from seasoned players. Crawford Falconer was recruited by the Brexit department for precisely these skills. Yet bafflingly, Mrs May is keeping this star player on the sidelines” 
READY: Simplified customs procedures planned for No Deal Brexit. “There are many Remoaners who will hate to hear this news. Global Britain is open and ready for business!”  
Almost 3 years after the 2016 referendum and we are still living #inLimbo.We make no excuses for campaigning to #stopbrexit.Our latest press release by chair @Suewilson91#The5Million 
A union flyer lands in my inbox informing me that the UK government has sent no deal redundancy notices to the British teachers at the European schools in Brussels, put out of a job halfway through the academic year, careers ruined, kids left stranded. Thanks Brexit. 
The UK’s financial services industry has emerged largely unscathed from #Brexit, with about 2,000 roles expected to have moved or been created overseas even as the risk of #NoDeal grows, a new Reuters survey shows.What happened to 100,000 jobs moving..?!? #ProjectFear #WTO 
He’s right. Brussels called the referendum then broke the law & lied & promised free gold for all if we leave then set out crazy red lines and forced us into Article 50 before we knew what we wanted and spent 2 years arguing in cabinet before asking for unicorns. Bloody Brussels!  
So what #Brexit actually means is less control of the borders (and of course less money...)  
Not one brexiteer will ever apologise for the deeper, even more serious suffering that will likely occur once brexit actually happens, for taking away rights & privileges people have been enjoying for decades... 
Important question from @AngelaRayner Huge issue for #Canterbury as the @UniKent and @CanterburyCCUni our largest employers with many of our EU staff and students needing clarity in light of #Brexit #BrexitShambles 
What the Brexit deal is bad for: - Jobs - Young People - NHS - Businesses - Environment - Britain’s place in the world- Security- Economy What the Brexit deal is good for:- It isn'tThings don't have to be this way. Join YC4PV and take back control of your future. 
David Trimble to launch legal challenge against Theresa May's Brexit deal in next few days 
"Freedom of movement is a joy & a privilege. For my kids, Brexit is incomprehensible.” We CAN save #FreedomofMovement: #StopBrexit with the #PeoplesVote. Young people shouldn't have fewer freedoms & opportunities than their parents 
Brexit was 100% started by the Tory party!Own your own shit. 
How many UK workers will be looking forward to going from making cars etc to making skinny lattes on zero hours thanks to brexit 
“Social media is making young people anxious” say politicians eight weeks from Brexit as they scribble down their ideas for some sort of plan on the back of a napkin to desperately avoid bringing in Martial Law and deporting everyone with a bit of an accent 
Road hauliers have it in their gift to save our country from a no-deal Brexit | Latest Brexit news and top stories - The New European  
“I, as First Minister, have said I will outline my thoughts on the timing of another independence referendum in the next few weeks – once the terms of Brexit have become clearer,”   
Before #Brexit is close to being completed, I am already seeing Quitters preparing to blame the EU for the damage leaving will cause the UK. Getting their scapegoat ready early, and starting attempts to gaslight the British people. 
Nigerian Separatist Group Schedule ‘Referendum’, To Boycott Elections  
But with a lying Brexiter leadership contradicting Party policy & aiding the Tories, Labour isn’t worth it. Kick out Corbyn & the Ms, fight Brexit, & there will be real hope for us all.  
So, while May tries to bribe Labour MPs into backing her botched #Brexit deal, in the real world the Tories continue their 9 year long transfer of money from poorer to richer areas. #brexitshambles #PeoplesVote 
Things we'll get back after Brexit:Old moneyImperial measurementsAnswering the phone like "Kettering 6542"Picking up the phone and going "operator?"Radio 4 returning to the Home ServiceBobbies on bicyclesCheeky milkmenOld county lines restoredChurchill's ghost for PM  
It’s clear the penny has finally dropped with DUP & UUP that the backstop is the only viable Brexit solution for NI, but neither can stomach there being an open border as NI’s Centenary approaches. Now they’re wheeling in Trimble & Empey to argue it undermines the GFA. Pathetic! 
Remain : ‘We can just veto anything we don’t like’.No. No you can’t. Either accept a federal #EU where you have no control of your own tax, policies and military, or Leave. Those are the only two choices. We chose #Brexit. Deal or #NoDeal. 
I have never voted tory in my life, but listening to Arlene Foster and Sammy Wilson, part of me wishes the tories had gained a clear majority at the 2017 election.These DUP people haven't even reached the 1950s.  We should not be hearing a word from them #r4today #brexit 
“Enabling a Tory Brexit isn’t representing your communities, it is damaging them.”Powerful article from #FFS Supporter and proud Yorkshirewoman @IsHousecroft, on why Labour shouldn’t be enabling Brexit - they should be demanding a #PeoplesVote#FFS 
Lord Jack McConnell on GMS says the country doesn’t want any other referendums on Scotland or Europe, apparently we all just want to ‘clear this mess up’ excellent thinking Your Lordship, so how about having a 2nd referendum in Scotland to get away from those that made the mess? 
.@JLongworthLML: Why retailers should embrace Brexit  
What Jeffrey Donaldson will get is a friendly reminder that the DUP do not represent the majority view in the north on Brexit and that the EU27 negotiates as a bloc. Again.  
The Malthouse Compromise not as bad as Chequers but still gives the EU considerable control over post Brexit Britain. We need No Deal where the EU has absolutely no residual control over UK 
Dear Mr Coveney @simoncoveney,This UK Prime Minister does not speak for us.This UK government does not speak for us.Brexit is a disaster based on lies & wrongdoings.So much damage already done.Please know that there are millions of us campaigning to #StopBrexit.@Suewilson91 
As Theresa May flies into Belfast for #Brexit talks, Arlene Foster says: This is not a time for intransigence.'-Anglo-Irish Treaty: DUP against-Good Friday Agreement: DUP against-Northern Ireland voted Remain 
Ireland’s anti-EU @IrexitFreedom tell me that Leo Varadkar’s “Team Europe approach to Brexit has put Anglo-Irish relations back decades and has heightened the risk of No Deal considerably”  
UK toxic to inbound investment - we've already lost 300 billion worth of investment because of referendum result -  
Here is the breakdown of my tax bill. For the sake of that tiny blue sliver (which also gives me personal benefits - EU health insurance etc), the govt is upturning the whole country and has ignored absolutely everything else since 2016. #Brexit  
‘@IrexitFreedom: ‘EU fanatic' Varadkar heightening chance of No Deal Brexit. “He decided to politicise the border issue to make it as difficult as possible for the UK to leave the EU fully.” 
Less than a year before the EU referendum, Labour members elected a leader who'd spent his life denouncing the EU as a "military Frankenstein" & a "European Empire". They didn't share those views, but they didn't care either. And that complacency is a big part of why Leave won.  
‘US lobby groups for agriculture and pharmaceutical firms want UK standards changed to be closer to those of the US in a post-Brexit trade deal.The meat lobby wants the sale of growth hormone-fed beef, currently banned in the UK and EU, to be allowed in the UK.’  
Older people read rags like The Sun. Younger people get news from a range of sources. That’s why the old want Brexit  
"The case for independence, for Scotland being an independent member of the EU and the world community, has only got stronger through the experience of Brexit." 
As we all know Anna, Greg Clark is another who should be facing deselection.It’s people like you and him who have fought against Brexit and have weakened our negotiating position.If a No Deal Brexit is ruinous that’s because of quislings like yourself.Deselection for you both.  
This is a breath of fresh air this is Democracy there are a lot of people who voted remain who can & do except the result of the referendum & wants to get behind supporting brexit to get the best deal, total respect for people that take this democratic path   
No deal #Brexit threatens Spanish NHS staff (of whom there are many). ‘One trust has warned it may lose its theatre nursing staff’.  
We’re hosting a public meeting for Perthshire EU nationals on Brexit and the EU Settlement Scheme on Thursday. Everything you need to know about the scheme, how to ‘apply’ and what Brexit means for you.  
WATCH: Brexit-supporting Labour MP Graham Stringer says "I think the EU are desperate for a deal" and urges the PM to hold her nerve - "the EU often wait until the eleventh hour."  
1,248 hours until Brexit43 years of being dictated to by ranting EU megalomaniacs like @guyverhofstadtThe British people said no more to your tyrannical destruction of Europe.Good Riddance Guy !!!  
Still time for Brexit solution, says Merkel  
Steve Bray is a Brexit fighting superhero of our age who deserves our support & thanks!  
"The Good Friday agreement helped form the bedrock of peace and stability in Northern Ireland. I'd be concerned if we had a hard border of the impact on that." Irene McAleese co-founder of Belfast tech firm See.Sense chats to @seanfarrington for #wakeuptomoney's #Brexit road trip  
‘Brexit’ is to neoliberal apologists what ‘leaves on the line’ are to unscrupulous rail operators. Just a convenient excuse to blame something on rather than accept responsibility for their own flawed system. 
The only economist cited by Jacob Rees-Mogg who says that Brexit will be good for the UK, is Patrick Minford. Minford was involved in the poll tax! His Brexit 'success' for Britain is predicated on the destruction of the car industry and agriculture... #BeAfraid #BrexitLies 
There is no such thing as a manageable no deal Brexit.@cbicarolyn  
The idea of 2021 as an end date to Brexit transition for the UK is spurious to put it politely. Once the UK is locked into transition it is in for the long haul, possibly until the end of the next EU MFF cycle in 2027.The Brexit future is 202X 
Do you believe in any of the scare stories being pumped out each week in relation to #Brexit ? #ProjectFear**Please retweet after voting ** #WTOBrexit #StandUp4Brexit #StandUp4Democracy #Conservative #Labour #LibDem #UKIP #SDP #ForBritain #Green #SNP #Time #Sovereign #Plaid 
‘...and Naomi is in the New Forest looking at how badgers are preparing for Brexit.’ Please make it stop... 
It's extraordinary this is being shared like it's some smoking gun. 1) Irish referendum was on Lisbon Treaty. 2) When Ireland voted NO, it was made to vote again. 3) Corbyn's critique of what the EU was turning into was absolutely legitimate. That's why Ireland had voted NO!  
Difficult to avoid the impression that both Remainer leaders as well as ERG Brexiters ignore the realities of Brexit transitions that will most certainly have to be extended beyond 2021 because they are inconvenient to the tone of their respective campaigns 
Totally agree with @CSkidmoreUK £30k does not reflect the reality of salaries in the tech/science and vital healthcare sectors. Post-Brexit salary caps for EU workers will be ‘detrimental’ to science, minister warns  
They bribe them here.They bribe them there.Those Tories bribe them everywhere.Are we in heaven or are we in hell?Leave lies cause the UK’s death knell.Bad poems aside, there is little chance that the UK will survive Brexit and the corruption underpinning it. 
Had they taken the referendum result and undertaken a managed withdrawal from the EU, it would still have been tragic and we’d be worse off, but the country’s reputation would not have been trashed to this degree and economically the hit would have been far lighter. 
That sums up the EU and Ireland trying to restart the civil war for their own political ambitions.BREXIT CIVIL WAR: Le Pen SLAMS Eurocrats For Trying To ‘Restart’ Irish Conflict 
Fascinating stories of Britons driven to take EU citizenship by Brexit. Has any stable country ever deliberately alienated its own citizens like this?  
Thing is, they're "hideously white", patriotic and overwhelmingly pro #Brexit Why wouldn't the #BBC rob our pensioners? It Hates them! 
This Leave voter insisted there would be no food shortages if we have a no-deal Brexit, saying if he wanted a banana, he'd just climb a mountain to find one. 
So Theresa May will be in Belfast today lecturing people whose lives are protected by the backstop she devised that they should be happy with her now trying to mess with it in order to ‘respect’ a referendum in which they voted to remain.Makes Brexit sense.#r4today 
#QueenElizabeth, royal family to be evacuated if #Brexit unrest breaks out in London, reports say. I read something about them being moved to the Getty Castle/Museum in LA a while back. Wish I could remember where???  
The referendum was advisory.  
Nissan shows that North-east England will pay the price for Brexit, which was the result of a decades-long failure to explain the benefits of being in the EU to the British people.  
It's unbearably sad that leave voters haven't worked out why the brexit pay out will be in 50 years (Mogg) or 100 years (Digby Jones). It's because they know it's not coming and you'll be too dead to complain 
Martin Selmayr admits that the EU are seeking a political land grab of Northern Ireland as a price for Brexit. If this doesn't open Remainer's eyes to the sinister nature of their beloved EU I don't know what will. 
Ex-Northern Ireland first minister Lord Trimble is planning to take the government to court over the Brexit deal for breach of the Good Friday Agreement. "If it reminds people to keep their promises, it'll be a good thing" #r4today 
The overwhelming proportion of MPs knows Brexit will be a disaster for Britain, devastating the jobs and livelihoods of their constituents. Yet they are going along with it. They will be damned in the history books as moral cowards. I hope they realise that. 
To understand Daniel Kerchingski, just follow the money. If we find how the money flows for every MP, we will finally understand the reasons for Brexit. Massive, endemic corruption in UK politics.  
Just listened to Lord Trimble on  @BBCr4today. Still mystified by his proposal to take legal action over Brexit. Against whom? In which court? And for what breach of the law? Happy to be enlightened. 
Jesus wept. How can you possibly claim that a man campaigning for a form of Brexit (EFTA) is trying to frustrate Brexit? Choosing a sensible Brexit over one risking jobs and posing a severe threat to the economy is common sense not betrayal.  
Esther McVey insisted that Nissan's decision to move production of it's new vehicle outside of the UK was nothing to do with Brexit. Within minutes Nissan's Europe boss, Gianluca de Ficchy, confirmed that Brexit uncertainty had played a large part. #BrexitShambles 
What happens to British citizens living in each EU country, if there's no #Brexit deal? Your comprehensive guide  
Lord Trimble on @BBCr4today now on poss court case against Brexit deal 
Former UK ambassador and Remain voter Sir Christopher Meyer is now fully behind Brexit - encouraging fellow Remainers to accept the result and help to deliver it in full, not try to reverse it.  
It absolutely did not have to be like this. Theresa May’s appalling botched handling of this has been worse than Brexit itself. The scale of incompetence and catastrophic misgovernance needs historical perspective, I struggle to find parallels.  
"Blame Brussels" is the only key on the brexiteers' piano. They were playing it when brexit was a fringe idea of the far right. They were playing it when Cameron put it into the mainstream. They've been playing it throughout the negotiations. They will play it for years to come.  
To all the English #Brexit superfans who fetishise the 'Blitz spirit' & romanticise a war they weren't born during-I grew up during an actual Conflict with yr soldiers on my streets acting with impunity; the @BelfastAgmt #GFA has delivered 20 years of a fragile & precious peace. 
Deal or no deal, Martin Selmayr told the Brexit Select Committee our divorce bill is £39 billion, writes @cmackinlay 
Those MP's advocating a quick exit and therefore no deal, are doing so only ensure that we leave.There is no reason to leave at the end of March with no deal. They're scared that as #brexit unravels people will change their minds and want to remain. This is dogma over country 
The Telegraph deeply to blame for the disaster of BREXIT. They have systematically misrepresented the EU for decades.This article - indeed this publication - has become a propoganda outlet for the objectives of a few key ex-pat billionaires.Ban the Telegraph from Twitter. 
Sinn Fein says it is angry, worried and frustrated by May’s Brexit. But not so worried, angry and frustrated it will take its seats in Parliament and vote against it. 
Gammon Tsarina if Nissan erected a 500 foot tall sign saying 'Its because of Brexit' you'd say it wasn't. When Brexit food riots are happening around your mansion you'll claim they're nothing to do with it too! 
How can Scottish independence be  positive and Brexit be negative?  Why should we Scots believe anything @theSNP @NicolaSturgeon says? Even the most staunch indy supporter must have issues with this one? Time for indy supporters to remove their head from the sand. 
Magazine blames Brexit for print move from Cornwall to Germany    #FBPE #Brexit #Populism #BrexitVote #PeoplesVote #ExitBrexit #BrexitDeal #BrexitShambles 
That would be because the “our” interests to which Rosa Plebb refer to are those of the SNP. That is to say, the losers of the referendum on Scottish independence where Alex Salmond and she were rejected by the people of Scotland. Oh, and First Minister, please resign.  
Citizens’ rights for Brits in the EU if there's no Brexit deal  
Tony Blair: We all want Brexit closure – but May’s deal won’t supply it  
Why does the BBC think that this speech by Sturgeon in the USA is important enough to report it on their newsfeed? There is absolutely nothing new being said, it's just repeat bollox.BBC News - Nicola Sturgeon warns of no deal Brexit in US speech 
Brexit day is the 29th March. The Politicians cannot hide, they cannot spin their way out of it. They cannot kick it down the road. It's enshrined in Law.  If they extend the date they are all toast. Brexiteers will Judge them all at the Ballot box. Many will face deselection. 
Peter Lilley is a brexiter and a key figure in the UK climate...err..sceptic lobby.He also may have as many as a million referendum votes down the back of his sofa.Even if he doesn't, he has an obvious conflict of interests to explain. The referendum was the product of fraud. 
Japan's EU deal 'threatens post-Brexit UK industry'  
Why is the government turning a blind eye to the Leave side’s law breaking?Why the silence? @TomTugendhat please don’t expect us to “respect” this corrupt referendum - and neither should you. #VoteLeaveBrokeTheLaw 
“I think delay is a proxy for stopping and that is being proposed by people who never liked Brexit in the first place and are seeking to prevent it taking place.So delay is code for stopping and all your listeners should be aware of that.” 
New figures show British car manufacturing surged 8.5 percent in 2018, as the country is enjoying a slew of investments in research and new factories.  #Croydon #Brexit 
Writing for @BrexitCentral, @LowTaxChloe explains why #Brexit is a chance for the #UK to re-establish its close relationships with #CANZUK countries. #cdnpoli #auspol #nzpol #ukpolitics #Canada #Australia #NewZealand 
For anyone who still has any doubts about Jeremy Corbyn's stance on Europe then watch this from the Irish referendum some years back. Farage would be proud.  
Any MP who wants to foist a corrupted vote onto this country shows more allegiance to Putin than the people of Britain. The man who bought Brexit.  
In next week I’m speaking on Brexit in Maldon, Essex (today), Salisbury, (Thurs), Chipping Barnet (Fri), Winchester & Chichester (Sat), Halton, Lancashire (Sun) & Islington on Mon 18th. Details of each event on twitter - all welcome! 
You'll laugh and laugh! Then you'll recall that Marcus Fysh is a British MP who has power over your life and welfare. And the laughter stops. | Tory MP Calls James O'Brien To Try To Explain Why Brexit Is A Good Thing - LBC  #DissolveTheUnion 
Tennessee Republican lawmakers introduced legislation Monday limiting powers of community oversight boards just months after Nashville passed a referendum establishing such a group to investigate police misconduct claims.Not so small government #tnleg 
Our government gave Nissan a financial pledge to compensate them if their costs rose due to Brexit. Who can guess how much this would have amounted to over time. But even so Nissan has decided Brexit Britain isn’t a place to risk further investment.  
“Certain companies based in Britain may want to consider moving their headquarters abroad in the event of a no-deal Brexit,” according to official UK government advice to businesses.Nothing to see here.  Project fear.  Blame diesel or cats or something. 
We are above Brexit, mama we’ve made it!  
For once the EU is doing something right.No Deal Brexit - the deal 17.4 million British voters want!  via @BreitbartNews 
UK to spend £800k on 'highly likely' Eurotunnel Brexit case: Another example of the billions being wasted while essential public services are being starved of cash.  
Puigdemont to Canadian TV: "Scots can hold a referendum but in Spain it's a crime"   
Brexit is a much needed wrecking ball to demolish our ailing command and control economy.#Brexit 
#Jammu & #Kashmir must be given freedom from #Indian Authorities Acc to #UN Resolution there has to be Referendum for their decision whether they remain with #India or #Pakistan. 
      Mock referendum Election held in Delta state yesterday 3_2_2019 . It was Biafra all the way. All hail BIAFRA .  
Why is grown up Stewie Griffin in the Brexit movie? @JeffDLowe @KenJac @LightsCameraPod 
On this episode we discuss New #AvengersEngame trailer, Boring #HalftimeShow, #Trumps 'Natural' tan, #Nutelladay and the Queens #brexit escape plan check it out on iTunes  and SoundCloud  #PodernFamily #SuperBowlLIII #Maroon5 
Steelmakers face ‘hugely negative’ impact of no-deal Brexit  
A portrait of civil rights activist, Faith Bandler, hangs in our Treasures Gallery. Bandler was instrumental in NSW’s campaign for constitutional amendments to Sections 51(xxvi) and 127-resulting in the successful 1967 referendum on Indigenous rights.Image: nla.obj-136357720  
Utter conceit!You don't have a monopoly on caring.#Lexit= #Brexit= Tory Brexit=Rights Removed w/o ConsentJobs lostWorse OffCorbyn isn't owed votes.#Remain opposes Brexit, Corbyn backs it.If he loses it will be entirely his fault not those who can't vote for his Complicity 
Best way to preserve the US-UK relationship is to preserve the UK. There’s no “deal” to be had here. The con game is up and it’s time to call for a second referendum.  
British Transport Secretary says Brexit will not be delayed  
Brexit: an infestation of groundhogs - eternally repeating the mantras,  is going to have no impact at all on events. Positions are settled and, while the EU is prepared to make cosmetic gestures, there is no chance of any substantive change...   #Brexit.  
No its still depressing as the UK marches towards the most stupid decision it has ever made on the back of an illegal referendum. 
Ministers hid £61m aid package for Nissan to build new cars in UK after Brexit. Letter revealing the financial support is finally released – more than two years after May insisted no ‘special deal’How many lies until MPs get it? Brexit must be stopped.  
Federal prosecutors issue sweeping subpoena for documents from Trump inaugural committee, a sign of a deepening criminal probe 
“UK is not remotely prepared to leave the EU in 53 days time. That's been obvious for a while now. So the UK government should ask the EU to agree to put back the planned date for Brexit,” says @NicolaSturgeon 
Abe and Merkel seek to take Japan-Germany ties to 'higher level' amid trade turmoil and Brexit  
My thought for today:Are remainers terrified of a WTO Brexit because they think the sky will fall, or because they know it won't? 
#StopBrexit if parliament rejects the deal  The response to this petition reads like the dying throes of a desperate government. @theresa_may is in sheer panic mode. None of this makes sense, but then #Brexit never did, unless you are a Tory. @CCHQPress 
Polls: The closer the UK gets to Brexit the more the country hates it  
EU to lose £500bn and UK to gain £640bn in no-deal Brexit, economist claims  
Please remember that this is a feature, not a bug. Those who promote Brexit know it’ll be shit for people, but whipping up the population to blame foreigners for their ills suits their wider authoritarian agenda for the UK.Brexit is a coup. 
German media: Members of the EU Parliament's Brexit Committee have that in the case of #NoDealBrexit, if Ireland refuses to protect the Single Market with a hard border, the border checks will need to be made between Ireland and the rest of the EU. 
Hrrllrrhh! We find it most amusing that Remainlings actually have thousands of workable ideas on how to make a success of Brexit, but are concealing them, out of pure spite.*Do not inform the Brexitons! 
A useful rule of thumb, the frequency of his head nodding increases with the lies. 
It's unreformable. It is a monster. I thought the same as you but have completely changed my mind. It is so undemocratic and elitist. The power lies in the Commission, who are the Government of European Union and no one has voted for any of them. Bring Democracy back. #Brexit 
'Blame Brussels, NOT UK' for no deal Brexit meltdown, says Brexiteer Chris Grayling  
Lib Dems and Labour right (Progress) are pretty chummy.Similar Brexit views, ‘hard left’ anti Corbyn obsessions. So what becomes of the Lib Dems if the Progress crew break off to form their own CENTRIST party?Will they hate each other then, a lot?Or just ‘moderately?’  
Spain believes in democracy so much they recognized an unelected president in Venezuela, but throw their own Catalians in jail for having an independence referendum.  Such is the hypocrisy - and greed. #Venezeula #Spain #cdnpoli 
Forget the Brexit blame game for now, and fight back | Letters  
Corbyn in 2009 branding the EU an "empire", a "Frankenstein" and subservient to NATO if the Lisbon treaty is enacted. This is the passionate speech of a fervent servant of the Kremlin. #Brexit #PeoplesVote 
"There should be a request for an extension" for the #Brexit deadline, Scottish First Minister @NicolaSturgeon tells @IAmAmnaNawaz. "That should happen whether there is a deal or not." 
This statutory instrument gets rid of the legal obligation for EU states to come to our aid in the case of an emergency interruption to our gas supply (and vice versa) Because after Brexit we're Billy no-mates, so we're on our own if problems arise.  
Proof the media is presently our gravest threat. [They] are literally calling for a forceful crackdown on #YellowVestsUK protesters who are just angry at being denied the #Brexit they voted for and the embarrassing mockery that has become of UK democracy.  
1) All you need to know about Corbyn's integrity is this:He was a life long eurosceptic Under pressure from MPs he agreed to flip to Remain to save his skin after his shock leadership winBut now that he's secured Labour he wants #Brexit & he's not letting go  
This was a UK initiative.The UK triggered Art50 before it was remotely prepared.The UK Cabinet didn't discuss the 'end game' until Dec 17.The UK overestimated its leverage & underestimated the EU.The UK lost two Brexit Secretaries.The UK ignored the Irish Border issue 
The Brexit impasse is such a good time to bury bad news like this.  Experts knew the cladding was unsafe for years before Grenfell, and before Lakanal House (2009) too.  
I am amazed that in all this debating and arguing we see about Brexit, no one is bringing up the Lisbon Treaty and where it will take us in the next few years if we don't get out. 
So Corbyn has laid his cards on the table today as a hardline Brexiteer unionist, and said he wouldn't give Scotland another referendum in a lifetime.  At least Scotland now knows where we stand with Labour.  If you want independence in Scotland, vote @theSNP #DissolveTheUnion  
Oh for God's sake. THERE. DOESN'T. HAVE. TO. BE. ANY. MORE. LEGISLATION. FOR. BREXIT. TO. HAPPEN. #default #nodeal 
Queen Elizabeth, royal family to be evacuated if Brexit unrest breaks out in London, reports say  
Brexit is 1271 hours away. #brexit 
Spoke to a university-employed researcher this evening. Brexit in his world: research itself goes on the back burner, effort diverted instead to the quest for funding, which, becoming UK-only, is far harder to obtain. His contract is up for renewal just before Brexit... 
I have said from beginning Brexit is the worst self-inflicted wound a country has inflicted on itself in history.  Obvious response to all the Little Englanders is for Wales, Scotland and Northern Ireland to cede from UK & rejoin EU & many firms & people WILL move there.  
That’s largely because it was assumed that Remain would win. Labour members didn’t think they were choosing a leader for an era that would be dominated by Brexit 
In poll after poll the UK public says Brexit was the "wrong" decision.Backing for Brexit has collapsed.And now 56% and growing want to #Remain - a huge 12-point lead.When will the politicians listen: #RevokeA50 & #StopBrexit.Write to your MP today. 
In retrospect, it’s striking how rarely Europe was discussed in the 2015 Labour leadership election. A referendum was coming, yet the avowed euroscepticism of one of the leading candidates was barely mentioned  
Let's go over and have a look how Brexit negotiations are going.  
UK's May urges business leaders to ask EU to avoid no-deal Brexit: FT  
Another case of the government perverting democracy by hiding information.The business secretary has been forced to admit the existence of a previously secret package of state aid to Nissan that could have been worth up to £80m. #PeoplesVote #Brexit 
Could be horse meat in imported food. Could be illegal immigrants or trafficked sex workers. Could be coke or heroin. Could be machine guns or bombs.No checks at 20 ports.Isn't Brexit turning out wonderfully?  
"if there is not a deal...that would be catastrophic..." First Minister @NicolaSturgeon on why she's worried about basic things like travel, medical imports, and food shortages for @Scotland without a #Brexit deal. 
Enda Kenny set up an All Ireland Brexit task force before the referendum but the DUP refused to attend. 
Who isn’t fed up of the #Brexit hell-on-wheels show? We want certainty, agreement, realism... In fact, we need compromise!Could the #MalthouseCompromise be the olive branch that shows sign of dry land on the distant horizon? (I'm thinking esp of you, @BorderIrish) 1/15 
Don't be scared guys, it's just another tolerant #FBPE being tolerant.#Brexit  
“Backstop: The politics and economics of Brexit's most important, but most eminently solvable, riddle” by ⁦@LiamHalligan⁩ 
How are you going to convince EU Nationals to come over here, be looked at like second class citizens and work for us miserable f*ckers in your post-Brexit compromise?No Kier, challenge the legitimacy of the whole damn Brexit scam, enough p:ssing about now.  
The present leader of @UKLabour is a fraud. He has no intention of following Conference policy. That policy is clearly an inconvenience. Just listen to this...  #Lexit #Brexit #StopBrexitSaveBritain#FinalSayForAll #PeoplesVoteNow 
Let me guess what your speech was about.Hard Tory Brexit.Independence.Scotland being dragged out the EU against its will.Independence.Peoples vote.Independence.Blah blah blah.Independence.(Yawn) 
No deal. No queues.Brexit: Customs checks to be simplified in no-deal situation - BBC News  
Morten Morland on Brexit #Theresa May #Tories #Brexit #TheresaMay #Brexit #IrishBorder #Backstop #BrexitShambles - political cartoon gallery in London  
Irish Gov sources say there’ll be no #brexit negotiations with DUP.  Repeats the line that Ireland negotiates through the EU. #CBlive 
Thankyou Newsnight for covering @Prefabsprout - I feel quite emotional. Back to Brexit now I see, but you can’t spoil my mood. It’s a life of surprises. 
Ireland, nor Europe for that matter, didn’t create the border, Brexit, or the need for a Backstop - all three issues foisted upon the Irish people by British Government policies  
This is why Corbyn was always going to facilitate Brexit if he could: because he’s always believed in escaping the ‘European Empire.’ But he voted ‘Remain’, of course...  
Calling all MPs... If you represent constituents working in the fishing industry, ask them how they feel about the veritable avalanche of red tape that a no deal Brexit is officially about to dump all over them. Better do it now, before it's too late! 
Argue with your keyboard.February 16, 2019, is Biafra Referendum, sit at home in Biafraland and be counted.  
Good to hear @Keir_Starmer underlining @UKLabour support for the #NorthernIreland backstop- vital to preserve an open border and the GFA. But the best way to do that remains to ask people to vote again and guarantee peace through saving the UK from Brexit. 
Labour women ask party leadership to stop ignoring conference Brexit policy. Letter from me ⁦@SarahVeale1⁩ ⁦⁦⁦⁦⁦@Fionafof⁩ ++ #peoplesvoteForget the Brexit blame game for now, and fight back | Letters | Politics | The Guardian  
Corbyn isn't ever going to support a second referendum. He isn't going to save us. He's not an honest broker here. He wants out of the EU. You can see Corbyn's opinions on the EU for yourself.  
Has anyone seen @UKLabour's Six Tests for the #Brexit deal? Wearing a stripy jumper, I think.  
In that case it's WTO on 29th March then.  Angela Merkel warns that Brexit deal CAN'T be reopened  via @MailOnline 
Corbynistas campaigned against Brexit and now want to keep the UK as closely shackled to the EU as possible. Defenders of the failed status quo!  
Why is Britain turning a blind eye to Leave side’s lawbreaking? asks @PeterKGeoghegan.(Also, why is Britain's media not asking this question, loudly and daily?)#Brexit #criminals via @IrishTimesOpEd 
Note: I'm not a Remainer. I'm pro-independence. Scotland rejected Brexit and I want nothing to do with it - Leave or Remain. Brexit is an English problem. 
Nissan was offered secret state aid to cope with Brexit. This makes a mockery of fair competition. Those on the 'inside track' get dosh others don't. A warning signal for countries thinking about trade treaties with the UK. 
Excl: Facebook bans Brexit (having helped to deliver it) 
The fishing industry will drown in red tape under a no deal Brexit scenario. That seems to be the gist of the new preparedness notice snuck out by Government very, very quietly this evening... 
A third of UK dentists are leaving the country because of Brexit.That means tooth hurts are staying 
Ok my #Remain friends. I am off on another of my postcard writing missions. If you want me to send one of these to your MP on your behalf just let me know. And any special message. Let’s them all know how we feel. #brexit #WriteNow #RevokeArticle50 #StrongerTogether #FBPE 
You’re an historian, Simon?  And totally unaware of the massive youth unemployment created across Southern Europe by the EU’s failing €uro currency project? And you’re suggesting that Brexit is a threat to jobs? NO, SIMON, THE EU IS A THREAT TO JOBS!  
The new @Global pop sensation - Iain Dale and the Backstops. Thanks to ⁦@daliagebrial⁩ ⁦@Ella_M_Whelan⁩ ⁦@darrengrimes_⁩ & ⁦@Will_DryOFOC⁩ for a fun Brexit panel. Listen on catchup on the Global Player app.  
The closer the UK gets to Brexit the more the country regrets it, polls show 
It is chilling how many people opposed to Brexit have come forward to say they too have been stood down by the BBC.   
Back  to  Square  one. There will never be a concession big enough for the Brexiters - because there is no Brexit that lives up to the fantasies of 2016. Parliament is once again in deadlock, and the #OnlyWayForward is a #PeoplesVote#FFS 
COMMENT OF THE DAY: The common sense fightback begins. #Brexit  
Lots reasons for no deal BrexitOne is IMF would have to bail out UK & crashed poundTop of conditions?Sale of NHSBritish public would have to accept this external demand, or face ruinVast sums from sale, vastly more from asset strippingMore rich traitors#RevokeArticle50 
.@UKLabour MPs: Tonight your party has told you that your views are of no concern, and neither are Jews. You have been humiliated. Your party is racist. You’ve justified staying in this amoral hole to influence #Brexit, to no avail. It’s over-have you no self-respect? Stand up! 
“To argue that the British public did not understand EU membership when fatefully asked to pronounce on it in a referendum is not to dismiss people as stupid. It is to recognise a decades-long failure of education and honest information”  
Why is Britain turning blind eye to Leave side’s lawbreaking?Illegal fund activity linked to Brexit being ignored in belief ‘the people have spoken’@PeterKGeoghegan asked that more than 6 months agoMore Brexit lawbreaking is now known, blind eye goes on 
For many of us, too much time is being spent on us reading stories on twitter & watching the news following the national calamity that is brexit.It would be great to switch off!But as brexit threatens the futures of our kids and UK as a nation, we must not stop!We will win! 
Germany's Merkel drops hint of a 'creative' Brexit compromise  
Angela Merkel warns that Brexit deal CAN'T be reopened.  And it can’t be ratified.  So it’s “WTO deal here we come!”   via @MailOnline 
“It has emerged that the government plans to pay a law firm £800,000 for advice in case Eurotunnel decides to sue over the effects of Brexit on its business.”Tacked  on to the end of this storyAnother cost to add to the final brexit bill 
Reminder: dropping May's red line on FoM could unlock a far better Brexit deal from an economic perspective:   
Sparky exchange at City Hall as Sinn Féin Mayor of Belfast Deirdre Hargey tells DUP councillors: "Brexit's got you all uptight."  
Theres a guy from the referendum campaign thats always stuck with me.He was handing out Remain leaflets at Earlsfield station. June 2016. He was so nervous, his hand was shaking as he gave the leaflet to me...I never forgot how brave this man was. To face his fears.#Remain 
Corbyn is a leaver . Labour ( I include myself ) have been had . He’s not who he purports to be , and his true Brexit stance is why he’s been conniving with the Govt to deliver Brexit. #StopBrexit 
BBC has refused to say how many complaints it has received from licence.. payers angered at .. Gary Lineker's frequent anti- Brexit rants... on £1.7million a year, uses Twitter to spread .. pro-EU messages to his 7.2 million followers.   
Brexit is against the will of the people.  This is not something the British want.  Revoke Article 50 and let us salvage what we can.  
I've come to the conclusion that @theresa_may & the ERG are colluding by spinning endless unicorn proposals that'll go nowhere, keeping pesky MPs busy talking and moving closer to the #Brexit line on 29th March. #PeoplesVote is not a lost cause. We need it more than ever. 
The transformation of the Tories from a centre-right economically conservative party to one that openly promotes hard right, xenophobic bile in just a few years shows what happens when you appease. We should fight for our values on Brexit and immigration. 
Confirmation tonight that traffic will flow freely through UK/EU ports after Brexit in whatever form it takes. So no 20 miles queues. (But they won’t confirm same for Irish border. What a farce). Project Fear No56 debunked. 
Corbyn seems to call European Union a “military Frankenstein”. This video looks kosher - if that’s the right word - and if so it sinks Corbyn as an honest player in Brexit.This is big potatoes.  
why??? did Brussels vote for Brexit??? 
Goods to be waved through UK ports without checks under no-deal Brexit, ministers admit.A field day for smugglers of goods, people, drugs, weapons - doesn't bear thinking about.  via @PoliticsHome 
Were you in the crowd for Jezza’s 2017 Glastonbury speech? Are you a right-on Remainy Corbynite? If so this really is a must watch for you: Corbyn the hard-Brexiteer ridiculing the idea of a second referendum. You’ll love it!  
#InsideEuropeSurely,  this programme is showing us all that being out of the EU is the most sensible thing to do.#Brexit 
While the British left is chuntering about a "jobs first Brexit" the US left is setting the world on fire     
HMRC’s promise to allow goods to flow freely across the border after Brexit is a classic case of good policy by default, rather than design.  However we end up there, free trade is good. 
There is no easy or popular Brexit policy.  The Tories have already let the genie out of the bottle.For this reason, I’ll support the Labour leadership on Brexit regardless.  There are simply too many other important issues at stake.We need a Labour government. 
For the love of God constituents want politicians with integrity. At what point did bribery become part of democracy? How far will Brexit drag us down. I have no words 
'Nobody' in Brussels is considering giving Theresa May concessions to get Brexit deal through parliament.More time-wasting from May on another pointless exercise. I mean, it's not like there's a clock ticking or anything …...…. 
Jeremy Corbyn speaks out against a second referendum! His logic was right about it then and the same applies now!  
I took a break from Twitter because Brexit is depressing me. Has everything stopped being insane yet, or should I go back to bed? 
Rumours of a new Brexit-themed pop group are yet to be confirmed @IainDale @daliagebrial @Will_DryOFOC @darrengrimes_ @LBC 
Well this aged well ey @Anna_Soubry ? Why should anyone ever trust anything you say again? #Brexit #NoDeal #WTO 
Looks like any remnant of hope that @Keir_Starmer will get behind conference policy on a #PeoplesVote has walked out the door, dragging six tests behind it. More Brexit disgrace. Power before people.  
If Greece managed to hold a referendum in 8 days, why can’t we? My analysis 2 weeks ago, now outside paywall  
"Stuart Cosgrove, illustrated how the BBC deliberately covered the referendum like a party political debate." 
What about a UK citizen's unqualified right to free movement as an EU citizen? The right many were born with, to live & work across Europe. A right, one of many rights & protections of EU citizenship, stolen in an unlawful referendum process, unchallenged by Labour @Keir_Starmer. 
I made an earthquake survival bag in Japan and ate it all every time I came home pissed. Nae chance for a Brexit stockpile in a Scottish home. 
The man who brokered peace says no #Brexit decision should be taken “that makes a return of violence possible.” Senator George Mitchell says the government must keep its promise to avoid a hard border.  
Wow how did Britain keep Nissan so onside during the 2016 Brexit clusterfuck? £80m of covert state aid - how's that free market ideology doin' for ya? @Conservatives - while starving people are forced to beg for work? 
Thousands depend on #Nissan for their livelihoods. Sadly, uncertainty around #Brexit is not conducive to encouraging business investment. Today in #Parliament I asked Secretary of State @GregClarkMP what assurances he could provide for the future security of manufacturing jobs. 
The European Commission’s secretary general has said that “nobody” on the EU side is considering legally-binding assurances to help Theresa May’s Brexit deal.  
Norway urges students to avoid UK universities in Brexit warning  
No deal brexit contingencies = "waving traffic through & relying on businesses to declare later."1 It's news to businesses.2 Not really a plan, more an abdication of responsibility.3. Why did we spend £'s on fridges & stockpiling? I smell a rat. 
This is like a Brexit comedy sketch ... (ht @DavidHenigUK) 
And the cowardice of MPs to question what "the will of the people" was, they all accepted May's interpretation without question, because to question the interpretation was equal to "not respecting the referendum result" and being a traitor. 
The WTO’s Pharmaceutical Tariff Elimination Agreement automatically means that tariffs do not apply to finished medicines, covering 10,000 medicines across the #EU, Canada, USA, Japan and Norway. This covers  ~90% of the world’s pharmaceutical trade.#ProjectFear #brexit #NoDeal 
Pay up £39bn Brexit bill or put a future trade deal with EU in peril, Brussels' top bureaucrat (nicknamed 'The Monster') warnsIn other words, he's want us to hand over this money on a wing and a prayerAnd we have learned that we cannot trust the EU to negotiate in good faith 
Corbyn caught using the same overblown rhetoric abt the EU as Tory ultra-Brexiteers & UKIP. Corbyn & his main advisers are driving Labour Party policy from this Eurosceptic position. In so doing they are aiding a hard right #Brexit & damaging democracy.  
Brexit upsides - the creation of 3 new independent nations in the EU.WalesScotlandUnited IrelandThank you @David_Cameron@YesCymru@YesWestLothian@IrishUnity@sinnfeinireland 
This is the real Corbyn on Europe, and in his own words. If you're against Brexit and still support this guy, you're being taken for a ride. He's pro-Brexit and trying to hide it to hang on to your votes.  
I WANT A FULL ENGLISH BREXIT NOT A CONTINENTAL ONE!... 
The Tories like to brand themselves as the party of business, take John Redwood, a man whose prime goal in life is never to come across a stick that he can’t find the wrong end of..... 
Business Secretary Greg Clark faces backlash after secret £80m Brexit sweetener he offered to Nissan is leaked  
Brexit: Lord Trimble to take government to court over Irish backstop, saying it breaches Good Friday Agreement 
For once something happens in politically boring Britain! Who else was govt giving State Aid to?? And thereby sailing close to breaking EU regs? Were other car companies given tens of millions as a Brexit cushion? Which ones? ‘There’s no magic money tree’  
No.  MPs must tell the truth.  Brexit is a ruinous Fraud that will hit the poor the hardest and should be ended.  I cannot respect a Socialist who pushed for a Brexit cooked up by Hard Right Vulture CapitalistsThe people are wise to this now and demand a #PeoplesVote 
U.K. businesses trading with the EU can apply for a special status allowing them to bypass some hurdles created by a no-deal Brexit.  
Here's the problem. #Quitters at first ignored Ireland and then shouted #ProjectFear. #Brexit is built on lies and fraud. You reap what you sow. #ProjectReality 
I’m gathering the Brexit #panorama isn’t great.Perhaps watch #MalwareForHumans instead.It actually explains some stuff. 
There are 53 days to go until Brexit, investment is fleeing the country, and Theresa May has a new idea  
Days to go until Brexit - 52Alternative Arrangements - 0 
This man solved a terror attack within a few days, but is now accused for not beating the Catalan voters during the referendum on 1st Oct 2017. Another example of the Fake Spanish Justice.#TraperoCatalanHero pic.twitter.com/kzb7vWhmws 
V short and brilliant on why Brexit happened. Spoiler: Europe had nothing to do with it. @PennyRed via @connorwa 
Remember their names (3): Please share @Reasons2Remain series of posters this week to remember some of the courageous Parliamentarians who spoke against #Brexit two years ago. #StopBrexit #FinalSay Link on Facebook:  
Soto del Real. The prison where 7 Catalan political prisoners await the political trial that could condemn them to even more years in jail. Their crime? To hold a referendum on self-determination.This is the real Spain.  
Brexit BBC HQ London 2019. Future generations will pull it down, if Brexit goes ahead, along with other landmarks of of right wing propaganda.#FBPE #PeoplesVote 
Marine Le Pen accuses EU of trying to spark CIVIL WAR in Ireland to punish UK for Brexit  
Riddle me this, Brexit peeps: why has there been no discussion about whether we really want to be outside the single market? 
@PennyRed bringing the heat in her inimitable way, with this cri de coeur explaining the Tories systematic gutting of the nation that has led to the "seven-dimensional cock-up" of #Brexit pic.twitter.com/ic2aqniYDc 
This article in Der Spiegel - respected German magazine - suggests that if there is no Brexit deal Ireland will either be forced to impose a hard border or, if it refuses, be booted out of the EU's customs territory:  
Chief financial officers of companies with a combined market value of £390 billion:•100% — Brexit is the top risk to their businesses•Some 80% — Business environment to be worse as a result of Brexit•More than half — Hiring will slow 
Here is the problem: the Border, Brexit and the Backstop. All of which Ireland did not invent, conjure or want. But all of which Ireland have been forced to negotiate on, accept and deal with. It’s time for the UK for once, to accept their role in the creation of their problems.  
‘Sling your hook’.   Nigel Farage told the EU’s most senior civil servant “sling your hook” after he said the UK must pay the £39bn Brexit bill even if there’s no deal.     Nigel Farage Slaps Down EU’s Top Civil Servant Over Brexit Bill Demands  
"..the UK must pay the £39 billion Brexit bill even if there is a no-deal exit".This would be laughable if I didn't think there was a good chance that May would actually do it.  #TreasonMay #Brexit  
In the future, everyone will litigate Brexit for 15 minutes  
Corbyn mishandling Brexit and going against the will of the Labour voters who want a 2nd referendum and for their leader to back remain. I thought "populism" was about backing what your constituents want   
No — because they've told her where to go already haven't they.  These #Brexit delays are just about clinging onto power for a as long as possible aren't they.  May is pathetic, deluded and certifiably dangerous. 
Douglas Fraser does a series of special reports on housing. Lisa Summers does a series of special reports on the NHS.At what point do we get a series of special reports into the effects of BREXIT on Scotland's economy, NHS, tourism, inward investment, universities, population? 
Shadow Brexit Secretary Sir Keir Starmer tells Newsnight the UK should "explore" allowing qualified free movement of workers from the EU after Brexit Watch the full interview tonight 22:30 @BBCTwo@nicholaswatt | #newsnight | @Keir_Starmer 
The Brexit gangsters are turning this once open, tolerant and respectable country into a pariah state.  
For those who say we have to go ahead with #Brexit because it’s the will of the people, well, it isn’t any more...#Panorama 
Now that would be a laugh for the thousands of Brits who have taken an Irish passport to avoid Brexit  
Lots of disinformation and nonsense coming from some political commentators.  The backstop is opposed by a large majority of UK Parliament including some Remainers. Not just the DUP. #Irexit #Brexit  
The sight of pensioners saying they are happy with a No Deal Brexit makes my blood instantly boil. Selfish twats. #Panorama 
When I studied at Cambridge University, for the first time in my life I met people who’d been to Eton, Harrow, etc. Some were nice; some awful. But what they all had was staggering intellectual confidence, even on topics they barely understood. #Brexit 
Do you think the Labour party’s policy on Brexit is clear or unclear?September 2017Completely unclear or confusing24%January 2019Completely unclear or confusing41%  
This got 63 seconds of coverage on BBC Scotland's flagship TV news programme. Scotland's elected leader visits the USA and gives a speech on Brexit and Independence and all it's worth is a minute of air time lodged halfway down a 30 minute programme.  
After a long day of #Brexit discussions this fair cheers you up......Flashmob Nürnberg 2014 - Ode an die Freude  via @YouTubeO friends, no more of these sounds!Let us sing more cheerful songs.......All that custom has divided,All men become brothers, 
Theresa May is a threat to national security.Forget "taking control of our borders"! We already had control. After a no deal brexit, there will be no control whatsoever. 
Ten hours since Ineos’s pro-fracking earthquakes rant & not a peep from @beisgovuk. Is this becausea) it’s considering changing its mind (again) despite recent insistence limits won’t be raised?b) Brexit chaos has rendered it incapable of even reissuing an existing policy line? 
Forget this damn deal. We need to go to WTO now Brexit latest news: EU chief tells UK 'nobody is considering' offering legal assurances on backstop in hammer blow to Theresa May  
Back when we first lunched the People’s Vote campaign I pleaded that we ended this Brexit mess! The fastest and most certain way to do this is to Exit from Brexit. If you want to just make this stop join our campaign >  
The March 23 election should be a referendum on the demolition of Allianz Stadium.Under Labor schools and hospitals will come before Sydney stadiums.  
Brexit: 'Nobody' in Brussels considering giving Theresa May concessions to get deal through parliament | The Independent  
Unfortunate but there we are! Angela Merkel warns that Brexit deal CAN'T be reopened  via @MailOnline 
This is something that doesn't get said very often: Brexit has re-invigorated UK politics. I think a lot of people who were on the sidelines feel more engaged. And, in their frustration and lack of representation do, oddly, feel more involved. This must, surely, be good? #LIBERTY 
The Bane of the Brexiteers: Gina Miller#brexit 
Over 800 people have already joined us as members.Can we make it 1000?Help us fight Brexit, austerity and the far right; for migrants' rights, workers' rights and solidarity across borders.Join us & tell your friends  
So far in 2019 there have been 5 polls that asked voters if they want a 2nd EU referendum.In every single one of them, the voters have said "no".  
Is your passport valid for post Brexit travel? Here's the info you need....  #MartinLewis 
Fantastic! Said the drug dealer ...UK ports to wave through EU goods without checks after no-deal Brexit, HMRC says  
It time we work collectively together to make sure once again that this flag stands for freedom. #Brexit #LeaveMeansLeave #BBCQT #BBCTW  #Marr #Ridge #BBCSP #StandUp4Brexit #Freedom #Students4Brexit #LetsGoWTO 
9/2/2019 WE NEED YOU! IF YOU VOTED BREXIT AND #BELIEVEINGBRITAIN WE NEED YOUR HELP TO SHOW OUR POLITICAL ELITE WE WANT OUT!EVERY UK TOWN/CITY!!!! #yellowvestuk #Revolution #GiletsJaunes #Brexitbetrayal #Brexit #Brexitmeansexit #Yellowvestuk #WWG1WGA #YellowVests 
What pisses me off most about the politicians playing power games with Brexit as the football, is that it won’t be them who may struggle to pay the rent or decide between food or heating or have permanent anxiety that their job will be lost. They’re immune to it all. #FuckBrexit 
If necessary, the UK must take an aggressive approach on financial services in Brexit talks, says @BimAfolami 
But your Brexity colleagues have been wailing that Brussels is bullying us. The toxic fascist duality: We are the bullied victims who have the right to break any rule and moral principle to defend ourselves and we are the powerful who will crush our enemies. #Brexit #FBPE 
Major gave away trillions in war reparation.Blair took us to war unnecessarily (Ask Dr Kelly—(Oh you can’t SOMEONE murdered him). Brown sold off the gold at rock bottom prices. And Run away Dave was a waste of space but he did instigate the referendum. May,still has a slim chance  
The prospect of no-deal hanging over the country for 3 more years would see investment and jobs desert the UK and the economy plummet. Nissan repeated over and over.It is truly bonkers, Brexit has only ever been about the Tory Party and sod the country. 
It was a privilege to speak in the beautiful Riggs Library @Georgetown today on Scotland, Brexit and independence  
When you make migrants feel unwelcome and don't provide legal certaintyNorway urges students to avoid UK universities in Brexit warning - Higher education minister says Norwegians should study in countries other than Britain@weareintl @Scientists4EU 
Dave Brown on Brexit, the backstop and 'alternative arrangements' #Theresa May #ReesMogg #Tories #Brexit #TheresaMay #Brexit #IrishBorder #Backstop #BrexitShambles - political cartoon gallery in London  
I’m in Belfast . I’ll be live tomorrow on @BBCBreakfast at the @nitronicadotcom plant in Ballynahinch — talking about the growing tech sector in Northern Ireland and looking at what the future holds. #Tech #Brexit #Backstop #Skills 
5/ #EUsupergirl doing the patriotic thing and teaching a Swiss guy how to shout BOLLOCKS TO BREXIT!!!  Photo credit @glabrate 
There will come a day when you will be able to watch an entire week of news without hearing the word Brexit.But if we have to spend the next 4+ years negotiating an actual trade deal with the EU, that day moves much much further away. #BoredOfBrexit 
There are many Remoaners who will hate to hear this news. Global Britain is open and ready for business!‘Lorries will be able to drive straight off ferries and Channel Tunnel trains without making customs declarations in the event of a no-deal Brexit’  
Almost all PM in the last 45yr sided with EU against the UK.Major caused a recession & cancelled German War Debt. Warmonger Blair opened borders to millions. Brown denied a Lisbon vote. Cameron resigned in disgrace.May’s a lying EU Dictatorship puppet who botched Brexit talks  
When you fine someone £1216.80 for a missed phone call but have £4.2bn to spaff away on a No Deal Brexit.   
Jeremy Corbyn would love to stop #Brexit but unfortunately he's washing his hair  
UK to spend £800k on 'highly likely' Eurotunnel #Brexit case  
As Nissan pulls back, North-east England will pay the price for Brexit, the result of decades of dishonesty about the EU, and failures to explain the benefits of membership.  
One of the many little problems with #Brexit that the #Brexiters try to keep quiet about. If we walk out of the EU, we leave its system of mutual recognition of #driving licences... @InFactsOrg 
My dear Igbos,I think it's logical to vote @atiku if you want referendum.It's a wise thing to do because the Buhari you know will not in this life grant you your wish. So to make Nigeria work again, vote @atikuStaying at home is giving  votes to the opposition. #AtikuWillWin 
Brexit is breaking Britain, and Theresa May’s deal might just leave it broken.  
Nissan's decision is NOT about diesel. It was effectively made in 2016, when diesel wasn't an issue. It was 100% Brexit.The decision was then reversed because May offered £80m and promised a soft Brexit. It has now been reinstated because May broke that promise. 
Brexit withdrawal agreement cannot be reopened: Barnier  
"Stuart Cosgrove, illustrated how the BBC deliberately covered the referendum like a party political debate." 
It was a great pleasure for Deputy Head of Mission, Michael Lonergan to meet the Scottish First Minister, @NicolaSturgeon  who gave an excellent speech on Scotland, Brexit and so much more at @Georgetown 
...Or to put another way, in the Brexit scripture, blessed are the pork pie makers 
And what Brexit has done is torn away the fig leaf of supposed normality. What are seeing is that NI is still very much a place divided, a place unreconciled. We still don't know who we are. We stopped fighting, but we still eye each other suspiciously. 5/ 
This British lawmaker still hasn’t deleted a tweet that is both inaccurate and inflammatory. Britain was the largest recipient of Marshall Plan aid. “We will remember” indeed. 8,000+ ‘likes’ for this #Brexit bile.  
Another insult to the 17.4 million people who voted to leave the EU! Artist Tracey Emin: Nothing ‘more hideous’ than Brexit  
Tomorrow's agenda for Cabinet:- Zimbabwe- Local Government finance- Brexit So the PM doesn't want to have a big row about the backstop tomorrow. Cabinet source: "She's left Brexit until the end again, when everyone is bored rigid and hungry". 
Nigel Farage to the EU’s most senior civil servant who says the UK must pay the £39bn Brexit bill even if there’s no deal: “You can just go and sling your hook!”@Nigel_Farage | #Brexit  
OMG, I just realised - after Brexit, there will be no more Brexit! How will remainers justify drawing breath when their very reason for remaining alive is cruelly taken from them? 
Pay up £39bn Brexit bill or put UK's future relationship with EU in peril, Brussels' top bureaucrat warns MPs  Time to #Go and Now - this is blackmail - nothing more or less 
Hilarious seeing the #FBPE wingnuts saying lord #Trimble doesn't understand the #GFA Just ponder that. Pro EU types have become so deranged by the fact that #Brexit is happening that they are telling an author of the Good Friday Agreement, that he knows less about it than them. 
Bear with me, but I feel like what the Brexit debacle has done is highlight how unacquainted people within UK & indeed, the South, are with Northern Ireland. Maybe I'm just being precious, but I feel that we aren't a normal society. We have paramilitaries, segregated schools 1/ 
It’s 56 days until we go over the Brexit cliff and BBC Scotland have a slot about fumigating a country house full of moths. 
A young Labour campaigner says Jeremy Corbyn's Brexit position has left her wondering what the party stands for.  
Oh how we'll laugh at the fuss about the Nissan £60 million when that £350 million-a-week Brexit bonanza arrives! 
Flabbergasted to learn that after all of Mrs May’s assurances to the 1922 Committee and to MPs in the House that she did not outright ask the EU that the NI Backstop be removed from that dire Robbins #Brexit Withdrawal Agreement.  
Why did Corbyn campaign to leave the EU? Why did he negotiate the worst deal in history?Why did he call the EU referendum in the first place?What?It was the @Conservatives?But, but, the newspapers & @BBCNews & even some Labour MPs said it's all Corbyn's fault... 
I propose a #Brexit compromise:1. Redefine “United Kingdom” as Scotland, Wales and Northern Ireland.2. Withdraw Act 50 to allow the new UK to remain in the EU.3. Cut little England adrift to sink independently into the steaming pool of bile and fascism it created. 
People are so blinded by Brexit.If the Tories get a majority and another five years, they'll gerrymander the electoral map to such a degree that democracy in the UK will be finished.Brexit can be reversed if it comes to it. These Tories are a danger right now.#JC4PM2019 
Come and join 1st UK wide youth strike 4 climate 15th February, 11am-2pmLondon, Parliament SquareLets show UK Government that we demand action! There is no Brexit on dead planet @theresa_may! 
This is a re-announcement, and is not new..   It also makes it harder for other countries to deal with UK as it removes their ability to rely on customs procedures and checks in UK.  Brexit: Customs checks to be simplified in no-deal situation - BBC News  
Another Remain claim shown to be nothing but sheer fantasyThere will be no gridlock or lorry carparks under a no deal Brexit.#RemainMythsDebunked Get involved @  
Pay up £39bn Brexit bill or put UK's future relationship with EU in peril, Brussels' top bureaucrat warns MPs  
Britain will have major shortages of everything it can't domestically produce on March 29 (and huge gluts of things it does produce).Hoarding and price gouging will start before then.Brexit will be a case study on how to fuck over the world's 5th largest economy overnight.  
Jo @Jazz_O72 was mortified when she woke up to the news of the referendum result. She’s saddened by the loss of opportunities for her young nephew & is determined to continue to fight to stop Brexit. (Apologies for some background noise in tonight's film)#BrexitIsPersonal    /1 
Words of wisdom from @DavidDavisMP that he and his colleagues would do well to remember. In a referendum, the people should be given a #FinalSay once the details are decided. This is essential to avoid a sense of betrayal and erosion of confidence in our political system. 
UK SCANDAL:50 anti-Brexit politicians have received millions from the EU 
FM @NicolaSturgeon addressed an audience at Georgetown University’s @giwps in Washington DC on ‘Scotland, Brexit, and the Future’. Watch the full speech here: 
I’m not in the slightest bit downbeat about stopping Brexit. We are going to have a people’s vote because they, the Leave establishment, lied to us. Let’s bin the whole thing and fix the real problems in this country. 
First Minister in US working to protect Scottish economy after Brexit and Reporting Scotland headlines a delayed report on staffing in the best-staffed health service in the UK. Naked propaganda. 
Luvvies going into meltdown. Brexit "ABYSS!" (Independent), Brexit "CATASTROPHE!" (Guardian). Our tax-devouring, regulation-loving New Class is flailing around like a wounded beast. The volume of their terrible cries reflects the scale of this great victory. 
Statement on Nissan in Chamber, but I’ve been at equally depressing meeting with Farming Minister on labour shortages as we approach Brexit. Fruit, veg and flowers rotting in fields because there’s no-one to pick them. Eg: 2 million bunches of  lost in past month. That’s £420k. 
... independence should not be in the hands of the pork-pie manufacturers” said one influential MP in the room. “But at the moment it seems to be”. Another said: “it’s important!”  Well it’s all important. And that’s the problem with just 53 days to Brexit. 
Great idea, but perhaps we need a referendum to decide if we need a referendum into whether we have a 2nd Brexit referendum? Just to be sure.  
The Swiss and Norwegians are clever people. They have a hard land border with the EU as a result of being outside of the #EU.#Brexit is imminent. Why do the saps in the Tory party think they can come up with a better solution in a matter of weeks?#StopBrexitSaveBritain 
Just think, if we had voted Yes in 2014, 2015/16 would have been 'the parting' and Brexit would never. have. existed.There's an obvious question... did we cause it? 
I'm having an exchange with BrexiteerHim - "Nissan is making it's new SUV in Japan because they have just sign a FTA with the EU."Me - "Yes, so, it's because of Brexit""No, it's because Japan has signed a FTA with the EU so they don't need to be in Europe" 
"Democracy" just means anything the establishment likes. -mainstream journos laid off? devastating to democracy-brexit/trump/etc? threat to democracy-cutting x social program? bad for democracy-voter id's? bad for democracy-protecting your borders? restricting democracyetc  
Rep Scot NHS staff shortages in Scotland. No mention of Brexit & no Scottish Gov comment, but  during report it emerged things in (example area) Thurso are better than they were.Left to puzzle if Scot Gov were taking responsibility for things they have no power over like visas? 
I, for one, am glad that @vincecable is being upfront about what the #PeoplesVote campaign is actually about. Its primary purpose is not to enhance democracy. It's to stop Brexit.  
Britnat @BBCScotland news headlines Scottish Government struggles to get staff for Scottish NHS No Fucking mention of of Brit Brexit Wonder where the actual reason is? 
Another in our long line of Veteran stories. This is how #Brexit rewards a life of service #peoplesvote #RevokeArticle50 
Sturgeon to tell US audience Scotland has been ignored on Brexit  
Say hello to Lucy. Lucy is yet another Matthew Elliott-Vote Leave, astroturfing shill, straight out of Tufton Street. 
My latest Brexit Blog post. The current impasse is the result of Brexiter falsehoods colliding with reality. The EU are finally doing what the UK polity and media have mainly failed to do by standing up to Brexiter misinformation, distortion and lies:  
I'm NOT a 'Leftie' I just think Brexit is fucking stupid!  
First Minister Nicola Sturgeon speaking in North America"Brexit itself will be damaging for Scotland., but Brexit without a deal will be catastrophic." - @NicolaSturgeon @ScotGovFM #BrexitDeal 
BBC News - Brexit: Customs checks to be simplified in no-deal situation Another PF story of miles long traffic jams are exploded by HMRC. Custom declarations will be simplified and duty paid later.All this in case of a No Deal . 
Greg Clark says a no deal Brexit - as in "no deal is better than a bad deal" - would be "ruinous" for the economy 
The Nissan debacle is the epitome of Brexit debate now and for the future: everyone can blame someone or something else; meanwhile the reality is still bad news. 
Fantastic News!Second Referendum Petition breaks through 55,000 signatures!Let's push it past 100KSIGN this  Now RT it!Thank you!#FinalSayForAll #PeoplesVote 
Sometimes it feels almost as though this whole Brexit malarky wasn't thought through properly before Theresa May invoked Article 50. If MPs were a proper profession they'd be sued for negligence  
Parliament legislated for a referendum on our membership of the European Union, and promised to enact the result. Any attempt, covert or overt, to reverse the referendum or make Brexit impossible is a HUGE breach of trust. 
Glad you’re not giving way over the backstop. I want a no deal Brexit and legal assurances might have got May’s horrible deal through. Keep up the good work Martin and force Theresa out with no deal.   
Rees-Mogg: ‘Delay’ Is Code for Stopping Brexit  
Brexit scaremongering: Why Nissan's XTrail decision ‘had NOTHING to do with UK leaving EU'  
The usual suspects have been quick to blame Brexit for Nissan’s decision to make the next-generation X-Trail in Japan...but the real issues lie elsewhere.Must-read from @julianHjessop: 
France: 'Emmanuel Macron FURY: French president 'will have to GO' if he loses referendum' 
Yet more good Brexit news!'Artist' Tracy Eminem hates it.Thanks, Trace. That'll help us with #NoDeal enormously.Viva Brexit 
Germany: 'Germany admits it IS trying to get the UK to cancel Brexit' 
Just watched Look North where they interviewed a couple in Sunderland about impact of Brexit on job prosperity at Nissan."It doesn't matter...we'd still vote for Brexit as theres too many Europeans in Sunderland"There you have it. The choice is xenophobia over employment 
Whatever happens in the coming weeks, the anti-Brexit Labour left needs to talk to each other.Come to this! 
It's a fallacy that Brits are leaving Spain because of Brexit.In fact, there are more arriving thanks to Brexit!@BremainInSpain 
The Strange Passions of Brexit now has 50,000 views - with @fotoole @LesleyRiddoch and me at @The_Convention_ Thanks you @HenryCPorter 
Brexit: Just #MakeItStop !#RevokeA50 #Sodem@RemainingKind @rnaunton 
It’s So Much Worse Than You Think: explaining #Brexit to Americans.  
I’m no Tory, but better to look at the trend here, peak dustbyn has now passed, if he continues to facilitate brexit the numbers will continue to plummet. 
Excellent article explaining the real reason Nissan's U-turn on Sunderland. Join the fastest growing Brexit movement @  
I’m young, metropolitan, educated and multilingual – but proud to have backed Brexit 
The paralysis in Parliament could be broken if Labour actually stepped up to the plate, instead of ploughing on supporting the tories with their disastrous commitment to brexit.  
"I think Scotland will become an independent country in the not so distant future." -@NicolaSturgeon @ScotGovFM #Brexit at @Georgetown 
Project Fear Nissan aren't building their latest diesel vehicle here because of Brexit.The TruthWhilst they are building it in Japan, they are investing even more money into the vehicles they are building at Sunderland.Oh dear, hysterical lying Remainers busted again. 
BREAKING NEWS: New Mills to leave the United Kingdom.As a result of overwhelming discontent with the British Government, New Mills, in the High Peak, Derbyshire, will be breaking away from the United kingdom and declaring itself a republic on 29th March 2019. #Brexit #Leave 
Lying obviously doesn’t matter, if it did, the 2016 referendum result would be void wouldn’t it 
Is pretty much the exact point @MartinSelmayr made to visiting @CommonsEUexit members today #Brexit  
Many companies high and low profile have left or will be leaving these shores because of #brexitIt's not just Nissan.#brexit is damaging to most, if not all UK business.Join with us and try to stop this madness.Call for a #peoplesvote today. 
Not much point though Billy when the leader persists in ignoring the wishes of the democratic majority in the party. If he (they) did, a call for a 2nd referendum would have been made officially in Parliament by now.3 line whip to support the Cooper amendment might have helped. 
"#Brexit itself will be damaging for Scotland. But Brexit without a deal will be catastrophic." -@NicolaSturgeon @ScotGovFM #BrexitDeal 
I profoundly disagree. Here’s a list of Europe’s 10 biggest problems:1. Trump2. Putin3. Le Pen4. AfD5. Lega6. Poland and Hungary7. Brexit8. Demographics9. Italian growth10. German Banking System.  
In 2016, I described the Nissan letter as “a foretaste of the way big business will deal with Brexit Britain. First the threat, then an expensive handshake behind closed doors. Each time, the public will be none the wiser.” 
German anger builds over dangerous handling of Brexit by EU.A report by Ifo Institute & Universities across Germany & EU warned that EU may be deluding itself in thinking that the EU has the upper hand in all respects & that the UK would capitulate. 
If you voted #Remain in 2016 #EURef please indicate below as to how you would vote now if there was a 2nd Referendum 
80% of Tory members oppose delaying Brexit  
And Remainiacs reckon Brexit voters are the extremists...?!?!?!  
Really engaging talk by @NicolaSturgeon speaking on Brexit and Scotland's future @Georgetown - Scotland "wants to be a good global citizen'. @ScotGovAmericas @ScotGovFM 
Tories have run down the clock on Brexit. Chaotic planning has forced them to cancel recess, but there still isn’t enough time to work through necessary legislation. @theresa_may must accept reality & extend Article 50. This could instead give time for people to have a #FinalSay. 
Actually can't stop thinking about fact that we are now at the stage of Brexit where companies are about to stop some global exports, because they take 6 weeks to arrive, and they won't know what Britain's global trading arrangements will be by the time the stuff gets there. 
If you think I'm going to quietly accept anyone depriving me of my right to move about freely in my own fucking continent OFF THE BACK OF A FRAUDULENT REFERENDUM, you can think again! #RevokeArticle50 NOW! 
Watch Biafrans from Delta province mocking Nigeria in a mock #Referendum @Amaka_Ekwo @NkemdiMary @NkirukaNistoran @EmekaGift 
Thanks to all your donations, the placards are back up outside parliament.Last Thursday we had 9 double-sided placards stolen in broad daylight.Brexit really is a crime scene. Thank you very much for all the messages of support  @BBCSimonMcCoy @RemainingKind @BarbaraWant 
I've officially ceased to be amazed/bewildered/surprised/etc. by MPs in government and the official opposition entirely ignoring the EU position. It is a key defining factor of Brexit, and has been from the beginning. It should now be considered a general working assumption.  
This isn’t diesel.Banks and other financial companies have shifted at least £800 billion worth of assets out of the country and into the EU because of Brexit, (EY - tracking public announcement in 222 companies conservative.  Likely conservative) 
If you watched the Brexit episode of BBC's #InsideEurope, don't miss the next two parts (actually first and second in series) on eurozone and migration. Completely riveting and really brings to life how the EU works. 
Leave economist Patrick Minford:“Brexit will help eliminate our car industry” - Leavers cheer!Remainers: “Brexit will eliminate our car industry” - Leavers shout “project fear”Reality: car industry declinesLeavers: “nothing to do with brexit”Its a religion isn’t it?  
In the last 20 years .We've had mass immigration .We've had an expenses scandal with MPs taking the piss.We've had austerity while giving away billions in aid.We've had a referendum on Brexit that MPs are doing their best to ignoreWhy does anyone still vote Tory or Labour 
The BBC is just as dishonest as other state broadcasters. The difference is there no pretence with other state controlled broadcasters but the BBC pretends to be better, superior, objective and trustworthy. In reality it’s just a Brexit propaganda machine. #FBPE #PeoplesVote 
The #BBC is now the Orwellian Ministry of Truth, the most unreliable news source in the Western world. @BBC #Brexit #propaganda 
No deal Brexit would be catastrophic for Britain’s remaining steelmakers - MP  
Brexit Britain is an object lesson in how a modern nation fails:  my piece on #Brexit for @PacificStand 
Power was not won by struggle as the ANC and others in #SouthAfrica claimIn 1992 the majority of whites voted "Yes" in a referendum to voluntarily and peacefully hand over power25 years later we need to ask the question:Why must we Whites give even more?#SelfDetermination 
Well, of course people blame Brexit when that’s what the Remain-dominated media tells them is the reason. It is NOT one of the TWO MAIN REASONS that Nissan itself gave for cancelling those plans. Neither is it the main explanation given by auto industry experts. But hey ho.  
How come this Government has loadsa money to *bribe* the #DUP, #Nissan and all and sundry, but NO MONEY to put into the #NHS, keep Sure Start Centres , youth clubs and libraries open?It's like they couldn't care less ~ innit?  #askingforafriend #bbcpm #brexit #stopbrexit 
Labour members are the largest pro-Remain political movement. Rather that stomping off in a huff, members should be working together to ensure that party policy represents our current views on Brexit.  
Make no mistake, Brexit is not just boring our country, it is crippling it by @Will_DryOFOC of @OFOCBrexit (and #Sodem placards) @RemainingKind 
There are no "extremists" on the Remain side, wanting a Clean referendum is not 'extreme'... Not wanting a clean referendum when Leave had a brief lead when they cheated by £10m (which has been referred to the police and National Crime Agency) is 'extreme' however.  
Who will you vote for in the next General Election if a full Brexit has not been delivered by then?! 
The quickest way to solve this Brexit mess would be to get Paul Ince in as Prime Minister. Or Brucey or Sparky. 
Bastille (@bastilledan) offer taste of new album ‘Doom Days’ with party in the post-Brexit apocalypse bunker  
"The government has failed to lay out clear plans about how it will manage potential scenarios after Brexit, which could see a dramatic decline in the number of EU professionals..EU workers leaving the NHS... interruption in life-saving medical supplies."   
UK factories stockpiling at fastest pace since 80s fearing no deal #Brexit but no sign of PM visiting Brussels as EU will only listen to concrete, workable proposals of which there are no signs. As options crossed off #PeoplesVote is only answer left - now the will of the people! 
Let’s see now....There are two problems with having May & Robbins in charge of our Brexit negotiations.1.  Neither of them believes in or wants Brexit; and 2.  Neither of them can negotiate for toffee.Apart from that they are perfect - if you are an EU negotiator.....  
Just spoke with @MichelBarnier about #Brexit. The Withdrawal Agreement remains the only way to ensure an orderly withdrawal of the UK from the European Union. We continue to urge the UK Government to clarify its intentions with respect to its next steps.  
If you love  the idea of more of these advans hitting the road around the UK holding our Brexit leaders to account, lets make it happen! Visit our crowdfunder and share the link with your friends    Thanks! 
UK ports to wave through EU goods without checks for a year after no-deal #Brexit, HMRC says.Companies will be allowed to retrospectively declare what they brought in and pay the duties later.So that's what taking back control means  
We r gonna tell u how Brexit is going to effect us in 1 hour 
It’s getting chilly outside.. EU maintains cold front on #Brexit deal changes. My thoughts:   
Incredible thing about the Brexit mess is we're not even at the point of conspiracy theory. Key figures are openly and publicly admitting to accepting bribes, pushing racist rhetoric and calling for violent, armed revolution.And it's just being allowed to happen! 
Dialogue @EU27 continues #Brexit. Today in The Hague with @MinPres Mark Rutte: full agreement that Withdrawal Agreement cannot be reopened. Backstop = only operational solution to address Irish border issue today. EU ready to work on alternative solutions during transition. 
Let’s Explain Brexit To Americans:  by me, for @PacificStand #brexit 
Have you SEEN this?@MrHickmott is the place to go to see Brexit Job Losses over the last couple of years.@mrjamesob, you should really take a look... lots of talk about Nissan cos it's a brand name but look why the grassroots jobs that have gone. 
Malthouse group meeting  was 2.5 hours with the Brexit Sec and lots of govt officials - they're due to meet again tomorrow - no decisions on anything yet - but sources suggest feeling was govt is taking idea seriously, but early stages 
To everybody that doubts Nissan's decision was much to do with Brexit, why on earth do you think they were here in the first place?Now think about every other foreign owned manufacturing business in the UK.Oh dear :-/ 
Nissan had plenty of reasons not to make a diesel SUV in Britain. But Brexit certainly didn't help the U.K.'s case  via @bopinion 
‘Lord Trimble to take government to court over Brexit backstop, saying it breaches Good Friday Agreement’ - absolutely his right to do so.  
You can keep your soft Brexit, your red, white & blue Brexit, your hard Brexit & your clean Brexit.There's only 1 Brexit acceptable & that No Brexit!#OnlyWayForward 
It’s not about the backstop . That’s why they now have to say that won’t be enough. They want no deal Brexit despite the inherent disaster that it will be. #StopBrexitBrexiter MPs unmoved by EU hint at legal assurance on backstop 
Lord Heseltine, Antoinette Sandbach and the Duke of Wellington - just some of the names who have received tens of thousands of pounds in EU subsidies over the years.What do they have in common? They all want to stop Brexit... No wonder!  
Do mention the war: the politicians comparing Brexit to WWII  
Common Sense: Any candidate who believes IPOB Boycott of polls will cause him to lose should talk to Mazi Nnamdi Kanu on Referendum. Resorting to recriminations against Kanu won’t cut it. The Igbo vote is not for cherry-picking. Show some respect and brinkmanship.Aloy Ejimakor. 
@LeadNotLeaveUK Poll finds stark generational gap in attitudes towards #Brexit . Nearly three quarters (72%) of 18-34s who expressed an opinion backed  stance of greater national control immigration compared to 38% of 55s and over. 
Met today with the Ulster Farmers Union. Discussed the serious and real concerns of the agricultural and rural sector. Negative Brexit impact is already hitting hard. No deal will be economically catastrophic! #Brexit  
The whole idea of Brexit was to be able to operate freely inside the European Union as if a member, while also disregarding it at our own convenience.That's why it failed, guys. Cos it was stoopit 
Hey Labour MPs how about humiliating Brexit fan Corbyn at the next PMQs by leaving all the benches behind him empty? 
The police just phoned me wanting information about any upcoming anti-Brexit activity. The PLO said he'd been instructed to phone me every week. Deeply unsettling for the police to be breathing down the backs of campaigners like this - who has instructed them to do this? 
Take these young people seriously.  We rate them. Read our #Brexit piece this morning : #GoWTO 
Exactly one year ago today we launched AFB on Twitter, having had  our first meeting a few days before! Since then we've launched a website, Facebook and Instagram page, so that any Brexit supporting arts workers anywhere in the country can get involved.Thanks for your support!  
What a creepy old man And they wonder why they lost the referendum?!  
“Students for Brexit was founded last month by Robert Langley, a young man from a proud working-class northern family, and the organisation has quickly fast-tracked into a major pro-Brexit mouthpiece for students across the country.”- @Facts4euOrg  
Beefeaters are planning to draw the Tower of London ravens into their campaign against pension cuts. When the ravens are released from the Tower, legend says the Kingdom will fall.   Relief from Brexit could come sooner than expected. 
French President Emmanuel Macron is likely to call a referendum in May as part of his response to the Yellow Jacket protests  
Over 208,000 jobs already gone as a result of Brexit and every single one of the callers (bar one) said they'd be prepared to lose their job so long as they get their Brexit.Go figure! 
Does taking back control of our borders mean no control at any of our borders? What kind of #Brexit weird control is that? #Remain 
So EU policy on Diesel cars is to blame for Nissan not creating thousands of jobs in the UK.The people of Sunderland were correct to vote leave.All the remoaners that blamed Brexit when the news was leaked have gone extremely quiet.@telegraph 
Stop saying Merkel "hints" things about Brexit! She always turns out to have meant what she said, no more, and not what she allegedly hinted.  
This is my new favourite bonkers Brexit scare story...!Bus services will 'grind to a complete halt' after Brexit 
This is one of the guys who brought the Good Friday Agreement about, and he wants the backstop removed!Lord Trimble to take government to court over Brexit backstop  
"Unbelievably the Conservative Party is leading a conscious process, diminishing the stature of this country on the world stage"I spoke to Michael Heseltine about Brexit and the Tory record on Europe. Is the party now trashing its own legacy?  
Fury as @BBC refuses to sack @GaryLineker over anti-Brexit rants  
Hilarious...Brexit 'taking back control' and securing our borders means no control at all. I'm sure all the Leave voters will be thrilled with this outcome. Brexit would be a joke if it wasn't going to cause so much suffering.  
Today customer refused to buy beer from us because of our anti-Brexit stance. This country has really been ripped in two  
A reminder:NOT IMPORTANTBrexit catastrofuck threatening jobs and food and medicine shortagesHomeless dying in the streetPeople dying on trolleys in A&ENHS/social care/schools/prisons in meltdownSoaring crimeIMPORTANTLabour member liked a dick pic 
When @IanBlackfordMP said the Brexit deal breached the Good Friday Agreement, Theresa May called him "frankly irresponsible".Will she say the same about Trimble?  
Tomorrow is Chinese New Year. How appropriate in Brexit year that we celebrate the year of the pig  
Hard Brexiteer Tories openly arguing with deal-supporting Tories in the tearoom just now. None of them actually care who overhears. Next vote on #Brexit deal on Valentine’s Day. I’m sure love will be in the air by then.... 
UK’s finance chiefs say Brexit is biggest risk to business.Ha! What do they know when there are genius like Fox, Davies, Kawczynski, Fyshe, Rees-Mogg, Dorries & B Johnson “Fuck Business” types who purport to know better?  via @financialtimes 
Lord Trimble has announced he plans to take the Government to court to "ensure the protocol" of the Irish border backstop agreed in Prime Minister Theresa May's Brexit deal is removed 
NEW Lord Trimble says he is leading a legal action against the Government over the 'backstop', claiming that it breaches the terms of the Good Friday Agreement. Legal action would 'ensure that the Protocol is removed from the Withdrawal Agreement'. #Brexit 
And yet no one is remotely bothered about taking legal action about 's illegal acivities before the referendum 
The entire country knows the EU policy on diesel cars is the direct cause of falling sales across the UK and Europe. But @SkyNews blatently lies by repeatedly saying low sales of diesel cars are caused by BREXIT. 
Quexit? Britain has a Brexit emergency evacuation plan for the queen  
In the event of a no-deal Brexit, UK businesses will have to recertify all the products they sell into the EU ("CE" mark) after 29 March if the conformity assessments were carried out in the UK, unless they transfer the certifications before Brexit Day. 
The older generation cannot simply keep saying to the younger generation: 'Your views on Brexit do not count. Your future does not matter to us. We don't care how bad things are going to be for you.'  
Straight-talking honest politics? @SKZcartoons on Labour's Brexit fudge.  
We need a left-wing Labour Party, which is unequivocally pro-Remain. We don’t need a new centre party, I don’t want to be in a party with Tories and LDs who voted for austerity policies. Just a party that opposes Brexit. Pro-Brexit Labour members are the ones who should leave. 
How did the UK come to this?WWII - bankruptMarshall plan - misspent, soEnd Empire - not enough, soNorth Sea Oil - misspent, soJoin EEC - not enough, soCrush Unions - not enough, soBig Bang (Financial Services) - misspent, soRussian money - EU clamps down, soBrexit. 
Stella basically wants a panel of Guardianistas to decide Brexit because her and her colleagues are too inept to sort Brexit out themselvesWhat an embarrassing admission of your own uselessness and cowardly ploy to overturn the referendum  
Just when you thought it couldn't get any more fraught - Lord Trimble plans to take govt to court over the Brexit deal claiming the Irish protocol inc the backstop contravenes the Good Friday agreement 
Any delay to the Brexit process would be met with fierce opposition among grassroots Conservatives - a staggering 83% want the government to just get on with it! RT if you agree! #NoDelay #LetsGoWTO #NoDealNoProblem Support us at  
After Nissan confirms their latest car will be now made in Japan, the government unveils prototype of new British-made, post-Brexit people carrier.  
In other words, Nissan foresees that Brexit will cause the company > £80 million of damage. And that's just ONE company (albeit a large one)! 
LEAVE: 80% of Tory members oppose delaying Brexit. Government have promised Brexit on 29th March. Must now deliver! 
Why isn't Ireland in breach of the Belfast Agreement by withholding cooperation on management of the border post-Brexit - its current stance? 
Marlowe was diagnosed with coarctation of aorta when he was five days old. He had undergone three heart surgeries at GOSH.  Today he is now a healthy little boy. 'We owe the NHS everything... but we can't lose the NHS to this Brexit mess' - Marlowe's mum, Juliet  
 WATCH: @CMonaghanSNP questions the UK Government for failing to commit to #Erasmus funding in 2019/2020 in case of a no-deal Brexit."Unlike the government, these young people are currently trying to plan what they're doing next year".  
As Mayor, @SadiqKhan has chosen to spend an extra £19 MILLION on City Hall staff, instead of police officers. The London Mayor needs to focus on what he's responsible for and use his budget to tackle crime, not Brexit:  
It is time to call out time-wasting Brexit delusions and acknowledge broken promises on trade | @ChukaUmunna 
I’m one of those who cancelled membership due to Corbyn’s Brexit stance or lack of it.. 
Mate.  If you do not support me on Brexit then why the hell should I support you?It isn’t even as if your GE2017 manifesto did the most for the poor.On your bike. 
BREXIT WARNING: Rees-Mogg's ERG to DESTROY May’s deal - ‘We're going back to SQUARE ONE!’  
Letters: Inadequate history lessons in schools have influenced Brexit  
Don't think tweets by Martin - for you the negotiation is over - Selmayr of the EU Commission are going to help in finding a Brexit  resolution. Will the more sensible member states who pay his wages take his phone away? 
Latest @LabourList poll: 78.5% of @UKLabour members want a special conference or an online poll to set Brexit strategy.Labour members are pro public vote, pro Remain, and pro party democracy.As the Tories continue to fail it's time for Labour to lead. 
The government has been left deeply embarrassed after their letter to Nissan was published in the aftermath of the X-Trail saga. Among the revelations were an £80m 'bribe' and promises to make carmakers a critical priority in the Brexit negotiations.  
No checks on people in lorries etc? Piracy? Counterfeit goods? Drugs? Brexit is insane. 
UK ports to wave through EU goods without checks after no-deal Brexit, HMRC says  
Disingenuous from @MartinSelmayr: opinions of the 20-odd Brexit Select Committee MPs this morning might have been “inconclusive” but the opinions of the whole of the House of Commons last week were clear: the Withdrawal Agreement will pass if the Backstop is fixed @HenryNewman 
I went back home to tell my nana about my fight with the biased Electoral Commission, she was amazed when I told her that, thanks to over 2,000 of you, I'm now able to take them to court!Anything you can give will help me fight this anti-Brexit bias ↓ 
Fuck you @Conservatives for your BrexitAnd fuck you @UKLabour for instead of opposing Tory Brexit you chose to complete with it instead with your almost as bad Labour Lexit pic.twitter.com/5I2b1bfSta 
Germany's Merkel drops hint of a 'creative' Brexit compromise  
The majority of Hilary Benn's Brexit Committee voted for the Cooper amendment and DIDN'T vote for the Brady amendment.That's the complete OPPOSITE of how Parliament voted! They should not be in Brussels pretending they represent Parliament's view. 
Today's Tories would give a shout out to  the brown shirts of 1937 Germany if they thought it would solidify support for  their Brexit stance.  #TurningPointUK 
Amazing footage of people moaning about metrication. 40 years ago. "We used to rule the world...why are they foisting kilometers on us." A useful reminder that Brexit has not unleashed new demons. People have always complained about the modern world...  
Good to see some in the public eye - whatever their political view - understand that having another referendum before implementing the result of the first one is NOT democratic, it is anti-democratic!  Support us at  
Today steel MPs met with steel companies to discuss impact of a no deal brexit. Very harrowing picture which brought back the horrors we had to face in Redcar in 2015. Reckless for Theresa May to have kept no deal on the table  
With just 2 months until Brexit, we can't afford to sit back and allow the continued spread of misinformation. Last week, @GreenJeanMEP set out to counter some common Brexit misunderstandings with #FiveBrexitTruths... *** Truth 1: 'No deal' does not mean 'no change' *** 1/5 
Every time the UK adds to its Brexit humiliation  
53 days to go until #Brexit - not sure what alternative arrangements can be invented & tested between now and then to replace the vitally important #backstop that protects the #GFA 
Unaccountable to the EU electorate. Unelected. Unbelievably distant. Unresponsive. The power that rules the European Union, a bloc that the vast majority of MPs voted for the UK to remain inside and who seek now to thwart Brexit success. 
So Britain is apparently preparing for martial law as Brexit approaches.If only anybody had warned them this was a bad idea before they votes for it...  
"Brexit offers us a fantastic opportunity - so let's get on with what the British people voted for and embrace it." UKIP Deputy Chairman -@MargotLJParker  #WTOBrexitNOW #LetsGoWTO 
Those Remainers crying buckets because their children will not be able to work in Europe because of Brexit, pause for a moment and look at the unemployment figures for young people across Europe. You can now resume your crying.  
In pursuit of its 330 year old balance of power strategy, Britain only succeeded by alliances. The only time it failed was the American war of independence when it stood alone. Brexit is the abdication of this long standing foreign policy strategy. 
Liam Fox: suggests MPs who block Brexit ‘deserve to be punished’ at the ballot box 
The fact that extremists on both sides of the Brexit debate, (think we need to start calling them that now), won't really countenance any deal in any circumstances doesn't mean a majority of MPs won't. If May can get a genuine Backstop concession I suspect that will be enough. 
Get behind a public inquiry into the EU Referendum 
Referendum of 1961 made Atiku Nigerian citizen – Nnamdi KanuLeader of the Indigenous People of Biafra (IPOB), Nnamdi Kanu has reiterated his earlier comment that Peoples Democratic Party (PDP)...  
Dozens of Brexit-blocking peers and MPs have received millions from EU  via @MailOnline 
3/3 The Labour Party have nothing to show for their coalition with the Tories except Brexit.Great job Labour!Ooh, check me out being all controversial for a change! 
Turning Point UK has links with several right-wing and "alternative" media sites and YouTube channels, including Westmonster, Politics UK, Breitbart, InfoWars and Brexit Central, so expect a lot of chat from them over the coming weeks 
1/3 Labour have been more complicit with the Tories over Brexit than even the LibDems were in coalition! 
Did the Scottish stay at home to vote on their referendum on leaving the United Kingdom?Anyway, you can't reason why IPOB members. You can not. 
IF there is a General Election and Labour's Brexit policy is:negotiate a soft Brexit with the EUto be put to a #FinalSay referendum with #Remain on the ballotI would be happy with this... and suspect it would be a big vote winner 
Brexit is entirely based on corruption. There are no aspects of it that are remotely legitimate. If there was, it would be an accident. It's all lies, bribes, deceit, tax evasion and robbing the poor of their money, rights and freedoms. Isn't it blindingly obvious by now?  
Lots of focus on the backstop.  But there lots of major flaws with the PMs deal - fails to reset our relationship with the EU, which is what the Brexit vote called for. If the deal passes, post 29th Mar, we will have the same arguments but from a significantly weakened psn. 
Simon Coveney's latest comments underscore political tensions of PM going back on Brexit deal."What Ireland is being asked to do by some in Westminster is to do away with an agreed solution between the UK government and EU negotiators and to replace it with wishful thinking." 
RT #ForBritainBrexit is only the beginningLINKS:Donate here Join For Britain Read our manifesto here Twitter  
People wanted a Brexit that'd mean more control. But we've got a deal that takes us out of the most powerful decision-making bodies in the world but we'd still follow their rules.If 52% voted Brexit when we were told we'd get a good deal, how many would've voted for No Deal? 
Those duped by the absurd @sarahwollaston, no doubt trusting that she would honour the manifesto she was elected on, to honour the result of the referendum & deliver Brexit, should be looking into deselecting her at the earliest opportunity.  
Government letter to Nissan reveals Brexit promise to carmarkers  
Let's face it.The type of Brexit that most of the 52% wanted when they ticked 'Leave' just isn't on the table. That's why Parliament is in utter chaos scrambling for a way out.So we're taking over Parliament to give them one!#ParliamentTakeover 20 Feb. 
With recent news that UK taxpayers will be funding a new @BBCNewsPR broadcast centre in the EU post Brexit I've just been asked to film a short Brexit show with with fine folk over at TVforEU.Website here... 
BBC managed to find a Unite Union representative who says that Nissan news is nothing to do with Brexit. A script obviously agreed by McCluskey and Corbyn.Amazing the BBC doing everything to try to water down the comments by Nissan. Dishonest broadcasting. #FBPE #PeoplesVote 
Wonder if they have ever considered inviting Professor Michael Dougan from @LiverpoolUni ...but I guess not...on #Brexit he has the mind the size of a Planet which might undermine the editorial stance & lead to calls to #RevokeA50 & #Remain in Control 
Brexit bombshell: EU chief says no to bailing out May  
Government letter to Nissan reveals Brexit promise to carmarkers  
Imagine if AOC backed the Trump’s wall. That’s how we feel about Corbyn’s Brexit stance. 
The Renault engine fitted in the Nissan X trail did NOT pass EUs emissions and they said it would take over three year to do so ...written here from EUs press office ..Nothing to do with brexit  
Tourism will be destroyed by a no deal Brexit. We're not sure why, since we have agreed planes can fly an people can have visa free travel. But it will be destroyed, I tell you.  
What is the point of this story - a referendum, or plebiscite, is not, and has never been, in all of human history, something that a "Supreme Leader" just declares three weeks to date. It takes planning, help, and multilateral support. Is there any evidence of all this? 
Emmanuel Endeley, the leader of the Southern Cameroons, wanted to remain with Nigeria, but when he lost to John Foncha in 1959, Foncha asked @UN to organise a referendum on if Southern Cameroons would join Cameroon, or remain with Nigeria. Independence was not one of the options. 
The last referendum held in the area around what is now Nigeria, was in 1961. The call for that particular referendum started in 1953 after Zik displaced Eyo Ita in the Eastern Nigerian Parliament made the Eastern minorities unhappy. 
Liam Fox has spent £220k, travelling 16 times round the globe on the promise of up to 40 new trade deals to be signed by the end of March. So far nothing, nil, zilch, nada, diddly squat. Still I hope he really found himself whilst travelling...to be a Brexit idiot that is. 
Want to see what a supermarket looks like after 1 weekend - just 1 - without any deliveries?  Floods to the south have cut the roads to my Queensland town so no trucks (lorries) since Friday.  Here's the result on Monday @RemainiacsCast #brexit  
Last week, the @TrussellTrust warned that any form of Brexit would increase poverty in Britain. Now a new report reveals it could plunge 1.7 million people around the world into extreme poverty too.Just another reason we need to change course.  
Dozens of Brexit-blocking peers and MPs have received millions from EU  via @MailOnline 
Erm, @Arron_banks if you're not going to wave to us from the window, perhaps you could explain how you went from supporting the ‘Norway option’ on #Brexit, to wanting to burn everything down with 'no deal'?  
Cab Sec @Feorlean met with @OrkneyCouncil this morning to discuss the impact of Brexit on:FishingFarmingTourismEU NationalsFood + Drink  
WATCH: @joswinson: We have to ask people if this is the #Brexit they actually want or if they would like to keep the deal that we have.A #PeoplesVote is the #OnlyWayForward:  
Companies in the United Kingdom are spending less and scaling back plans because of Brexit fears  
When Nissan said they would build the X-Trail here, this is what the government had promised them in 2016.No Deal Brexit does not fulfil that promise.Even the deal doesn't guarantee it long-term. 
Within hours of the conclusion of the Brexit “negotiation” Weyand was boasting about the backstop telling her cronies that “the EU retained all the controls”.  The EUs’ lies & scheming over Ireland has been a disgrace - like the collusive capitulation of May to the whole nonsense  
Anyone seen a good Brexit scare story today? It's almost as if the remain campaign have given up. Terrible. 
Just signed the petition to de select @YvetteCooperMP Cooper We MUST adopt zero tolerance to arrogant Hardline Remain MP's who obfuscate to thwart Brexit and SUBVERT DEMOCRACY  via @UKChange 
@Margaret_Curran on Sunday politics Scotland... There shouldn't be another Scottish Independence Referendum & Scots wouldn't forgive the SNP. On Brexit, im moving towards a "People's Vote" (Second Referendum).How do these Hypocrites get a job in politics?#RedTory 
I can't believe I'm having to write this but, as @jeremycorbyn and the @UKLabour party seem to be ignoring us - No version of #Brexit will be acceptable to young people in this country, many of whom voted for Corbyn's policies, and you're leaving us behind. #RevokeArticle50 
Not sure the Brexit committee is really reflective of parliament as a whole. It reflects the two extreme wings of the debate with a inbuilt majority for remain. And happily and wilfully undermines UK’s negotiaiton hand with these pointless meetings.  
Sinn Féin Deputy Leader @moneillsf and @ChrisHazzardSF met with British shadow Brexit secretary Keir Starmer MP to tell him that the backstop remains the bottom line in protecting the Good Friday Agreement and ensuring there is no return to a hard border.  
An unfunded promise to Nissan, which Nissan has wisely decided to ignore now it has seen what Brexit means. The British people must also be allowed to deliver their verdict on Brexit #PeoplesVote 
“All the polls show that Leave voters want an FTA or No Deal. Remainers want a second referendum or to reverse Brexit. Compromises like Norway and May’s deal are the least popular options.”Britain’s leading pollster John Curtice on the Brexit divide 
Government Confirm Intention To Use Brexit As Excuse For Everything  
Dear JonHave you not noticed that you and your media friends have just watched for over 2 years - whilst £millions of our money have been spent on this Brexit chaos - which has ONLY ever been an internal Conservative Party "spat"?  
So Charles Moore has written a piece for the Telegraph saying the Tory Rebels (Grieve et al) should be deselected for trying to ‘overturn Brexit,’ while in the same piece condemning Labour for ideological tyranny.The Brexit cognitive dissonance is real.   
Nicola Sturgeon said that this was a critical time for the country and suggested we are heading for disaster with Brexit. She said she is ready to engage with the PM on the way ahead. No surprise she's off on a jolly to the USA and Canada to talk about Independence for 5 days. 
Latest @YouGov Brexit tracker "Brexit: right or wrong?" survey results now out (in the field on 30-31 January).  "Wrong" consistently 7-8 points ahead now.  E.g., here's the trend  
Alternative arrangements to the #backstop were explored for more than a year but "none of those ideas... have actually stood up to scrutiny" - Irish Deputy PM @simoncoveney. #brexit  
Theresa May claimed she would govern for the left behind. Now she says she has the cash to help but will withhold it if Labour MPs don't back her #Brexit deal. This isn't to do with ideological purity but not collaborating with a morally bankrupt Tory gov & perpetuating austerity  
IF YOU WANT BREXIT THEN RETWEET AND LIKE AS MUCH AS POSSIBLE!!! 
Lord Patten compares a 2nd referendum to a snake bite... as an antidote you need more snake poison in the serum... so maybe the only way we can get out of this mess is with an other referendum.#peoplesvote #FinalSay pic.twitter.com/D9H3sOVy51 
Ouch! #Brexit  
Why Single Market & Customs Union is so important to small businesses:Just had pallet of stock delivered direct from Germany.No paperwork & no customs processes/costs - I simply ordered it last week & here it is today.#Brexit ends that & my business will suffer @AlunCairns 
Christ Heydon,Your point is what? That this country abided by a previous referendum and therefore we should also respect this one? Or we shouldn’t have abided by the 1975 one? Can you add the FBPE moniker to your account so we can save time and recognise fucktardery early doors. 
you remember *that* controversial letter from ministers to Nissan which helped persuade them to keep investing in Brexit Britain? the FT's @Petercampbell1 can reveal what's in it 
If your line is "layoffs aren't about Brexit, there's just a really challenging economy right now", maybe sit and think whether that actually supports your argument that the UK should give itself a big economic shock right now. 
Met a lovely couple from Northern Ireland whilst we were away on holiday. Conversation got round to #Brexit. They are very frightened of the consequences of a hard brexit as it would inevitably bring back the troubles. Very angry that most UK politicians don't care or understand. 
“If we can’t get any deal, we have to leave without a deal” Jacob Rees-Mogg says those trying to delay Brexit are actually trying to stop Brexit altogether @Jacob_Rees_Mogg | #RingReesMogg 
Today I'm starting part-time as chair of @the3million's Young Europeans group, after many great months of  #citizensrights campaigning.My priorities: protecting our rights regardless of the Brexit outcome & bringing more young Europeans' voices to the table.My DMs are open.  
No. But it has little or nothing to do with Brexit, despite the spin. It’s about diesel engines, the car market and the EU/Japan FTA, which makes production in Japan more attractive for Nissan.  
“Ireland should have the same rights as the outermost regions, especially given that after Brexit the closest Member State to Ireland will be France, which is over 1000km away.  We should have greater or full control of our 200 nautical mile zone.” 
Dear Heydon,The EU didn't exist in 1975. The EU has been built on the back of successive transformative treaties which UK Governments signed without asking the public to ratify them. Brexit is the resulting storm which has been decades in the making.  
The EU Commission's political game continues - stonewalling to give as much ammunition as possible to MPs trying to block Brexit or force a 2nd referendum. But if Parliament decisively rejects those options (again) next week, they will have to start making serious choices...  
If Nissan's decision was about Brexit then they would have re-located to the EU. They did not. Because this is about the decline of the diesel SUV in Europe, in part thanks to new stringent EU anti-emission laws, not Brexit.  
EXCLUSIVEThe FT has obtained the l government's 2016 Brexit letter to Nissan.Here's what it says:  
Rival Conservative MPs negotiating Brexit between themselves in the Cabinet Office with less than two months to go is a fitting symbol of a chaotic disaster 
EU = Greater German Reich.It didn't take a War. It was all done so peacefully by the stroke of a pen. Subjugation by consent.Brexit is going to change all that. 
My 82 year old mum last year:"I like Corbyn, he cares about normal people."My 82 year old mum last night:"Corbyn's an idiot. He's useless."My mum's voted Labour all her life.She wants a new leader.She came to the decision on her own as Brexit's something we "don't discuss" 
Loving the Nissan worker who voted Leave to teach the country a lesson but has an EU passport so once Brexit shuts Nissan down (and he thinks it will) he’s off to work in EU27. His mates will be stuffed. He’s not bothered.Mic drop...forever. 
Cognitive dissonance is the Conservative party proclaiming they wish for peace in Ireland and that as a party, they respect the will of the people. While 53 days before Brexit establishing a Working Group to override the voice and clear message, of the North and South of Ireland. 
When you're privileged and moneyed, why should you care about the millions of British citizens struggling and in despair after 9 years of Tory austerity? Brexit didn't cause this damage. Never mind, you carry on just like Mary Fisher in her high tower by the edge of the sea... 
This is absolutely damning. Daniel Kawczynski and Rees-Mogg calling for the "EU concept to be consigned to the ash heap if history. This would impoverish Europe, increase the risk of war and benefit only Putin and vulture capitalists. They are traitors. #PeoplesVote #Brexit  
The House of Commons has stated that it requires either the Irish backstop to be dropped or to have legally binding restrictions. The EU knows what it needs to offer if it wants a #Brexit deal. If the EU refuses to move on this issue it is clear that the EU doesn’t want a deal. 
SCARY reports about this new drug 'Brexit' which is sweeping the upper classes It makes you feel in control and capable of anything, side effects are said to include 'shouting a lot' and becoming delusional Plus it has a terrible comedown when reality kicks in - please avoid  
Brexit could put 1.7 million people around globe into extreme poverty – study  
BREXITEERS may have to back May’s deal or risk a 2nd referendum, JRM warned.JRM admitted that supporting PM could be the only way to ensure Brexit actually happens.So they fear peoples vote because they know Remain would win. So much for democracy! 
Rats, super-gonorrhea, martial law. How long before Brexit causes Godzilla’s return?  
Cash for votes - the very antithesis of democracy. And they lecture us on 'respecting' the referendum? (Also criminally procured with illegal slush funds) 
There is no reason at all today's invisible Irish border coping with differing taxes/duties can't now handle minor post-Brexit differences in trading standards.This eminently solvable problem is being exploited by an increasingly irate anti-Brexit lobby 
To run a country you need a leader, a majority and a message. The Tories have none of these. This paragraph by Stephen Bush says it all.Whether May delivers a Deal or No Deal is unclear. That she'll be gone soon after 29th March (or delayed Brexit) is far clearer. #ToriesOut 
Presumably business uncertainty will be improved by a 6-9 month delay to get through new second referendum legislation which your newspaper is now advocating?  
This popped up in my messages about 30 seconds after a caller to @BBCTalkback called me Yoda (not completely sure why he called me that). Tell the truth on Brexit and the economy I will!  (Thanks @SeamasBelfast , might use it for my next election poster ) 
Today’s @News_Letter column: the GFA was undermined long before Brexit—and many people were happy to turn a blind eye.  
The EU's and Irish government's concerns over the Irish border - and their insistence on an arrangement that doesn't deliver what people voted for - are not driven by practical considerations, but by anti-Brexit ideology.  
Theresa May’s Conservatives are making a mess out of Brexit – it's become a national embarrassment. @JoSwinson: “We have to go back to the people to ask them if this is the Brexit they actually want”  #PoliticsLive 
Evacuating the queen? Really? Is there any depths to which this nonsense won't stoop? Just laughable and embarrassing. #brexit 
QUEEN TO BE EVACUATED IN CASE OF BREXIT UNREST @Reuters#BritainFirst "British officials revived Cold War emergency plans to relocate the Royal Family should there be riots in London if Britain suffers a disruptive departure from the EU next month." 
I think we all know who is “fundamentally dishonest” @Jacob_Rees_Mogg 
I'm from a council estate in Barnsley and would vote for JRM. I'd rather have Mogg's brains than Corbyn's dangerous idealism. I despise Corbyn for his stance on the Armed Forces, terrorists, Jews etc. At least you know where Mogg sits on brexit, unlike Corbyn on his fence.  
With the X-Trail, a major factor was the new EU-Japan Free Trade deal, which a post-Brexit UK won't benefit from. So Nissan chose to build it in Japan, not Europe in general, but by the same logic, a UK OUTSIDE the EU-Japan deal would be even less attractive for other investment.  
There were non-Brexit factors involved in the decision not to build the Nissan X-Trail in Sunderland. That's why the conversation is so messy, so let's just look at the Brexit effect for now. Thanks @SkyNews 
This man became one of James O'Brien's favourite callers - the Production Line Manager at Nissan who voted for Brexit.@mrjamesob | #Nissan 
He would say that, wouldn’t he.....Jacob Rees-Mogg calls billboard featuring his quote on a second referendum 'fundamentally dishonest' | indy100  
i hate brexit because it’ll make us poorer so i’ll let the tories in and make us poorer**not me though. i’m very well off and well insulated from the negative repercussions of my actions  
Vince, Vince, Vince,This isn’t just a problem with no-deal Brexit.We all know this is a problem with ANY Brexit.56% of the public and growing know it and want to #Remain. Millions of votes are there to be won. Stop the fudges and start campaigning hard to #StopBrexit. 
It's not just food & medicine we need to stockpileMy contact lenses come from Ireland and hair colour from Germany.#Brexit is quite the most stupid thing that any country has ever tried to inflict on itself.We need a #PeoplesVote to stop it. 
Watching #politicslive and they are all ignoring the elephant in the room. The referendum was corrupted with lies funded by foreign powers and illegal actions by the Leave group. It has to be rerun. I can’t have any respect for anyone who respects this travesty. 
It would not surprise me to see vast numbers of Ministers resigning as the final weeks of Brexit play out, under flimsiest of pretexts. Then they can blame the new guy (or gal) for all the problems. "Fire's nothing to do with me, guv - the house was barely smoking when I left." 
The British MSM are an outlet for right-wing propaganda & a bastion for deceit Nothing but lies & misdirecting political soundbites Brexit will be here soon & the public remain largely ignorant about the facts & what it entails They must be accountable#RevokeArticle50 
I believe people vote for @UKLabour to protect:JobsWorkers RightsWomen's RightsThe most vulnerable in societyInvestment in disadvantaged communitiesNational Security & so much moreBUT - All these are threatened with ANY Brexit. Labour voters & members, demand #StopBrexit 
Pretty much what I’m hearing in #Brussels today. But for so long as the priority of ⁦@theresa_may⁩ is to placate the Tory party then the interests of the people & nations of the UK will be subordinated #Brexit #MalthouseCompromise 
“Watching a group of old men who can’t operate a smart phone talking about a technology that does not exist” Lib Dem @joswinson on how a young person described watching MPs talking Brexit and plan for NI border #politicslive  
A Humument sorts out Brexit#AHumumentNewPage 
Thanks @theJeremyVine for reading out my comment on #Brexit & Nissan:When will people wake up to the fact that what was flippantly called Project Fear is now Project Reality? Nissan's decision is purely commercial & will be the first of many manufacturers who will quit the UK 
 If Labour choose to be the midwives of Brexit, they’d be betraying the interests of Scotland, enabling a hard-right Tory agenda, and will be culpable for every job lost as a result.  
“We have spent 2 years negotiating the Backstop with the UK. It ensures we never return to a hard border on this island and the we protect the peace process”. Peter Sheridan of Cooperation Ireland shows @ministerBlok just how invisible the border is #Brexit  
The Government have lost the plot.Less than 2 months away from crashing out of the EU, with a No Deal #Brexit , this week Parliament will spend the largest amount of time on General Debates, including on the subject of beer tax and pubs.Taking the piss! 
No one thinks Venezuela is flawless. The left just know that forced regime change will make everything worse. Corbyn isn't antisemitic and questioning accusations of antisemitism isn't antisemitic. Labour has a Brexit policy. It's in the manifesto. Sorry if you don't like it. 
Here's the extremely dodgy #Brexit enthusiast & falsifier of history Daniel Kawczynski & chums on Westminster Russia Forum, heaping praise on RT (Russia Today) & eagerly anticipating "business opportunities" in Putin's Eurasian Economic Union  
Hidden in this @LabourList popularity poll of over 5000 Party members:- 78.5% want fresh member consultation on Brexit- 72% say Lab MPs who voted against or abstained on Cooper amendment should resign or be disciplined Members not happy @jeremycorbyn 
Boris Johnson dismisses snap election talk as 'scare tactic' to win support for May's Brexit deal 
At the border with Dutch Minister for Foreign Affairs @ministerBlok - Thanks to the Netherlands for their continued support in the #Brexit process.  
Watching #politicslive it’s like Jeremy Kyle for the ruling classes  No wonder Brexit is such a disaster 
"Brits have been sold out from the start. In June 2016 following the Brexit vote, our politicians should have been preparing every day for Brexit & putting major reforms in place.Instead,MP’s failed to make even basic changes or preparations & shamefully tried to sabotage Brexit"  
Boy, the Brexit Festival documentary on Netflix is gonna be LIT 
#PoliticsLive Got 2 Remoaner bores on today For Brexit bashing & Project Fear. Jo Swinson & Stella Creasy. Both get it through your thick skulls 17.4 million voted leave the EU. Stop trying to derail Brexit all the time BORING. Didn’t work 2016 Referendum won’t work now. OK.  
Imagine 9 Flemish MPs (innocent until proven guilty) transferred from Flemish to prisons in Wallonia for a trial about a referendum. Then imagine the leader of the opposition saying they should never be returned to Flemish jails - BEFORE there’s even a guilty verdict. Imagine it.  
A Downing Street spokesman says Prime Minister Theresa May will visit Northern Ireland to deliver a speech on Brexit and meet local businesses 
Hilarious!! Radio4 on brexit has just said 'Sadly when we thought the EU would be trade-motivated it turned out they were more about principles"!Damn! I hate it when principles get in the way, don't you?! 
BREAKING NEWS. New wonder drug Brexit cleared for use by the NHS. Cures everything, apparently. Costs and side-effects unknown. No proper trials or evaluation, but those selling it are very enthusiastic and have myriad vested interests. What could possibly go wrong? 
The “OMG they cancelled Brexit” riot would last about fifteen minutes and consist of forty three gammon men in yellow trousers getting kicked out of a Little Chef. 
Good to see @ministerBlok on the border today with @HMcEntee.  Great to have the continued support and interest of #Netherlands on #Brexit challenges.  
Declining investment in the U.K.’s car industry is due to diesel scandal, regulatory changes and global market stagnation. But Brexit-related uncertainty doesn’t help so I hope you’ll abandon attempts to frustrate or delay Brexit David and accept the will of the British people.  
Back Theresa May's deal or risk delaying Brexit, Tory MPs told.A bad deal is better than no-deal, but it's still a bad deal.We have a good deal, so let's have no Brexit.  
Tory MP claims Britain got no Marshall Aid cash after WW2 & Defence Secretary's has "Dunkirk" plan for getting medical supplies post Brexit. What's behind "roll out the barrel" politics - are we being softened up for a D-Day General Election in June?  
Andy West is adamant Brexit isn't going to happen and went on to say he's "sympathetic" to Jamelia's view that older people shouldn't be allowed to vote.@AndyWestTV | @TheJeremyVine | @DawnNeesom | #jeremyvine 
Many Lords & MPs have received millions in EU subsidies for their estates. All staunch Brexit Blockers. Duke of Wellington was handed £91k for his 7,000 acre estate.Lord Haskins, 82k, for his farmlands.Tory MP Antoinette Sandbach 23k for family farm. Lord Heseltine 90k. Nice, eh?  
One of the strangest things about a no deal Brexit is the speed of the verdict it will deliver on our political classes. Normally it takes months or years for the full horror of a bad policy to sink in. But under no deal, the impact should be clear within 24 hours of leaving. 
I don't know about you, but if we have to have riots, I'd rather have the 'OMG they cancelled Brexit' riot than the 'There's nothing to eat' riot, the 'the banks have closed' root, the 'they abolished the NHS' riot and the 'they shot rioters' riot. 
UCL President: "Unless we negotiate an association agreement for science and innovation - despite a no-deal Brexit - British researchers could be excluded from the entire seven-year Horizon Europe scientific research initiative, due to start in 2021." 
"We can use the remaining time to perhaps remove all the obstacles that  have so far stood in the way and find an agreement - if everybody is willing." Chancellor Merkel this morning said that 'with creativity' Northern Ireland solution might be possible.  #Brexit  
UKIP Leader @GerardBattenMEP welcomes @vincecable’s new anti-Brexit party”A new party will dilute the anti-Brexit vote, and as such, I welcome the addition of yet another establishment party deaf to the will of the people.”IN FULL:  
Theresa May visiting the North tomorrow and the border area to make a speech about Brexit. Well Theresa, we've already made it quite clear, you will not be imposing a British hard border in Ireland. Your visit is nothing more than a publicity stunt. Not welcome! #Brexit #Think32 
Nicola Sturgeon plans telling her audience in the states and Canada that Scotland is being ignored by the UK Gov over Brexit.Let's hope it registers with our Atlantic cousins. We have already had support from the Irish this week about being ignored. We have been ignored 300 years 
Two million young people have turned 18 since 2016 - and if #Brexit goes ahead they'll have to deal with the consequences for the rest of their lives.Please sign and share the petition to help deliver a #PeoplesVote and give young people a voice 
Isn’t it weird living through a slow motion coup like Brexit. It’s like one of those nightmares where can never get your limbs to work or the controls just refuse to work. This isn’t supposed to happening but it is. 
Delighted that @markdiffley1 is the head of polling and research for @progressscot. His experience as the pollster for the UK government in the run-up to the 2014 independence referendum will be invaluable. More info available here:  #ProgressScotland 
1. 70 jobs are not lost. They never existed.2. With Khan and co taxing the nuts out of diesel cars, who's going to buy them?3. Nissan blame #Brexit a little. Nissan want UK to #Remain.Buckle up, the anti Brexit propaganda machine is in full swing. 
RT #BattleforBritain Ever since the UK joined the EU the country has declined on the world stage, had our resources drained & lost control of our courts, laws, borders & money. Brexit is our chance to reverse this damage & rebuild the country  
Today delegations of @COPACOGECA @FoodDrinkEU @celcaa meet with EU's #Brexit negotiator @MichelBarnier to discuss all the possible scenarios and necessary preparations for the agri-food sector. 
We are a group of @Conservatives who are very worried that #brexit is now threatening our political system and culture, as well as our economy, and we want to see a return of courtesy and respect for different views in political debate. Please contact us if you feel the same. 
UK Government advisory shows what a post Brexit holiday will be like. #DissolveTheUnion 
Gary never told you that the FM was speaking at Women World Leaders Week. Why would your own @BBCScotlandNews tell women, men, girls & boys in Scotland that? Will @BBCJohnBeattie? @BBCGaryR FM to discuss Brexit shambles as failure of U.K. leadership by May #NewScotland 
UK construction growth close to stalling as Brexit fears build  
It could have only happened in Britain: after a referendum voted to leave the EU a staunch Remainer was appointed as PM in a palace coup and the whole government consisted of opponents of #Brexit with some pretending to be in favour of it. That is how a failed state looks like. 
#5things -Shutdown worries rise (again)-Bad news on Brexit -Oil's at highest since November-Markets quiet-Powell's "coming around" 
Nissan shows Sunderland MPs @JulieElliottMP & @bphillipsonMP are right to oppose Brexit. Corbyn should follow their lead  
The prize-winning Indian economist Ashoka Mody explains why the EU is facing long-term economic decline, and why the economic costs of Brexit have been greatly overstated.  
Stoner stockpiling Kinder Bueno for no-deal Brexit 
The use of war rhetoric probably not very conducive to getting a meeting. #TheresaMay #Brexit  
Good honest fact-checking is essential to the Brexit debate. An interesting article on Huffington Post -- -- compares the warnings about the effects of Brexit with the allegations of 'Project Fear', and sees who got it right. 
Brexit mustn't occur because the result was criminally procured - and nothing else is relevant. That's not a simplistic thing to say. If you've cheated, that's the end of the matter. We don't care what bullshit excuses you've got. Left-behind voters are important, but not to THIS 
I’m only laughing at 21 to hide the fact that my passport is German and brexit is coming to collect me  
May’s deal is Bad for Britain even without BackstopIt bringsUncertainty;Jurisdiction of #EU Courts;No International trade deals;Higher prices in shops due to EU protectionism;Annual EU payments;Cost of EU regulations.And WE pay £39 Billion!#Brexit 
Theresa May will visit Northern Ireland on Tuesday to give a speech on Brexit and the border and meet business leaders 
Brexiteers:“The loss of manufacturing jobs in Sunderland has nothing to do with Brexit.”Brexiteer Chief Economist Patrick Minford:“Over time if we left the EU it seems likely we would mostly eliminate manufacturing.”They think it’s a price worth paying.What do you think?  
The @EU_Commission announces its annual press revue for March 30, day after Brexit, titled 'The Last Night of the Poms / La Derniere Soiree des Rosbifs'. 
"#BREXIT ROCKS THE CAMPUS" - Brexit Facts4EU is proud to present @Brexit4Students - Interview with the young founders and summary of this great new organisation, Students for Brexit!  Read about them here: #GoWTO 
 via @GuidoFawkesBoris is still the Tory MP that most Tories would want to become PM.Glad to see all Remainers in Cabinet have little or no support.Let’s hope we get a change after Brexit.If ever Hammond,Rudd,Gauke became PM I for one would walk away 
Here’s solid analysis of Nissan’s retreat. Brexit only one factor in complex decision by an industry facing major global upheaval. But why car town Sunderland voted 61% Leave is still a great mystery. Note that Mrs T lured Japan cars here as “EU gateway”  
It will never cease to amuse me that Velma from Scooby Doo grew up to be the EU's deputy Brexit negotiator  
All Hardline Remain MP's who have politically weaponised leaving the EU, to thwart Brexit and SUBVERT DEMOCRACY MUST be SACKED.We cannot trust these EU enemy within traitors to back Brexit Britain, when they have shown such sneering contempt for our proud island nation. 
WATCH | @Jacob_Rees_Mogg says "delay is code for stopping" Brexit and dismisses the ridiculous Project Fear scare story that the Queen will be evacuated from London in the event of no-deal - "that's all got rather silly!" Support us at  
So let's get this right.Sturgeon wants another Brexit referendum so that the UK stays in the EU.Then she wants an independence referendum to take Scotland OUT the UK & OUT the EU.No wonder everybody laughs at her.  
The ERG does not want compromise. On ideological grounds, it wants the most severe rupture possible from the EU.For years it's played the game of making impossible demands a measure of success. True in Cameron's renegotiation, the Referendum, and now with the backstop. 
Nissan won't have problems selling it's new SUV to the EU because Japan has just signed a trade deal with the EU. IT'S GOT NOTHING TO DO WITH BREXIT!!! 
UKIP Founder Alan Sked was adamant that Nissan's decision had nothing to do with Brexit but Remain Campaigner Femi Oluwole had other ideas, and things became quite heated.@IanPayneSport | #Brexit | #Nissan 
The "uncertainty around the UK’s future relationship with the EU is not helping companies like ours to plan for the future."Nissan confirms it is abandoning plans to build new model in Sunderland and warns that Brexit uncertainty is affecting businesses. 
Even a Brexit bribe of £60m from the most corrupt PM in Britain’s history could not keep Nissan in Brexitland. What a f^cking massive disgraceful shambles.  And STILL, amidst ALL this carnage the Brexic^nts continue to lie and spin and wriggle.  
Friends of the Earth have revealed that Tory MP Antoinette Sandbach, a persistent Brexit rebel and backer of the #PeoplesVote received £23,000 last year from the #EU for the family farming business in North Wales.No wonder she’s so keen to #Remain...#NoDeal #WTO #GoWTO 
It’s often said that Labour will lose Remain voters should Brexit go through, but nobody mentions the other side of the coin.Lots of Leave voters will abandon the Tories once they see we have left. It’s becoming impossible not to see the failure of their other policies 
Tis but a scratch ...#Brexit#MontyPython 
A really dangerous thing is happening: the ERG are converging around an unworkable Brexit solution, safe in the knowledge that doing so runs down the clock towards a no deal crash out. Because even if it gets 100% Government support, that won't make it any more realistic.  
It was the Referendum of 1961 that made Atiku a Nigerian, before that he was a Cameroonian. If in doubt ask HRH Aliyu Mustapha Lamido of Adamawa. This has proved the greatest historical argument yet for the Biafra Referendum. 
Thank you very much .Most people at #Sodem are accidental activists (as Polly @RemainingKind calls it), all because of Brexit.#WeAreSodem #WeAreEurope 
Why the British really voted for Brexit - they rumbled the EU  
"If Brexit happens ... both the Labour and the Conservative Party will split." Former Labour Cabinet Minister Lord Adonis is asked about the possibility of a new centrist political party being formed.  
They need to revoke. Retable a final, non-advisory referendum for December 2020, with the vote to be upon a detailed and factual plan for withdrawal or likewise staying. We need to go through a year (19-20) of legislative & regulatory overhaul, from disinformation to dark money. 
Brexit news: Italy to CRASH OUT of Euro causing banking crisis in the EU claims economist | World | News |  
Oh  @adamboultonSKY you took a pounding today from Prof Mark Blyth didn’t you!!When is Populism going to end you asked.When he said it’s not it cooked your chips.Still sticking to the story that the x-trail isn’t going to be built in Sunderland because of Brexit is a lie 
"No-deal Brexit will mean the destruction of the automotive industry." That's not the words of James O'Brien. That's from Brexiters' go-to economist Patrick Minford.@mrjamesob | #Nissan 
Farage right again and again ...........   Brexit news: Farage's BRILLIANT response after BBC fail to show speech | UK | News |  
Brexit is like a supertanker fuelled by division and dogma - at the moment it is heading for the rocks. We will hit them unless politicians can come together and decide on a direction. There is time to find a different course but it's running out. @josh_hardie @SkyNews 
Nathan is worried about the impact this #Brexit will have on the medicines he takes which is why he believes a #PeoplesVote is the #OnlyWayForward. Join him. Write to your MP to demand a #PeoplesVote:  
Independence is the only way to protect #Scotland's interests post-#Brexit. #ScotRef #Indyref2RT - Agree  /  Like - Disagree 
BREXIT: I think reality might finally be kicking in for Mail readers. Just in time for it to have absolutely no effect whatsoever.  
.@pamela_nash of @scotlandinunion said: “What @AngusRobertson will find very quickly is that the majority of voters don’t want another divisive independence referendum.”Read more here:  
February 16 is a referendum between record poverty, record unemployment, record insecurity vs a Nigeria that will see our economy and institutions working again for a better life. Vote and protect your vote. #LetsGetNigeriaWorkingAgain 
Tax payer funded Civil Servants are being used today to resolve a dispute among Conservative Party MPs over how to proceed with BREXIT. Is this a first? For one party to be accorded the services of non-party civil servants to resolve an internal spat? Does the tax payer approve? 
4 days out of Westminster bubble & I’ve no doubt vast majority of people are demanding leadership & clarity on #Brexit Instead there’s confusion & can kicking from both main parties. Sensible Ministers must show courage or will be complicit in a diasterous no deal #Brexit 
Your daily reminder that the government of the United Kingdom and the Prime Minister @theresa_may knew about the cheating during the referendum before they triggered Article 50. ie. before I came forward. ie. knowingly perverting democracy.  
I just saw this in London[Insert Brexit joke]  
A bunch of clowns discuss Brexit. We ask attendees of the annual Joseph Grimaldi clown memorial about their thoughts on the Westminster politicians that occasionally get compared to them.  
Corbyn was back in Glasgow yesterday spouting similar diktats. He is now saying that in 2014 we had our ‘once in a lifetime independence referendum. ‘We must now accept our fate as North Britain!Hear this Corbyn- Dead Party Talking is Labour.#Indyref2 2019 
Did you know that the EHIC is based on residency not nationality? So even EU citizens in the UK will lose it after Brexit.  
The Brexit thing that saddens me most=tribalism on both sides. Leavers defending Kaczynski bc he’s a leaver prompt the thought but it goes both ways. Remainers citing Gove’s ‘had enough of experts’ also annoying. He didn’t say that.If only 1side’s lies matter to you, truth loses. 
Start your week in matters #Brexit with Version 6 of my post-Meaningful Vote diagram.This one tries to look beyond the "Malthouse Compromise", and is based on conversations in London in the last 48h.tl;dr - we're going to be revisiting delay / Cooper-Boles  
And of course post Brexit Scotland won't be able to take advantage of this unless it does the sensible thing and gets the hell out of this destructive, xenophobic UK  
This "Alternative Arrangements Working Group" looks suspiciously like a selected bunch of backbench Conservative MPs being provided with support by civil servants. Which of course is not allowed. I'm sure no.10 will clarify to remove suspicion. #Brexit 
On BBC Radio Tees in a couple of mins taking about auto sector and Brexit. 
Not once since the #Referendum was announced has a positive case been made for staying in the EU or indeed a positive case for the EU itself. With possibly one exception...  #brexit #brexitdebate 
Productive meeting with Labour MPs this morning about the need to protect NI from a hard Brexit. We strongly reiterated the need for the Backstop- a position @Keir_Starmer @JennyChapman and Tony Lloyd understand. 
Someone just posted an abusive comment to a person living in #Cornwall with a "foreign" sounding name who had posted on our page, telling him to "go home". We responded as below. This sort of poisonous attitude is where fascism takes root. Cornwall is better than this.#Brexit  
"[The] fragile truce with hardline Eurosceptics shattered as they said the PM .. no longer .. willing to reopen the Withdrawal Agreement with the EU""One Brexit MP said: “No.10 is setting us up to fail. They want as little Brexit as possible" 
Now everything is clear, we are doing Brexit for Israel and Corbyn is an ‘antisemite’ just because he wants Brexit for Britain and the Brits...   
You get the impression all the self-interested Brexit lads are thinking "Just two more months of bullshit, lads, then we get all our money". 
If your weekly food shopping bill was to go up by say 10% could you easily afford this increase or would you have to make cuts? or even struggle?If the answer is you'd struggle or have to make cuts then you should really REALLY be fighting to stop brexit, not supporting it. 
My son is working as a ski instructor in Italy right now. Because of Brexit he won’t be able to do that next year. Not a huge problem, I know, but it’s one of a great many opportunity-stiflings for Brits.  
Sajid Javid says he can solve the Brexit backstop...but he won't tell us how  
Great song by Steamtown offering a bit of hope amid #Brexit chaos and political failures.And brilliant to hear all proceeds from the single will go to @YoungGreenParty! Have a listen: 
Voting down Theresa May's deal means WTO, that's the #Brexit the electorate (and MPs) voted for and is the default, in accordance with law and what is required in Article 50. Any extension will not be welcomed but also duly not forgotten, with hell to pay at the ballot box.  
The world is watching. The world has been watching. And it has roundly condemned the hypocrisy of a government that attacks our judiciary and our very constitution.This election is a referendum on our very existence.#LetsGetNigeriaWorkingAgain#TheAtikuPlan 
I am cancelling Brexit for self care. 
"I have handed in my notice at my job in London to move back to Ireland. Nobody seems surprised. #Brexit is looming around the corner. Why would I stay?"  
Doesn't this important research (out today) also justify Jeremy Corbyn's focus on voters hit by austerity, during arguments over Brexit?  
The Malthouse compromise is clear as mud. Ext transition = nothing but Brexit til ‘22 at least! Any deal needs to be put to the people: do want more Brexit vs make this malarkey STOP, stay in the EU and get on with the MASSIVE issues facing our country.   
Who would be best at running #Brexit? 
There is something VERY wrong with how the Brexit vote was arrived at & is being pushed through, just as there is w Trump's election. But in the US, it's being investigated. In UK, it's being suppressed. MPs are either complicit or duped. Even 'rebels' don't question the legality 
We have a youth oriented Monday Night Panel on @LBC at 8pm...Brexit campaigner @darrengrimes_ Anti Brexit campaigner @Will_DryOFOC Spiked Online’s @Ella_M_Whelan Novara Media’s @daliagebrial They’ll be taking calls too! 
Nissan has changed plans to build a new model in Sunderland.Among other factors, it said Brexit uncertainty is not helping them "plan for the future".Does this make you feel any differently about #Brexit?That’s what @EmmaBarnett is asking today.#EmmaBarnettShow 
I wonder how many generations will pass before the British people ever have faith in their 'political representatives' again.They are embarrassing us, and that's putting it politely. Crime's Out of Control, Poverty is Rife, Brexit's being Whitewashed & Services are Collapsing.  
Another scare story debunked. Had enough of Brexit scaremongering? Join us today:  
"We don't fall off a cliff, we just go to a different place."Brendan Cole tells us why he backs Brexit - but is swiftly told by Andy West that he's "ignorant of the facts". Thoughts?@BrendanCole | @AndyWestTV | @DawnNeesom | @TheJeremyVine 
Labour's Rupa Huq - "With a decision of this magnitude, it's only fair it gets put back to the people". #EU #Brexit #PeoplesVote 
There is a only one place where MPs like Daniel Kawczynski who lie shamelessly and blatantly to in order foist #Brexit on Britain belong, and that is in prison. We must work tirelessly to ensure that happens. #PeoplesVote 
And THAT’S how you impersonate Michael Caine. Latest from Brexit.  
If it's ok to refer to Britain exiting the EU as Brexit then I'm calling the Malthouse Compromise the Mompromise. You can't stop me. 
Remainers will tell you Brexit was behind Nissan's decision to produce a new car in Japan. This is false and more scaremongering. It's time #ToGoWTO and into the rest of the world. Join the fastest growing Brexit movement @  
People are beginning to catch on.... 
So apparently it’s Brexit that has exposed the ‘poverty of leadership’ in British politics - not stalling life expectancy, rising homelessness or increasing *actual* poverty.  
Nissan should be considering a post-Brexit rebranding back to Datsun and relaunch the Sunny to compete with the second hand Austin Allegros we'll all be driving soon.  
PATHETIC: SNP's Sturgeon to call for Brexit delay, second referendum. Doubt the two-time referendum losers would be as keen on another vote if they’d actually managed to win either of them.  
Truth...interestingly the number of second referendum emails has nosedived and no one on the dooorstep is calling for one, quite the opposite. Sadly the whole second referendum snake oil has done tremendous damage to our country’s negotiating position  
Thank you for your replies. I am pleased to see that wit and satire are alive and well in Remainer Britain, and beyond in the EU. Not so in Brexit Britain, which seems reduced to *Get over it. You lost, Remoaner.* 
All this anti Brexit opinionated news 24/7, makes me more determined to support a no deal Brexit.Agree? 
It's 8 days since I issued an ultimatum to Mrs May, she's ignored my decree. I now have no choice but to recognize Jeremy Corbyn as the legitimate PM of Britain. Let's end the uncertainty and humanitarian crisis in this poor country as it heads into self imposed exile. #Brexit 
Sajid Javid claims technology can be used to solve Irish border. If that's true, why won't ERG back a Brexit plan that would only see the backstop come into play if no alternative arrangements were possible? Either solution exists, so no backstop. Or it doesn't and they're lying.  
Dozens of Brexit-blocking peers and MPs have received millions in EU subsidies for their estates and why wouldn't they if the handouts are on offer? But look closer at those who are leading the campaign to block Brexit. 
Nissan has specifically blamed uncertainty around Brexit & business reasons for pulling production of a new car from its Sunderland plan-thus scaling back its UK business operation. Hearing reaction from voters in Sunderland-which voted overwhelmingly to leave the EU-on @bbc5live 
Here is my local MP Daniel Kawczynski. After hanging up on a radio station who fact-checked him yesterday, he is teetering on the edge this morning; much like the country at large as we near the possibility of no deal. Don’t let the country hang off the edge like him. #Brexit  
When this caller claimed Brexit was to blame for Nissan's decision to move manufacturing of their new car away from Sunderland, Jacob Rees-Mogg insisted even the car company isn't saying that.@Jacob_Rees_Mogg | #RingReesMogg 
Scenes - @adamboultonSKY has now raised wibble levels to a VERY HARD BREXIT .. Coming soon - Brexit even harder than you've ever done before ... 
I suspect this will come as a shock to lots of Brits post-Brexit. People are quite used to ordering from the EU. Now, everything over £15 (and even gifts over £39) will be subject to VAT on the item AND the shipping costs, along with a typically outrageous admin fee.  
Apparently citing Brexit as factor in Nissan decision is "one of those BBC answers" says @Jacob_Rees_Mogg  ie all bad  blamed on Brexit. 
The only thing I am grateful to Brexit for is the great reveal of how our political system is manifestly failing us. The system needs complete reform...I’m delighted that ⁦@RenewParty⁩ are leading the charge for the revolution. ⁦@thetimes⁩ 
Brexit delusion: A refusal to accept your campaign for Britain to leave the world's largest trading bloc is having any negative impact - even as fresh inward investment in the UK car industry falls by nearly 50%, £1 drops to €1.14, and 1000s of jobs move to continental Europe.  
Poor article. EU tariff preferences for developing countries are unilateral, so no need for UK to reach "agreements" to continue them. UK policy is to keep the preferences.Brexit could put 1.7 million people around globe into extreme poverty – study 
Britain cannot afford a long delay to Brexit.  
Can someone explain why MPs keep demanding a second referendum when they and their colleagues haven't even got the courage to table an amendment calling for a second referendum. 
With @CommonsEUexit at #EU Commission in #Brussels to discuss where next....?! Pleased to be the #Scottish voice on the Committee #Brexit #ScotlandinEU #ScotlandsPlaceInEurope  
So with 53 days to go until Brexit Theresa May sets up a working group of MPs to look at arrangements for the Irish border. She is just taking the piss out of us now! 
UK Construction PMI reveals slower growth, with Total Activity Index down to 50.6 (52.8 - Dec). Brexit uncertainty reportedly delayed decision-making on new projects, leading staff recruitment to slow. Read more:  
BORIS: Government not clear on Brexit vision. “I have no idea why the PM has failed to make her mind up for so long” 
We’re excited to announce that we’re on our way to Brussels today till the 6th Feb to explore how we can continue to have a close working relationship between young people in the UK and Europe post-Brexit. Follow our trip on our Instagram story: @ MyLifeMySay   
I am a #cancer patient, Mr Raab...why are we leaving #Euratom then? Which will deprive me and thousands like me, of access to the isotopes needed to treat us?You are a total hypocrite!Like the rest of your partyWe are going to die.Do you care?#cancer  #brexit 
This isn't a negotiation but a change of membership terms that Theresa May and co are seeking.#Brexit 
Listen to this campaigner at #Warrington4Brexit rally yesterday, on why is crucial we uphold democracy. #Brexit #LeaveMeansLeave 
The Malthouse compromise on #Brexit may unite elements of the Conservative Party – but shows zero understanding of what might work in Brussels 
Lord Heseltine, Antoinette Sandbach and the Duke of Wellington - just some of the names who have received tens of thousands of pounds in EU subsidies over the years.What do they have in common? They all want to stop Brexit... No wonder! Support us at  
How are you all getting on with my great Idea of #Brexit ?  
Keep saying this but really am so pissed off that the "Brexit will defeat itself" apathy has helped get us to this point.A chief reason I was anti Brexit from day one is I know history well enough to grasp there were dark forces in our country a referendum win would unchain. 
Hats off to @kitmalthouse! His genius method of solving the Brexit Ireland border problem using "alternative arrangements" has inspired me to solve the problem of perpetual motion in the same way.Sunlit uplands await us post-Brexit#ToryGenius#MalthouseCompromise 
In fact, Rees-Mogg's investment outfit set up in Dublin explicitly because of the economic risk and uncertainty of no deal Brexit.  
No more election in Biafra land, anybody who vote will go back to Northern Nigeria, watch #Biafra #Referendum and Sit At Home Evangelism in Port harcourt Market Zone in Obigbo L.G.A, we must continue, pls #SupportBiafraReferendum 
Remember how Leave supporters argued that Brexit would help the world's poor? Well, once again, they lied. New study shows severe impact on some of the poorest countries. 
Thanks to Brexit, the far-right is on the rise and dark forces have been unleashed. Rampant black face is now sweeping across the land. Once again, I detect the hand of Tommy Robinson (not his real name, btw).  
Why are tory MPs surprised that May has gone back on her promises?  She’s betrayed 17.4m voters, tried to stitch up her DUP allies  & capitulated  to the EU in the Brexit negotiations. She doesn’t want a real Brexit. They were fools not to vote her out.  
Why Brexit at all?  
ICE accuses rapper, 21 Savage, of having made a no-deal Brexit.  
#Biafra #Referendum and Sit At Home Evangelism in Port harcourt Market Zone Obigbo L.G.A in Biafra land, we must continue, but remember we still need your #Support For #BiafraReferendum on 16th of  February 2019 thank you, 
Smoking doesn't cause cancer. Fast food doesn't cause obesity. CO2 doesn't cause Climate change. Brexit dooesn't cause job losses. It's the same right wing denialism, repeated over and over. 
Ever wondered why all TV Channels are so anti Brexit?Well there’s a simple answer! Subscriptions can be lost because a NO DEAL Brexit means they need to have to pay for a EU operating licence.Please read and RT. Fake News= Revenue for TV Companies. 
Silly me. I see now, it’s the uncertainty about the future created by Brexit that Nissan are leaving, nothing to do with Brexit itself. We remainers are so thick sometimes. LOL 
Just as, if not more, important than Steve Baker’s Sunday tweets was Jacob Rees-Mogg’s Sun on Sunday piece where he warned that a failure to avoid no deal could lead to either a delay to Brexit or no Brexit at all  
May gathers Tory rebels for last-ditch meetings as EU negotiator dismisses key part of her Brexit plan.Wasn't May's plan to negotiate with whole of the parliament, not just her own party? More spin, more time-wasting, more delusional thinking.  
Brexit: 700,000 tourism jobs at risk if Britain leaves EU with no deal, trade body warns - The Independent  
The gloves are well and truly off!Boris Johnson drops any pretence of support for the PM as he attacks her ludicrous Brexit deal, slams her total lack of vision and strategy for post-Brexit Britain and dismisses talk of an early election.   
Jacob Rees-Mogg at the start of his @LBC phone-in: "Brexit is far from the primary reason that Nissan has made this decision."Demand diesel engines has fallen... the UK car industry has seen a decline." 
Boris is right: there’s truth to the argument that uncertainty around our post-Brexit is relationship is bad for business. That’s why, now that the EU has rejected MPs demands to drop the backstop, we should pocket our £39 billion and trade on WTO terms.  
Tory MP Jacob Rees-Mogg tells LBC: "Brexit is far from being the primary reason" for Nissan's decision not to build the new X-Trail model at Sunderland. 
Jacob Rees-Mogg says “Brexit is far from the primary reason Nissan has made this decision”. He says it is more about the move away from diesel engines.#RingReesMogg 
Jacob Rees-Mogg is live on LBC to answer your questions on Brexit, Nissan and anything else you want. #RingReesMogg 
Brexit would  “mostly eliminate manufacturing” predicted one of the few economists to back Britain leaving Europe, happy to lay down other people's jobs for his ideology. Nissan is a warning  
I think it’s interesting that the youngest voters in 1975 were 59 years old in the 2016 referendum, that would be the old people who stole the youngster future, the same people who voted us in, voted us back out.  That tells me a lot.  They recognise they got it wrong in 1975 
Some points to note: A] In 1975 we were voting to join a trading block not a political unionB] Russian interference has been dismissed comprehensivelyC] The 2016 referendum was agreed in parliament by all parties except the SNP#Brexit 
“You are going to have to run it [the car industry] down, in the same way we ran down the coal industry & steel industry. These things happen.”- Patrick Minford. Minford is the author of the only economic paper to suggest #Brexit will benefit the UK. Odd looking benefits.  
Julia Hartley-Brewer in fine form: The news broadcasters, reporters and editors know that Nissan's decision has nothing to do with Brexit. Remoaners have deliberately created Brexit uncertainty in order to try to stop Brexit:  
Actor Christoph Waltz has said he is in a state of desperation over Brexit - wanting to know when the “clowns” behind the vote will ever take responsibility.  
As #Brexit is so different from what was promised, then “To leave the EU without public consent would be wilful negligence” says @GeraintDaviesMP : 
What made the referendum non democratic:Advisory.Gerrymandered.Wafer thin majority.Stolen data.Over spending.Covering up.Micro targeting using racist material. Ignoring the truce(Jo Cox murder)Open lying.Non specific question.1 million uncounted postal votes.Cheating. 
Brexit is not a device to solve a genuine broader problem, but a political weapon to shore up a minority British government, open the door to a privatised Britain and punish the EU for daring to tackle tax avoidance. 
Depressing prospect! Brazen Bercow Insists He Will "Help the House Decide" Which Way Brexit Goes -  
Lego launches ‘Incredibly Depressing No-Deal Brexit Town Centre’ 
No Deal supporters can volunteer to have their pensions converted into a new class of UK Government debt security. The Brexit Bond. 
On BBC 3 Counties Radio just after 9 talking about Nissan and other companies pulling out of the UK as a result of Brexit. 
'With 53 days to go until Brexit and with investment fleeing the UK, Theresa May sets up a working group to find a solution which has escaped negotiators for 2 years'  
Like the 1975 referendum where we voted to stay in the EU by 67%?Should we not respect that one? Or just the recent one which there was no public demand for and where you scraped a 3% win with some help from the Russians? Just that one yeah?  
'what a time to live,' says a friend. Or in my case having 86% chance of #cancer returning & being told by oncologist that I'm unlikely to be prioritised for treatment, given my age& the scarcity of isotopes once we drop out of Euratom, what a time to die. #brexit  
Beware the @NickyMorgan01 @kitmalthouse 'compromise'.This is nothing more than No Deal in disguise.And all about keeping the Tory #Brexit show on the road.One way out: #PeoplesVote 
I’m a modest Stylite, but I must tell you I have solved Brexit. [Thread] 
“This decision has far more to do with green taxes and far more to do with the slowing eurozone economies than anything to do with Brexit.”The fabulous @JuliaHB1 fires truth bullets on Remoaner claims on Nissan’s diesel range - nowt to do with Brexit!  
This is a missing persons report for a Mr K Starmer. Last seen acting as Shadow Brexit Enabler, some time ago. We are particularly keen to hear from a Mr J Corbyn who is believed to have been the last person to see Mr Starmer. 
Sinister forces have take hold of our country. If moderate MPs don’t coalesce in the centre to stop Brexit, we face catastrophic #NoDealBrexit 
Stop the bus, I want to get off.  Why the UK cannot see that Brexit is utterly, utterly stupid  
MPs must compromise on a Brexit deal or tear the country apart  
"It's not Project Fear."@richswart, sales director of a Sunderland manufacturing company, says there is a "ripple effect" of @Nissan's announcement over #Brexit that will impact his business- right down to the "local cafe". Latest on #Nissan here:  
If Labour splits to form a new party out of earshot of Corbyn's 1970s past its sell by date socialism, but committed to tax reform, human rights, social justice and a second referendum then I will join that party and stand for election as an MP. After Brexit the Tories must go 
Liam Fox, "no deal Brexit is survivable"This is the problem isn't it. Most people see Brexit as a fabulous new opportunity for global trade, the bonfire of regulations, a return to self government.This idiot regretfully believes we might 'get by'. 
So the PM is now outsourcing Brexit (& the Good Friday Agreement) to a rag-tag team of the sacked, resigned & desperate-to-be-back. If ever there were a sign Westminster has failed & the people need to take control of Brexit with another vote, this is it!  
When this account was started in December 2017, it was not done with any real expectation that brexit would be stopped but mainly to prove a point and to do 'something'.Whatever your view on last 2 weeks it's still so so much more likely we will #StopBrexit than 14 months ago. 
Always Follow The Money !!!Vast Majority Of Hardline Remainers Are In The Pay Of The EU.Dozens of greedy self serving Brexit-blocking peers and MPs have received millions from EU  via @MailOnline 
Here’s the Brexiters’ leading (only?) economist saying we’ll have to run down the car industry. But remember, Nissan’s decision has nothing to do with Brexit.  
Brexit is a revolt against German-run Europe super-state, other countries will follow our lead..  
'Manufacturers and businesses across the UK have a real issue with #Brexit.'@richswart, sales director of a manufacturing company based in Sunderland, on the impact of @Nissan's announcement to scrap plans for its branch over #Brexit.Latest here:  
Julia: "Nissan is not moving its production of an unwanted car to the UK because we don't want to buy them here. That's all there is to it. You can't blame Brexit for everything"@JuliaHB1 |  
Think about it; after 30 months the U.K. government has set up a group to think about what it should be doing about Brexit. It meets today. With 7 weeks to disaster day. Think about it. And weep. 
I always thought our UK Brexit negotiators were naive and incompetent. It now seems to be not to be the case. They are extremely skilled at ensuring the EU gets everything and the UK nothing. 
In the event of civil unrest after a No Deal Brexit I will be evacuating my wine collection through my bladder. 
The closer the UK gets to Brexit the more the country regrets it, polls show  
How long would it take to organise a new Brexit referendum? - The Independent  
UK not remotely prepared for Brexit, Nicola Sturgeon insists -  
We’ve waited long enough. The Withdrawal Agreement is a crock of sh.t and cannot be supported. Deliver Brexit on 29th March using the legal default option. If the EU insists on a hard border in Ireland, let them build it. #LeaveMeansLeave 
Today‘s motivation:Jacob Rees-Mogg will ‘flee the country’ if #Brexit is abandoned.If that’s not worth fighting for.#RevokeA50 
Spanish court rejects international observers in courtroom during referendum trial that will start on February 12.  @amnesty @hrw @fairtrials @FrontLineHRD @InterTrialWatch @vongruenberg @AndrejHunko @AnaGomesMEP @ivajgl 
MCVEY: WTO Brexit is default option. “The plan has always been to Leave, as we always said, without a deal if we cannot agree on a deal”  
Queen Elizabeth II will be evacuated from London if a no-deal Brexit causes riots, British media reported  
Does a man preparing to back PM’s Brexit plan write that it will lead to “a protracted & humiliating period where we accept every jot & tittle of EU law” & blame “prolonged uncertainty emanating from the top” for damaging business? Or might @BorisJohnson just have another plan? 
Opinion: It may not be the only reason, or even the predominant one, but Brexit is a problem for the UK automotive industry, and only a fool would deny it:  
Watching writers like Gary Younge fall for Brexit as "an authentic uprising of the working class" reminds me of the 80s. Brexit is Thatcher all over again, built on support from C2, blue collar Tories, cosplaying as "the true working class." 
I’m sure that’s purely coincidental! : Dozens of Brexit-blocking peers and MPs have received millions from EU  via @MailOnline 
Nicola Sturgeon: UK ‘not remotely prepared’ for Brexit.SNP doing the job of opposition. If only Labour were saying this too. 
Nissan CEO in a Tokyo jail; Nissan Board accuses him of more misconduct that he used the company as a personal ATM; EuroZone is in a nose dive, EU pollution standards sees diesel vehicles sales plummet...But deciding not to build a car in the UK afterall is because of #Brexit  
A leave voting father of 2 Nissan employees on tv didn’t care. Said it would be just like when the pits shut and people would survive. Brexit ideology is officially removed from the reality of its impact. 
Nissan. Sunderland.Shocking news, isn't it?Despite Gov 'assurances' (), they've cancelled future UK X-Trail production (petrol & diesel), in favour of Japan who, unlike us after #Brexit, will enjoy tariff-free access to the world's biggest trading bloc- the EU. #Shocking  
A no deal Brexit is a "bit like disconnecting from the internet, you can do it, but why would you?" - Unipart's CEO John Neill  #r4today  
Yes, let’s pretend this lies at the root of the problem. It can’t possibly be that any form of Brexit is not deliverable without ruining the UK economy. Carry on, only a few weeks to go.  
We must rule out exiting the EU all together. Brexit is not in the UK’s interest. That has become abundantly evident. #StopBrexitSaveBritain 
It seems obvious that Brexit has played a part in Nissan’s decision, especially in the context of EU-Japan trade agreement. The only Remainers claiming it’s the *only* factor seem to be confined to the imaginations (and tweets) of Leavers. 
Investment is fleeing Britain and Theresa May has recycled an old idea to try to make Brexit work  
If Corbyn had campaigned to Remain even half as passionately as he campaigns for Palestine, Brexit would not be happening. Corbyn is every bit as responsible as Johnson, Mogg and Farage for Brexit 
There is no reason at all today's invisible Irish border coping with differing taxes/duties can't now handle minor post-Brexit differences in trading standardsThis eminently solvable problem is being exploited by an increasingly irate anti-Brexit lobby 
Interesting piece by ⁦@lisanandy⁩ in which she argues for compromise: the WA and EEA of some kind. MPs must compromise on a Brexit deal or tear the country apart  
Nicola Sturgeon will warn that UK is “not remotely prepared” to leave the European Union in less than two months and will call again for a second Brexit referendum#PeoplesVoteNow #StopBrexit 
Now @BBCr4today know more about car industry than Nissan. It’s all to do with the switch from diesel, not Brexit. So that’s all right then. 
The Conservative Party persists with a leader who has zero belief in Brexit and who continues to collude with the EU against the wishes of the 17.4m who told her to Get Out of the EU. Just watch her squirm and equivocate. She will betray.  
Brexit latest: There are ‘alternative arrangements’ but they go to a different school. 
‘No deal’ Brexiters are currently insisting that Nissan has *nothing* to do with Brexit while pretending that Patrick Minford, the ERG’s pocket economist, hasn’t stated that ‘no deal’ will entail the destruction of the U.K. automotive industry. 
Just a quick reminder that ships are slow, and if we don't have a Brexit deal within the next week, exporters of £3bn+/yr of goods to Australia will have to load stuff on ships with no idea on the customs arrangements or fees that will greet it. 
You can't post anything about Brexit or the Eu, even jokingly,  on here without the #FBPE mob eventually getting wind of it & piling in.... just fuck off & be deluded.... we've heard all your weak arguments & sound bites 100x over... youre boring  
'The shadow chancellor says Labour MPs will not be "bribed" into supporting Theresa May's Brexit deal in exchange for funding for their constituencies. John McDonnell said any such offer would be "pork-barrel politics" and "dangerous for our democracy".' 
Nissan slamming the brakes on Sunderland is a Brexit warning  
Shameful Sky News. They are shifting the blame for Nissan cancelling production of a diesel entirely on Brexit. They know full well that it is because the model is no longer viable. If it were to do with Brexit they would build it in the EU. But they are not. 
The simple truth is that Europeans are no longer purchasing diesel engine vehicles, that's why production is moving to Asia - NOTHING TO DO WITH BREXIT!  
Heiko Maas, the German foreign minister, has said he hopes Britain will cancel Brexit over the coming weeks as the prospect of no-deal looms  
Massive mistake by ECB head faking the market in 2018 to believe the Eurozone & EU could be let off life support by walking back QE. It was all part of project fear to prop up the EUR during Brexit negotiations. They now need QE BUT can't do it till after March 29th to save face. 
Brexit referendum was corrupt and un-democratic.It is now being imposed with coercion to break Britain. Revoke Article 50.  
Sturgeon to say UK not ready for Brexit - The Times  
Government reveals it is stockpiling third-rate politicians to spread jingoism in the event of a no deal brexit 
Cost of Brexit so far: £100bn and rising. Cost of NHS: £115bnWe could have nearly DOUBLED NHS spending if Conservatives and Labour hadn’t pursued Brexit. 
I’m young, metropolitan, educated and multilingual – but proud to have backed Brexit, says @LewisFeilder 
This Kanu’s Atiku Cameroon theory and IPOB’s election boycott/referendum on the 16th has exposed once again the depth of hypocrisy in Nigerians.On this Twitter, many of you, by every disguise, celebrated Nnamdi Kanu and acknowledged/ratified all his struggles and tribulations 
History shows the Tories can’t be trusted on workers’ rightsAnd we're clear that Mrs May's Brexit deal puts these rights at riskSo unless she shifts her red lines, we won't support this dealEmpty promises aren't enough – we need binding guarantees 
How the BBC biases your news: “investment in U.K. motor industry is down 80%” (that’s a lot)..and “Of course, Brexit doesn’t help” “Doesn’t help”? That’s the main reason! So stop spinning & telling lies... 
I would imagine the majority would expect their MPs to do what’s best for their communities - which means finding a backbone and stopping brexit- whatever the referendum result, brexit is seriously damaging our country. They need to start being honest with the electorate now. 
Ffs, Sir Keir, stop making a blithering idiot of yourself and address the damned elephant!Its not the"Tories' chaotic handling" that is causing this, but Labour's refusal to oppose Brexit. 
Since when do people think Freedom of Movement is a recent innovation? It’s not EU competence creep, it’s an essential part of its founding DNA. That the UK signed up to when it joined in the 70s, approved overwhelmingly in a referendum, and profited from massively.  
Brexit is being blamed for Nissan’s decision not to build the new X-Trail in Sunderland... What else can we blame on Brexit?@JuliaHB1 |  
I thought Nnamdi Kanu guy is even educated and sensible but lately he's been saying all sort of gibberish. How can you tell your people not to vote & exercise their civil right ? And somehow he thinks he'll get a referendum by doing that smh dullard. 
It’s amazing that so many centrists are complaining about people voting for Brexit - however it is their pursuit of austerity (or lack of opposition to it) which led to people backing Brexit in the first place. 
1,272 hours until Brexit.We are escaping the most audacious fraudulent scam ever perpetrated on British taxpayers.Where immigrants from 27 countries were called citizens to enable lucrative British benefits & tax credits to be robbed blind & sent back to Poland, Romania etc 
checking in on Brexit  
What did I tell you? The UK media narrative has done a total 180 on Brexit in last 7 days. Facts not rhetoric are now coming to the surface. Europe not the UK is in big trouble with a clean Brexit. Thats the truth & the UK media have known it all along. Theyre now capitulating.  
Watching the Nissan piece on Sky News, with a reporter saying workers at the plant are angry that "Nissan are just using Brexit as an excuse".At times like these, you have a grim sense that WTO Leavers need to get what they wish for.... 
And in rather less than a minute flat , this is what a leading figure in #eu negotiations thinks about a key part of the 'Malthouse compromise' on #brexit  
Who runs the country? Government, Parliament or ERG.  We are being held hostage by a bunch of right-wing zealots demanding what they know is impossible & lusting for the mayhem & dictator-style emergency powers that follow no-deal Brexit. MPs must find their backbone & stop them.  
Good morning Corbyn is enabling Brexit. He could stop Brexit todayBut he prefers to focus on removing rights from 66,000,000 of us. Anyone who is still a labour member is complicit in reducing freedom. Is that a value system you want to be part of? . 
Discussing the Nissan Brexit car crash on @GMB in a mo. Brextremists still pretending they know better than motor manufacturers 
This is a real problem.#Brexit is the biggest issue of a generation. You cannot make solemn promises to the electorate in a manifesto, restate them whenever asked and then decide immediately after being voted in you’ve ‘changed your mind’.Deselect.#nodeal #GoWTO 
"Asked about the possibility of a second independence referendum, Gerry Hassan claimed that a win by one vote would not be enough and claimed Yes would need at least 55% to legitimise the result." 
Sky News almost salivating this morning trying to solely blame Brexit on the Nissan decision.....they’re now as biased as the BBC  
If there’s going to be no food after Brexit,what are the plagues of giant rats going to eat?These scare stories are becoming contradictory. 
London will retain its spot as biggest financial centre in Europe after Brexit - “nobody wants to move”  
Dozens of Brexit-blocking peers and MPs have received millions from EU  via @MailOnline 
I’ve handed in my notice and I’m leaving Brexit Britain  via @ITabroad 
UK High Commission confirms that talks are underway between #Canada and the #UK that could lead to a trade & migration deal in as little as a year.#CANZUK #cdnpoli #auspol #nzpol #ukpolitics #Brexit 
‘Once no deal is ruled out, there is no alternative to a referendum besides some fantasy renegotiation, which isn’t happening’  via @jackielongc4 
NCNC means “National Council of Nigeria & the Cameroons”. Adamawa was in the Cameroonian part. After Adamawa joined Nigeria through a Referendum, NCNC became “National Council of Nigerian Citizens”. That was in 1961. Atiku is from Adamawa & he was born before 1961.MNK nailed it. 
Factories are closing down due to Brexit, but the factories themselves are still there, and so are the workers capable of working in them.If only there was some sort of government or something that could ensure that these workers could continue to work in the place.If only. 
Sunday: "We must cancel #Brexit because a Japanese car manufacturer now won't build a car nobody wants in UK".Monday: 53 days to #Brexit Irrelevance beckons, give them time. 
Scotland's Sturgeon to say Britain not ready for Brexit: The Times  
Declaring themselves ‘Brexit ready’, Chief Executive David Brown has said: “We remain confident that our systems and operations will continue to function smoothly and efficiently once we leave the EU and whether there is a deal or not.  
Angela Merkel is set to arrive in Japan for talks with Shinzo Abe as they brace for Brexit  
I posted this tweet in 2017.Now you know why my vote is  for Atiku Abubakar. Atiku wants to restructure, he wants regions/states to become stronger and richer. He is for fiscal federalism. No Nnamdi Kanu or referendum can stop me from voting Atiku on February 16. #LGNWA 
Hardline Brexiteers join taskforce in search of Brexit deal  
Dozens of Brexit-blocking peers and MPs have received millions from EU  via @MailOnline 
Glad you've noticed.It's not just the Cons though.A #Brexit by any other name would smell as rank.What was promised to the electorate is undeliverable.You cannot have the same benefits outside a club as you can inside it.Stop chasing unicorns: come clean with the electorate.  
God save the Queen... from #Brexit? Cold War plan revived to rescue royals from riots – media 
So why are young Kenyans not demonstrating against the handcuffs of CRB and HELB? Forget referendum and 2022 nonsense. Tell politicians that education is a right, not a debt that you pay back. You are part of the society that is improved by your being educated #ToxicWorkSpaces 
Fool Britannia@harikunzru excellent on Brexit 
You don't build a bridge by withdrawing from the EU and supporting the billionaires Brexit. We are European not American, you silly old fool 
Brexit: Plans to evacuate the Queen if riots break out  
Dear Ms. Ocasio-Cortez: Corbyn is an anti-semitic rabid nationalist that is blocking a second referendum for the people in the UK to confirm or reject the Brexit process. He is not a friend of the people, which is sad for all us democratic socialists. He must be called out.  
#MondayMotivation we need this filled 100,000 genuine UK signatures - because people are dying, starving, homeless, food banks struggling and Brexit on top?This is the worst policy ever!So cruel!UN HAS SPOKENEx Prime Ministers warned as bad as Poll Tax 
A Cold War-era emergency plan to relocate the royal family has been revived in case riots break out in London in the event of a no-deal Brexit next month, two British newspapers reported today.  #FoxNews 
They didn't evacuate for WWII even when bombed... But Brexit sure scares them. 
UK officials dust off emergency evacuation plans for Queen Elizabeth in case of Brexit unrest  
Deselection is Coming, "Failed as MPs, Shamed out of Office". @NickBoles @sarahwollaston #Brexit 
Welcome back to the POLIS Deakin seminar series for 2019!Starting us off on Tues 19 Feb is Prof Alex de Ruyter, visiting from the Centre for Brexit Studies @BCU_CBS, talking about "Public Attitudes to Brexit". Join us in Burwood or from Geelong!  
MP Deselection for supportingTory Brexit? Cash to struggling Labour strongholds?Isn’t it odd that money has been found to attempt to bribe MPs?But from where? And who put this despicable plan together? On who’s orders?Surely this corrupt practice can’t be legal in the UK? 
There's no electoral logic. Corbyn's support for Brexit is ideological. It is the main reason Labour is now 7 points behind a disastrous Tory government. 
Queen Elizabeth royal family to be evacuated if Brexit unrest breaks outThe game is over when the public knowsTHERE IS NOWHERE TO HIDENo amount of money, influence, or power can stop this@POTUS @GenFlynn #QAnon #DigitalSoldiers #SuperBowlLIII 
It's cumulating, this willfulness to pander to authoritarian figures, to those who have worked for Brexit, to those who have a very superficial underlying of our own history, and how her words can hurt many of us.Many from her own district. 
Brexit is 1293 hours away. #brexit 
Don't you support Brexit? 
So the auld Queen is set to be evacuated if there is bother with the Brexit? Jeepers - the Royal Family stayed through the Blitz... So Brexit is WORSE than the BLITZ... #TheGammonsAreRevolting #Brexit 
'If you want a vision of the future of Brexit, imagine an island discovering that its own Government burned the lifeboats and destroyed all the lifejackets'Orwell, 2019  
May accused of 'wasting valuable time' over new #Brexit working groupJeez..3 effing years & £Billions wasted on this #BrexitShambles to be far Worse Off.Just #RevokeA50 NOW Stop this effing fiasco & #Remain in Control  in the EU!!! 
Don't get me wrong, I do get pandering to your followers (the very same pandering the extreme left frowns upon when it's not done by Bernie).And I do understand the base of her followers happen to also support Brexit and replacing May with Corbyn.But this is not right. 
#Scotland First Minister @NicolaSturgeon will use a speech Monday at @Georgetown to warn that the #UK is "not remotely prepared" to leave the #EU and there should be a second #Brexit referendum, reports @thetimes. 
"Jacob Rees-Mogg Will 'Flee The Country' If Conservative Party Abandons Brexit"Now why would he do that? If Parliament comes to its senses & revokes Article 50, the next step will be a Mueller-type inquiry into the criminality behind of Brexit. Perhaps not good news for JRM. 
Hello Britain, it is I, Sir Savage the 21st and ye shall rejoin brexit or I'll dump yo tea pic.twitter.com/l5S0buSgIT 
Aren't the same actors who pushed for Brexit also pushed for the election of Trump? And Democrats are steering clear from meddling in UK politics.Aren't there rules where we don't meddle in foreign govs, & the extreme left keeps criticizing us when we do? Genuinely asking.  
How disappointing. @AOC would be well advised to understand the depth of disappointment in @jeremycorbyn utter lack of opposition leadership over Brexit. He is failing to serve the interests of those most vulnerable to the economic effects of Brexit: i.e, lower income families. 
thanks but no thanks for trying to speak on behalf of british jews when you can see a whole thread of them saying he is problematic and citing statistics showing that he's overwhelmingly viewed as antisemitic. and he's enabling brexit, which will exacerbate poverty in the UK. 
No-deal Brexit 'could put 700,000 tourism jobs at risk', trade body warns  
You're up to your neck in Brexit corruption, in bed with the far right, complicit in foreign interference and illegal funding.WE SEE YOU Labour Leave, rotten to the core, we won't forget or forgive.  
Snap election rumours a 'SCARE TACTIC' to force through Brexit deal claims Boris Johnson  
2019 sees 7 years - 3/4 of a decade - since the 2014 IndyRef announced, and 5 years - half a decade - since the actual vote. EVEL, legal discrediting of Sewel & England's Brexit vote etc means the  'UK' upon which the NO vote was predicated has ceased to exist. Time for #IndyRef2 
The Remain press (Guardian and FT) insist against the evidence that the Nissan cancellation was due to Brexit. 
It turns out, according to the Times, that Nissan was promised £60 million by May to build its new car in Sunderland. Apparently it will not now get the money. Greg Clark the Business Secretary is still blaming Brexit rather than failing diesel emission tests.He is a Remainer Rat 
In 1990 I was sat on the Berlin Wall shaking hands with a East German Gaurd. We were celebrating the Wall coming down and the East German Citizens being free. Never did I think that Britain would be the country to build a political wall against Europe. #brexit #StopBrexit 
Theresa May: Were fucked lads21 Savage: “I got 12345678 suggestions on how we deal with brexit” pic.twitter.com/3NfsEoPRHB 
#Nigerians are fanatics who are not prepared to be reasonable.they are desperate for our oil and gas money, otherwise why is Referendum too much for them.@Amaka_Ekwo @MaziNnamdiKanu @NnamdiFans @JencaBenca @NwajiugoG @nlitvin @realDonaldTrump @BBCNews @NkirukaNistoran 
18 forced govt UTurns on Brexit, a Contempt of Parliament ruling, the biggest defeat since 1924, demanding No Deal off the table, and put forward an amendment to allow a second vote this week. 
Guy Verhofstadt has claimed the EU is “threatened” after Brexit and could be “destroyed”. At last, Guy has a sense of realism.   
Lib Dem’s these days seem little more than a remain pressure group. There is a huge vacuum in the centre of British politics for those that want common sense politics combined with respect and support for the referendum result. The SDP is growing to fill that vacuum Join us. 
Thread on Brexit, Corbyn, and the impact of both on POC in Great Britain:  
UK officials dust off emergency evacuation plans for Queen Elizabeth in case of Brexit unrest  
BREXIT: No-deal Brexit 'could put 700,000 tourism jobs at risk', trade body warns /#EU #Brexit #PeoplesVote 
They've had two and a half YEARS.We're 53 days from #Brexit, and the Tories are still arguing among themselves. Rank incompetence. 
The UK is an undemocratic neoliberal institution (which wrote most of the content in EU treaties), and Brexit is neoliberalism on steroids. Shredding workers' rights and environmental protections. A socialist UK could reform the EU. Socialists build solidarity, not borders. 
Brian Adcock on departing Nissan and others. #BrexitShambles #finalsay #PeoplesVote #beherenow #nissan #TheresaMay #Tories #Brexit #BrexitShambles - political cartoon gallery in London  pic.twitter.com/p3ocDL3NMI 
BBC Bias again .................Brexit news: Farage's BRILLIANT response after BBC fail to show speech | UK | News |  
Martina Anderson has been a one woman crusade at Brussels.... Teresa May is clinging onto her job by the skin of 10 DUP MPs who care less about here than IPJ cares the innocent dead of Sri Lanka.Wasn't it, Brexit Secretary, David Davis said SF have played a blinder over Brexit?? 
He's anti semetic (per 85% of British Jews polled)And he went through a no confidence vote from his Labor party as Britain blunders through Brexit.Please take him as an example of what NOT to do 
This is the same Liam Fox who before Brexit told us an EU trade deal would be the easiest deal ever!!!Leaving EU without a deal is 'survivable' - Liam Fox  
The result of the Brexit referendum didn't dent my faith in democracy in quite the same way as does knowing that, right now, Dorries, Braverman, Kawczynski, Bone, Rees-Mogg et al are secure MPs, and May and Corbyn are secure party leaders. 
Hopefully AOC convinced Corbyn to demand the #PeoplesVote on Brexit. There's a lot he can learn from a Bronx legislator. 
Wish you talked with an MP who opposes brexit. 
Need to go back to Poland before Brexit, because vodka. 
We haven't seen any Brexit-related issues arise yet, Deborah. The only issues we've seen are a result of the constant attempts to thwart a smooth & orderly Brexit by the traitors in Westminster. Of course it isn't working out so well, when our leaders don't believe in Brexit.  
Do you know one way you can tell the Remain narrative is being driven by the rich elites. ?Because 90% of the rich elites support remain and are funding idiots like #FemiSorry to act as "Judas Goats"#Brexit  
if you're using the pull out method for birth control, but you just pull out mid sex for no reason and walk around slamming your dick into things, that's a brexit 
OK let's deal with "respecting the result of the Ref" once and for all52% voted for the NHS, more jobs and more influence.(food&drugs shortage, undemocratic martial law, curfew, becoming a laughing stock weren't on the ballot)52% voted to leave the EU100% voted against Brexit 
Folks need to get real.#Nissan netted almost $108 billion last year.Nissan is  the French and Japanese states making cars together.They don't want #uncertainty and disruption, that's  all.#Sunderland#BrexitDebacle#Brexit 
I have this dream where the LDs and Greens unite under a new name, Caroline as leader, get some high-profile defections from Labour, and enough attention to seriously challenge in current Lab/Con seats. It’s complete fantasy, but at least as plausible as a Jobs First Brexit. 
Well they do when they’re proven liars with dodgy outside interests unbecoming of an MP and are suggestive of profiteering from pushing Brexit. I guess.  
#BREAKING: Students will vote on a referendum to pay a semesterly fee of $27.20 per person for a fund to benefit descendants of the GU272 after a 20-4 @GUSAssociation senate vote. 
I think this saga has hit a nerve because it brings together every Brexit element in concentrated form:- Lying MP, won't admit lie or engage- truly appalling journalism from @ShropshireStar (conversely kudos to @alexisconran)- shrieking ignorant jingoism of @DKShrewsbury 
Nissan, JLR, Ford, Honda, PSA, Siemens, Panasonic, Sony, AstraZeneca, GSK, Marks & Spencer, Sainsbury's, Waitrose, McDonald's, Starbucks and others:"Brexit is bad for our business."Brexiter:"Pah, what do they know about business!"#Brexit 
Regardless of your stance on Brexit, it was great to see the BBC & others discover an interest in UK manufacturing this weekend with their saturation coverage of the Nissan story. Looking forward to them reporting the 100s of new factories/investments in 2019 with similar zest... 
“It is a truth universally acknowledged that a Brexiteer in possession of a good fortune will either have residency in a tax haven or a second European passport to ensure full post-Brexit access to the EU.”  
Someone like @jeremycorbyn, who has cratered his own party's support by refusing to forthrightly oppose Brexit despite the preferences of his party's voters (), needs @aoc far more than @aoc needs him at this point. 
It is not for Brexiteers to compromise, there are no compromises on independence, you are either an independent country or you are not. Kicking the can down the road for a further 2 yrs on full membership terms is not acceptable to the 17.4M. W/A is NOT Brexit. #OUTNOW 
How about your pointless flag referendum and the Americas cup is a complete waste of money  
French President Emmanuel Macron is likely to call a referendum in May as part of his response to the Yellow Jacket protests  
January 2017: "Government didn't offer Nissan money to stay in UK"February 2019: "Nissan faces losing May's £60m Brexit sweetner" The truth finally limps into public view.#PeoplesVote#RevokeArticle50@LBC #r4today #PolitcsLive #newsnight @RCorbettMEP @acgrayling @IanDunt 
Can anyone explain why falling diesel sales globally makes Nissan move a model from the UK to Japan and JLR move from the UK to Slovakia? How is this about #Diesel not #Brexit? 
Theresa May has survived as PM despite losing her majority in 2017, the government being found in contempt of parliament & her ‘Brexit Deal’ being crushed in the commons. Yet somehow people believe that if Labour supported a ‘People’s Vote’ she would simply roll over & allow it? 
They stayed in London stayed The Blitz. She’s not leaving for Brexit.  
Thank you. And the status of #21Savage  in Britain will also be precarious given that country's sloppy handling of West Indian Immigration in the past and the impending Brexit. Deportation has been an issue for U.S. Black Folk since whites created Liberia to deport us.  
The “Malthouse Compromise”A) isn’t a compromise but just a longer way to a “no deal” #Brexit B) Has already had virtually all its key elements rejected in negotiations with #EU27 C) Is in part based on a misunderstanding of WTO rules #magicalthinking 
At the time the government insisted no money was promised to Nissan. Now it turns out they offered Nissan a bribe to ignore brexit. State Aid rules, anyone Public Accounts Committee?  
Reminder: Jacob Rees-Mogg Will 'Flee The Country' If Conservative Party Abandons Brexit Rees-Mogg can easily flee if things go wrong for him, but most of us will have to stay and suffer the debacle he wants to inflict on us.#PeoplesVote #Brexit 
Scotland is a Country Mary....one of the “ kingdoms” referred to in United Kingdom... although that will def come under threat post Brexit.  
Boris Johnson dismisses snap election talk as 'scare tactic' to win support for Theresa May's Brexit deal  via @Telegraph 
This is the damage Marcon’s #Police Thugs are doing with so called ‘non lethal weapons’ against peaceful protesters blowing whistles and waving banners against #austerity#PoliceBrutality #Westminster #Brexit #policereformsneeded 
You can't hold back the populists Guy, your days are numbered!'EU never been more THREATENED' Verhofstadt claims bloc could be 'DESTROYED' post-Brexit  
There is no good  #BREXIT . None.  Whatsoever.  
Ok, this is an example of how the new EU-Japan trade deal (lowering tariffs on Japanese cars from 10% to 0% by 2027, in stages) could affect Nissan’s X-Trail decision, especially if you factor in a no deal Brexit... 
Theresa May 'cannot resist pressure to delay Brexit' - ITV News  
“It is difficult to see any scenario whereby a no deal or other chaotic Brexit does not significantly impact our ability to safely treat our patients”.This is from the CEO of one of the biggest NHS trusts in EnglandWe really think it’s important for everyone to know the truth  
I have done with Labour & I used to be a fully paid member.(And I live in South Yorkshire) Now they’ve turned their back on the North & Midlands the people who voted Brexit by not backing Brexit and leaning towards Remaining in the EU I’m not the only one. @TheSDPUK for me now. 
“Brexit epitomises the worst of Britain and the British. People from privileged backgrounds seeking to manipulate others, to pit people against each other for their own personal gain. Selfish people creating a selfish atmosphere in selfish times.” ⁦  
I’m young, metropolitan, educated and multilingual – but proud to have backed Brexit  via @BrexitCentral 
I have had a very enjoyable first day on twitter. However I can understand why it is not for everybody So what do the people plan to do if and i do stress if we are asked to vote again on a Scottish independence referendum 
The reason Keir Starmer was DPP and a highly respected lawyer before he was the Shadow Brexit Secretary is because he knows a damn sight more about Brexit and negotiations than you do. Stick to Physics Brian.  
I’m speechless....Brazen Bercow Insists He Will "Help the House Decide" Which Way Brexit Goes - Gallery Guido  
An image of a group of unelectable ideological fanatics who have been a plague on Scotland for decades and whose British nationalist extremism has held back its people and should not be tolerated, next to an image of the Orange Order#IndyRef2 #Brexit  
I have been asking myself for months why Brexiters, especially ERG members, are pushing so hard for #NoDeal Brexit chaos. Xenophobia is just not a strong enough motive. Could it be something much more sinister? This thread may provide the answer.  
Brexit: Talks on backstop 'alternative arrangements'  
The kind of warning many of us said during the Scottish independence referendum, shot down by the British Labour Party in Scotland, told was nonsense by Tories, and scoffed at by Liedems.Just like their other lie - "only by voting to remain in the UK could we stay in EU".  
Brexit for me is like waking up from a nightmare and realising it wasn't a nightmare. i've wasted years of my life having therapists try to drill into me that people AREN'T stupid and terrible and they AREN'T going to ruin my life  i KNEW it wasn't just in my head!! 
BREAKING: HM Government says UK leaving EU is "nothing to do with Brexit". 
If the Tories get #Brexit, they will break out of the backstop, quit the Customs Union & do a trade deal with the USA which will end the NHS because the USA will demand that US companies have full access to British healthcare which is exactly what the Tories want.#PeoplesVote 
Then there is this sudden change in Dan’s fortunes around Brexit.Have you enough journalist chops to investigate and challenge or are you a patsy too? 
If there's things good about #Brexit it's1. Ireland unified at last2. Scotland independent3. Gibraltar independent4. Wales independent5. England its own ParliamentThe Kingdom of England will always be welcomed back as a full EU member after restoring true democracy. 
Of course he cited GATT Article 24. Because when the country's hurtling towards a National Disaster Brexit you created, go with: No deal is fine because we'll have a deal... That makes sense.Article 24 requires BOTH parties to agree & just covers tariffs, not the Single Market.  
No doubt "it was Diesel" that made #Hitachi dump the 2.3bn Nuclear investment for Anglesey!!! LolNobody should be complacent, Japanese feel betrayed by #Brexit 
Shocking if true.If she seeks to delay Brexit, having already wasted 2 and a half years, we know that she is a Remainer at heart, determined to keep us in at all costs, and contemptuous of the will of 17.4m people who said LEAVE in 2016!!!!!!!!!  
@MarcusFysh adds: “I look forward to working with colleagues determined to come together on the detail of the ‘Malthouse Compromise’ proposals for an alternative backstop in the Brexit negotiations.” 4/6 
Remain and leave MPs working together to find a way to deliver a good #Brexit in accordance with the manifesto you stood on when elected and promised to deliver. Shameful? Embarrassing?It’s not the #MalthouseCompromise which fits that description. 
Leavers can dress it up as much as they like. the UK has made a historic mistake with Brexit and ignoring that fact won't change the outcome. 
.@Bill_Esterson from Labour’s frontbench calls on MPs from all parties to work together to find a Brexit compromise  
“It’s because of Brexit” Nissan“It’s got nothing to do with Brexit.” Brexiteer 
One moment the Tories find millions to offer as ‘bribes’ to MPs to back May’s botched Brexit deal. The next moment they secretly slash vital funding for early intervention knife programme as knife crime soars.You sure you don’t want a General Election? 
I honesty thought the first one was a comic genius until I realised it wasn’t a joke. Are the Brexit arguments any different?  
#BorisJohnson who literally has thrown #Brexit in the BIN and his OWN CHILDREN,. Then we’ve got    #NigelGarbageFarage who is on the verge of being arrested for Money Laundering, THEN we have  #JacobReesMogg  who is going to make a MINT on BTEXIT & Styles himself on HITLER. 
When the post-Brexit aid packages start to arrive in the UK for distribution among the impoverished, I hope Brexiters will have the decency to get to the back of the queue. 
EU agrees no-deal Brexit compensation for Irish farmers: report  
Oliver Letwin should keep his promise. Instead of battling against those who want to implement the referendum result, he should be helping them.  
Brexit is quite the accomplishment.Some of the richest, most out of touch predatory bastards in the country, have persuaded poor people to vote for something that will make them worst off believing they'll take back control.And our democracy wasn't strong enough to stop them. 
The economic crisis brewing in Italy will lead to default, exit from the euro, or both:  #Brexit 
So far today: Sajid Javid lied about techno fixes for the border, Arlene lied about movement from the EU on the backstop, Esther McVey lied about Nissan and Brexit and Daniel Kawczynski MP lied about the Marshall Plan.  Any more spotted by anyone? 
We had a Referendum.Then we had a National Conversation.Then we had "summer push" for independence.Soon there was the Growth Commission proposals.Followed by the 'Day of Action'.Now this (commercial) organisation.When will they get the message?  
Daniel Kawczynski, the Tory MP who made up his own 'alternative facts' about war reparations to argue for Brexit, is paid £6,000 per month by a billionaire gold speculator aka disaster capitalist. The "who funds you?" question is, as ever, vital in divining motives.  
If the Brexit fanatics really believed there was a technical solution they wouldn't object to the backstop. They clearly know this isn't possible but are not being honest about it.  
So basically, everybody that #skynews has asked in Sunderland basically don't care if Nissan actually closes, as long as they can have Brexit...? Fucking hell...  
Blatant scaremonging by @SkyNews. Not one Nissan job will be lost at Sunderland. Remainers and Reversers pile in with lies, scare stories and anti BREXIT propaganda. Sunderland still in favour of BREXIT, despite @SkyNews lying all day. 
National Farmers' Union president says she 'cannot imagine how bad' no-deal #Brexit would be for Britain's food and farmers  
Why @theresa_may’s cabinet expect her to announce within a few days that she will ask the EU to delay Brexit  
21 Savage trying to negotiate a better Brexit deal.  
I'm getting fed up of the media and remoaners dancing with joy at every bit of bad news which they can pin on Brexit. These scumbags want to see our country collapse so they can say "I told you so". I wish they would all f*ck off to their beloved EU. 
Sunderland vox pop on #ITVnews re the Nissan decision - woman blames 'too many people trying to stop Brexit. That's what's causing the uncertainty.' I don't believe this is stupidity. This is the opinion of someone who has been systematically lied to, and who believes the lies. 
Ok, if Brexit were to be cancelled, what could be the alternative "prize" for Leave having won the 2016 referendum? SERIOUS ANSWERS, if possible, please!For example, the Government could promise to pump £tens-of-billions into regenerating the poorer regions that voted Leave. 
My latest blog post is now up. GATT Article XXIV does not soften a no deal Brexit: 
Tune into Wesminster Hour now to hear Liberal Democrat Leader @vincecable on the latest developments in the Brexit crisis 
Brilliant work @alexisconran. One reason this kind of propaganda gained so much traction is too many people chose to laugh off the likes of Farage & Johnson as loud mouthed but harmless buffoons. Exposing their lies today remains just as important as it should've been back then. 
A Brit invading the music scene in America and securing the bag is the US post-Brexit trade deal we voted for!! #BritainMeansBusiness  
Annie Lennox, Chrissie Hynde: Brexit Poses ‘Significant Threat’ to UK Music Industry  via @RollingStone 
Fragile Tory truce over Brexit starts to crack as Eurosceptics suspect backstop back-pedalling  
Point of view?Is that what we are calling historically verifiable and documented facts now in Brexit Britain? 
For 'no deal' Brexit read: crashing out of the EU.#StopCrashOut #StopBrexit 
Frankfurt Office Market 2017 report: "We have yet to see an increase in the number of new leases signed by international banks in the wake of Brexit"  Another Remoaner myth down the drain, meanwhile banks are expanding space in London (14% above 10-year average in 2017)  
Hilary your comments are disingenuous and disappointing as you know full well that the Nissan news is nothing to do with Brexit and more to do with the general decline in car sales and in particular Diesel!  
Boris Johnson apparently stuffed 50 pages of Brexit-related notes and documents in a petrol station bin. Or so says the Mail.  
Owning the billionaires and migrant-baiters by *checks notes* delivering the Brexit they lied to hard to secure on a fucking silver platter.  
The more we question the legitimacy of #Brexit the more they will have to impose it. The more it becomes an imposition, the less legitimacy it will have. - #StopBrexit #RevokeA50 #RevokeArticle50 @LoubinWally @lunaperla @emmyzen @RemainingKind @RemainerCreates #FBPE @BrexitBin 
Surely can’t be true. The royals stayed in London during the Blitz but they’d leave because of Brexit?  
I have tweeted extensively about Nissan today. Read them all. You’ll better informed about the various factors behind this decision (Brexit played its part but so did growing sentiment against diesel). It will stop you jumping to premature conclusions!  
Here is a question from #remainernow Katie re a #peoplesvote on brexit.Answer - The only real reason why people oppose a second referendum is because they fear it will overturn the result. But if that's the case how does that fit with democracy?It's why a #FinalSay is needed. 
It’s my bedtime. Since the #FBPE folk rarely seem to sleep or take time off from their whingeing on my timeline about why they’re furious about Brexit, here’s a message just for them. Night night.  
My favourite bit of today was when I met a bishop and he crossed himself when someone said the word “Brexit”. 
Monday’s FT: Nissan retreat is warning sign of no-deal Brexit damage, May told #tomorrowspaperstoday 
This is a decent summary of Brexit and the stupid attitude of many in the UK right now.A great number of us have succumbed to a stubborn national pride and irrational belief that we are better off alone.It’s dangerous, tribal, irrational, and very sad. 
So who’s gonna be the one to ask if 21 savage voted for Brexit ? 
This is the most awful thing about what's happening that no-one is talking about. This is Brexit. "What a time to die"  
"I would have gotten away with evading brexit too if it weren't for you meddling kids"  
Is it as useful as a) your explanation on Britain not getting any Marshall Plan funds when in fact it got more than any other country, b) you holding up that "inefficient" EU lemon in that supermarket that turned out to be from South Africa or c) you asking Poland to veto Brexit? 
Queen to be EVACUATED in Brexit RIOTS!!!!! You what?!? Evacuate the Tories from Government!!!  
Short delay to Brexit Day acceptable, as long as Commons had already passed the second reading of the Withdrawal Agreement Bill, writes JRM...  
With respect @jeremycorbyn, no version of #Brexit will deliver job security, economic growth and an end to austerity. You’re complicit in the entire mess & unless you can lay your hands on a magic money tree, your manifesto promises are pure fantasy. #backLabourandMagic 
The impact of Brexit becomes ever clearer and that’s where we’re headed even though we didn’t vote for it. Independence is normal. We need to steer our own course.  
This reflects not only how desperate the establishment is to avoid genuine Brexit, but also how little respect the Saxe-Coburg-Gotha family has for the people of the UK  
So, those of you who want #Brexit - is this really what you are prepared to accept? People dying for the sake of bigotry, sovereignty, nationalism, and stupidity?  
OH, AND -Got fined £20,000 for doing a Brexit 
And sadly the workers cheered when Brexit was announced because Team Brexit told them a pile of lies. We are not gloating  at all but bloody fed up of being sneered at for fear-mongering when PREDICTING this sort of thing. Nobody is happy - nobody wins except for the very rich 
So 21 didn’t wanna vote during the EU referendum nah??? 
No love bug. We act like this scenario is hilarious and we're making light of it. Y'all act like this is an attack on the UK and that's making it even FUNNIER. Brexit my mentions.  
I live in Wales watching the fallout from Ford’s decision. How many more examples do people need to see the chaos Brexit will bring? 
These people want Brexit at any cost.  
Back after a week in Japan, where I witnessed concern and bewilderment of Japanese business about Brexit.Yes, decline of diesel played role in Nissan decision in Sunderland: but so did paralysing uncertainty and loss of friction-free access to Europe single market #NoDealBrexit 
Take the medicine Guy, it’s for your own good. Verhofstadt claims bloc could be 'DESTROYED' post-Brexit  
Just been quizzed on Brexit by Irish family. Their view thankfully is consistent with mine. They think Theresa May is utterly delusional and were laughing out loud at some of the newspaper headlines after winning her mandate vote last week. They see it as a rolling comedy. 
People of #LeedsNorthEastACTION: On Feb 9th visit your MP’s constituency office at 10am & hand-deliver a Valentine's Day Card to your MP asking for a #FinalSay on #Brexit with a #ValentinesVote#PeoplesVote#LoveNotLeave@cactus_woman here's a heart! Can you organise? 
21 savage not claiming the UK was the real Brexit 
How's your Brexit? Ye hivin a good yin, aye? 
I’ve no views on Brexit, just on facts  
Despite the delays, Brexit has already caused damage in these 5 areas  
We're talking about two separate ways to negotiate - threaten or trust. We've been threatening since the referendum, with no success whatsoever. Perhaps just for a while we could go down the trust route... 
It is not for Brexiteers to compromise, there are no compromises on independence, you are either an independent country or you are are not. Brexit was about taking back control,not asking the EU what we can have. Govt had almost 3yrs to negotiate Brexit, Country needs to move on. 
Reminder: Nissan had to take legal action against Vote Leave for illegally using their logo on pro-Brexit leaflets during the referendum, and for attributing false statements to the company. 
Are you finding yourself forever baffled as to why so many people are clamouring for a no deal Brexit, even as all signs point to it plunging them further into misery as Frogspawn Farage runs cackling to the hills?I decided to look into it: 
I will be discussing Brexit next steps with @JuliaHB1 on @talkRADIO tomorrow morning at 7am. 
This is  becoming the norm in London now .. while people sleep rough the Mayor is spunking money on fireworks ... cycle lanes .. moaning about Brexit .. needs to sort out London .. protect our kids from knife crime and help the rough sleepers   
Outrageous and not the first case like this I have heard of locally. Let’s just stop this, too many lives are being ripped apart by the charlatans who drove Brexit. Enough.  
If we don’t have a GE, a significant grouping of non aligned ‘centrist MPs’ could have a great influence over the kind of Brexit we get. If they have the guts to do it of course. 
Given how polarised the debate over Brexit is, and how obscure and technical many of the key conflicts are, I wonder how difficult it would be to get a substantial share of Leave or Remain voters to strongly support or oppose a wholly invented proposal? 
21 Brexit 
21 Savage on BBC trying to get us a good Brexit deal  
We cannot let Brexit risk a hard border in Northern Ireland - and apparently @theresa_may agrees. Sign our @OFOCNI petition calling on the peace process to be respected  
Sometimes you need to forgive & forget. To win the next independence referendum we need former no voters to join us. Please folks when this happens please welcome them with open arms. Don't give them a hard time. We have all made mistakes in our past. 
Wrong again. The only Labour MPs who have betrayed me are the 172 "moderates" who deliberately sabotaged any chance of Labour winning the 2017 General Election. If they had got behind Corbyn from the beginning, Labour would be in charge of #Brexit negotiations, not the Tories.  
Just a reminder that the U.K. is set to leave the EU next month with No-Deal, by default, because May and Corbyn will not accept that Brexit was a fraudulent, con-job that is not what people voted for. 
MPs will have to respect the will of the electorate and deliver Brexit because the British people are not going to put with this for much longer.  
Anybody know why Nissan would be pulling out of the UK?I mean, I know the EU's massive FREE TRADE DEAL with Japan kicked in on Friday and that any cars exported from the UK will have a 9.8% #Brexit tariff slapped on them at the end of next month, but....Oh. 
I do hope you all sorted the world out while I was away. What’s happening with Brexit? Has nothing changed by any chance? 
Whatever one’s view on Brexit, it’s surely worrying when an elected representative caught making an argument based on something obviously, clearly untrue feels they can brazen it out like this.  
Next time there's an article about northern voters causing Brexit, remember that only about 28% of the English population lives in the north. Northern towns may have voted Leave in higher percentages, but the *bulk* of the Leave vote came from the south and Midlands.  
The Royal Family weren't evacuated during the blitz. We are facing the kind of food shortages that German U-boats imposed on us. We have gone to war with ourselves. We depth-charged the U-boats, what should we do to our government? #PeoplesVote #Brexit  
Apparently the plan to evacuate he Queen and senior royals from London in the case of a no deal Brexit is based on a Cold War Plan to rescue them in the eventuality of a Soviet nuclear strike. Laugh? I could cry my eyes out.Would Remainers attack the Palace? Led by Soubry? Ha!Ha! 
British MPs condemn imminent Catalan referendum trial  
Is Brexit a shambles? @theresa_may 
The Tories have cut the Police 21,000 Coppers gone, they’ve cut early intervention as the country is in the middle of a knife crime epidemic and Tory Brexit!!! FFS!!! Cuts to police tax cuts for Tory Billionaires!! Less Safe Britain Wake UP!!  
Welcome to new followers! Thanks for standing with this German against the shameful rhetoric coming from some politicians. But Brexit hasn’t just unleashed anti-German sentiments. So please join in and say #HandsOff! Become an #EUcitizensChampion today   
So she's gonna.....Brexit?Does she have a..... plan?  
Sick of the underlying problems of this country and the political mess Brexit has created? Did you know @TheGreenParty are working on a written UK constitution like other democracies? @MollyMEP @CarolineLucas @SalisburyGreens 
Do not delete this Alt-Reich, populist, nationalist, dog whistling propaganda @DKShrewsbury. There may be some people, perhaps even your own constituents, as yet unaware of how much of a rancid stain you and your fellow Brexit scammers are on the UK.  
It's been quite fascinating to observe expectations for #Brexit Britain being seamlessly managed downwards from guaranteed Imperial glory to "we'll survive" (provided we're able to muster the spirit that was needed to endure the merciless onslaught of the Luftwaffe, of course).  
Pulse scandal typifies why CFP's a disaster Post-Brexit ban shows leaving can deliver real environmental gainGovt must also scrap EU Quotas & go to discard free policyLimiting hours at sea in return for landing & recording all catchesSee All  
And this is not a Nat point. I clearly recall very committed unionists - Kenny Farquharson and Hugo Rifkind, I think, possibly Alex Massie - say essentially this: the Britain that doesn't allow a referendum will not be the Britain for which they've argued. 
Brexit in a tweet. 
"A new party would be a huge risk to anyone considering it. But maybe, after the turbulence of Brexit and a gaping hole in the centre ground of British politics, it is a risk worth taking."  
I’ll be even more explicit: if you voted for Brexit in the hopes of getting rid of immigrants and now you are losing your job, I literally couldn’t care less. My sympathy is reserved for people who will be hurt by Brexit who did absolutely nothing to bring it about. 
Horrid lying slattern @theresa_may is a vile pile of filth, with her pretence that 80% voted for #Brexit parties. The sleazy skank knows very well that @UKLabour members are 80% opposed to her scam. 
Brexit is effectively Britain’s own Fyre Festival. 
BREXIT WARNING: Rees-Mogg's ERG to DESTROY May’s deal - ‘We're going back to SQUARE ONE!’  
Farmers are warning that a no-deal Brexit would be "savage" as they call for assurances on Britain's commitment to high animal welfare standards   
Do you really understand the meaning of the word fact?It has bugger all to do with Brexit! Do you enjoy talking our country down just to try and stop Brexit?  
Well then... I guess that rules out the 2016 referendum then...  
Brexit as sold in the referendum by Brexiteers is so good for the country they are now planning to Evacuate from London the Queen. A Cold War / WW2 scenario. A true Take back control !  
So Brexit is now on a par with ...  cancer? Was that on the side of a bus too??  
The vast majority of Yes supporters and SNP supporters are very happy to welcome those who have changed their minds. If no one changed their mind, then the referendum result would stay the same! So welcome aboard. 
From Briefings for Brexit'Some MPs continue to have the same attitude to No Deal as a frightened toddler has to the dark..'Beautifully put....#NoDealNoProblem 
Just had a thought. The Bosman ruling meant that footballers could move freely to a new club at the end of their contract. It was applicable to players within the EU not including Malta. Has anyone bothered to consider the impact if any Brexit will have on Bosman in the UK? 
Opinion: Nissan’s Sunderland snub is further proof of the Tories’ Brexit shortcomings  
Complete pack of lies. The X Trail will not be built anywhere in Europe, maybe not even in Asia. Its market has fallen through the floor. Nothing to do with Brexit  
The exodus from London is getting real (via @bopinion) 
My dad and I have been Brexit-proofing my garden - extending the  vegetable bed. Growing more greens is my one tiny positive response to all this doom-mongering. Thanks to Mandy @IncredibleVeg for the lovely perennial kale plants. 
Really glad we've learned that Jacob Rees-Mogg, who has never worked in the car industry, knows more about why Nissan cancelled the X-Trail than Hideyuki Sakamoto, who is "Nissan’s executive vice-president for manufacturing & supply chain management," who said Brexit is a factor. 
 via @telegraphnewsMacron is to hold a referendum in France on how long MP’s can stay in the French Parliament and how many MP’s there should be.I think he is missing the real reason that the French ppl are rioting.They want you to go Macron. 
Belief the Brexit referendum was corrupted and cannot be relied on is growing. How shameful is it that those who pass our laws have so little regard for them. That those who represent us have so little concern our democracy has been hijacked, that they barely mention it. 
Family of bullied Syrian boy forced to move after threats. Jamal’s father warned that other Syrian families in Huddersfield were facing persecution.This is the sick ignorant bigotry of Brexit Britain. #Brexit rewards the bigots. We must stop it.#FBPE. 
When it comes to how the #Backstop problem gets solved, again @ajcdeane nails reality. This is how this plays out now for TM and her #Brexit #WithdrawalAgreement.Alex has always been consistent with the view that negotiations would go to the 11th hour.#BBCDateline 2/2 
THIS >>>> (Beware the ‘Blame bad news on Brexit’ business bullsh*tters...)  
French referendum "con". A referendum to stop the Gilets Jaunes would simply ask voters if they want to reduce the number of MPs and limit the number of terms they could serve. Both were campaign pledges by Mr Macron anyway.  via @telegraphnews 
No, we will be closer to your deselection  @NickBoles More people want the full proper #Brexit proposed by the ERG which is what the #Leavers voted for than your Non #Brexit which neither the public, the @Conservative voters manifesto nor your constituents/Association want 
So you reincarnated eunuchs want to disavow your supreme leader at the 11th hour. Not so fast. The Sit-at-home order stands on Feb 16 in biafra. No referendum, No election. .We love our Jubril from Sudan, why are you ashamed of your Aboubacar from Cameroun? 
Time is running out! Dump the LabCon Brexit #DemocRobbery 
Any news of companies setting up in the UK, because of the opportunities afforded via Brexit..........thought not. 
British MPs condemn imminent Catalan referendum trial  
As Brexit looms, the Rock is in a hard place. In Gibraltar, a British territory, 96 percent of the population voted against Brexit, but they are also adamantly opposed to joint rule by Spain. It might be time to reconsider.  
Forget @BBC. They have their own problems with BREXIT. Forget @CNN. They are still battling with Trump. Nobody will leave the problems in his own farm to come and attend to the problems in your own farm. Let’s brainstorm on how to take over the game, not staying away from it. 
SEVEN MONTHS on and only a BANANA REPUBLIC would DOWNPLAY CONCERNS over their attempts to deliver a major constitutional change predicated on a vote procured by campaigns under active investigations by the Police & NCA after being found guilty to a CRIMINAL STANDARD OF PROOF. 
 Michael Russell @feorlean: "In Scotland we need to take the next and final vital step away from Brexit dependence, which can only be done by choosing the normality of independence." 
One weird feature of Brexit that a good historian will one day have to capture is the fact that the most outlandish, surreal, polarising political events all pivoted around a Prime Minister who was a complete cultural and charismatic vacuum. 
MURRAY FOOTE ‘Brexit is a choice. But it’s not Scotland’s choice. Throughout this unfolding calamity, the Westminster Government has treated Scotland’s democratic preferences with shameful contempt.'  
Six months ago I started this account to chronicle escaping Brexit and moving to Berlin, as well as helping others do the same.Had no idea nearly 10,000 of you would be interested in it. I'm very humbled and I love you all.  
And here's @bphillipsonMP telling the truth about Brexit rather than concealing it. Shouldn't MPs do this? As @annaturley, another NE MP, once said to me "I'm not going to punch my constituents in the face, even if they ask to be punched in the face" 
Has the BBC’s handling of Brexit made you opposed to the licence fee? 
Tory HQ Draw Up Plans to Delay Brexit and Fight June 6th Election  
BIAFRA REFERENDUM hits Delta stateJubilation in Delta state as IPOB Delta state conducts a mock referendum on 3rd February, 2019 as many voted for Biafra. Biafra referendum is a done deal and Biafra restoration is imminent. #SitAtHome#BiafraReferendum#NoVoteInBiafraland 
"Surely only when the detailed legislation has been passed by the House can we go to the people and say to them: Is this what you said you wanted?"- Iain Duncan Smith on the need to seek #informedconsent from the people once the details of a referendum are decided by parliament.  
MPs be warned: There will be a relentless campaign to jail every MP who has connived in pushing through a criminal and crooked #Brexit against the will of the majority. We will never accept the legitimacy or legality of what is being done to our country.#PeoplesVote #FBPE 
This is why you'll never understand the outcome of the referendum. IT WASN'T ABOUT THE MONEY OR JOBS! It was Treason to hand our sovereign nation over to the EU without the people having a say. We have now had our say and it was to LEAVE! I knew what I was voting for, FREEDOM 
I don’t know a single Remainer that is rejoicing. Surely what’s more nauseating is that brexiters are denying it’s brexit related & are still peddling their No Deal agenda in full knowledge that there will more of this to come?  
It's time to put this idea to rest, before someone writes it on the side of a bus (via @bopinion) 
The financial skulduggery behind Brexit, the EU referendum, opinion polls, the links between politicians and hedge funds  is yet to be fully investigated. Our lives don't matter to these punters as they manipulate markets and public opinion to make money. 
When remainers keep bleating- ''name some benefits of Brexit'' - this is the best by far!  
This lie - that Brexit has nothing to do with Nissan's decision - is being actively promoted by @BBCNews Radio 4 7pm news led on an interview with Jacob Rees-Mogg claiming that the decision was all to do with internal Nissan politics. Disgraceful pro- Brexit bias from @BBCNews 
“Being part of the family” isn’t quite how it was...#brexit  
Juncker has said that the Brexit negotiations are about ‘punishing deserters’. But we rats are deserting a sinking ship. 
And it seems Kawczynski's willingness to lie for #Brexit may be linked to the use of gold as a hedge against financial turmoil.  
Brexit: Theresa May 'Determined' To Leave EU On Time  Well leaving on a BRINO which keeps UK under EU control is not and never will be BREXIT 
The BBC has been blasted by MPs over missing records about a controversial tax scheme for 100 highly-paid starsYet they keep pumping out anti-Brexit nonsense, allowing Lineker to do the same and now demand that over-75s pay for the TV licenceShameful! 
I'm as worried about the consequences of a No Deal Brexit as anyone, but I really don't see how giving the Queen an enema is going to help anything.  
We are the world hub for gold.In some months our exports of gold is bigger than all our other physical exports put together.The uptick in exports after the referendum, was gold.Gold shows up as non EU imports/exports.Distorting the figures between world trade and EU trade. 
This sounds like a sensible #Brexit compromise. Well done ⁦@Jacob_Rees_Mogg⁩ 
Any single company decision to invest or not in the UK is going to have multiple factors only one of which will be Brexit.You need to look at whether there is a trend 
2.5k RTs for a thread on the constitutional intricacies of Brexit. Truly these are fascinating times.Many thanks to all for the RTs and replies and sorry to those I haven’t acknowledge — I was unprepared for the deluge. Doubt I’ll top this but I will be back with more soon.  
Brexit is against the elite, correct? So its figurehead is a titled Etonian who went to Oxford, runs a hedge fund and is worth £100 million. You couldn’t make British hypocrisy any stronger. 
Remember that the Belfast Agreement hardly even mentions the border OR the EU & has nothing whatsoever to say about trade/tariff arrangements! The whole Belfast Agreement/Brexit panic/threat is bogus and a completely dishonest/ignorant 'red herring'!  … . 
As @Dr_PhilippaW was pointing out in parliament only a few weeks ago. You can't stockpile certain meds, which means they will run short and people will suffer.This cancer patient has been told she will unlikely get cancer treatment due to Brexit shortages.  
Exciting news!!Subject to news changes (we  brexit) I will be on ITV news live tomorrow afternoon and evening talking about Mental Health, my charity and an announcement from the Department of Education on wellbeing lessons. Tune in!!  
People of South Shields!!ACTION: On Feb 9th visit your MP’s constituency office at 10am & hand-deliver a Valentine's Day Card to your MP asking for a #FinalSay on #Brexit with a #ValentinesVote#PeoplesVote#LoveNotLeave@GuitarMoog do you know anyone who'll get involved? 
I kukuma have my PVC and I will vote, referendum kee dem there! Tshior!  
Dear @BBCNews, when a car factory announces it’s moving production to another country, I REALLY don’t want to hear Jacob Rees-Mogg instantly announcing that it has nothing whatsoever to do with Brexit, as if he actually knew something about it. Tiny tip: HE DOESN’T! 
Love how the fucking Brexit arsegapes claim to know more about Nissan’s decision to cancel their plans to make a particular car in the UK than the guy from fucking Nissan. 
Reality has an inherent anti Brexit bias.  
On the face of it, the statement is uncontroversial. But it's significant the government of the world's fifth-largest economy must reassure people they'll have food in two months' time 
I hate what Brexit is doing, and will continue to do, to this country.I have NEVER seen this country so divided. 
Here's @MPphilwilson a northern Labour MP, who breaks with the media stereotype by telling his constituents the truth about Brexit, rather than pandering to their fantasies and asking for bribes. If you lived in the north east, wouldn't you want that? 
"The collective madness behind Britain’s latest Brexit plan"#Brexit is what happens when immoral political hacks play on the prejudices of uniformed and ignorant voters. It's the British version of Trumpism. The only cure for either is brutal reality.  
On my way to Brussels with the Brexit Committee. Tomorrow we are questioning Martin Selmayr and Guy Verhofstadt. 
Tell me, what are your current thoughts about a no-deal Brexit?  
In the referendum, Mel voted to remain because she saw the value of the work and support of all her EU colleagues in the NHS. She’s now very worried and upset about the future and of the impact of Brexit on the NHS without her EU colleagues.  #BrexitIsPersonal    /1 
Would it be an enema of the people? #brexit  
UK PM May will seek 'pragmatic' solution to Brexit deal in Brussels  
Labour MPs to voice concerns over party's Brexit 'ambiguity'  
The UK joined what we now know as the EU on 1 January 1973. The Treaty of Accession had been signed previously by the Tory Government in 1972. The British people were never given an opportunity to vote on this most important topic in isolation. There was NO Referendum. 
@NickyMorgan01 You are such a disappointment. Muddled thinking.You are a City lawyer.  You know full well how bad and how dangerous May’s WA is.  YOU KNOW IT.The alternarive to her bad deal is not NO DEAL but NO BREXIT or a #PeoplesVote if you are too weak to #revokeA50 
The EU is too scared to be interviewed  It's not a surprise they can't defend their negotiating position.Join the fastest growing Brexit movement @  
Brexit is 1300 hours away. #brexit 
Read The Secret Plan To Airlift The Queen Out Of London If 'Hard Brexit' Becomes A Reality  
Ben Jennings on reports the Queen could be evacuated if Brexit turns ugly – #Queen #TheresaMay #Tories #Brexit #BrexitShambles - political cartoon gallery in London  
No compromise needed.We voted to #LEAVE.Not to be half in & half out because arrogant, self important, treacherous MPs think they know better than the 17.4m.MPs passed the #Brexit decision to us.MPs need to carry out our instructions.If they don't the MP's will be voted out.  
“If we have no-deal Brexit, and we could not share that information, and if we lose access to those systems, it will inevitably make the UK and Europe less safe than it is today.” DAC Neil Basu, UK counter terror lead, 23 Jan 
OK, the last post from me today on #Nissan. This, from that infamous Brexiteer rag *the Financial Times*, explains the specific problems behind the decision on the X-Trail. If you still want to blame this on #Brexit, there's nothing more I can do for you.  
Get's better as we learn more. It appears government and the BBC put out the bullshit about brexit being responsible for Sunderland not building the latest smoking diesel car when it happens to be the fact that diesel regs in Britain don't make it viable. Sick of the BBC & tories 
#ProjectFear Never ending Project Fear nonsense 24/7 all getting bored same bollocks morning noon & night. BIAS BBC, Sky News, other channels. Worst of the lot LBC all day & night brexit bashing & Project Fear on.  Shut up FFS. 17.4 million voted leave EU. Just get on and do it.  
Think of all the money that has been wasted on brexit, will be lost and won't go to*NHS*Education *Welfare *Police*Fire Service 
Just remembered that Brexiteer plan to set the date for an election after March 29 so no-deal Brexit couldn’t be blocked by an incoming government. Also had the side-effect of scheduling the biggest peacetime economic catastrophe for the middle of an election campaign 
UK officials dust off emergency evacuation plans for Queen Elizabeth in case of Brexit unrest  
Brexit Special .  
A new polling organisation gathering data on Scotland’s views on independence has been launched by the SNP's former Westminster leader Angus Robertson, as First Minister, Nicola Sturgeon, prepares to set out her thinking on a second indy referendum.  
I will be in Parliament & apologies to constituents for cancelling meetings that week. Shameful failure on part of Govt though to tackle the critical legislative backlog. No Brexit legislation scheduled in Commons chamber this week; just running down the clock to No Deal  
The Shadow Health Secretary has cited a 208% increase in diseases such as scarlet fever, amid austerity policies imposed by the current Conservative government.@AyeshaHazarika | @JonAshworth | #Brexit 
Every form of Brexit will lead to companies reducing investment in the UK and, ultimately, jobs being lost. It’s about time politicians were unambiguous with the British people: Brexit - whichever flavour - is a disaster. Uncertainty is an issue, but Brexit is the problem.  
Here is a typical example of a charlatan. If he genuinely cared about Brexit, he would have used his energy attacking the Tories/May over the past few years. It’s all so pathetically sad to see someone behave like this. But he needs our compassion. #Pray4Jo 
Queen Elizabeth would be evacuated in the event of #Brexit riots  
Because your own party leader believes a no deal Brexit would be an "unmitigated disaster". Hence, if it comes to a choice between any deal and no deal then, well, you've got a choice to make...  
First you threaten us with Poland, now we discover that you’ll gain massively from no-deal Brexit. You need deselecting.How’s your gold, traitor?@Conservatives 
Brexit has already lost the jobs Nissan was doing to bring. The Tories are job killers.  
As predicted ERG hardliners are getting ready to reject any new deal that the PM might secure. So on 14 Feb we will be back where we started but 2 weeks closer to their real goal which is a no-deal Brexit.  
BBC presenter tries to shut down JRM when he starts to criticise their. coverage of Brexit.  
Worth watching this video from @JulieElliottMP on the realities that Brexit is causing for thousands of workers in the NE. This is no longer project fear, but project reality for families like mine who work at the plant. @FFSake_ 
Why should ⁦@theSNP⁩ play by ⁦@Theresa_may⁩ rules? Our mandate is not to avoid #NoDeal but to avoid #Brexit. Scotland’s future lies as an equal member of the #EU not an unequal member of the U.K. #Brexit #indyref2 
‘Tell Gary Linkeker to f*** off!’ Cardiff boss Warnock lays into #BBC's ignoramus Neoliberal Globalist Fascist stooge after #Brexit jibe.The atmosphere within the BBC is by all accounts toxic - no wonder so many employees are ignorant brainwashed morons 
It has been more than two and a half years since 17.4m voters told politicians to leave the EU. Now they're plotting to delay it even further. Stop messing the British people around and get ready for a clean WTO Brexit on March 29!  
Why does @DKShrewsbury, with no discernible background in gold be paid £6k a year by Kaplan?Brexit chaos, of course, increases the value of such resources as the GDP devalues.  
Everyone but himself: #Macron blames aliens, #Brexit, social media & #Russia for #YellowVests Not pathetic leadership, taxation or his blind arrogance 
Nobody will want invade Britain after Brexit as there’ll be nothing to steal, confirms Javid 
Fellow Remainers, I think wherever there is space we should refer to a "crooked" or "criminal" Brexit. During the run-up to the referendum the right-wing press relentlessly linked immigration with "illegal" - a tactic which proved very effective. #PeoplesVote #Brexit #FBPE 
Juncker’s team BANS EU members from making ‘MINI-DEALS’ with UK as Brexit panic sets in  
A huge blow for Sunderland and the north east. Painful proof that the government's failure on Brexit is hurting investment in the areas that need it most.  
Of the 4 products, 3 are from #Spain! Today, #UK duty payable: 0%. In a no-deal #Brexit, #Tomatoes 8.8%, #Clementine 16%, #Cucumber 12.80%. Add some extra cost for red tape (2x customs formalities). Will food prices for my weekly shipping go up for down in a no deal #Brexit? #EU 
The truth is as ever more complicated than Twitter partisans would like. I would add one point to this fair summary by @afneil : it would be crazy to add to car manufacturers’ woes by contemplating a no-deal Brexit  
Like him or hate him, agree with Brexit or not, he’s one of the few with the balls to stand up and say it how it is   
Fact: EU-Japan FTA came into force last week which means #Nissan X-Trails now enter EU market directly from Japan with a 0% tariff versus risk of 10% tariff under WTO/No Deal Brexit. People of Sunderland & elsewhere need to give their #InformedConsent to this Brexit #RightToVote 
Forget the army forget the police this will be Britain with a no deal Brexit.  
A good counter to this story would be to list all the jobs coming to the UK because companies are excited about the opportunities from brexit.Oh. 
As my German friend just said after reading this headline appalled: "What the hell! What kind of language are you using! Get a f'cking grip !!!"May vows to ‘battle for Britain and Northern Ireland’ in Brussels Brexit talks  
The Tories’ own business minister says business is at breaking point over Brexit - We must rule out a hard exit.  
We are likely to see more announcements by firms of operations moving out of the UK, particularly if we don’t stop a no deal Brexit. This is what uncertainty about our future relationship with the EU is doing to the future of our economy and the jobs it sustains. 
Believe it or not, this article is 100% true. Have a read and share. The Queen Could be Evacuated if Elves on Unicorns Can’t Solve Brexit For May  
I'll lose my EHIC as an Irish resident in the UK, since it depends on country of residence rather than nationality. I travel a lot in the EU so it's important to me. Other UK-dwelling Irish migrants should be aware of this. Yet another joyous Brexit dividend.  
Look at the attentiveness of Verhofstadt, and his colleagues beside him who usually pretend to play with their phones when he speaks. And observe Juncker, Barnier and the Commission behind them. They’re attentive as they know @Nigel_Farage represents Brexit Britain, not May 
Google it . The EU are biggest trading block , consumer protections, workers rights , rights as a citizen, freedom of movement etc. None of your problems or UKs have anything to do with the EU . Brexit is all about tax dodging and avoiding anti money laundering laws  
Translation: Nissan’s made a business decision not a Brexit decision. If you need someone to blame, go looking for environmental fanatics and anti-diesel tree-huggers.  
Not at all - and the so-called inevitability of something that is as illogical and stupid as Brexit I'd say is very questionable. Brexiters still dont know what they want ( except the tax dodgers) leaving the EU will not deliver them what they were promised. Wait and watch  
A year ago Macron admitted the French would  'probably' vote to leave EU. Referendum denied. Now he has the Gilets Jaunes instead. Nice one Napoleon.  
#JeremyCorbyn chooses #terrorists over #Brexit meeting with #British PM #LabourAntisemitism #CorbynTreason #BritishMustWakeUP   POLITICIANS JEOPARDIZING THE #SAFETY OF THE #WEST = #TREASON 
This is the most effective anti-Brexit campaign I've seen so far. If any evidence was needed, @mogg_jacob is seriously annoyed by it. Please support any way you can. If you're lucky enough to be rich, give £££! 
The guy who flies in private jets and holds his birthday parties at the Ritz, claiming to be the man of the people???I’ll be directing all the people who lose their jobs after Brexit to where you live in London, Nigel. You’ll be okay with that, right??? 
Nissan's decision to switch production of new X-Trail model from Sunderland to Japan, due to continuing uncertainty over #Brexit is "blow to whole of North East economy"  
Brexit has shown the world a political class like a ship of fools without a captain. It is too generous to say that May has trouble measuring up to the moment. Corbyn is similarly ineffectual, unready to meet the leadership tests — 2 clueless party leaders  
It's amazing to see the hostility against young people exploring the continent that's cheapest for us to get to, from the very same people who claim Brexit was supposed to make us fairer and more outward-looking. 
The head of HMRC has repeatedly said that Brexit requires no additional border infrastructure. His Irish equivalent has said he is ‘almost 100% certain’ of the same. The WTO visited Ireland last year and confirmed this.Meanwhile the Withdrawal Agreement breaks the Good Friday one 
Cancer is now survivable for many but I wouldn’t choose to have it. Fox makes no sense. We do have a simple binary choice over Brexit & for over half the country the obvious choice is Remain. We are a trillion miles away from the stupid childish promises of 2016#BrexitMeansLies 
Leave want to destroy our higj animal welfare and food standards for their Brexit vanity project. #PeoplesVote 
No deal #Brexit explained   
Hysterical ... and true #brexit  
wondering wtf the good people of @scarfolk are up to next now that they seem to be running the U.K. government and major news organs ‘streets awash in rubbish after brexit’ easily one of their better gags 
If No Deal HappensGovernment: In a national crisis, patriots accept the need for NHS privatisation, austerity etcFar-Right Brexiters: You're poorer because liberals ruined Brexit & the EU wants to hurt usFar-Left Brexiters: We'll save you from the disaster we facilitated 
Nissan..... Please tell the truth,be honourable & say this decision has nothing to do with Brexit, it's just a pragmatic business decision in the light of anti diesel findings. No doubt the EU & French arm of your business encouraged your timing of this announcement though. 
Liam Fox warns of "disruption" in the event of a no-deal Brexit but insists it would be "survivable"  
Wrong Barbara,we focused our influence on the strong side of the negotiating table, the EU side. SF were central to securing the EU negotiating position on Ireland through our place to the Brexit Steering Group of the EU Parliament and work of our MEPs particularly @M_AndersonSF 
Lichsteiner makes the Brexit negotiations look quick. 
I see that Israel is responding to the growing #BoycottEurovision2019 campaign by bringing out credible cultural influencers like *checks notes* the guy who spearheaded the youth Brexit campaign and was found to have broken electoral law by overspending  
You will also see a relentless campaign to jail every MP who has connived in pushing through a criminal and crooked #Brexit against the will of the majority. We will never accept the legitimacy or legality of what is being done to our country. 
After Brexit the Irish under Enda Kenny cooperated with the UK in drawing up plans to keep an invisible border:authorised economic operator and trusted trader schemes;continued checks away from the border; and derogations for small firms.Varadkar ended all this for political gain 
Just unbelievable that Esther McVey attempted to deny Nissan's withdrawal from UK is to do with Brexit, Nissan said it is #PeoplesVote #StopCrashOut #PeoplesVote 
Phew! Brexit will be OK after all...UK and Faroe Islands sign trade continuity agreement  
If this Nissan decision has nothing to do with #Brexit, why does their management tell workers that #Brexit uncertainty is holding back investment when informing them about the decision?  
A member of *UK Parliament* does not realize the UK was the biggest recipient of the Marshall Plan. In fact, the UK was so grateful they created @MarshallScholar program. Many Americans like me benefited, and that's why I live in the UK now.Another Brexit delusion.  
All the ‘What does the Nissan announcement mean for Brexit’ back and forth is a bit dull. Let’s be clear. No Deal Brexit equals good bye to car firms unless there’s a big enough intra U.K. market. 
"Brexit: How the poor idiots got it wrong." Brilliant!!!   
Meanwhile you came to the North East and promised people a “jobs first Brexit”, something that simply doesn’t exist @jeremycorbyn. Nissan made clear this is about Brexit. You still support Brexit too. So stop lying to people: this is on you too.  
BBC BIAS: Farage has BRILLIANT response after BBC fails to broadcast his Brexit speech  
“Brexit hurts women most” is actually patronising. Why would sovereignty, including the right to abolish the tampon tax, hurt women? Why would ensuring my Parliament rules my country rather than a man who gets drunk and ruffles women’s hair hurt women? Equality = equal vote. 
By this point, any politician or journalist who says Labour's Brexit policy is unclear after Labour has been repeating the SAME policy for over a year is either being wilfully misleading or displaying their ignorance/incompetence on the matter.  
You missed one...Ensure a  Brexit happens and have no money for anything on your list 
I’m going to have to stop thinking about brexit soon before my head explodes, but I’ll never understand the argument on the left that labour can’t campaign for a second ref because they’ll lose leave votes.it’s about what is right and wrong for those who’ll be most affected. 
People claimed we've changed our minds on Brexit. The way the EU has acted has done exactly that. Did you vote remain but would vote to leave now?Drop me an email: steven@leavemeansleave.eu with a 30 second video on selfie mode explaining why to use on our social media. 
Ladies, gentlemen, brothers & sisters, Brexit comments that exemplify Godwin's law are no longer mere products of deranged cranks. Indeed, they are increasingly signs of someone able to read the writing on the wall. Ciaran is nothing if not level-headed. #StopBrexitSaveDemocracy 
Almost 240,000 people voted for Sinn Féin in last Westminster election,supporting our abstentionist ticket. Westminster cares not for the North or it’s people. That’s become more transparent during the brexit chaos. If ever there were a time to support abstentionism, it’s now.  
Great thread on who *really* lied to us about Brexit   
“Is it worth it? Let me work itI put my thing down, flip it and reverse it” - Missy Elliott on Brexit 
"Sit at home and be counted for referendum"The most stupid thing I've heard all yearBut when "Python dance" comes he'll be dancing in UK but you'll be dancing inside a stream with lashes on your back.I seriously feel for blind followers. Modern day SLAVERY. 
Yep Brexit caused the so called climate change issue which has seen Diesel engines / Cars demonised resulting in a huge reduction in car sales hence this move by Nissan , a story gladly jumped on by remain globalists typically avoiding the true cause #WTOBrexit  
Jobs Last #Brexit more likely.ALL versions Remove Rights, Undermine Jobs & Public Services & leave us Worse Off.So tired of these Complicit #Lexit fantasists.Not one has ever explained how they can protect rights if not in power & a Tory Govt Removes Rights w/o Appeal 2 ECJ. 
You just know that if brexit wasn't on the cards the Remain Ultratwats would be fuming about how the attack on diesels has damaged the car industry.But their new religion (Remain Ultratwatness™) means they have no choice but to blame brexit.Will they ever recover from this? 
A bunch of clowns discuss Brexit. We ask attendees of the annual Joseph Grimaldi clown memorial about their thoughts on the Westminster politicians that occasionally get compared to them.  
brexit negotiations, simplified: the uk: we want out of the eu!the eu: okthe uk: we want a deal to make sure everyone is satisfied!!the eu: okthe uk: we want all the benefits the eu brings, including access to the single market but none of the downsides!!the eu: nothe uk:  
Another thing to cheer us, just in case you missed it & Brexit is getting you down. Neil Patrick Harris - 2013 - Tony Awards Opening - HD  via @YouTube 
May will seek 'pragmatic' solution to Brexit deal in Brussels  
I'll quote your branch managers words "If the Scottish Parliament votes for another referendum it would be wrong for anyone to refuse" (or similar words). So are you lying now or were you lying then?  
So, the 'secret reassurances' given to Nissan by the UK govt which likely included more subsidies (accelerated corp welfare being key to the post-#Brexit scenario) still aren't enough to persuade them to stay on a sinking ship... Will the price of 'assurances' now rise further?  
My latest Brexit Blog post. The current impasse is the result of Brexiter falsehoods colliding with reality. The EU are finally doing what the UK polity and media have mainly failed to do - stand up to Brexiter misinformation, distortion and lies:  
Not having Aguero. Bad.Not having Aguero when he's mass captained. Really fucking Bad.Not having Aguero when he's mass captained in a double game week. Absolutely fucking terrible.Not having Aguero when he's triple captained in a double game week.Brexit.#FPL 
NEast businesses to rally in Teesside on 15th Feb with 75+ leaders calling for delay/revocation of A50 to sort Brexit mess as #Nissan confirms #Brexit damage reality. Govt impact studies confirm No deal/PM’s bad deal make UK worse off v status quo. #PeoplesVote a serious option 
Interesting that Nissan chooses Japan over UK to build new X-Trail car. #Brexit will not have been the only factor in this decision but it has clearly played a part. The new EU-Japan trade agreement also makes it easier to supply EU markets from Japan.  
Dear ERG perhaps you've not worked out that by saying U can't accept a BackStop you're admitting there's no Technical Solution to the Irish Border!I however have the perfect solution.#RevokeA50 #StopBrexit & #Remain in Control in the EU with our Best Ever Deal.#Brexit Britain 
PLEASE RETWEET THE TRUE NISSAN FACTSHere is Nissan's statement below.> No jobs lost> Decision taken for "business reasons" (Brexit NOT one of them)We all know demand for big diesels has nosedived, the market is evaporating.Ignore Remainers blaming this on Brexit.  
Crispin Oddey, one of the multi-millionaires who bankrolled Brexit, made £220 million overnight betting against the pound on the night of the referendumWe are all meanwhile paying 15% more for all our imported food, petrol, clothesYet somehow leave voters think they won? 
Just to be clear for #brextremists because you may now be confused. Night follows day and day follows night... and so on. It is important you take this on board so you can understand the next point. Brexit loses jobs. Many of them.#FBPE 
This thread by @DavidHenigUK, who knows a thing or two about #trade, explains the effects of a #nodeal #brexit. Have no doubt, the impact on jobs and the #UK economy, which David mentions only in passim, will be, if possible, even more drastic. #BrexitShambles 
I was 15 years old when my father and brother took part in the miners strike. I witnessed first hand men, women, families and whole communities crumble. It was very distressing to watch.We are again on the precipice of awfulness. The dread returns.#Brexit#Tears 
You really have got a bad case of Brexit Derangement Syndrome! At least if you're going to respond, engage with the argument rather than assume Brexit is to blame for everything. Is that too much to ask? 
Do you know one way you can tell the Brexit narrative is being driven by rich elites?They're arguing that ending free movement won't limit Brits' ability to work in countries abroad. To us that's insane, but for them... A 30K minimum salary requirement wouldn't even touch them! 
Queen Elizabeth II will be evacuated from London if a no-deal Brexit causes riots, British media reported  
Japan has been the most outspoken country not in the EU critical of Brexit since the beginning  
Quite a lot of people in final salary pension scheme home owners like me... I’m part of blessed generation, no wars, managed to make a living, own a house & save 4 pension - I’m very worried 4 my children and for those who don’t have parents like us - brexit’s So bad for them  
. 2/2#Nissan are moving back to Japan to relieve shareholder anxiety in the capability of their new management and #Brexit is a #UK excuse. They are giving different reasons in France and Spain. (Info from a Nissan insider)#Media: Check this out! 
They’re trying to incite violence, put it in our minds, then blame Brexit 
This is the best the Brexiters can now offer.  Brexit will (probably) be 'survivable' (so long as the medicines don’t run out).  
Sickening. Marr begging the IRA’s political proxies to vote at Westminster to stop Brexit   
The attitude of Brexit supporters which you choose to see as 'Gloating.' is rather frustration at having to keep repeating ourselves because many who voted to be ruled by the EU refuse to accept the democratic decision not to be.Wallow in your scare stories.  
Good Friday Agreement provides for Irish unity referendum. No matter what happens with Brexit, it is time for referendum. Irish Canadians have a role to play in supporting a unity referendum and safeguarding the GFA.  @ICCCTO @ICCC_MTL @ICCC_OTT @ICCCVan @iccccal 
Who the the hell gave this man the mandate to meet with Mrs May and to discuss how to get Brexit delivered on time and as hard as possible? He has even given his support to Mrs May in opposing a People’s Vote. #FBPE #PeoplesVote 
Ah. It’s not Brexit that’s the problem. It’s the uncertainty over Brexit that’s the problem.Anyone want to explain to Julia how they might just be related?  
To all the Project Fear scaremongers running around spreading fear of Britain starving the morning after Brexit.India's got Britain's back. Punjab - the world's most fertile land of the five rivers, granary of the world, breadbasket of a billion people.Bring on Brexit!  
#BREAKING#Germany: 11-year-old girl has kKILLED HERSELF because of massive bullying and threats from other Muslim classmates in school. How long with people allow this to happen???#EU#Brexit#MAGA 
How about we understand that countries don't have friends, they have interests?How about knowing that Britain wouldn't care about Ireland, and realising the EU doesn't?How about the fact that our interest in Brexit was to look after ourselves?How about? - "Ireland First!" 
It won’t. This is Project Fear. Brexit will enhance not damage our security.  
Time is long gone for just going along with current #Brexit shambles. Tory Ministers and MPs know the damage this is doing. Please don't stand for it any more. Take back control and stop this crazy kamikaze course.  
So, Health Secretary Matt Hancock accepted £32,000 from a company that wants to scrap the NHS. But of course it will all be swept under the biggest carpet that has ever been: Brexit.  
Meet Remainer opportunist Nick CleggIn 2008, he wrote: "Pro-Europeans have got to face up to the truth: the EU is not popular in Britain."Then he wanted an in-out EU referendum but later opposed itThen we had a vote, now he wants a second referendum 
#AnywhereButWestminster is in Derry, focusing on Brexit & the border. But it's good to be in a hotel with an exhibit/shrine to the great That Petrol Emotion (& The Undertones, obv)  
Thank you! We need more of this sort of focused questioning of the charlatans & spivs responsible for the Brexit scam - from all corners of the British media. 
#EUsupergirl and #EUsuperwolf en route to #London for some more #StopBrexit trouble-making this week!  Me & @AlbaWhiteWolf are filming for Belgian & Japanese TV documentaries on #Brexit and posing for some photos!  We'll be outside #Westminster Mon & Tues afternoon! 
Plot twist: A Leave liar doesn't get a free pass to lie about Brexit on Talk Radio, of course Julia Hate-Spewer wasn't presenting at the time.  
Had a lovely conversation with "Mark" up the pub. He's for #Brexit, he's anti immigration, massively anti gay and a massive fan of #jacobreesmogg.had to channel my inner @mrjamesob, showed him facts and actual numbers! He didn't change his mind but he bought me a beer. #babysteps 
The closer we get to Brexit, the more desperately hysterical they become. I welcome these headlines.  
Geoff Capes?! Don Estelle?! Gobsmackingly clever.to see yet another @Coldwar_Steve of such intelligence, genius and historical/hysterical references warms the heart while nailing Brexit.When this man decided to take action & create this world he enhanced thousands of lives.   
I wrote to all EU citizens  in #CCDV last week to make them aware of a @scotgov funded advice service available to help assist with this shambolic schemeFeedback from constituents is that the UK Gov guidance (just like their handling of #Brexit) is simply not good enough!  
Fact-checking « alternative arrangements » re #Brexit backstop: Can technology solve the Irish border problem? Short answer: not in the next few years.  
For the young people of Northern Ireland, for the young people of all Ireland, for the young of the entire UK, for Scotland, Gibraltar, and the millions upon millions of people - the majority - who live in our country, BREXIT MUST BE STOPPED. @peoplesvote_uk 
Superb thread on what 'no deal Brexit' means - no hyperbole here about evacuating the Queen - but plain, basic issues about how international business etc works. Also a reminder that, even if the WA goes through, that only postpones rather than solves many of the issues.  
Thousands of potential job losses in Sunderland. Brexit negotiations in crisis, 7 points down in the latest poll.Corbyn’s response. ‘Number 21 bus turned up late.’It would be funny if it wasn’t so tragic.  
The loss of Nissan would be a body blow to the North East.The Government & Unite both need to recognise that the economy of the region is jeopardised if Brexit goes ahead.Nissan workers & we all need the chance to choose our future in a public vote. 
My father in-law over Sunday lunch gave an impassioned view on Brexit & how annoyed he was at Jacob Figs Roll instead of Jacob Rees-Mogg and that from now on is what I shall be calling him. That is all. 
Tesco should be ashamed of themselves, promoting #ProjectFear ahead of #Brexit.They are just trying to increase sales by scaring their customers into bulk buying, when there is absolutely no need.Supplies will carry on as normal after #NoDeal #WTObrexit on 29/3. 
Don't even think about it! Retweet on your profile and send this to your local MP! #Brexit #BrexitBetrayal #Brexiteer  
Esther McVey attempted to deny Nissan's withdrawal from UK is to do with Brexit, Nissan said it is  
An orderly Brexit depends on a united Tory party. So start stockpiling now | Matthew d’Ancona  
Andrew, the Nissan X-Trail has three petrol models and only two diesel models. This isn't about diesel. This is about #Brexit as Nissan has confirmed today.  
No-deal Brexit 'savage' for food and agriculture, farmers warn  
Corbyn is the midwife of Brexit. He’s happy to help disaster capitalists see the majority suffer. He even voted with Tories to reduce civil rights and help them pass the Immigration bill.    
If #Brexit the reason for transferring production out of UK, the production would have gone to the EU, not Japan.  Given declining demand & new tariff-cutting EU-Japan trade deal, logical for Nissan to repatriate production.  
Brexit...The perfect storm of clusterfuckery and fuckwittery. 
Biology 1:01.To grow food plants you need warmth and long sunshine hours.THAT’S WHY WE IMPORT SO MUCH FOOD.“Being more self-sufficient” is not going to work for people with small north facing gardens or people in flats.This “war time Brexit spirit” must be ... alcoholic?  
Scenes from Highland Life: ordering my fish supper in Polish at the chippy in Tain and then disagreeing amicably with three others at the counter about the respective cultural merits of Wrocław, Kraków and Gdańsk. #Brexit 
This is scary stuff. It’s like a bad divorce and stems from racism and this anti-globalist view. The Queen to be evacuated in case of Brexit unrest - media | Reuters  
So why are Unite supporting Brexit?  
The Queen will reportedly be evacuated in case a no-deal Brexit sparks riots  
Even our local Dutch cheese maker’s trolling the UK. “We do have a Brexit deal” (pic by @space_fantastic on Insta) #Brexit #hardcheese  
‘Emergency plans’ to evacuate the Queen from London in the event of riots breaking out following a no-deal #Brexit have been revealed. 
Poll: Should any Brexit deal agreed by @theresa_may include access to a Customs Union? Please vote and retweet. 
Who the hell is inventing this garbage, the Queen couldn't be more secure than where she is. It's brexit not a nuclear war! 
Deluded Churchill wannabe - "We have nothing to fear from no deal. They won’t dare derail Brexit. There is simply no consensus. If you want to take this deal, you’re a terrible sellout.” 
Home Secretary Sajid Javid insists UK will still be safe in case of no-deal Brexit. The UK is part of 5 eyes which does not involve any EU nation, that is the best tool for our security, indeed EU free movement makes the UK unsafe..  
Sunderland thrilled to build imaginary cars and live on imaginary wages after Brexit 
Summary:1. My previous 'line', "Brexit will never happen, as Our #2ndPeoplesVoteToRemain will stop it", has been amended.2. It now reads: "After Brexit has happened, #Our2ndPeoplesVoteToRejoin will reverse it."3. Talk about my shrewd forecasting skills!4. That's all, folks! 
Brexit Politicians: "Anyone who questions Brexit is calling you thick for believing the lies which we (as your elected MPs) told you. Be angry at them!" 
The Washington Nissan plant is part of Thatcher's legacy. Ironic that her greatest acolytes might well destroy it with their Brexit jingoism.  
And when Scotland and Northern Ireland leave the UK due to Brexit, the vast majority of the UK's fishing grounds will be in EU territory again. 
I simply don’t understand Labour’s position on Brexit.16 million people don’t want it. There’s votes to be had. 
Don't worry, I've been informed that if you throw salt over your left shoulder whilst having a EU flag covering your head then you'll be immune from the no deal Brexit plagues. 
Hi you can read it here: Thread by @nicktolhurst: "1/ We need to talk about Daniel Kawczynski MP (@DKShrewsbury) &amp; Gold Speculation. His comments &amp; seemingly "poin […]" #Brexit Share this if you think it's interesting.  
Please sign this very important petition and re-tweet.  #StopBrexit #PeoplesVotePetition: Hold a second referendum on EU membership.  
Wt Bacha Khan done for Pak:•He didnt believe in separate homeland for Muslims•Opposed referendum&wanted autonomous Pakhtunistan•His son participated in militant movement•He preferred to be buried in AFGBut Surkhas want state assets to be after his nameAisay kaisay?  
May poss be some post Brexit hardship depending on how Govt handle it. But we should look forward, not back like Remainers, & be willing to make sacrifices in the interests of our children & grandchildren’s future in a prosperous country free of EU tyranny  
Oh hi Twitter, on Nissan I see we're still sticking to our two "BREXIT!!!! and "NOTHING TO DO WITH BREXIT!!" camps, with the two never meeting anywhere remotely in the middle, or indeed along the way whatsoever 
Live from Brexit  
The Brexiteer Battle Plan2016: Conquer the world!2018: Mere survival2019: Okay, survival's a bit ambitious but none of it is our fault, all right?#Brexit 
Sunderland is on you as much as May. The only difference is that she's ok in the opinion polls and you're not. Stop this madness and start supporting a new referendum. @emmadentcoad @KensingtonCLP 
Labour has again & again set out its Brexit policy -Tories Know it & so do MSM This is what propaganda looks like ...pic.twitter.com/D5NB6ofId1#Brexit #GTTO #toriesout #ToryLies 
The utter disdain for young people moving themselves forward in their professional lives using the Free Movement opportunities that your Brexit is stealing from them, absolutely disgusts me. 
President Macron is considering holding what would be the first referendum in France in 14 years in May as part of his response to "yellow vest" protests, the Journal du Dimanche newspaper reports  #GiletsJaunes 
A thread to inform you that a hard #Brexit MP who has been caught spreading disinformation online, is being paid £6,000 a month by a billionaire US gold investor whose business model depends on economic chaos driving investors to gold.We’ve been played.By our own MPs.  
Queen to be EVACUATED in Brexit RIOTS!!!!! You what?!?  
Brexit? Everything has gone to shit.               From @howardhour on @SkyOne 
Nissan came to the UK in the 1980s because we were in the EU, Sunderland is their European base; company has consistently warned Brexit is a huge problem. Long Read on it all here  
Another #Brexit Dividend! The chemicals they use to clean our drinking water cannot be stored for more than two weeks.They are all made in France and Germany.But who needs clean water when you have 'control & 'sovereignty'?Where was that on the bus?#stopbrexit #nodeal 
Agreed. Worth pointing out that Nissan sales in Q4 across the EU are back 45%. Brexit is not the issue. EU regulations are. Ironic given how some politicians are spinning it. 
So Theresa May who bought 10 DUP MP's votes with tax payers' money is trying to buy 50 Labour MP's votes in the same way? A reminder that diminished tax revenues already at £20bn a year due to the Brexit catastrophe is equivalent to over £30m p.a. lost to all 650 constituencies.  
Queen to be evacuated if Brexit turns ugly – reports  
Brexiteer Esther McVey reveals who is REALLY influencing Theresa May's Brexit decisions  
I listened and watched the politicians and campaigners and I voted Remain on tthe 23rd June. Then I started listening to the EU commissioners etc and realised that I had been lied to and now support Brexit. Why do Remainers get it so wrong? 
‘Tell Gary Linkeker to f*** off!’ Cardiff City boss Neil Warnock has choice words for BBC pundit after #Brexit jibe (VIDEO) |  | 
Manufacturers have put in the work and prepared themselves for all Brexit circumstances on the 29th of March. The worst thing politicians could do now is undo that good work by postponing that Brexit date.  
So Hassan tells us we can't have an independence referendum because Salmond has a court case to answer?This guy is supposed to be some sort of 'intellectual'? 
"What to do when a politician tells lies after lies, after lies... Fact-checking Boris Johnson." @jnpaquet_BR#brexit #NoDealBrexit #FactCheck 
The global car industry is in crisis, for various reasons. None more so than Nissan, whose recent boss is in jail. Brexit has added to the global troubles for those operating in Britain. The loss of the X-Trail is bad news. But it’s interesting it’s not going elsewhere in EU.  
Being in a plane crash, a war or a tornado are all 'survivable' but who would want to when you don't need too?#brexit #PeoplesVote #NoBrexit 
I voted No in 2014, but will vote YES in the next Scottish Independance Referendum. 
Jeremy Corbyn is having a bad Brexit, the issue is driving a wedge between Labour’s leader and his activists — Jeremy Corbyn is much farther away from his party's centre of gravity than Theresa May is from hers 
Phil, I understand you care deeply about stopping Brexit but this is wilfully misleading - what about the collapse of the diesel market?  Nissan aren’t moving production into Europe.  
Not just ignorance.Laziness.  Sloth.  There is a reason why it was a “deadly sin”.In fact I think it is the seam that runs through Brexit.That, dishonesty and moral cowardice. 
What #Nissan has actually said... #Brexit uncertainty is 'not helping companies like us to plan for the future' (obviously true), but this decision has been taken for 'business reasons' specific to the X-Trail. Other #Sunderland investments (next-gen Juke and Qashqai) unaffected. 
How ridiculous.     Queen to Be Evacuated After No Deal Brexit? Project Fear Strikes Again  
And remainers rioting on a “no-deal” Brexit? They’ll need this book then. x  
MPs have to respect the will of the electorate and follow through on Brexit  
Very sad to hear that there may be job losses at Nissan. People should have listened when Jeremy Corbyn promised that a Labour jobs first Brexit would be implemented by unicorns. It's time for Theresa May to move aside and let Jeremy Corbyn negotiate additional fairy dust.  
The Royal Family remained in London throughout WW2, even when the Luftwaffe was raining bombs on the capital. But in opaquely sourced stories the Sunday Times and Mail on Sunday claim Brexit means the Queen might have to be “evacuated”. Truly doth Brexit make some media mad. 
The NHS is miles better than this. Don't let the Brexit Elite flog our health. #PeoplesVote 
If Brexit was so full of opportunity and such a wonderful thing why would you need the Dunkirk spirit? 
WATCH: news today that Nissan will produce their new models in Japan rather than Sunderland is a bad indicator for post-Brexit Britain, says Sedgefield MP @MPphilwilson READ about the Nissan decision here:  
On @BBCSPSE this morning talking Brexit (of course), 20% hikes to the Young Persons' Bus Travel Pass in Kent, Cuts to Libraries and County Council budgets. Please SHARE.  
And to add insult to injury, how those same people now work consistently to frustrate Brexit in Parliament - denying us the ability to secure the good free trade agreement we promised by undermining our negotiating stance. Viz the amendments last week.  (3/) 
Steve Bush of Unite says Brexit has played "a major part" in Nissan's decision to move production of its X-Trail model to JapanRead more on the move here:  
Catalan secessionist mayors say the trial on 1-O "is a trial against democracy"  Manipulation: the referendum was illegal and its leaders had been warned beforehand they were about to commit a crime @TheEconomist @guardian @EU_Commission @lemondefr @FT 
Met a friend, who said - and she was not joking: "Have you switched from Remain to Leave yet?" When I said no, she couldn't believe it.Naively, I thought that the endless Brexit bad news would have filtered through to everyone. I was wrong. It's just dismissed as "fake news". 
Altaf Hussain needs to be educated to know what Self determination actually is before making joke of himself. He gave example of Scotland for the referendum. Scotland is a sovereign country at first place, it is not a province or a city. United Kingdom means 4 countries in it.  
*Ignorant fuckwit who earns a fortune talking up a national catastrophe thinks that Brexit is a huge joke* pic.twitter.com/9z6UmfVu2c 
Everyone should watch this.National Farmers' Union president @Minette_Batters explains how a no-deal Brexit batters UK farmers.   
Here's an idea that would really focus Theresa May's mind: set up an insulin stockpile for her over which any pharmacy facing shortages has first dibs. Because the shortages will only occur under a no deal Brexit of her own creation. Shouldn't be controversial if she's confident. 
There are always multiple factors in international investment decisions but the one common one is a need for political stability. There is therefore no doubt that Brexit is harming the UK's competitive position. And a loss of investment today means a loss of jobs tomorrow. 
Questionnaire: Seeing both Conservative and Labour support Brexit, how would you vote should there be a GE in the coming months?(Pls retweet for larger sample) 
Many of us keep saying it. But journalists insist on using the phrase 'in the event of a no deal Brexit' instead of 'if May allows a no deal Brexit to happen ' which disguises agency. May can unilaterally revoke A50 until 29th March. 
Ndi Igbo anyi, gee nu nti. The only thing happening on February 16th is the Presidential and NASS elections. Nobody is coming to your house to do any referendum. Don’t be deceived by people who threaten and rant but then leave their followers and run away. Go out and vote! 
WOW!!Second Referendum Petition punches through 50K!!Let's push it even higher!SIGN and RT this  You'd be barking mad not to!#FBPE #PeoplesVote 
Brexit isn't the only thing wrong in the UK atm.  
Please don't make such sweeping generalisations. I'm a Remainer. I did not welcome the announcement. I worry for the people of Sunderland. And the North East. And everywhere that has taken - or will take - a big hit from Brexit.It can all be avoided.#PeoplesVote #RevokeA50 
Trump's comment this is all a waste of time & I won't read anything that does not support a wall SPEAKS VOLUMES. Our country needs NATIONAL REFERENDUM 4 ALL Americans 2 vote 2 denounce @POTUS Shutdowns taking country Hostage/ruining lives. Let American People decide NOT Dictator! 
Unfortunately not Guy mate, we've had our votes stolen from us though a criminally procured referendum that our parliament wants to brush under the carpet.....but you know, Leave means lies. 
.@andreajenkyns @EstherMcVey1 Why after nearly three years are we still having to fight for Brexit every day ?Clue .... A Remain PM chosen by Remain MPs (unelected, unopposed, no member vote)A Remain CabinetA Remain Civil ServiceA Remain Parliament with 75% MPs voting Remain 
Cute the way Nissan suddenly announce they are going to produce an SUV promised for Sunderland in Japan because brexit is causing uncertainty. The fact that diesel production has been slashed by a ludicrous amount and the demand for the car is no longer there has been ignored ! 
Leaving the European Union is a bit like leaving the internet; you can always do it, but it makes more sense to stay and influence its’ content. #Brexit 
Labour's Policy on Brexit is perfectly clear.It's one thing that the Tories are running a deceitful propaganda campaign to confuse voters about Labour's position - it's quite another that they are being aided and abetted by the media that should be holding them to account.  
“Classism” is a very lazy claim to make, Matt. I live in Gateshead, I knew the potential harm to the region Brexit could have. 90k jobs are tied directly to Nissan. I was told countless times that I was engaging in “project fear”. I take absolutely no glee in being proven right. 
Immediately after the Brexit vote there was a majority for idependence.Then this happened:1. The MSM seized on the 2017 Snap GE, abandoned Labour and promoted Ruth.2. Fishing became a pro-Brexit proxy.3. The SNP win was presented as a loss.4. The SNP didn't fight the lie. 
It could have been so simple.Public consultation to find out what sort of relationship people actually wanted with the EU, so a concrete & detailed Brexit option could have been named on the ballot paper. We vote, then negotiate for that. Then the public decides if they want it. 
Nissan to produce new model, post-Brexit, insists Jacob Rees-Mogg  
The EU is taking the hardest possible line in the hope of derailing Brexit, says @DanielJHannan 
BEWARE: APC has created hundreds of Bot handles with Igbo names and Biafra slogans in order to push Referendum narratives.What to do: 1. Do not engage such handles.2. Block them on sight.3. Remain focused.Ndigbo will vote massively for @atiku Pls SHARE & RETWEET 
A vote for Theresa May's deal is a vote for indefinite subordination to EU institutions with no vote in its councils and no right of exit. We are supposed to vote for that in return for assurances from the EU and May. When have either proved honest on Brexit?  
And....no rejoicing, just how the hell can people actually vote to lose their jobs? Vote to destroy thier children's future? Vote to make themselves poorer.We never rejoice! We just STILL look on in stunning amazement that people still support an insane idea...Brexit! 
Esther McVey Denies Nissan Decision Linked To Brexit.. But Then Europe's Nissan Boss Said It Was  /#Brexit #Nissan 
At least help me to understand your strategy here. What would setting up this new party before Brexit achieve? How would the lack of any parliamentary arithmetic for a new referendum be changed? 
17 million people DID NOT vote for a No Deal Brexit.17 million people voted for Brexit in circumstance where everyone on telly supporting it said we'd get a good deal because of how much the EU needs us.You insult them when you suggest they wanted chaos. 
Conversation with a Cabinet Minister -"We can't have a second referendum as it would cause civil unrest!Anyway, we need to get on with planning for civil unrest post-Brexit. Hey, we may need to evacuate the Queen!No - I told you - it's NOT safe to have a second referendum!"  
I’m a little confused why the first two interview questions to any Cabinet Minister aren’t:Why don’t you resign for the appalling shambles you have made of Brexit?And,Will you apologise for leading the country to this terrible situation? 
It's FA to do with Brexit ffs 
The $1 Trillion Man talks Brexit, China and Big Tech  
Tomorrow I will meet with the British Shadow Brexit Secretary Keir Starmer MP in Belfast. I will take the opportunity once more to make it clear to him that the backstop as already agreed must be protected and maintained.  
So last night I heard on the news that the powers that be are preparing to evacuate the Queen if there is a No Deal Brexit due to the prospect of riots ..... doesnt that just prove how violent Remainers are ?as Brexiteers want a No Deal if we got one there would be celebrations 
Now Nissan’s confirmed its decision not to manufacture the company’s new model in Sunderland because of Brexit uncertainty we are no longer discussing ‘Project Fear’ but ‘Project Fact’. It’s now time to ask people is Brexit reality what was promised? @peoplesvote_uk 
When the PRO-BREXIT Home Secretary admits No Deal Brexit will hurt UK security and the British Medical Association says it would be catastrophic for the NHS...With the clearly rising cost in human lives, when does supporting it become an extremist view? 
EU's solidarity has been "absolutely total" on Brexit and Ireland won't change its position, Senator @nealerichmond says  
Selling our soul for Brexit. This is the population equivalent of doing a trade deal with Inverness except the Faroe Islands kill protected whales and dolphins and overfish mackerel.  
#SitAtHome on the 16 February  Election in #Biafraland until a Referendum date is Granted. #Boycott2019NigeriaElections #SupportBiafraReferendum #RBL 
 #Frexit #Brexit - LET’S DO IT!! I am sensing the beginning of the end for the #EU (Italy  , Austria  Greece ..Portugal, etc., plus MORE European countries are rebelling: Hungary  Poland  ,defying #EU DICTATS!!  
Do you still remember the Y2K bug?  Never mind if not.Here comes BrexRat !!--Fears a no-deal Brexit could unleash a plague of rats if waste exports halted  
That's the problem, a remainer cabinet, trying every way it can to stop Brexit.  
The #MalthouseCompromise is nothing more than a proposal to unite the factions within the @Conservatives to support @theresa_may and keep them in power. It does not deliver the #Brexit i and millions of others voted for. They have had 3 years to sort this out. Enough is enough. 
British Medical Journal paper warns that no-deal Brexit would kill 12,400 British people by 2030 due to higher fruit & veg prices leading to more heart attacks. Wonder if BMJ would have published if the results had been reversed....  
#Brexit is separating British kids from their parents. It's putting Brits out of jobs, and risks making British ppl homeless. It'll cost British LIVES. No matter how much you believe you hate the EU, you CANNOT call yourself a British 'patriot' and be happy to enable this. 
Norwich MP Clive Lewis brands local government settlement cuts 'devastating'>And yet there’s clearly enough money to attempt to bribe ⁦@UKLabour⁩ MPs to swallow the PM’s Brexit deal. Why not end austerity and give that money to ALL our communities   
We Lexiteers have a duty to th country and a responsibility to our party to ensure the leave voice is much louder within the Labour movement. We always were the Brexit party-Let’s make that true again. 
If you don’t know Labour’s Brexit policy either:A) you’re not paying attentionB) you’ve got your hands over your ears.B) you’re spouting received wisdom from rightwing media.#GeneralElectionNow#CorbynsCustomsUnion 
Angus Robertson, whether he realises or not, has with his new project exposed the fact that the SNP leadership has done almost nothing to prepare for independence, and as such are tactically constrained in relation to calling and fighting a referendum. 
WATCH: Queen Elizabeth's comments about respect and finding common ground are understood by some as a call for #Brexit civility  
Where ARE all these tens of thousands of Job Losses over #Brexit?What business waits 2½years before laying anyone off, if they have a "crisis" looming?Why are so many recruiting?Why are we at record employment levels?Why does ANYONE listen to UK media?54 days to #Brexit  
There's no point in MPs doing this *after* Brexit. If that's the plan, they may as well just forget it. Pathetic.  
Nissan specifically said that Brexit uncertainty is unhelpful and that they might take further steps. But then Rees-Mogg knows that: the risks of no deal Brexit are the explicit reason that his investment outfit set up in Dublin.  
It's Not Brexit But 'Deutsche-it' You Want To Worry About  
Read this thread to see why UK Gov (and maybe UK) could collapse with month to 2 month max of No Deal Brexit.  
How the hell can we get out of this mess?! Even with #Brexit cancelled we'd be left with a festering putrid mess. 
Leicester one down already thanks to the brilliant @MarcusRashford. Get Brexit back on. 
Brits are stockpiling food for the Brexit Apocalypse. 
Wasn't so hard now, was it?This feigned ignorance from news anchors & pundits about Labour's Brexit policy is inexcusable now. It took 10 seconds for Scarlett to set @jonathansamuels straight. Well done her. 
How insulting, how humiliating must it be for the leader of the Lib Dems to have people say “we want a centre ground, anti-Brexit political party, that can win elections; and we want you to leave the Lib Dems and help us create it.”?That has got to hurt.  
“This is what nationalist populism does to a country.”  The catastrophe that is Brexit and PM May’s failure to lead.  The Washington Post  
"That's not scaremongering, that's fact..." says the Labour MP on @SkyNews, telling utter lies about Nissan & "tens of thousands of jobs being lost in the NE" over #Brexit.Constantly repeating a lie makes it no less a lie.Surely we still teach that to kids? 
Today Sajid Javid on Marr stated “You can have no hard Border on the island of Ireland.....The only thing missing is a bit of good will on the EU side.”Why yes. A dash of goodwill, a sprinkling of blinded faith and two teaspoons of historical blindness. A perfect Brexit recipe. 
If you want to avoid No Deal, you've got to vote for some kind of deal. Otherwise you get No Deal. Which you say you don't want. (Another referendum isn't happening; nor is revoking Article 50)  
Austerity and welfare cuts main driver behind Brexit referendum result vote, finds report  
 LISTEN | @Jacob_Rees_Mogg confronts @BBCMarkMardell on the broadcaster's anti-Brexit bias: "The BBC is very much 'in spite of Brexit' when it's good news and 'because of Brexit' when it's bad news!" Brilliant!  Support us at  
In a sharp blow to Britain's post-Brexit economy, Nissan changes course, says the X-Trail SUV will now be made in Japan, not Britain.  
I knew Brexit would create new jobs, I just didn't realise they'd be in Japan.  
This. A BILLION times over. #AntiWestminster NOT #AntiEnglish#IndyRef#DissolveTheUnion#Brexit  
The real truth behind Brexit.  The rich Brexiteers will have to disclose their millions.  The bloody cabinet is rife with them.  #StopBrexit #PeoplesVote 
If TM is prepared to burn her backstop*, then she wants to leave the EU on ANY terms. Pay attention folks - this is now her #Brexit, and she will do whatever to make it happen.*It's very different to the one the EU proposed. 
.@EstherMcVey1 explains we have a remainer Cabinet and Olly Robbins frustrating the negotiations. It's time to leave with No Deal and walk away from the Brussels bullies. Help save Brexit @  
Civil servants drawn up plans to evacuate Queen from London  if there are brexit riots. Do they know nothing about history. Royal Family stayed in London during the blitz 
Civil servant s have drawn up plans to evacuate Queen if there are brexit riots in London. More ridiculous Project Fear. 
Do the maths yourself.Nissan sells across Europe.70% of the cars made in the Sunderland factory go to other EU countries.If Brexit makes cross-border trade more expensive, basing its factory here means 70% of its cars face a cost. If it moved to e.g Frankfurt only 30% would. 
Tories in a 7 point lead in latest poll as voters punish @jeremycorbyn for Labur’s cynical opportunism over brexit 
When people talk about the consequences of #Brexit, proper cancer treatment isn’t one of them, nor is rationing of life-saving healthcare. But it’s about to be a reality for @carolJhedges. Thread  
Not that it will matter much longer, but European newspapers have mostly ignored how Brexit has always been about hoping for and working towards a collapse of the EU  itself versus simply about the UK leaving. Brexit never made any sense without the EU itself disintegrating.  
Who's cheering? You might want to direct this at someone who really is cheering on the loss of the industry (Patrick Minford and the architects of Brexit) instead of remainers who didn't want this to happen (including many who know exactly what it is to be skint with no hope). 
Pro BREXIT constituencies are now  dramatically out-voted by those supporting Remain UKRemain 422  :  Leave 210EnglandRemain 324 : Leave 209Whose side do you want to be on Conservative ultra right billionaire Tax Avoider liarsOr their opponents? 
Nissan HQ: “Ok, our chairman’s in the slammer, sales are down the toilet, the EU has screwed diesels and we’ve got more chance of selling our toe nail clippings than an X -trail in Europe, we need to pull the plug. But....we can blame Brexit.... Large Suntories all round.” 
Esther McVey insisted today that Nissan's decision to withdraw manufacturing of its X-Trail model in the UK was nothing to do with Brexit, but Nissan's Europe boss then said it was... 
Labour is not opposing Tory BrexitLabour is competing with its own just as damaging version of BrexitWe don't want either, just stop it! #RevokeA50 now 
Once we see Brexit through, the next big battle is taking on cultural Marxism in the UK.British values are being rapidly eroded in the name of collectivism, social justice and equality of outcome.We need to embrace liberty and individualism again, and celebrate prosperity! 
Good package on @rtetwip on #Brexit & the visit of @katarinabarley to the border area. As we approach the endgame, solidarity and the meaningful support of our EU colleagues has never been more crucial @labour @FES_GB 
Or perhaps telling the truth — which is that it has nowt to do with Brexit and everything to do with the collapsing automobile industry.  
May will seek 'pragmatic' solution to Brexit deal in Brussels  
This aged well. Just another reminder that Brexit is a shambles because the Leave campaign cheated and deceived and if their botched Brexit goes through they will blame everyone else for their own shameless incompetence.  
Remarkable but mostly unremarked about Brexit is that not one Brexiter has ever sought to "reach out" to non-Brexiters to involve them in the debate about the future of the country. This is because Brexit is a Bully's Charter - bullies don't compromise. 
Labour MPs have been warned not to take Theresa May's Brexit bribes.  
Trade secretary Fox says EU 'irresponsible' to refuse to reopen Brexit deal  
Japanese car giant scraps plans to build new model in Britain citing Brexit 'uncertainty.'  
I gather from Jacob Rees Mogg just now that the Nissan decision, contrary to what the company says, is nothing to do with Brexit, but is the fault of internal Nissan problems and the BBC. 
Quite a crafty piece of propaganda from @SkyNews."Nissan is due to a decline in diesel sales, but #Brexit is also adding uncertainty."Then off they go, exploring "#Brexit uncertainty".UK media are charlatans, anyone paying them money is a mug. 
OPPOSE IT THEN!!!! Labour members don't want Brexit, Labour supporters don't want Brexit, the majority of the UK doesn't want Brexit, and it'll destroy the country!! it's only YOU that wants it! your selfishness and ignorance is unreal, and will lose us the next election. 
2016:“I see no downside to Brexit. Only a considerable upside”“Sunlit uplands”“As soon as we leave, we hold all the cards”“Easiest deal in human history”2019:  
BREAKING: Queen Elizabeth ‘to be evacuated’ in event of #Brexit unrest.Back to the family home in Germany presumably ... 
We’ve now gone from Brexit being a major benefit to trade etc to simply surviving ... 
Brexit shows no signs of uniting the uk. We are a deeply divided union. England’s desires are foremost with three subservient nations largely ignored. Never in my lifetime have I been more convinced that Scottish independence and a united Ireland are a complete necessity! 
And your botched handling of leading the opposition is letting them. All we get are meaningless slogans about jobs first Brexit and how you could do better negotiating if you were in power. Have a look at the polls and you know LAB own research says same, you won’t win a GE   
And here's how they conned people into voting Leave, how it would bring them lower prices, higher wages and a 'resurgent economy'.....people are about to suffer - parliament needs to wake up and quick. #Nissan pic.twitter.com/ZTitpl2BSq 
This pub would also serve a cocktail named 'The Hard Brexit'. Advertised as the best drink ever, it costs thirty times as much as everything else, even though it's just a four hour wait for the barman to throw a mug of cold piss in your face  
Why, how is the country inflicting this on itself? It makes no sense. Own it ⁦@BorisJohnson⁩ ⁦@DavidDavisMP⁩ ⁦@michaelgove⁩ ⁦@Jacob_Rees_Mogg⁩ #Brexit  
The Conservatives' botched negotiations and threat of a No Deal Brexit is causing uncertainty and damaging Britain's economy. 
“The reason why those overseas can see that Brexit is stupid while Britain stockpiles food and medicine... is because those overseas are not influenced by the UK media.”  
Finally we can reap the vast benefits of Brexit like...Surviving?  
Italy has entered a recession, and it's taken populist rulers just a few months to discover the problems with their policies (via @bopinion) 
Let me be the first to admit I am no Brexit expert. That said it seems to me that the deeply rooted movement was exacerbated and brought to a boil with Putin’s help. Very similar to our Trump Russia. I remain firmly in the Remain camp. Thanks.  
Morten Morland on #TheresaMay renegotiating with the #EU #Tories #Brexit #BrexitShambles - political cartoon gallery in London  
Imagine 9 Scottish MPs (innocent until proven guilty) transferred from Scottish to English prisons for a trial about a referendum. Then imagine the leader of the opposition saying they should never be returned to Scottish jails - BEFORE there’s even a guilty verdict. Imagine it.  
I hope your members know that your General Secretary has pushed hard to ensure Brexit happens eg  
I used to regard sectarianism as a societal cancer in Scotland. I was wrong; it's a tool, used to divide (typically) less educated folk.Notice how "loyalists" are so irrationally angry at the idea of oil rich Scotland governing itself rather than suffer Brexit chaos. Abnormal. 
Exitism is spreading! #Macron actually admitted a few months ago that if the French were given a #Frexit referendum they would probably vote the same way as the #UK! The EU is a failing political experiment dreamt up by idealistic liberal Globalists who thought they knew best. 
10/ When Gold spiked 10% after the referendum that made the expense of paying Kawczynski £6,000 look like chicken feed.The question you should be asking is how many other leading Brexiters are also being paid by similar companies...Mogg isBanks isHow many more?/Ends 
Another entry to the great British tortoise race, already featuring Brexit, Cross Rail and the Spurs Stadium - the new EastEnders set!  
Great to hear @Jacob_Rees_Mogg absolutely destroy @BBCMarkMardell on @BBCWorldatOne. What a biased presenter Mardell is on Brexit.  Certainly not worth paying the extra Licence fee for him! 
BBC reporting Nissan news as though it’s unimportant and bringing on Rees-Mogg again today. The people at the behind BBC Brexit propaganda need to be exposed and made to account for their censorship and bias. #FBPE #PeoplesVote 
I've never known venality or corruption like we see in today's Tory Brexit Taliban. Steve Baker, Daniel Hannan, Daniel Kawczynski, Jacob Rees-Mogg all openly pursuing an agenda of personal enrichment 
Another MP who believes we should respect a criminally corrupted referendum which denied votes to those most affected and has been mendaciously sold as mandatory. And she wants to force this crooked #Brexit on Britain against the will of the majority. #PeoplesVote 
"The plan has always been to leave, as we always said, without a deal if we cannot agree on a deal", says Esther McVey, while encouraging the public to read up on leaving the EU on WTO terms.@Nigel_Farage | @EstherMcVey1 | #Brexit | #Get2KnowWTO 
What are you looking forward to most in the event of a no deal brexit ? 
Okay Brexiter if every job loss and cut in investment is not due to BREXIT then where are the new jobs and investment coming from on WTO rules? I’ll wait  
No! We need to stop this destructive criminal #brexit. There will be no forgiveness if it is forced through against the will of the majority without a #PeoplesVote. Such a move will create an anger which will only grow. Distrust in our poltical system will be endemic. 
Liam Fox says MPs who block Brexit ‘deserve to be punished’ at the ballot box 
Brexit will be what breaks the Union. And I wouldn’t blame Scotland or Northern Ireland for leaving it. Seriously they have been sidelined and ignored. If you care about the union at all brexit is your enemy 
.@LiamFox and @theresa_may it's irresponsible to tear up the backstop which the PM spent 21 mths negotiating.Your desire to hold the Conservative Party together, at the expense of the UK's interests, is shameful.There is still a way out of this #Brexit mess - a #PeoplesVote 
6/ .....Except, that around the same time as this was happening Aron Banks was also getting into the same diamonds & gold business with the Russians.Aron Banks and Daniel Kawczynski are now very tight colleagues in #Brexit disinformation media....but why the resources link.... 
I see Kawczynski stands to make a lot of money from the most disorderly Brexit. Having already doubled his salary by betting on gold  
We in @lewishamlabour believe that any Brexit will hurt our borough, especially our poorest and youngest.That’s why, alongside the vast majority of Labour members and voters, we want a #PeoplesVote and a Labour campaign to remain in the EU  
Have I picked this up right? As if Brexit wasn't a big enough dump by UKG on Northern Ireland, we're now expected to be used as a "disposal facility" for radioactive waste amongst other things ?   
Labour MPs saying Nissan & all car manufactures are pulling investment because of Brexit .... yet Honda made the UK it's global hub for the Civic to target the non-EU market. Enough with the lies & Project Fear, please. 
EU may wait to 21-22 March summit to come to final agreement with May, so it will be May's deal v no deal for Westminster. But Commons will still have the choice to revoke A50 - &, tho v late with 1 week to go, asking for an extension for another referendum also possible.  
After Brexit there will be no more cars. Or food. Or medicine. Or laughter. Or any sensory perception... Just a big void of doom.I heard it on the BBC. 
Spot on from @iandunt The collective madness behind Britain’s latest Brexit plan - The Washington Post  
The UK media *including the not directly evil bits* are a big part of the Brexit problem - they keep going to Sunderland to interview toothless guys on the dole, when the median Leave voters are middle-class couples in southern England with decent pensions who own their own house 
On LBC this morning with @Nigel_Farage taking listeners calls on #Brexit listen below #Get2KnowWTO 
This is just the start.The last 2 years of horror will just continue, were May’s Deal to be approved and we move onto endless arguments about the future relationship.We’re in this mess because Brexit is a dud. Simple as that.The latest twisted contortion to avoid that fact:  
Brexit uncertainty and diesel mishandling to blame for loss of Nissan X-Trail. Unite response to confirmation the X-Trail won’t be coming to Sunderland   
Speaking on The Andrew Marr Show, Sinn Féin leader @MaryLouMcDonald said in the event of a crash Brexit, the people should be given the opportunity to remove the border through an Irish unity referendum #Marr 
1) Our nature protections are already at risk from #Brexit & now it appears @scotgov has , without consultation, downgraded protected status of internationally important #Ramsar sites. @KevinStewartSNP ⁦@NicolaSturgeon⁩ 
Five years ago Nissan were very optimistic about Britain. They saw it as a great place to do business, and as the gateway to Europe. Now they are pulling their investment. The absolute shambles the Tories have made of Brexit is likely one of the main reasons this has happened.  
Understand this, the only way to get Biafra referendum is through the Nigerian state!If you usurp your right to effect change in your community by ensuring #AtikuObi2019 is a reality you will suffer in that Nigeria you so despise and I promise you referendum will never come! 
Now, days to election he’s asking Ndi Igbo to not participate in their civic duty, as Nigerian citizens for the time being, and allow them the option to vote out those that do Igbo’s wrong.Nnamdi Kanu is asking Igbo’s to do referendum AT HOME?! Biko, okwa unu an-enwe sense? 
The country sent the the Tories into bat for us on #brexit and they've spent most of their time hurling their bat at their own stumps while winking for the cameras, running each other out, and colluding with the bowlers about how best to dislodge the bails. It won't be forgotten. 
Scottish Ministers @RichardLochhead and @BenMacpherson have called on the UK Government to reconsider their post-Brexit immigration policy:  
2/ Kawczynski has until recently been a pretty mainstream Tory MP, even liberal on some issues given his personal background.Yet since the referendum has not just been hard #Brexit supporter - his views have increasingly been seen as slightly beyond the pale even for brexit... 
17.4m Britons voted to leave. Many at Westminster & Brussels have chosen not to hear our voices. EU is a highly geared capitalist economy where consumers are powerful when united in purpose. We can continue to vote for Brexit through our consumer choices. #BuyBritishOrGoGlobal 
I spoke to a UN observer of elections in countries trying to apply democratic values. She said that the EU referendum would not meet their minimum requirements. 
Friday: EU and Japan sign free trade agreement creating marketplace of 635m people Sunday: Nissan confirms new X-Trail will not be built in Sunderland.‘Continued uncertainty over #Brexit is not helping companies like ours’Just 54 days to go  
Looks like a room full of people who will definitely, definitely, definitely be affected by the longer term impacts of Brexit.  
May planning to stay in customs union. How exactly do Tory MPs think their party will survive the astonishing incompetence and duplicity of Mrs May? From start to finish, these appalling "negotiations" will haunt the Tories for decades #brexit 
"Somebody told me last night that in Poland "Brexit" has become slang for someone who says they're going to leave then just hangs around annoying everybody" 
Another shameless attempt by Corbyn to deflect attention from Labour Brexit policy  
1/ We need to talk about Daniel Kawczynski MP (@DKShrewsbury) & Gold Speculation.His comments & seemingly "pointless" lies about #brexit has provoked confusion among leavers & remainers alike.But once you find out who's he really working for, his actions make perfect sense... 
Having a subsequent referendum doesn’t disrespect the result of the first.Pushing ahead with something people didn’t actually vote for (eg May’s Deal) does.Which is why it is right a public vote is included as part of Labour’s policy options. 
Bloke in the gym was stuck under the barbell after just 1 rep on the bench press. What did he do next? Adds even more weight. Proper Brexit workout. 
Home Secretary Sajid Javid on alternative #Brexit backstop: “It can be done”  #Marr 
It got a like from Tory MP @nigelmp. But did Kawczynski tweet it out of ignorance or using the Brexit-Trump tactic of spewing out lies knowing that most people will never read the fact-checks? Either way, we should have a way of sanctioning MPs who promote such falsehoods. 
Gradually seeing the Brexiter narrative shifting from 'Brexit damage won't happen, that's just Project Fear' to 'the damage warned of is happening, but it's got nothing whatsoever to do with Brexit'. It's a hermetically sealed argument, immune to any evidence or rational debate. 
Nissan is part of Britain's zombie economy. Much like Airbus, it's a giant ponzi scheme to mask the structural faults in an ailing economic model.#Brexit 
Can Marr & the BBC get any worse?  Watch this...In his desperation to help stop Brexit, Marr comes close to pleading with Sinn Fein IRA to take their seats in Parliament.To think, we have to contribute to Marr’s salary on penalty of criminal prosecution.  
Tories are being warned on a daily basis by almost every single institution in the land about the genuinely catastrophic economic & societal effects of No Deal BrexitA Govt that cared about the naion would listen & react, but Theresa May is held hostage by hard-right ideologues 
Labour respects the result of the referendum, sorry but it does.What they don't respect is the way the Tories have screwed up the process from start to finish.Despite what some say, we have opposed Tory Hard Brexit every step of the way.New and updated for 2019 - the proof.  
Here's how #Brexit could affect paediatric care in the UK  
Ken Clarke is right. Brexit is a fairy tale with an unhappy ending - not for the few endlessly telling this tale - but for the many who will have no choice but to live with its disastrous consequences. 
Well said Liam. Labour and the media constantly talk about a Customs Union as if it were a way to deliver Brexit. It’s not. It’s not Brexit at all.  
Anyone who just wants us to accept some form of Brexit so we can get on with the real job of tackling the social & economic inequality in this country needs to remember what the government’s own leaked impact assessment said about how Brexit will affect Britain. #nissan 
I would vote for request to extend A50 until the end of the year, as per the Cooper amendment. I suspect that will happen when May’s tweaked deal is rejected in a few days time. That would pave the way for either an EEA / customs solution (sub optimal) and / or referendum. 
UK preparing to undo Brexit | Politics | The Guardian  
Well said by @paulhilder “The 2017 balancing act is dead”Labour can no longer triangulate over Brexit.Turning a blind eye to Labour MPs aiding and abetting Tory Brexit must not be an option.  
I spent an uncomfortable week in Frankfurt at a Japanese-European business forum. Privately the Japanese stated that they regard Brexit as a betrayal of trust on a gigantic scale. They will not start new contracts with UK companies; and all were  looking to cut UK contracts. ASAP 
If the EU mess us about. We should sue them for the return of £450bn! Retweet this widely! #Brexit #BrexitBetrayal #Brexiteer   
May might want to deliver Brexit in March.But 56% of the country and growing want to #Remain.The referendum was won with lies and law-breaking.And Brexit will damage jobs & public services.So write to your MP to demand they vote to #StopBrexit. 
.@MattHancock On your watch, Mr Hancock.My death, every death.Every man, woman and child who dies from insufficient treatment, or no treatment, or delayed treatment.On your watch.You have a choice.STAY in the EU#stopbrexit #brexit #remainintheEU #cancer #NHS 
Nissan nixes plans to make its X-Trail SUV in the UK — a sharp blow to Brexit supporters, who fought to have the model built in England.  
These people are not well... not well at all #Brexit  
Well,what brexit has taught us all is that if you have a nation of empty heads, there's plenty of space to be filled with lies and propaganda 
Sajid Javid,on #Marr claims “existing technologies” can avoid a hard @BorderIrish with a bit of “goodwill” from EU. Of course he’s right. No problem with technology. The EU are pushing a hard border. They called the referendum, they created gov’s red lines.Pesky EU & Ireland. 
i'm a Labour member who won't vote for Labour unless they change stance on Brexit. there's tens of thousands of us, plus tens of thousands who've already left the party. enough to ensure the Tories win the next GE, and that's on Corbyn. easily the biggest problem Labour has rn. 
I've already been made redundant through the construction downturn caused by Brexit so know how it feels like. Thing that sticks in my throat is the sheer arrogance from high profile brexiteers when confronted by the effects caused so far by Brexit. 
Brexit: Plans to evacuate the Queen if riots break out   
#socialistsunday Post Brexit Race-to-the-Bottom: The meat lobby wants the sale of growth hormone-fed US beef, currently banned in the UK and EU, to be allowed in the UK. NHS already ripped-off by drug companies; US wants price controls lifted. 
BBC News - Nissan new X-Trail to be made in Japan instead of Sunderland  What  a tragedy and Corbyn & McCluskey still backing Mrs May’s Brexit. What a betrayal. Stop Brexit. ##FBPE #PeoplesVote 
Don’t be fooled by ill-informed media talk that “2nd is referendum is now unlikely” or “it’s May’s deal or no deal”There ARE still alternatives to Brexit disaster, and there IS still time, to extend Art50 and get #PeoplesVote, or #RevokeArticle50@BBCNews @Channel4News @itvnews 
Queen to be evacuated if Brexit turns ugly – reports HMM ! INTERESTING.  WHAT ABOUT THERESA AND HER ERG COHORTS  ? I WOULD IMAGINE THEY ARE PROBABLY MORE AT RISK THAN HM !#JustThinkingAloud 
Anyone who thinks it's 'all about diesels' or 'all about China' really ought to read the submissions to Parliament of @SMMT and individual automotive manufacturers about the impact Brexit would have on them. 
In a letter to workers, Nissan says continued #Brexit uncertainty is not helping it to "plan for the future"  
From Bletchley to Brexit – an utter disgrace  
It is not the handling of brexit - it is brexit itself. The idea that Labour could negotiate a positive outcome to unilaterally withdrawing from the trading agreements we have with the whole world - not only all of Europe - next month (!) is for the birds.  
BS. The new X-tail will come in petrol and hybrid versions. EU tariff on those built in Japan will be 0% under EU-Jap FTA but tariff on any built in UK would be 10% after Brexit.Denial won't help you. Project Reality is coming and it will hurt your family and everyone in the UK 
Time for Sinn Fein to represent their voters’ interests & attend Westminster to help defeat Brexit. “Sinn Fein leader says Brexit compromising Irish peace process would be 'grossly reckless and irresponsible' - Evening Standard  
Delingpole: Brexit 'Project Fear' Hits Peak Hysteria with Plan to Evacuate the Queen  
The really important sentence: “Corbyn’s rating on Brexit is at -44% (16% approve against 60% who disapprove)”. The 2017 balancing act is dead. Len McCluskey is undermining Labour conference policy. We are on the brink of a generational tragedy, & Corbyn’s project is in jeopardy.  
Yes. But far better to stop Brexit altogether: & we can. Keep fighting. “One day, a second people’s vote will bring us back into the EU. But when? | Will Hutton - the guardian  
EU is taking the hardest possible line in the hope of derailing BrexitA EU Parliament debate turned into an Orwellian hideous ecstasy of vindictiveness against the UK over why it deserves to crush the UK.EU is losing the plot, a bitter sham Parliament  
No-deal Brexit would be ‘absolutely savage’ for the farming industry  
In the 2 weeks I just spent on the Costa del Sol, I found his attitude is typical of many English pensioners. They don't want EU immigrants in the country they no longer live in but demand that life for them should remain as before Brexit. English execptionalism on steroids. 
This is pathetic. The EU has behaved with scrupulous correctness throughout, protecting the 27 & the integrity of EU arrangements against the lunacy of Brexit. “UK trade secretary says EU 'irresponsible' to refuse to reopen Brexit deal” - Reuters  
The Queen and other royals will be evacuated from London in the event of riots triggered by a no-deal Brexit, under secret plans being drawn up by Whitehall. @MaajidNawaz asks: Is no deal still better than a bad deal? 
The fundamental flaw in the Biafra narrative is that Igbos don't recognize any ONE supreme leader.Nnamdi Kanu that's on exile issues directives on referendum on Feb 16th. That's thoughtless & recklessWe igbos need to look inwards and think critically.Biafra ain't the answer 
Nissan tells Sunderland workers new model will be made in Japan instead, as boss says 'Brexit uncertainty not helping'  
So committed Labour supporter and anti Brexiteer Martin Freeman he of Doctor Watson fame buys a new £5m home.I say good for him but don’t tell us that the reason he’s against Brexit is because the poor will be worse off. 
Nissan: - investment decision taken for business reasons- Brexit uncertainty is unhelpful- further unspecified decisions re Brexit might be necessarySunlit uplands tho  
DUP MP's have cost the government £200mn. each, minimum. The going rate for Brexit Labour MPs seems to be a lot less. Selling themselves short?  
British officials have revived Cold War emergency plans to relocate the royal family should there be riots in London if Britain suffers a disruptive departure from the European Union next month. #Brexit 
As I concluded yesterday. Nissan decision more about EU Japan FTA agreement and fall in diesel sales. Post WTO Brexit. UK can state aid electric vehicle research, development & manufacturing. Can’t in EU. GET AHEAD OF THE CURVE. SEIZE THE BREXIT OPPORTUNITY  
Crystal Palace Chair @CEO4TAG tells @bbc5live "Post Brexit we can open up to the whole world. That will drastically reduce our cost for buying footballers and make the League a better @premierleague.” #Brexit #brexitdebate 
I've been petrol bombed in riots, countless mass fights and brawls, detained armed criminals and thought I was quite brave. But you've got way more bottle than I ever had. So proud of you and your bravery in facing down this Brexit farce. 
No deal brexit explained.  
Cuts to Police, 21,000 Coppers gone!!! rise in violent crime, rise in knife crime what do the Tories do? cuts to early intervention and.. and on top of all of that Tory Brexit making the country less safe... Get Rid of the Tories!!!   
BREAKING: Nissan cancels plans to make X-Trail SUV in the UK in blow to Brexit supporters 
Significant intervention from 1 of our most senior legal figures. Sir David Edward, European Court of Justice 1992-2004, says the Brexit threat to Scotland has changed his position on independence. via @ProgressScot 
NEW staff letter obtained by @gerardtubb Nissan boss confirms X Trail will now not be made in Sunderland, only in Japan... cites “environment for car industry in Europe changed dramatically”, having to invest in new powertrains, and says ‘clearly’ Brexit uncertainty “not helping”  
“In principle, I’m totally against a Customs Union because it would not in my view deliver on Brexit... I actually don’t think you would get a majority, so I just think it’s a complete nonstarter“ @sajidjavid#StandUp4Brexit #Marr 
The #Brexit ParadoxENGLAND: voted Leave, WALES: voted Leave,NORTHERN IRELAND: voted Remain; special arrangements plannedGIBRALTAR: voted Remain: special arrangements plannedSCOTLAND: voted Remain: ???? 
Oh, and to the extent that Brexit is an issue, it’s the UNCERTAINTY over what will happen. If Remoaners weren’t trying to stop Brexit, and our PM wasn’t so useless at negotiations, we could have had certainty long before now.  
The #EU is like a billionaires unelected boys club, telling the elected millionaires to put pressure on those below the minimal wage, to work harder and extra hours without pay, because those at the very top bonuses have been tainted.I prefer our own destiny; #Brexit  
I hate the classism that runs through the Brexit debate. People cheering the loss of jobs in Sunderland is disgusting. Many of you have no idea what it’s like to be skint or to have no hope. Yes, people were warned, but the smug glee is rank. You have no idea how lucky you are. 
but despite of Brexit -UK GDP higher than the eurozone, higher than germany.. Riots on the continent everywhere..  
"Emergency, Jeremy! We're seven points behind the Tories!""Oh, dear. Maybe we're just not backing Brexit hard enough." 
Labour's big challenge right now is a lack of clear, cut-through, populist messages that set the terms of the political debate. That's how it thrived in the 2017 general election. As long as Brexit dominates, that's a huge challenge - but one Labour needs to think about. 
After his efforts to frustrate Brexit, the deselection process for Nick Boles will begin Monday week.His local Association chair has received a record number of letters from party members with 94% of them calling for Boles to go. The grassroots are taking back control!  
Your update on the various Brexit outcomes:1. Brexit cancelled —> GAMMON RIOTS.2. Hard Brexit —> SNOWFLAKE RIOTS + STARVATION + QUEEN DISAPPEARS.3. Theresa May’s deal —> The last two years on repeat while we rehash the same arguments, possibly forever.What a choice. 
Big Ben silent as the scissors of sorrow cut the cord of commonsense. Today I eat a Brexit English breakfast: turnip bacon, turnip fried eggs, turnip mushrooms, served on a slice of toasted turnip. Table decoration is a turnip carved into a cargo ferry. I will eat that tomorrow. 
Some actual facts that help explain Nissan’s decision not to move production of the X-Trail to Sunderland... Spoiler alert: it’s not all about Brexit.  
Asking the EU to rip up the most contentious provision of the Brexit deal for an entirely unspecified alternative is absurd (via @bopinion) 
Still staggering how many Sunderland folk voted for Brexit...  
That feeling when you realize your neighbours really are out of their minds. #Brexit  
This is extraordinary.Listen to Andrew Marr’s bias against Brexit as he asks a question loaded with project fear claims which he states as facts rather than speculation. There’s no evidence that “lots and lots of companies” are taking investment to the continent. Disgraceful.  
mmmmh ok.....only problem is that destroyers, frigates, and mine sweepers tend not to have bow and stern doors for Ro/Ro lorry access#Brexit  
Hypothetical question: how many Labour MPs do you think Corbyn would have to lose to a new breakaway party before he changes his mind on Brexit? And what about Theresa May? 
The EU is prepared to take Brexit to a last-minute, high-stakes summit rather than cave into Britain's demands, diplomats say  
You misuse your Polish heritage, with Brexit talk of the Polish pilots in past battles, to justify the outrageous jingoistic rhetoric you are now trotting out, which leads to dangerous nationalism and xenophobia, including that directed at Poles in the UK. You should be ashamed.  
Yes. Because their community is going to lose hundreds or thousands of times as much due to the impact of Brexit. It's like offering someone a chocolate bar immediately before starving them to death. 
Theresa May's attitude to the Irish Brexit backstop is like someone demanding the definition of vegetarianism be changed to include bacon and sausages because they don't want to give up their favourite foods. Neither rational, nor realistic. 
Nissan boss confirms Sunderland blow - Brexit 'not helping'  
As expected Brexit being blamed for Nissan cancelling the production of the next generation X-Trail in the UK.  Nissan have just stated it is not due to Brexit ..... but no doubt that won't stop the liars.  
Caroline Nokes(immigration minister) - I think there may come a point where we have no choice but to have an extension of #Article50Molly Scott Cato - It's a democratic necessity to have a 2nd referendum... the main thing is not to destroy businesses & the country#ridge #marr 
Also: when Brexiters praise a planned investment as a sign of Brexit sunlit uplands, then claim that cancellation of the same investment has nothing to do with risks of no deal Brexit, it's hard to take seriously.  
'I will order the Navy to replace Channel ferries': Defence Secretary Gavin Williamson invokes Dunkirk spirit for a No Deal Brexit 
Struggling to keep up with your Brexit history? Here’s a primer:- Britain won both world wars on its own with no help from anyone else using only Blitz spirit and homemade popguns,- We were cruelly mistreated in the post-war reparations (despite getting more £ than anyone else) 
The Irish:*suffer 800 years of oppression and genocide*Britain: *does Brexit in shitstorm of xenophobia*The Irish: *soberly present Irish interests*Britain: *suggests the Republic should rejoin the UK*Ireland: lolPhilip Boucher Hayes et al: This is Anglophobia!!! 
WATCH: Tory Home Secretary Sajid Javid admits he will lose access to intelligence and powers that keep Britain safe if there's a no deal Brexit. #Marr 
Yessss let’s finally see some action - no more talking!Around six @UKLabour MPs said to be mulling a move to breakaway from @jeremycorbyn The MPs are frustrated at Labour's confused stance on Brexit and Corbyn's handling of anti-Semitism in the party. 
One family’s Brexit dilemma: ‘I’ll fight to keep us together until the very last day’  
What a mess. Labour are so complicit in Brexit, they can’t even beat this shambolic Tory government. Write to your MP and demand they #StopBrexit. 
Would someone like to remind @Anna_Soubry that the majority (57%) of eligible voters did NOT vote to stay in the EEC in 1975. Someone might also politely point out that the majority (65%) of eligible voters in Broxtowe did NOT vote for her to be their MP. #Marr #MarrShow #Brexit  
He’s not ambivalent about Brexit; he’s all for it.The reason he hardly ever mentions it is that he’s dishonest.  
Brexit thought for the day comes from my late Uncle David, who was on the Atlantic and Russian convoys and D Day, “It’s always them that have never been to war that are the first to call for it.” 
Nigel Evans MP @nigelmp, you gave a like to this tweet by Daniel Kawczynski @DKShrewsbury What he wrote was false The largest recipient of Marshall Plan money was the UK (about 26% of the total), France got 18% and West Germany 11%.#Brexit #LeaveLies 
The Queen will reportedly be evacuated in case a no-deal Brexit sparks riots  
I’m not interested in a new ‘centrist’ party. I’m not interested in a new party at all. I’m interested in our existing left wing party taking a left wing approach to Brexit. *ducks* 
Brexit reminds me of that kid at uni who did no work until the night before and thought he could blag his way through the law of Trusts...Naaaaaaaaaaah!! 
EU Mob Rule!Mafia Dons raked in £2.6 Billion EU cash over past 10 years...Stolen EU money was meant to benefit sheep farmers & National Park communities.At least we now know where our hard-earned tax money goes!So glad we're Leaving #EU#Brexit 
 A former UK judge on the European Court of Justice who spoke out against Scottish independence ahead of the 2014 referendum says Brexit has now left him open to the idea.  
Best thing about this is the open admission that "People's Vote" is synonymous with "stop Brexit".  
WATCH | @LiamFox: "80% of MPs were elected on a manifesto promising to honour the result of the referendum. Those who get elected on that promise and then don't follow it through will have a difficult time with the voters next time - and if that happens, they deserve it!"  
Now we go live to Brexit  
Delighted to read this openness to #Indy on part of Sir David Edward in light of #Brexit. His comments highlight the importance of strategic & policy development by @theSNP on the case for #independence Europe judge in Indy U-turn 
Patrick Minford must be creaming himself with joy. He promised us the end of car manufacturing. Watch out farmers, brexit is coming for you next! 
Maites we shud remiember Brexit is hair soon, we kneed two maike brittain grate again. Noe moore irrigation, two many hair, I stil remimber how mi road luked beefour sum irrigants moived inn at numbier 23.  
Eh, I don't think so. Yes I do not wish to vote for independence to escape this calamitous Brexit because the former Leader of SNP has an on going court case. Said no one ever.  
BREAKING: Production of JLS condoms to move from UK to France due to Brexit  
A sizeable group of MPs could split from Labour due to their dissatisfaction over Brexit and Jeremy Corbyn’s leadership.  
Michelle O’Neill suggesting SF influence has had any impact on Brexit is painfully delusional. The only show in town is Westminster - if you’re not voting, your voice is ignored. It’s that simple. #SundayPolitics 
“We are selling a pipe dream to your average loser.”Fyre.Brexit.Trump.All of it works the same way, with the people behind the scenes sharing the same attitude. 
If you support Brexit, fine. But please don’t say it’s because you support Democracy. Democracy, as a term and practice came from Athens in 5th century BC. Voting was restricted to male citizens (no foreign residents, slaves, women) who comprised around 30% adult population #Marr 
Fascinated by the argument that the UK is an impartial, rational actor when it comes to Brexit but Ireland is motivated by ideology, xenophobia and history.  
Here is another blue ticker, pretending Labour hasn’t been pushing a customs union/single market Brexit for 2 years and pretending that this was not voted down by a majority Tory government, advised by right wing labour MPs. It’s just weird. Why make stuff up ?  
I have spent my life supporting and campaigning for  @UKLabour. Any Labour MP that facilitates this Tory right wing #Brexit should be deselected. The Labour Party cannot support an act that will hurt the poor and vulnerable most. It will be a complete betrayal.#StopBrexit 
Sajid Javid avoided answering Q on UK's post-Brexit security on #marr. He might as well have stared straight down the camera and said: "You. Yes you, at home. I think you're stupid. You're too dense to understand what 'mitigate' means. So I'll use fancy words to dodge the truth." 
#Marr: If we leave with a no deal #Brexit, will things get worse for security?Home Secretary Sajid Javid: “We will still be a very safe country” 
Home Secretary Sajid Javid tells Marr “we are planning to leave on March 29th” under existing Brexit legislation, which was not quite we will leave on that date. 
The Royal Family stayed put during the Blitz. But #Brexit #ProjectFear would have us believe that the #Queen might be driven out by a temporary shortage of fresh avocados... 
Home Secretary: After No Deal Brexit we’ll still be one of the safest countries in the world. Will irresponsible hardline Remainers stop trying to scare people? 
Theresa May could call a general election in June and vows to battle for Britain during talks for new Brexit dealDowning Street advisers are thought to have drawn up plans to extend Article 50, with a possible date of 6 June for a general election   
.@JohnMannMP while you chat with @theresa_may and her Tory government about what short-term benefit you might get from helping deliver #Brexit , have you also talked about the long-term damage any Brexit will do your and everyone else's constituencies?#PeoplesVote #FinalSay 
Time to leave a message with your MP- in your own voice- let them know how you feel about Brexit and ask that the people, not the politicians, have the final say on Brexit  
Interesting - Home Sec @sajidjavid says the Border Force has told him that there is existing technology that could be used to keep the Irish border open after Brexit. Boost for the Malthouse Compromise crew who are pushing 'tech solutions' instead of the backstop #Marr 
Saddened to see yessers jumping on this news with such distain. Come on folks...we must support & welcome all who make the journey to Yes or we will fail to get it over the line. I saw the failure of a 2nd Quebec referendum firsthand & do not wish that for Scotland #Inclusive 
Good to hear the voice of #SinnFein's Mary Lou Macdonald on #marr. Says #Brexit btackstop has to be protected & that a #NoDealBrexit makes a border poll more likely. Given Northern Ireland voted Remain we have heard too much in the media from #DUP & not enough from Sinn Fein. 
#Brexit boiling down to "hide the Royals" & "hide Crown Jewels" - sounds like France then Russia at time of Revolution... An Extreme #TakeBackControl But if a hard Brexit leaves supermarkets (and KFC) empty, bellies are a normal revolutionary trigger. Let them eat chips!  
Sajid Javid: "People will never forgive us for a General Election."And you think they will magically forgive you for the appalling damage of a no deal Brexit?!#Marr 
Brexit is basically Fyre Festival 2.0. 
Why the UK cannot see that Brexit is utterly, utterly stupid  
Stratford Rd, Birmingham.Never forget that @BorisJohnson,  @DavidDavisMP, and the other bullshit artists ruled out No Deal before the referendum.(h/t @peter_garbett for the pic) pic.twitter.com/17OAycOtRR 
Liam Fox proudly boasting of Brexit Free Trade deal with Faroe Islands to import £200 million of fish Government is clearly happy to turn a blind eye to this barbarism @LiamFox @theresa_may @seashepherd @Seasaver @GlobalWarriors @emeliobedelio @Animal_Watch @Tinganes @PeterEgan6 
Brexit has thrown the UK into disarray. 2 years on from the vote & we still haven't come together. This begs the question:Should there be a referendum on the future of the current UK Union? 
All of Britain's most senior politicians have had full scrunity from the media during this critical moment in Brexit negotiations. But when was the last time we saw the EU's leaders get that same level of scrutiny?  
Sajid Javid stating (paraphrased) that the Government is going to feel free to ignore last week's vote in Parliament to avoid a no deal Brexit because it's not binding. But, but, but... neither was the referendum! #Marr 
#Brexit: "My vote is not for sale"Shadow Int Trade Secretary Barry Gardiner on Brexit cash for Labour constituencies #Marr 
Liam Fox says that MPs who don't "honour the result of the referendum" deserve to be punished at the ballot box #RidgeCatch up on today's political stories here:   
17. But that’s a futile hope. Logic and reliance on evidence have not characterised the Brexit debate. If they had, there might be less pieces arguing for the impossible and more that tried to deal with reality’s messy complexity. /ends 
Peace is a precious thing that we have built collectively @MaryLouMcDonald#Marr #Brexit  
This has been bubbling under the surface for months. @vincecable tells @SophyRidgeSky that he’s been approached by Lab & Tories about starting a new party. Brexit tactics from the two main parties leaving a space in the centre for a Remain/Second Referendum party  
“In those circumstances [of a crash Brexit], we should go back to the Good Friday Agreement & put it simply, if the border in Ireland can’t be mitigated or managed, put the question democratically to the people and allow them to remove the border” - @MaryLouMcDonald #Marr 
"I am not pro-#Brexit, I am pro-democracy" says @BarryGardiner.Are you pro massive breaches of electoral law by the Leave campaign, Barry? Millions of pounds of offshore money (very likely from Russia) flowing into that campaign? Wholesale abuses of personal data?#Marr 
#marr Glad @BarryGardiner says he is not pro #brexit but pro #Democracy   Presume that means he’s against going ahead with brexit without checking that voters still want it, given that it’s turning out to be so different from what was promised. 
Would someone like to remind @BarryGardiner that the majority (63%) of eligible voters did NOT vote to #Leave the #EU. It’s a sad day when a Labour front bencher appears to be so keen to facilitate #Brexit @AndrewMarr9 #Marr 
1. There has been a rash of opinion pieces about why the Government’s new Brexit position should be acceptable to the EU. These pieces tend to have two fatal flaws. [Thread] 
Sinn Fein on the Irish border: “There will be no hard border”Leader of Sinn Fein Mary Lou McDonald tells #Marr there’s a lot of “hot air and rhetoric” surrounding the backstop #Brexit  
'I am not pro-Brexit, I am pro-democracy and the people of this country said that they wanted Brexit.' @BarryGardiner However you voted, democracy should be respected!Respect the 17.4 million people. #Democracy 
Barry Gardiner "I am not pro Brexit. I am pro democracy. And the people in this country told us they wanted Brexit."In other words, all the bad stuff that happens is *your* fault. Nothing to do with me, guv!#marr 
“I am not pro Brexit, I am pro democracy” @BarryGardiner absolutely nailing it on #marr  
God save the Queen... from Brexit? Cold War plan revived to rescue royals from riots – media 
Also seeing lots of references to border polls. One huge lesson from Brexit: There should be no Irish border poll without a clear road-map of what would happen if the vote was in favour of a UI.  Ideally, a poll would come with an agreed UK\Irish plan for how a UI would work 
As from the date of a no-deal Brexit UK companies will have no easy redress for business issues in the EU or countries with whom there is no trade agreement e.g. delayed containers, staff refused permission to work. 19/ 
Project Fear reaches for new levels of hysteria: 'Queen takes leisurely spring drive to Sandringham in her limousine' becomes 'Queen to be evacuated from rioting hordes upon no-deal Brexit'. Nobody believes this rubbish anymore. #NoDealNoProblem #LetsGoWTO 
International Trade Secretary @LiamFox “I wish more people in our Parliament would do what they were elected to do, which was to fulfil the promise they made to honour that referendum [in 2016]”  
Invest NI makes unprecedented call on North’s politicians to act on Brexit  
Marr telling Sink Fein they should use their votes to influence Brexit. APPALLING. Sinn Fein  more honest in saying it's not their place to interfere in British politics. Who ever thought the BBC would be less loyal to Britain than Sinn Fein?! 
Mary Lou McDonald invokes the SNP experience to explain why Sinn Fein not taking seats in Commons, even with knife edge Brexit votes; “They would readily attest that Westminster has no interest in Scotland” (she’s talking about the SNP as opposed to the other Scottish MPs btw) 
Incredible. We are actually hearing from a Northern Irish politician on Brexit on our broadcast media who is not from the minority leave DUP. #marr 
“Plan to evacuate Queen” in some kind of no-deal Brexit scenario - sound, realistic planning or Project Fear disappearing into the realms of parody? You choose... 
The "flood" of jobs from London to Paris and Frankfurt has been, so far, a trickle ahead of #Brexit. No cause for complacency, but unlikely to change significantly.  
*BREAKING*BBC are putting TV licenses up by £5 & OAPs will have to start paying them too.In other news, tune into #Marr on BBC1 now, he's interviewing the spokeswoman for the IRA on 'referendum' & 'UK democracy'. 54 days to #Brexit. 
*sound of truck reversing**engine stops**back doors open**a million Brexit 50p coins spill out onto the Tesco car park*“I’ll take one small loaf of bread and a turnip please, shopkeep.” 
Sinn Fein leader Mary Lou McDonald tells @AndrewMarr9 if there is no deal, there should be referendum on Ireland (as provided for in Good Friday Agreement) on a united Ireland. "Bear in mind the people of Northern Ireland did not consent to Brexit. They voted to remain" 
CONFIDENT: Bristol Port ‘Brexit ready’, Deal or No Deal. “65% of the cargo that Bristol Port deals with is non-EU, with the majority imported under World Trade Organisation rules.” 
UK trade minister Fox says EU 'irresponsible' to refuse to reopen Brexit deal  
Brilliant article @NickCohen4 Gets to the heart of the #Brexit problem. Inequality caused by poor distribution of wealth, lack of proper taxation for the rich, + rich avoiding tax by inadequate voluntary giving and a con claiming they represent the poor.  
We have young people in the UK saying that the Referendum has ‘stolen their future’. Oddly enough, young people on continent are now hostile to EU. Perhaps that’s because they can’t find work in the workers’ paradise.  So be careful what you wish for. 
"This is huge for every single person and I think it's still not understood what no deal means" - National Farmers' Union president @Minette_Batters explains just how disastrous a no deal #Brexit would be for farmers and the food industry in the UK.#Ridge #Marr #StopBrexit 
Brexit is a civil war, tho no guns or bombs, and no-one calls it that. Over the past 3+ years, we've come to see what Brexiters are through what they say & do. They lie, cheat, distort, censor, gaslight, anything to achieve an aim with no merit, endangering EU & liberal democracy 
Nnamdi Kanu has fixed the Biafran referendum on the day of the presidential elections, Feb 16 and directed all Igbos  to stay at home so Biafran population commission will come and count them for referendum purpose. Kanu that is on exile in London  
This really is turning into 'Carry on Up the #Brexit'  - can we just do the commonsense thing and ask the EU to #RevokeA50 and the UK push to be a strong leading voice at the heart of the EU #LeadNotLeave 
remain: start stockpiling! there’ll be no food after Brexit! we will all STARVE!BE AFRAID.also remain: your supermarket shelves will be ATTACKED with a GLUT of CHEAP food!BE AFRAID. 
Labour MPs being threatened with deselection for accepting cash for hard-up communities (in exchange for backing Brexit deal) is a fascinating conflict btw principle and pragmatism. What would their constituents want them to do? Turn down the money to remain ideologically pure? 
In no-deal Brexit there will be no agreement with the EU on data adequacy or financial services equivalence. This will mean extra cost for all UK companies who move data between UK and EU for example11/ 
About to go on the air with #Marr @BBCPolitics talking Brexit, borders and backstops - tune in #Think32 #Brexit  
Nigel Farage and Esther McVey are live and taking your calls on #Brexit@Nigel_Farage | @EstherMcVey1 | #FarageOnLBC 
Scottish Labour collapse because: Leonard is completely ineffective; no Corbyn surge because they all hate Corbyn, still wedded to Better Together rhetoric, completely confused on Trident & Brexit, comms incoherent, er, that will be enough for now  
We have an Opposition that refuses to Oppose. Corbyn’s rating on Brexit is therefore at -44%.  
And this idiotic fearmongering is exactly why remainers lost the referendum (and would lose again and again). They never learn... 
Just 54 days to go before Mr. Putin's Brexit and the huge triumph for Russia 
A question for Leavers ... if you lost your job because of brexit and you ended up living on the street. Would you change your mind?Remainers please RT. 
Too many people think 'no deal' means keeping the status quo.  It's essential we change from calling it 'no deal' to "crash out brexit". We really need to make it go viral and get it into MSM. Please spread the word - retweet. #CrashOutBrexit 
I’m now expecting them to evacuate the ravens from the Tower of London on Match 28th. Because Brexit. @ravenmaster1 
The Conservative Party doesn’t hold London. That’s a Labour mayor that’s too busy virtue signalling through EU-inspired firework displays or second referendum activism to tackle the knife crime epidemic.  
Bristol Port optimistic about Brexit, Deal or No Deal. 65% of their imports are non-EU, most under WTO rules. They have just invested £7m, ready to handle any re-diverted traffic.Media too busy with Project Fear to report on confident reality.  
“80% of MPs were elected on a manifesto promising to honour the result of the referendum. Those who get elected on that promise, then don’t follow it through, will have a difficult time with their voters the next time & if that happens, they deserve it” @LiamFox#StandUp4Brexit 
The New Yorker turns to Monty Python to expulsion a no-Deal Brexit  
Liberal Democrats are fighting to give the British people the final say on Brexit. We believe people should be free to reject Theresa May's deal and stay in the EU.Let's give the people the final say > 
"The whole industry is rethinking its approach because it originally saw Britain as a gateway to Europe and that gateway is now closing [due to #Brexit]" -@vincecable on reports that Nissan will no longer make its new cars in the UK as previously agreed 
I posted this yesterday to make people aware what #Brexit will mean for many of us. I felt it was the time to share it. Please feel absolutely free to send it to your MP. As many times as you wish.#brexit #stopbrexit #brexitkills #nobrexit #WATON #exitfrombrexit #NoDealBrexit 
Nnamdi Kanu  has fixed the Biafran referendum on the day of presidential elections, Feb 16.He has directed all Igbos  to stay at home so Biafran population commission will come and count them for referendum purpose. Kanu  will be counted in London 
“After dumping 70 pages of #Brexit documents in a rubbish bin and having so many porkpies on his plate, would anyone — seriously — still/ever trust @BorisJohnson as a politician, let alone their PM?” . #BrexitBin #StopBrexit #Marr #Ridge @CCHQPress 
After Brexit - Project fear says all planes to be groundedBefore Brexit - 27th December 2018 French company buys controlling stake in Gatwick for £2.9 billion citing significant growth potential as a reason... #LeaveMeansLeave 
I get the feeling the Govt’s post Brexit “coalfields and coastal communities” fund for MPs could soon be extended to High Wycombe 
Help. My Twitter is broken again. I was looking for the reaction by Jeremy to the news that Nissan won’t be investing in Sunderland because of Brexit. Can anyone help?  
You think Ndi Igbo are fools?On the day of Nigeria's Presidential election Ndi Igbo are being told to "sit at home and be counted for Biafra Referendum".Who is counting who?What referendum?You guys should just come out with your chest and declare NK's deal with Buhari.  
Corbyn’s Brexit is no different to May’s. Nissan is leaving because we’ll be out of the Single Market. And if Corbyn continues to pander to Kippers and racists with his opposition to FOM for the workers, there’s not a cat in hells chance the EU will let us stay in that. 
Our career MP's have let our whole country down by disrespecting our democratic vote to leave the EU. A WTO BREXIT will be just fine for Britain and end on 29/3 the £Billions given to the EU for free.  
SCOOP! 'Man duped into voting for brexit through lies, empty slogans and misinformation requires forensic proof that brexit may be very damaging'#FFS 
The Tories should heed Oliver Letwin. They won’t be forgiven a no-deal Brexit | Andrew Rawnsley  
Here is a letter almost 300 of us economists signed in @thetimes before the Referendum demonstrating the overwhelming consensus against Brexit  @PhilAldrick @sjwrenlewis @jdportes 
May is trying to win votes by saying she will protect environmental standards (and workers rights) after Brexit. NFU says it's all hot air 
Back to the lies in the meme: and see those guys in the background? That photo was lifted from an article in the Leicester Mercury in 2017. Nothing to do with Brexit. The lie in the connotation of their presence in the meme is that they support Brexit.  /3  
The only ‘economist’ ever cited by Rees Mogg & other ERG advocates of ‘no deal’ literally explains how its ‘success’ will entail the destruction of British industry & agriculture. Of all the baffling things about Brexit, ignoring this simple, undeniable fact is among the oddest. 
President of Farmers’ Union on #Ridge arguing that No Deal would mean cheap imports. Not sure prospect of cheaper food is a great argument against a WTO Brexit... 
Labour has a very serious problem with its pro Brexit policy and 7% behind in today's poll so they put up Baroness Chakrabarti and Barry Gardiner to push same failed Brexit arguments. Labour has no chance of winning a snap election. #Ridge #Marr 
“Evacuate the Queen”.Because Brexit will go so swimmingly there will be uncontrollable rioting.Splendid./s 
Some one has pissed their pants!You will find most of your "headlines" are not Brexit related, but are portrayed as anti Brexit Just PROJECT FEAR IN OPERATION! 
Vets4EU have regularly expressed our alarm at the false patriotism which has hijacked the Brexit debate and now allies itself with extreme-right elements that are the very opposite of patriotic, and even sometimes subject to police investigation and anti-terrorism measures. /2  
Great interview with NFU President @Minette_Batters on @RidgeOnSunday this morning emphasising the importance of food production to the nation and why a no-deal Brexit would be a catastrophe for British farming.  
Dear Mrs May,It´s not a pizza.It´s Brexit.Brexit is national suicide.And please stop referring to 'no deal' - you really mean crashing out to the EU, and who voted for that?#StopBrexit 
WATCH: "Really, simply not good enough." National Farmers' Union chief Minette Batters slams the government for failing to protect British farmers from cheap food imports post-Brexit. #Ridge 
Privately-educated Femi is worried about skiing opportunities post-Brexit.  
BREXIT latest:DOWNSIDENissan, Sony, Airbus, Panasonic, Dyson, JaguarLR etc off/cutting jobsNo food No medicineManufacturing collapseNI peace in dangerNHS/social care meltdownKent = car parkRiotsActual shit everywhereUPSIDEBlue passportBrexit 50pCONCLUSIONWorth it 
'A no deal would be absolutely savage for us, I cannot imagine how bad it will look' - National Farmers' Union president @Minette_Batters says she has had no written assurances from the government over their plans post-Brexit.  #RidgeFor more, head here:  
Queen to be evacuated if Brexit turns ugly – reports  
There is a border between Northern Ireland and the Irish Republic. It is a currency border. It is a tax border. It is VAT border. Those pretending that Brexit changes things have weaponised a fact and turned it into a threat. 
Not Right wing, just believe in honouring the referendum result and manifesto commitment to the British people. I understand that you too stood on a manifesto to deliver Brexit too! Not a manifesto to tie us to the EU.  
It is now officially a ‘Britain stands alone’ Brexit. It is literally turning nuts.  
Perhaps the biggest outcome of the referendum is we no longer respect people just because they have titles like ‘QC’. So many have turned out to be haters of our democracy, people and country.  
The referendum was rigged! No deal is bad for the uk, Mays deal is bad for the uk, any deal is worse than what we already have!When are politicians going to grow a pair and say we should remain and change things from a position of power within the EU. #stopbrexit #brexitisacrime 
'This is huge for every single person and I think it's still not understood what no deal means' - National Farmers' Union president @Minette_Batters explains just how disastrous a no deal Brexit would be for farmers and the food industry in the UK. #Ridge 
Auto expert from Aston University on @BBCRadio4 concludes Nissan decision based mainly on fall in diesel sales - 1/3 in UK alone & now the new EU-Japan FTA which takes EU tariffs off cars built in Japan. Brexit uncertainty not the main factor, as reported  
WTO is not a “clean Brexit”...it’s the messiest Brexit possible- complete with tariff barriers, broken contracts and a non-functional WTO. 
The Lib Dems would welcome a gen election where we would campaign under my leadership as the only true stop Brexit party committed to a People’s Vote  
The four stages of Referendum Grief Syndrome.1: Denial.2. Rage3. Reluctant Acceptance4. Grasping at straws.  
Royal Family Relocating To Ireland Over Brexit  
Just after the plague of locusts! : Fears a no-deal Brexit could unleash a plague of rats if waste exports halted  
You're going to have a referendum without Nigerians. You people are jokers. A guy that's in UK is going to organise a referendum for you people in Nigeria. How did he get his passport from the FG to travel back to UK? You'll not ask questions now. 
A variation on the "We knew what we were voting for" - this is a clear case of "We know what we were voting against".Brexit is built on a foundation of outright lies & fraud, a responsible Gov't would put a stop to the pretence that it will be okay. Oh, hang on...#marr #ridge 
I remember the Millenium bug, salmonella, mad cow, not joining euro, AIDS in heterosexuals,referendum result special budgets, climate disaster scare stories.My father remembers the German parachutists dressed as  nuns scare.Me?I don't scare so easy.  
 @theresa_may: "I am now confident there is a route that can secure a majority in the House of Commons for leaving the EU with a deal. This represents a significant step towards delivering Brexit."Read more  
@NicolaSturgeon @Feorlean We know Brexit is a bad idea. That's why we voted against it. We know that choice was treated with contempt by the British state. We don't need you to tell us how bad it all is. We need you to tell us how you plan to save Scotland. #DissolveTheUnion 
"Its not just Nissan. The whole car industry is now rethinking its approach, they saw Britain as a gateway to Europe." #Brexit #Ridge 
Below, someone asked me what we can expect in the election campaign, when it happens. The answer is never-ending fake news from almost all outlets. Here's Sky News with a typical example. They had a 'Basingstoke People's Panel' about Brexit. Watch the video attached.  
MPs know if parliament is ever to command respect again, Brexit must happen, says Charles Moore  
It’s advertising an important and often ignored fact. Brexit was the biggest example of electoral cheating since the 1832 reform act. I know this might be inconvenient to some, but history won’t forget. 
The only people that want a general election are those self serving second rate politicians who are putting their spent ideology & their political ambitions before us and the national interest,Pox on every politician calling for a GE at this time of Brexit crisis  
'It isn't a unicorn, it's a question of timing' - Lib Dem leader @vincecable says he believes parliament will reject a no deal Brexit, that he would lead his party into a 2019 general election and he hasn't given up hope of a second referendum. #Ridge 
I think the BBC has succumbed to metropolitan groupthink at the worst possible time.And for many people its obsession with  the identity politics of the modern left is even more off-putting than the anti-Brexit drumbeat.This disconnect with huge swathes of people may kill it. 
Across platforms, the video has already racked up over four million views and counting...@Nigel_Farage | #Brexit 
Prof Sir David Edward, former UK judge on the European Court of Justice who spoke out against Scottish independence ahead of the 2014 referendum, says Brexit has left him open to the idea - as @AngusRobertson launches new pro-indy research & polling group 
#Brexit Fact Not Fiction :  
The EU is prepared to take Brexit to a last-minute, high-stakes summit rather than cave into Britain's demands, diplomats say  
Hi Amake, Please can you explain how I will be counted in Anambra for the Biafran referendum by sitting at home?  
.⁦@simoncoveney⁩ : The backstop is about peace: Britain must stand by it.Tánaiste : “It is now time for the UK to keep its word, to deliver on these commitments & on its responsibilities.” #Brexit 
Imagine a state where government pursues policy that wrecks industry, makes people poor, creates civil unrest, emboldens racists, serves the interests of our greatest external enemy and disrupts our supply chains of basic food and vital medicines. No need. That's #Brexit. Madness 
Queen to be evacuated if Brexit turns ugly – reports  
#brexit won’t be stopped. I suggest you move to an EU country. What exactly are you worried about?  
Your vote doesn't count in Nigerian elections, only election rigging counts.Sit at home and be counted for Biafra Referendum. 
#FakeNews #Brexit headline. Why not: ‘China isn’t buying Nissans, world discouraged from buying diesels but Nissan doesn’t adapt to changing market’’?  Instead, legacy media blames Brexit.  
'It's very worrying for the North East, the workers and their families' - Lib Dem leader @vincecable says Brexit is a major contributing factor as to why major car manufacturers are cancelling future work in Britain.#RidgeFor more on Nissan, head here:  
It started before Brexit.  Gove & Johnson are both anti experts.  This is what happens when grubby second rate journalists become politicians. 
On ‘new party’ stories today - Brexit is the deep crisis in British politics.  The existing major parties, albeit internally divided, will survive if they succeed in stopping it. If not, both Labour & the Tories will probably split & a new radically pro-European party form 
When Sunderland lost its shipyards and coal mines it still had hope: the Single Market and EU funding meant it could attract new investment. If Brexit proceeds, Nissan and its suppliers will close and it will have no such hope. You have 8 weeks people, 8 weeks. 
Brexit youthquake latest  
Very hard to feel much sympathy for the Nissan workers of Sunderland. Their employer warned them if the dangers of Brexit, yet the two voted overwhelmingly to leave. They didn’t think they were fools at the time, but might be revising their views at the moment. #ridge #marr 
Dear @jeremycorbyn,Busses will be the least of our problem if we continue with Brexit.  
Let’s stop worrying about the threats by multinational businesses in the U.K.    We are a British business, like millions of others.  Here’s why I, as a businessman, welcome Brexit - even with No Deal.  
Downing Street advisers are understood to have drawn up plans to extend Article 50 - the clause which triggered the UK's withdrawal from the EU, then secure backing of parliament for new a Brexit deal in April before calling a general election in June   
.@theresa_may for @Telegraph: Let’s put aside our differences and focus on getting the deal over the line. Brexit offers great opportunities for our country. It’s up to all of us at Westminster to make it work. 
When cancer doctors are talking about rationing cancer treatments because of Brexit you can understand why the Health Sec told Cabinet he couldn’t guarantee that people wouldn’t die if we had a No Deal Brexit.This is not Project Fear. This is REAL. 
Voters will never forgive Tories for a no-deal disaster, says minister - actually, millions won’t forgive you for any Brexit at all.   
Why Corbyns strategy to let Brexit happen is simply infuriating. - V good by @NickCohen4 
Government ministers including the PM have been threatening that if Brexit is stopped or delayed there will be civil disorder or violence. This is not merely the reporting of a threat, this is the government inciting and legitimising threats and violence. #PeoplesVote #Brexit 
The backstop is supposed to be the Brexit insurance policy. So why are we letting it burn the house down  >  Mail On Sunday  >  
The Queen, who stayed in Britain throughout the war, will not flee from Brexit chaos - unlike Rees-Mogg & Redwood who have already moved assets abroad or advised others to do so 
You #Brexit liars will be jailed, of that you should have no doubt.The largest recipient of Marshall Plan money was the United Kingdom (receiving about 26% of the total), followed by France (18%) and West Germany (11%). 
In No Deal Brexit, the lack of cross-channel ferries is a “threat to life and limb.” The navy will be called in to transport vital supplies. This is not Project Fear. This is Project reality. Our Government’s current plans are a “threat to life and limb.”  
It's getting more and more obvious that the EU is bad for Britain's interests. That's why, since the referendum, more and more Remain voters have come round to backing Brexit.  
Dear @bbcquestiontime, if  we crash out with a no deal Brexit in March, please can we go back to Derby the following week and see if those morons are still happy with their WTO 'Deal'? 
One family’s Brexit dilemma: ‘I’ll fight to keep us together until the very last day’   @Elenauk How sad to read this article. @InLimboBrexit Thx x giving voice to the human cost of Brexit and x providing a safe harbor to those  who want share their stories 
2016: Sunlight uplands, a new Elizabethan age. 2019: Make sure the Queen doesn’t accidentally die when we start rioting. There isn’t a Brexit that can deliver on fantasy promises of 2016. There’s only #OnewayForward; a #PeoplesVote#FFS 
Just bear in mind when brextremists are crying project fear, these contingency plans are being drawn up for and by a government which is trying to get through any form of brexit they can including no-deal.  They have not taken any action to actively prevent a no-deal scenario.  
Welcome @NickyMorgan01 to the hatred and prejudice Leavers have encountered on a daily basis since the referendum. For a supposed ‘peace’ project, the EU’s hardline followers can be remarkably nasty.  
Don’t succumb to gloom & despondency because of Tuesday’s confused votes in the House of Commons. Mrs May’s Brexit is heading for the buffers again & I believe we will prevail!  
Coincidence(noun)Jan 13 - EU plans to end tax avoidanceJan 13 - Cameron promises referendumJan 16 - EU propose Anti-Tax Avoidance DirectiveFeb 16 - Cameron announces referendumJun 16 - EU vote to adopt Directive in Spring 19Jun 16 - UK votes to leave EU in Spring 19 
May vows to 'battle for Britain' during talks for new Brexit deal - No, your references to the last war doesn’t make you appear heroic May, you are battling for narrow party interests. Time to let the British people deliver their verdict on this shambles.  
Concentrating on the issues that are affecting us most.Brexit or no Brexit, austerity will continue its killing spree unless we #GTTO.Austerity has killed thousands yet rather than having a GE to remove the cause, MP's & others would rather a PV.That's called enabling. 
The Tory Party is in danger of an historic split; this fact explains May’s tortuous contortions over Brexit which are so dangerous for the country BBC & MSM headline a sad handful of Labour MPs threatening - yet again! - to split (anything to do with threat of deselection?) 
To drive a #Brexit won by gerrymandering, cheating, crime, massive press campaigns of hate & lies and foreign interference, through against the clear will of the majority would be a criminal violation of democracy. Democracy needs a #PeoplesVote. 
Brexit: “The day after we vote to leave, we hold all the cards and we can choose the path we want.”                                               Also Brexit:  
Most politicians ignore the fact that the Remain majority is growing. An economically damaging Brexit added to demographic change would cause that majority to grow immensely. In a few years there may be massive public pressure to jail the Brexit liars and charlatans.#Brexit 
One Sunday paper leads on plans to evacuate the Queen from London.  Another has this.   A third features the Prime Minister “determined” to deliver #Brexit “on time”despite overwhelming evidence it can’t be done.Comment is now superfluous.  
It’s that time of year again. The number of Americans who can’t spell is kind of mind-boggling. But if Brexit coverage is your idea of an escape from SuperBowl fever, then you are in the right place.  
More scaremongering nonsense.  Hitler couldn't get the Queen out of Buckingham Palace but altering our international trading policies will? Absurd.  #Brexit #SundayThoughts 
Brexit will be fun.  
How to change this, Jeremy? Fight Brexit, back a #PeoplesVote “Theresa May given boost with seven point Tory poll lead as Jeremy Corbyn calls for snap general election” - The Independent 
Why on earth would there be riots in the event of a no-deal Brexit? That would be honouring the result of the referendum. We don’t tend to riot against democratic decisions. #TimesTalkingTosh 
Is she moving to Dublin as well? #Brexit  
I really hope that there is a split in Labour. So many good people in the party who have tried to save it but it's now @UKLAbour in name only. No real socialist party would have contemplated Brexit given the damage it will cause 'the many'.   
#Brexit Facts4EU is party-neutral.  You can like or dislike @Nigel_Farage.  But there's nothing controversial or unreasonable in his speech to the EU Parliament last week. Somehow the BBC didn't play this, so here it is.#GoWTO 
Thank you @MarinaHyde Tuesday was a record-breaking day for the number of hours the peaceful pro-EU protestors at #Sodem were called traitors to their country by Brexit supporters.We'll cope with a bit of 'traitor fatigue' to #Remain.@RemainingKind 
I've tweeted this previously and make no apologies for doing so today, or tomorrow, the day after that and every day  from then on until the result of the referendum is respected. A reminder that #17.4millionbetrayedPlease retweet if you feel the same, thank you  
This is nothing to do with Brexit, it’s because of the fall in diesel sales!! Get your facts right! Someone who works at the site told me... 
We hope to see you next Saturday 9th February in #Winchester for Anti Brexit day of action. @JasonJHunter @Andrew_Adonis @SusanKramer @vincecable 
They are doing this because neither May's Brexit nor Labour's Brexit gives them the security they need.Brexit is the problem.And the Labour front bench supports Brexit. 
 Labour policy is being AIRBRUSHED out of news. Case in point @TheEconomist does 2 articles on Corbyn’s ‘bad Brexit’.  It fails in 2500 words to mention Labour Customs Union support - NOT ONCE ! It mentions Clarke supports one though & bigs up @YvetteCooperMP Yup stitch up 
In every poll the majority of Leavers have said they are happy with No Deal Brexit. Brexiters also tend to be more patriotic than Remainers. So why anyone thinks the Queen would need protecting from middle class metropolitan elite Remainers is strange.  More scaremongering.  
Utterly cretinous Sunday Mail cheers ‘ Dunkirk spirit’ of using navy as ferries So Dunkirk was an EVACUATION caused by British defeat in a WAR.Brexit is an act of national self-harm carried out in PEACETIME.Really extraordinary that we can’t seem to understand this. 
Why is the UK walking backwards into the future?A sociologist might like to try and explain to me this very bizarre (and widespread) Brexit WW2 nostalgia: wasn't it fun when bombs fell on us and we were all hungry? 
Neil Warnock:From Sheffield Pro Brexit Thinks Gary Lineker should F...Off   
No, Keir, BREXIT is having a devastating impact.For goodness sake - sort Jeremy out or get a new leader.Have you seen how badly Labour are doing in the polls?! Listen to the sane half of the UK.  
Well done ⁦@jeremycorbyn⁩ you have broken ⁦@UKLabour⁩ with your 80s socialism, crackpot ideas and Brexit stance. I’d vote for a new middle ground party   Retweet if you would   
Join Nigel Farage live from 10am when he will be joined by Esther McVey, as they answer all of your questions on Brexit. @Nigel_Farage | @EstherMcVey1 | #Brexit | #FarageOnLBC 
What's this... Boris Johnson caught dumping vital government Brexit papers in a bin... Phew... Just as well he's not a black female MP from Hackney or the memes would be flying around on social media forever about it. 
And here in our great democracy there is no transparency, MP's leave and walk into plum jobs lobbying : a vicar's daughter and avowed Christian offers Labour MPs money for votes: gives a billion to the DUP to keep them sweet and refuses to investigate a fraudulent referendum.  
My car insurer has just sent a letter saying they are moving their HQ to Luxemburg because of Brexit. Explicit enough? 
Where does Sajid Javid sit in the Brexit debate? He is a member of & contributor to Jacob Rees-Mogg's European Research Group. He has claimed expenses on his contributions to the ERG - meaning the taxpayer is financing the UK's destruction...#BrexitShame #Marr #Ridge 
Imagine being second in the polls behind a party that:is presiding over job losses and costing the UK billions a weekforcing food and medicine stockpilingrisking UK security with no deallies about a Brexit dividendoffers the opposition cash for votes? 
The UK cannot simply trade on WTO rules after a no-deal Brexit. UK has been blocked by WTO members from simply relying on the EU’s “schedule” – its existing tariffs and tariff-free trade quotas.  
This MP is a terrible symbol of the #Brexit debate. He appears not to even know about the Lend Lease program: the one where U.S. lent the U.K. $31 billion ($340 billion today). That’s before the Marshall Plan, of which the U.K. was the BIGGEST recipient (about 25% of all funds)  
“MPs will face a choice between May’s deal and no deal, between handing a blank cheque to the Tories or crashing out. Labour must swing its support behind a referendum or it will rightly be held responsible for what comes next” Observer 
The Sunday Times reports there are plans to evacuate the royal family in the event of a no deal Brexit.The royal all family stayed in Buckingham palace throughout the blitz, so it is hardly likely they would go.No real Brexit would admittedly cause riots. 
A thousand factors force any multinational to scale back production, cut jobs, move its HQ or pull investment. There’s one MAJOR reason why so many of them are choosing to do all those things in the UK at the same time. It is Brexit. You either got this by now or you never will. 
This story is a malicious context-free distortion of what I said. @IanMurrayMP should be ashamed of himself. His time would be better spent joining his Labour colleagues working alongside @theSNP & REBEL Tories at Westminster for a #PeoplesVote #Brexit  
Friends! Good point from Our Jessica, the People's QC! The referendum was conducted unlawfully, and here's the proof:Leave won in direct contravention of EU Directive 83148257/JUNCK/VERHOF, which strictly forbids Hate Votes being counted.Talk about never understanding this!  
Boris Johnson, Jacob Rees-Mogg and Nigel Farage should show some guts and visit the Nissan plant in Sunderland and explain to the workers why they think Brexit is such a good thing.  
Corbyns Labour Brexit strategy working really well.  
NO SHAMEMr Blair wants MPs to “stand up” to the British public because they're the experts & know best about Brexit. This from a man who enabled an unnecessary war in Iraq causing over 460,000 deaths & ruptured race relations in our ­country. Tony Blair... the expert.  
'If people are angry about the Brexit mess – which they really should be – that fury should be directed at the decisions of the Tory government, decisions voted for and endorsed by virtually every single Tory MP'EXACTLY THIS!! 
How much worse can Brexit get? It's now been revealed that there are plans to evacuate the Queen following civil unrest in the event of No Deal. Thousands of Remainers will take to the streets and I'll be with them. Look at what youve driven us to. I hope you're proud, Brexiteers  
The Queen will reportedly be evacuated in case a no-deal Brexit sparks riots  
1,296 hours until Brexit• Remain have turned to Revile• Project Fear to Project Farce• The EU scam is disintegrating Thankfully on 29th March 2019 at 11pm we leave the most audacious fraud ever perpetrated on our proud island nation and Europe.Free at last  
I joined Labour to try to influence party direction, but was shocked at how easily Jeremy Corbyn could just ignore the party on #Brexit. How is he getting away with it?This thread explains how Seamus Milne has more power over the Labour than the entire @uklabour membership. 
Just look at the blatant propaganda of the mainstream media against a WTO Brexit. The Times is part of The Murdoch Empire which owns Sky and The Sun. Do not buy these rags or subscribe to Sky if you believe in Brexit.  
"WHAT YOU CAN DO TODAY TO DEFEND BREXIT" (Shouting at the TV politics shows this morning won't achieve much!) For practical solutions, read this: #GoWTO 
Any form of #Brexit whatsoever is going to cost jobs long and short term. Time for #Farage, #ReesMogg, #Johnson, #Gove etc to get on a big red bus, face the people losing jobs now and apologise on their wealthy, hedge funded, self-seeking, knees. End of. #RevokeA50 #Remain 
Unite union's assistant GS Steve Turner said he will be meeting Nissan on Monday morning. "Our priority is to ensure investment commitments are upheld.'  Arguably, your priority was to back a mythical Workers Brexit & you reap what you sow.  via @MailOnline 
These thugs have been incited into aggressive behaviour by the hate speech coming from the right-wing press and #Brexit politicians including Theresa May. Press and politicians from Theresa May downwards have encouraged and legitimised political hate and violence. #StopBrexit 
I was woken up early by the thought of how I would feel if #Brexit happens. It's not good. Intense despair would be one emotion, and extreme anger and hate would be another. If a few million people feel like me, this country will be heading for very bad times. #StopBrexit 
Brexiter Dominic Raab insists that 'only a Brexiteer will make Brussels blink'. He was Brexit Sec. for months, with David 'hard Brexit' Davis before him, and neither got any traction (or did any significant work). Where we are now is down to them!!! #BrexitShambles #Marr #Ridge 
Whitehall has drawn up secret plans to evacuate the Queen in the event of riots following a no-deal Brexit  
Brexiteers are fond of referring to the “Brexit people voted for”. Based on the statements of both Farage and Johnson, the people voted for a second referendum; this is what the two Brexiteers promised. 
Or we could just stay, have peace, prosperity and our lives back. Not to mention our rights.Brexit: Theresa May 'determined' to leave EU in March  
Worth reminding that losing our car industry is all part of their Brexit plan: cavalier with other people’s jobs & livelihoods. The case for @LabPeoplesVote grows every day! 
I was initially against #Brexit but after seeing the EU try as hard as it can to punish the UK for leaving, I now see the relationship for what it was: abusive. 
“Britain can’t escape the prison of class, however hard it tries.Any kind of Brexit will hit the north, Wales and Midlands, which is why Leave-supporting Labour MPs are betraying the very constituents they say they are serving.” Me  in The Observer  
1/Hello@DKShrewsbury@RoryStewartUKThis is you both being informed by Prof Patrick Minford what would happen to the car industry if you followed his economic model.You did not tell people during the referendum that you would deliberately trash UK manufacturing#BexitInquiry 
Anyone know of a political party that is anti-Brexit and doesn't hate women? Asking for a lot of friends. 
Macron on Brexit: The #WithdrawalAgreement is "the best agreement possible and is not renegotiable" 
To all those in the South -Nissan not making new model at Sunderland has absolutely NOTHING to do with #brexit . It will have NO impact on current jobs at the plant . Stop using #brexit for everything @SkyNews @BBCNews 
Fraud! FG must have paid him , released him to cause voter apathy.Come back to Abia let's count you during the referendum.Ewu Isreal 
Ronald, you are the calmest and most decent of people I meet on twitter.  You must know the car industry globally is in a dire state. Though, BREXIT plays a tiny role in Nissan's decision to shelve the SUV production, its the state of the car industry that triggered the decision 
Nissan will not be building the predominantly diesel X-Trail at Sunderland.Brussels has been trying to ban diesel cars from Europe since the VW fiasco.Declining sales and EU environmental legislation is to blame not Brexit.#BBCQT 
Is the report true that all benefits & free housing for migrants will stop after Brexit & that British people will be put first? 
Brexit : Before and after    
Companies in continental Europe are preparing for a chaotic no-deal Brexit  
Forget it matey, @Anna_Soubry is providing far better opposition to Brexit than the entire @UKLabour front bench, with the exception of @Keir_Starmer. 
Every MP that voted for Brexit should be made to comment on Nissan’s decision and explain why they are promoting the decline of British manufacturing. @theresa_may Sky Sources: Japanese car-maker Nissan is cancelling plans to build its X-Trail model at its plant in Sunderland 
Dear Brexit overlords,Only approximately 10% of Earthtards are as stupid as you think they are. Another 40% are apathetic about everything.The remaining 50% are implacably fucking furious with you.See you around. 
Emergency plans to rescue the royal family during the Cold War have been redrawn to evacuate the Queen in the event of riots triggered by a no-deal Brexit  
Prime Minister of #NewZealand, @jacindaardern, has confirmed her government stands ready to strike a comprehensive trade deal with the #UK for closer migration and trade relations.#CANZUK #cdnpoli #auspol #nzpol #ukpolitics #Brexit 
Remain MPs blame Brexit for Nissan withdrawal  
Exit from Brexit? I'd like it, but it's unlikely: German foreign minister  
The British Raj was always a travelling circus of maps, medals, and grand larceny. But Britain’s failure to come to terms with the end of empire has led to the most moronic decision in memory — the Great Brexit Disaster of 2016. Today’s piece: 
It's not like there was a referendum held that was of huge geo-political importance and that was won in part because thousands of micro-targeted ads based upon analysis of stolen Facebook data were created and broadcast .No sir. That would be outrageous. 
The Queen will reportedly be evacuated in case a no-deal Brexit sparks riots  
The tiniest hint of Labour backing a second referendum and this happens. Watch how quickly it rallies when people realise that is not the case. Don't beleive FBPE when they spout their nonsense. #Labour must respect the result of the first referendum.  
Brexit: Theresa May 'determined' to leave EU on time  
Queen Elizabeth to be evacuated in case of Brexit unrest: media  
Too bad they are going to have to eat it after Brexit.   
Referendum on the 16th of February? You must be stupid Man!You think we don't know you're working for APC led administration. Continue fooling yourself. Anu Mpama!!  
Legit question: can someone explain to me the procedural/legal reason why Brexit can’t just go to a revote?Because this looks to be about to become a disastrous exit, if not a war. 
UK's May says to seek 'pragmatic' Brexit solution in Brussels  
If the UK  CAN’T deal with the snow, KFC running out of chicken and drones, how’s it expected to deal with Brexit ???  
If you find yourself thinking “Parliament would never allow us to go to war with our friends and allies”, have you ever thought “Parliament would never allow us to go through with a no deal Brexit”? 
ICYMI: Queen Elizabeth calls for respect and finding common ground, in what some see as a call for #Brexit civility  
I think we tend to give this argument more credence online, somewhat racistly, the more exotic and poor the country. Imagine someone getting away with "Brexit is good. Trust me. I'm English." or "Look, I'm American and we want Kamala" or whatever. 
Since 21st January when I placed the bet, @PaddyPower has slashed the odds on #IrishUnification to pass before 1st Jan 2024.2 weeks ago the odds were 20/1, but today they are 15/2#Think32 #PaddyPower #Brexit #UnitedIreland @thejournal_ie @IrishCentral 
Breathe11Major DNA testing company is sharing genetic data w/ the FBIPatel Author of controversial Nunes memo joining National Security CouncilGoldman Sachs could claw back executive pay over 1MBD scandalQueen Elizabeth to be evacuated in case of Brexit unrest: report pic.twitter.com/YAgeUxHF1u 
Opinion: It is unfair to accuse Speaker Bercow of trying to block Brexit  
“Any kind of Brexit will hit the north, Wales and Midlands, which is why Leave-supporting Labour MPs are betraying the very constituents they say they are serving.”  
The significant bit of this report is that Philip Hammond is lobbying for a second referendum  
Breathe6Trump Sought a Loan During the 2016 Campaign. Deutsche Bank Said No. Longtime Schumer spox left after inappropriate behaviorUS Softens Timing for List of NK’s Nuclear AssetsBrexit: Leave. EU & Arron Banks' firm fined £120,000 over data breaches pic.twitter.com/oXumESOAGP 
#TheQueen and members of the Royal Family will be evacuated out of London to safe locations if things get dicey with unrest and riots in London next month if there is a “no deal” Brexit.  
Brexit Explained  
I've read this three times now, trying to understand the point of it.What I make of it is:1. Joanna Cherry is part of a cross-party group, working together, to oppose Brexit.2. Ian Murray is, and always will be, an opportunist fud.3. #DissolveTheUnion 
I am TRULY disgusted by this.Of all the Tory seats to pick on, you pick on one of the very few Tory MPs trying to save the country from destruction?I hope every single Labour member who opposes Brexit shreds their membership cards with immediate effect.You lot make me SICK!  
2016: Brexit will go fine2019: WE’RE BLASTING THE QUEEN INTO SPACE  
Exit from Brexit? I'd like it, but it's unlikely: German foreign minister  
The Queen and other senior royals will be evacuated from London in the event of riots triggered by a no-deal #Brexit, under secret plans being drawn up by Whitehall, according to the ⁦@thesundaytimes⁩. 
Plans in place to evacuate The Queen and Royal Family if Brexit results in unrest  
Cut the crap Anna. If you really cared about business certainty you wouldn't be calling for another divisive drawn-out binary EU Referendum. This an ideological crusade for you, don't pretend otherwise. Job losses totally on you and all the "Remain or nothing" MP's.  
Foaming at the mouth Brextremist nut-job Julia Hate-Spewer has NOT tweeted for 12 hours on the day it emerged Nissan is switching production of its latest model out of the UK due to her beloved Brexit catatrophe. #Fuckwit #Nissan  
Queen Elizabeth to be evacuated in case of Brexit unrest: media  
Tories pencil in June 6 for polling day after delaying Article 50 and securing Brexit deal in April | Daily Mail Online  
Not what we voted for #Brexit betrayal  
This guy was on the Bank of England board. Thinks the BBC should just carry on with Project Fear, Despite Brexit & full on Remainer bias  
ICYMI: Queen Elizabeth's comments about respect and finding common ground are understood by some as a call for #Brexit civility  
May 'could call June election' and vows to 'battle for Britain' during talks for new Brexit deal  
UK media: "#Brexit will lead to UK unrest. We are sure of it."Also UK Media: "France? Err whut? Never noticed."  
The last laugh Can the Speaker affix #Brexit sticker on his car? Interesting debate in British Parliament.(Video length 1.31 mins)  
Surging 18thC diseases in UK:Gout  2010 to 2018  ^38%Scarlet Fever   ^208%Pertussis   ^59%"Dickensian diseases on the rise in Tory Britain today. The damning truth is austerity is making our society sicker. It means the poor die younger."And #Brexit ? 
Assertions without decent evidence are worthless.What you suggest was not true before the referendum and not true now.You and your ERG and UKIPPY buddies have created this mess.You have divided our country with your bile and stupidity.  
NOT F*** HELPFUL! Most remainers had no idea what the Single Market was in 2016!Even the BBC didn't! People in the most neglected areas of the UK are set to suffer even more from Brexit. We need to come together to fix this. Ridicule is pointless & cruel. 
Two years ago I interviewed Theresa May about the prospect of jobs lost at Nissan in Sunderland as a result of a hard/no deal Brexit + the impact on a community so reliant on that plant. Quite striking to see just how little has progressed from this answer more than two years on:  
Fifth of large UK firms have already moved operations abroad due to Brexit while a further 12% are planning it — Businesses are now well past the point of no return when it comes to taking contingency action, as a no-deal rupture on 29 March rushes closes 
Ask many of those who campaigned on the doorstep in 2017. Only by accepting Brexit were they able to get a hearing from local people and focus their minds on day-to-day issues in their lives. Had Labour not accepted Brexit, they'd have been crushed. 
Queen Elizabeth to be evacuated in case of Brexit unrest: media  
This is anecdotal: I don't have the sources to hand. But what I noticed repeatedly last year was, whenever Labour seemed closer to stopping Brexit or backing a 2nd referendum, their support FELL. That's exactly the same problem which did for Ed Miliband in 2015. 
The U.S., New Zealand, Japan, South Korea, Ukraine, Israel and Moldova have all blocked Britain’s post-Brexit entry into the World Trade Organization’s Government Procurement Agreement, a market worth $1.7 Trillion 
"Labour is now seven points behind the Conservatives, with approval ratings for Corbyn over his handling of Brexit at an all-time low and worse than those for May."@UKLabour @CorbynistaTeen What a useless old man!!! 
What a farce Brexit is. Why is anybody in Scotland putting up with this nonsense & self harm against common sense or our wishes? It’s a simple choice now, defend our rights to excel or sink into an abyss & be labelled cowards to the world. I will be ashamed if we do. #saoralba 
We know that businesses are threatening job losses in the event of a No Deal Brexit but are ‘secret plans’ to evacuate the Queen if there are riots just Project Fear gone bonkers? How bad for Britain would a crash out Brexit actually be? Join me from 1 on @LBC 
The Royal Navy could be pressed into action to ferry vital supplies across the Channel in the event of a No Deal Brexit because the increasing of ferry capacity has failed, according to a secret contingency planning document of the British governmentVia Mail on Sunday  
Allowing Brexit to happen, at the expense of people's jobs so we can build socialism  atop the rubble won't work. You said a dramatic line earlier, so now it's my turn:A socialist manifesto written in the blood of the working class will never be voted for in a general election. 
Again, according to the Sunday Times, Hammond has been lobbying MPs to hold a second referendum. Eight Remainer MPs (Tory and Labour) are also supposed to be planning a new party. 
The threat of the French turning against the EU Project is very real.They were one of two countries that rejected deeper EU integration in 2005 after all - an integration that happened despite rejection.Now #Macron ridicules Brexit because he is scared of it.  
HEHASDEMENTIAThat's not the only reason by far that he's a bad President, and it's not a referendum on all people who have dementia, but HE CLEARLY HAS DEMENTIA  
According to the Sunday Times, there are plans to evacuate the Queen and senior royals from London in the event of a no deal Brexit. I am sure Her Majesty would never agree. Not even Hitler could get the royals to leave London. Besides the Queen is supposedly a Brexiteer. 
Theresa May is still a zombie PM.Her deal is still crap.Tories still face electoral armageddon.Labour still unelectable.EU still arrogant tosspots.UK media still bought liars....and #Brexit is *still* en route.54 days to go, weak liars cannot halt our surge to freedom. 
This is my Dad you utter sap. He was RAF aircrew in WW2. He knew that after the war we needed to build a Europe strong and united. He campaigned in the 1975 referendum for remain. He knew that loving your country is good but nationalism and xenophobia is always wrong.  
How comes the Queen can get evacuated. What about the rest of us 16 million who didn't vote for the utter shit that is #Brexit. We should add the 13 million wankers who didn't bother to vote at all. 
Brexit: Care home and hospital caterers stockpiling food  
The cool thing about Brexit is that it exposes just how little liberals care about issues that effect people in their day to day lives  
We Remainers have got the 15-20 Tory MPs we needed onside. A huge achievement. Now the source of anxiety is Labour, whether Corbyn or the likes of Caroline Flint or both. #PeoplesVote #Brexit 
Brexit plans to evacuate the Queen in the event of riots triggered by a no-deal Brexit, under secret plans being drawn up by the British government — The royals would be moved out of London to a secret locationVia @thesundaytimes 
By failing to investigate the fraudulent illegal referendum of 2016 our political parties Conservative and Labour both look guilty. Not one word complaining about it 
The Brexit Labour party are now seven points *behind* this shambolic Tory government.Labour needs to stop enabling Brexit - and start campaigning hard to #StopBrexit. Millions of votes are there to be won - for parties that campaign to #Remain. 
Wasn't this the start of Brexit, the fact that the EU will not reform. It doesn't listen to many of the other members, eg Hungary over migrant crisis.  
From a friend : Sky News now:There is a plan in place to move the Royal family in case riots break out in case of a no deal and STILL BREXIT SUPPORTERS THINK IT'S A GOOD IDEA!!!  They know No Deal is so catastrophic that they're prepping for this?! 
Labour is not responsible for brexit. The conservatives called the vote. Labour is the opposition and cannot negotiate terms for leaving. How stupid do all you people blaming them think you are capable of becoming. Asking for everybody who understands democracy and how it works. 
May says to seek 'pragmatic' Brexit solution in Brussels  
Nothing to do withCorbyn’s hopeless Oppositionhis supporting Tory Brexithis bungling of the Immigration and Society Security billhis allowing his MPs to accept bribes from the Toriesor his allowing his ministers to defy the whips?What about his inaction on anti-Semitism? 
UK police rely on EU databases to identify criminals & bring them to justice. Deal or no deal, Brexit will make their job harder – and make us all less safe.We need a #PeoplesVote & an #ExitFromBrexit. 
Labour supporters denied they were siding with racists when they were trotting out right wing cliches about low skilled immigrants swamping the UK. They bear huge responsibility for waving through a xenophobe Brexit & for the destruction of EU ctzns lives.  
No such thing as a Jobs first #Brexit. It's just a shit #Brexit...there is no other #Brexit. 
Royals 'to be EVACUATED from London if No Deal Brexit sparks riots'  
I don't quite follow the logic of these alleged official plans. It seems they're rooted in fear that Remainers will riot if a No Deal Brexit goes ahead. Are there no plans to deal with riots by Leavers if Brexit is blocked?  
And the problem with our "national #Brexit debate" is not only will apologising never cross @DKShrewsbury   mind but he won't get close to feeling any sense of embarrassment about such a silly tweet. 
So the areas of greatest deprivation are also (tragically), the areas:where support for Brexit is the strongestthat would receive the most from the EU over the next 5+yrsthat will be hit hardest by Brexitwhere the PM is trying to bribe MPs#TurkeysChristmas?! 
Wish Scotland could be evacuated from Tory Brexit Britain too......  
Unbelievably tragic, avoidable and so predictable once HMG adopted the hard Brexit out of SM&CU policy. Still time to reverse or soften Brexit.  
I'm am certain that this is unintentional, but I really think that Spain's response to the Catalan independence referendum has started a chain of human rights dominos in Europe that has already spread to France. Macron sees that little was done about Spain. He is emboldened. 
Oh dear, project fear Stop clutching at those straws, they’re a menace to the planet Fears a no-deal Brexit could unleash a plague of rats if waste exports halted  
Supporting Dictators, welcoming Anti Semites, deselecting BAME candidates & voting for Brexit is working well for Corbyn then.  
“No Deal riots”? What are they smoking? There will be street parties if we leave with “no deal”. There will be riots if Brexit is delayed by 1 minute or if it is Remain - which is what the WA is. Who is going to riot? Remoaner liberal snowflakes? What happened to MSM logic? Nuts. 
A landmark revelation that every Briton must see - Brexit supporter or not! Steve Baker MP answers the European Scrutiny Committee  
Newspaper headlines: 'Brexit plan to evacuate the Queen'  
Tory backbencher Richard Drax hit back at demands to extend the Brexit process as he called for Britain to have a “clean break” from the Brussels bloc and not give Remainers "anything else to shout about". We must leave 29th March.. #ManagedWTOBrexit 
There is no Brexit dividend.Nissan were due to manufacture their new car in the UK, in Sunderland.Now, those plans are cancelled. Brexit is putting jobs at risk. The Brexit shambles must be stopped.Write to your MP to demand they #StopBrexit. 
'Secret plans to evacuate The Queen if no-deal Brexit causes riots'  
How would you solve the Brexit problem if you were PM? Majority of visitors to Princes St brexitometer today would #RevokeArticle50 with #PeoplesVote a close second.#OptiontoRemain #JustMakeItStop 
The decline in diesel sales is part of the reason large multinationals are cutting jobs. Brexit is why all of them are cutting all of the jobs they need to cut in the UK. 
To all whose live choices have been decimated, to every worker promised "no jobs lost", if you need a healthy and well-staffed NHS, to those who know Brexit throws open the doors to the worst of capitalism, to members promised control of policy, Corbyn's Labour has betrayed you. 
Telegraph’s response to civil unrest caused by no deal Brexit (no insulin, no fresh fruit and veg, no radio isotopes for radiotherapy, stockpiled waste, collapse in trade and major economic shock)?Plans for Queen’s evacuation.  
“Latest Opinium poll suggests Labour has lost support from both sides of the Brexit debate.”Listen Jeremy, there comes a time when leaders have to LEAD!This isn’t the battle you chose. But you still have to fight it. 
No. Russia was found to have played a part in US elections and Brexit votes. I have no idea why you voted to leave.... Allen35033190  
Conference policy on Brexit has been deselected. 
Sunday Telegraph goes all Empire and #Brexit ... The PM 'will "fight" for Britain in Brusses' #geez The backstop is a compromise the UK Gov agreed to and is now reneging on ... Why would Ireland/EU gamble with a UK that looks tonight that it is adding Nissan to those it misled. 
Nissan ‘set to abandon plans to build X-Trail model at Sunderland plant’ as Brexit uncertainty shakes UK car industry  
I spoke to my senior Nissan UK contact tonight and he confirmed not only that the X Trail will not go ahead in Sunderland (announced in the week) but that it’s 100% a Brexit based decision. He said the UK will soon be toxic to inbound investment. He was scathing frankly. 
I never understand this idea that a referendum will lead to riots but food shortages, medicine shortages & mass job losses won’t 
When does Project Fear become Project Reality?I am so angry about the damage that Brexit is doing to our region Anyone who argues that Brexit has any economic benefit whatsoever should look at what is happening to our region.  
Raise your hand if you will be dead by the time Brexit goes through....  
Last Sunday the news was dominated by a lie.The Sunday Times put a suggestion in one paragraph about 'martial law' & ALL media leapt on it.It was a lie. Media didn't care.This week the story is Nissan & it's another spun lie.#Brexit in 54 days. Ignore the lies.  
Boris Johnson dumps Brexit parliamentary paper work in fuel station binThe king of gaffes dumped 70 pages of work into a petrol station trash can - including handwritten memos on the economy  
No matter what happens during Brexit, there are 5 signs of damage it has caused so far  
It has emerged that civil servants have drawn up plans to evacuate the Royal Family if a No Deal Brexit causes riots on the streets of London. The Mail on Sunday claims that Whitehall planners are considering the need to move the Royals to safe locations away from the capital. 
When it all goes down the shitter, the ruling class look after their own.#thequeen#brexit pic.twitter.com/eR2CGIswNH 
This is an example of the level of political comment in #Brexit England today. Perhaps extreme but not untypical. Dangerous, nationalist bile.  
“The scarcity of isotopes once we drop out of Euratom” is a phrase that fills me with rage. Anyone up for trying those who still advocate Brexit for murder? I am....  
BREXIT & LABOURThere's rumour a group of disaffected Labour MPs is preparing to quit the party to form a breakaway movement amid discontent with Corbyn’s leadership on Brexit and other issues including immigration and foreign policy. Labour is 7 points behind the Tories.  
Because the public still have faith in them completing brexit cleanly, if they don't they'll be unelectable for years!Tories surge to 7-point lead after Labour's Brexit blocking  
Desperate stuff from Corbyn.  Back Labour Brexit get austerity dressed up in a different name.Meanwhile they keep trying to sell “Brexit?  Who me?”Then wonder what has gone wrong with their wonderful plan to get Brexit but blame it all on the Tories.  
Car production down in UK, its also reduced in Germany and France, so don't blame Brexit. 
Under a Tory administration you'll not pay parking fees at work. Of course, under a Tory Brexit you won't have a work at which to park. So hurrah.  
Rebel Labour MPs set to quit party and form centre group reports the Guardian?Growing discontent over policy on Brexit, anti-Semitism and Venezuela spur breakaway movement? Please, stop procrastinating...just go, then we can all move on. Thank you.Ps. GO AWAY. Thank you. 
I swear I am not making this up - according to the newspapersUKGov's latest plans for Brexit:1   Evacuate the Queen from Buckingham Palace to avoid rioting.2   Hold a General Election on 6th June.  That's right - on D-DAY!These utter clowns actually believe it's still 1944. 
You had better get your facts right here! It is due to plunging diesel sales and the fact that they have struggled to get their Diesel engines compliant with new regulations. Please stop using #Brexit as the beating post! No jobs will be lost in Sunderland! 
I think we can safely assume there probably will be riots judging by the current behavior of the neon nazisMays brexit = Neons riotCorbyns fantasy brxt = Neons riotNo brxt = Neons riotNo deal brxt = Neons celebrate for a few days, then the whole country riots as reality hits 
Oh dear Remainers, #ProjectFear is getting embarrassing now.Brexit could unleash a plague of rats  
Low-grade Blairites bloated with self-importance still think they know better than 17.4 million Brexit votersBut this week Parliament sent them a clear message. They won't succeed in overturning the biggest democratic mandate in our country’s history! 
Brexit is going so well there is now ‘a plan to evacuate the Queen’. #tomorrowspaperstoday 
So, it appears that there are now only 253 Lab MPs prepared to continue backing a Brexit enabling, anti-Jewish, totalitarian populist Lab party.I’m completely reassured & impressed.  
We now head over to Brexit who has more Brexit news ahead of the Brexit.  
A PM who has stopped progressing Brexit bills through Parliament for fear of defeat says she will deliver Brexit in a matter of weeks  
I’ve forgotten. Was “we’ll evacuate the Queen” on the side of any of those #Brexit buses?  
According to Len McCluskey Corbyn is a genius & has played a blinder with his handling of Brexit. This must explain why Labour are doing so well in the polls.   
The government:“We can’t have a second referendum because there’d be civil unrest”Also the government:“Good chance the riots will be so bad next month we’ll have to evacuate the fucking queen” pic.twitter.com/nWdFOctR1D 
Rebel Labour MPs set to quit party and form centre group amid growing discontent with Corbyn’s ways not opposing Brexit, his support to end freedom of movement, his support to Venezuela’s Maduro, and enabling antisemitism 
Sadly, the Brexit chickens are coming home to roost.   This is what many people in Sunderland -- including many who work for Nissan -- voted for.    Did they think there would be no consequences?  
Thanks to the great #Brexit charlatans who lied to voters about the true impact, Nissan set to join other key industries pulling out of future investments. 
What Brexit has helpfully revealed is how incredibly thick some of our MPs are - what can be done about it is more of a problem. 
Nissan is facing a number of challenges. People, especially in Europe, are not buying diesel. The Chinese won’t buy Japanese cars. The EU economy is moving towards recession. Brexit cannot be blamed for Nissan’s problems which are shared by all carmakers. Even Cable admits this. 
Matt on Brexit #TheresaMay #Tories #Brexit #BrexitShambles - political cartoon gallery in London  
At least 6 Labour MPs are planning to resign the whip and leave the party soon so that they can oppose Brexit. One of them is rumoured to be anti-Brexit rebel Angela Smith who represents a constituency where 61.3% voted LeaveGood riddance to them all!  
Brexit is so disastrous it’s turned us into an ant colony  
2016: ‘No downsides to Brexit, only upsides!’2019: ‘GET THE QUEEN OUT OF HERE’  
Fifth of large UK firms have already moved operations abroad due to Brexit new survey shows  
Fake news from ⁦@SkyNews⁩ Nissan have not blamed Brexit and no jobs will be lost. FU ⁦@SkyNews⁩Nissan casts further gloom on car industry with X-Trail blow. 
We were at Radio Biafra London studio & witness our leader, Mazi Nnamdi Kanu broadcast from our London studio after 4 years.Biafra is here and there is nothing anyone can do about it.Remember to sit at home in Biafraland on February 16, 2019, & be counted for Biafra Referendum!  
The question is:why were people who were utterly ignorant of history & economics so effective at winning the referendum?  
Tomorrows papers saying that @10DowningStreet are planning an election for June after extending Art50 so that the people can vote for PMs deal.Get ready @Nigel_Farage the 17.4M need somewhere to go as they wont be voting Conservative or Labour after both of their Brexit betrayals 
We want our country back and no amount of #FakeNews or scaremongering will change that! We want #Brexit And to quote @theresa_may... NO DEAL IS BETTER THAN A BAD DEAL!  
SUNDAY TIMES: Brexit plan to evacuate the Queen #tomorrowspaperstoday 
SET YOUR ALARMS! Sunday Supplement klaxon! ... An extra episode as David and Helen try to work out where we've got to with Brexit after this week's votes in the Commons.  Can Tory unity hold?  Can EU unity hold?  Something's got to give - but what?  And when?  
A No Deal Brexit saves £39bn. Help save Brexit @  
What about your party's PATHETIC opposition to the Tories' chaotic handling of Brexit? You could have literally not bothered turning up since June 2016 for all the good you've done. You're as bad as they are. Don't know how you sleep at night. 
A question for Leavers ... if you lost your job because of brexit and you ended up living on the street. Would you change your mind?Remainers please RT. 
 #TheRainMakers@realDonaldTrump  French 'yellow vests' march through Paris Denouncing Police Violence   Join the Great Awakening across the World#MAGA #Frexit #Brexit #GiletsJaunesParis 
GOVERNMENT officials have begun “serious work” on remaining in the customs union in a bid to salvage Theresa May’s Withdrawal Agreement on the eleventh hourLilley is right that this would be a Brexit betrayalWhat part of LEAVE don't they understand?  
The anti-Brexit camp is led by overpaid QCs; a dry-drunk, psychopathic spindoctor, an unhinged philosopher; a Rod-Stewart lookalike who won't even recognise his workers as employees; & a man who killed 2 mil in Iraq.And they wonder why they have no support in the working class? 
Most labour voters oppose Brexit, Labour doesn’t. It’s like the shock of finding out you have Lyme disease after you’ve just kissed a deer 
If any @UKLabour MP is tempted by the bung consider these two maps. This indicates how well an area is doing compared to the rest of the EU. Worryingly it shows a country in decline. We have gone from 2 to 5 at the bottom and more is in the middle than the top. #Brexit #Remain 
When you hear of police/military planning, the pretence for it will be in the case of No Deal I'm certain some of it's true, but the scenario they are gearing up for is *not* No Deal it is No BrexitThat's what will cause riots. No Deal is the disguise for their preparation 
It’s really enough now. Every single day for almost a month there’s been some anti-German snipe. Usually not based on facts. I have really had enough of this. As a German but also as a historian. The abuse of history to justify Brexit is sickening, irresponsible and dangerous. 1/  
Repeat after me, Labour:There’s no such thing as a Jobs First BrexitThere’s no such thing as a Jobs First BrexitThere’s no such thing as a Jobs First BrexitThere’s no such thing as a Jobs First BrexitThere’s no such thing as a Jobs First BrexitTime to be honest with people 
This Scottish/Belgian couple are in an impossible position & are also concerned about other EU citizens in similar circumstances who might not be aware that come No-Deal-Brexit their EU27 benefits will cease.@SiannamacDonald #InLimbo #RingFenceOurRights 
A bad day personally on the sporting front. Ireland and Everton both chinned. Brexit to blame. That’s my story and I’m sticking to it. 
Why does any new party have to be centrist? Make it socialist, just not riddled with antisemitism and Brexit. 
President Puigdemont to Canadian TV: "Scots can hold a referendum but in Spain it's a crime"  
We agree with Anna, no second referendum.  
Impeachment?!?! Absolutely got to go. Traitor. Sir Oliver Letwin says he never agreed with the Conservative's 2017 manifesto, as he attempts to block a no-deal Brexit 
UK would regret no-deal Brexit 'for ever': business minister  
Oh dear - this is what we're dealing with - fantasy world - the 'evil eu empire'. Sad that some people think EU is the cause of their problems. Brexit will be like going to hospital suffering with kidney stones - and they amputate both your arms . You still have kidney pain.  
If Labour has smarts, they’d use Nissan announcement (and any other companies that want to jump on the bandwagon) to say that Brexit is a job-killing machine & must now be cancelled. Then defy the Tories to call an election if they still think Brexit is “will of the People”.  
If you were leader of the Conservatives wanting your MPs to vote for your crappy Brexit deal, briefing the Mail on Sunday about your “plans” for a general election and threatening deselections is a logical tactic. Let’s hope it’s not all a bluff, though.....   
Brilliant....#brexit  
We don’t give a fly fuck about fucking busses. We want you to stop Brexit before it devastates every job, company, family and life in this country. There is nothing more important. It’s not going to bring a socialist wonderland. It’s going to be a shit show. DO SOMETHING 
Agreed the Tories are handling it badly but ultimately Brexit is the problem Keir. It’s bad in any form for Britain, you know it, please say it! 
We were lucky in the UK, Cameron gave us the #EUref to take back control the democratic way. Unfortunately our French friends are not so lucky & are in a fight to return the control of French back to the people the old fashioned way.#Brexit #Frexit #GiletJaunes #ViveLaFrance 
If Labour now came out and suddenly, unexpectedly said “Brexit is such a shitshow, and has been so badly botched by the Tories, that the only responsible course of action now is to revoke Article 50 and cancel Brexit” I reckon those polls would get quite interesting.  
It is generally accepted that May has made a complete pig’s ear of the Brexit negotiations. There is nothing controversial in saying that.Yet @OpiniumResearch managed to find 2k people online who gave her an increased approval rating for her handling of #Brexit.Incredible.  
The Brits are the most open society in the world for foreign goods, the EU proclaiming we are little Englanders is tosh, now is time the Nation of shopkeepers become more patriotic just like the Europeans & buy more of our own products post Brexit!@gerardjasper @BrexitKnight 
We are eight weeks from a no deal hard Brexit and @jeremycorbyn is off doing one over busses. Jesus fucking Christ it’s like we’re living in the middle of the thick of it. You could make up incompetence like this if you tried. 
In just 6 months, 18-34-year-old’s approval of how Jeremy Corbyn is responding to Brexit has dropped 27 percentage points, from +13% in July to -14%. Corbyn’s failure to do enough to stop Brexit is one of the top reasons. (fieldwork Jan 23-25)#Brexit 
Has Corbyn seen the polls? Losing. Utterly delusional. He can't stick to party policy on Brexit. Labour finances in disarray. Party split looming. Deselection & backstabbing. Why would voters trust him to lead the UK? Delaying tactics to deliver Brexit.   
'We liberated half of EUROPE!' Brexiteer MP blasts 'UNGRATEFUL EU's' Brexit behaviour  
Confused about the next steps in Brexit? Here you go. Thanks @jonworth  
Puigdemont to Canadian TV: "Scots can hold a referendum but in Spain it's a crime"  
We've  heard 'off the record' from a remain army cadet captain that if brexit 'goes wrong', young army cadets 3 star and above will be called up to act as home guard. Most are remainers. Our sons and daughters.  #armycadetsuk #Stopbrexit 
“A Labour source last night said that ‘A new party to protect the status quo will rightly be seen as an establishment stitch-up.’” What status quo? What establishment? Brexiters ARE the establishment. The status quo is kamikaze Brexit.   
Blairite Labour MPs set to quit the party and form a new centrist partyGrowing discontent over policy on Brexit, anti-Semitism and Venezuela spur breakaway Blairite movement  
Nissan reverses decision to build X-Trail at Sunderland - bey bozo ⁦@michaelgove⁩ you told everyone not to trust experts who told you brexit would result in loads of firms moving to the E.U. and closing plants in uk if brexit mugged by reality again  
RISING: Conservatives surge to 7-point poll lead. Labour’s Brexit blocking is going down like a cold bucket of sick! 
Genuine answer for you. Nothing would make me want to stay in the EU. I became a Brexiteer on 1st November 1993 (the date the EU came into existence.) I have never wavered in my decision.  Brexit is about democracy. 
When @UKLabour attempt to block Brexit and they plunge to 34% (-6) in the polls... #Students4Brexit 
Absolutely nothing. Everything the EU and the europhile elites in the UK have done since we voted to Leave has only strengthened my support for Brexit  
May’s bribe won’t stop Brexit inflicting more pain on our old mining towns | Jonathan Freedland | Opinion | The Guardian  
Meanwhile Her Majesty is dragged into Project Fear as Cabinet Office draw up Brexit plan to evacuate Royal Family - sensational Glen Owen scoop:  
I read interviews with Mackems who voted Leave in protest at a political status quo they believed had failed them consistently. Yet, while acknowledging Brexit threatened jobs (Nissan), they insisted that same political class would not fail them. Sadly, it has and will fail them. 
Our cartoonist KAL draws Theresa May's Brexit power struggle  
‘If Labour don’t support Brexit, they may lose the next general election!’They’re probably going to lose anyway. Better to lose and be on the right side of history, than lose supporting something that is going to destroy our country.  
Pure jingoism.The rest of Europe sits on the sidelines watching us implode... The contracts we've thrown at the EU are not even supported at home.I predicted 3 years ago that Brexit would lead to the irresponsible in UK engaging in wild war talk. ...And here you are.  
Extraordinary. I live in London just like others. I was at the criminal Bar for 5 years after the relevant time to study. I do care about crime in the city I live in. Even if I’m wrong to criticise the Mayor’s priorities, this from you because we disagree about Brexit is pathetic 
I guess when you support Brexit like the Tories, want to spend £200bn on a new generation of mass destruction like the Tories, and are incompetent like the Tories, people think why have a party like the Tories when we can just have the Tories.  
Even the insanely #Remain @FT can get it right! Blame it on #Brexit  
.@DanielJHannan:  The EU is taking the hardest possible line in the hope of derailing Brexit  
'We liberated half of EUROPE!' Brexiteer MP blasts 'UNGRATEFUL EU's' Brexit behaviour  
No Deal Brexit will lead to a new ICE AGE and we'll all DIE! Shock new warning in Sunday Sport newspaper tomorrow  
I've been a reluctant supporter of the Prime Minister's deal as the best available Brexit option given the circumstancesI accept the need for assurances for Ireland but the backstop as drafted needs to be tweakedHere's a dozen riddles of the backstop 
Matthew Parris: Those who warn of Brexit civil unrest are inviting it  
The huge appeal of Brexit is that it's a licence for bullies - hence the suffering of others is very much the point of the whole exercise. 
We produce food for circa 26 million people per annum. The island is populated by 6million people. We are the most good secure nation on the planet. We export a large proportion of that to the U.K. These people, don’t, can’t or refuse to read. #Brexit  
New Yorker cover on Brexit  
This is a key ingredient in the essence of Brexit. It doesn’t matter how fucked we are, as long as someone else is fucked more.Petty, cruel, spiteful, and, ultimately, stupid.  
Well this aged well.... 
Whether you're pro- or anti-immigration. If you support Brexit, you support a policy guided by those who've clearly stated their plans to end free movement. So to claim that movement will be just as free for Brits shows epic levels of either dishonesty or British exceptionalism. 
Crawford Falconer was a top New Zealand trade envoy over the period in which his tiny country’s bilateral agreement with Singapore grew into a cross-Pacific trade deal involving 11 countries. Yet May decided to send Olly Robbins to negotiate #Brexit instead. #GoWTO #nodeal 
Failing to provide sufficient opposition to Brexit is working out very badly, not least for everyone who needs a Labour Govt. People need to wake up to risks, reality & reason  
They never got their heads around the fact nearly a third of Lib Dem’s voted Leave.It’s fine to oppose Brexit, but using phrases like ‘that awful morning’ might explain why they can’t poll double digits.  
Against what is officially the most incompetent government in modern British political history, Jeremy Corbyn’s party drops six points in latest poll to put Conservatives ahead. 
Opening a plant and investing here, was the gateway to the EU markets.Brexit changed that. Opinion: Nissan’s U-turn is the beginning of the end for Britain’s revived car industry  
Remaining in a Customs Union will make the U.K. a vassal state. Tariffs and duties set by an authority over which we have no control. This is not Brexit and does not take back control (2 of 4) 
Anyone who broke the law in pursuit of their fantasy Brexit Island is going to have years of remainers crowd-funding legal action against them. I hope they're shitting themselves. 
Leaving the EU on WTO rules is not "crashing out".It's keeping £39bn of our money, and having the freedom to do Free Trade Deals around the world.RT if you agree it's time #ToGoWTOHelp save Brexit @  
So many pernicious aspects of UK social security law comes from Labour @jeremycorbyn from the old ATOS medical assessments to benefit sanctions. As you usher in Brexit - Labour backing the Tories - what would you do to create dignity and fairness in our social security system? 
Labour MPs should start embracing a no-deal Brexit - @cricketwyvern 
MOTD Gary Lineker is immune from strict guidelines on impartiality, the BBC has admitted. He uses Twitter to spread Anti-Brexit and Pro-Immigration messages. He is at BBC Sport, not 'News', so technically he is allowed to get round the rules. He is paid £1.8m by licence payer. 
Nissan would have given us the X Trail if only Remainers had believed in Brexit more!!! It’s their fault! (Am I doing this right?) 
I’m kind of confused by people who voted Labour last time and want to Remain. You know the manifesto pledges to end FoM and Brexit don’t you?Why are you surprised? 
It's also time the @UKLabour stopped being the midwife to brexit and the jobs it destroys. Come on @Keir_Starmer - the country needs you. 
I feel sorry for all decent English people because this is what Brexit has done to their country but I feel even sorrier for the rest of us because we are tarred by associationSooner we are free of these shackles, the better#indyWales 
Great piece. We all have to now make choices about what we are prepared to tolerate. And what is worth fighting for. I will NEVER accept #Brexit. Or this. ‘Yellow Vest’ Protesters Run Rampant in London and Attack Police Station – Byline Times  
Alas, the opposition to Tory Brexit has been shambolic. Two years of systematically avoiding Labour's pro-EU membership having a say. Then when we forced one our Policy has been undermined by the Shadow Cabinet, ignored by Ministers and kicked into the long grass. A disgrace. 
So why aren’t they voting for Stop Brexit parties, which are on derisory levels of support in this poll 
Walking through Aldergrove, you can see how big agri-food is to NI not only in terms of our heritage & history, but it's a massive part of our economy. Brexit will seriously damage agri-food-  DUP & Tories back Brexit- even a No Deal.They're playing with jobs & livelihoods  
Tories & Labour betray the 17.4m over #Brexit but 75% of the 17.4m say they will still vote Lab or Tory.When will they ever learn?If you keep voting Lab &Tory they will keep betraying you.Vote for a # Brexit party instead on the 2/5.  
So you are still around? Come on, Keir, you can spin it how you like, but the problem is Brexit. All this chaos and disharmony arising from a fraudulent referendum.  Why aren't you calling to #RevokeA50 on that basis and stopping our country's destruction? 
May's dramatic sell out to the ERG/DUP will spring back on her in the next MPs vote. Her Brexit dam holding back the #PeoplesVote is failing quickly. Nissan's decision to cancel X-Trail a game changer to add to the multiple scandals she has covered up like Banks Referendum Crimes  
Tories surge to 7-point lead, if they won over UKIP voters they would be 14 points ahead. Meanwhile Jeremy Corbyn’s popularity has reached an all-time low. Delivering a clean Brexit, on time, is clearly the way forward for the Conservative Party.  
We have waited 2 YEARS & 9 MONTHS, seen UKgov dig a whole for itself & effectively derail BREXIT with UNACCEPTABLE Back Stop conditions, that would see the UK split-up! Are we really expected to WAIT any LONGER, for these CLOWNS to get their s*** together?!  
Tory, DUP and UKIP MEPs voted against EU plans to crack down on corporate tax-evasion. #PeoplesVote #Brexit 
Just spent the week working in France and Germany. Everyone, from taxi drivers to senior execs, asked me WTF the UK was doing to itself with Brexit, and why. 
LAB/Corbyn appear to be paying the price for Brexit ambiguity.Tonight's Opinium poll with a CON 7% lead finds that for the first time in since GE2017 less than half of referendum remain  voters (49%) would opt for LAB. 
In tomorrow's paper ... @Feorlean on how deep this Brexit crisis goes  
Remainers: 'We 'pool' sovereignty' The majority of UK MEPs voted against 576 EU proposals between 2009 and 2014, but 485 still passed. Pre referendum, the UK had been defeated in over 77% of cases in which it has been a party in the European Court.#Brexit #WTO #NoDeal 
Corbyn calls for snap election to help put an end to austerity - the Fixed Term Parliament Act allows for early elections if 66% of MPs vote in favour. Yet parliament are making a revolutionary change in the UK based on an illegally procured 52% - madness. 
Every single time the #UK has voted against a measure in the Council of Ministers, it has been outvoted. This has been happening more and more: in the run up to the last referendum, of the UK’s 72 defeats, over half (40) occurred in the preceding 5 years #Brexit #NoDeal #WTO 
Remain spent MORE then leave in the referendum.We need our fishing and farming back under UK control. We are a net contributor and time OUR money was spent at home. The Liars are Remain , my friend.  
Gosh @JulieElliottMP perhaps you shouldn't have voted to trigger Article 50 without preconditions and then voted down Clause 13 of the Withdrawal Bill which would've allowed us to stay in the customs union after Brexit?   
Can all Brexiters who duped the electorate in believing that Brexit would bring great success and prosperity promise that, if British operations are moved to France, they will visit Sunderland and take responsibility for all their lies? ⁦  
The X-Trail has never been built outside Japan. It’s a diesel SUV, a sector in sales freefall (ask Land Rover). It’s a tiny volume model. No existing UK jobs are lost. It’s another #Brexit scare story being hyped by Sky News, rapidly becoming a parody of a news broadcaster 
Seriously, Aaron: labour are now perceived, with reason, as doing nothing to stop Brexit, which nearly 80% of its members oppose 
Being seen to oppose the referendum result costs Labour support.  As did Labour’s failure to offer an In/Out referendum back in 2015.  The commentariat will under report both phenomena because it doesn’t fit the “narrative”, but they nonetheless hold true.  
He told Sky News that it was "looking inevitable" that the UK's departure from the bloc would need to be delayedWhy is it inevitable? We leave 29/03 by law, with or without a dealNo inevitability about it, only if they are *choosing* to stop Brexit 
Absolute nonsense. Britain has been built on the hard work, loyalty and determination of generations of people from all over the world. We are multicultural and all the better for it. That's Britain's identity. Brexit is nothing more than a nationalistic, right-wing circus. 
There is no form of Brexit, or Lexit, that will lead to an improvement in people’s lives. Nothing. It is high time that this was acknowledged and this whole stupid folly was abandoned.  
Japanese companies who are/look like they are going to move their European HQ out of the UK because of Brexit  - mostly if they have a large proportion of sales to EU, easier to invoice from within EU after Brexit. Others will remain/are already run on management fees only 1/ 
....In the week when the Conservatives agreed to attempt something looking like a proper Brexit and Labour tried to block Brexit. #notrocketscience 
It's tempting to think they're deliberately letting them run amok so as to reinforce "the threat" that there'd be civil unrest if we don't "do" Brexit. This is a tiny minority of the same thugs who've supported Yaxley-Lennon/EDF/ChelseaFC just looking for a fight 
If confirmed, this represents a serious blow to the communities that depend on the jobs Nissan creates and supports. The Tories’ chaotic handling of the Brexit negotiations is having a devastating impact on business investment. It’s time ministers got a grip on this crisis.  
The liars and chancers of the Brexit elite should never be forgiven for conning the people who had the most to lose into voting to shoot themselves in the face.  
You absolute fool, we have had a vote, we voted out, you said you would honour the referendum, you got into power over saying you would honour the referendum. If you want to condemn your party to the dustbin for the next few decades - carry on with your lunacy.  
Jeremy Hunt has insisted there is "no turning back" on Brexit, warning that failing to deliver it would "see the rise of a large populist movement"  
If ministers are remotely concerned about addressing some of the very real reasons people voted for Brexit, tackling criminally low pay should be a top priority – not something they drop as departments drown in last-minute preparations  
Bad news for Sunderland and  for @theresa_may . Brexit driving away investment from the company brought to Britain by Mrs Thatcher despite promised financial assistance. Companies voting with their feet. #ExitFromBrexit #FBPE 
Nissan came to the UK in the 1980s because we were in the EU, lobbied by Margaret Thatcher, decided on Sunderland as their European base. Now industries being wrecked by Brexit, pushed by her deluded / lying successors.  
Literally hundreds of signatures collected in Bradford today from local people who just want to cancel Brexit @LeedsEurope 
Corbyn: Brexit would go ahead even if Labour won snap election  
Didn't Sunderland vote overwhelmingly to leave the EU? Well, to coin a commonly used Brexiteer phrase, "This is what the British people voted for" #BrexitBBC News - Nissan 'U-turn' expected on new X-Trail SUV in Sunderland 
And the reality of that poll is Tories are up 4 while Lib Dems are only up 1. So unless lots of Remainers are saying "bloody Corbyn sitting on the fence on a second referendum. I'm voting for May and the ERG" it doesn't really help their argument. 
If your first reaction to reports about Nissan/Sunderland is “that does/does not prove a point about Brexit”, you are revealing how much you actually care about places like Sunderland. 
Those Remainers saying Corbyn needs to get off the fence on Brexit are going to get a hell of a shock when he gets off the fence and properly backs it. 
Most of my Brexit Select Committee colleagues hate the referendum result and simply want to frustrate it - @cmackinlay 
UK was the biggest recipient of Marshall Plan aid. Received much more than W. Germany. You appear not to know basic European history. Small wonder #Brexit excites you. 
Opposing Brexit.   Not a good look with voters.  
"The breakdown of trust in politics if we try to turn this over by a second referendum will be hard to repair."@CarolineFlintMP is a rare breed. An MP that understands what Brexit means to Labour's heartlands.  
Notice the age of most of the people in this picture of celebrations in Sunderland on the night of the EU referendum. Not many young enough to work at the Nissan car plant. They should be ashamed.  
WTF?! If May does this the Tories and democracy is dead in this country.Brexit news: Whitehall officials start ‘serious work’ on UK staying in customs union | Politics | News |  
So ‘sources’ are briefing that Labour frontbench want to get Brexit over with so they can talk about domestic policies and that enough backbenchers are happy to vote a Deal through.Wouldn’t surprise me at all. 
The Remain establishment must be desperate. They lost the referendum despite their gigantic propaganda campaign, huge expenditure and false economic forecasts    .They have tried to repeat the same tactic over “no deal” but have deservedly failed again.  
This is exactly what the countries of the western world need - large populist parties that win votes & power. Parties whose policies are popular with ordinary people. Brexit is just a first step along the way, and an example to Europe & the west.   
Perhaps the greatest threat to Brexit is that May with Labour support will agree to some sort of Customs Union with the EU. The ERG must be prepared to vote this down and if necessary split the Tory Party to secure no deal. 
Darren Grimes and Arron Banks have perverted the most important vote in living memory, and they have got off with puny fines. They should be in jail for many years. We must make that happen. If it requires legislation implementing retrospective punishment then so be it. #Brexit 
Question though, where are anti-Brexit voters going in Britain? Why aren't Greens and Lib Dems scoring higher? 
Well this hasn't aged well..... 
A leading brexiter journo told me it wasn't the ref itself that was sacred but the Solemn and Binding commitments made afterwards by Con and Lab that they would implement it. Cancelling brexit would make political classes look incompetent and mendacious. As if they don't now!  
Nissan is expected to announce that it is cancelling a planned investment at its plant in Sunderland to build the X-Trail SUV in Sunderland. The government assurances in 2016 haven't been enough. As expected #Brexit is hitting investment. #PeoplesVote 
A message to all Leave constituencies:The Tories have the money to invest in your communities, but it will only do so if your MPs vote for their deal.If not, they’ll just give it away to the rich.Brexit or no Brexit, they don’t give a shit about you and they never will. 
I see Nissan have cancelled plans to build the new X-Trail in the UK as a result of #Brexit.I suppose @JuliaHB1 will claim that this is just #ProjectFear agaun, whilst she buries her head further up her own derrière. 
Just received an email from one of our European suppliers, delivery is normally €8. This would be potentially devastating for our little business, we already suffer greatly from increased delivery charges from U.K. suppliers @KateForbesMSP @IanBlackfordMP #Brexit  
Anyone trying to inject Brexit politics into the 6Nations will get insta-blocked.  You have been warned!  
Another Brexit dividend  
Polls are bollocks anyway, but FWIW I'm not remotely surprised by this. This poll was taken immediately after the biggest newspapers in the country had just declared that Triumphant Theresa Has Solved Brexit. Ask them again in a fortnight.  
Who cares about #Brexit now .. 
"Brexit was a political project based on the idea that identity politics could answer technocratic questions. If the technocratic question keeps proving problematic, you just need to have more faith in your identity. It was like trying to unlock a door with a slice of bread." 
I've known for ages. BUT I felt this was the time to post it ... just to make people aware. I have my LPA in place, my will made, my end of life plan in a folder. Have joined Dignity in Dying ....just in case. Aim for none of this to be relevant, but good to be sorted. #brexit 
Joking aside I don’t think this is an outlier (and I also think Labour will win the next election). Labour are now perceived by many as wanting a second referendum while pursuing a strategy of ‘Miliband+’ - as we found out in 2015 that’s 30% of the electorate.  
"It is quite clear that we're going to come out of the Single Market and Customs Union.I don't call that a 'hard Brexit', I call that Brexit.You can't leave the European Union without leaving the Single Market and the Customs Union."Well said @EdVaizey  pic.twitter.com/G5iPgJtV6q 
You won’t see this on the MSM because the French are rebelling against the bankers’ President Macron & the consequences of EU membership, over-taxation, austerity & immigrant invasion. Instead an endless stream of anti-Brexit propaganda.  
The mafia has gained €3 billion over the past decade by siphoning E.U. funds intended for farming in a national park in Sicily. Local MEPs have warned that the mafia is deeply entrenched in EU tendering processes. I suspect they are involved in Brexit negotiations. £39 billions? 
You should feel ashamed to your bones for calling the realities of Brexit "Project Fear". It's one thing to want a particular outcome, quite another to ignore the facts. 
Strategy of trying to face both ways at once on Brexit is creating enormous tensions inside Labour and failing to impress the voters  
Labour votes "won't  be bought" lol! All Labour votes are bought. They've been promising "free" stuff to the young and gullible for decades.BBC News - Brexit: John McDonnell rejects any funds deal for votes 
Brexit Deal or no deal is utter lunacy. No-deal should not be an option being considered or planned for by a single responsible politician. A total self-imposed falling out of every single treaty and framework we have which ensures we stay safe, secure and economically productive  
This is not Project Fear. This is a reality check. Leaving the EU will in all likelihood result in a recession. A No Deal crash-out Brexit could cause a Depression.We need to check this is what people want before we press ahead  
Conservatives gain 7-point lead, while Labour drops 6-points in two weeks: 41% for Conservatives vs 34% for Labour, approval for Jeremy Corbyn’s Brexit response falls to all-time low with only 16% approving - with @OpiniumResearch 
One family’s Brexit dilemma: ‘I’ll fight to keep us together until the very last day’  
"The largest recipient of Marshall Plan money was the United Kingdom (receiving about 26% of the total), followed by France (18%) and West Germany (11%)."Wikipedia. 7 seconds. This is a Conservative MP for Shrewsbury and Atcham. These are the people negotiating Brexit.  
High time May and her so-called government tuned in to the fact that #Brexit has unleashed a growing undercurrent of violence in our society and did something about it.Bowing to it will normalise it completely.Stop the rot and#RevokeA50 
The MPs who have tabled a #PLP 7-day ultimatum on #Corbyn on Anti-Semitism have returned cyclically to the default attack on their own party their own leader and by extension the millions who need a #Labour government in power. #Brexit #Venezuela Anti-Semitism. Rinse, repeat... 
UK’s politics serves capitalists (low taxes, low wages, austerity government) but angers workers; result = Brexit. US’s same politics = gov’t shutdown. A self-destructive capitalism both causes and results from each country's "crazy" actions.#HowCapitalismWorks 
3rd day running, and another massive stack of Brexit propaganda from Wetherspoons in my block of flat’s foyer, all immediately trashed in the bin where it belongs. What a pointless waste of their money.  
Brexit: We want out now & really don’t care how | Andrew Norfolk for The Times“Contempt for politicians in a former mining village has only grown since the referendum. A former miner says Grimethorpe has survived worse than a no-deal Brexit”  
Britain's Conservatives open up their largest polling lead with Opinium since before the 2017 general election - 7 pointsApproval of Corbyn's handling of #Brexit slumps to a record low -16%  
I spend a lot of time telling my students that history is interpretation and there are no right answers and we need to be careful with ‘facts’ and I think Bad Brexit History might be my punishment for that. 
You people need to stop worrying about Brexit.Businesses like Nissan will just adapt! CEOs will get to keep their jobs, so relax! 
This week @JohnMannMP you were everywhere talking about significant investment for Leave voting areas.Here's one such area, soon to be repeated everywhere, where Brexit means further decline.The Tory bribes are a con, you are selling us down the river. 
Brexit has already lost us more than we have EVER put into the EU, EMA alone £1bn, Galileo at least £10bn, banks pulling out nearly £1 TRILLION (with associated tax losses), Nissan now leaving, so is Dyson, etc etc. Get over a war that ended 74 years ago, #RevokeRemainRebuild 
I literally wrote a whole PhD on Britain and the Marshall Plan (they got $2.7 billion! More than any other European nation!), this Bad Brexit History is feeling more and more like a personal attack  
We will reduce United Russia to ashes and isolate @KremlinRussia_E from the world banking system as payback for their interference in British politics. We will crash their economy and humiliate their military, cf: Wagner in Syria. You are welcome. #Brexit  
I was wondering how Jeremy Corbyn and his “ jobs first Brexit “ is panning out . It’ll be the usual response from the unions after Nissan will announce   The x trail suspension on Monday . Cmon @jeremycorbyn admit it. There is no such thing as a “ jobs first brexit “ 
Bad news from #Nissan (if confirmed), but is it really due to #Brexit? Original decision to build in UK was made *after* the referendum, and there's no suggestion here of move somewhere else in EU. Global problems in #auto sector look far more important. 
Dear oh dear. Britain was the largest recipient of the Marshall Plan - $2.7b for the UK vs $1.7b for W. Germany.What a shock these Brexit extremists don’t know historical facts...  
Turning back on Brexit would cause 'large populist movement' - Jeremy Hunt  
The Conservative Government, ever since it was induced by electoral arithmetic into holding the EU Referendum, NOT because of its conviction, ever since it campaigned actively for Remain, has done EVERYTHING in its power to prevent the UK from leaving cleanly and decisively. 
Politicians saying “I respect the result of the referendum” knowing it was fuelled by dodgy billionaire money and illegal, criminal acts must be held accountable for Brexit destroying the UK’s rule of law. It’s also specifically timed to avoid 1st April EU tax transparency rules  
#Brexit is the symptom#Austerity is the cause#SocialJustice the cure#RestoreHope#RevokeArticle50#StopBrexit-#FBPE @LoubinWally @RemainingKind @RemainerCreates @lunaperla @emmyzen @dontbrexitfixit @StopBrexitMarch @LeedsEurope @JolyonMaugham @BremainInSpain @remain_central 
.We fought for a referendum .We fought to win the referendum .We were victorious in the referendum So why are we still fighting for Brexit, that battle was won nearly 3 years ago. 
This good piece about Brexit and Article 50 reminds me of the political crisis in the US, where increasingly the struggle is not between liberals and conservatives but between those who face difficult facts and those who peddle fanciful lies. 
sadly, #sunderland voted #leaveJapan has just signed a massive trade deal with the #EU. Toyota...and other car makers will follow. It's business.I extend exactly the same amount of sympathy as LEAVE voters extend to me.'We had a Referendum. Leave won. Get over it.' Nissan 
Any @UKLabour MPs supporting Brexit should be deselected NOT the ones fighting it. Brexit supporting Labour MPs, and those who voted with the Tories, are a disgrace to the party  
We refuse to believe this is what the people of Sunderland really want. The whole North East needs Nissan & it’s supply chain.#brexit #Nissan 
With #Brexit “there is no equivalent to the Mueller inquiry to bolster public confidence that the organs of state are capable of warding off corruption.” ⁦@carolecadwalla⁩ 
The 2016 referendum was won through electoral crime. The government and Brexit MPs are, in effect, handling stolen goods and profiting from the proceeds of crime. They must be prosecuted and jailed and #Brexit must be stopped in order to return the UK to the rule of law. #FBPE 
Only a Brexiteer has the nerve to properly lead Brexit talks, says Brexiteer who gave up the job after four months.  
Officials are warning of putrefying piles of waste after Brexit.. it’s the Tories and their stinking rotten disgusting system, feed the rich scam the poor!! As Govt jets off skiing, homeless lie in tents outside boarded up shops  
You'll never get to lead Scotland Miles. You bribe the DUP. Now you are bribing Labour. You are involved in Electoral Fraud. You support a fraudulent referendum yet refuse to call out Leave, Farage, Banks. Your Party is not fit to govern in Scotland. Your Party is corrupt. 
#brexit Does anybody believe this load of bollocks in the crap  newspaper the guardian. Brexit bashing & Project Fear everyday. All the journalists hate Brexit & Donald Trump everyone of them. The guardian only newspaper has more journalists than readers. Shut up.  
Here's what Brexit really means for Labour areas in the North and Midlands.Lost jobs, less investment, lower standards of living and reduced public spending. Decades more misery and decline.Those MPs who support Brexit support this.#PeoplesVote 
Politicians have lost the plot. But lawyers still grasp Brexit realities  
Brexit: Nissan to announce it is pulling plans for new car the X-trail which had been announced in the autumn of 2016 - after Nissan given secret assurances @MarkKleinmanSky⁩  reports. Nissan not denying it. 
The contents of 2016 “Nissan letter” about #Brexit were never disclosed but it seems whatever the @GovUK promises, they haven’t been honoured - serious implications for all investment.....Nissan 'U-turn' expected on X-Trail SUV in Sunderland - BBC News 
They are the most odious bullshitters on the planet. They have been lying about #brexit to vulnerable people for years. These people should be held accountable for the damage they have done to this country in pursuit of their own vested interests. pic.twitter.com/FqCMSEE2HG 
It's not just what you do on air that demands impartiality. You know this. The BBC broadcasting a Brexit-supporting Spectator contributor being held to account by the chairman of the company that publishes the Brexit-supporting Spectator is the problem here - not the solution!  
UK would regret no-deal Brexit 'for ever' - Greg Clark  
Timothy's controversial role in the Brexit debacle and shaping HMG's inflexible redlines will be one for historians to debate.  
Andy Davey: ‘Those responsible folk we elect to run our country don't seem too interested in cancelling their February recess. Well, there's not much on at the mo.’  #Brexit #apocalypse #MeaningfulVote #NoDealBrexit - political cartoon gallery in London  
Iconic example of the way 'project fear' is turning into Brexit reality#JustMakeItStop 
Your credibility is waning JacobYou have no idea the damage that will be done if there is even a single day extension to BrexitThe Tory party has totally, utterly screwed this upI will be happy to vote for a populist party after thisWe need massive change in Westminster 
Govt @DefraGovUK @michaelgove MUST end EU access & plunder of UK waters immediately post-#BrexitOur resources should be caught by Our boats, with British crews, landing into & supporting British communitiesTime Whitehall safeguarded national resources for national interest!  
With politicians who can’t be bothered to read peace agreements, it’s no wonder Brexit negotiations are such a mess - The Independent  
The fact that some Remainers believed, against all evidence, that Corbyn was going to stop Brexit if he won in 2017 is just bizarre. He never said that. The manifesto never said that.There was nothing to suggest that Corbyn would stop Brexit - absolutely nothing. 
Anyone who’s been unfortunate enough to hear me giving speeches on Brexit will have heard this trailed some time ago. It’s not always nice when you’re right.  
Important Nissan clarificationNissan's decision to pull X-Trail from Sunderland is NOT (totally) Brexit related, but more b/c of diesel collapse.Planned to use Renault diesel engines - if switch to petrol, needed to import engines from Japan:  
It's time to put the latest claim about Brexit to rest, before someone puts it on the side of a bus  via @bopinion 
More jobs lost, more lives damaged.The prospect of #Brexit is already doing huge damage to communities across the country.The #Labour party has to stand against this, we have to stand up for a #PeoplesVote and campaign to #Remain in the EU. 
BREXIT IN: 55 DAYS. The EU can't WAIT for Theresa May to come over yet again, to talk about the #Brexit deal they didn't want to talk about again...#BrexitMess#GroundhogDay 
The fact you don't know what's wrong with it is extremely worrying and proof that your local party did the right thing. Wonder what the journalists and MP's who supported you then are saying now ?#brexit #JC4PM2019 #GTTO 
One reason why the independent body which will help defend EU27 citizens rights after Brexit should be set up ASAP.  Are opposition parties pushing for this @HackneyAbbott @joannaccherry ? 
Leavers: “If Brexit is cancelled the far right will take to the streets!”Remainers: “If Brexit happens we’ll have a march and never vote for xxx again!”Like with the poll tax riots the Government will only take notice of proper civic unrest rather than peaceful protest... 
This is another serious blow caused by Brexit. We must stop Brexit Breaking Britain and fight to stay. #RejectTheLies #ReformPolitics #rebootBritain 
John is right: “If there is money there to spend on our constituencies, it should be done anyway.” May's Brexit bribe is an insult to communities suffering under Tory austerity.Stop Brexit, get the Tories out.  
Tremendous meeting with Cannock Chase Labour Party members hosted by Greenheath Progressive WMC where we discussed #Venezuela, #Brexit and democratising the economy. A huge thank you to @RyanTipton9 who organised such great event#ChangeIsComing in Cannock Chase 
I am no longer keeping quiet when cowards like @DKShrewsbury  hide behind the real sacrifices made in WW2 to deflect attention from their Brexit plans. He is no more a patriot for voting Brexit than I am for not. Let Brexit stand on its own merits. 
"With the shadow of Brexit hanging over our economy, it is more important than ever to reassure businesses that Scotland is an open and welcoming country" 
It won’t just be a ‘no deal’ Brexit, it’s ANY Brexit that will damage UK science and research- no longer will we qualify to be lead universities in EU funding. These top class scientist won’t want to follow when they used to lead. @Scientists4EU 
My thread on the assault against democracy by a transatlantic tax and regulation-hating elite allied with Putin and the far-right in a war aimed at crushing meaningful democracy. #RageAgainstBrexit #PeoplesVote #Brexit 
Great day again, for the first time we had a Brexitometer option to just stop Brexit and that won! People have clearly changed their minds and want an option to remain in the EU! @peoplesvote_uk #PeoplesVote @euromove @BestForBritain @BrexitometerC @mkfm 
What have the UK and Switzerland agreed on their trade relationship post-Brexit?The text(s) is(are) not available publicly but there are interesting insights in a Swiss government information sheet, prepared mainly for Swiss companies.Quite a long thread (21 tweets)1/21 
Amidst all the #Brexit chaos, this news will hit home among many Llŷn families whose children have benefited from @Maersk trainingStick that on a bus - #endofseafaringtrafition 
Have you ever heard the #BBC mention that the #Tories have doubled the national debt to past 2 TRILLION borrowed more money in just 8 years than all other governments combined since records began & lost our triple A Credit rating? No? Me neither #Brexit #GTTO #bbcqt #Marr #GTTO 
Very sad to hear that there may be job losses at Nissan. People should have listened when Jeremy Corbyn promised that a Labour jobs first Brexit would mean not a single job lost. It's time for Theresa May to move aside and let Jeremy Corbyn negotiate Brexit. #Brexit 
There are two strangers on the train talking about brexit and I’ve seen enough @_DHOTYA to know that any second now someone will say something and the whole train is going to stand up and clap 
Nissan, JLR, Toyota, PSA, Airbus....it's not IF, it's WHEN they close a plant, two plants, three plants....few falling for the Leave lies understood, but those promoting those lies understood fully...'these things happen' 
Brexit is an unprecedented example of an advanced democracy dismantling itself. It will be studied for decades to come. People will shake their heads in utter disbelief - at the utter madness of it all. 
BREXIT BRITAIN: Japanese car-maker Nissan is cancelling plans to build its X-Trail model at its Sunderland plant. #EU #Brexit #PeoplesVote 
Sorry but the quicker Scotland can get out of this union the better. Brexit has been according to the yoons, the will of the people but it wasn't a binding ref, nor was it legit or above board. Scotland is losing so much opportunity staying in this cesspit. 
Here's a draft of the letter that Revenue plans to send to Irish SMEs about Brexit next week. Tl;dr - things are about to get serious.  
Indeed, if the government tries and fails to ram this through before March 29, we face a no deal Brexit by default, by automatic operation of law, as the clock ticks remorselessly down. Remember: no WAIB = no ratification. See Withdrawal Act, s13 
In light of your answer to this question, how realistic do you think it is that the PM will (a) secure a majority for her withdrawal agreement *and* (b) pass the WAIB before March 29?If she cannot, there will be a no deal Brexit, or a delay. 
These are the people politicians and commentators are appeasing every time they say we can't have a second referendum, or we can't cancel Brexit, because it will upset them.That's a success to them, and emboldens them to do more.  
There was brief window when my British friends were very relieved that we Americans so quickly took the dunce cap from them by electing Trump after Brexit was approved -- but it didn't last long. So many reasons why we need to evaluate these votes as twin poles of disruption.  
McDonnell accuses PM of 'pork-barrel' politics with Brexit 'bribery'  
Republic of Ireland worried that they will be forced to drive on the right hand side of the road under a No-Deal Brexit. EU plans are being prepared for a phased introduction; lorries and coaches in April, cars in May..  
.@JamilSmith: The one thing I would have asked Mr. Castro is should racism be a firing offense in politics? That is something the 2020 election really should be a referendum on. #AMJoy 
A bloke on LBC has dual British/German nationality and as lived in Germany for 20+ years, he presumably pays his tax there too.He was complaining that he didn't get to vote in the Referendum.He makes no contribution to Britain. Why should he get a vote? 
Feels somehow appropriate to sign off this thread with my nod-and-a-wink Brexit reference to Planet of the Apes...  
If your are in the Customs Union you are under EU Law. That is not Brexit. 
Worth noting that the UK Government sent Nissan a confidential letter in 2016 offering Brexit reassurances. It was so sensitive that 2 years later they still adamantly refuse to disclose its content. And Nissan's walking anyway. *That's* how bad Brexit is! 
We were promised unicorns and the reality is that #Brexit is costing the UK jobs and economic prosperity, there are no sunlit uplands. #peoplesvote“A crisis takes a much longer time coming than you think, and then it happens much faster than you would have thought.” 
Ignore Oliver Letwin – the Tories have nothing to fear from a no-deal Brexit - @oflynnmep 
Dear @jeremycorbyn the country is about to be dragged into a brutal no-deal #Brexit won by crime, by an alliance of ruthless kleptocrats & far-right nationalists, and you tweet about a late bus! For the sake of democracy & the British people resign!#PeoplesVote 
Remainers will say this is all about Brexit. Leavers will say it is the decline of diesel and shift to electric. But don’t forget the Mackems who could well lose their jobs.  
And these are the foundations of the great new Brexit society.   We've really taken back control, haven't we! 
So you can be as rah-rah-rah and pro-Brexit as you like. The steamroller of reality just doesn't care. Facts are facts, regardless of how little you want them to be true. And the facts of Brexit are that it will gut the car industry and leave it flopping and gasping. 
Lammy finally realises second referendum would be insane …...  
No I don't think the prospect of a 2nd Referendum has gone. 
Never mind the second referendum. Given everything the Leave campaign is charged with and being investigated for, I fail understand how the first referendum is not null and void. 
Nissan announces the cancellation of plans to manufacture its X-Trail model in the UK. Nissan's future investment in Brexit Britain doubtful #PeoplesVote 
Brexiters are like climate change deniers. Every job loss is down to something other than Brexit. Denial won’t save them though. 
Yay! Now we get to go without jobs as well as food and medicine. God bless you, Brexit. God fucking bless you.  
All this is compounded by the fact that the EU and Japan just ratified the largest free trade deal in history (we get to share in it, but only until Brexit Day). Amongst other things, it cuts tariffs on Japanese-made cars entering the EU to 0% by 2027. 
This follows a blunt warning from Prime Minister Abe of Japan last month that a no deal Brexit was a nightmare scenario: "That is why we truly hope that a no-deal Brexit will be avoided and, in fact, that is the wish of the whole world." 
Bribery and corruption is at the heart of Brexit  
Advisory referendum? Sovereign people do not 'advise' governments. They instruct them! #DissolveTheUnion 
i'm in #Sunderland at the moment. Terrible news for the city, all due to Brexit and the lies peddled by people like Farage, Boris and Rees-Mogg who will all profit from it...  
Can we please have a comment from the blonde lady in the red Vote Leave T shirt being held aloft as Sunderland referendum result came in 
Liberal Democrat leder Sir Vince Cable talks Brexit in North Walsham | Politics | Eastern Daily Press Too many important issues are being sidelined while this government is mired in a Brexit mess. A #PeoplesVote lets the public decide 
Just had a letter from Toyota Insurance saying that because of Brexit they are moving their offices to Luxembourg. @jeremycorbyn not a single job lost. 
NEWYDD / NEW "Madness is doing the same thing repeatedly & expecting a different outcome. And although the constant re-negotiations clearly show sanity is lacking in Westminster, this cyclical Brexit gameplaying is driving us all mad" - @LSRPlaid 
#LedByDonkeys John Redwood quote Barford St (Bradford St end), Digbeth, just round the corner from the Anchor #Brexit #MakeItStop 
Terrible news for the North East. Another #Brexit #NoDeal casualtyMark Francois MP will tell us his dad didn’t survive Pearl Harbour, Battle of Medway, Iwo Jima & Tenko to let the Japanese bully him now 
‘So Brexit will be all about the “Blitz spirit”. Was the Blitz so great really?’  
"Why not dust off the Tusk package and look to be a stronger voice in the centre of a stable Europe?" says #LeadNotLeave Campaigner Gina Miller.@MaajidNawaz | @ThatGinaMiller | #Brexit 
Feb 1: EU-Japan free trade agreement comes into force, creating a market of 635m people & one-third of the world's GDP.Feb 2: Nissan pulls plans to produce X-trail in Sunderland.This is the way the world works. #Brexit  
Latest post on my Brexit Blog. The current impasse is the result of Brexiter falsehoods colliding with reality. The EU are finally doing what the UK polity and media have mainly failed to do - stand up to Brexiter misinformation, distortion and lies:  
Dear @mccanntb - Lord Saatchi speaks for himself. I speak for myself.  must be a broad church to realise its objectives & win over as many Leave voters as possible. Don't expect us to agree on everything, except to fight to stop a catastrophic #Brexit  
There is no doubt all businesses are under pressure but ask yourself why are the job losses, cuts or lack of investment only happening to the UK factories?One answer BREXITIf you vote to make trading more difficult then this is the result.Own it. 
As an Irishman, I’m appalled by Leo Varadkar’s antagonism over Brexit - Adam MacCarthaigh  
Norwegian MP Christian Tybring-Gjedde has penned an interesting article for Norway’s largest newspaper Aftenposten has suggested a “free trade agreement between the United States, Canada, the United Kingdom and Norway”.#FreeTrade #Brexit #SaturdayMorning 
currently X-trail only made in Japan, & plan announced after Govt letter was here too..As result of EU-Japan FTA which came in to force Thurs, those Xtrails will enter EU market directly from Japan with 0 tariff.Vs risk of 10% tariff under WTO/ No Deal Brexit from Sunderland 
And this is how Remainers exploit young people to try and subvert Brexit. I invite those behind this to explain why lying down to Brussels, lying about the “back stop” is likely to bring about the return of terrorism. If you dare...  
Really disappointing that some members' obsession with Brexit is distracting us from the important business of changing local parties to an all member meetings structure. 
Oh dear. Not sure this is what people voted for in 2016.Any MPs backing brexit are supporting the losses of British jobs.It's not a surprise we have seen a shift in the North East becoming #RemainerNow 
Brexit is fast becoming a national crisis. Theresa May continues to kick the can down the road. Demand better. Let's give the British people the final say on Brexit, and option to stay in the EU >  
Theresa May still has no way to acheive her dream Brexit deal without   breaking the Good Friday Agreement, losing the DUP and ERG, or putting a  border down the Irish Sea.A public vote is inevitable - the public should get the sign off on any deal or agreement.  
If Carlsberg created politicians that think they are clever. #Brexit  
#Nissan have released a video from a senior exec to all Sunderland #Nissan workers who voted for #Brexit  
'We must respect the referendum'='We must respect criminality'Make no mistake: You are being told you must accept the loss of your rights, and accept criminal activity, because their actions came under the guise of 'democracy'. You are being conned. 
Our City Editor ⁦@MarkKleinmanSky⁩  understands Nissan in Sunderland is about to pull plans to produce X-trail, announced to much Government fanfare, and after a Business Dept letter of “support and assurances” four months after Brexit vote in Oct 16  
Read my warning to the Prime Minister in today's Telegraph. The European Scrutiny Committee is conducting an inquiry into the Brexit negotiations. Here is David Davis's evidence session: And Steve Baker's evidence is here: 
Bad news for future investment in Sunderland because of Brexit. Nissan casts further gloom on car industry with X-Trail blow ⁦@bphillipsonMP⁩ ⁦@JulieElliottMP⁩ ⁦@annaturley⁩ ⁦@PaulWilliamsMP⁩ ⁦@CatMcKinnell⁩ 
You absolute fools. Look what you did. #Brexit  
Nissan Announcement:Your Bingo CardNothing to do with BrexitProject FearIt’s their losePeople knew what they voted forRemoaners talking down the UKEU sign trade deal with Japan - so what?Get over itSovereignty init!#PeoplesVote 
Imagine @BBCNews reporting on a no-deal brexit like this. I can't either.  
Nigel Farage's new Brexit party has '£1m of funds and 200 candidates on standby'  
Over a year ago @J_amesp spotted that #Moggmentum was a Russian operation (his hedge fund has major holdings in sanctioned Sberbank). So now JRM has hooked up with Bannon and Russian-backed Banks, the whole Alt Reich Brexit Axis is obvious  
EXCLUSIVE: Nissan will announce next week that it’s cancelling a plan unveiled in 2016 to build its X-Trail model at its Sunderland plant. Bombshell Brexit move for industry given that ministers gave Nissan secret reassurance over industry competitiveness.  
As Brexit has dominated, the rest of the government's agenda has withered   
“Sometimes MPs simply have to be honest with their constituents.. Their message can be: ‘You elected me to be your representative, not your delegate. And I owe you my judgment that Brexit will hit this area, and the poorest, hardest.’ Plenty of voters would respect that candour.” 
MPs have failed to deliver on the largest democratic decision in our country's history. The deal on offer now is not Brexit, it's capitulation. Let's walk away from this national humiliation with our heads held high.Help save Brexit @  
How to trash one of our most successful industries, skilled worker by skilled worker, colleague by colleague. Words cannot express my fury at the cruel, self-defeating idiocy of Brexit and the fascistic impulses that underpin it. May leads a criminally irresponsible government.  
If you were in any doubt about the Brexit coup, this is the Tory Government setting up a system of attack and defend - a 'war like structure' - to combat its own citizens.  
.@Nigel_Farage - 'There is no great public demand for a second referendum, there really isn't.'on #LBCRT if you disagree !  #PeoplesVote 
The Tory party was once the party of law and order. Now it fanatically upholds a referendum won by electoral crime. #PeoplesVote #Brexit 
Biggest Remainer myth is that the UK was united before the referendum.In fact more than half the population loathed being bossed about by an unelected government based in Brussels.They just seldom got to say so. 
"We have to build a mass movement & momentum for Irish unity, both here in Ireland & internationally."We must campaign – bringing others onside – for a referendum, secure a referendum & then win it." - @moneillsf closing today's Irish unity discussion in Dublin #Time4Unity 
We're "basically in limbo" for the next fortnight as Theresa May returns to the EU, Vince Cable says.He also describes Jeremy Corbyn as being in an "embarrassingly bad" position on Brexit  
Brexiters, on the one hand proclaim that Brexit will be easy and the EU needs us more than we need it, and on the either hand wail that Brussels is bullying us. Read number 8 on Umberto Eco's list of characterstics of fascism - "the enemy is both strong and weak". #Brexit #FBPE 
Yup. People just want this Tory Brexit nightmare over now. I had an amendment to revoke Article 50 this week. Will be tabling again at the next opportunity. Representing the people of Perthshire.  
The UK Government's failure to understand Ireland has been a defining feature of its Brexit shambles 
Don’t believe all the car industry’s prophecies of Brexit doom - @julianHjessop 
If we get a proper Brexit, it'll be by accident rather than design  
#Brexit may be attractive to elements of England, but it's certainly not good for England - and it's both unattractive & bad for #Falklands,#Gibraltar,#NorthernIreland ,#Scotland,#Wales. If we're serious abt the "united" bit of UK, it's time to tell the truth & #RevokeArticle50. 
Brilliantly put, Molly.Parliament are trapped in a permanent referendum campaign. Someone tell them it’s over. We’re leaving.#StandFirm 
Back from supermarket where I put my basket down briefly, return & see a man taking a whole chicken out of it because it was the last one.In another aisle people were fighting over the last pack of puy lentils.Good luck with those Brexit food shortages. 
All of the things you list exist now, pre Brexit, pre Brexit vote even. Do you not feel the need to ask yourself why that is? Clue: it isn't the Labour party's fault. 
My mum is one of your constituents. She is 73. I have never ever heard her swear. She did last week...about Brexit and how it is destroying our country. Then she said she was glad she was old as she didn't want to have to live to suffer decades of the consequences. You are evil. 
A Customs Union with EU would be a massive kick in the teeth to the 17.4 million British citizens who voted #Brexit This is totally unacceptable we must free ourselves of this interference in domestic laws and regulations once and for all. @SkyNews 
How can anyone claim that actions like these didn't influence the result?Why would the Leave campaign illegally overspend if doing so wouldn't make any difference?The referendum result cannot be trusted!@bremaininspain 
Mr Oliver Robbins should not be part of Britain’s #Brexit negotiating team. ⁦@BBCRadio4⁩ 
Glasgow.If you want to see more billboards in more cities rinsing more Brexit donkeys, please consider chipping in >>>>   
'Britain is one of the richest and most advanced democracies in the world. It is currently locked in a room, babbling away to itself hysterically while threatening to blow its own kneecaps off. This is what nationalist populism does to a country.' 
It seems that the EU fishermen are ignoring quotas and stripping as much fish out of British waters as they can before Brexit. 
Perhaps 100 suella fans isn’t actually a fair representation of all of Fareham, come by my factory and explain how Brexit in any way will benefit our business and my employees. 
Uhm.... Where's our referendum?   
If @theSNP put forward a motion in the House of Commons next week, that England can leave the EU (54% of England voted leave) and Scotland can remain (62% of Scotland voted remain) by dissolving the UK Union, we all get what we want. #Brexit solved.#DissolveTheUnion 
Campaigning outside Crossgate Shopping Centre, in @RichardBurgon's constituency. Regardless how they voted in 2016, most people we speak to now say Brexit was a terrible idea. Time for a rethink?  
“Telling that Jeremy Corbyn went to meet May in No 10 without Keir Starmer, accompanied instead by aides known for their pro-Brexit stance. All the signs point to Corbyn seeking to do just enough to ensure Brexit goes through with as few of his fingerprints on it as possible.”  
Tells EU flag holder: “You are traitors to England!  People who fought and died in World War 1 and World War 2!”  Brexit-English nationalism seems to be following route of German nationalism in early twentieth century: a xenophobic ideology of the fascistic right.  
9. Belief in the impossible is a symptom of Brexit madness. Note that this particular theory is brought to us by the same academy for genius that reliably informed us the Brexit deal would be ‘the easiest thing in human history.’ 
How this became such a story in the UK on Friday baffled. Even more so now when one reads this  #Gibraltar #Brexit  
Cameron’s folly has empowered some very unsavoury characters within our society.  This is never going back into the box.  It will be worse when we stop Brexit. 
Brexit will cause the breakup of the United Kingdom and loss of both Gibraltar and the Falklands Churchill and Thatcher must be turning in their graves#RevokeArticle50 
@RichardBurgon - Just wanted to share with you the results of our day spent in Cross Gates talking to your constituents about where we go from here. Clear majority for remaining in EU, followed by no deal #Brexit. Almost no support at all for your policy of a General Election.  
If we're going to discuss "fair elections", how about looking closer to home and debating the proven financial irregularities & data  breaches and purported foreign interference in our own referendum? #bbcaq 
More on the BBC's Brexit blacklist in Mandrake in @TheNewEuropean on Thursday. Some big names have come forward. A disturbing story is emerging. 
Wait a minute the brits impose Brexit on Scotland then impose a police charge on deploying their Brexit Don't you just love Britnats  
'BREXIT' noun: the undefined negotiated by the unprepared to secure the unspecified for the uninformed. 
What we can do is vote against all those parties that are trying to reverse #Brexit.We can start at the local elections on the 2/5.  
Last night, Suella Braverman asked for a show of hands for those in favour of Brexiting with no deal....what's wrong with the picture she posted? 
One yr anniversary of the #PTM movement & I still have yet to read or hear about the mass protests in the mainstream media happening across #Pakistan due to Brexit. As then & always, I stand with our friends  @manzoorpashteen + all others in the #PashtunFreedomMovement 
Campaigning against your own voters' wishes is just not smart politics.And no more "But he must be careful of his leave voting constituencies". Those are areas like Sunderland which would be worst hit by Brexit. Go there! Ask them what they really need! 
It's been two and a half years since the brexit vote. Here is a definite list of everything we definitely know about brexit.1.2.3.4.5.6.7.8.9.10. yeah you might have completely fucked it lads 
Per Operation Yellowhammer leaks, HMG can only handle two concurrent major events, e.g. a severe weather emergency and a Bridges event (death of a royal, e.e. "Forth Bridge" is Duke of Edinburgh).If we get a no-deal Brexit, the Queen dies, *and* an inch of snow, we're fucked. 
I wonder if the Queen’s applied for a German Passport. #Brexit 
If only Tories in Scotland were putting in even a fraction of the effort opposing a catastrophic no deal #Brexit than they are opposing the Scottish budget, then maybe they would be in less of a mess. The Scottish budget means economic growth, the Tory Brexit means decline. 
Not only backed by Farage and Breitbart et al (see below), but also awash with Matthew Elliott's ex-Vote Leave and BeLeave staffers. Remember LeaveEU & Vote Leave told the world they had & never would work together - they lied. One arse - two cheeks.... 
Well well, small world, Chole Westley from 55 TUFTON ST in the middle of that video promoted by Farage....where will it all end? 
You can't compare us to man that have three hour naps during the day - every day. We actually don't have the time for that. When Brexit and housing crisis is there, love us in peace abeg  
Apparently the new slang word in Poland is ‘Brexit’ - it describes someone that says they’re going to leave but then just hangs around winding people up. 
V grateful to @LabourPaylor for spotting @Nigel_Farage in Harrogate, Yorkshire. Significantly less grateful to Farage for a 20 year career of divisive sophistry and baiting vulnerable people. Still, apparently he never promised Brexit  would be a huge success (yes he f*cking did)  
Happy #GroundhogDay. Or as it’s now known, the Brexit negotiations. 
"Congratulations on being selected for the first Brexit Hunger Games."  
"It’s amazing how much money can suddenly be found to bribe MPs to vote for a deal that was dismissed by the largest parliamentary margin in history."Whatever your views on Brexit, this is absolutely spot on  
Spain hopes Brexit will help it gain sovereignty over Gibraltar, the British enclave at its southern tip. A footnote in an E.U. document showed how its position has strengthened.  
#Spain's state repressionhas also targetted Catalan teachers FOR HAVING DEBATED #1Oct #Referendum VIOLENCE ON VOTERS in classThese banners were placed on school façades all over #Catalonia:"We teach to THINK, not WHAT to think"#Makeamove 
55 days until Brexit.  
We have a centuries-old tradition of smuggling (‘brandy for the parson, baccy for the clerk’), and are ready to set out in our little ships to Dunkirk or wherever and bring back luscious black-market lettuces and French beans, oranges and lemons.  #Brexit 
Do we 'respect the referendum? Err no, not at all! It's been proven to be fraudulent on many different levels, it asked a vague question, noone can agree on an answer, millions of people most affected were were arbritarily excluded. People have changed their minds#Peoplesvote 
Britain’s trade deficit means its own manufacturing will suffer less than the continent’s; Europe needs London’s finance more than Britain needs Amsterdam’s fish.  #Croydon #Brexit 
No one who has followed Brexit and seen this devastating insider’s account can be in any doubt that Brexit voters have been cynically betrayed by Theresa May her a cabal of Remain supporting ministers & advisers...  via @YouTube 
UK would regret no-deal Brexit 'for ever': says the Business minister, diehard Remainer Greg ClarkEr, No we will not! Most countries trade with each other (and the EU) on WTO termsIf need be, WTO is the way to go! via @ChannelNewsAsia 
But the Brexit campaign promised not to leave without a deal - “Taking back control is a careful change, not a sudden stop - we will negotiate the terms of a new deal before we start any legal process to leave” (from Vote Leave’s Our Case) 
#EU Parliament Boss: Efforts to Prevent Mass #Migration From Africa a ‘Betrayal of Europe’  #Brexit  
If Brexit goes ahead it will soon be cheaper for EU27 citizens to buy Japanese cars directly from Japan rather than from the UK.  
The second referendum amendment has been withdrawn due to lack of support.#Labour policy is to respect the referendum result and deliver #Brexit.Party members who continue to campaign for #peoplesvote are campaigning against @UKLabour. 
What can Olly Robbins possibly have on Theresa May for her to keep him in charge of Brexit talks? He negotiated the worst deal in history, has actively lobbied against reopening the WA after it was comprehensively voted down in the Commons, and he's STILL in charge?   
Twas Brexit and the slimey goves     Did fox and farage through the glade. All Tory was this fucking mess     And the moom raabs mcveyed.   after Lewis Carrol, obviously... 
Leaked emails show plan for crisis centres to manage 'putrefying’ Tories after no-deal Brexit  
Here's what I gave the @Chartist48 knees up last nightThe Jakereeswocky   Twas Brexit and the slimey goves     Did fox and farage through the glade All soubry were the whittingdales     And the moom raabs mcveyed... 
UK would regret no-deal Brexit 'for ever': business minister  
BEST OPTION. Stop any further talks about Brexit with the EU. Hold our nerve, slip through the 29th March with NO DEAL, then see the EU come running in blind panic.If they dont, so what? We will be free of them and free to trade across the globe. WAKE UP PARLIAMENT. 
After the account chaos of last week, we're blown away by the interest in oor wee group.Thanks So, as a special treat..Here is the Brexit board from our street stall in #bonnyrigg last Sat.Loads of leaflets, badges and stickers given out, and good chat had too #brexit  
Two referendums created Scottish Parliament:  Yes-No? Tax powers Yes-No? No wonder MPs don't know what Brexit we want!As a Scot he loves England but the way the Tories have treated Scotland, promising stability in 2014, then showing utter contempt during Brexit...@BigC1874 
“Bridges event” is a reference to a Royal Family death —— Gvt fears they may have to deal with no deal brexit and Royal Family tragedy See here:  
We need legislation allowing for retrospective penal sentencing of the Brexit law-breakers and the politicians who are profiting from their crimes. #Brexit is a monstrous violation of democratic norms and the normal democratic remedies fall far short of being sufficient. 
The future of the UK is a matter for the people of the UK. We demand a #PeoplesVote on whether the Brexit disaster should be allowed to continue. You, Corbyn, are betraying your country & the vast majority of Labour members & supporters by being May’s handmaid. Disgusting.  
Around 6% of UK business trades with the EU. BBC now pushing an #iod poll suggesting around 33% of UK business seeking to relocate to the EU “because of Brexit”  
What is remarkable about this photo is the supermajority of old people-its not their future they are torching- must all be well enough off to manage a no deal. An unexpected feature of Brexit is the inter-generational divide-that’s it dump on the young  
Shocking and sinister, how the BBC keeps Remainer voices off its programmes.  #PeoplesVote #Brexit 
From today’s #irishtimespage1 this #irishtimescartoon by Martyn Turner for the day that’s in it#Brexit #SixNations #IREvENG #IRLvENG 
My in-laws bought a conservatory in the promise that if they let people view it, they'd get all their money back. There were never any viewings but it took them a long time to finally give up and accept they'd been conned. Denial of this kind keeps Brexit alive. For now. 
Irene Lazano, director of #Thisistherealspain PR campaign goes on @BBCNews to improve #Spain's international reputation. She manages to a) argue #Gibraltar could become Spanish after #Brexitb) state that jailed Catalan politicians AWAITING TRIAL are already guilty#welldone 
Midwives to a Tory Brexit.   
The next Brexit vote is on Feb 14th! ACTION: On Feb 9th visit your MP’s constituency office at 10am & hand-deliver a Valentine's Day Card to your MP asking for a #FinalSay on #Brexit with a #ValentinesVote#PeoplesVote#LoveNotLeave#VoteLove#LoveMeansLove#LoveEU 
I can’t wait to get Billy Vunipolas take on the whole brexit issue #IreVEng 
Meanwhile in the UK bribery, electoral cheating, etc, is now the norm. Brexit has poisoned us, we stink as a country now, we have been dunked into a cesspit by the Brexiters in both main parties: there will be a *dies irae* for this. Never, never accept what they are doing.  
Straight to the gym after @BBCBreakfast#exercisemotivation Actually laughed while sweating  listening to my funny, fabulous colleagues' Brexitcast podcast.Thank you @BBCkatyaadler @bbclaurak @adamfleming @ChrisMasonBBC#didntfeellikehomework#interesting #informative #Brexit  
Lab MPs to back May's Deal  "members of the Shadow Cabinet supportive as want to get Brexit “out of the way". Bribed or just delusional? The WA is the easy bit!  We'll be facing yrs of hard negotiating for future relationship from position of subservience  
Dominic Raab has threatened a fragile Tory truce last night by casting doubt on David Lidington's suitability for leading Brexit talks. @MaajidNawaz asks: is he right to imply that only a Brexiteer can make Brussels blink? 
I always thought that there were a small number MPs who are corrupt.  I also believed that the vast majority were, in the main, doing a reasonable job with the public intererest in mind.  The EU referendum has completely dispelled that belief. 
If a real Brexit isn't delivered then the British Public will vote against it at the next General Election.The conservative party will disappear into the history books and a new party will take their place as a political force in the UK  
The Story of Brexit: The Tory ConVoted leaveBoris taken out, TM planted as PMLie to leave voters, get reelected Lie to leave voters continually for 2 years 6 months to go, admit will be BRINO2 months to go, admit will be extending Article 50Guess the final chapter 
71% of UK firms totally untroubled by Brexit.  
If #Brexit is delayed/betrayed who would you vote for? 
Scotsman failing to understand that all under spent budget gets spent the on projects eventually. Its important to have a safety net when Westminster and Brexit constantly screw your budget.  
One thing #Brexit did is completely unsettle Big Brother's propaganda machine that's been plugging the false notion that people have a voice. For once after WW2 the government let slip its grip and the people made the right choice and now the whole machine is reversing the vote. 
#TheLastLeg - Alastair Campbell can you give a brief opinion on these faces:-Boris Johnson - The C wordTheresa May - DesperateMalcolm Tucker - LegendJeremy Corbyn - For God's sake lead on #BrexitNigel Farage - Nicotine stained man frog #PeoplesVote @campbellclaret 
Brexit is 55 days away. #brexit 
What would be really useful in the next couple of weeks is some news from the National Crime Agency about where #ArronBanks got his £8 million from. That should surely be a game changer? (Sadly I don't type the question with confidence.) #Brexit 
The debate about Brexit is extremely confusing. But that's mostly because virtually all politicians are obfuscating what's going on.@rdanielkelemen created this great overview of the realistic options *ages* ago. Astoundingly, May still acts as though the trilemma didn't exist. 
Germaine Greer has refused permission to a publisher to call a book about Theresa May and Brexit, 'The Female Unicorn'. 
If you think a gigantic clusterfuck like Brexit couldn't happen in Australia? <ahem>... Look at the front bench.Look at the government backbench.For the 417th time - our institutions aren't the problem, the people we let into them are. 
"This present Conservative administration is spitting in the wind of what every Conservative Prime Minister and government that I've supported and worked for since the 1940s told us was in the British national interest" - Lord Heseltine on Brexit. 
.@John_Mills_JML on why Lab's position of being "half in half out" is "not Brexit at all... the worst of all worlds". #Brexit  
The cost of Brexit is already apparent. We've crunched the numbers  
If British diplomats thought they had laid the Gibraltar row to rest during Brexit negotiations they were sorely mistaken  
Queue at the street stall - signing petition to cancel Brexit and signing up to join Bradford for Europe  
Brexit Broadcasting Corporation @bbceurovision would never allow it...  
Not by a long, long way. Remain will never let Brexit win: the future of the countries of the British Isles is in the EU. Either we’ll stop the madness of Brexit, or if the thieves manage to chest & steal us out, we’ll soon be back in. They will not win.  
Norway's $1 trillion man, Yngve Slyngstad, talks Brexit, China and Big Tech  
"A second public vote is not at all impossible. Recent opinion polls have shown that a majority of the population wants another referendum," argues @Alison_McGovern 
Normanton: De Select Yvette Cooper - Sign the Petition!  via @UKChange - LETS DO IT FOR ALL THE BREXIT TRAITORS 
You're supporting a Brexit your own Party's experts say hurts the UK & which does the opposite of what Brexit voters wanted: giving up our control over EU policy but still being bound by it, angering both sides, and your only response is to criticise my use of punctuation? Oh hun 
What utter drivel. I’m from a unionist family, regardless of politics, unionist rugby lovers have always supported the Ireland Rugby Team. If people from NI still supported Ireland Rugby when articles 2/3 of the constitution existed, Brexit wouldn’t deter them.  
Let's get this Second Referendum petition really moving!Let's push it over 50KAll you have to do isSIGN and RT it.It only takes a minute SIGN this     Now RT it#FinalSayForAll #PeoplesVote 
It's time for clarity on Brexit means Brexit and Leave means Leave.@RemainingKind @ChrisHa33342711 @StandUp2Brexit 
POLL | How would you describe Labour’s position on Brexit? 
Corbyn: Labour members can have any option on the table they like as long as it's Brexit. 
Officials are warning of putrefying piles of waste after Brexit.. it’s the Tories and their stinking rotten disgusting system.. Tories Smell Bad!!   
Column on Brexit, localism and the purpose of MPs  
So Unionist were ok with articles 2/3 of the Irish Constitution, yet Brexit is a problem? Utter drivel . 
I’ll never understand the mentality of those that supposedly represent this country actively seeking to ensure it gets the worst possible terms out of Brexit.  
Lord Heseltine tells @lbc MPs, the majority who voted Remain, must kill Brexit. he ignores majority of British people who voted Leave. He’s a fully paid up member of the sneering elite 
Now having reflected about what the Commons did and didn't do on #Brexit earlier this week, I've written a blog post about what's nexttl;dr - May's Deal still won't pass, No Deal looms into view, but won't necessarily happen 
A moment of levity in the Brexit debate from the Lords.Though former Brexit minister Steve Baker looks rather, ahem, unconvinced!  
We've started receiving questions about Brexit, so we've put together this post to answer from FAQs and explain what our plans are. It's a long post, so feel free to skip to the end for a summary! 
Since we like to call the various options by the names of countries, I suggest ‘The Venezuela Model’ for no deal Brexit.  
FALL OF MAN: Extremism always collapses in on itself; as the devotee numbers lessen they turn on each other, desperate to prove their faith is greater. It happens in religion, in politics, in terrorism - and now Brexit. Once Jacob Rees Mogg becomes a ‘traitor’ then all is lost.  
There will be hell to pay if this is true & the result of the referendum is ignored, by remaining in the CU.  
Your Brexit is stealing people's futures from them. Those people are YOUR kids!You can't say "we're going to restrict free movement" and then pretend you're not narrowing your own children's horizons too! 
With Brexit sensitivities running so high over the backstop, I’m not sure the rugger boyos have quite thought through their #iREVENG hashtag. 
Italy now in recession, Germany about to follow suit, and Britain has growth rate double the Eurozone. I thought the British economy was going to hell in a handcart after the Brexit vote?#BBCQT 
The referendum was conducted unlawfully.  Serious illegality involved.This is a matter of fact.  Since when do we have to 'respect' something unlawful? It is contrary to the most fundamental concept underpinning our democracy - the rule of law.  I will never understand this. 
Let me get this rightWe've gone from Brexit, to Theresa May's Brexit In Name OnlyNow to Theresa May's Brexit In Name Only with a Customs UnionAnd from leaving on 29/03 to now extending Aritcle 50 and potentially never leaving at all The Tories are overturning the vote 
It is completely unacceptable to descrIbe Gibraltar in this way," the prime minister's official spokesman said. (Guardian, Brexit visa-free travel plans spark Gibraltar 'colony' row, 1 Feb 2019).  
As a grassroots #Conservative member I will not support a PM who keeps us in the #CustomsUnion to save her miserable deal.That would be the ultimate betrayal of the biggest democratic vote in our history#Brexit #StandUp4Brexit#Conservatives @andreajenkyns @DVATW 
excited to announce two big band shows on the night of brexit (whatever happens) at the royal court theatre. tickets now on sale.plus am on @gillespeterson @BBC6Music today around 4ish talking about the record.join us! 
Six Nations Brexit special? Confronting a difficult choice.Courtesy @thetimes 
The bus promised £350m a week for the NHS. That was a vote-winning lie. What the Brexiters really want to do is privatise the NHS. A no-deal economic crash plus a trade-deal with the USA would do just that for them. #PeoplesVote #Brexit  
BBCQT is going to be a lot of fun next week. You there. The red faced bald man with the sash your father wore on. What’s your thoughts on another nasty divisive independence referendum? Surely Scotland must know it’s place in the glorious union? 
#Brexit: Whitehall officials begin ‘serious work’ on UK staying in EU customs union as way to rescue deal  
“#Brexit is also affecting the sciences because it is sending out a perception that the UK is not open for business and the UK does not want scientists from other countries."Our President, Venki Ramakrishnan FRS, in the @Daily_Express 
“Whitehall ‘won’t cope’ with no-Deal #Brexit” says ⁦@thetimes⁩ after leak. Truth is, having spent £4.2 bn on preparations, the UK cannot cope with any form of #Brexit⁦@peoplesvote_uk⁩ #FBPE 
I'm sure. The 3 million FB page is full of pictures like this .... each represents a tax-paying family who've made their home here, but no longer feel welcome @sajidjavid and #brexit has destroyed us. #stopbrexit #Iameuropean 
I voted #ReluctantRemain.What do I mean? I've never been a fan of the EU. But I felt that Brexit came at the wrong time and I felt that the Tories would hijack the process. As a result, I supported Remain but reluctantly - like Jeremy Corbyn. Anyone else feel similar? 
Interesting. The "EU has brought peace in Europe" argument used to feel a bit over-egged. But the intense anti-European hostility Brexit created in just 2 years after the UK voted to leave the EU makes it seem entirely correct.  
If we stay in ANY customs union with the EU then Brexit is utterly betrayed  
The West has better things to do with its time than getting involved with Africa.Anyone who thinks we are on the brink of more, not less Western involvement in African affairs - is day dreaming. Definitely not in an age of Trump or Brexit. 
'what a time to live,' says a friend. Or in my case, having 86% chance of #cancer returning, and being told by my oncologist that I'm unlikely to be prioritised for treatment, given my age, and the scarcity of isotopes once we drop out of Euratom, what a time to die #nhs #Brexit  
GMS this morning had an in depth discussion on Brexit and Ireland. GMS doesn't really do Brexit and Scotland.Scotland wasn't ignored completely. The programme later had two former Scottish Labour councillors talking about council funding and the 'cuts' the SNP is making. 
Rees-Mogg "A short extension to the timetable to deliver #Brexit is not impossible" Yes, it would most definitely be UNACCEPTABLE#Brexit29March2019#StandUp4Brexit#WTOBrexitNow#LetsGoWTO 
Elites trying to delay or block Brexit are sitting on a volcano:  
BBC bias is still skewing the Brexit debate, says @Madz_Grant 
Goebbels after a Nazi referendum victory: "The will of the people is the will of the government and vice versa [...] there is no possibility for parliamentary interference, to obliterate and render ineffective the execution of the nation’s will."#PeoplesVote #Brexit  
Remainers realise that honouring the 29th March leaving date means their campaign is over. The only way they can hope to succeed is with an extension to our departure date. Our leaving date, like Brexit itself is written into law, bin one & you are effectively binning the other. 
If you really want to upset Mogg, share this:cc @J_amesp @Byline_Media 
The EU is now within touching distance of a Brexit deal. Parliament has asked for an agreement that conforms to international norms (ie, where either party can serve notice). Is that really too much to ask? My column on the case for compromise:  
It’s amazing how much money, which should have been distributed on the basis of need and fairness, can suddenly be found to bribe MPs to vote for a Brexit deal that was dismissed by the largest parliamentary margin in history. 
We were given sight of an official government document showing they can’t cope with No Deal emergencies. We are fighting against Brexit. Please visit our donate page if you want to help the fight  
This week Theresa May requested the EU reopen negotiations on the Brexit backstop. That didn't go well....  
Brilliant speech my Labour MP David Lammy exposing lies and hypocrisy of the leaders of the #Brexit campaign.  
They can't blame Brexit for this Europe-wide mess, says @johnredwood 
I have reached out to @BBCBreaking @BBCr4today @GMB @Channel4News & ALL have given me silence. It appears a campaign this necessary & one that could eradicate so much toil & mental stress is not as newsworthy as Brexit or a bit of snow. I will endeavour.  
hi Emily, i'm a Labour member who voted for Corbyn; Brexit is absolutely your fault too, and there's no way i'll vote Labour again if you allow it to go ahead. i'm absolutely disgusted with my party. 
Your “facts" ignore the fact that history's declarations of independence are unilateral. Is Denmark the opposite of democracy? Is the United States? How then is Catalonia, whose people had a referendum violently opposed by their rulers in Spain, which is also historically normal.  
@RBlackPA “The Conservative MP as well as political donor Arron Banks were among the guests at a Democratic Unionist dinner in Ballymena, Co Antrim on Thursday. “The DUP has very similar views on many issues relating to Brexit,” JRM said. via @BelTel 
Brexit: fight for 'people's vote' not over yet, say campaigners  
Rabid, Ideological and absolutely crackers... No wonder the world continues to look at us with pity and astonishment. #Brexit #PeoplesVote 
Yet we waste billions on brexit. The country's priorities are fucked. The politicians are obviously comfortable with people dying on our streets whilst they play politics with borrowed money. 
Another Remoaner propaganda rag that's losing money hand over fist.Let's just hope and pray that the Substandard will soon be a victim of Tory Cuts and Cliff-Edge Brexit ...  
All this #BREXIT stuff reminds me of the time we had to negotiate a free trade agreement between the for'ard and aft NAAFIs. Now THAT was a difficult negotiation. 
Whitehall officials begin ‘serious work’ on UK staying in EU customs union as way to rescue Brexit deal.  Why not do the commonsense thing and look to renegotiate the special deal we already have - a much better win win for all -  
The Greek people oppose this deal which you are trying to impose on us! The gvt doesn’t dare hold a #ReferendumThe population of #FYROM also opposes this deal & de-voted it by a huge abstention!The deal signed by your puppets #Tsipras & #Zaef to serve your goals will not stand 
You have had 2 years to deliver Brexit. For 2 years the PM has said no deal is better than a bad deal, not that anyone voted for a deal just leave or remain. Last 2 years wasted by an incompetent Government. 
#NDCLondon was a blast! Big thanks to everyone who attended, we hope to see you again next year. Brexit or Semi-Brexit, we'll be back on 2020 
More unnecessary cost burden for businesses that will no doubt be passed onto consumers BBC News - Brexit: UK plans new product safety mark for 'no deal' scenario  
A no-deal Brexit will be avoided because Germany "doesn't want it" and that country "runs Europe," Lord Digby Jones says  
John McDonnell - A 2nd referendum has to remain on the table..we've committed to that having to be an option that has to be considered.So yet again Labour can't just give a straight answer on this. #PeoplesVote #FinalSay #RevokeA50 
SINKING: Jeremy Corbyn’s popularity falls to all-time low after pathetic shifting on Brexit. The public want to Leave but Labour would rather play party politics. Disgraceful!  
My Leave voting mother just came in to see me, after seeing a @SkyNews piece on Japanese trade post-#Brexit. She said she had her “eyes opened” by the sheer scale of the issues we might face outside the single market, and wondered how we could let other Leave voters know. 
Jacob Rees-Mogg has said that there could be grounds for an extension to the Brexit deadline. @TomSwarbrick1 asks: Would a delay be acceptable for you? 
EU officials have defined Gibraltar as a “colony of the British Crown” in legislation to prepare the EU for UK's No-Deal Brexit. Theresa May’s EU ambassador, Sir Tim Barrow, contested the “completely inappropriate” despite UKGov considering it a colony!  
It’s Groundhog Day, made famous in a film about the recurring nightmare of living through the same experiences again and again while getting no further.Brexit is due to happen next month. 
 is free. Join the campaign to help save Brexit @  
Hi @BBCNews When are we going to get a summation of 'No-Deal' brexit as honest as this from YOU ... ?  
Today's @thetimesIE cartoon for the day that's in it. #IreVEng #SixNations #Brexit  
A short extension to the timetable to deliver Brexit is not impossible.  
A reminder of what the Brexiteers said before the referendum... and the contradictory remarks they make now.  
Low-grade Labour nobodies still say they know better than 17m Brexit voters  
Brexit is turning into Fyre Festival. Except we can’t leave the island.  
Would David Mundell the Scottish Secretary Care to explain to us why the Scottish office is in secret talks with the Orange Order? TORY Scotland Office minister Ian Duncan met with the Grand Master of the Grand Orange Lodge of Scotland ahead of a key Brexit vote at Westminster. 
Revealed today that UKGov is refusing to fund the deployment of up to 400 Scottish police officers to deal with the consequences of Brexit, despite funding similar emergency deployment in England and the north of Ireland.UKGov already owes Police Scotland £125 million in VAT. 
Gary Lineker Sends Grovelling Letter To Germany Apologising For Brexit What a snivelling little prick you are @GaryLineker Why don’t you just fkin move there?@inthematrix888 
Time for a brutal truth:A 2nd referendum will not happen without a general election first.It doesn’t matter if Labour supports a 2nd ref or if they whip their MPs to vote for one, the numbers aren’t there.If you honestly care about mitigating Brexit - stop attacking Labour. 
This is what I wrote about Brexit in 2014 in my book The Road to Freedom. I predicted what would happen. The book is out of print now but I have asked the publisher, Bretwalda Books, to reprint since it is still topical. Go to info@bretwaldabooks.com  if you want a copy.  
Liberal Democrats are not giving up.We are fighting to give the British people the final say on Brexit. We believe people should be free to reject Theresa May's deal and stay in the EU.Let's give the people the final say > 
Pass this around to all those who think No Deal Brexit won’t be so bad.  We, in Britain, have lost all perspective. This scenario is worse than anyone can imagine. We may slide into it without intending to. #StopBrexitSaveBritain 
Waiting for Godot latest ... waiting for supine ministers who tell you privately they think Brexit is a disaster & then go along with it, & won’t even resign when Mrs May keeps no deal in play. Contemptible 
Brexit: Third of UK businesses considering move abroad - No one voted for this! Time for a public vote on the Deal   
The most extraordinary thing about #Brexit is that we don't have to do it. Every other national emergency I can think of, we had little choice but to deal with it. This one could be avoided. 
If you were hoping to escape #Brexit and immerse yourself in the #SixNationsRugby just for a day don’t look at the ads up around Dublin. #IREvENG 
The Malthouse compromise or ‘sort of Brexit better than no Brexit’ will not do!  It’s like ordering a Jaguar but having  Reliant Robin delivered instead ...then having the dealer say “well it’s a sort of car... better than no Jag at all” ....it’s not what we ordered! 
Low-grade Labour nobodies bloated with self-importance still say they know better than 17.4m Brexit voters.Parliament sent them a clear message — their hopes to overturn the biggest democratic mandate in our country’s history will come to nothing.  
Why shouldn't it be illegal? The government are not obliged to continue with Brexit, and certainly not a no deal Brexit. People's lives are at risk, through lack of medicines & possible return of  the Troubles in N Ireland. All this on a ref. result won with criminal interference 
Very important quote in this - at last a recognition that the “sea of opportunity” is only that if you have markets and those are at grave risk because of #Brexit as - for example - the fishing members of @CIFA_Scot have been making clear for months. 
Secret Brexit meeting between Orange Order and Scottish Tory minister  
Ringleader for British nationalism who feels "oppressed" by a trade bloc in full rant against Irish people pointing out obvious flaws of brexit. This is MOPEism at its worst  
George III Lost America. Theresa May Could Lose the United Kingdom Over Brexit. - The Daily Beast  
Brexit news: Gibraltar vows Spain CANNOT take 'ONE GRAIN OF SAND of our sovereignty'. The last time Gibraltarians were asked they voted to remain British by almost 99%. Gibraltar is British, period..  
The guest list for Paisleys fund raiser sounds like the worst orgy ever: Man of the people Rees-Mogg MP, Brexit-backing businessman Arron Banks, loyalist blogger Jamie Bryson, anti-abortion campaigner Bernie Smyth and Daniel McArthur from Ashers bakery. 
The UK economy is proving the Brexit doomsayers wrong' | via @telegraph 
How bizarre that I feel jealous that your families past gives you this opt out from the lunacy of the UK! What on Earth is #Brexit doing to us and all and those rights we have built up of the years?@peoplesvote_uk @LibDems @EdwardJDavey 
Great story. And only in Britain would we actually have a picture of an actual yellowhammer on the cover. @BBCRadio4#tweetoftheday meets Brexit.  
UK mainstream media should hang its head in shame for its comprehensive failure to educate, inform and explain Brexit Those few who have had the chance to interview leading political figures on live TV are particularly at fault for their gross failure to do their job competently  
Too right Westminster should pay for Scottish Brexit policing, say SNP   
This is a brilliant thread and well worth a listen to excerpts of Brexit hero @SteveBakerHW in front of the EU Scrutiny Committee. 
WATCH: Leading Brexiters this week said they could back a Brexit deal without the backstop. But they have previously said their concerns go way beyond the backstop.Don't let the get away with it - please RT this video:  
Best Brexit proposal of the week - a "Brexit Cookbook", which recommends cooking and eating what can be grown locally. Why should we have strawberries in December?  It's decadent. Eat simply and in season. Appreciate home-grown produce. Great idea. 
Jobs and lives will be put at risk by a No Deal Brexit, for which our country and our Government is totally unprepared. It would be an act of criminal negligence for Theresa May to do this to her people.  
Norway's $1 trillion man, Yngve Slyngstad, talks Brexit, China and Big Tech  
BBC News - Brexit: UK plans new product safety mark for 'no deal' scenarioA little Gammon symbol? Spitfire? Monocle?   
Don’t succumb to gloom & despondency because of Tuesday’s confused votes in the House of Commons. Mrs May’s Brexit is heading for the buffers again & I believe we will prevail!  
Simply devastating.“It’s difficult to be too damning about the..negotiation”..“No.10 has consistently tried to cling on and have as little Brexit as possible”Watch these extracts former minister Steve Baker’s brutally frank testimony on how No.10 has screwed up Brexit.  
Dear @andrealeadsom  I know the house needs a lot of time to talk Brexit and I understand, but please don’t delay the amendments to the Children’s Act anymore. We need to add #FGM to the legislation so we can protect girls. Please allow the bill a hearing next week.  
Exc: What next for the People’s Vote campaign? Insiders insist that despite the disappointment of this week, their “last man standing” long-term strategy remains on track. They say approx 200 MPs support a referendum but that will grow in the coming weeks.  
Of bigger concern is whether @NCA_LynneOwens of the National Crime Agency is deliberately slow balling the investigation into the potentially more serious crimes of Arron Banks including Russian espionage. Will NCA conclude AFTER March 29th so shock news won’t disrupt Brexit? 
'Quick and easy' and 'they (EU27) need us much more than we need them' . Haven't we heard the lead Brexiteers categorically state this before and it's sadly been a major miscalculation behind HMG Brexit negotiations policy since 2016.  
Yesterday I realised I listen to @mrjamesob too much. Had a convo with some brexit pensioners. Dismantled thier "sovereignty, laws, money, and unelected bureaucrats" views calmly without belittling them. I then did a timecheck and walked away  
It's disgraceful that, with just 55  days until Brexit, the rights of the 1 million UK citizens in the EU are still not secure. That's what happens when people's lives are used as pawns in the negotiations. (Remember: EU wanted to settle them 2 years ago.)  
Orange Order meet Tory Scotland Office Minister and leading Scottish Liberal Democrat and Labour MPs at Westminster to discuss Brexit. (SNP declined to meet).  
Department for Transport says UK transport systems will be ‘overwhelmed’ by no deal Brexit - yet it is still government policy to prepare for it. I regard this as immoral & possibly illegal (abuse of public office) since HMG has it within its power to prevent a no deal Brexit  
Dad, I feel sick, have you got any fruit or vegetables, or medicine? #Brexit  
The EU has not threatened UK with anything & much as the blame game by Brexiteers who now cant deliver their promised sunlit uplands will focus it on EU truth is that UK chose Brexit & HMG chose the hardest variety and thus legal consequences are entirely of the UK's own making! 
Arron Banks tweets: "Gosh we communicated with our supporters and offered them a 10% Brexit discount after the vote! So what?"#UKEUchallenge@Suewilson91#VoteLeaveBroketheLaw 
EU agrees visa-free travel for UK citizens even after no-deal Brexit  
Last night’s Brexit discussion at Hereford Cathedral was organised by Shaun’s husband @peterdyke49, the Cathedral organist, who leads an annual choir exchange to Nuremburg. Nothing better symbolises 70 years of friendship with Germany & the case for Britain staying in Europe 
Slowly dawning on me if we philosophers had done a better job of explaining the concept of relational autonomy we could have nipped this Brexit nonsense in the bud. 
Brexit could lead to thousands more deaths due to rising food prices, researchers say  
Ambulance staff from #EU countries are sticking with the service and not leaving ahead of #Brexit, an #NHS Trust report says.We need to start a #ProjectFear myth buster chart! We’re losing track. 
Fun Brexit fact: Irish cattle have blue passports 
Moore has a point. May's conduct throughout has been at odds with her words. The real reason she agreed to the backstop was that she wants to keep the UK in [the/a] customs union, which we voted against in the referendum. via @Telegraph 
This is political dynamite.  Steve Baker MP gives evidence of No10s  attempts to block Brexit to the EU Scrutiny Committee.  It’s an hour long but the 1st 5 mins are enough to condemn May.       
If British diplomats thought they had laid the Gibraltar row to rest during Brexit negotiations they were sorely mistaken   
Momentum would like to pretend that Labour & Corbyn had no part to play in the continuing Brexit shitshower,They’re lying. Labour are upto their neck in this. They voted with the Tories to drive through a hard Brexit no matter the cost, no matter the damage,  
The "People's Vote 2nd Referendum" crowd are suddenly very quiet. They're also failing and divided. So, what went so wrong with their well-funded campaign to reverse the ACTUAL People's Vote? HINT: It wasn't just Supergirl who was out of tune. #csm #Brexit  
Sons and Daughters dying on the Street.Wheelchairs..Benefits and Social networks being stripped from People with disabilities.Schoolkids searching bins for food.While Mandelson..Blair..Chuku and the rest of the FBPE troll Labour on AS and Brexit.Makes you want to puke !!! 
It is fundamental to the future of this country's democracy that the referendum result must be honoured.  
So David Lammy says the definition of insanity is doing the same thing over and over again, but expecting different results.Doesn't David Lammy want a second referendum because he didn't like the result the first time around.  
Brexit and the Brady Amendment: Game Changer or Phony War? Here’s my latest on another head spinning week via @RTENewsNow  
Brexit has zero affect on the GFA.  Please stop lying & trying to use NI as a means to stop Brexit.  
An inch of snow and Britain grinds to a halt. So tell me again about this *managed* No Deal Brexit bullshit. 
Do you think that at some point twenty years down the line, 20-30something left Brexit advocates will feel a hot flush creeping across their face & their toes curling inwards as they remember supporting an extreme right project, & thinking there was a progressive way to do it? 
Birkenhead doesn’t need a #Brexit bribe from a Tory PM - it needs a @UKLabour government with long term investment based on socioeconomic need & opportunity for economic growth & jobs not bungs! 
Low-grade Labour nobodies bloated with self-importance still say they know better than 17m Brexit voters  
6) UK media branding #Brexit voters racist & Far Right?@SteveBakerHW shares his disgust at the smearing, calling for all voices to be heard. He calls for Labour Leave to be heard more, which I'd soundly agree with. 
Anyone who thinks supporting Brexit is what’s is best for their constituents is a liar or an imbecile.  
The clock radio’s gone off and they’re talking about Brexit again. Must be #GroundhogDay 
Absolutely nothing on @BBCNews about the £120,000 fine for Arron Banks for cheating during the referendum campaign. 
John Humphrys interviewing European politicians is a form of absurdist performance art, revealing nothing about the EU and everything about the Brexit misinformation that got us where we are. We really deserve better. #r4today 
When #indyref2 comes (& it will) can I suggest to @theSNP that UN observers are brought in to ensure that all votes are counted properly & referendum is delivered within the law! #indyref2 #DissolveTheUnion #OurScotland #NewScotland 
.@julianHjessop The UK economy is proving the Brexit doomsayers wrong  
Funny, I thought we’d been assured by such aviation experts as Biggles Rees Mogg and Dam Buster Darren Grimes ( aged 12 3/4) that flying into EU post Hard Brexit will be a piece of cake. “Control Tower, can you hear me...”  
Officials are warning of putrefying piles of waste after Brexit.. it’s the Tories and their stinking rotten disgusting system, feed the rich scam the poor!! As Govt jets off skiing, homeless lie in tents outside boarded up shops...   
What "hit?". This is just more project Fear.Young people stand to benefit the most from Brexit, through lower prices, lower rents, higher wages and increased investment in the NHS and public services.  
People stranded in their cars by the snow are interviewed for @BBCr4today complaining about being trapped with no food & cold. One day of snow. And No Deal Brexit is just fine is it? Food & medicine shortages, traffic gridlock in Kent, putrid waste in the street? 
Official testimony of Irish Customs to Irish Parliament - No hard border required.  Here's what they said in 2017 :   The problem isn't #Brexit, it's Remainer politicians.#GoWTO 
“Hello BBC and Sky News?  Why don't you listen to Irish Customs about the Irish border?” Proof that Irish border problem is manufactured by EU Commission & Irish Government.  #Brexit summary here: #GoWTO 
Brexit wrecking Europe? The root of political "wreckage" across Europe today lies in neoliberal policies  — #AJOpinion, by @culturejamming 
#Brexit must be winning when BBC bias gets this bad : “Brexit: Third of UK businesses considering move abroad - survey”  We take this apart with facts here : #GoWTO 
2/ Then he fear-mongered about a recession. The global economy is to some extent on tenterhooks re: Chinese economy slowdown, Brexit, etc. This is why the Fed has put off any rate increases in the near term. 
Translation: The Prime Minister is prepared to use inequality between communities as a bargaining chip in an attempt to persuade (see also: bribe) their MPs to vote for her Brexit deal - under the guise of a "longstanding commitment to tackling inequality".Utterly disgusting.  
TB created more jobs than JC ever will, gave us the minimum wage, improved schools hospitals and didn’t assist in delivering a job destroying Brexit . I know who the real friend of thecwifking class is. 
Brexit, the final countdown: 55 days to go... #GroundhogDay 
The "doesn't have the votes" contention simply isn't true for other things though. Mrs. May's Government has,  after all, just gone down to a historic defeat of her flagship policy on Brexit - by a majority of 230. It just shows that it is more than possible. 
There is little indication from Mr Corbyn, despite his leadership election promises and the conference resolution, that he is willing to follow Labour policy on a people's vote. The signals coming from his office are that he wants to continue to facilitate Brexit. 
1,320 hours until BrexitWe are leaving the biggest fraudulent scam ever perpetuated on the British taxpayer.The EU connived with Blair to let millions of immigrants from 27 countries claim higher British benefits & tax credits, without contributing a penny.Britain bled dry. 
North to south, the seeds of division in Brexit Britain were sown long ago | Ian Jack  
Magnums and deodorant being stockpiled in case of no-deal Brexit  
Theres something very strange going on in Britain, theres a brexit result delivered by fraud and lies, theres an opposition to the Govt that no longer opposes, and a state broadcaster with a licence for propaganda.If I said that about Russia - shoulders shrugged as normal. 
The EU has described Gibraltar as a colony, with its own tax raising powers, broadcasting, and general autonomy.The precedent is set, that the SNP as Scottish Govt can now say to the EU that UKG are negotiating brexit FOR Scotland - as A colony where consent is taken from NO. 
"We spend so much time beating ourselves up over Brexit"REALLY? From a female perspective, on our side I see swagger, boorishness & incompetence. Then when EU outclasses/outflanks us (which it does, every time), Govt cries to the press it's being bullied. EU just sticks to rules  
Word of the dayPAUCHLE, nA swindle, a piece of trickery1963 Scottish Field“I've never won a prize, except once when I was on an amateur football club's committee, and that was a pochle”2019 BoswellBrexit is the biggest pauchle since the Record tried tae sell “The Vow” 
This country was built on a Full-English. Eat your bubble & squeak with pride, and say after me No-Deal, No Problem! Stick your Continental Breakfasts up your arse.   #Brexit  
‘Mrs May’s impact assessment showed that the north-east would be hardest hit by Brexit. Accepting her deal means selling out the areas that we represent as well as the wider national interest. No one should do that for vague promises of a short-term fix’  
Track Brexit’s impact in charts and graphics  
What is Billy Joel going to rhyme with “Brexit?” 
Low-grade Labour nobodies bloated with self-importance still say they know better than 17m Brexit voters, says @TheSun 
Reality: Spanish Judiciary vs. international press.In the AP's article on Spain's trial of Catalan political leaders, the only "violence" mentioned is a "violent police crackdown".Yet the referendum organizers are accused of "violent rebellion". 
Ireland has yet to make its most important decision on Brexit  via @IrishTimesOpEd 
No-deal Brexit worries grip Irish border  
Well, looks like the paramilitaries aren’t going to wait for Brexit and are kicking off early…  
Tory SNUB: Donors WITHHOLD vital funding in 'disgust' over Theresa May's Brexit leadership  
You will try to deceive Biafrans again but  you shall never survive it because Biafrans will shame you on 16th February 2019 by sitting at home on Referendum day to be free from your evil plan on them. Blood suckers  
Small extension to Brexit timetable could be acceptable: Rees-Mogg  
It would be very difficult for the EU to take legal action if a post-Brexit Britain refused to pay the £39 billion after no deal. The ECJ would have no jurisdiction over us andnit does not recognise the jurisdiction of any other courts in EU matters. 
BREXIT.... A brutal reality  
Latest Guardian scare: putrefying tons of waste will not be able to be exported after a no deal Brexit. Next it will be rats and the plague and the return of the Black Death. 
Referendum on U.S. base relocation in Okinawa to be held across Japan's entire southernmost prefecture  
British manufacturers are stockpiling goods at the fastest rate since records began in preparation for a disorderly Brexit and growth in the sector has slumped to a three-month low  
Funny how just after beating up voters waiting in line at the referendum of 1-O 2017, #Spain gave away many "prestigious" prizes to #EU functionaries. Here @EU_Commission chair @JunckerEU receives his invincible lampshade. No prizes since. Are all #EU functionaries satisfied? 
"#Brexit is a watershed moment. Britain must take advantage of this opportunity. This means rejecting #EU protectionism and embracing trade, including #CANZUK.”@ASI @MatthewLesh 
Name one Muslim country that has embraced #multiculturalism You can't because there is none. An African country? An East Asian country? None again, yet Europe is supposed to accept it. We do not want it, it causes nothing but death and misery. Roll on #brexit @UKLabour @LibDems 
An official EU document has referred to Gibraltar as a ‘colony’. @matthewstadlen asks: Are you running out of patience with the high-handed attitude of Brussels Brexit bureaucrats?  
I think the people at the BBC have memory loss issues 'cos no matter how many times someone from Labour explains our Brexit strategy, BBC hosts always ask, "What is Labour's Brexit strategy?" 
The referendum was fraudulent, and more evidence is coming to light.  Leave EU stole 300,000 customers data from Eldon Insurance to use in targeted advertising. I refuse to have my FOM and my  EU citizen rights stolen. MPs who ignore this fraud should be ashamed. @CarolineFlintMP 
From the horse’s mouth, Mr Rees-Mogg has indeed become a compromising snowflake with regard to his party and parliamentary colleagues while ignoring the significant issues and risks of an extended Brexit timetable.  
You are deluded.The Tories started it (but Corbyn and McDonnell and other Labour MPs argued for it, voted for it...and have been a willing midwife to May’s Brexit right from the whipping of LP MPs on A50 notice onwards.You damn well are responsible too & we shall NOT forget 
I don’t really understand what @thomas_violence has to do with Brexit but ok  
Brexit Campaign Used Data Illegally During Referendum Campaign.  
The pro-EU lobby would have liked the UK economy to tank after the Brexit vote - their fabricated fear-mongering predictions now look ridiculous.But I never thought Chris Giles or the FT would have the gall to admit as much in writing.  
Full circle: The @Telegraph's Brussels correspondent argues Britain should stay in EU and sabotage it from within -- as "revenge" for bullying over Brexit. Isn't that what Britain has been doing for decades?  via @Telegraph 
"It is difficult to describe the scale of economic disaster this outcome would be for the UK"......and Brexit will cause a global economic crisis. The world's press can see it:Brexit no-deal: Why the world needs to start panicking - CNN  
That awkward moment when you realise your Prince Charming supports Brexit.  
Whether or not you think that Catalonia should be an independent country, please keep your eyes on the trials in Madrid of the Pro independence leaders. During the referendum vote  on independence on October 1, 2017, Spanish police came out and...  
A few hours later on Penryn campus, George Eustice admitted he "could not guarantee" this. Any more than he could guarantee a snowball's chance in hell.#Cornwall #Brexit  
This is incredible. May knows that Brexit is built on pure, dangerous nonsense. Almost every MP does.Write to your MP to demand we #RevokeA50 & #Remain. 
We spend so much time beating ourselves up over Brexit while EU bureaucrats treat us with intransigence and rudeness. Calling Gibraltar a colony just simply isn’t on. I voted remain and I’ve almost had enough. Have you? Join me from 1 on @LBC 
They will have received personal invitations - MPs only want to hear from people with similar ideologies. That's how they know the reasons behind how we voted in the referendum; they speak to a hand-picked audience and extrapolate. Am I right Suella? 
Extending the Brexit timetable is most definitely unacceptable, Mr Rees-Mogg.  
The possibility that Brexit and the Trump campaign relied on some of the same advisers to further far-right nationalist campaigns has set off alarm bells on both sides of the Atlantic.  
The political establishment have spent 2 1/2 years fighting over the referendum, ignoring the countless other issues  our country faces . The SDP are working hard to finalise policies to create a post-Brexit Britain we can all be proud of. Our New Declaration was just the start. 
If you perpetually sack Remainers and retain Brexiters in the Shadow Cabinet @jeremycorbyn there are conclusions to be drawn:You want Brexit.You will sacrifice the members, Party Policy and Party Conference to get it.You welcome those with your views and sack those without.  
Excellent piece by Jane Mayer  ICYMI New Evidence Emerges of Steve Bannon and Cambridge Analytica’s Role in Brexit  
I'm not American I'm English. I admire what you guys have and what the Anons goals are. I metaphorically stand with you shoulder to shoulder. WWG1WGA. We have the EU deep state to deal with. Brexit must prevail. Stand firm my patriot cousins, love from England. 
have decided to invest all my life savings into stock piling milka and choco leibniz. after Brexit I’m waging these reserves will be like gold dust, which I can use to barter for protection and batteries when the inevitable riots ensue 
The idea that our current parties might fall to pieces due to brexit must be one of the most exhilarating and wonderful possible outcomes ever and only makes leaving even more worthwhile 
I conclude @CarolineFlint is living in her own little bubble deaf to all the anger, betrayal and despair around her for she is too scared and too wet to tell her constituents the truth - that Brexit will harm them.She is neither educating nor listening, thus betraying us again. 
Brexiters won't understand the war they are fighting until they learn to despise also the politicians and media vessels who claim to speak in their name. #Brexit 
Anyone think that the day after brexit the first thing the tories will do is abolish Holyrood?  Compare EVEL after indy vote. 
"Most importantly, we need to hear more from women – especially young women – on Brexit and how it will really affect them." The only way to do this is call a #PeoplesVote 
Will the UK Gov survive the chaos of the first week of a No Deal Brexit after 29th March ? 
"Brexit will leave the UK 'unstable' for decades with violence on the streets and independence referendums in Scotland and Northern Ireland, EU intelligence secret report warns"  
Before the vote: “No downsides, only considerable upsides.”After the vote: “Officials warn of putrefying piles of rubbish after no-deal Brexit.”Brexit is literally rubbish. #RevokeA50 #StopBrexit #Remain 
Pet passports issued by the European Union won’t be recognized for U.K. pets anymore if there’s a no-deal Brexit.  
I like how obvious bribes are now just an accepted part of English politics and that a referendum that continuously has been proven to be corrupt and full of illegality is "the will of the people".How fan-fucking-tastic. 
Note to ALL - the Withdrawal Agreement Bill, ready for when/if the Withdrawal Agreement is approved - put simply, overturns Brexit and keeps us in the EU. This is the massive deceit of the traitor in Downing Street. The WA itself is not a deal and is a Remain - crafted by Robbins 
"Speaking to The Daily Telegraph last night, a senior Labour MP said: “They are banking on these cases being buried behind Brexit - out of sight and out of mind. But we can’t allow this disgusting tolerance of anti-Semitism go by any longer.”"  
So, under No Deal we are literally going to sink beneath our own crap. This insanity cannot go ahead. “Officials warn of putrefying piles of rubbish after no-deal Brexit”     
Funny how those who will accept any economic hit for Brexit squeal and moan about taxes for vital public services  
No sign of Project Fear in Fareham tonight. On a show of hands at my open meeting about Brexit for 100 local residents, large majority in favour of leaving the EU without a deal. Thanks to Holy Trinity Church for hosting us. #Nodealisbetterthanabaddeal 
Nothing dodgy about a Tory MP with leadership ambitions at a fundraiser for another political party (the DUP) being photographed grinning with Arron Banks, a man offered gold mines by Russia to fix Brexit ... nothing dodgy here at all.  
Brexit is a schism that is cutting across all established political parties of Britain and exposing the depth of their betrayal to the British people and the potential damage to the future of Britain.  
"Newly surfaced e-mails show that the former Trump adviser Steve Bannon, & Cambridge Analytica, the Big Data company that he worked for at the time, were simultaneously incubating both nationalist political movements [Brexit & the Trump campaign] in 2015." 
After Sir William Cash's hearings and the discovery of hidden implications in the Withdrawal Agreement Bill, it is very clear;The only safe Brexit for the 17.4M majority is WTO exit on March 29th next year.No argument and no delay, of any sort, for any reason. 
.@CarolineFlintMP is mistaken if she thinks #Brexit will restore faith in democracy. #VoteLeaveBrokeTheLaw: democracy was bought & paid for by the likes of Arron Banks with £ from who knows where (NOT UK). Brexit is damaging; voters will blame you.Better to upset 17m than 49mn. 
"Newly surfaced e-mails show that the former Trump adviser Steve Bannon, & Cambridge Analytica, the Big Data company that he worked for at the time, were simultaneously incubating both nationalist political movements [Brexit & the Trump campaign] in 2015."  
I SO can't wait until we're free from the shackles of EU rights and protections and are completely under the control of an unrestrained deranged Tory Gov who don't care that our stockpiled 'optimism' doesn't ACTUALLY feed our kids. It'll be fucking great. #JustBelieve #Brexit 
While the UK govt is divided & paralysed by Brexit, the EU is addressing key areas including child poverty, industrial redundancies and tax avoidance; report worth reading, by ⁦@SebDance⁩ 
@CarolineFlintMP and all other MPs supporting a FRAUDULENTLY procured vote might want to consider distancing themselves from brexit when there's a #brexitpublicinquiry. 
If you only read one thread about Brexit this week read this ( long but brilliantly done )  
The proper penalty for this electoral law-breaking would be lengthy prison sentences & annulment of the referendum. As it is we will have to wait for public anger to increase to a point which will force the implementation of retrospective justice. #Brexit 
A no deal Brexit is like jumping out of a plane without a parachute. A no deal Brexit with a transition period is like jumping out of a plane without a parachute, then cobbling one together *after* you're a strawberry jam splat. One's merely crazy. The other's crazy, and absurd. 
Thanks to the remainer who has explained "many" to me,it means a lot.But we still won the referendum! 
Any independence referendum should always take place within 60 minutes of a Welsh victory in the 6 Nations #SixNations #Annibyniaeth 
Nigel, asking for a friend : if a person embezzles EU funds to harm the EU, thereby also defrauding the UK taxpayer, how long can he expect to run around being silly before he is arrested ? 
One of Bannon's right wingers killed a Member of Parliament over Brexit. He attacked her in broad daylight. Screamed “BRITAIN FIRST” before stabbing her multiple times in the chest. Then he took a gun & shot her in the stomach & head. via @Phire2Fire 
Oh dearie me, Jolly Old England has a problem on its hands.Brexit was a racist, exclusionary act. England's economy did much better during robust trade, tourism+an open market with Europe. Now its going to be back to the miserable, grey, austere post WW2 economy. How unfortunate.  
I don't think it's fully appreciated just what an utterly catastrophic disaster Brexit has been so far, in terms of lost revenue, public spending, investment, damage to national reputation, trade, businesses and the virtual seizure of govt. All that *before* it has even happened. 
Usually I’d say something disparaging about these nonsensical Tory tweets. All that is now required is to say this is the Brexit Tories. They are decimating our economy and our community while we try to make Scotland a more equitable place. They will get nothing from this  
“After Brexit we are free to choose the path we follow.”Michael Gove 2016  
I've started growing my own veg at a secret location in case there's a shortage of lettuces after a no-deal Brexit.  
May’s Brexit Deal proposals to unions to boost workers’ rights rejected. Revealed labour market regulation would still be ‘woeful’. The average UK employer “can expect a visit from an enforcement agency once every 500 years”.  
Officials warn of putrefying piles of rubbish after no-deal Brexit  
Opinion: Dominic Raab's ignorance of the Good Friday Agreement insults the people of Northern IrelandHe's an embarrassment. As Brexit minister he came late to the idea of how important Dover/Calais was, but this is even more staggering  
German view - 'We need UK in the CU because it makes Europe’s GDP 20% larger and gives us more bargaining power with China, India, and the US.' German anger builds over dangerous handling of Brexit by EU ideologues' | via @telegraph 
"Britain's best chance of revenge for its lost Brexit is to REMAIN in the EU"  
Whitehall officials begin ‘serious work’ on UK staying in EU customs union as way to rescue Brexit dealIf she moves get red lines, surely common sense will prevail and people will ask, what is the point? Why not just stay and and seek reform.  
If a 2nd referendum came about somehow, and Labour took a position to campaign for Remain would you? 
One of the most shaming elements of Brexit and the hardcore Brexiters: the complete couldn’t-give-a-shittery about peace in Northern Ireland.  
No one believes you.We all know that you prefer to go along to get along rather that roll up your sleeves and spell out to your poor constituents the hardships Brexit will bring them...including Jeremy Corbyn’s version.Customs Unions still require much red tape. 
So   Labour ahead in most polls;Brexit ongoing+GE poss up soon.yet the PLP are to spend Mon night discussing ...anti semitism +holding a vote to condemn Corbyn over his handling of it..according to 2moros IndyLFI own the PLP.. This garbage cant go on 
When you illegally import milk after no deal Brexit  
Ever since I began tweeting about #brexit I’ve had so many abusive messages such as calling me a Hun. Well, I’m a Rangers fan who is British. Wtf does football have to do with anything?Please do grow up.  
”Equally, to delay for the purpose of vacuous discussions would be solely to thwart Brexit. It must not be for that purpose and should be opposed if negotiations are incomplete,” writes ⁦@Jacob_Rees_Mogg⁩ 
Saturday's Guardian: "Officials warn of putrefying piles of waste after Brexit"  #BBCPapers #tomorrowspaperstoday (via @BBCHelenaLee) 
Through our parliament's (in)actions, the message Britain is sending to the International community is succinctly summed up by Professor Dougan.... 
The referendum was a scam.Our country is being hijacked by fascists.Can you show me any evidence that I am wrong? Can you?  
Leave EU and Banks insurance firm fined £120,000 for data breaches.The referendum was tainted by lies and cheating. It was not free and fair. The result is unsound.It’s time for MPs to say: enough.#RevokeA50 #StopBrexit #Remain 
I know what sort of Brexit we need, no deal and out. 
Indeed, conveniently forgetting to mention the national mailshot LeaveEU did, paid for by Peter Hargreaves, that's in addition to the £8m that nobody knows the origin of, all spent by a campaign allowed to spend £700,000!!!! 
The irreplaceable Jeremy Hardy spent many years as a columnist for the magazine Red Pepper (@RedPeppermag ). From the end of New Labour to the beginning of Brexit negotiations Jeremy’s columns were caustic & full of compassion - here are some highlights:  
A short extension to the timetable to deliver #Brexit is not impossible, writes @Jacob_Rees_Mogg 
EU leaders do not want their empire to shrink, and they will do whatever it takes to prevent Brexit from happening:  
“There will be no downside to Brexit, only a considerable upside.”David Davis. 10 October 2016 
Brazen Bercow Insists He Will "Help the House Decide" Which Way Brexit Goes  
Great piece by the formidably well-informed @S_CAdkins in the Cornish Guardian, detailing the many ways in which #Brexit will make life more difficult and expensive for businesses and consumers.#StopBrexit #RevokeArticle50 #PeoplesVote #Cornwall 
The Washington Post has done what no one else has done. They’ve worked out what Brexit means...  
.@jordialapreso "let's massively demand #acquittal and denounce this #trial. Let us do it in the same way we got ready for #Catalonia's #1October #Referendum #FreeTothom" 
The #PrimeMinister politically profited from the result of referendum  irregularities and subsequently blocked their investigation. Is she criminally culpable? 
If you’re fed up of hearing about Brexit turn over from the news and watch @TheLastLeg now. Where I will probably be talking about Brexit, whatever they ask me 
Femi you have no idea why people voted for Brexit you fuckwit  
Brexit, hard, and WTO rules, start again! 
The OED defines a colony as a country or area under the full or partial political control of another country and occupied by settlers from that country. So what’s your problem? The truth? (That was a rhetorical question!) #Brexit #Hypocrisy 
hi @UKLabour, friendly reminder that this deal still wouldn't meet your 6 tests so you still shouldn't support it and also WE DON'T WANT BREXIT IT'S A HORRIBLE IDEA WHY WON'T YOU LISTEN IT'S BEEN 2 1/2 YEARS#DontBackTheBrexitDeal 
How can you allow a corrupt referendum drive us to disaster @theresa_may? How do you sleep at night knowing this happened and you’re still determined to drive us off a cliff to disaster? 
They’ll be so much anger if they extend Article 50.Everyone I’ve spoken to has had enough of Brexit (as have I) & just wants to get on with it. If we can’t get a good deal, then so be it. We’ll manage perfectly fine  
The Guardian front page, Saturday 2 February 2019: Officials warn of putrefying piles of waste after Brexit  
They have been facilitating the Tory Brexit (with some notable back Bench resistance) from the get go & has to shoulder its’s share of responsibilityWe see it and cannot unsee it.  I’m afraid LP will have to accept that we will not forget.  No forgive. 
Nice illustration of how we should be wary of voices claiming to speak for “the fishing industry”. Weathering the storm is easy if you’ve got healthy bank balance & have the resources at your disposal. But if fisheries policy after Brexit is going to work, it’s gotta work for all  
"You come to my country and knock my fucking pub down... #Brexit all the way." #BrexitExplained pic.twitter.com/fUEmaMBRqX 
Like @judi_sutherland, I think everyone must be stockpiling for a no-deal Brexit. The Harrods Food Hall has totally run out of quail eggs.   
Can someone tell me what has been achieved from the Brexit process so far??? 
You admit  @jonlansman  that  “an election looks unlikely anytime soon”.  In that case why is Jeremy Corbyn not pressing for a Public Vote now on Brexit in accordance with 2018 Party Conference decision ?  
Peter Brookes on Theresa May's Brexit  troubles #TheresaMay #Tories #Brexit #BrexitShambles - political cartoon gallery in London  
No, the law that passed the referendum required a leaflet be sent explaining the government’s position. That’s complying with the law.Illegally sharing data and overspending to micro target floating voters right before the vote is cheating. That’s what Leave did. 
Let’s not bother with a second Brexit referendum. Let’s just go with the results of this poll.  
The biggest cheerleaders for Brexit are ex public school types. Incuded in their number are Seumas Milne and Jeremy Corbyn. The reason? They've never encountered a day of real struggle in their lives, but are arrogant enought to think they know the fix for everyone who has. 
A referendum won by cheating, yes - something May, and her little helper Jeremy Corbyn, have refused to acknowledge or even mention. Such is the state of British politics and the calibre of the people who lead it. (I use the word 'lead' loosely)  
I think Remainers have been so focused on the Brexit process that they're missing what's really going on out there. And they're still making mistakes. /1 
The data law watchdog has issued fines totalling £120,000 to two organisations involved in the Brexit Leave campaign  
EU Member States' agreed position on Brexit and aviation safety licences: Must still be negotiated with the European Parliament 
It’s very easy to Tweet about the financial advantages of Remaining and the financial risks of Brexit - But  it’s not the main reason I back Remain. The EU is the most successful peace project in the modern world. A continent known for strife is now at peace. 
If anything #brexit shows us the failings of the systems supposedly in place to protect democracy.  The pressure of #brexit has revealed the truth. After all these years, the country has been played by traitors in our midst... and their foreign collaborators. The irony! #FBPE 
New post on my Brexit Blog. The current impasse is the result of Brexiter falsehoods colliding with reality. The EU are finally doing what the UK polity and media have mainly failed to do - stand up to Brexiter misinformation, distortion and lies:  
I voted remain but if we got another referendum I will vote out. It's democracy, you can't keep calling referendums until you get the result you want. 
That is NOT #Brexit Stop your self serving underhanded scheming and  do what the voters have told you to do! #WTOBrexit.Whitehall officials begin ‘serious work’ on UK staying in EU customs union as way to rescue Brexit deal  
My stop Brexit checklist is going well:Move public opinion towards a majority for Remain. Show illegitimacy of the referendum. Show that Brexit isn’t viable. Show that concerns labelled as, “Project Fear” were actually reasonable predictions. Stop Brexit -  
Senior Conservatives expected to tell No.10 that “Another referendum, taking ‘no-deal’ off the table, or not leaving at all would betray the referendum, damage democracy and our party for a generation” in a motion brought by @WorldofDinah#StandUp4Brexit 
It's a joke, of course, but for plenty of businesses in UK it's an important fact, with big implications for jobs, taxes and public services post-Brexit.  
It's reassuring how terrible Labour's leadership is. Because every advantage—Ed Miliband's invite-a-Trot party reorganisation, Theresa May's Mr-Bean-esque Cabinet and campaigning, Brexit—has rolled out a big red carpet to them. AND STILL THEY'VE BLOWN IT. 
Wrong! Over sixties will be hard hit when pensions get frozen after Brexit.Brexit is about taking away rights and discarding the needy. Pensioners will be first to feel it.  When NHS goes haywire as well they will hate themselves for bringing this about.  Kick themselves  .  
The most likely outcome for Brexit is now a permanent Customs Union, experts say  Remain PM May and all remain MP's on all sides of the Commons are now so far removed from the voting public they might as well sit in the undemocratic EU Parliament. 
Extending A50 by 2 years - deferring Brexit by two full years -is a false and humiliating choice when we can - *sharp intake of breath* - deliver on what people voted FOR and just leave on March 29th #LetsGoWTO  
The travel of the government elected by the #Catalans to the jails of Madrid, where they will be tried like a criminals to make a #referendum: with a civil guard van, locked in tiny individual cells, as if they were animals! #ThisIsTheRealSpain #GiveYourselfARibbon #6Nations 
James O'Brien was banging on about no bananas after #Brexit. I remember those dark days before Maastricht sans bananas, how grateful we were for the imports from the great German plantations. 
Tip for journalists interviewing Brexiters:When you point out an evidence-based effect of Brexit and they declare “Project Fear!”, please respond:“No, you’re not allowed to say ‘Project Fear’. You have to say WHY what I have just said is untrue.” 
BBC bias is still skewing the Brexit debate - The Telegraph  
The Spanish Supreme Court pretends to codemn members of the previous Catalan government for rebelleion and  sedition for holding a referendum and voting on independence in parliament, BUT it refuses the former Catalan president to appear as a witness. Why?  
Thank you @joannaccherry and others for putting forward your thoughts & concerns about Brexit, as well as answering questions from the audience - hopefully there will be a slightly warmer venue next time!  
Labour are a load of pathetic ostriches, heads in the sand, refusing to actually address our national crisis. We can’t ‘get beyond’ Brexit. We have to stop #Brexit then sort the country out. Labour are useless  
Parliament needs to be talking about this.  How can anybody keep respecting the result of a referendum where one of the sides has been proven to break the law.  All 3 leave campaigns broke the law. The result cannot be safe and MPs across the house need to address this. 
RT if you disagree with the EU referring to Gibraltar as a British colony. #Brexit #BritishOverseasTerritory  
I see Macron's finest are ripping apart the racist, leave voting Welsh. This is just another consequence of Brexit. 
Jeraemy of the House Corbyn, First of His Name, The Unburnt, King of the Andals, the Rhoynar and the First Men, King of Meereen, Khaleesi of the Great Grass Sea, Protector of the Realm, Lord Regent of the Seven Kingdoms, Breaker of Chains, Father of Dragons and Enabler of Brexit  
If you're bored of Brexit, your only option is to vote to stop it, so we can focus on the things we ALL agree we need. 
Not only do I hate what brexit will do to the transport industry - my mrs  won’t speak on the train after that poor Spanish women was punched in the face a few months back( same train she gets)- I also have a personal vendetta against brexit ( is that the right word to use )? 
the same is true for Scotland and Northern Ireland, this is a very English brexit but we're dragged over the cliff as well 
Germany was willing to take a massive economic hit for its national aspiration (unity). Yet no-one in Ireland understands why many Britons are prepared to do the same for #Brexit. 
The head of Airbus spoke for many other firms when he recently branded the government's handling of Brexit "a disgrace"  
The Brexit result is indeed invalid. This is just one of nine diff investigations into the leave campaign. Do police literally have to find Putin and Nige together in a bath of money before they start taking this seriously?? #BoteLeaveBrokeTheLaw #StopBrexit #LeaveLied 
It's worth revisiting the performance of the chuckle brothers of LeaveEU at the House of Commons last year, they appear to have a sense of humour failure once lawyer @IanCLucas starts asking them questions they don't want to answer...1/4 
Brexit or Remain dear Twitter?Remain always has been our best option, and it remains our best option.If you agree then let’s begin the weekend with some optimism and positivity.Please retweet your view, thank you.Our best option is to 
If you’re wondering how Britain’s handling of Brexit looks from European capitals, @IsabelHardman and I will be discussing that on the programme tomorrow. Hint: it’s not v flattering! 
Organising a grassroots anti-Brexit campaign event? We want to know about it  
A big moment in time for @Keir_Starmer He's too modest to believe it but he holds the future of our country in his hands. The only person who can now stop Tory Brexit is sidelined by the Brexit supporting Leaders office.Flight or fight? Let's hope you make the right decision.  
I was in Austria last weekend. When I told people I met I was British, they looked at me pityingly. I felt embarrassed, ashamed even. The whole world thinks we’ve taken leave of our senses. That’s because we have. Brexit is utterly bonkers. Read this. 
Actually recent polling only shows that 18% of remainers fundamentally disagree with Brexit being completed.What would split society is if 17.4 million people have their vote ignored. 
Give me strength...this guy has an ego the size of a bus..Germany are probably saying. "Who is he, does anyone know "Gary Lineker sends GROVELLING letter APOLOGISING to Germany for Brexit!  via @UnityNewsNet 
Leaked no deal documents: Officials warn of ‘putrefying’ rubbish after no-deal Brexit . Department of environment seeks volunteers  
Read the latest article from Sinn Féin National Chairperson @DeclanKearneySF reflecting on last weekend's landmark 'Beyond Brexit' conference in Belfast and calls on unionists and others to become involved in the discussion on shaping a new Ireland. 
‘Once the government has conceded the need to delay, someone will have to go further and acknowledge the damage of implementing Brexit altogether. After three years of lies, manipulation and doublespeak, which senior minister will finally break the spell and tell the truth?’  
Well worth a listen again, as Jacob REES-MOGG "owns" James O'BRIEN on BREXIT - 
How many elderly people don't know they have to either apply for #SettledStatus or ILR via the #Windrush scheme?If they don't they will be deemed illegal after Brexit deadline (30-6-2021, or 31-12-2020 in case of no-deal) #UnSettledStatus 
"...money will be withheld unless home evictions & auctions are accelerated..."This is what the EU brings to a nation. We want no part of this robbery.#Brexit in 56 days.  
Best Brexit cartoon of the week... but the laughter is bitter. pic.twitter.com/EMWWcuWvmF 
Brexit has gone quiet. I haven’t forgotten though. I won’t Fuckin forget. You can’t fool me. 
Could have told you this the day David Davis sat in front of a select committee and said there were no impact assessments.  The Tories want a No Deal Brexit and will use it as Shock Doctrine. And you and your journo pals have facilitated it by constantly trashing Labour. 
‘EU nations will choose language & legislation suiting their own interests, & UK will not be in the room able to stop them.’That’s why having no voice, no vote & no veto while having to obey EU rules - the reality in any version of #Brexit - is such poor substitute for #Remain 
“There’s a serious amount of panic going on”.Officials warn of ‘putrefying’ rubbish after no-deal Brexit  
As Remainers have caused all the Brexit trouble they should be taxed an extra 10%, (30% in the case of Lineker), until all the money they have lost us has been repaid to the Leavers who have lost out. 
Yet again, non-DUP voices in Northern Ireland Seek a hearing in London - Invest NI makes unprecedented call on North’s politicians to act on Brexit #brexit via @IrishTimes 
How come the advisory nature of the referendum where 37% of the population voted to leave is treated as written in stone, when this vote amongst MPs, representing 100% of the electorate, to take No Deal off the table isn't?   
May’s bribe won’t stop Brexit inflicting more pain on our old mining towns | Jonathan Freedland  
Article 50 states:1.   Any Member State may decide to withdraw from the Union in accordance with its own constitutional requirements.A referendum distorted by electoral crime may be legal, but it is clearly not in accordance with the UK's constitutional requirements.#Brexit  
200 ‘Highly Professional People’ Ready to Stand for Farage’s New Brexit Party  
Good point @DavidLammy we get fed up here @NE4EU of the North getting tarred with this brexit brush.  Newcastle, Leeds, York, Liverpool, Manchester all voted REMAIN (and many others are #RemainerNow). Also agree inner city in the capital desperately needs more cash. 
To make unequivocally clear: this verdict represents yet another way the Leave campaign acted in an unlawful, undemocratic manner during the 2016 Referendum. THIS is the foundation on which Theresa May is carrying out the democratic will of the people.  
Piloting the Sammy Wilson Brexit plan #LetThemEatChips 
Pleasure to debate @graceblakeley on Channel 4. Two young, left-wing women discussing Brexit on TV is not something I remember seeing in 2016. 
Ben Jennings on Theresa May's Brexit  troubles #TheresaMay #ReesMogg #Tories #Brexit #BrexitShambles - political cartoon gallery in London  
I don't know about anyone else but I am sick of this foreigners interference in a democratic nations affairs!EU's Verhofstadt calls for 'cross-party' coalition to STOP no-deal Brexit  
A deserved evisceration of Chris Grayling, who tried to blame his lack of popularity on his Brexit stance: "Some people want to have a go because I'm pro-Brexit"That's like an axe murderer saying "people don't warm to me because of my smelly feet."  
Here is #remainernow Tim on the @Conservatives as a result of brexit....Many natural Tory voters feel exactly the same..Time for a #finalsay and #righttovote@conservative4pv 
He should be sacked or banned from any Brexit votes!  
The left needs to turn resolutely to Europe & pluralise sites of conflict... There is no left-wing case for Brexit: 21st century socialism requires transnational organization | British Politics and Policy at LSE  
Great to welcome @Andrew_Adonis to @HFDCathedral to talk about the future of our broken country, yes we are broken, whichever way you voted, whichever way you wish the U.K. to proceed, a great deal of reconciliation is going to be necessary #brexit  
Labour MP Ronnie Campbell tells @MichaelLCrick: "If I know Jeremy Corbyn, I think he voted to leave." The Labour leader has said he voted remain in the EU referendum. 
In this week's newsletter:  Second referendum  Brussels' backstop brain twister Invincible ERG to kill Customs Union Support us at  
Tony Blair took the UK into a needless war in Iraq!! The manner in which he is attempting unashamedly to thwart Brexit is likely to cause riots on our streets of unprecedented consequence, the man is a self serving parasite and is recognised as such by most people in our Country!  
Shops are running empty, motorways are at a standstill with only a few inches of snow. Wait until 12ft of Brexit hits the UK. 
Fuck Brexit. 
Schoolyard revenge-seeking & hair-pulling by the EU over #Gibraltar status.1) They don't have a say, UK & Gibraltar only do.2) This is a sign they are on the back foot, lashing out like children scorned.3) 56 days to #Brexit, our day is close. Smug they will NOT be soon.  
Brexit threatens Ireland's medicine supply, food supply, trade and jobs, not to mention re-igniting violence along the border, and she wonders why it's unpopular in Ireland. Serious brains at work here....  
Here's what I don't get. Brexit in any form will hurt the economy. And everyone knows, when you hurt the economy, who are the first people to suffer? All those people Corbyn has vowed to care for. And yet..he wants to 'ensure' Brexit happens. And thus see them get a kicking 
Of course Eilis O'Hanlon doesn't mention the toxic hibernophobia now prevalent in much of the British media & political establishment, which seeks to blame Ireland for standing up for itself, and pins the failure of brexit on Leo Varadkar. Dishonest, but what we've come to expect  
I’m in a club in Paris and 500+ Parisians have just finished going mental to Trash Boat and are now singing along to Bring Me The Horizon, many of them wearing Architects and Bury Tomorrow t-shirts, while they wait for While She Sleeps. We’re doing okay lad. #Brexit 
European democratic parties intend destroying EU from within using EU elections in May.Plans have been shelved to hold their own Brexit-style referendums in favour of wreaking havoc within Brussels to destroy EU from within. #WellDeserved#Brexit #EU 
The nail in Labour's coffin will be their last minute collusion with the Tories to achieve Brexit because they are scared of losing the votes of deluded fools. 
Nigel Farage's new Brexit party has '£1m of funds and 200 candidates on standby'  WE need a party that respects our democratic vote which very clearly Labour and Conservatives no longer do. 
Perhaps you could bring this to the attention of the @UKLabour front bench so they can start questioning the legitamacy of the referendum and opposing it instead of aiding the Govt#StopBrexit#RevokeArticle50 
At 2030hrs, my full interview on @SkyNews re #Gibraltar, #Spain and the #EU, #Brexit etc.  
I think it's poor. Labour aren't responsible for Brexit (tho did vote for A50), but in a hung parliament they could have played a central role. At the v least could have a clear policy, not the 'strong single market relationship' nonsense that's no better than have cake & eat it.  
Ireland Rugby persevered throughout the Troubles. Toxic commentary from outside rugby during Brexit won't prevent that. You are completely out of touch with modern Ireland. 
Whether the UK *should* Brexit is the subject of continued detailed evidence and argument. That the UK *deserves* Brexit is becoming more certain every day. 
And Farage shouts “Rubbish”.  The thug in a velvet collared coat.  Mr Brexit. Taking the EU’s money while working to destroy it. Any wonder GB is full of Gammons who see this as WW2 and Biggles Flies Again?  
'I always supported Ireland in rugby but less so now due to the anti-British mood over Brexit'  
Wrong. The referendum was offered because of growing public pressure. UKIP, at the time a single-issue Eurosceptic party, suddenly became the biggest in MEP elections. Cameron won a majority on the promise of a referendum, plus 4m votes for UKIP. People just don't want a 2nd one.  
George Eustice, asked about how the UK will survive the economic shock of #Brexit, just said that he'd be prepared to accept a 25% devaluation. And claims that this would have minimal effect on food prices. Just unbelievable levels of delusion. #Cornwall 
A government that exploits a loophole that means that electoral crime cannot result in the voiding of an advisory referendum must be regarded as violating the intentions our constitution and as colluding in and profiting from crime. They must be jailed. #PeoplesVote #Brexit 
What are all these anti Brexit agitators in the media going to do in six weeks time?  
If Britain leaves the EU without an agreement, we have Gina Miller and her court case to thank. She hoped MPs would block Brexit. Instead, they are blocking Theresa May’s dreadful deal. Never underestimate the law of unintended consequences! 
The EU cannot do anything about the Irish backstop. It can, however, give Britain more time to sort out the Brexit mess  
The inestimably brilliant @chrisgreybrexit yet again nailing the Brexit fundamentals.  
Trump/Brexit did not solve the problems of the people who voted for them to protest against their situation -nor will they: Things will get worse.Nevertheless, Trump/Brexit gave their voters something: A whole lot of people to hate and blame for said problems.A common enemy. 
You pledged to reject no-deal then voted against an amendment to prevent itYou pledged to fight for your constituents then voted against MPs having any sayYou pledged the 6 Labour tests then abstained on a Tory BrexitYou voted against Party PolicyYour pledges mean nothing  
Jacob Rees-Mogg on working with Remainers on a Brexit deal compromise: “I’ve come to the conclusion that what I most want is to leave the European Union” @Jacob_Rees_Mogg | #Malthouse 
Brexit scaremongering is backfiring in the country. (Maggie Pagano for Reaction @reactionlife) 
Leave have lost the plot. The ex  Head of the WTO says it would be like getting relegated to the 4th division. Time to take back contol and bin Brexit.  
Brexit: 'asking the peasants to vote the correct way this time, is regarded by all but dedicated Remainers as a dud idea...The voters are tired and want the politicians, one way or another, to get on with leaving the EU.'exactly right @iainmartin1 
Whitehall officials begin 'serious work' on UK staying in EU customs union as way to rescue Brexit deal  
So why are we trashing our economy for a narrowly won, fraudulent referendum? 
Doesn't Corbyn realise that if / when he betrays us by facilitating May & Farage's Brexit, that'll be him & @UKLabour finished?The hardened core of 300,000 members may always stick with him, but millions won't.Surely, Labour realises this, or are they suicidal? @Femi_Sorry 
Sorry for political tweet. I won't do it again. I've had enough of Labour and Conservatives so I just joined the Liberal Democrats (at least they have a consistent anti-Brexit policy) - join me here:  via @LibDems 
When (if) Brexit happens New World quality wines will flood our markets at more competitive prices that continental products.Food too will be cheaper, New Zealand lamb by up to 50%The protectionist EU is coming to the twilight of its being.  
@SiannamacDonald & her Belgian husband are in an impossible position & will have to leave the UK in case of a #NoDealBrexit. Sianna is also concerned about other EU citizens in similar circumstances who might not be aware that come No-Deal-Brexit their EU27 benefits will cease.  
Well said @WorldofDinah. We're not going to tolerate a deliberate attempt to halt or pause Brexit.  
If Brexit happens on the plus side we could have a UK version of 90 Day Fiance with Sharons trying to marry a Carlos from Tenerife to secure passports and Spanish mothers calling them cultureless putas 
We could also do a film about #Brexit & women:-1 in 2 men back Brexit, but 2 in 3 women oppose it-1.6mn 'Brexit' divorces so far-90% of the voices in the debate are male-Research shows women will be much harder hit by #Brexit than men-Brilliant women have emerged as leaders  
Brexit is like me being asked to design a time machine.I have no real technical knowledge to be able to do so.And after 2 and a half years & £billions spent on development, those who asked me for my design tell me it is impossible to build it. #StopBrexit 
Dozens of MPs have refused to give up their holidays even though e February recess has been cancelled because of potential delay to Brexit. should they be ordered to cancel their trips? join me @lbc from 7 
Presenting Week in Westminster on Radio 4 at 11am tomorrow. Of course we talk a lot and in-depth about Brexit and what happens next, but we also look at a very serious problem threatening democracy: the intimidation and harassment of MPs. 
With no single option holding enough parliamentary support, Labour backing a People’s Vote would change the dynamic completely and break the stalemate.@OwenJones84 Labour having “no say on the substance of Brexit at all” is completely by choice. 
As our Head of State if it meant protecting the Democratic will of the British people I wish the Queen would step in and protect Brexit by suspending Parliament, The fact is though I can't see this happening.  
Brexit may see us drowning under millions of tons of waste. If you're wondering how in the world that's possible, a "no deal" scenario would see export licenses invalidated without anything to replace them, since there's obviously no transition period. 
Gardaí believe Omeath ammunition discovery may be linked to dissident Republican activity and have said it is “significant” in terms of Brexit |  
This doesn't sound like Jeremy Corbyn's Jobs First Brexit!BBC News - Brexit: Third of UK businesses considering move abroad - survey  
John. 54. Father of 4. Grandfather of 7. West Ham united till I die. Brexit means brexit. Not racist. Just don’t like em.  
Brexit will turn the country to sh*t, literally. 
Also apparently FBPE are one large amorphous hivemind bent on dethroning Corbyn & using Brexit as a smokescreen for our nefarious Soros funded aims 
Dear David - think you’ll find you’re wrong.....again...the so called breach occurred AFTER the referendum  and we will be appealing and will win - history will be kind on us, unlike you and your fascism and hatred of the U.K. its history and democracy. @DavidLammy 
Hundreds of thousands of us carry our Party membership cards with us wherever we go. They are our deeply held beliefs.For us, any Labour MP who votes for a Tory Brexit disrespects the aims and values of the Labour Party and must have the whip removed.They are Labour no more.  
These mushrooms are only £1 HARD BREXIT NOW 
Please retweet this. on monday parliament will be voting on the motion to ensure Brexit with WTO must be allowed, currently Parliament are trying to stop it in order to make it more difficult to leave tell your MPs what you think of that, dont let the remoaners ignore your vote 
Yet again @fiannafailparty fail to hold @FineGael to account. The world's most expensive hospital costing at least €2bn and they hide behind Brexit.  
Gibraltar row shows danger of reopening Brexit withdrawal agreement  
Met with German Justice Minister @katarinabarley at the border along with @Labour. Katarina will be leading the German Social Democrats in European Parliament from May & was visiting to get a personal understanding of the impact of Brexit here. Extremely strong grasp of the issue  
May's #Brexit Trilemma  
Now we can't even get through Brexit by necking cheap booze  
This Week In GammonMonday: "We won the war! Surviving #Brexit will be easy!"Friday: "ARRRRGGGGHHHHH! THERE'S BEEN A LIGHT DUSTING OF SNOW! WE'RE ALL GOING TO DIE!" 
How Brexit is writing the last chapter of the miners' strike - and why Labour MPs seeking to placate leave voters might be making a big mistake. My column  
A corrupt PM calls a referendum to see off a corrupt UKIP/Farage threat, so corrupt leavers corrupt the election process to get their desired corrupt result. It’s the will of the people. #corruption. 
Sir Bill Cash MP Forces the PM to Reveal that ‘The Deal’ WOULD OVERTURN THE REFERENDUM RESULT AND STOP BREXIT.PLEASE WATCH, PLEASE RETWEET, PLEASE BOMBARD YOUR MPs WITH THIS! 
Irish PM Varadkar to meet Tusk, Juncker on Brexit  
Brexit means ... putrefying rubbish and overflowing manure. Yet another thing that was left off the side of the bus   
Want a #FinalSay on #Brexit? The next vote is on Feb 14th. On the 9th of Feb visit your constituency office at 10am & hand deliver a Valentine's Day Card to your MP. Take the kids, make macaroni cards, have a street party - show "we love our neighbours" #EU #UK #PeoplesVote 
If u have-#FBPE/the EU flag in your bio &-been posting photos of the food u r stockpiling 'because of Brexit'Then u r no better than an uneducated, medieval peasant. The rest of us will hold u personally responsible if any harm comes to anyone as a result of your stupidity. 
Brexit has, I think, caused more people in the electorate to scrutinise and question what our MPs are doing in Westminster with legislation. It's a good thing. The UK needs to #StandFirm. Don't forget to #FlyTheFlag  at your house or place of work, in support. 
This weekend's @theipaper cartoon#Snowmageddon #snowday #Brexit  
Officials warn of ‘putrefying’ rubbish after no-deal Brexit  
Fine Gael are giving jobs to everyone at the Irish Times and Independent who appliesThis is the equivalent of Hillary Clinton giving everyone at CNN a jobThis is wrong, corrupt and it should be illegal. Especially after how they all behaved during the referendum. 
We are getting ready for the Leavers of Leeds launch #Brexit chat and more!  
Of course we must extend Article 50. But that’s just the start. Which senior minister will be first to admit damage inflicted by any Brexit? After 3 yrs of lies, manipulation and doublespeak, who will finally break the spell and tell the truth?My latest  
"Gary Lineker sends GROVELLING letter APOLOGISING to Germany for Brexit!"Imagine being a spineless crisp eating weasel like Gary Lineker  
Hundreds urge the EU to intervene in the Catalan conflict. They say jailed leaders won’t get a fair trial in Spain. Politicians and activists face up to 30 years in jail for organizing an independence referendum  
If Brexit happens, both Tories and Labour deserve to split. Theyve completely ignored and alienated millions and millions of people in this country just to press on with a doomed Brexit project tainted in corruption and criminality.  
If he hates Brexit so much just give up all his massively paid jobs here and move to mainland Europe . 
EXCL Dominic Raab claims Theresa May's deputy will stop UK striking good Brexit deal  via @PoliticsHomeLooking as if #May never learns .. she's trying to stitch us up once again ! She will fail ! 
PM criticised for drafting in Remain-supporting minister David Lidington for Brexit renegotiation  
Joe, we wouldn't be targets if the #Brexit fanatics didn't think we are about to stop their crimes. 
Here’s an idea, can you cut out the time you spend on getting those PR shots and poking your nose into Brexit? You might have a chance to get some actual mayoral work done then. 
Voting to reject our current relationship with the other EU countries, only to be left with one that both remain and leave voters can see is worse, but sticking to the idea that the country voted for it...#Brexit 
This shreds the “Malthouse Compromise”which Rees Mogg was praising last night.  Merely more ill informed British exceptionalism trying to cloak a very hard #Brexit ...Why claims about a ‘WTO Article 24’ interim agreement are a red herring – UK Trade Forum  
“The spat over No Deal reveals a key front in the Brexit battle – that between a lily-livered establishment and an emboldened people.”Brendan O’Neill on the new divide within western politics: the political elites & the people.  
Been away for 6 weeks. Met dozens of people from all walks of life and all countries of the UK. So far just 2 have said they voted #Leave and of them, just 1 would still do so, ironically a resident. All the rest think #Brexit is madness. #Brexit is  the will of which people? 
If it isn't a colony what is it? It's a  colony. Chickens coming home to roost. #Brexit  
I will again be tabling an Amendment to #RevokeArticle50  at the next Commons Brexit Votes - the last time the amendment did not have enough support but as we look down barrel of No Deal that might change. 
Scotland really does need a referendum now.Here’s the question:“Should Scotland bulldoze Holyrood & go back to a world where the majority are not hostage to thick, bigotted zealots campaigning for Indy 24/7?”Gimme a saltire with a Yes on it. 
Brexit   
Labour right-winger John Mann admits he could accept Theresa May’s cynical Brexit ‘bribe’  
BREXIT LATEST: Poland demands EU give May deal that WILL be supported in Commons | Politics | News |  
None of the possible Brexit outcomes - whether it’s May’s deal, Norway, Canada, no deal, or no Brexit - is politically sustainable unless that option is ratified by the voters. Read my article in @Independent: 
Another #ProjectFear story drops away.The British are hugely important to the European tourism industry. We will still travel, work, laugh, love and make friends all over the #EU post #Brexit.Don’t listen to those who tell you otherwise.  
Okay here's a mind map of the Brexit endgame, with an emphasis on the challenges for Labour... 1/ If the EU ditches Ireland over backstop we get May's WA and a hard Brexit. Game over. But...  
#Brexit .. What a great opportunity the 2 year Article 50 time frame could have been .. with positive #Leadership from the #PoliticalClasses & the #Business Community working together  the excitement would have been palpable .. instead they have created division & strife 
Can @theresa_may get off the train to a no-deal Brexit?  
Nurses, Ambulance, Fire Fighters, Armed Forces, all manner of Public Servants. All operate unselflishly.The MPs hols have been cancelled next week, yet many of them are refusing to give up their skiing holidays. Surely, in times of this Brexit crisis, they should serve, not ski. 
Can I suggest a slight edit, "This means the EU referendum was won by [even more] cheating [than previously disclosed with yet more cheating still to be investigated]". 
MPs have gone home for the weekend.No Brexit business is due in the Commons next week.Does this really feel like a country about to take its most momentous step in 70 years?Or is this sleepwalking? 
Brexiteers may soon begin to back Mrs May's deal. If no deal becomes impossible, the only real alternative will be no Brexit at all  
Westminster, not Brussels, is responsible for these vast regional imbalances. Yes, we need to redistribute across the country, but impoverishing these regions through Brexit does the opposite. Labour MPs should show courage and say all this - not allow May to divide and rule. 
This is a slap in the face to Labour's inner city voters. Your argument relies on the false idea that all leave voters were from the industrial north. Actually most Brexit voters were from the Tory south: every part of the South except London voted Leave.  
This is the trouble with the out of touch Westminster bubble, they think it is ALL about the MPs. People voted for Brexit and want it delivered. If any party backs this they are toast..  
BREAKING MAY BREXIT: We will exit the EU  on March 29.  I'll  take ownership of shutting down the EU. I'll will then build a wall around England a tall wall, in years be named " the May Wall". It will be paid for by France ,Germany and 25 other EU countries who stood in my way 
There is no Parliamentary majority for 2nd referendum.Even if Labour backed it, up to 50 Labour MPs would oppose alongside shadow cabinet resignations.This, alongside the fact it would take six months to hold a 2nd referendum (Parliament rejected Article 50 extension).  
A simple message from Labour member @tessmillsy to @jeremycorbyn: please back a #PeoplesVoteIt's time for the party to recognise the views of its members and call for a public vote on Brexit.  
Searing, truthful stuff from @harikunzru on Brexit in @nybooks 
Carole....................Cadwally FFS how can a national referendum where you ask the electorate to vote be a bloody coup If remain had won by the same margin you'd have said the referendum was a thing of symmetrical beauty and you bloody know it.  
I very rarely call out politicians, but this... Frank is my MP. Elected on a Labour ticket. Birkenhead doesn’t need a Brexit bribe. It needs an MP who’ll hold this govt to account for Brexit deal that will make us all poorer & genuine long-term investment not a few bob for a vote  
AND... that brings this very special musical brexit week to the end! I hope you enjoyed it. Previous parts:Rees-Mogg 'Be Prepared': Cooper/Boles 'Can You feel the love': And Gove singling 'Let it Go': 
Should Labour MP's accept bribes from @theresa_may in exchange for their votes on her brexit deal? 
EU Confirms Visa-Free Travel For Brits Accross Europe After Brexit — Deal or no Deal  
In the face of the unremitting vileness of Brexit and the clear evidence that is about to succeed in imposing itself on a majority who don't want it, it's hard to think of a worse time for yet more Remainer hand-wringing about how we just weren't nice enough ...  
Brexit is doing a little good. It is bringing to prominence genuinely brave and honest politicians, not least among them is @annaturley, who deserves far more praise than she receives 
There is NO will to pursue or punish the crimes of Leave EU because everyone in a position to make this happen wants Brexit to go ahead unhindered (and this includes Corbyn’s Labour).I’ll say it again: tolerating corruption because you stand to benefit from it IS CORRUPTION.  
This means EU referendum was won by cheating.  
And we're the ones behaving badly? #Gibraltar #Brexit 
BREXIT DELAYED IS BREXIT DENIED. NO DEALS. NO DELAYS. WTO. DEMOCRACY PREVAILS.  
German anger builds over dangerous handling of Brexit by EU ideologues, writes Ambrose Evans-Pritchard 
Hey all. Post Brexit, how do we turn our attention to the BBC? A state broadcaster funded by a mandatory tax is not what we should expect in a democracy. At the very least a petition that says the next charter must name an end date for the license fee funding model. Thoughts? 
Dangerous, irresponsible and reckless reporting. This 'paper' which has been roundly ridiculed and thoroughly debunked, was once pushed as the 'magical' solution by the infamous right wing lobbyists The Legatum Institute. That fact alone should tell you all you need to know. 
Petition: Stop squandering taxpayers' money on a 'No Deal Brexit': rule it out  
Hereford Cathedral, where I’m speaking on Brexit at 7.30. The bishop, Richard Frith, will be there - who I have just discovered is ⁦@JamesFrith⁩’s dad! Small world 
OV and I are discussing Brexit   She sez, with scalpel like clarity, "The Cameron lad. What ailed him that he called the referendum?" Then, "Do you think he sleeps at night?"However, I'd say he sleeps like a baby... 
An extract of my interview with @BBCNews @BBCPolitics on the Spanish government's attempts to use the EU to advance it's expansionist territorial ambitions over our homeland. #Gibraltar #Brexit  
Philip Hammond repeats what is quickly appearing to be the Govt's party line - short delay to Brexit to sort "little things out" will be acceptable.Risks infuriating grassroots 
Brexit is..."trying to unlock a door with a slice of bread." - @IanDunt 
Anna Turley MP: "If Brexit is about Britain taking back control and a return of our great democracy and sovereignty, then I’m afraid this is not what British democracy should look like. It’s squalid and grubby and demeans our politics." 
NICOLA Sturgeon has been urged to ditch a second independence referendum after new figures showed 3 fifths of Scottish exports are to the rest of the UK.THEN, UK exports our Scottish exports - to the rest of the world & includes this in THEIR export figures! #cutoutthemiddleman 
Overruling the clerks to force an anti-Brexit amendment through for political reasons against the rules is a strange way of standing up for one of our most important institutions, Brazen Bercow has to go.  
What happens to society if we go ahead with a Brexit that was won by lies, deceit and fraud where the final outcome does not even resemble the  Brexit that was presented to voters???This is the primary reason for the “breakdown of trust in politics”. 
From today's @FT #Brexit  
Absolute pleasure to speak with @GaryGibbonBlog and @CarolineFlintMP about the recent Brexit developments. Watch the full recording here.  
Arron Banks founded Leave Eu & owns Eldon Insurance. Between them they unlawfully sent out over 1.3m unsolicited political marketing messages.Question is, did this have undue influence on a very close-run referendum and should there be an inquiry into the soundess of the result? 
How does Bercow respond to criticism? He gives an interview to CNN unapologetically defending his right to support anti-Brexit "dissidents" and "help the House decide" which way Brexit goes - before going on a rant about "intimidation". Shameless.  
Brexit crisis, only because the remainers have made it so. 
Theresa May’s denial is staggering: Brexit absolutely must be delayed | Jonathan Lis  
Well worth a read. One lesson I’ve drawn from this Brexit experience is that tone really matters - on Twitter, the media and in person.  
Brexit = making us laughing stock  
But remember, there’s absolutely no reason to question the legality of the referendum and Theresa May is right not to investigate.  
An imaginative and constructive proposal from @WhelanKarl to solve the backstop issue: "a future referendum within Northern Ireland asking whether its citizens wanted to remain within the EU’s customs union and single market." 
There is only one Brexit, Robert. OUT.  
This alone should be enough to postpone Brexit Day and Article 50 - for a proper enquiry into what really happened and just how corrupt either of the Leave campaigns actually was - just how far democracy may have been undermined.  
UK and Faroe Islands sign trade continuity agreement  There's no such thing as a WTO only #Brexit. Expect more of these rollover agreements to be announced. 
Saturday's @Underground_RT : The great Belgian physicist & philosopher of science Prof. @JeanBricmont on the significance of thousands maimed and 10 dead as #GiletsJaune protests erupt for 12th week in a row. #neoliberalism #globalization #Macron #Brexit #ECHR 
On point #brexit trolling from Paddy Power   
Biafra Referendum Count Down :February 16 Sit At HomeWhen I asked one of my friends “Why didn't you go to church?” he replied, “I can’t shout Fire Fire with an empty stomach#ReasonWeWantBiafra @MaziNnamdiKanu @NkirukaNistoran @Amaka_Ekwo @NkirukaNistoran @EmekaGift @cedoziemm 
This goes out to the wonderful women in UK fighting Brexit and for future generations. You are awesome&strong @Anna_Soubry @joswinson @MollyMEP @abcpoppins @JMPSimor @emmyzen @julietlodge2 @catherinemep @nickynoo007 @spaceangel1964 @Shieldmaid8 @VesperUK @julie4nw Never give up! 
Theresa May’s denial is staggering: Brexit absolutely must be delayed | Jonathan Lis  
"We are in a Morris Minor hurtling towards an armoured train. The stakes are not equal. The EU has neither the same flexibility to swerve nor will the damage to both be the same." #brexit  
Introducing the #StandFirm Campaign. How Leavers can ensure #Brexit is delivered on time, with or without a deal.All without leaving the comfort of your home.A short blog on how to #FlyTheFlag 
Things the UK can't deal with:Two inches of snowHeat over 25 degreesDrones KFC running out of chickenA woman playing The DoctorSupermarkets closing for Christmas DayVegan sausage rolls from GreggsThings the UK thinks it can deal with:A World War A No-Deal Brexit 
"The breakdown of trust in politics if we try to turn this over by a second referendum will be hard to repair."Labour MP Caroline Flint says she wants "to get beyond" Brexit so "we can get to deal with some of those more pressing, everyday issues".  
It’s an absolute disgrace that this is necessary. This country is an embarrassment, and anyone who still supports Brexit can just go to hell.  
So what was wholly illegal and impossible is suddenly a good idea round at the Berlaymont. The answer is no: we are not extending Art50 by two years so that the EU can create space for a referendum or General Election. People here will go wild if we don’t get out as pledged.  
Like Jaguar Land Rover ..Their biggest market in China has almost collapsed , no one is buying Diesel cars ..90 percent of their stock is diesel Not one model in UK top seller list..YET BREXIT GETS BLAMED See how this is all being engineered yet ? 
Is Facebook deliberately trying to close down the pages of #Brexit supporting groups?   
Country in Brexit Crisis Homelessness up 165% Where is the Tory Government??? They are off Skiing.. FFS!!! They are taking the PISTE!!! 
You could fill a book with sneering references in the @guardian to '£350m on a bus'. But their front-page Brexit splash today is just infuriatingly slapdash  
Brexit  
Breaking: Taoiseach Leo Varadkar will meet the European Commission President Jean-Claude Juncker in Brussels on Wednesday Feb 6 to discuss No Deal Brexit planning. He will also meet European Council President Donald Tusk to discuss the latest developments in London - spokesman 
Labour MPs warn Theresa May they cannot be 'bribed' to back her Brexit deal with promise of extra funding 
Brexit & The Spayed Parliament.  
Let's be completely clear. With the revelations of cheating by Vote Leave and Leave dot eu, there is *no* democratic mandate for brexit. 
“If you want a vision of the future Brexit Britain, imagine Del Boy falling through that bar - forever,” George Orwell, 1903-1950.  
Gibraltar Chief Minister: "I don't know what Spain is playing at"@FabianPicardo says it's "unnecessarily provocative" for Madrid to call Gibraltar a "colony" in EU #Brexit legislation  
EU ambassadors agree that Britons entering the Schengen area after Brexit should be granted visa-free travel  
Foodbank charity the Trussell Trust has warned that ANY FORM of Brexit will lead to further dependence on foodbanks.Brexit will sweep thousands more into poverty. That's why MPs must be true to their values and call for a different course. 
Perspective: The collective madness behind Britain’s latest Brexit plan  
Theresa May botched negotiation of Brexit forces NHS bosses on a panicked tour of hospitals – @JonAshworth 
I’m trying not to view my inability to light three “strike anywhere” kitchen matches in a row as a referendum on my overall competence. 
"It is clear that austerity was not a necessity but a political choice. MPs now have to decide whether to make it worse with a Tory Brexit or go back to the people and ask them to put an end to this madness."Well said, Anna Turley, Labour MP for Redcar. 
British factories stockpiled goods in January at the fastest rate in 30 years, as they count down towards a potentially chaotic #Brexit  
Muslim school will not allow girls to eat lunch until after boys have finished, Ofsted chief saysME: Welcome to the Pakistan United Kingdom in Europe (or PUKE for short)#Brexit#WWG1GWA#MAGA 
More than 80% of IoD members have some form of commercial link to the EU, but notably less than that actually trade directly with the bloc. People need to understand why direct import/export is not the sole or even main determining factor in how businesses are approaching #Brexit 
My father belonged to the generation that *actually did* fight WW2. In the 60s, he invited German students into our home every summer, as his contribution to European peace. He is turning in his grave at the Brexit rhetoric. 
Another senior Tory has admitted Brexit could be delayed  
No one on the left needs to fall out over Brexit. If we were in power, or had 400 MPs then maybe. But we’re in opposition. Let’s not fall into the Tory trap of divide and conquer. 
David Lammy keeps spreading hatred about Brexit Andrew Brexiteers. We say resign. He’s not a good mp and he so obsessed and fancy’s himself. We need to send a messge in which he know we won’t  stand for the betrayal or him dictating to us all time! 
Saying you can have a ‘Managed No Deal Brexit’ is like saying you can have a ‘managed’ car crash on the fast lane of the M2. It’s reckless gibberish. Me on Snow and Brexaggedon. 
After many years enjoying a good old ‘spoons you’ve now officially lost my business @WeatherspoonsU you bunch of propaganda spreading idiots. I walked straight out. Let people make their own decision instead of inciting propaganda #boycotweatherspoons #brexit #propaganda 
Dear PaddyPower marketing : we are in awe. Give yourself a Brexit bonus!!  
Leaving the EU is not only stalling the economy and making companies move jobs abroad, it is turning Britain into a global laughing stock...  Brexit eviscerated in the Washington Post by @IanDunt.  
Warning: Unelected Labour Director of Comms & strategy does not want a 2nd referendum so 86% of Labour's membership who want a PV are not allowed to have one. Democracy, yay!  
i had a very not boring conversation with michaela coel about brexit, sex, racial fetishes, the end of chewing gum, etc. etc.  
The vote to get FGM included in the children’s act may have been pushed back because of Brexit (which more than anything else is FUCKING up our political system) but this is why we need social services and schools to be empowered to act to stop crimes like this from happening!!  
Why would any Labour MP:1. Trust this Government to deliver for deprived areas they've decimated over last 9 years?2. Go through the voting lobbies to back a Tory Brexit, which will hurt working class people?3. So utterly go against members wishes?#PeoplesVote#FFS 
New post just up on my Brexit Blog. The current impasse is the result of Brexiter falsehoods colliding with reality. The EU are finally doing what the UK polity and media have mainly failed to do - stand up to Brexiter misinformation, distortion and lies:  
Why isn't Labour front bench making a fuss about all this criminality around the referendum? 
BREXIT: Piers Morgan 'blames Brexit' after biography is reduced to 1p "ONE PENCE"  / #EU #Brexit #PeoplesVote 
So @BBCNews sends #wato team to Cornwall to talk about brexit & its impact on the life & prospects of the county. @BBCNews omits @MollyMEP, the region’s Green MEP, from the discussion. Any ideas why? After all she is a knowledgeable, principled, pro-European economist. 
“This is a sweetener, isn't it, if not a bribe?”@JohnMannMP is asked about reports that more money may be allocated to Leave-voting constituencies held by Labour MPs in return for their support for Theresa May’s Brexit deal.  
It seems the left is largely uninterested in these aspects of Brexit. I suspect many think it's just a silly hyper-Remain obsession - footstamping by losers unaccustomed to losing.Big mistake. This criminality will also be used to prevent a socialist Labour government. Got it?  
February’s market seems poised for more possible volatility as investors watch how geopolitical issues like Brexit and U.S.-China tariff tensions unfold  
The government is exploiting a loophole in the law meaning an advisory referendum cannot be rendered void because of the Leave campaigns' illegal actions. Crooks and con-tricksters exploit legal loopholes, governments should be held to the intent of the law. #PeoplesVote#Brexit  
"Those who block a deal and then complain about no-deal, I think will have little cover when they next face the voters."International Trade Secretary Liam Fox says voters may turn on MPs who vote against Theresa May's Brexit agreement and force a no-deal.  
That's nice. Care to comment on further findings that the outcome of the 2016 referendum was unlawfully procured? Eldon Insurance fined £120, 000 for data breaches. Does @Uklabour still "respect" the result? @Keir_Starmer 
The Good Friday Agreement ended decades of conflict. Ireland worries Brexit could unravel it.  
Before the 2016 Brexit referendum two Swedish parliamentary parties wanted to quit the EU. That number is now down to zero. The state of Britain is the best possible advert for EU membership. 
Dominic Raab on David Lidington's involvement in Brexit talks: "He also was negotiating the Cameron deal. Is he really going to have the kind of Brexiteer credentials to get this deal delivered in a way that is palatable back home?" 
Theresa May said on Tuesday that Lidington, Geoffrey Cox & Stephen Barclay would help her renegotiate her Brexit deal. But Raab said Lidington leading would be a "problem" because "there’ll be a perception, perhaps unfairly, that this is a guy who wanted us to stay in the EU". 
The EU have called Gibraltar a "colony". RT to let Brussels know Gibraltar is British and always will be! Help save Brexit @  
New: Dominic Raab says David Lidington's status as a Remainer means he will not be able to deliver a "palatable" Brexit deal because the EU will feel like they are negotiating with one of their own.It is a *very* polite intervention in The House magazine but utterly brutal. 
NEW “We have been too grey and gloomy about Brexit. We need some positive pragmatism." @DominicRaab talks to @PolhomeEditor 
Mrs May & Mr Corbyn there can be no honouring the referendum result.Evidence continues to mount, & it has now achieved great height, that the Leave vote is the result of fraud.‘Fraud unravels everything.’You act as if there is a mandate. There is no mandate for Brexit.  
Man up mate. Many 'older' people supported families BEFORE Brexit. And what 'hit'? The nation came through two world wars … and even now, with all the uncertainty, the UK economy outstrips the EU for performance. Stop moaning about supporting a family, just get on with it.  
These are the masters now…… .the people driving forward the unmitigated disaster of #Brexit.  .  Truly a revolting spectacle … 
Very sympathetic interview with Tory Brexit-blocker Nick Boles in the London Evening Standard.But one line may cause him some ribbing. Says he grew up in "not a huge house, six/seven bedrooms". 
No Parliamentary majority for extending Article 50.No majority for 2nd referendum.No majority for May's deal.And Tories won't budge on calling election.We'll be leaving the EU with no deal because Tories hate Corbyn more than they hate you having food and medical shortages. 
This report from Reuters is worth a moment of your time. It bursts the myth of a bank 'Brexodus' from London. "In Frankfurt and Paris, the flood of banking jobs predicted to arrive after Brexit is, for now, little more than a trickle." 
Gibraltar has been British since 1713. It played an important role in WW2 fighting for Europe's freedom. It provides work to thousands of Spanish citizens in neighboring communities. The #EU labeling it a 'colony' is a calculated, deliberate insult. #Brexit #NoDeal 
Hey Nicola Sturgeon, it only costs £125 thousand to cheat in a referendum to ensure your side wins! Cheap at half the price. I'm willing to chuck in a couple of quid.  
“I’m afraid we are in fantasy land at the moment.” Lord Adonis says there is not enough time left to prepare for the UK to leave the EU by 29th MarchAre the Lords holding up Brexit? #newsnight | @Andrew_Adonis 
Two simple things @Conservatives could've done that would of given them at least another decade in power:Deliver Brexit Become conservatives againInstead they're going to make us slaves to the EU & carry on becoming Blairite authoritariansIt's the perfect self-demolition 
Ken’s #SixNations Predictions1. Ken becomes Wales’ most capped hooker of all time2. France sack their coach3. Manu Tuilagi gets injured4. Ken solves Brexit5. Eddie Butler and Brian Moore kill eachother6. Gav returns7. Jiffy loses his voice 
There is nothing more unattractive than a grown man having a Twitter meltdown because he’s worried about buying lettuce after a no deal Brexit. Get a grip ffs. 
Many MPs refused to give up their skiing holidays next week yet Brexit may be delayed. What is their priority? 
The board of Invest NI, Northern Ireland's inward investment agency, has expressed "deep concern" about how unprepared many businesses are for a no deal Brexit. 
‘The backstop is the best thing Mrs May has done. It is a recognition that the peace and security of Ireland are a critical British concern and that the Good Friday Agreement shouldn’t be traded for Brexit, whatever Farage and Rees-Mogg say’  
Stand up for Brexit I know I am .... are you? #Get2knowWTO#StandUp4Brexit 
Only one hundred people cross me every day carrying a can of Guinness and Brexit is being held up because of them? 
We know appeasement doesn't work. It makes it worse. Continuing with Brexit tells everyone that othering and demonising groups of people, lying, shouting down opponents, and believing blame-myths are now just normal. 4/ 
Britain's best chance of revenge for its lost Brexit is to remain in the EU  
Bloody fabo #bbcquestiontime #BBCqt : #Brexit Tories caused it & #Tories balls it up. Yet #MSM pundits, commentators, journalists, #BBC all spout off "yeah but what about Labour" "what about #Corbyn"Shut the f**k up eh ... pic.twitter.com/Ez3UVTERbV#ToriesOut #GTTO #JC4PM2019 
Every single one of these fines etc. for the Leave campaign’s is an opportunity for Labour to say ‘We want to respect the result of the referendum, but the result we have had been compromised by illegality. Let’s check.’But they don’t.They don’t even mention it. 
Finnish PM Juha Sipilä wants to get Brexit out of the way quickly: "Brexit has taken too much time from our decision-making process"   
Of course they won't. They're not going to say "Thanks very much, that's tickety- boo. I'm off to lead a quiet, happy life". If it's no deal they'll escalate blaming foreigners for the consequences. If it's a deal they'll blame Govt and remainers for not getting a real Brexit. 1/  
The referendum was illegally won and yet the result is being implemented? So cheating in elections  is now fine is it @theresa_may? 
Maybe the best solution to Gibraltar is to make it an integral part of the UK. They already voted in the referendum, so let's take the next step and make it a full constituency of Parliament so that it can send an MP. 
'Nationalism in Europe means power for the already powerful. Solidarity pushes back the other way. That is the argument my party must make in another referendum, and we must make it clearly.'Spot on from @Alison_McGovern – we couldn't agree more. #FFS 
Let’s make tonight’s the MOTHER of All #Moats @talkRADIO 7pm Ring in text in email in tweet in. Listen up all over the world #VenezuelaCoup #PolPot #Brexit #JeremyHardy #JeremyCorbyn #TheresaMay #Churchill #Trump #Russia 
In the Polish & Russian languages a new verb has recently been coined: "to #Brexit” ("brexicić”). In Czech it is "brexitovat".It means to say that you are leaving a party but then staying, drinking booze that you didn't bring, acting badly and occasionally insulting the host.  
The EU will offer Brits visa-free travel for short trips after Brexit -- if the UK reciprocates  
Images of the catalan political prisoners being taken to a Madrid prison.Afer more than a year in prison without any trials, they are going to be judged for organising referendum. This is happening today in Europe. #shame 
Honestly can't be fucked to get out of bed today x #Brexit 
Yep. It still really fucking surprises me to see so many MPs declare oh so solemnly that we should 'respect' the referendum - as if it is some profound, deeply held moral conviction. THEY. CHEATED.  
Behold the 'ginormous' Spanish military police column transporting nine (9) heroic Catalan politicians who... embezzled? No. Who murdered? No, wait for it. Who organised a f... democratic Referendum without Franco's permission. #Spainstinks 
Croydon North Labour Party has overwhelmingly backed a motion in favour of a people’s vote on May’s Brexit deal with Remain the alternative option on the ballot 
Snowmaggedon Brexit: An inch of the White Stuff and Britain grinds to a Halt — so tell me again about No Deal. By me.  via @BylineTimes 
Corbyn's strategy becomes clear, to appear to oppose #Brexit while allowing enough of his MPs to vote for it to counter the Tories voting against it. He wants #Brexit but he wants to avoid the blame. I would love to be wrong about this. #PeoplesVote #RageAgainstBrexit 
From The Economist ... and highlighting the continuing Brexit saga.  #economics @TheEconomist #brexit  
.@GreenJeanMEP's week of Brexit truths ends with the complex issue of the Irish border.Sadly, no amount of "belief in our country" is going to solve this technical problem. Watch in full here: *** Day 5: There is a border on the island of Ireland *** 
Do @UKLabour still repect the 2016 referendum? We don't. @Keir_Starmer @jeremycorbyn 
How the HELL is Brexit allowed to proceed with all these illegalities and open investigations?How are we allowed to proceed past point of no return with these criminal investigations pending?#RevokeA50 must be revoked and these investigations come to conclusion. 
The leader of UKIP has written to the Queen to suspend parliament until after #Brexit to stop #Remainers keeping the UK in the EU.In his letter Gerard Batten also told the monarch she should never have approved the 1992 Maastricht treaty. #BrexitChaos 
CAR-T is therapy that uses the immune system to kill cancer cells and Brexit could hinder patients access to this therapy. We can't have that! Demand a #PeoplesVote  via @pharmaphorum 
The #EU is run by unelected power-hungry bureaucrats who have no interest in democracy but a great deal of interest in increasing and consolidating their power by issuing reams of red tape. Stifling innovation and slowly strangulating Europe. #brexit #news 
Pet passports issued by the European Union won’t be recognized for U.K. pets anymore if there’s a no-deal Brexit  
The hard Brexit mob are putting all they can into driving us off a no-deal cliff now, with the shrill aggressive desperation of inept bank robbers who know the police are nearby.@theresa_may should not let herself be controlled by these scammers. 
"Let's take back control of our laws."So far. Vote Leave: broke the law LeaveEU: broke the law BeLeave: broke the law Facebook: broke the law Constitutional Research Council: broke the lawToday.   Eldon: broke the law#Brexit 
550 jobs at risk as Oddbins blames Brexit for plunging into administration. The case against Brexit continues to rack up. 
Gibraltar was ceded by Spain to Britain in perpetuity under the Treaty of Utrecht in 1713. It is sovereign UK territory and designated as a British Overseas Territory. At the 2002 Gibraltar referendum, 99.0% of Gibraltarians voted to stay British. 
As the ICO announces audit over concerns that the Brexit campaign is tainted by data abuse, remember when Brittany Kaiser revealed Cambridge Analytica’s proposal to break UK data protection law?  
Why would anyone want to scrap the ‘Human rights Act’? This demonstrates a callous disregard for humanity. This was the reason for Brexit. This is called fascism. 
Most Remain voters have now accepted that Brexit is going to happen.Those who campaigned for a so-called People's Vote should turn their focus to reforming and improving our country, instead of setting up a 'Rejoin the EU' campaign.  
So the planes will fly after Brexit...#ProjectRealWorld 
Thanks to @JasonJHunter for improving our understanding of the consequences of Brexit from a trade perspective. Thanks for the beer as well! @chesterforeu 
Steve Baker MP tells us the sidelining of successive Secretaries of State for Exiting the EU from Brexit policy development was “a considerable abuse of our constitution”  
EU CAN’T SUE Britain over £39bn Brexit bill… but is plotting other ways to make UK PAY  
Yeah, this nation of people who will trample each other to death for a cut-price Soap & Glory gift set really seems like a country that will calmly embrace food rationing after Brexit   
When they can cheat knowing they’ll only be fined pocket money if they get found out, this is not a functioning democracy. #Brexit #arronbanks 
Hey IoD we’ve corrected your headline for you. Based on your membership, only 348 of your 30,000 firms are moving ops or thinking of moving because of #Brexit. So:‘IoD says 1.16% of their firms thinking of moving part of their ops post Brexit’Not quite as catchy, is it?  
People who are to blame for Brexit being dreadful? A) RemainersB) the Irish C) JudgesD) the EUPeople who bear no responsibility whatsoever ?Brexiters  
EU agrees visa-free travel for UK citizens even after no-deal Brexit  
Real life beyond Brexit. Big moment in the Middle East. A first in 2,000 years. The Pope to hold Mass in the Arabian Peninsula with 130,000 Catholics. UAE hosting the Pope & Grand Imam to better human relations. Co-existence!#HumanFraternityMeeting#لقاء_الأخوة_الإنسانية 
The EU has proven Leave voters right since the referendum.They do:- - plan to build an EU army - plan to enforce the Euro on ALL members- want member countries to give up sovereignty- want to become a political United States of EuropeWhy would anyone still want to remain? 
On it goes... "serious breaches of electronic marketing laws during the referendum campaign."That means people were influenced.  Why is the PM respecting the 2016 Referendum result?#VoteLeaveBroketheLaw @Suewilson91@RobertCPalmer13@c_anne_richards 
We hate to say it, but it looks to us as if @BBCWorldatOne came to #Cornwall with a story already written about how the majority of Cornish people are still staunch supporters of Brexit, and deliberately ignored what is now a mountain of evidence to the contrary.#wato 
CNN warns: "The world needs to start panicking about #Brexit “  
Our "friends" in the EU showing their true colours once more, claiming Gibraltar is a colony whose status is controversial. In a referendum, over 99% of Gibraltarians voted to be British. Not that the EU respects referenda of course.  
What? Confirmation of visa free European travel, and now there will be no impact on flights post Brexit?What’s happening to the no-deal Brexit apocalypse Remainers and their Project Fear II promised us?Brexit looks smoother by the day!  
Looks like the ICO has made some progress uncovering data abuse by Nigel Farage’s LeaveEU as the cloud over Brexit darkens further.  
Dear @BBCMarkMardell,We've been talking with literally thousands of people in towns across across #Cornwall & their views on #Brexit are very different to what you're hearing from wealthy retirees in Portreath.Opinion here has shifted very significantly.#wato @BBCWorldatOne 
Oddbins blames Brexit as it collapses into administration  
#Brexit:  and Arron Banks' firm fined £120,000 over data breaches 
The Brexit campaign group  and an insurance company run by Arron Banks, the prominent Brexit backer, a total of £120,000 for 'serious breaches of electronic marketing laws' during the 2016 referendum  
Happy birthday to my nephew, 3, who saw the Brexit votes in Westminster on telly last month and inquired as to whether "all the people in that Mass are saying their prayers". Top analysis from the boy 
Oie muppets @JunckerEU @eucopresident — Gibraltar ain’t no colony. It’s a British Overseas Territory (as is the Falklands) that not too long ago held a referendum regarding its status. Scary how you lot seem to disregard democracy when it doesn’t go your way. #Gibraltar #Brexit 
"group of top German economists has told the EU to tear up the Irish backstop and ditch its ideological demands in Brexit talks, calling instead for a flexible Europe that preserves friendly ties with the UK"Panic setting in... 
Dominic Raab became the latest Brexiter to claim Switzerland as a model for avoiding a hard Irish border. Social media called him out on his nonsense, BBC did not. #Brexit 
So the referendum result was criminally funded and criminally procured. The Tory and Labour parties still insist they have a mandate to take away my kids birthright and destroy our economy. Why ?  
I never realised JUST how much I hate the EU - this #BREXIT process has totally hardened my absolute loathing for them.  They are NOT friends, they continue to insult my country at EVERY turn.  WHY #Remoaners love them and wave their ridiculous flag around is just beyond me #WTO 
Not a popular view but I think the BBC has done a bang-up job reporting on Brexit most of the time. And the tinfoil hat brigades on both sides of the Brexit divide can put that in their pipes and smoke it. 
He can go whistle for it ......  Brexit news: EU can’t sue Britain over £39bn divorce bill - lawyers | Politics | News |  
My interview with @GoodwinMJ, professor and bestelling author, on the future of Brexit and the European Union. “The British people knew exactly what they were voting for. A second referendum would undermine British democracy from below.”  
Yet more dishonesty by the Leave campaign exposed.Let's not mince words. Our country is facing ruin as a result of multiple breaches of the law by these cheats, liars & crooks.How can that be right?#StopBrexit #RevokeArticle50 #PeoplesVote #Brexit 
Define : trolling Answer : #Brexit #Ireland #England #SixNations #6Nations #Rugby 
Claire Fox on #PoliticsLive tries to explain away Arron Banks, Eldon and LeaveEU being fined £120,000 over wrongful marketing during the referendum as 'not influencing the result'. They contacted a million people. If 625,000 were persuaded to vote Leave, that changed the outcome. 
Gibraltar a colony, treated like a country by Westminster, Scotland a country, treated like a colony by Westminster.What a difference being a tax haven makes, just ask the Channel Islands, Isle of Man, BVI etc., hence the rush with the Brexit con job. 
#Gibraltar is not a part of the UK say the EU.  Of course, the EU would never have said that, if the UK was remaining.  Spain want Gibraltar and as an EU member, Spain will have Gibraltar. We need an EU member to now say, Scotland is not a part of the UK.  Hey Presto.  #Brexit 
If the Tories had given cash to run down communities in the first place there wouldn't have been austerity and there wouldn't have been Brexit 
But lucky for him there's snow because @BBC (Brexit Broadcasting Corporation) hasn't had time to discuss this. Come on @Channel4News we're relying on you! 
Businesses in the UK who work with businesses in the EU are actually feeling helpless. Not one person voted for this. This isn’t sovereignty it’s suicidal. All for a referendum that was only won because people broke the law. 
And the whole of your country is now told to accept a referendum based on illegal, if not criminal methods... 
We don't want to see the pork barrel politics you see in the US sully our politics here. Its bad enough people should want to facilitate a job destroying Brexit deal but to connive in what Downing St is trying to do runs totally against our progressive values. Very Distasteful /2 
It’s obvious! The EU is obstructing the United Kingdom’s attempt to leave the EU. I personally want us to leave without any deal. Minds will be better focused post Brexit. Any change is difficult, but we are not without the wherewithal to resolve all problems. 
Jeremy Hardy's best jokes: From Brexit to right wing hypocrisy  
I covered every day of the referendum campaign, attended every press conference. Conducted two of the set piece live interviews. Not once was the phrase “customs union”, used or heard. 
If Theresa May is robust with Brussels now, she may finally be able to get Brexit right, writes @FraserNelson 
Even if we stop Brexit - and I'm crossing everything that we do - how will we ever live down the way we have behaved? There have to be big changes in personnel and policy, inquiries, a fresh start, key legislative changes, if we're to restore Britain's good name. 
The Global Britain put forward in the Referendum Campaign cannot be forgotten in a rush to secure an unnecessary Withdrawal Agreement. It would be best for Britain to #GoWTO 
I'm seeing tweets from Remainers stockpiling food, toilet rolls etc in case of a no-deal #Brexit. I haven't seen anything similar from those who voted Leave. You know why? We're not DERANGED! We're hunters and gathers. I'll go to Southwark Park, and kill me some squirrels.  
Now Spain prepared to light the #Gibraltar fuse and invites EU see it as a “colony” after #Brexit - starts to give Spain an upper hand. UK backed Spain as a “valuable and trusted ally” in relation to #Catalonia. Interested to if there’s a change of tone over the weekend? 
That's the SECOND ruling against the Leave campaigns that have confirmed they BROKE THE LAW!How many does it need before someone declares the result as unsafe and the referendum should be rerun?#Frauderendum #PeoplesVoteNow 
Todays Brexit scare story is a bit poor: Brexit means we will run out of Magnums (!) Come on Remainers cant you find something a bit scarier for us to run out of??  
These Brexit hot takes are getting more fucking face-meltingly ridiculous by the day. We’re literally a week away from:‘Canine excrement is surprisingly delicious if you sprinkle it with a bit of oregano and wash it down with a glass of your own piss.’  
Alison McGovern MP: "Nationalism in Europe means power for the already powerful. Solidarity pushes back the other way. That is the argument my party must make in another referendum, and we must make it clearly." 
If Carlsberg did Reporting Scotland."On tonight's programme ..."May bribes English Labour MPs to back her deal."RBS small business scandal - the UK Treasury implicated."Brexit - How will it hit Scotland's economy."Indyref2 - Is Westminster ignoring Scottish democracy." 
Good article about the pressure US academics are feeling from agri-business, seeking to direct & limit what they can research. After Brexit it's likely that more of this will happen here, as we're pressured to accept US produce with lower env. standards  
Hugo Rifkind(The Times) - #Brexit is a square peg in a round hole... #brexit is undoable & there's no way of doing it that isn't palpably bad.#peoplesvote #politicslive @hugorifkind 
Leave-EU gets £60k fineEldon Insurance gets £60k fineDaniel Sandford @BBCDanielS explains the background to the EU referendum spending to #politicslive viewers  
Decided to check out the #BBNaija hashtag. The overwhelming crowd and ensuing injuries from scuffles is all the proof we need that this government has failed Nigerians. Nigerians, February 16 is a referendum. You have only one job. 
It is reflective of people's entirely antiquated understanding of how business and trade runs today that people seem to think the only thing which makes #Brexit relevant to companies is whether they directly import or export with the EU 
With this in mind, it's no wonder brexit has played out this way. May's BRINO was primarily designed to frustrate a future Lab gov. Perhaps she called the '17 GE cos she knew she'd need a huge maj to get such a con of a deal thru parliament, just to offset her own dissenters 16/ 
The panic over a 'no deal' brexit is really a panic over the prospect of an unrestrained socialist program that would impose workers rights & fair taxation. How could it not be? We are warned that 'no deal' represents the worst of a disaster capitalist, tax haven dystopia.. 11/ 
The EU has agreed to allow UK citizens visa-free travel to the continent - even in the event of a no-deal #Brexit  
Can people in their 60s stop saying "We'll just take the hit" on Brexit.YOU WON'T BE THE ONES TAKING THE HIT..The ones taking the hit from Brexit will be the EU as we will no longer have to subsidise them. 
Brexit nationalist: 'Proud' to be British. Not a Brexit nationalist: Absolutely, profoundly mortified & ashamed of their country. Because of Brexit nationalists. 
It has been obvious from the beginning that when push comes to shove Labour Leavers would facilitate a Tory #Brexit. And #Corbyn will not lift a finger to stop them. If this happens Labour will pay the price at the next GE 
Maersk (Europe's largest shipping line) is going to take its ships off the UK register and also stop taking on UK cadets, due to Brexit. 
Human rights and dignity no longer matters to predators chasing a  fast buck. After Brexit it will get worse as Theresa May is committed to repealing the Human Rights Act.  
#Brexit: Leave. EU and Arron Banks' firm fined £120,000 over data breaches  
So, Banks is fined £120k for cheating and yet no one questions the ethics of securing the referendum result via the practice of misleading people through lies & trickery.why is the questionable result of 2016 not being challenged?this is not democracy. #BREXshIT 
And I cannot believe you wrote that & didn't include 'Tory Govt failure' anywhere at all. Brexit isn't an act of God. It's the actual job of the Govt to put a working Brexit plan in action. The. Actual. Job. #GeneralElectionNow 
No, you’re not singled out for criticism for your pro-Brexit views, you’re just incompetent. Chris Grayling was singled out as the worst Lord Chancellor long before Brexit. You say ‘tough decisions’, I say bad decisions!  
Be interesting to see how the government, Labour and most of the media will manage to ignore the latest evidence of criminality in the Brexit referendum campaign. 
Here's why people lose faith in politics. Even when this stuff is exposed, nothing changes. Brexit is going ahead despite evidence of such deep and widespread cheating that the result of the referendum should be declared unsafe.  
Another Brexit tragedy for remains of UK shipping: after P&O ferries, Maersk removes its ships from British flag, will pay no UK tonnage tax and stop training UK cadets. 'Serious impact on jobs' says Nautilus union. 
Driving your own vehicle or hiring one in the EU? From 29 March you will need new documentation. Check the new requirements:  #PrepareforEUExit #Brexit  
#Leave campaign and Arron Banks firm Eldon Insurance fined for cheating in EU referendum.So the result is therefore invalid in UK law.  
What a surprise. @Arron_Banks & his pals caught yet again. When are there going to be criminal charges & the complete overhaul of the UK's inadequate electoral laws? #Brexit has shown them not fit for 21st century.  
The reality is that there is a price on an Irish identity in Northern Ireland. A personal price being felt across our community. Today I stood w/ a family going through incredible hardship because they maintain the #GFA right to be accepted as an Irish citizen not British #Brexit  
I'm sure we'll now hear from Brexiters that these illegal acts by Arron Bank's company Eldon Insurance & #Leave.EU had no effect on outcome of referendum, along with the overspends, & targeting people on FB via illegally harvested data.If it had no effect, why did they do it?  
"Whenever Brexit comes up there seems to be a lot of people asking what Jeremy Corbyn is doing.. Labour aren't actually in government at the minute, the Tories are..It seems to be that Labour have to do a lot of the explaining for Conservative failures"  
I'm not saying that the BBC is biased against Brexit.....oh, yes I am.Robert Peston: BBC NOT impartial during EU referendum campaign.  
Richard Dawkins on Brexit: "Cameron should never have called that referendum. He will be damned by history as one of the worst prime ministers ever for sacrificing the long-term future of the country for the sake of a petty internal squabble." 
The insert in today’s Perthshire Advertiser. Standing by the people of Perthshire on Brexit.  
Why is that so many Remainers think that this tweet is asking Labour to ignore Remainers? That is not our position at all.Our point is that Lab can't afford to alienate either side. But Remainers are asking Lab to cancel Brexit/impose 2nd ref, which WILL alienate Leave voters.  
Oddbins Off Licence Chain has called in administrators and BLAMES BREXIT! But Oddbins  went into administration in 2011 long before BREXIT . Yet more scaremongering - even by those going into administration! 
Under the cover of this week’s Brexit votes, Ministers snuck out next year’s funding settlement for local councils. No wonder they hoped we wouldn’t notice. £7.31m off Oldham Council (£20.8m since 2015) and £6.48m off Tameside Council (£33.41m since 2015).  
Is Unionism capable of any self-reflection?I represented GB, NI & Ireland in sports - I was always proudest to represent NI.Now as I look to the FUTURE I sadly & regretfully just don’t see “NI working” & think UI offers a better chance (no more) - Brexit only accelerates this 
Very good to hear that @andrealeadsom has scrapped MPs half-term and is likely to make MPs work Fridays and weekends as I said should happen 2 weeks ago. MPs have had two and a half years to prepare for #Brexit. No more delays!  
Don’t forget the failure of the British media is one reason we are in this situation. They promoted ignorance of the EU and treated Brexit vote as a Tory leadership campaign. Some in the media are really looking forward to no-deal chaos - it will be their ‘Nam moment.  
Brrrr! Brush off the #snow & forget the cold! There are more People's Vote events taking place all over the UK this wkendHere's your chance to engage w. people in your local community about why a #PeoplesVote is the best way to sort out this #Brexit mess 
#Brexit:Theresa May’s so called ‘mandate’ to re-open the WA & remove/renegotiate the backstop will come to nothing. She will basically put the same deal to Parliament again in mid-Feb.EU will sit tight on this one for now. No new renegotiation.@bsurveillance @flacqua 
Brexit represents a set of values (of highly questionably worth) which non-believers find it very hard to understand. What it does not represent are the values of decency, integrity and consideration for your fellow human beings. And it's not ashamed to say so. 
The FT has turned into a parody of itself - complaining that the economy is doing too well to scare people into doing what they're told on Brexit  
Nigel is right if Mrs May truly wants to deliver Brexit for the British people then she must get rid of Olly Robbins  
If you had any sense, any sense at all, you'd be making case that short term financial bungs won't be enough to transform UK economy post Brexit. Only ditching austerity with a Labour Govt will do that. Stop helping the Tories attack working class people #GeneralElectionNow 
Are you an EU family (with children) that has left the UK due to Brexit?We are urgently seeking interviewees for important academic research () we are partnering. Please consider taking part by contacting us at research@the3million.org.uk. 
Jacob Rees-Mogg calls billboard featuring his quote on a second referendum 'fundamentally dishonest'  
A Brexit-supporting campaign and Arron Banks's linked insurance company are fined £120,000 for serious breaches of marketing laws  
Ironic that Labour MPs who attacked the Lib Dems for being in gov with the Tories are now happy to prop up the most right wing Tory policy of all - a hard #brexit. A policy that will leave the communities they claim to protect worse off for generations. #brexitshambles 
Small tip. Attacking Labour MPs from Brexit supporting constituencies, for securing extra investment for those constituencies, in a deal that involves supporting Brexit, isn't going to work. 
Just got to say it … the Bertie would have that nurses thing and the Brexit problem sorted by now 
#Brexit is not about leaving the EU. It is about a greed-crazed tax and regulation-hating elite faction whipping up mob sentiment in a struggle to seize power and gain itself a Brexit tax haven. #PeoplesVote #RageAgainstBrexit 
It's not worth the £150 in the 1st place with its biased bull for Europe!!! We should have a referendum on abolishing BBC and then they would have to be showing commercials to generate its income....  
A fine is not sufficient. These people interfered with our democracy.The referendum must not stand.  
Stockpiles of despair at record levels after another week of Brexit | John Crace  
Oddbins blames Brexit as it collapses into administration  
EU Council draft of offer of visa free travel to British citizens after Brexit (if reciprocated to all EU27 citizens) - they have added (ie Spain has insisted) a footnote “Gibraltar is a colony of the British crown” and controversy over sovereignty, solution yet to be reached  
NEW: Visa free travel to the EU will continue after Brexit. RT to let your friends know Help save Brexit @  
More record fines on the Leave campaign for breaking the law. Yet the Government still refuses an inquiry into the multiple criminality & subversion of the #Brexit referendum. Wonder why? #BrexitShambles #PeoplesVote 
Genuinely unsure who comes off worse from the 'cash for votes' corruption scandal.Is it May, who only finds money for deprived places to save her own skin?Or is it the Labour MPs willing to support Brexit, which will take away far more than May would ever offer? 
I'll never forget on the morning after the referendum and working all night I went to the allotment to escape and bumped into a plotholder who had voted Leave. Because allotmenteers are lovely, he said "I'm sorry" and left me alone. 
Last week, Sky News revealed that Ford had calculated that a no-deal Brexit would cost the company as much as $800m (£614m) this year alone as a result of World Trade Organisation (WTO) tariffs and the weakening pound.And now they have cut 400 jobs in Bridgend who voted Leave 
Queen Urged To Suspend Parliament To Stop Brexit Being Delayed Or CancelledWell done @GerardBattenMEP Let’s hope she does it! 
"If the government is going to give us money for doing what we think is right, what's actually wrong with that?"Independent MP Frank Field on Labour MPs 'show us the money' #Brexit row 
The Tories' shambolic approach to Brexit continues to have real-world implications, with people and businesses paying the price. Demand the final say on this Brexit mess, with the option to stay in the EU >  
The data law watchdog has issued fines totalling £120,000 to two organisations involved in the #Brexit campaign  
"Left case for Brexit was an interesting exercise, like a Marxist review of The Very Hungry Caterpillar or one of those games where you work out whether it would be better to have no arms or no legs"Goodbye, Jeremy Hardy. We'll miss your passion & humour  
For more commonsense from @thatginamiller see our latest campaign  to #endthechaos .  After 2 and half years of chaos and no solution in sight, is it not time to take a step back and consider a third way that could actually end #Brexit ?!  
Brexit's bankroller @Arron_banks 's Eldon Insurance  and  fined £120,000 by ICO for data breaches. Criminal investigation into Britain's biggest ever political donation for Leave continues. 
BBC SCAREMONGERING #3281 - Sandwich fillings.Sandwiches will look like sandwiches after Brexit Emily.Oh dear BBC Newsnight. Looking forward to a lengthy apology for this garbage.  
Another #ProjectFear claim busted!EU agrees visa-free travel for UK citizens even after no-deal Brexit. Britons won't need a visa for short stays in European Union countries, reports Sky News. 
Justice Secretary @DavidGauke tells @christopherhope's @brexitbroadcast Jeremy Corbyn doesn't care about Brexit, ‘all he wants to do is damage a Conservative government’Listen to the full episode here:  
“It feels a bit like being in a casino,” said a German executive in the U.K. about the uncertainty surrounding Brexit  
Leave campaign and Arron Banks firm Eldon Insurance fined for illegal marketingLeave,EU used Eldon Insurance customers' details to illegally send almost 300,000 pro-Brexit adsThe Brexit result is invalid#BrexitIsACrimeScene #Brexitgate 
Spare me this paddy whackery, this outbreak of patriot feeling.This is truly the last refuge  of scoundrels stuff.Stop resisting fair taxes on your sector, and stop profiting from addiction. That would show some concern for the actual welfare of people. #Brexit  
EU and UK regulators agree Brexit deal for asset managers -Delegation is not just a concern for UK-based fund groups. Due to the UK’s status as an investment hub, asset managers HQed in EU27, EEA & US rely on portfolio managers based in London.  via @FT 
About to do #PoliticsLive LIVE. Always nerve-wracking. Not too Brexit heavy but also looking at homelessness, elderly abuse & tax so at least lots to mull over. 
It's here. The thing you've all been waiting for. Forget snow and Brexit. Our list of Writing Competitions and Opportunities to enter in February is now live.  
In all the fuss about the Brexit backstop problem, I've yet to discover how the Irish leadership have tried to find a solution. They just sit on the fence as they did by turning their backs on the UK in the war. They forget we spent billions bailing them out of economic collapse. 
EMA and the European Commission have published updated guidance to help pharmaceutical companies prepare for Brexit:  
Brexit banter revving up in Dublin ahead of the Ireland v England Six Nations game...  
Now officially established beyond all doubt that THERE WAS A CROSS-OVER BETWEEN ARRON BANKS' INSURANCE BUSINESS, ELDON INSURANCE, and BANKS' POLITICAL ACTIVITIES WITH LEAVEEU, should the authorities now revisit the startling information revealed in this @CommonsCMS video????? 
#brexit excellent the economist.  
"We are a nation sleepwalking towards a cliff edge. If we do not pull ourselves from the brink the damage will be permanent."Brexit and Trump: Which country has bigger problems, the U.K. or the U.S.? 
 This week Alister Jack MP voted AGAINST amendments which called for the possibility of the UK leaving the EU without a deal to be rejected.The UK Government's own analysis says that a no deal Brexit could hit Scotland's GDP by 9%.Press release   
FUN IDEA for Labour MPs tempted to take the Tory Brexit bribe. Why not refuse it so you don’t prop up a Tory government? You could then win a general election so the whole country benefits not just your constituency. 
As I said last year, tranche after tranche of #EU legislation will mean that if there is a No Deal #Brexit, it will not be the disaster that Remainers like to predict.  The #EU would be hurt as much - if not more- if there were a breakdown between the #UK and #EU after ~Brexit.  
Lab/Tories have betrayed the 17.4m who voted BrexitOn May 2nd Vote in local electionsVote to get Lab & Tory Councillors OUTLab & Tories need to be sent a clear messageWhen a referendum is held the outcome must be honoured.Not overturned by arrogant,treacherous Tory & Lab MPs  
#BreakingNews: The information commissioner's office has issued fines totalling £120,000 to the  referendum campaign & the insurance company owned by its major financial backer Arron Banks for serious breaches of electronic marketing law. #PeoplesVote 
Should @JohnMannMP be expelled from @UKLabour with immediate effect for agreeing to take a bribe from the PM in return for voting for her Brexit deal?@JennieGenSec 
"Of course we will survive Brexit. It's the British spirit. We can survive anything""It's snowing""Cancel EVERYTHING!!"#Snow #snowday #Snowmageddon 
I try to keep my personal opinions separate from my analysis. Most likely outcome is, I think, Parliament passing the withdrawal agreement (largely as is) with a political declaration signalling a softer Brexit than current version.  
Labour wants a sensible Brexit deal that respects the Referendum result but also protects rights + jobs.We oppose crashing out without alternative plans in place.Such chaos would just be exploited by Tory extremists to change our economy in ways even Thatcher didn't dream of.  
1/ EU Member States' representatives today agreed that UK citizens can travel without a visa to the EU post-Brexit.Press release: Full text: Some comments. 
Absolutely right. May owns brexit from the course the the very edges. Sure it’s corrupt. Sure MPs have been supine. Sure the law has been blunt. But in the final analysis this is May’s child, and it is all on her.  
Why isn't Bob Geldof arranging a pop concert to help feed the starving people of Britain after Brexit? Come on Bob, we're famished! 
Sabine Weyand: the EU Brexit negotiator with a British sense of humour  
Jon it really is time to talk with economists who almost all see brexit as an unmitigated disaster - pro brexit economists are so far out of the mainstream as a profession we do not even want to engage with them to give them credibility which may be a mistake but...  
On welcome comeback album 'Encore', veteran ska-punks @thespecials address Brexit, austerity, Tory rule, Black Lives Matter and mental health. We need right-thinking rebel records like this now more than ever – read the     NME review  
Not enough, should void the referendum. Cheating devious... 
No respected country has done anything half as extreme or desperate as Brexit for a long while. The last two countries to crash out of a major multilateral organisation in this way were Hitler's Germany and Mussolini's Italy, when they left the League of Nations in 1933 and 1937 
And elites determined  deliver Brexit are priming a time bomb. There is no easy way out and it is asinine to pretend otherwise 
 via @GuidoFawkesWe hear all the time from Universities how worried they are that Brexit will affect how many students come to the U.K. to study.This has been proved to be PF.The numbers coming to the U.K. continue to increase.Give PF up you fools. 
Elites trying to delay or block Brexit are sitting on a volcano. (Gerald Warner for Reaction @reactionlife) 
Here’s what the German Ifo economists are suggesting: And here’s the full report that seems to be getting a lot of backing from Leave lobbyists today, actually very similar to Labour Brexit policy. Who’d have thought it? 
LeaveEU/Eldon Insurance fined £120,000 for serious breaches of electronic marketing laws. LeaveEU using Eldon customers’ details unlawfully sent 300,000 political marketing messages. Eldon unlawfully sent over one million emails to LeaveEU subscribers without sufficient consent. 
BIG NEWS: Another Project Fear scare story de-bunked. Britain's financial services will continue to boom post-Brexit#LetsGoWTO 
Help! I’ve been locked in a cell with IDS and @MikeGapes. They won’t stop arguing about Brexit! Get us out of here!!! Donate now for @ELHAP  #RedbridgeJailbreak #GoingDownOrGoingHome 
The only time there will be chaos at British ports is if the Govt try to block Brexit. I live in Dover a majority Leave town.. we will close the ports if the corrupt government tries to ignore the will of the people.  
#Brexit & #Brigid - #Ireland really featured on today’s @BBCr4today. Take a listen to Min @HMcEntee on why the backstop remains essential (2.20) & the wonderful Marie & Catherine Heaney on #StBrigidsDay & Seamus Heaney (2.53): 
Still don’t know what the #Brexit backstop is? We explain it through cricket (where the backstop originally came from) - it’s a fielding position to ‘stop the worst outcome’Ireland international @georgedockrell explains all here: 
The U.K. Information Commissioner’s Office issued fines of £120,000 over use of data for pro-Brexit political campaigning - ICO investigation found that LeaveEU and Eldon Insurance were closely linked. 
Brexit means we can control our borders, get visa-free access to EU and likely UK-only airport lanes here & abroad.  
#Brexit: Manufacturers stockpiling at record pace  
At a meeting of ambassadors in Brussels this morning the UK's Permanent Representative to the EU Sir Tim Barrow objected to Gibraltar being called a "colony" and its status as "controversial" in the EU's legislative proposal to give Brits visa-free travel after Brexit. (1) 
I like this idea floating around to break the backstop impasse by a referendum in NI on something like the question "do you want a hard border or want to have special status and stay in both EU and UK with a foot in both camps". Obviously lots to tease out, but interesting. 
"Brexit is the Fyre Festival of Britain" Sad because its true.. @mr_gbengz1  
Nah, @UKLabour won’t split. We might lose some Tory infiltrators but they are easily replaced & it’ll be good riddance. Brexit and all its ruinous mess belongs entirely to the @CONservatives. They will suffer far worse than we will. We’re marching onwards to socialism...  
"Though she has badly misjudged every stage of Brexit, even she will surely pull back at the last moment. Why would she want to captain the ship when a no-deal tsunami swamps the decks? Surely not." 
If Arsenal voted to relegate themselves to Division 4 and no longer participate in cup football, would they still be able to play Champions League?NOAnd would this be the fault of the Champions League?NOAnd would they have anyone to blame but themselves?NOThat's Brexit 
EU agrees to visa-free travel for UK citizens even after no-deal Brexit  
Do you remember the time when David Davis was Secretary of State for Leaving the EU, and he went to Sweden and told them about leaving his robot lawnmower to cut his grass in Yorkshire, and we were all meant to realise that this meant Brexit would be brilliant? I liked that one 
New polling shows that only 18% of people who voted Remain in 2016 are still totally opposed to Brexit. Most people want to get on with it and deliver the result. Not an easy fact for Losers' Vote obsessives like @Anna_Soubry to accept!Support us at  
The Speaker of Britain's House of Commons, John Bercow, insists he's a neutral arbiter of the rancorous Brexit debate -- and tells @CNNI that a good Speaker would pay no attention to "moaning" government ministers:  pic.twitter.com/HOB7mHQ7Bs 
So actually 29% of 30,000 @The_IoD members (if we accept the 1202 polled are a representative sample) out of 5.7 million businesses in the UK have or might relocate due to Brexit. That's 0.15% of UK businesses. Or 1 in 667 businesses. Interesting. Some might call that #FakeNews 
How Brexit was won:They owned the pressThen they liedThey bought a referendumThen they liedThey stole your dataThen they liedThey bought the DUPThen they liedThey bought the opposition.And remember that when the uplands are dark and barren, remainers are to blame. 
Department for International Trade estimates £35 billion loss of future free trade benefits to UK economy under Government’s Brexit plan  
Just went to pick up my HRT prescription from @BootsUK & was only given half of my six months supply & told they didn't know when they would get more in because of "production issues". Is this how Brexit will be affecting women? @SWCwomen @ChristinaSNP #Menopause 
On my way to the courts this morning to show solidarity with another Irish family facing government imposed British citizenship. The rights & entitlements of the GFA are being routinely questioned & tested by the UK Home Office with devestating consequences #WeAreIrishtoo #Brexit 
A Nobel winning scientist has warned Brexit could kill the UK science sector, by cutting it off from funding and international collaboration. Britain should be at the forefront of innovation, not falling behind. It doesn't take Einstein to realise that. 
The Information Commissioner’s Office (ICO) has issued fines totalling £120,000 to Leave EU and Eldon insurance over unlawful political messaging during Brexit:  
TODAY: Curious that the Mail blames MPs for the Brexit mess but have already absolved themselves of responsibility for decades of fictitious anti-EU articles spearheaded by their former editor who fucked off to a better job once reality started to kick in… pic.twitter.com/reIFXmLAn3 
REMAINERS need to move past the economic downturn and chaos of Brexit argumentsLeavers have factored it all in so it doesn't hit homeElitists like Farage & Rees-Mogg are insulated from it all and don't careLeft behind leavers have nothing to lose so why not roll the dice 
This is my favourite thing today, @FT seething that the economy hasn't crashed since the referendum as experts like Chris expected. How stupid of the economy! 
"I'm a parent from Cheltenham and I'm extremely concerned about the complete mess that is #Brexit." This man in Cheltenham is asking @AlexChalkChelt to support a #PeoplesVote. It's the #OnlyWayForward. 
The Irish backstop is a ruse to keep the UK trapped indefinitely:  #Brexit 
The EU has decided UK citizens can travel visa-free for trips under 90 days to the Schengen Area. #Brexit has given the EU total control over British travel in Europe. It has robbed us of one area of control over our own lives.#PeoplesVote #RageAgainstBrexit 
I remember voting in East London in 2016 on UK Brexit.I did Voter Registration online and the Slip was sent to my house. I didn’t move an inch until day to vote. It was a simple queue and I was done in ten minutes.It made me wonder why we make simple things tough in Nigeria. 
FRANCE’S ports will be ready for a No Deal Brexit after turbocharging their preparations, the country’s harbours chief has announced.IGNORE THE REMAINER LIES ABOUT US STOPPING LORRY LOADS OF LETTUCES BEING BLOCKED BY UK CUSTOMS.There is no reason for jams at Calais or Dover.  
The EU free trade agreement with Japan launched today now makes the EU 27 and its free trade agreements with 61 countries by far the largest trade-promoting global free trade network. Only purblind ex public school Brexit boys and right wing demagogues can’t see it. 
Wilful ignorance from a key architect of this destruction. Of course there are other factors, but given investment fell 46.5% last year and the Society of Motor Manufacturers and Traders says Brexit uncertainty has "done enormous damage," you have nowhere to hide.  
I don't think I'm being hysterical for suggesting this but... why aren't we panicking *more* about Brexit than we already are? Why isn't it being treated like an utter national emergency? We're all being mislead by our collective status quo bias. 
A Sky Data poll has found that a #NoDealBrexit is the most popular leave option, whilst a Survation poll has found voters believe the UK exiting the #EU on WTO rules is now the most likely outcome.#Brexit #FridayFeeling 
Societies that self-destruct often start by burning books and disposing of intellectuals.Brexit began with 'We've had enough of experts' and the deliberate sidelining of Remain voices in the media.Once you embrace ignorance, the only way is down. 
Absolutely right @jonsnowC4 Shamefully most of those privileged to have a platform on MSM have badly failed to properly hold this govt to account & to interrogate its actionsIt’s much wider than Brexit. See austerity, poverty, NHS, morality & standards and much else since 2010  
*** Breaking News ***This is a great development, means we will not have to apply for Visas to visit Europe after a no-deal Brexit. Can I just say to all the lefties... #GreatNews #LeaveMeansLeave #NoDeal 
“The speaker can try and help the House to decide on such issues...” says Speaker Bercow on #Brexit. The man tore apart parliamentary precedent against the advice of his clerks just so that he could select anti-Brexit amendments. The arrogance displayed here is unreal.  
Visa-Free travel for UK citizens even after no-deal Brexit.Boom! Project Fear takes another direct hit!  
Danske Bank CEO Kevin Kingston this morning presenting latest results from the lender: "A no deal Brexit is the biggest risk to the Northern Ireland economy in a generation."  
EU agrees to visa-free travel for UK citizens even after no-deal Brexit  
Now needing to buy votes to get her Brexit deal through Theresa May meets members of the Labour opposition; whilst Jeremy Corbyn seems to be doing little to discourage the meetings, David Lammy calls anyone falling for the bribery 'cowards & facilitators'. 
1st Feb so we're only c.6 weeks away from HEDGEHOGS!!! Time to think about getting ready for the invasion - clearing their highways, making feeding stations etc. They're coming and they don't care about Brexit. #hedgehogs @hedgehogsociety 
Join me on Radio Biafra Saturday, February 2, 2019, at 6 PM Biafraland time.It's going to be my first broadcast from our London studio in 4 four years.Biafra Referendum is on February 16, 2019. Sit-at-home and be counted. 
The European Council says EU ambassadors have agreed that UK citizens should be given visa-free travel to the Schengen area for a short stay after Brexit 
#LBC James O’ Brien  Brexit Brexit Brexit Brexit Brexit Brexit Brexit Brexit Brexit Brexit Brexit Brexit Brexit Brexit Brexit Brexit Brexit Brexit Brexit Brexit. That’s his show 3 hours a day 5 days a week. Has there ever been a bigger crybaby    bore than this DOOFUS.  
Nearly a third of British companies have made plans to relocate from Britain after Brexit in a stark survey from the Institute of Directors. Even by Brexit standards this story is hugely concerning. We desperately need to change course. 
Alexander Stubb(former PM Finland) - #Brexit is ludicrous, stupid, it's one of the biggest mistakes a nation state has done.. there should be a #PeoplesVote between remaining & May's agreement.. it's better to influence the #EU from the inside.#FinalSay #RevokeA50 
“#Brexit is also affecting the sciences because it is sending out a perception that the UK is not open for business and the UK does not want scientists from other countries."Our President, Venki Ramakrishnan FRS, in the @Daily_Express 
My old friend ⁦@MartinSelmayr⁩ says a No Deal Brexit wouldn’t be the end of the world for Brussels. Jobs & livelihoods at stake in the member states, but not in the Commission. Plus all the tariffs would go to Brussels, not the member states. #Brexit  
Why do the Tories have it in for Brexit?  
Oh look, seems that your video isn't all that representativeThe fruit counter at ASDA Charlton, vast majority is from Also your tweet doesn't point out that we lose ALL our trade deals on no-deal #Brexit INCLUDING those with Peru, Kenya etc.#Stopbrexit#RevokeArticle50 
Virtually all no-deal Brexit supporters continually contradict themselves because if we don't need a deal with the EU to economically prosper then we also don't need trade deals with anyone else. (repost, typo in original) 
Voters backed the SNP so they would be given a choice on Scotland's future *at the time of Brexit* - not 10, 20 or 30 years later:#ScotRef #indyref2 
"A second referendum is still a v. real possibility. And it offers the only opportunity to fully consider the potential impact of Brexit on children."- Helen Stalford, professor of law & director of the European Children’s Rights Unit at Uni of Liverpool 
Richard Dawkins on Brexit: "Cameron should never have called that referendum. He will be damned by history as one of the worst prime ministers ever for sacrificing the long-term future of the country for the sake of a petty internal squabble."  
I can believe it Mr.Peston. Because for the last 2 years +you and the rest of the MSM have been whitewashing the vile deeds of this Government, whilst constantly smearing @jeremycorbyn, whose Party, if you had bothered to report it,DO have a cohesive Brexit plan.Shame on you   
Want to know what no deal Brexit looks? Read the first chapter of @iandunt's book Brexit: What the Hell Happens Now? for free: 
Brexit: Article 50 delay would need purpose - Irish Europe minister  
My Father has just told me that he is stockpiling snow in preparation for a 'snow deal Brexit' :-)Thats snow joke!  
Bonus #iDidNotKnow:Here's a list of Tory MPs opposed the EWTD after Brexit.And here's @Jacob_Rees_Mogg saying he thinks the working time directive should be scrapped: 
If you’re talking about the wider questions that the Brexit vote asks of us, and you’re not following this guy, you’re doing it wrong.  
Some claim experts don't support a WTO Brexit. Here are just a few who do:-Sir Richard Dearlove, former head of MI6-John Longworth, Former head of the BCC-Lord Lawson, former Chancellor of the Exchequer-Martin Howe QCRT to show it's the remainers who don't like experts  
The EU-Japan Economic Partnership Agreement (EPA) comes into force today - creating a "mega free trade zone" which will save EU companies an estimated £900m a year.The UK stands to benefit from the #EPA for just 57 days before #Brexit:  
#Brexit in one 'sketch'!  
"...the unavoidable disruption & increased trade barriers that no deal would bring are entirely unproductive."A third of companies represented by Institute of Directors have moved business abroad to cope with Brexit or are actively considering doing so. 
There can be no democratic choice against European treaties.The United Kingdom belongs to the European Union.A Federal EU#Brexit  
"There can be no democratic choice against European (EU) treaties" & he means it.Time to take back control#Brexit  
Lineker again proving he doesn't understand Brexit. It's true what they say about footballers and brains.  
If she extends because she can't get a deal then that is total capitulation. Brussels will rule the UK.She may as well tell voters: "We Tories are a huge bunch of liars. The referendum was a con. Our manifesto was a con and if you want to leave the EU vote for another party."  
UK suffers hugely from Brexit. But who'll do well?I call Amsterdam. Big up-tick in bank transaction volume. The European Medicines Agency that we just lost, with pharma following.Moreover: appeal to the young. Socially liberal and bike infrastructure.  
YouGov find only 18% of Remain voters now outright refuse to contemplate Brexit, 74% willing to accept UK leaving. The country has moved on. We’re ready to leave. Time for MPs to implement the will of the people.  
EU ambassadors have today agreed that, following Brexit, UK citizens coming to the Schengen area for a short stay (90 days in any 180 days) should be granted visa free travel. 
Breaking News: In a shock move to delay Brexit, the government has cancelled February and called today “January 32nd”. They say January could continue for 2-5 years. 
Brexit gridlock could force Kent NHS staff to sleep in hospitals  
Anyone in the real world would be sacked after 2 years of incompetence and treachery. 'Get rid of him NOW' Farage calls on May to SACK 'eurofanatic' chief Brexit advisor  
Could this be the worst impact of Brexit so far? I don’t know about you but I’m not prepared for a Magnum-free summer!  
Brexit!   
From our neighbour to the North ‘The meeting was reportedly chaotic, with heckling, intimidation, and general confusion.... Now their revolution is eating their own…’  #Brexit #Labour 
Britain's manufacturers are building up stockpiles at the fastest pace on record as concerns about Brexit intensify  
Surge of smaller companies activating plans to move operations abroad over #Brexit - @The_IoD warns almost 1/3 businesses are planning to relocate: 
7/ We can provide dozens of real world example of UK re-shoring since the Brexit vote, including household names like Clarks, Cadburys, McClaren, EE, Vodafone and BT. We ask the outlets spreading these misleading figures to clarify their headlines as soon as possible.[ENDS] 
4/ ABE would like to highlight the hundreds of businesses we represent who are positive and optimistic about Brexit whose opinions are never canvassed or requested. These are businesses with great entrepreneurial stories to tell but sadly they don't fit the desired narrative. 
.@patmcfaddenmp says "hard, cold facts showing how British businesses are already voting with their feet" in response to industry chief warning of nearly 1/3 of British businesses planning to relocate over #Brexit:  #PeoplesVote 
My own year abroad as well as witnessing students undertake that experience now shows how much #Erasmus does for students. A hugely important paper in the light of the #brexit threat  
Gary Lineker tells Germany in open letter: We still want to be friends after Brexit  
EU ambassadors agree that after #Brexit UK citizens coming to the #Schengen area for a short stay should be granted visa free travelPress release:  
“We will always be friends”Cold day warm hearts #SnowUK #Brexit Full text of letter @welt@TomFletcher @NSoames @StewartWood @EmmaReynoldsMP @annietrev @TomTugendhat @GaryLineker 
I’ll cheer a ‘huge result for democracy’ if and when the Labour Party reflects its members and voters views on Brexit.  
Former Head of the WTO say Brexit is like getting relegated to the 4th division. Leave have nothing to offer UK but an apology. Time for a #PeoplesVote 
Today's @Independent cartoon... #TheresaMay #MichelBarnier #Brexit  
We had a referendum. We #Repealedthe8th. But some anti-choicers obtained the contact details of a woman who had a LEGAL abortion and asked her to come in for an "appointment". Utterly sinister. These folk would still LOVE to control women, and shame them. 
BREXIT REALITY: Trade Agreement between EU & Japan, boosting trade by £31bn?.. Surely not, It must be an illusion.. Right brexiters? #Brexit  
You remember how #brexit Britain was going to launch a new era of grand and lucrative trade deals with America, China, India, Australia et al? We just made a trade deal with the Faroe Islands. Population: slightly less than Durham. This is winning! (But God bless you, Faroes!)  
A further reminder of what we will leave behind with #Brexit as EU-Japan trade deal comes into force to create world's biggest trade zone. The UK enjoys many free trade agreements through EU membership. These will not be easily replicated outside EU.  
Jacob Rees-Mogg really doesn't like this billboard featuring his second referendum quote  
No Deal Brexit WON'T stop trade across the Channel, French port boss confirms  
Interesting piece, but a problem: poorest people weren’t voting to be poorer. Polling suggests most Leavers either believed Brexit would make us more prosperous, or else not change things either way. Vote Leave didn’t promise job losses or food shortages.  
“A group of top German economists has told the EU to tear up the Irish backstop and ditch its ideological demands in Brexit talks, calling instead for a flexible Europe of concentric circles that preserves friendly ties with the UK.”  
Yesterday the ⁦@SMMT⁩ warned a No Deal #Brexit posed the biggest threat in a generation to the Automotive Industry. Today starts with my hearing from the ⁦@GKN_plc⁩ ⁦⁦@unitetheunion⁩ Shop Stewards their concern over mounting job losses 
Wife has put a block on the word ‘Brexit’ on her twitter. It means I can say anything I want about her and she won’t see it if I include the word ‘Brexit’ - like, ‘it’s going to be hard to continue my affairs with beautiful continental women after Brexit!’ Hooray! #Brexit 
The Japanese ambassador to the EU confirms on @SkyNews that the new trading relationship between Japan and the EU will not take long to replace in the event of a #WTOBrexit. He says Japan will replicate a similar post #Brexit agreement with the UK based on the EU deal. #LetsGoWTO 
This report got lost in May's pre Xmas Brexit shambles, it's important: Two in three academy chains 'fail' poorer pupils with ‘Low-performing chains may be harming the prospects of disadvantaged students’#Education 
Labour have had a consistent Brexit policy as documented in our manifesto since early 2017. The Tory govt have whipped to vote against their own deal on 2 occasions. And its JC that's inconsistent? No wonder you're the only company still giving the Tories a lead in polls.   
Five double acts that would make a better job of Brexit than Corbyn and May  
The UK is controlled by 4 assemblies2 of the 4, Scotland and Northern Ireland, the people voted overwhelmingly to remain2 of the 4, England and Wales voted to leaveNow the Welsh assembley wants to remain and supports a Peoples VoteBrexit is now a solely English project 
"We thought, 'It can't be catastrophic. The government will be prepared,'" the chief executive of a British auto parts maker said about Brexit. "But it's been a shambles, to be honest. There's still no clarity."  
Labour has been finished for a generation in Scotland because we misread one Referendum. We could be wrecked in the rest of UK by mis-stepping in the wake of another. 
.@tashaisblue speaks to First Minister @NicolaSturgeon about Brexit, reading for pleasure and online book clubs:  #ScotlandCountryFocus 
I'm snowed in and unable to make an urgent chiropodist appointment. If it wasn't for Brexit our country would be better equipped to deal with adverse weather. Thanks Leavers. I hope you're all proud of this mess.#snowmageddon #snowday #snowuk #fridayfeeling 
So if you wanted to reduce uncertainty for business you could accept the referendum result and work constructively towards a Deal.You won't do, because you are on a crusade to humiliate and crush the views of 17.4 million leave voters come hell or high water.  
There's been a lot of talk about a #citizensassembly to solve the #brexit impasse, but how does it work? Might deliberation among citizens bring the country together when Parliament cannot? Watch/like/share the video ! #brexitshambles @lisanandy @CarolineLucas @stellacreasy 
Brexit explained. 
The Daily Mail commissioned this poll but funnily enough didn't draw attention to this result:#Leave: 45% (-4)#Remain: 55% (+4)Change is since January 11Looks like the public have had enough of #BrexitIt's time for a #PeoplesVote #FinalSay so the UK can #ExitFromBrexit 
Here comes the American left to offer the stupid Brexit take you didn’t know you were missing.  
New Zealand's highest Brexit priority is not a UK-NZ Free Trade Agreement but to resolve the issue of quotas at the WTO. They don't see the UK's actions as in keeping with talk about us being future leaders at the WTO...  
Brexit  
Dear oh dear. When it comes to GMOs the European Parliament is still away with the fairies. Nonsense all spoonfed by Germany antis. 'Anti-science to the left of us, anti-science to the right... stuck in the middle with EU.' Until Brexit day that is... 
There's an expat on Facebook saying Leave voters should pay for her partially private healthcare, in France, after Brexit.Oh, I'm going to have some fun with this .....  
This may seem counterintuitive but the justification for a 2nd Scottish independence referendum increases if there ISN'T a People's Vote.We told Scotland to vote to stay in UK by threatening that they'd lose their EU membership, and now we're dragging them out against their will 
I hear the far-right UK is buried in snow, which is directly related to Brexit. This is just a taste of the terror that no deal will bring. It will snow every day after Brexit. The British economy will be destroyed. 
Nobody in #Labour party has done more than @ChukaUmunna to expose the damage #Brexit will do & make principled case for a #PeoplesVote.For @PeoplesMomentum to pick this moment to undermine him tells you everything. For them, factional battles more important than the country. 
Driving to and through Europe after a no-deal Brexit: you will need at least one International Driving Permit, possibly two.  
Oh, if you’ve followed my predictions and probability assessments on Brexit, here’s the update:Extension: 10% chance and < dailyRevocation: 2% chance and < dailyNo Deal: 98% chance and > dailyLeaving the EU: 100% chance and static 
I am genuinely baffled.If Hardline Remainers love the EU so much why don't they move there. They have 27 countries to choose from and could stop whining & moaning incessantly about Brexit, our proud island nation & tremendous Brexiteers.Think how peaceful it would be! 
Woke up, switched on R4 Today to instant sound of an Irish woman wailing "no more Brexit, it's a monster". Things got less balanced from there! It's stopped being the nation's forum for intelligent debate and become an extended insult to Brexit voters. And one we pay for too. 
#Brexit has swallowed all of political space, & if we do leave in the coming months, it is going to swallow the next 3-5 years. Leaving our many other crises unaddressed. #PeoplesVote could draw a line under the disaster  
Pretty soon the country will be under TOTAL CONTROL of a Gov who don't care if we have jobs, homes, food or adequate healthcare. Already we DON'T exist unless there is a USE for us - it's going to be so much worse after #Brexit. It HAS to be stopped. #RevokeRemainRebuild 
We now have a massive new trade deal with Japan, courtesy of our EU membership. It creates the largest free trade zone in the history of the world. And in 56 days, Brexit will put it in the bin, as far as we're concerned. Thanks, Brexit!  
It is eight weeks till we leave the EU. And we don’t know anything about what kind of Brexit it will be.  I cannot really believe I wrote this and I am not dreaming. 
Worrying -and growing - signs that Corbyn’s Labour might be gearing up to facilitate a Tory Brexit. If so, I suspect an entire generation will never forgive them.  
Used to think the 2-party system gave us a certain stability often lacking in other countries. It’s now clear this is a major contributor to the current brexit crisis. Roll on that split in both parties, into ‘sensible’ & ‘extremist’.  
So you know that weird Brexit mag that turned up Wetherspoons pubs? Turns out they have actually been spending money on delivering it to people’s homes. They’ve told us they’re doing it to “stimulate debate”  
I got a lot of attention for my blog on Brexit and Academics in the media, that I've tidied it up and improved it. I'm always interested to hear of other examples.  
New. "If referendum tomorrow 'Should UK remain member of EU or leave EU", how would you vote?Remain 55% (+4)Leave 45% (-4)@Survation Jan 30. Poll of Polls (average of all polls) now has:Remain 54%Leave 46%ht @whatukthinks 
No Deal Brexit WON'T stop trade across the Channel, French port boss confirms  
If Brexit happens without a further referendum, I would expect both major parties to split for the first time in modern history. It will be that big a shock to the political system - because the system at large will have failed at the basic job of public protection 
So basically Labour MPs are acknowledging #Brexit will devastate their communities, but they'll vote for it , if the Tories promise to pump in billions to support those damaged communities. 
Today the 9 #CatalanPoliticalPrisoners have been transferred to prisons in Madrid.They’ll face the trial and the menace of 177 years of prison for organizing a referendum and giving voice to people. #Shame They’ll keep fighting for justice and democracy, they deserve #freedom 
Can you remember those days before 23/6/16 when viewing choices were a movie or soap, not Parliament TV? Or when we used to read magazines & books rather than Hansard?Can we stop Brexit now please so we can take back control of our lives & the remote?@BremainInSpain 
We're leaving the EU on the strength of a corrupt referendum won by lying, overspending and data mining.We have a minority government in place by bribing the DUPWe have a PM who hands out honours to win votesWe have a PM now offering to bribe opposition MPsBanana Republic 
The rest of us are stockpiling for our post Brexit celebration     
New Brexit party has more than £1m in pledges and slate of over 200 candidates, including Nigel Farage  
“Regular people (wanted) to have a say, and that say was Brexit and it is now the MPs against them – The people who are meant to represent them, trying to tussle power off them. They want control of their own future” @EstherMcVey1#StandUp4Brexit #ThisWeek 
Shocking insight into impending UK crash-out:The EU cannot rescue Britain from Brexit chaos  via @financialtimes 
Forget Brexit – Top Gear has the biggest British shock story of the year. The new Morgan sports car will be made of ‘metal’, not wood >>  
Brexit in one cartoon  
Among the many things shaming Britain right now is constantly hearing Irish and EU politicians (the latter often speaking in second or third language) clearly so much more intelligent, articulate and across the Brexit detail than our own 
“Chris Grayling has hit back at personal attacks on his political competence and declared: "I’m a lightning rod for the anti-Brexit brigade." No, Chris. Just accept that you are accountable for your performance! 
Good morning Mrs May. Balls to Brexit!  
Brexit: 16 million Remainers utterly abandoned by May and Corbyn – Joyce McMillan #StopBrexit #PeoplesVote #RevokeA50 
I like a robust chinwag w/@JuliaHB1 in the morning - better than coffee to get me going! Amused to find Owen Paterson dismissing survey showing nearly a third of IoD members have moved or are looking to on account #Brexit as Project Fear. It's literally their factual responses 
In other words, probably all ‘British’ businesses that have significant involvement in single market will re-register inside single market after Brexit with consequent loss of tax income to UK and jobs migrating abroad.  
Online Brexiteers: We've made it very clear what kind of Brexit we voted for. You know this isn't it.Also Online Brexiteers: You cannot hope to fathom what kind of Brexit we voted for!  
Dear @theresa_may I will personally back your brexit deal if you invest £1.9m in my bank account.I'm sure I speak for all Remainers 
Funny BBC & Sky not reporting German economists major report criticizing EU Brexit tactics & risks to EU countries  
If we end up with a no deal #Brexit then #NHS leaders will seriously need to review the NHS constitution and the entire patient complaint process. The public must accept a deteriorating service, longer waits, drug and equipment shortages and inevitably poorer care. 
It has been more than two and a half years since 17.4m voters told politicians to leave the EU. Now they're plotting to delay it even further. Stop messing the British people around and get ready for a clean WTO Brexit on March 29!Support us at  
Worth remembering that the UK power system is helped to meet demand peaks by electricity imported from  the EU, & that #Brexit threatens to put our energy supplies at risk during extreme weather.#Snowmageddon #snowuk 
So those Labour MPs whose constituencies voted for Brexit get a bung to improve their communities, whilst those of us who voted to remain, get shafted.That's about as rotten as politics can get. 
I'm not joking when I say that articles promulgating lies & disinformation (for that is its primary purpose), should be criminalised.@lbc #r4today #bbcaqEU to lose £500bn and UK to gain £640bn in no-deal Brexit, economist claims' | via @telegraph 
EU will be “begging” for fish under no deal Brexit, fisherman sayHitting back at “stupid” claim fishing industry “may not survive” leaving without a dealSaying Whitelink director only worried about transport links & not thinking about industry as whole 
Idea for Theresa May.Cancel Brexit, or postpone it  indefinitely.Still spend money on building the economies of NI and deprived areas of the UK.Start a long term project to attempt to re-establish our credibility as a voice of reason in a world gone mad. 
The EU could be one legally-binding sentence away from agreeing a Brexit agreement that parliament accepts. My Telegraph column on the deal to be done:  
Hi @Bharper3407, I'm a Padres fan from the UK.Brexit is weighing heavily on my mind. We might not have food at the end of March.Do know what would make this British boy happy right now? If you played for the @Padres.If you choose not to join the Padres, I'll still love you. 
POST-BREXIT DIARYDay 9 - convinced wife English Prosecco is ok Day 22 - tins in kitchen low. What are Hearts of Palm?Day 39 - kids get veg picking jobs. Need to wait 3 months till crops readyDay 151 - caught hedgehog today. Will go well with grass & dandelion stew 
Almost a third of UK companies could move operations abroad because of Brexit, a survey has suggested #r4today 
Don’t even start me today on our MPs ! Holidays!and Brexit!I’m too Old for a “Twitter Ban!” 
Let's be clear, if these two people go into meetings with the EU they will be catastrophic, causing problems that are outside even Brexit.  These two are representatives of US business interest, not national interest.  Very dangerous... the #ERG are taking the country hostage 
I often wonder how preternaturally incompetent politicians process overwhelming evidence of their own imbecility. The answer is always an invented narrative of victimhood. Grayling’s using Brexit here just as dishonestly as Dorries tries to use ‘sexism’.  
My article in @BrexitCentral. We do not want Brexit delayed @StandUp4Brexit 
The Speaker of Britain's House of Commons, John Bercow, insists he's a neutral arbiter of the rancorous Brexit debate -- and tells @CNN that a good Speaker would pay no attention to "moaning" government ministers:  pic.twitter.com/3gJZlIKXhc 
Unlike the reported third of UK businesses, my business is not planning to move abroad. Brexit has already killed it. There's nothing left to move. #stopbrexit 
Brexit: Third of UK businesses considering move abroad - survey  
I walk past this memorial to the brave pilots who saved Britain in 1940 and wonder what they would have made of the ignorant Facist knuckle dragging gammons invoking the Duncekirk spirit to justify their #Brexit madness  
Devastating. “One in three UK firms plan for no-deal Brexit relocation, IoD says | Politics | The Guardian  
Are you surprised when #Corbyn planned to abstain on Immigration Bill, then 60 Labour abstain and Tories win?Labour MPs touting for cash in return for their votes on Brexit?Labour MPs voting or abstaining to allow May to carry on wrecking? 
Friday briefing: Hard-Brexit exodus as a third of firms look abroad  
Third of British firms 'could be forced to move abroad due to Brexit' - Evening StandardWhat an absolute load of b@llocksCabal lackey Osborne reaching new lows with outright lies.You are disgusting   
Just so the facts are clear. A no deal Brexit at the end of March would mean there would be no transition period. WE WOULD BE OUT!We are months, years away from being ready for this catastrophe.By the end of April we will be in chaos.Serious civil unrest starts in May. 
Brexit latest: People outraged by stories about bendy bananas are supremely relaxed about the prospect of no bananas. 
Thanks to everyone who came to our first Brexit information event yesterday evening in the Civic Centre in Dronfield - good discussion about all of the issues and good to hear residents views.  I’m holding another one in Clay Cross next week - come along if you want to chat!  
No-deal Brexit could see operations cancelled, NHS trust says  
I blame Brexit.  
I've just finished @BarristerSecret’s outstanding book, and now I'm almost as angry about the government’s incompetent and thoughtless handling of the criminal justice system as I am about Brexit. 
Polls: No Deal Brexit Most Popular Leave Option, WTO Exit Most Likely  via @BreitbartNews 
A group of us decided to reply to Germany’s letter of friendship to the UK last week. To say that whatever happens on Brexit, there will always be friendship between us, and work to be done that can only be done together.  
Ukip leader asks Queen to suspend parliament to stop Remainers 'thwarting Brexit' - The backers of Brexit put their ideology above our democracy. They have tried to sideline Parliament at every turn.  
I think Nigel Farage has moved to the top spot after this weeks passionate speech in Brussels. Julia narrowly misses out but keeps up the good work on her show. Brexit Heroes -1. NIGEL FARAGE2. Julia Hartley Brewer3. Jacob Rees Mogg4. Boris Johnson5. David Davis 
May has been given one last chance to get Brexit talks right - and has been told to make four big changes in her tactics. My  Telegraph column on the art of the deal:  
Brexit has uncovered a despicable enemy within that trashes our proud island nation and our tremendous indigenous peoples at every opportunity.They are in all political parties, the establishment and institutions. They are traitors. We should show zero tolerance towards them. 
Anyone know why @BBCNews is promoting such a lie?92% of British business does no trade with the EU, so it's a quite simply not true to say 1/3 of business to consider relocating out of the UK because of #Brexit#StandUp4Brexit #bbcbreakfast #gmb #itvnews #skynews #BBCBias 
Returning to the ongoing MSM theme claiming thousands of disgruntled Remoaners are to leave for the EU post Brexit,will this not release their housing which managed correctly should help ease our never ending queues at home for our youngsters who deserve a home and wish to stay? 
"Brexit’s Destruction Of British And EU Citizens’ Rights Will Tear Families Apart" writes @fjgodfrey from @BritishInEurope 
The #Brexit Bill is already huge. And still no sign of a “stop and think” moment from #TheresaMay as we head for the cliff edge... 
Can you imagine ANY other circumstances when a THIRD of UK businesses would be planning to move out of the country? This is on your head @theresa_may @Conservatives & unless you stop enabling Brexit, you too @jeremycorbyn#StopBrexit @CCHQPress 
Why didn’t they call the Wetherspoons newsletter/propaganda pamphlet “Brexit at Timothy’s” 
Project Fear. If we have a hard Brexit 33% of UK firms will move to the EU. However as only 7% of UK firms trade with the EU how does that add up?Most likely result will be many EU firms will move to UK for the inevitable better business climate 
The reality of Brexit is that businesses have voted.1 in 3 of them are leaving Britain to avoid no deal.1 in 3 businesses will leave.That's not a project. Not scaremongering. Just good business and reality.You have been lied to and your jobs will leave with them.  
when Leave Means Leave talks about their 200 “British business leaders” who want no-Deal Brexit it’s worth asking who the 200 are  
Insistence by some that only Nationalists want the backstop insurance is frankly repugnant and ignorant.There are 100’s of NI Unionist business owners, employing thousands of Unionists, that want backstop insurance in lieu of better solution. They deserve to be heard.#Brexit 
This morning the nine Catalan political prisoners are being moved to Madrid for their trials. They face sentences of up to 25 years for holding a referendum, as mandated by the people.Self-determination is a right, not a crime.#LlibertatPresosPolítics 
If that doesn't set off alarm bells then I am at a loss as to what will :( BBC News - Brexit: Third of UK businesses considering move abroad - survey  
Headline in The Guardian: “One in three UK firms plans for relocation” because of Brexit, according to the Institute of Directors. Sounds like a lot. But 92% of British businesses do no trade whatsoever with the EU. So they’re not relocating, are they? 
People in Northern Ireland can see that the Irish border issue has been hijacked by a highly politicised Irish government that only wishes to frustrate the Brexit process.  
A matter of life and death? UK stockpiles drugs as no-deal Brexit feared  
A politician who says “I respect the result of the referendum” knowing it was fuelled by dodgy billionaire money and illegal, criminal acts must be held accountable for Brexit - specifically timed to avoid EU tax transparency rules on 1st April - destroying the UK’s rule of law. 
Here is the UK arrogantly telling Ireland that they should change their policies to fit Brexit.Sorry but none of this is Ireland's fault, they didn't vote for this monumental farce. So frankly Ireland doesn't need to do anything to suit the UKgov. Anything.  
Dusting of snow in South East and panic breaks out. Trains running on emergency timetables. Food disappearing off shelves. Enjoy your hard Brexit guys. 
"Jeremy, with no EU minimum wage (and no requirement to have one in each country) are you sure you want EU workers' rights replicated in the UK?"  The #Brexit Facts4EU team give the facts from the EU yesterday : #GoWTO 
Glyn Johnson calls on the Government to pursue a managed No Deal Brexit: “The Government’s deal is not in the best interests of business, nor is it the only option." - Glyn Johnson of G.H Johnson Plant & Machinery SalesG.H Johnson is #NoDealReady 
Half term recess for MPs has been cancelled... Do you feel sympathy for those who had holidays booked? Or do MPs have a duty to stay and work on Brexit?@JuliaHB1|  
WATCH Prof Robert Patman describe how the international rules based order, that defends the rights of the weak not the strong, is being eroded through the rise of demagoguery, Brexit, Trump & Russian interference in our democracies.Full interview here -  
Everybody I know believes May is idiot. #brexit leavers and remainers. Undoubtedly, she is a loserSo how is it she is winning with her ambition to remove my FOM, my Rights, my Pension, my NHS? and still she has hard up gammon supporting her ambitions against their own interests? 
Friday briefing: Hard-Brexit exodus as a third of firms look abroad  
Fifth of UK firms have already moved operations abroad due to Brexit  
"Why multi-national companies love the EU (And why EU countries export their unemployed to the UK)" #Brexit Facts4EU brings you the truth about workers' rights to a minimum wage in the EU : #GoWTO 
Get him on the Brexit negotiation team.  
Brexit: 16 million Remainers have been utterly abandoned by May and Corbyn #FBPE #Brexit #Populism #BrexitVote #PeoplesVote #ExitBrexit #BrexitDeal #BrexitShambles 
In 1349  the Scots were delighted  at news  the black death was ravaging England and assembled an army to invade  the army caught the plague retreated bringing the plague back to Scotland. Such will be labours fate if they facilitate #Brexit which they show every sign of doing 
‘My hunch is that the faster the clock ticks the more likely it is that Britain will tumble into an unintended election. A second referendum could follow. But Mrs May must first be stopped.’  
Institute of Directors report One in Three firms plan to move abroad in survey of their 1,200 Members...amid fears of hard Brexit.... 
Breaking! Excitement And Expectations High In Biafran Land And Among People  Of Biafra In Diaspora As Referendum (  Sit-At-Home On 16Th February Sat, 2019) Which Shall Usher In "The Sovereign State Of Biafra " Approaches Irresistibly! "Oh Gracious Lord, We Give Thee Thanks"  
German anger builds over handling of Brexit by EU ideologues. They propose a Customs Union rebadged as a ‘supranational trade body’ where EU/UK are full members covering goods excluding services/intel. property/foreign investment/social areas eg health. 
We will cope is hardly a resounding vote of confidence is it? Does that sound in any way like the considerable upsides that we were promised? Brexit has already caused permanent damage to the UK, we need to stop it getting worse.  
The end of the Conservative party...Sajid Javid admits Brexit may be delayed as clock ticks for May  
EU PANIC: No-deal Brexit could be 'CATASTROPHIC' for Ireland claims QT panellist  
Hang on.Where's OUR backstop?Where's the clause that prevents our lives from getting worse until Brexit has delivered all that was promised in the referendum? 
Hands up those who think #Brexit is still a good idea#ProjectWeFuckingToldYouSo#FridayFeeling pic.twitter.com/dIBE5C5Lhf 
Brexit: Third of UK businesses considering move abroad - survey  
Legal equality between Irish and British residents in the region is threatened by Brexit  
NEW: Nearly a third of British businesses planning to quit UK over Brexit, industry chiefs warn 
Nearly 1 in 3 UK businesses are planning to relocate some or all of their operations abroad to cope with a hard Brexit, says,The Institute of Directors (IoD).Next time you meet a brainy  brexiter. Ask them if brexit is so great. Why aren't  firms clamouring  to come to the UK? 
The thing is us Scottish people voted & won the referendum 2 stay part of the UK, please don't think for one minute those clowns of the snp at westminster represent the Scottish public they don't, they represent their own wee fantasy world & us Scots are embarrassed daily by them 
This from the Brexit Secretary who “did not quite understand the UK’s reliance on Dover”. #UnfitToGovern 
 #Brexit : apocalypse... not now.Toujours not now.  
#Merkel says #Germany must prepare for possible disorderly #Brexit  
Brexit: Plan to cancel commons recess branded PR stunt after Tory MPs told they can still go away - The Independent  
A matter of life and death? UK stockpiles drugs as no-deal Brexit feared  
Can someone please remind the audience member that Brexit was supposed to be a good thing and is completely voluntary! We don’t need or have to punch ourselves in the face to show resilience that makes no sense! #BrexitLogic 
Relocation on agenda for nearly 1-in-3 UK firms due to Brexit: IoD  
MPs have had nearly three years to prepare for Brexit. Any extension of Article 50 is a deceit in order to keep the UK shackled to the EU. We must leave in full on 29th March on WTO rules. No Delay!  
Even now, the British media is covering #Brexit like an excited toddler smashing toy soldiers together, picking representatives of the most proudly ignorant and uncompromising positions to go head-to-head while consistently ignoring thoughtful and moderating influences.  
Brexit-blemished UK assets look cheap — but investors are wary  
Next in BBC radio, Love Should Have Brought You Home by Tony Brexit.My 5am brain made me do this. 
It's three o'clock in the morning & we are in fits of laughter at comments on Facebook & Twitter concerning Brexit scares and police idiocy (non hate crimes) The British sense of humour has come to the fore again & we'll beat the doom-mongers, lefties & PC adherents! Allez #UK ! 
Brexit: Third of UK businesses considering move abroad - survey  
And how would a second referendum make everyone happy/unite people? You could use your own arguement against a 2nd ref. 
Who’s ready for Justin Trudeau’s REFERENDUM next October 21st???  
Oh that's funny, because the BBC seemed to play its part leading up to the referendum by letting Brexit supporters talk absolute bollocks none-stop. It seems now it's served it's purpose and you got the result you wanted, you don't care about the consequences. 
Utter nonsense...What does the UK (Westminster) take from Scottish Gas, Oil and Whisky.We sell more to the EU than to England and that’s a fact.#Brexit #DissolveTheUKUnion #YouYesYet #WakeUpScotland  
No, you're just another Brexit liar. 
Hear, Hear.Brexit is just the beginning. 
Millions, possibly a majority now, want a Corbyn led Labour Govt with Corbyn’s sensible #Brexit vision to overturn @theresa_may’s barbarity that the EU turned a blind eye to, and rebuild our nation for the benefit of the Many. #GeneralElectionNow #JC4PM2019 
Brexit was championed and pushed through by white nationalists Why am I UNSURPRISED the boys at @jacobinmag would support it ? 
latest "big board" on automatic voter registration:—AVR is law (via leg.) CA, DC, IL, MA, MD, NJ, OR, RI, VT, WA, WV —AVR is law (via referendum): AK, MI, NV—AVR is through first legislative step: MN, NM—some administrative implementation: CT, CO, GA All this since 2015.  
Ep 88 Beyond Vietnam feat Margaret Kimberley@freedomrideblog & @joanneleon discuss prescience & relevance of MLK’s “Beyond Vietnam” speech. We also talk NATO, new Cold War, yellow vests, Brexit, Greece & American politics.  
Everyone in Ireland needs to know what @simoncoveney is planning with this #Ireland2040 crap. Planning to import a million people from Africa. And don't be fooled into thinking it's out of compassion. It's for profit. #Irexit should follow #brexit  
This week, Tribune magazine's new owners endorse a no-deal Brexit 'but from the left.'Next week, they'll endorse building the wall 'to own the libs.' 
What does @truthtemptress tweet about? 49.2% of their tweets contain one or more of the terms shown in this chart. Trump and Brexit categories are the most prominent. Many of the automated tweets feature links to news stories, mostly on right-wing conspiracy sites.  
Peter time to be pragmatic, accept that what you thought was a great idea in 2016 is turning into a national humiliation. Brexit was never going to work, it was always doomed to end in chaos because it was a terrible idea.And I know about real life before you have a go at me. 
Yet more evidence that thick people love company. Brexit rhetoric, war time spirit.Reality, troops on the street, martial law, no food. Who really voted for this apart from the dummies like this one that probably voted UKIP? When did we become a nation of absolute morons? 
There. Is. No. Remain. That. Can. Bring. The. Country. Together.Stopping Brexit would make UK divisions permanent!Is that what you want Femi?  
Corbyn’s support is collapsing. On Brexit, he should be campaigning to #Remain in the EU and reform the UK.Instead, he voted to trigger article 50, and Labour votes have passed Tory policies. History and voters will not forgive Labour unless it campaigns to #StopBrexit. 
I thought you made a very important point about where responsibility lies for the mess the country has been put in - both in relation to the Brexit negotiations and so much else more besides. 
I think you underestimate the cultist delusions of Brexiters.They will believe whatever they are instructed to by their Brexiters in chief.We've gone beyond politics, Brexit is a full cult, complete with well constructed protections against reality. 
Well a majority of the People now wish to #Remain in the EU...but in Parl ideologues & party hacks are denying the option to test it, being more interested in imposing their will on the Ppl than the true maj Will of the Ppl.#Brexit Britain is FUBAR.  
#BrexitDividendAnd know what?Even if #Brexit never happens, like with #TrumpShutDown in   US-the damage is done. 
Blair will always be remembered for his biggest mistake, Iraq. Corbyn, unless he has some astonishing flash of enlightenment, will always be remembered for his biggest mistake, his support for Brexit. 
Do you think a no-deal brexit it's a good idea?  
Sorry, no.  I don’t want to give a single penny of taxpayer money to the EU whilst we have people here, living like this, tonight.  If that means some of you have to forego a lettuce, get over it.  Have to queue at Dover?  Get over it.  Lose phone roaming?  Get over it.#Brexit  
Bercow: ‘I’m not biased over Brexit’  No Mr Bercow, you’re just not impartial, which your job requires..  
But on just this issue alone, the terrible consequences of medical shortages should be enough to put a stop to Brexit. It astounds me that for some, putting people’s lives at risk is a price worth paying for a leap into uncharted fantasy land. 
"God knows what the rest of the world thinks of this country. You now have the PM going back and arguing against her own deal that she did" Alan Johnson on #Brexit deal #bbctw  
#5Things- Trade deal hinges on Xi- Stocks, Treasuries advance- Trump threatens another shutdown- China Treasury holdings slide, again- U.K. lays groundwork for Brexit delay  
“If the EU has to choose between tweaking the Irish backstop and a no deal Brexit, why would it not tweak the backstop?" @afneil "Why should they commit to something they cannot rely on. What will they get in return?" @StefanieBolzen#Brexit #bbctw  
Labour voted to trigger Article 50 with no plan.Labour’s leadership is still refusing to call for a #PeoplesVote.Tory Brexit policies have been passed with Labour MPs’ votes.Labour will not be forgiven unless it backs #StopBrexit & #Remain. 
We're all going to starve with a No Deal Brexit ? maybe not  @ElContador2000 @Smileygirl19681 @Kalimeralynn @Bobilly10 @ultimateOne @SuzieSzabo2 @MagaRedKAG @Lin46222208 @TeddyUKIPClark @Carpheydenim @SueWhitaker11 @lorraineSW1 @Testo_Squirrel @p_beejal 
Brexit supporters need to understand one truth , leaving the EU won’t be enough. The rotten anti-democratic nature of MPs we’ve seen means the EU disease remains in parliament. We need to take back control of parliament for the people. @TheSDPUK is the vehicle , get onboard. 
Good to catch up with @Jacob_Rees_Mogg in Ballymena with @duponline @eastantrimmp and #IanPaisley talking brexit, Irish border, backstop and WTO. @Arron_banks @LeaveEUOfficial 
The fact that she does not agree with  Brexit does not disburden the Government of it’s obligation to plan for No Deal. The slogan ‘No Deal is better than a Bad Deal’ came into play early on in May’s deal pitch; so one assumes she knew it was on the cards. 
"If she (PM) got a substantive change to the backstop would you back the deal?" @afneil"It would have to be removed and it would have to be within the withdrawal agreement, in the legal text that it had gone" @EstherMcVey1#Brexit #bbctw  
Let Michael Edwards negotiate the brexit 
So it transpires that David Cameron & Enda Kenny had agreed a practical backstop that suited both sides here even before the referendum but UK remainer Civil servants rejected it to try and keep UK "close to Brussels" It's simple treachery. 
The majority of Italians are Europeanists and certainly would be happy if the United Kingdom remained in Europe, we hope for a new referendum.#facciamorete #FBPE 
It’s not the UK’s red lines that needto change Mr Verhofstadt it’s the intransigent EU, but never mind Guy most of us in the UK would prefer a No Deal Brexit in any event, and then you can erect your hard border independently..  
Came out today that Dominic Raab hasn't read the Good Friday Agreement, despite his previous role as Brexit Secretary. Guess what... It's 35 pages long. 35. He could have read it over a cup of tea. Could he be any less responsible? Remarkable arrogance.  
Thinking Brexiters didn't want to mention 'No Deal' because it's obviously a festival toilet in a field with martial law. To see it, for what it is, would expose every possible Brexit as being a point on the slippery slope to the same toilet. Remain smells so sweet in comparison. 
"Two year extension to Article 50 inevitable" - that should be enough for the inquiry and court cases. 
Why? His case isn’t for ages. So why hasn’t she stepped aside while she is under investigation? Any decent politician would do that. And why is there an SNP committee convened? All set up to whitewash her. And she wants to call a referendum while all this is goring on?  
When was the last time we heard an EU citizen on #bbcqt talking about what it's like to live #InLimbo due to #Brexit and #citizensrights uncertainty? We're 3.8 million, why are we not/never represented on @bbcquestiontime? 
Given Theresa May’s epic incompetence, as evidenced by her pathetic handling of the Brexit fiasco, there is only one living soul I trust in number 10 - and it ain’t a human.  
A whos who at unionism's before Brexit conference at the tullyglass last night.  
It should be absolutely unthinkable for Labour MPs to accept cash for votes to prop up May’s disastrous Brexit. Do they really think that is the way to rebuild trust in politics? It’s grubby and offensive. And Corbyn should not accept it.   
Please share with us what the 'benefits' of Brexit are for Scotland. 
Especially hard when asking your friend, who has protested Brexit alongside me. We are the same age, the generation brought up in the EU. We saw communism fall. And now we are putting walls up again? It’s nonsensical. At least we are stockpiling #magnums 
One in three UK firms plan for no-deal Brexit relocation, IoD says  
Whose ready to #MugClub tonight?We've got @Nigel_Farage trying to explain #Brexit to us.We look at the Democrat Party's infanticide agenda.And why is Bernie Sanders taking his clothes off?With @Brodigan and more! All at the top of the hour... 
Brexit update.Country that has yet to embrace the concept of mixer taps and that thinks opening a train door from inside by having to lean through the window and reach the ouside handle makes sense proposes to develop innovative technological solutions. 
Guardian front page, Friday 1 February 2019: Fear of hard Brexit pushes one in three firms to plan move abroad  
ERG chair Rees-Mogg and NCA target and Conservative party member, Arron Banks, welcomed by serial expenses abuser Ian Paisley Minor as they attend Ballymena DUP fund raiser...... 
We haven’t *even* had Brexit yet. And yet jobs are going directly because of it and drugs are in short supply in a way GPs are saying hasn’t happened before. 
Brexit and Trump transcript: Which country has bigger political problems?  
German anger builds over dangerous handling of Brexit by EU ideologues -   Brussels 
Brexit Preparedness: European Commission adopts final set of “no-deal” contingency measures for social security coordination rules #EU #Brexit #Pensions  
Something beautiful and amazing pre-bedtime to temporarily wash out all the Brexit horrors & ensure a peaceful sleep with wondrous dreams. Thanks @NadiaShireen  
My partner is 70 & devastated by brexit. He despises the no deal, let’s get on with it types & I feel sorry that he will have to suffer because let’s face it, we all will & he shouldn’t have to worry having worked hard, for this time of his life to be harmed bySelfish bigots 
Oh they need us to stay & will say any utter crap to make us do so.With Brexit they need every penny they can squeeze out of Scotland & it’s resources. If you think otherwise, you’re an idiot! 
One of the worst pundits I’ve seen on #bbcqt in some time. It’s remarkable that someone can be so wide of the mark, yet be so confident in their position. Britain is being duped. #Brexit  
I never look at @bbcquestiontime but watching tonight. They really don't understand the EU or #Brexit.The lady from the Telegraph  
The Government have made available:£4.2bn for no deal preparations£400mn for London authorities to deal with Brexit preparations. £1.5bn to buy the DUP£ ? to buy wavering Labour MP's votes for WA #EndHomelessnessNow #MagicMoneyTree 
A No Deal Brexit Potentially Fatal For People With Epilepsy  
Regardless of where Brexit goes, here are 5 signs of damage it has caused so far  
Today in history: Boris Johnson (l) and Jacob Rees-Mogg celebrate the EU referendum victory for Leave. (2016, colourised)  
Exactly @TiceRichard, having been born and then grown up in Africa, we all knew are best produce was sent to the overseas markets like UK. I had to come live here to eat the best fruit and veg I didnt get as a kid . #brexit #wtothewaytogo 
56 days until Article 50 deadline #Article50 #Brexit ⣿⣿⣿⣿⣿⣿⣿⣿⣿⣿⣿⣿⣿⣿⣿⣿⣿⣿⣿⣿⣿⣿⣿⣿⣿⣿⣿⣿⣿⣿⣿⣿⣿⣿⣿⣿⣷⣀⣀⣀ 
Brexit is 1367 hours away. #brexit 
If Theresa May is robust with Brussels now, she may finally be able to get Brexit right - also read some useful comments  via @Telegraph 
Senior Conservative back bencher Sir Graham Brady has told the BBC that he could accept a delay to Brexit - as long as a deal was already agreed. - BBC 
There are 1355 hours until we leave the World's largest trading bloc. It might sound crazy, but own Government has recommended that #UK Companies establish a presence there. Germany, anyone? #GmbH #Brexit #SingleMarket 
#scotbudget here's a solution... for #brexit 1 country called #irelandsfuture Ireland can be left alone to unite AGAIN #Scotland makes it's own decisions in a fairer union then WM can do what it wants  
Japan believes the vanguished should save face. Equally companies in keiretsu networks are closely intertwined with the state. Disinvestment from Brexit Britain is a geopolitical decision taken by state + business. Brexit Tories to be allowed to save face.But Brexit is the cause. 
Have your say: Should there be a second referendum?  
No. This is it  Unless you think boss of Honda is lying when he said decision had everything to do with global car industry developments, nothing to do with Brexit. Perhaps we should concentrate on helping Swindon, not making cheap, irrelevant and inaccurate political points.  
Clearly Brexit doth make some Remainers mad. They spent the day on Honda, whose boss says it’s nothing to do with Brexit.  And Ignored Mr Gove, who my good Remainer friend Robert Harris says has just admitted that Leave will not mean cheaper food. 
“Certainly Brexit has sped up this transition” - think tank director, Faiza Shaheen, says Britain’s departure from the EU has brought forward decisions - such as the closure of Honda’s UK factory - that otherwise may have been 10 years away#newsnight | @faizashaheen 
Brexit, what a load of old bollocks eh??..    (And people say I can't do political comedy... pah!) 
Well, right now, it's the mirrorverse trainwreck impulse: us with Trump & gerrymandering, them with Brexit, who's going to crash & burn harder? ::sigh:: 
It looks like the Tories will implode over Brexit & call a GE. So a group of Tories leave Labour to prevent them winning. 
Let's say you had a business and were relocating because of Brexit80% of British media is fervently pro Brexit and attacks anyone suggesting it might be a bad thingYour business prizes brand value very highlySomeone asks if you're leaving because of Brexit. What do you say? 
It's a good time to pull out. A #Honda guy said tonight that while they are changing to electric cars and their market is switching to #China, the uncertainty over #Brexit is not winning the UK any plaudits. Anybody with business sense knows that.  
Whereas you have left UKIP and joined the Brexit Party.  Looking forward to the by election.Of course you couldn’t get elected as an English MP.  No one wanted you. 
if case you don't know about #NoConCon   koch wants to have a constitutional convention.  he could then rip up our Constitution. and start over. you've already seen his 5 judges on scrotus. citizens united, etc. we cannot be asleep or we'll get something 1000x worse than brexit  
Problem is, we don't believe you Andrew, you're not a trustworthy source. You lunch with Farage and Murdoch, you're chairman of the Telegraph group, you have a vested interest in Brexit being delivered. 
Heads up. If u continue 2 enable #brexit, we'll remember at election day. This mess is on u now because u should have stood up & fought for what is right & NOT legitimise a #Frauderendum, calling it the will of the people.  R u going to block me now? I've heard u do that a lot. 
SInce Brexit hasn't happened yet, Javid's decision to strip Begum of UK citizenship also deprives her of her EU citizenship. Pretty sure there's case law that limits Member States' rights to do this. 
Read the below, bearing in mind that a no deal Brexit is a deliberate, engineered outcome. We don't have to have it - we could remain instead - so if we embrace the full horror it's because of Theresa May intentionally ignoring every chance to stop it.  
If he's really smart, Corbyn will wait till all the ones who would never accept him as leader gone, then back a second referendum so their main selling point to voters is taken from them 
How many more MPs need to leave their parties before there's a large enough parliamentary crisis to halt #Brexit?Asking for 16 million friends.#LabourSplit #TorySplit #BrexitChaos 
if vauxhall leaves the uk then brexit will have been worth it 
the independent group will soon vanish into irrelevancy where it belongs once umunna and leslie start sharing their actual policies and ideas bar "stop brexit."a party that at least adopted some left wing policies may have posed a threat but their too proud to even consider it 
Agreed. When I've been in Japan I learnt the hard way people are not always 'direct'?Amazing how some usually skeptical journalists (you know who I mean) are claiming that because Honda has said it has nothing to do with Brexit - it hasn't. 
I will never forgive @jeremycorbyn for turning his back on his own party, for not opposing #Brexit, for not demanding a #peoplesvote on any plan, and for his racism. @UKLabour is irrevocably lost to his far Left, and the sooner sensible people realise it the better. 
Owen they just want to destroy Corbyn, and the media will do all they can to help, they've probably made a hard Brexit more likely, but I really don't think they care, their main objective is get Corbyn and they don't care about the Labour movement or the people who rely on it. 
quite excited that tomorrow's episode of Brexit might begin with Soubry swinging open the doors of the Independence Group and strolling in in a big hat.  
Hold a second referendum on EU membership. - Petition to Sign.  
Has anyone EVER heard Sarah Wollaston back Brexit (as she claims she did) before she had her Damascene conversion to the High Table of Remain?If the good doctor told me tomorrow’s another day, i’d have to get a second opinion. 
BBC News - Sturgeon urges EU citizens to stay in Scotland after Brexit  
Real Conservatives don't hold fringe positions and expect to be a party of government. The country voted LEAVE. The Tory party got 42% vote share by promising to deliver BrExit. REMOAN Tories are the lunatic fringe. They are not real Tories. 
This is where the cheaper food lie unfolds. This is where we stumble to reach agreement with other countries to get all those wonderful new trade deals. This is another reality which spells out the con that #Brexit is.  
This is precisely why we need external help. We are in the middle of a right wing coup. The US and Canada are investigating the 2016 referendum. Why aren't the authorities in the UK?The BBC follows Govt orders.Those who protest against the referendum result are silenced.  
I loved the Lab manifesto in 17. But don't see how it's achievable with Brexit. That Lab haven't been able to pull ahead of DUP-supported Tories in last 2 years is astonishing.I quit Lab party and have felt politically homeless for some time, and know I'm not alone. 
This is brilliant. 21 minutes of pure Brexit broadcasting joy. And you don't get to say that very often.  
Even’ Tal. Don’t be a smart arse. Unless you think boss of Honda is lying when he said decision had everything to do with global car industry developments, nothing to do with Brexit. Perhaps we should concentrate on helping Swindon.  
I cannot imagine the anger and despair that Remainers in Swindon must be feeling. Even if you believe this is has nothing to do with Brexit, the irony is as a member, EU funding would have been allocated from Brussels to support the town and stop deprivation 
Joan Ryan's letter cites antisemitism within Labour as the main reason for her departure, but also describes @jeremycorbyn's Labour as 'cult-like,' and asserts that Corbyn 'offers no real opposition' to the 'crippling' Brexit we face.the #LabourSplit is sad, but understandable. 
Former #EU #PresidentBarroso today has said the #UK won't leave the EU on 29th March. This from the man who describes the EU as an "empire". He's not alone in his distain for #Britain...    Email your #MP to save #Brexit @  
And Honda announced last year they would leave the U.K. if a hard Brexit would happen.Now it is too late and it bails out. Whatever they may say to protect UK car sales, it is Brexit and nothing else that caused them to leave. 
@NE4Eu @sandersonkim TEFL teaching has been a great way for British people to work in Europe. They are now blocked due to #Brexit uncertainty.  
#Brexit is bad for health. #NoDeal is much worse. As I - and many other experts - have been saying for a long time now. @healthyBrexit @brexithealthlaw @UKandEU @Nickf72 @martinmckee @MarkFlear @JeanMcHale2 @Woodpolitics1 @sarahwollaston @NuffieldTrust @FionaCLoud 
“while the government "has been very ready to accept the evidence of Russian activity in the Skripal case" it has been "reluctant to accept evidence" of the same activity influencing the Brexit vote, due to ....being influenced by foreign interference.  
Emmanuel Macron will describe Brexit as a “grave” moment for Europe in a speech in coming weeks, as he admits fears there could be fresh attempts from other countries to split from the EU, sources close to the young centrist said on Monday.  
Pretty certain that the MPs going to the Independent Group know that their time as Members of Parliament is short. I fully expect and believe that they will sacrifice their status as MPs in a last desperate attempt to disrupt or attempt to stop Brexit. 
Important points by Ebadi, but a referendum could only come after the Khamenei regime is gone. A free and internationally monitored referendum in which #Iranians choose their next system of government and economy. 
So, Jeremy Corbyn, here we are at the crossroads. This road leads to election victory and a secure future for our country. And this road leads to Brexit, the devastation of the country, and the annihilation of the Labour Party. The choice is yours. 
Biz not your strong point Bonnie. Stick to literature. Unless u think boss of Honda is lying when he said decision had everything to do with global car industry developments, nothing to do with Brexit. Maybe u should concentrate more on helping Swindon. If u cld find it on a map.  
“I think we begin to see a pattern here of companies that... can’t deal with the unpredictability of Brexit” Economist George Magnus says companies like Honda have stopped investing in the UK due to cost structures which will rise as a consequence of leaving the EU#newsnight 
This IS Diesel and he's very sorry for causing the decline of the British car industry.Obviously he failed to believe in brexit enough.  
So it is just few weeks to #Brexit and few in UK care or want to know how potentially awful it may be. But I grew up in the Cold War, in the former colonies. So let me tell you what it triggers!THREAD 
The @BritishInEurope citizens rights team has raised it again and again and again in dozens of meetings in London, Brussels and EU27 capitals. It didn’t matter. We are just collateral damage, like so many and so much else in Brexit 
All those Leavers are right then. #Honda’s decision to close the Swindon plant has nothing at all to do with #Brexit. Would someone please explain that to the Japanese ambassador? He seems to think differently.....  
What a fabulous day!> Shemima Begum's British citizenship revoked> Labour Party split begins> 1 day closer to a No Deal Brexit 
For your collection of #TweetsThatHaveNotAgedWell#Brexit#AndrewNeil 
Email from my parents re: them visiting us this summer. Had to tell them to hold off on plans because of Brexit. How fucked up is this, that we have to tell our own families, don't know if it's safe for you to visit us in Scotland. 
Whilst the country teeters on the edge of a Hard Brexit cliff...Tories complain about Parking charges they don't need to enforceLib Dems whine about the FM putting Scottish trade on the mapLabour do what they always do, have a catastrophic meltdown and pass the Brexit buck 
So Young Labour are now holding votes on whether or not to tweet divisive tweets against Jewish MPs or not...And you guys thought Brexit was hard...  
Start by opposing Brexit & fighting for a #PeoplesVote. Enough with the slippery prevarications & misleading rubbish. - Where are Keir & Tom Watson? 
A cargo ship can take up to 6 weeks to sail from Britain to Asia. For firms that have to ship stuff around the world, Brexit arrived early. In this week's "Money talks", @CockettRichard looks at how businesses such as @cevalogistics are bracing for Brexit  
Brexit supporters suddenly discovering it’s really irritating when people blame our relationship with the EU for things that have a complex range of causes is my new favourite Twitter trend. 
Leading pro-Brexit campaigners have been found by the Electoral Commission to have broken the law. The NCA is investigating.Labour MP David Lammy said: “Brexit must be put on hold until we know the extent of these [alleged] crimes against our democracy.” 
This really gets you in the gut. This Honda worker has just taken on a new mortgage. When 3,500 jobs go - that’s everyone in the area competing for anything left - or moving. Gutting. And this Govt’s support for jobless is shocking. #GTTO #Brexit  
Miles - no they won’t.   That is simply untrue.  What is true however is that more than 100,000 people will face unemployment in the event of a no deal #Brexit which you  - personally - are doing nothing to prevent.   Worse, with this approach you are fiddling while Rome burns.  
If we're scaremongering, and Brexit will actually be great for this country, then...WHY exactly would we be scaremongering? 
Except that both their uk and Japanese chief execs have made clear it’s nothing to do with Brexit. Mendacious tweets like this are shameful.  
Hi labour luvvies and Corbynologists. How does it feel to be aligned with Farage, Mogg and Redwood? Facilitating Brexit? 
What is perhaps the most intriguing point about this curious opinion poll is that the brand new anti- Brexit 'independent group' are out polling the anti Brexit Lib Dems who have been around forever. People must still loathe the Lib Dems.  
And the Magnificent 7 become the awesome 8... This will creep up & up, and become a x-party crescendo. MPs of all political colors will want to be on the right side of history, no one decent will want to carry the Brexit can! @UKLabour @tom_watson @DavidLammy @YvetteCooperMP 
Sorry to deviate into politics. I've had this graph in my head for weeks and need to get it out of my system. It is my current understanding of the Brexit options. I think it's potentially something we could all agree on. You might need to adjust the scale of the x-axis to taste.  
A position forced on him by farmers but which destroys the free trade case for #Brexit and has echoes of the Corn Laws which split the Tories in the 19th century :  UK will apply food tariffs in case of no deal, Michael Gove says | Politics | The Guardian  
#Brexit isn't just a case of a 'difference of opinion' - the disastrous consequences ALREADY happening are being widely reported now - it's a dangerous and selfish REFUSAL to accept REALITY, and I'm just not pandering to that. #RevokeRemainRebuild #StopBrexitSaveBritain #Remain 
For first time in #brexit , I detected real pessimism @Europarl_EN today. Many fear crash out inevitable. While these are serious politicans, I still think it won’t happen. Common sense must prevail but real leadership as scarce as hen’s teeth!! #exitfrombrexit @FineGael 
brexit means brexit 
Deborah the free trade deal between the EU and Japan is certainly the problem.Honda can now build the cars in Japan and ship them to Europe with no import tax.The EU has cost these jobs not Brexit.  
These Tories are just embarrassing themselves now. Farmers in my constituency face being driven out of business by this Tory Brexit yet drivel on with made up numbers about car park legislation that hasn't even been considered yet.  
With the amazing @madeleinakay #eusupergirl telling le tout Paris  Brexit is couilles at a great European initiative for financing climate change financing  
You can believe the diplomatic words of Honda management today, that Brexit has nothing to do with the decision to close the Swindon factory, or you can believe their evidence to MPs just 14 months ago.#PeoplesVote@lbc #newsnight #r4today #PoliticsLive #bbcqt #pmqs #bbcaq 
This Brexit ad from the Leave referendum campaign has not aged well.Brexit truly was built on a pack of lies. MPs must #RevokeA50 & #StopBrexit. 
1/2.  This is a serious blow to the UK economy, Swindon & 000’s of families. But to be fair it is exactly what the Japanese auto (& pharma) companies have been warning us for 3 yrs was likely with a bad Brexit, which we are now 40 days from. This is a serious wake up call ....  
I was a Tory until the referendum. I would have voted Labour in the following GE if Corbyn had backed another referendum even though I thought him not fit for the job. I have now joined LibDems and will never vote Labour or Tory now. He has blown it.  
Sir John Major gave a compelling lecture on #Brexit -why we are hurtling towards the abyss -& why politicians must serve the interests of the country not their political parties at tonight’s John Smith Centre for Public Service lecture ⁦@UofGlasgow⁩ 
Any Brexit is a disaster that will put jobs at risk and make families poorer.Labour MPs should be campaigning to #StopBrexit, or millions of Remainers will vote for a party that does. 
About this, Naomi. Unless you think boss of Honda is lying when he said decision had everything to do with global car industry developments, nothing to do with Brexit. Perhaps we should concentrate on helping Swindon, not making cheap, irrelevant and inaccurate political points.  
At this point the UK is screwed, Brexit or no Brexit.  If you have any economic arguments then save your breath.  If you were hoping to save jobs then they're gone.  If you were hoping to save the NHS then there's no cash.  The only thing left to fight for is rights and freedoms. 
Enfield North MP Joan Ryan has resigned from the Labour Party to join the Independent Group saying Jeremy Corbyn has allowed antisemitism to "infect" the party and accused him of "playing games with Brexit" 
The BBC have just pointed out that the trade deal between the EU and Japan means that Honda won't need to build cars here because there will be no import tax.They can simply import them from Japan.Looks like it's the EU's fault and not Brexit @DavidLammy 
Every day as a GP I get the message back from the pharmacy (after prescribing) that x, y or z medication is not available. Happens more & more but almost impossible to say whether it’s due to Brexit or drug suppliers diverting supply to maximise profit (poss to due Brexit too!) 
Brexit is entirely about eschewing short term considerations in favour of crucial and fundamental long-term reforms. This is just more meaningless centrist soundbite.  
Hey, did you know that the European Medicines Agency (EMA) leaving London has nothing at all to do with #Brexit?Yeah... it’s just a natural consequence of continental political changes. #Honda #HondaSwindon #Projectreality #LetsgoWTO #GTTO #FBPE 
32 voices, from 32 counties for Irish Unity "It's time to build a new Ireland based on the principles of equality and respect — it's time for a referendum on Irish unity!" #Time4Unity #Tá32 
Pathetic of MayShe is bowing to pressure from Remainer Cabinet ministers to hold a so-called meaningful vote on a meaningless piece of paper that makes no legally binding change to her 'Brexit' dealThe ERG and DUP still won't support it via @Telegraph 
Interesting that the first plant that Honda has closed in 71 years globally is in a UK approaching Brexit. Tells you everything. Brace for impact. 
Example here of why @bbcnickrobinson is not impartial on Brexit. He knows Leavers like Mogg & Patterson promised Brexit would lead to lower food prices. He didn’t challenge them then, and he hopes we’ve forgotten now. 
@MikeGapes: I am sickened that Labour is now seen as an anti-Semitic party, and furious that its leadership is facilitating Brexit. From Russia to Syria to Venezuela, Jeremy Corbyn is on the wrong side. #ChangePolitics 
Worth reading Milne’s thoughts on a previous referendum: Crimea, 2014. Held after Russia invaded. Not recognised by any member state of EU. Or as Milne puts it: ‘..Crimeans voted overwhelmingly to join Russia.’    
Live in or near Dundee? Then come join me @dundeeuni on 11 April, 6pm, for my @HistoryScotland Lecture. Given the proximity to, you know, "that day", my lecture is about "Global Scotland in the age of Brexit". It's *free* but please register, details here:  
Once again @KateHoeyMP ignores all recent polling evidence showing 92% in Ireland support continuing EU membership. Her continued #irexit talk is a mere distraction from the unfolding #brexit disaster she helped creat!   
Brexit news: Jean-Claude Juncker 'not expecting breakthrough' in blow to PM ahead of fresh talks in Brussels - Evening Standard  
Remainers lied about Jaguar Land Rover, lied about Nissan and now they are lying about Honda. The job losses announced today are tragic but they have nothing to do with Brexit, says @FraserMyers 
If Brexit goes through, these 250 companies may relocate to the Netherlands  
This is what this Tory Brexit is doing to farms in Scotland yet they still threaten No Deal which they know will cripple Scottish farmers. The @ScotTories need to stop loitering in car parks and get down to the farm gate. 
The ladybird book of trade deals with other planets part of the bright #Brexit future series  
Mr Gove's determination to protect British farmers removes the best economic argument for Brexit: cheap food. Did Robert Peel repeal the corn laws for this? #freetrade 
Here’s something about the ‘listening’ Labour Party... Both the deputy party leader AND shadow Brexit Secretary are now BARRED from Brexit meetings! @SeumasMilne, Derek Hatton & @LenMcCluskey are not though. Corbyn continues to ignore policy & piss on its members. #fbpe 
Well it’s the same guy who in the Autumn said they were fully committed to Swindon... oh and also told select committee Brexit was a factor. So....  
My Cornish company is moving from UK to EU. 'Nothing to do with Brexit of course!'The real reason is that May et al are lying duplicitous devious insane poisonous zealots that we don't trust further than we can spit into a gale! Japan's ambassador said  same thing really. 
The Daily Record tomorrow highlights the looming threat to Scotland's economy of a no-deal Brexit and Record View issues a stark warning to the country.  
I think you will find that Britain will be signing a large number of trade deals across the world in the Brexit era, including with the US, and far more than the EU. Sovereignty and self determination matter above all.  
How can independent MPs demand another referendum, but refuse to put themselves up for their own People's Vote?' | via @telegraph 
Got a letter today telling me my heating bill is going up 44% because of Brexit so that’s cool.    
One of the greatest opportunities of Brexit is the ability to sign free trade agreements 
The SNP doesn’t need an ‘incentive’ to demand another referendum. They are a sovereigntist party. They exist to pursue sovereignty. Fair play to them but had the UK voted Remain and Cameron then crushed Labour in a snap election, that would’ve been an ‘incentive’ for the SNP too. 
It takes a major leap of faith to take seriously anything that Brexiteer @michaelgove says, but if he’s actually conceding that some aspects of Brexit may be bad, you can bet that it will be cataclysmic.#PutItToThePeople #StopBrexit 
Is there any way we can get together some sort of award or celebration for @borderirish for the most original, understated, chilled, and accurate reporting about this brexit shit? 
Not every storm that comes will be blown here by Brexit. But it will be Brexit's fault that the roof leaks when they do come. It leaves our economy less weatherproof: the rains will lash harder and afterwards the clean-up will be more arduous. 
Brexit causing ‘palpable decline’ in UK influence at the UN 
I've came to the conclusion that England whom demanded brexit deserves a no deal brexit. Only England can solve its brexit problem, Scotland and Northern Ireland, well looks like they will be walking away from it, as Usain Bolt says "fuck me that was fast". 
Your click just shut down. Unless you think boss of Honda is lying when he said decision had everything to do with global car industry developments, nothing to do with Brexit. Perhaps we should concentrate on helping Swindon, not making cheap and inaccurate political points.  
Important piece by @TerryGlavin, interviewing Shirin Ebadi.  Takeaways:1) IRI can't be reformed.  A referendum is needed.2) Canada shouldn't re-open embassies. 3) Magnitsky sanctions NOW4) Confiscate the wealth that regime affiliates bring to Canada. 
Disgraceful and dangerous that Brexiters should be putting our food security at risk.Brexit is risking a huge food price hike.We don’t have to go ahead with this. It’s time for MPs to #RevokeA50 & #StopBrexit. 
I'm seriously considering a private prosecution against @theresa_may for misconduct in public office, namely that she proceeded with a referendum decision despite knowing that parties acted illegally. Would anyone support me? #brexit #Referendum  
The sheer and utter hypocrisy of the 7 Blairites who quit the Labour PartyThey demand Britain has a second Brexit referendum so people can have a ‘another say’ - while all 7 of them refuse to call by-elections to give their constituents another sayBlairite democracy in action  
Applause justified. Unless you think boss of Honda is lying when he said decision had everything to do with global car industry developments, nothing to do with Brexit. Perhaps we should concentrate on helping Swindon, not making cheap, irrelevant and inaccurate political points.  
theresa may when she sees joon walk up to 10 downing street and propose another election to end brexit  
Brexit story of the day - Leave leader @michaelgove promised farmers he’d use tariffs to block cheaper food imports after Brexit & warned that some food prices will rise dramatically in the event of a No Deal Brexit 
Been looking for a ‘powerful emotional’ video from Tom Watson on the Tory Brexit shambles or the Universal Credit nightmare or the Windrush scandal or the disaster of Tory austerity. Four years as Deputy Leader and nothing, we’re all still searching..  
Andrew Neil 2016 not aging well...Now wait to watch him talking up all the OTHER reasons whilst failing to explain that Brexit was the straw that broke the camel’s back and the Japanese Ambassador tried to explain over ..and over..and over...  
As predicted another unicorn vanishes. The Tory party as presently constituted cannot agree what #Brexit it wants and won’t by the 29th of March.  So either seek a delay for a referendum or call the whole shambolic, disastrous , fated and failed thing off.  
I'm going to honest a probably lose some followers.My first preference for Brexit is to leave on a managed WTO basis.BUT. I want to leave the EU. So like the ERG I am willing to accept the withdrawal agreement with a legally binding limit to the backstop.I just want out. 
I understand why elected UK politicians hesitate to argue for revoking article 50 and cancelling Brexit. But why wouldn‘t more UK newspapers take that liberty? No one elected you. You’re free. Isn‘t it your job to challenge your nation and readers? You still have 950 hours left. 
Approach of @vincecable & @LibDems Parliamentarians to #LabourSplit has been deft & appropriate. Groups can ally together to help force a #PeoplesVote & halt UK politics drift towards extremes. #brexit will bring change but not that hoped for by Corbyn, May or Brexiters.  
If Gove is correct & tariffs will apply to food imports after Brexit, then two things are certain, 1 Food prices will go up, 2 Food will be scarcer as delivery trucks wait to fill customs forms & pay taxes. Gove is promising the exact opposite of his 2016 Frauderendum lies. 
  HELP TO SAVE OUR CAR INDUSTRY FROM BREXIT :  #honda #Hondaswindon #nissan #sunderland #jaguarlandrover 
.@chrisleslieMP and @ChukaUmunna insist voters must be allowed to vote again on #Brexit because circumstances have changed.However, since resigning from Labour they refuse to allow constituents a vote in a by-election.They are a pair of #fraudsters. 
All European Union countries need to keep acting united as the #Brexit date approaches. Our shared project must be strengthened to stop nationalist movements on the upcoming european elections, #EUelections2019. 
Nobody will block Brexit extension, Juncker says  
Aaaand there it is - JRM talking about slashing environmental and safety standards post-Brexit.  
Did you vote for Labour's Chukka Umunna because he promised to deliver Brexit?Well, guess what, he's quit the party and YOUR MP wants to STOP BREXIT now.Are you angry about this betrayal? SO, DEMAND A "PEOPLES VOTE", a by-election to swap him for a Brexiteer.  
So none of  the cheaper food promised by the Leave campaign. The referendum result is all the lying Quitters have left  
This feels like a strategic move by government - stoke the discussion, get people arguing against human rights = ever easier to remove them once Brexit happens. Whatever we feel or don't feel towards a person, we have to believe in the structures in place otherwise we all lose. 
Brexit backstop talks: Theresa May to present EU with new proposals.May isn't bothering with the plane or the train to Brussels this time, she's taking the unicorn.  
Self-governing independent nations make their own laws, control their own borders and have their own courts. Farage SHUTS DOWN Swedish MEP in fierce Brexit spat - 'We will be FREE'  
Watch the three videos in this thread: Brexit is over.  
I've tweeted this previously and make no apologies for doing so today, or tomorrow, the day after that and every day  from then on until the result of the referendum is respected. A reminder that #17.4millionbetrayedPlease retweet if you feel the same, thank you  
I will now move on from the Brexit-related drivel being tweeted about Honda today by irrational Remainers. If Michael Gove said what he’s reported to have said today re tariffs on food, then the Brexit case that Leave = cheaper food has just gone down in flames 
Government distracting us with this Shamima nonsense from the Brexit mess   
Actually UK farming could see incomes rise from No Deal Brexit - depending on the policy balance struck between consumer & producer interests. See @DGWilkinson analysis on various tariff scenarios. 
90% of Honda Swindon’s output goes to the EU. Japan-EU trade deal gets rid of 10% tariff into EU. Honda has plants in Belgium. UK gov Brexit plan is to be out of EU single market and CU. You do the math...  
Any doubt things are not great in world of Brexit. Juncker tonight: “There isn’t enough movement for me to be able to expect this to be a discussion with a concrete outcome. I don’t know what Mrs. May will communicate to me tomorrow... unsure what our British friends would like”. 
If you need proof that some politicians are way out of touch and way out of their depth today, this from John Major is it.To claim 63% didn’t vote for Brexit, when - by those terms - 65% didn’t vote to stay in the EU, shows how laughably poor UK political debate is today.  
Honda said its decision to end manufacturing in the UK was not linked to Brexit. 
This much more important than all the Brexit-related drivel being tweeted about Honda today. If this is true the Brexit case that Leave = cheaper food has just gone down in flames.  
Barbara, Duncan and Mohammed (aka @Fayaz786pk) voted leave in 2016 but they have all now seen the reality of brexit & changed their minds & are #RemainerNow (NB recognise 3 reported #leavernow in the article but 2 of those are just resiled Remainers) 
Brexit is basically 3 entire years of the Fyre Festival 
.@fshakir had a key role in the People Power initiative that ACLU launched in last two years, which had a big role in MI's voting rights referendum. An interesting hire for Bernie.  
That nasty little Remoaner @terrychristian wants Brexit voters to lose their jobs for having the audacity to vote against the EU.Here’s caring Terry with super-paedophile-predator Jimmy Savile. What a lovely pair they made.Talentless twat. pic.twitter.com/IRsUxC4aMh 
BBC news has gone from disgusting to vile - even Honda have disowned the so called news saying its nothing to do with brexit  
Do they have Brexit in Turkey as well?Honda to end production of Civic models at Turkey plant in 2021  
John Major understands why #Brexit justifies a second #Independence referendum. The @ScotTories should pay attention to their former leader #ScotlandsPlaceInEurope #indyref2 
Like the Remoaners that are constantly telling us - ALL THE WORLDS PROBLEMS ARE DUE TO BREXIT & not the real reason - THAT THEY ARE ON THE EU GRAVY TRAIN THEMSELVES . Of course Brexit will cause hiccups but we will be better off in the end  
Fundamental issues and the financial need for a clean Brexit  
It’s not because of Brexit. It’s just in case they need to start shooting civilians because of global market conditions. 
Actually, the issue is, for elements of the Remain and Brexit camps, facts are mere inconveniences and rational debate another country. They make Mr Trump’s tweets look almost rational.  
BBC News - Conservatives being 'manipulated by Brexit zealots', ex-PM Major to warn  
“Britain voting for Brexit was like Pompeii voting for the volcano” John Oliver on Last Week Tonight 
Over 400 ex Isis have been readmitted to U.K. Why is Javid holding this one pregnant girl to account? Distraction from Brexit? Pandering to far right? Yes to both those questions. 
EU stresses again it "will not reopen" its Withdrawal Agreement with Britain 
Shamina Begum will appeal this decision re: citizenship (if that letter is genuine) and will probably win and will come back to the UK. This will then be used as part of all the talk around Brexit and border control. Feels like a big PR play to me 
John Major with an extraordinary barnstorming speech tonight in Glasgow - a welcome intervention which pretty much calls out the brexit madness and our broken politics  
this sort of disastrous economic news should be a moment to just say, "Brexit is dumb and evil; we're not going to do this." Instead he argues that he'll rearrange the deck chairs. 
We've mapped the latest 250 #BrexitJob Losses after #Honda. Browse the map of the who and how many redundancies here.#StopBrexit#PeoplesVote #PutItToThePeople 
3500 job losses for #Honda in Swindon.Media - is it because of #Brexit Honda - NO Media - Are you sure it’s got nothing to do with Brexit Honda - YES Media - Why are you closing Honda - Unprecedented shift towards electric vehicles Media conclusion, Brexit to blame! 
it's not the mishandling of Brexit, though. It's the fact that Brexit is happening. Corbyn always presents it as if there's some magical way to handle Brexit that won't lead to disaster. I think that's a disservice.  
Facts remain. Unless you think boss of Honda is lying when he said the decision had everything to do with global car industry developments and nothing to do with Brexit. Perhaps we should concentrate on helping Swindon, not making cheap, irrelevant and inaccurate political points  
Not just any old Swede but the formidable ultra bright Italian born wife @AnnaMariaCB of the former PM of Sweden @carlbildt. UKIP did peddle bull over Brexit and still do now. Lies, damned lies, and UKIP more or less sums it up.  
Why in Brussels they say the odds of no-deal Brexit are 60% - ITV News  
In stroke of the usual LP “Leadership” not only is Starmer left out of critical meetings on Brexit (eg with No 10) but the Deputy PM Tom Watson is also supposed to attend key meetings but it is understood he has not been invited to one since Feb last year.  
EU Brexit lawCouncil and European Parliament agree law on flights to/from UK after no deal Brexit: Must still be officially approved, but that's normally a formality. Unilateral and temporary. Full text of the law not yet available. 
themselves remain incredible. And thinking of all the Brexit mess that really is saying something. In any case, and while I appreciate fully the complexities of Shemima's case and why many struggle with it, there is a reason international law outlaws making someone stateless. 2/2 
Watch Karin Vaughan: "It's the only life I've ever known" Karin was born in Germany. After 35 years of living and working in Scotland, she is now worried about her citizenship after Brexit. 
Something I wrote before the referendum, I wish I would have phrased it stronger and mentioned how much more medication will cost us, how the NHS is suffering from losing EU staff due to a hostile environment...  
This is really touching I hope @jeremycorbyn listens to Therese. Therese and Most of the country are waiting for his leadership to fight Brexit #FinalSay Please send your MP a personal message at  
Remainers need to be ready to change from campaign to stay or vote again. The Brexit mandate ends when the WA is agreed and we leave.We have to shift very quickly into a new narrative of demanding closest possible ties or the ERG will set their unicorns loose. 
This from @NSoames is so right and so important. This is what #Brexit is really about. Not petty, tactical party manoeuvres, theoretical backstops and so-called meaningful votes...  
More and more jobs are being lost because of Brexit.MPs need to take action in the national interest: #RevokeA50 and #StopBrexit. 
Arron Banks was pinged in Lauterbrunnen when Andy Wigmore told Sky and BBC in Feb 2016 he was returning from Moscow via Switzerland after talking to Sberbank about a Gold consolidation deal 
It's going to be interesting discussing Brexit in the context of F1. By interesting I mean nightmarish. 
was out supporting the brilliant Fairfield Labour council team today alot of great conversations had about topics like Brexit and bins amongst others #labourdoorstep 
Meanwhile, there are now cargo ships at sea that won't reach their destination ports until after Brexit day, and with no idea what trade conditions will exist when they dock. Literally couldn't get more uncertain. 
If May gets her Deal through next week, then Corbyn will not have fired a shot over Brexit. Will be lots of unhappy people. 
Amsterdam is winning so much Brexit business that its financial regulator needs a budget boost to keep up  
I fear hot heads will fail to see what’s happening here but it seems clear this dereliction of UK government responsibility is another cost of a failing #Brexit process. Our values are corroding.  
A man about to lose his job at Honda went viral with a glorious 13-second Brexit takedown 
38 days left until Brexit with no plan in place. If there was a Royal Wedding in 38 days, and there was no plan, there would be utter fucking panic in all the newspapers. 
NHS trusts will have “no choice but to prioritise” which patients receive cancer treatment if a no-deal Brexit delays the import of radioactive isotopes, the Royal College of Radiologists has warned. Is that REALLY what people voted for?? #stopbrexit 
Oh come on people, Brexit is, was and always will be a really bad idea. Shall we just not do it? 
True.But they can still hack your mind. See, e.g., Brexit.  
'We are leaving!' Farage SHUTS DOWN Swedish MEP in fierce Brexit spat - 'We will be FREE'  
The Brexit amendment prepared by MPs Peter Kyle and Phil Wilson offers a much-needed compromise, writes @JolyonMaugham 
What's the betting that if Brexit goes ahead then in a few years time you wont be able to find anyone that admits to voting for it? 
in Hell, Brexit & T***p will be revealed, as in a Borgesian/Dantean allegory, as but two faces of a single malformed entity.  
Before Andrew says, "Oh but it's got nothing to do with Brexit" he should listen to his own Political Editor on his own magazine's podcast. “To deny there’s any Brexit factor at all would be wrong.” (10m 20s in)  
Companies leaving the country. Massive job losses. Food and medicine supply risks. Brexit is a disgrace. An absolute disgrace. “Take back control”. FFS. 
NEWS! Brexit has nothing to do with Brexit, insist Brexiters  
This is the language that alienated so many from our Party in the first place. Respectable people who are deeply sceptical about the benefits of the EU project are not zealots. Surely the referendum result should have been your wake up call John?  
EU27 consultations. Today in #Madrid for constructive meetings with President @sanchezcastejon MFA @JosepBorrellF & SoS @marcoaguiriano. Clear and strong unity of EU27 to preserve the withdrawal agreement in all its dimensions, including on Ireland. #Brexit  
Major doesn’t have a clue what a ‘traditional Conservative’ is. Thanks to pulling the wool over the public’s eyes on Maastricht, we lost a huge chunk of our voting base to UKIP. Both tories in the shires and working class tory voters are united in the desire for a clean Brexit.  
@thecatreviewer my Russian Shorthair Abe is listening to the news about Brexit and is worried he will be removed from the UK. 10/10 for political awareness. 3/10 for being unpredictable on if he will be allowing fusses at any given time. 10/10 when he is allowing fusses.  
Don’t weaken animal-welfare laws after Brexit, ministers warned  
Brexit verdict from Barnier spokesman @StefaanDeRynck: "Don't try this at home." 
A few more data points to support my negativity @JGForsyth. Based on chats w all sides. Short #Brexit thread 
UK warning: We are not listening to you, we do not give a damn about anything YOU have to say!MACRON WARNING: Brexit is 'GRAVE' for Europe and could SPREAD - shock speech REVEALED  
Kate, you’ve poisoned the U.K. with your lies but we won’t let you away with it here. More than 85% of the Irish population are happy with and want to remain part of the E.U. What you said has zero basis in fact. Where do you get off making these spurious accusations? #Brexit  
970 days since the referendum.892 hours until Brexit.We still don't have the faintest idea what will happen on 29 March. 
I turned 51 on Saturday. What has 'Great Britain' given me?* Thatcherism* BrexitBoth wouldn't have happened if Wales was independent. Give @YesCymru a follow. 
There's thick and then there's Andrew Brigden....the negotiation ended months ago. 
#OAS General Secretary deemed the constitutional referendum in #Cuba illegitimate“The international community should act accordingly & denounce the illegitimacy of the #24F referendum & the constitution#Canada@RosaMariaPaya interviewed by @elsa_cruzm 
Brexit mugs are so desperate for Brexit not to be blamed. It makes me sad. Only 6% of Honda's made in Swindon are diesels.  
Part of this evening's shout at the gates of the Houses of Parliament at 6 o'clock. That's how we finish every day of peaceful protest at #Sodem against BrexitWhy not join us?#StopBrexit 
The first people who should lose their jobs are Johnson, Gove, Mogg, Stuart, Davis and the rest of the #Brexit mobsters.Just saying.#RevokeA50 
The tragedy of Honda is that it didn’t see a future for developing EVs in ‘global Britain’. Where is the queue of international manufacturers itching to invest in Brexit Britain? 
"the whole country united behind" their manifesto...  brexism really is a mental condition. No Remainers united behind a brexit Party. He got away with it because he sat on the fence.  The country wants to remain and yet you get this. How conscious are these people??  
 Turull and Romeva defend referendum in trial. Learn what you need to know, and more, in 100 seconds . 
I genuinely can't my head around all these Brexiteers who didn't understand Brexit was going to mean many companies leaving the UK and massive job losses. I mean what did they think was going to happen? 
Always useful to remind ourselves what Rees Mogg's favourite economist, Patrick Minford, said  would happen to the British car industry l, and our manufacturing, after a hard Brexit.@lbc #newsnight #r4today #nbcaq #bbcqt #PoliticsLive #PeoplesVote 
The President of the National Farmers Union says a no-deal scenario aka “WTO Brexit” is the stuff of nightmares. 
I would say that the Independent Group, the LibDems & Greens need to talk urgently about how to evolve into something new pretty quickly. Splitting the vote is not a good idea....But the V. urgent priority now is still to #RevokeA50 & Stop #Brexit  
They are making an example of her pure and simple and it’s a great diversionary tactic for Brexit 
Nigel Farage warns anti-Brexit campaigner Alastair Campbell: “You’re not telling the truth and you know it!” @Nigel_Farage | #Honda 
Tell me (I'm a suspicious old biddy (I wouldn't, but hey) but doesn't all this :'OF COURSE it has nothing to do with #Brexit ..mean it has everything to do with #Brexit?#stopbrexit #fbpe #honda #swindon 
Hope you can work with the @LibDems and the @TheGreenParty and others under one umbrella party to defeat brexit. 
The long-awaited Brexit split between unilateral free traders and Tory landowners has arrived. Minford denounces comrade Gove for bourgeois deviationism.  
Suspend #Article50 and put Theresa Mays deal to the public with remain on ballot. If it's that good she'll win easily. In the meantime if we have to participate in the European Elections then let's try electing people who want to be there. Not fucking Farage #Brexit #PeoplesVote 
The British government revoking Shamima Begum’s citizenship is nothing to rejoice over. Look at the bigger picture, the precedent set with this decision is a direct contravention of international law. With Brexit looming this is alarmingly worrying 
BUT WHAT ABOUT BREXIT? 
What absolute rubbish!Mr PiggyWeasel has joined Project Fear. Could this be the start of May's final assault on Brexit?  via @Telegraph 
Imagine Honda admitting Brexit was a major factor in closing UK plants. What would that do to their UK sales?See the problem? 
Labour have stopped inviting Tom Watson to meetings of the committee which decides its Brexit policy (even though he’s a member). 
If you guys haven't checked it out yet, I was on the legend @JolyonRubs podcast last week. we chatted all things Brexit, the environment and the impact of the youth on changing the world!  
if you are a traditional #Conservative or #Labour voter:With the new #BrexitParty & #TheIndependentGroup forming who would you now vote for at a #GeneralElection ?** Please retweet after voting **#Brexit #WTOBrexit 
Councils are already struggling to run basic services due to Tory funding cuts. Adding to this burden by asking them to prepare for ‘No-Deal’, which @theresa_may could easily rule out, is shameful. The only way out of this #Brexit mess is to give the public a #FinalSay! 
NEW: Just had a chat with Brexit Secretary Stephen Barclay who confirmed the UK WILL take new legal proposals out to EU tomorrow, prepared by the Att Gen Geoffrey Cox. Also confirmed Malthouse Compromise alt arrangements will form part of future relationship discussions only. 
Britain admits it isn’t likely to reach agreements with Japan and South Korea to roll over existing trade deals before Brexit  
Home Secretary wishes to arbitrarily revoke rights of someone the public doesn't like. Worrying thing is that this may work. If it does work, it will encourage further moves of this kind. And it will be easier for them to do so after Brexit, assuming we leave ECHR.  
Please let us know what you think now with just five weeks to go to the #Brexit catastrophe: 
Whatever the outcome of Brexit, there is nothing more important than children & their safety.  Thats why we - the four UK Children’s Commissioners - are seeking assurances on the immediate issues facing children arising from Britain leaving the EU.   
All day long, BBC has been desperate to push line that Honda’s closure has absolutely nothing to do with Brexit. No dissenting voices allowed. No questions about warnings of Japanese govt, nothing about Honda warning Swindon voters on eve of referendum in 2016. 
This report is devastating on loss of UK diplomatic clout due to Brexit; far from ‘liberating’ us to ‘punch above our weight’ as ‘Global Britain’, our influence is already shrinking - and we’re afraid to offend China re its human rights abuses  
At @FinalSayForAll, we fight for the rights of #The5Million disenfranchised citizens. We’ve filmed and collected many moving stories about the personal impacts of Brexit. Our aim is to disseminate them, especially to those who can bring about change.  /3 
After the referendum, Michael @MintyTeaboy was told to "eff off back to Frogland" while sitting in a car with a French number plate in a supermarket car park. The referendum unleashed this xenophobia and it's incumbent upon all of us to speak out. #BrexitIsPersonal /1 
I heartily recommend BBC journalists, reporters and editors watch @iamjohnoliver's return with Last Week Tonight. He summed up Brexit in 20 minutes with more class and clarity than any of you lot have managed in 2.5 years. 
Britain is heading for a no deal #Brexit on March 29—and will thrive and prosper freed from the shackles of the EU. The European Union has not negotiated in good faith, and has approached the Brexit negotiations in a hugely negative and destructive fashion.  
Striking that the height of Brexiter ambition now is just: 'not *every* piece of bad news is directly attributable to Brexit'.  
As a grassroots #Conservative member I campaigned to leave the #EUI knew what that meant.I expect nothing less than what 17.4m people voted for from the Government.Please retweet if you agree.Britain expects.....@Arron_banks @LeaveEUOfficial @andywigmore#Brexit #nodeal 
This 'will of the people' bollocks?The referendum was a product of proven electoral fraud and foreign interference (probably funding).It was a non specific, explicitly advisory vote. It arbritrarily disenfranchised many who'd be most affected.It was years ago. #Peoplesvote 
Yes of course, #Honda did not choose to leave the #Swindon UK due to #Brexit. Yeah, right.It's sad because they warned and told they would.(#Hondaswindon #Brexitshambles) 
#TonightVMTV #rtept If FG collapsed the Gov because the majority of the Dail consider Simon Harris incompetent, then it’s Varadkar who would be guilty of ‘National Sabotage’FF are supporting this Gov because they’re terrified to face the Electorate, nothing to do with #Brexit  
No one:JK Rowling: The person who did the cleaning at Ollivander's shop was actually a vegan tri-gendered half-muslim half-buddhist mixed-race adopted British Latino anti-Trump anti-Brexit pro-choice feminist socialist undocumented migrant from Mars who arrived in a meteorite. 
In the latest blow to the UK car industry as #Brexit approaches, Honda to close UK car plant  
Fellow remainers: If another referendum were to happen, it’s probably best if you don’t have a backlog of tweets like this where you sound like a vindictive bellend who wants to punish the ill-informed for the crime of believing the lies they were told by liars.  
.@TiceRichard: "Last year the UK grew faster than Germany, France and Italy, our unemployment levels are half that of the Eurozone unemployment level, and wages are growing faster than inflation, thanks to Brexit" #LetsGoWTOEmail your MP to save Brexit @  
This member of the Cabinet  @GregClarkMP desperate to blame Brexit. No confidence in our country so why does @10DowningStreet keep him there 
We may not be able to export ANY food for 6 months after a no-deal Brexit, confirmed today by Gove. “The EU still have not listed the UK as a full third country … As I speak there is no absolute guarantee we will continue to be able to export to the EU.”  
 A former Tory Prime Minister seems to understand the desire for a referendum on Scotland’s future.  
The way the Scottish people is being treated by this government since the independence referendum is deplorable. Circumstances have changed and the people of Scotland should now be given another opportunity to decide their own destiny. And soon... 
note: if May’s Brexit deal goes ahead, EU citizens and UK nationals will continue to be able to travel freely with a passport or identity card until the end of the transition period in December 2020 so no visa will be required. however, a no deal brexit would cause a problem.  
“Does the Sec of State agree or disagree - for the sake of those who are failing to understand - with the Senior VP of Honda, Ian Howells who’s confirmed this decision has nothing to do with Brexit, it is not driven by Brexit and it is not because of Brexit” @SuellaBraverman 
Wow. Brilliant, concise and indisputable.The case for Remain destroyed by a teacher in less than one minute.#brexit #nodeal #WTO #control 
Absolutely terrified. Can't concentrate. Trouble sleeping. And if I could find *1* brexiter, just 1, who'd calmly give me good reasons why this is ok, without calling me "sneering", "liberal elite" or "traitor", I'd feel better. But Brexit isn't about facts. It's about feelings. 
The poll doesn’t include the Brexit party strangely ...  
Now published: Duncan Bell & Srdjan Vucetic, "Brexit, CANZUK, and the Legacy of Empire," British Journal of Politics and International Relations (2019)@srdjanvucetic @Dept_of_POLIS 
C’mon Alastair...It isn’t the case that Honda changes were “done by Brexit”. You know that as well as I do... 
Grey Man, John Major in a lecture in Glasgow says Brexit makes an independent Scotland "more likely"."English & Welsh votes will take Scotland out of the EU against its will. Scotland cannot apply to re-join unless they are independent. The incentive to try again is clear." 
An unexpected outcome of Brexit is the destruction of the media's reputation for impartiality and honesty. That includes:> BBC News and Current Affairs> Sky News> Channel 4> Channel 5The constant pro-EU manipulation of facts (aka lies) and programme rigging is astonishing. 
ARMYs don’t forget about brexit if your booking tickets to either London from another EU country or if your from UK and wanting to go to France you need to know if you need visas! Yes I know, FUCK BREXIT!! 
There are two schools of thought: winning Indy means painstaking building of arguments and winning indy means not losing the urgent impetus of the Brexit bourach. These are NOT mutually exclusive tactics. But the footsoldiers  are in desperate need of encouragement 
Sir John Major has warned that the “agonies of Brexit” could break up Britain and lead to an independent Scotland.  
Imagine being @montie @afneil or @JuliaHB1 trying to spread enough doubt the widely predicted UK industry collapse post #brexit has zero to do with brexit.Only in order to get brexit over the line before workers realise how screwed they are.How do these people sleep at night? 
Honda: This is Not a Brexit-Related Issue  
Has anyone realised that #Brexit vastly increases our chances of dying in some sort of queue? Dole queue, food-bank queue, hospital waiting list queue..... Such a British way to die  
UK, Survation poll:European Union membership referendumRemain: 52% (-3)Leave: 48% (+3)+/- 30 JanField work: 18 February 2019Sample size: N/A#Brexit #BrexitDeal #BrexitVote #BrexitDebate 
Gap between rational moderates Tories like John Major & current party leadership over #Brexit is widening significantly. It's not just that they're at odds with the ERG, they're almost in open revolt against May herself. Significant schism in Tories is now looking possible.  
During the referendum, Dominic Grieve said Leave supporters officially wanted "a World Trade Organisation agreement with special privileges for the United Kingdom" - so why has he resisted implementing it?  
This article of mine is now two years old. It was supposed be a worst case Brexit scenario to get people to wake up.A lot of it has happened and is happening with weeks still to go before exit day.It’s a warning. Always was. And the ears were deaf.  
The Dutch Brexit rapporteurs have been in London this week in meetings with UK politicians from right and left.I asked one how it went. He told me he's returning to the Netherlands, and recommending that preparations for No Deal be redoubled. 
Useless, irrelevant has-been in "says the same, whiny, squishy, anti-Brexit stuff he's been saying for ages and ages" shock  
He's scapegoated for there being no 2nd referendum, despite himself proposing a Parliamentary amendment in such regard which was voted down. He's scapegoated for the obviously appalling crime of the poorest in society actually being given a voice at last. 
*cough* perhaps you shouldn't have demanded we all respect a fraudulent referendum won through breaking electoral law. This is an unprecedented situation. Our democracy is under attack. What the hell are you playing at?! 
Conservatives being 'manipulated by Brexit zealots', ex-PM Major to warn  
.@michaelgove Remind me, what was it Tusk said about those who argued for #Brexit without a plan? 
He's scapegoated for not being able to wave a magic wand and change the Parliamentary arithmetic out of nothing. He's scapegoated for not having a 'credible plan' for Brexit, despite Donald Tusk having said it's a plan the EU could work with. 
John Major giving a lecture in Glasgow - he says Brexit makes an independent Scotland "more likely"."English & Welsh votes are taking Scotland out of Europe against their will. Scotland cannot apply to re-join unless they gain independence. The incentive to try again is clear." 
if both the deputy party leader and the shadow Brexit secretary are banned from Labour Brexit meetings i don't see why there have to be meetings at all, surely it's then just a bunch of yes-men in a room, eh @jeremycorbyn @SeumasMilne @LenMcCluskey?  
Just who are the extremists? MPs who want to honour the referendum vote & their manifesto promises or EU fanatics like Sir John ..  
If you listen carefully, you can hear all of the Brexit fibs popping like reeking farts in a care home chair, barely disguised by the mad ramblings.  
We are clear: Brexit uncertainty is not caused by Brexit.It is caused by the uncertainty surrounding Brexit. 
Interesting idea (if it can be copper-bottomed against govt reneging), as it puts the final #brexitdeal (very different from what was promised) back to the people to decide whether to go ahead with #brexit or not once they can see what it entails (& avoids a no-deal catastrophe)  
Brexit is an utterly dishonest shitshow.Nothing about it bears even the mildest scrutiny.And why do we continue to dance this absurd dance? Because, having lied so much, politicians & media CANNOT now be honest. They’d rather screw us over than admit it.What a shameful legacy. 
just a casual reminder that michael caine loves brexit 
Particularly loving the attempts to separate Honda from Brexit by citing the EU/Japan trade deal (which we’d be part of but for Brexit) and the Turkish factory (which isn’t being but closed but “realigned”).  
If we have a no-deal Brexit, we lose the EU orphan works directive, which means the British Library will have to close the digitised Spare Rib archive. (So you better get downloading, historians.) 
The BBC is determined to push Brexit as the reason for the Swindon closure whatever Honda says. The Brussels Broadcasting Corporation is still functioning to order. 
Tom Watson no longer being invited to key Labour Brexit meetings - PoliticsHome  
Despite evidence to the contrary, biased BBC News has been desperate to make the Honda closure about Brexit, and even illustrated the story on its website with a Remain campaigner’s poster:  
BBC News showing a Cafe near the Honda Plant.Imagine the hit that business will take.Fuck you Brexit Twats.  Wrecking the Country.Fuck you. 
If you voted for Brexit, THIS is what you’re putting people through! Read the comments and seriously think about the #PeoplesVote . Also send your apologies to Eliza! 
The brexiter position seems to have evolved from “....the UK car industry will flourish with #brexit”to...“...the collapse of the UK industry is a perfectly natural event with nothing whatsoever to do with brexit”....Inside 2 years. 
On education funding Walz said: “While some schools have turf fields and a stadium, another school is trying to pass a referendum to fix a leaky roof.” 
Pretend, for a mo, that the reason most of the auto industry is planning to leave the UK has nothing to do with #Brexit.Where are the 'new' (or any) industries, keen to invest in 'Global Britain', once we're rid of our tarriff-free access to the world's biggest trading bloc? 
No-Deal Brexit Drug Supply Plans Face Last-Minute Lawsuit  
Hurrah my German husband has confirmation of ‘Indefinite Leave to Remain’ in the UK after March  Frustrating that after 25 years of living here and paying taxes & having married a Brit that it’s even necessary - but I guess that’s Brexit for you  
Remainers insist that Brexit is to blame for the Honda job losses in Swindon despite all evidence to the contrary. They are less concerned with the workers about to lose their jobs than they are with overturning the referendum result, says @FraserMyers 
Congratulations to the Independents, but you can’t build the foundation of a party on trying to reverse Brexit 
#WhiteSox put selves in position to feel as disappointed as they felt learning Machado signed 10-year, $300M deal with Padres. But getting close no consolation. Machado was referendum on offseason. Time to pick up pieces but hard to rationalize what a gut punch this is for Sox. 
Personally, I’ve found it quite pleasurable to watch Brexit fans literally choking down their own lie today. I look forward to more of this.  
As Honda joins Nissan, Toyota, Ford and Land Rover Jaguar in taking action over Brexit, experts conclude that Project Fear must really hate cars. 
@F1 Mercedes boss warned  #NoDeal #brexit could cause "mother of all messes" for F1. "Any major disruption with borders or taxes would damage F1 in the UK." Sports, educ, fashion, food - every part of UK life will be disrupted. Is it worth it? @cnnsport 
To put this key point a different way, businesses that are anti-brexit aren't anti-Brexit campaigners per se. They will make anti-Brexit statements to further their commercial interests. If they decide on complete pullout, there is no commercial interest in making such statements  
Good of you to criticise the French National Assembly. #Brexit #BBCBias 
My social media pet hate when it comes to debating Brexit. Remain Voter: “This is happening right now open your eyes” Leave Voter: “It’s not” Provides links, evidence, peer reviewed sources etc...”Remain Voter: “you don’t know what you’re talking about, gammon”  
In Brussels they are saying the odds of a no-deal Brexit are 60%.  Here is why  
UK will apply food tariffs in case of no-deal #Brexit  
"The British economy is not in especially good health. It faces serious challenges and has done for decades. But for some reason, these problems never provoked the kind of fury or concern that they do today, when a spurious link can be made to Brexit"  
The impact of Brexit on uk clinical trials is being discussed as part of the Clin Trials Statutory Instrument in the HoC. Clearly Brexit, hard or soft, is going to present really profound challenges; even admitted by UK Govt. Why are we doing this ? 
Our @NicolaSturgeon Paris ”I spoke about French citizens in Scotland earlier.This is one of the saddest parts of Brexit. The UK Government is proclaiming the end of free movement as a victory. It is a self-defeating measure. It removes opportunity from millions of people”  
The Bus Secretary Gregg Clark has said it’s unacceptable that with less than 40 days to go to Brexit that two thirds of Manufacturing  business dont know how we are going to leave the EU.as only 12% of business actually does business with the EU he should get his figures right. 
Corbyn reportedly taking delegation to Brussels to negotiate that ‘no deal’ Brexit be taken off table. It’s his Gov that’s threatening ‘no deal’ + his parliament he must persuade. Could both Tories + Labour please stop simulating negotiations with EU? Time’s running out #GetReal 
The European Commission has promised its 917 British staff that they can stay on after Brexit  
What role would @YvetteCooperMP's Bill give to Parliament in extending #Article50? And how would it fit into the broader #Brexit process? Our latest Insight explains  
Brexiteers pooh pooh the fact that the referendum was advisory, but are happy that it was because if it hadn’t been it would have been deemed illegal.And still mad May ploughs on. Ambitious, stupid people are truly very dangerous indeed. 
Has there ever been a speech by a major politician that trolls their own most famous policy (in this case Brexit) as much as Gove's speech to the NFU?   
FM ⁦@NicolaSturgeon⁩ addressing (sparsely attended) session of foreign affairs committee of French National Assembly #Brexit  
NEW EXCL Tom Watson no longer being invited to key Labour Brexit meetings  
Britain's EU workforce in decline as numbers from elsewhere soar.EU immigration in UK down 61,000.Non-EU immigration up 130,000.Not exactly what was promised - of course, that's Brexit all over.@Bremaininspain 
Hear the section of @Feorlean 's Statement today, where he tells Holyrood that Unemployment could more than DOUBLE under a No-Deal Brexit and who is responsible for it...."It is vital that this Chamber & Scotland know that things will change very fast... for the worst."  
It's great that @UKLabour keeps saying the seven rebels should hold by-elections because every time they say it we get to point out what a bunch of hypocrites they are for not wanting people to get a vote on the #Brexit deal.#PeoplesVote 
In tonight's @EveningStandard @DrPhillipLeeMP urges @theresa_may to defend MPs against #Brexit abuse. We have launched our #timeout campaign to give the government and the country a pause to negotiate in a respectful manner #righttovote 
Britain likely to delay Brexit, former EU chief Barroso says  
But we in @fiannafailparty have Confidence in this the most Incompetent Gov in our history....   We are #Spineless   We will Blame #Brexit.  We will Blame SF and anything else we can think of to cover our own #Hypocrisy 
Carmakers quitting Britain won't blame Brexit – it's not in their interest | Phillip Inman  
You too.  You have fertilised Brexit.  Helped it along.Ignored your members and voters.Looking straight back at you. 
@raulromeva  2 days before the referendum: "EU has to choose between democracy and repression".Today his lawyer wasn't allowed to show this video in english on Court. Maybe they don't want to let europeans know that this is about freedom and rights.  
I have spent the last few hours correcting Remainers who are making false claims as to Brexit being at fault for the Honda factory closure. They have been rampant. Non-stop today lying about it.Who's willing to bet the last person I speak to today will say "but Leave lied".  
I can't see why some entrepreneur can't take over the Swindon plant and produce a British reasonably priced electric car .Some of the £39billion could be used in the form of loans. Do great diesel scrappage schemes but only on British models.Get this countries pride back. #Brexit 
Today's interview with @Matthew_Wright in @talkRADIO in full...  I agree with @terrychristian that Brexit voters who voted to be poorer should be first to lose their jobs! 
"The Government's incompetent handling of the whole thing,they haven't got a clue...they can't even decide what Brexit means...this is idiocy of epic proportions"Honda worker completely nails #ToryBrexitChaos  
Why you won't see Japanese carmakers blaming Brexit for their decision to leave UK - they know it's not in their commercial interest. By @phillipinman 
I simply do not agree with you.The UK is attracting record inward investment and our economy is thriving.Why do you persist in talking down our economy?Presumably because you don't like Brexit. How damaging Remainer speak is. You are wishing us into a bad place,  
Saddest thing = that the wrong seven resigned. Had it been Corbyn McDonnell Rayner Hoey Thorberry Abbott Milne, Brexit would be as good as dead and Labour could be elected. #LemmingParty 
Well done to Scottish Centre on European Relations @SCER_eu & @KirstyS_Hughes for making it onto ‘Best New Think Tanks 2018’ list compiled by Univ of @Penn @TTCSP. Well deserved for their work on #Brexit alone. Scotland needs more think tanks of this calibre  
Delighted to hear that @GoodLawProject are going to challenge the Serious Shortage Protocol & other No Deal Brexit preparations that threaten safe healthcare. #BrexitThreat 
A UK IT specialist not being hired abroad because of Brexit uncertainty? Maybe we should have had a Services Market Access conversation at literally any point in the last three years spent obsessing about goods?  
What happens when #Brexit and #TrumpRussia collide? Well, that's exactly what just happened in the Special Counsel's probe.It appears that Trump's data company Cambridge Analytica was deeply involved in cheating on two continents.#TuesdayThoughts 
Brexit makes us poorer- when will Labour fight to stop brexit? 
If the 7 Labour splitters truly cared about stopping a hard Brexit, they’d have stayed in the Party.In a GE, their pro-second referendum group could take a crucial 1-2% off Labour, thus enabling hard Tory Brexit.Don’t fall for it. A vote against Labour ONLY helps the Tories. 
Theresa May faces calls to clarify reports she blocked a 2016 probe into Leave campaigner Arron Banks Reports suggested Mrs May refused to allow an investigation into the Leave campaigner before the Brexit referendumRead more at:  
If a CEO blames Brexit you believe them. If they say it wasn’t Brexit you call them liars.You, Sir, are a pillock of the highest order. 
How can independent MPs demand another referendum, but refuse to put themselves up for their own People's Vote?  via @Telegraph 
Apparently I'm getting targeted Facebook ads against my MP @heidiallen75 - Personally I'm very happy with Heidi's stance on #Brexit, but clearly someone isn't and want to spend money to stop her.  
Neither Brexiteer nor Remainer should be over keen to say too much about the Honda factory closure. Remainers can't claim to be honest if they just say its all Brexit, but can Brexiteers be confident decision wasn't hastened by the Brexit induced chaos in the UK? 
Nigel Farage's Brexit Party has a more obvious slot in UK politics than the Independent Group  via @Telegraph 
If Angela Smith thinks that the Labour Party has only recently changed to become Anti Semitic, then I’ve got a bridge to sell her. She won’t go back to the electorate in Sheffield but wants the whole country to vote again over Brexit. Integrity?  
Michael Gove's Brexit "journey" continues.  
FM: Brexit now puts some of those ties at risk. However when you look at the closeness of our countries’ existing connections, and when you see how much common ground we share, I believe that – despite Brexit - our relationship will flourish still further in the years ahead. 
Newsreader on BBC news still desperate to pin the Honda decision on Brexit, putting words into the Honda guys mouth.WTF is happening here? 
Just like Honda, it won't be because of Brexit that they leave. One after the other. Right on top of Brexit. After decades in Britain.No, nothing to do with Brexit.   via @FT 
Oh that's easy: They're raging hypocrites! #brexit #gangof7 via @Telegraph 
Worries over Brexit are undoubtedly a factor in Honda’s decision to close its manufacturing facility in Swindon   
“Brexit is like Pompeii where people voted for the volcano” • Last Week Tonight with John Oliver (video) #BrexitChaos #InvestigateLeave #PeoplesVote  
Nothing is more important than children and their safety. But along with the UK's other Children's Commissioners I have concerns about how Brexit could affect some of the systems that keep our children safe. Read our joint letter to @SteveBarclay -  
Well that didn’t age well.. #leaveu #brexit  
Jean-Claude Juncker: Brexit delay beyond EU election is possible 
Haha. Also, the idea that the board of Honda met to discuss a strategic decision this big about their British plans and Brexit didn’t come up is about as credible as 30 second research  
.@theresa_may Our chemist asks for patience in case they have to dispense a different brand. Different brands use different processes and sweeteners and fillers and preservatives, and not all brands are equal. Meds insecure. Food insecure.What the hell are you doing?#brexit  
Majorly IMPT CASE HERE. Did u know pharmacists now have the power - without consultation - to change quality or quantity of prescription drugs in the event of medicine shortages?! Subject of poss new JR by @JolyonMaugham@GoodLawProject #Brexit  
The #LabourSplit has changed nothing in terms of the parliamentary maths. We have 5 weeks to stop Brexit. We need to not get distracted.  
I have said this for some time. Brexit is a terrorist incident, incurring more damage to UK than all Irish and Islamic terrorism groups combined over the past 50 years.  
We must not let #NoDeal Brexit cause a food crisis for people most in need. Decisive action must secure food for hospitals, schools, people in care and frontline charities. ⁦@UKSustain⁩ ⁦@FareShareUK⁩ ⁦@TrussellTrust⁩ ⁦@ProfTimLang⁩ 
FM: One thing I do want to stress, however, is that for the Scottish Government, independence is not about the isolationism that characterises Brexit – instead independence would see us recognizing and embracing our interdependence with other nations. 
FM: And finally, we proposed that when there is greater clarity about the terms of Brexit, Scotland must have the option to choose a different course, by opting to become an independent country.I will say more about independence at a future date. 
Lammy, you are the "idiot of epic proportions", co -starring with that other epic idiot, Alistair (Spin) Campbell. The Honda bosses themselves have said the move has nothing to do with Brexit. You are either epically stupid or an epic liar, I suspect both.  
Delivering Brexit on March 29th won’t destroy the Conservative Party. On the contrary, it could well be destroyed if it fails to deliver Brexit on time. Tories should be very afraid for the local elections in May.  
Informative thread on the subtleties of how Honda's decision relates to Brexit by the FT's Tokyo Bureau Chief and endorsed by a leading expert on Japanese business in Europe. Useful antidote to some of today's black and white coverage.  
Agree with that caller 100%. Thornberry and others always justify their support for Brexit ‘because I’m a democrat’ apparently allows them to go into complete denial and ignore the lies and misinformation and must deliver a project which will harm us. 
BREXIT CHAOS: 100,000 Scots could lose their job due to no-deal Brexit /#EU #Brexit #Scotland #PeoplesVote 
John Oliver checked in on Brexit, which, you will perhaps not be surprised to hear, is still an enormous clusterfuck.  
Access to EU markets is vital for our high-quality food and drink sector - and the protections, like PGI, that we currently have.  Brexit threatens all of that. #BrexitDamage 
Trump's data team was deeply involved in #Brexit election cheating. Now, Mueller has flipped a key member of Cambridge Analytica, the Bannon/Mercer psychological warfare company.  
According to a simple IP lookup for the IP Address that modified @CraigMurrayOrg's Wikipedia page to add the words "conspiracy theorist", it was done from the House of Commons. Rather sad to be honest! Taxpayers money wasted to smear him! | #scotref #brexit #indyref2 #HOC 
The Tories' disastrous Brexit will damage the health, security and livelihoods of people across our country. We need to make it stop!Let us know how Brexit is affecting you:  
“We’re all heading off in my big spaceship - Scotty beam me up” #janeygodleyvoiceover #brexit #swearing 
WATCH: Swedish MEP describes Nigel Farage as “the biggest liar in Europe” and accuses him of peddling “bullshit slogans” just weeks ahead of Brexit  
How can independent MPs demand another referendum, but refuse to put themselves up for their own People's Vote?  via @Telegraph 
One of the key features of the Brexit debate is leavers saying that nothing is due to brexit, despite the masses of evidence to the contrary.  
There is an old firm from JapanWhose Swindon plant faces the can;The exit of HondaLeaves Britain to ponderThe shit that is hitting the fan.#Honda #Brexit #Japan #Swindon 
Collected repeat prescription today and had to sign a form to say I was taking my meds regularly and not stockpiling... what an idiotic situation. Thanks @DavidCameron_MP #Brexit 
With the new passport we lose our EU citizenship, lose our rights to travel, work and live without restriction in the other 27 EU countries. Our freedom of movement will end. Unless we stop Brexit!  
Do you get the impression that remainers are sat eagerly waiting any bad news that they can vaguely pin on #brexit?Like a pack of vultures circling and squawking "Brexit! Brexit!"  
As Brexiters proclaim that Honda (and pretty much every other company relocating elsewhere) has nothing to do with Brexit they unveil the list of companies which have relocated to Britain to take advantage of the boon causes by Brexit...............(We can wait all day guys) 
.@raulromeva imparts a MASTERCLASS10July2010 SENTENCE by SPConstitutional Court was origin of conflict: SP Constitution loses LEGITIMACY IN #CATALONIA as 14 HOME RULE articles are stricken off Constitution VOTED in2006 by both parliaments CAT&SP & in #REFERENDUM by Catalans 2006  
If you, your family, or your friends ever rely on prescription medication for your health, or think you might in the future - you may want to support this bid for a judicial review to protect you after Brexit...  
Brexit is unravelling...no wonder the majority of people no longer want it  
New powers to tackle Brexit drug shortages face legal challenge  
All of this, gone after Brexit. Like tears in the rain.  
Not really. Unless you think boss of Honda is lying when he said the decision had everything to do with global car industry developments and nothing to do with Brexit. Perhaps we should concentrate on helping Swindon, not making cheap, irrelevant and inaccurate political points.  
New powers to tackle Brexit drug shortages to be challenged in court  
Brexit threatens Euro Lambs' remarkable story. The firm has a turnover of £66m a year and no debt  
Let that sink in for a moment. Rolls Royce might be owned by a German company now (BMW) but it has ALWAYS been based in the UK, the UK is where it started in 1904. So after 110 years, due to #brexit it's leaving. Let that sink in! | #brexit #scotref #indyref2 
.@JunckerEU #Brexit “It’s not @EU_Commission who decides when UK is leaving the EU, but UK alone. @theresa_may says UK is leaving on 29/3. If UK were to stay beyond May, as a member of the EU it must organise #EUelections2019. The Treaty is the Treaty and this is what it says.” 
UK employment hits another record high. That pesky Brexit is at it again! 
Roughly 100,000 Scots face losing their job in the event of a no-deal Brexit, Scottish Brexit Secretary Mike Russell insisted "things will change, and change very fast for the worse" if the UK crashes out of the EU without an agreement on March 29. RULE IT OUT NOW 
Remember when the word “Brexit” didn’t exist? How I hanker for those days. 
Oooh look the “Just vote for May’s deal or we won’t get Brexit” bots have arrived   
Fears over a No Deal Brexit have been further blown apart with preparations to minimise disruption if the UK exits the European Union without a deal.#WTOBRexit #BrexitNo Deal: EU banks can access UK for £60 trillion of trading, UK can serve EU clients  
This is so tragically awful ... @JasonJHunter outlines what is happening now and what is yet to come, as the government plays its game of Brexit Chicken with UK based businesses ...  
I have a friend is looking to relocate his award winning business to Poland because of the uncertainty of Brexit. The cost of importing materials from the EU and exporting to the EU, his biggest market, is one reason.  That’s 200 jobs lost. 
Anything new when it comes to #Brexit?German Minister of State for Europe Michael Roth sums it up in one word...  
Those who bemoan the uncertainty created by Brexit must accept that sticking to the March deadline and leaving on that date is the only way to ensure the certainty that businesses clearly want.  
MIKE Russell warns as many as 100,000 Scots could lose their job in wake of a no-deal Brexit. Fellow SNP MSP accused Michael Gove of letting “the cat out of the bag” admitting Brexit will serious harm UK agriculture. "There's “no guarantee” British farmers will export to the EU.  
Horse and Cart production to cease in Swindon as all U.K. horses will be eaten within a week of Brexit 
There are now No Deal Brexit contingency plans for: Financial services, customs, road connectivity, railways, air travel, climate policy, social security, Erasmus. ‘Cliff edge’  
Brexit: Is time running out for Malthouse Compromise? - BBC News  
I remember @EmilyThornberry tearing Jacob Rees-Mogg to pieces on Newsnight during the EU Referendum campaign. She was wonderful - passionate, on top of the facts, witty, graceful, incisive. I just don't know what on earth happened to her after that.  
Wait what?   @GroovyTimbo has been lying about cheap food post Brexit?   If only someone had called him out on that and not got barred from his public debates eh? 
A Swedish MEP has described Nigel Farage as “the biggest liar in Europe” and accused him of peddling “bullshit slogans” just weeks ahead of Brexit. #REVOKEArticle50NOW #RemainRebuild #StopBrexitSaveBritain  
Brexit's worrying effect on women in Northern Ireland: Brexit marks a defining moment in the relationship between women & the state in Northern Ireland writes @ygalligan @WeAreTUDublin 
They're waking up at last : EU faces 'enormously high economic costs' with no deal Brexit - shock warning  
BBC Breaking: Jeremy Corbyn took 20 seconds to get his water when speaking at a conference. He is clearly inept.FBPE: Jeremy Corbyn wasted 20 seconds getting himself water when he should have been opposing Brexit. He must stand down.Everyone else: Man drinks water.  
Liam Fox says.. "Parliament said we don’t want there to be no deal and that we will sign up to the prime minister’s deal if we are able to get changes to the Irish backstop."Listen to the people Fox, it was a people's referendum not Parliaments ! We voted to LEAVE the EU ! 
These Europeans are so slow !!! ;MACRON WARNING: Brexit is 'GRAVE' for Europe and could SPREAD - shock speech REVEALED  
Hugely important work. We must know what how ready the UK is for leaving the EU and no deal. Government must publish the Brexit workstreams immediately so parliament and public can be fully informed.  
Now we know why Michael Gove said back in December that food prices would rise in the event of a no-deal Brexit.  Anyone remember this being promised during the referendum campaign?  
Brexit departures from UK, so far#Sony#Dyson#Panasonic#Lloyds#Unilever#GoldmanSachs#Barclays#Airbus#Flybmi#PandO#HSBC#JPMorgan#UBS#Ford#Hitachi#Toshiba#AXA#Honda#Moneygram#Philips#EBA European Banking Authority#EMA European Medicines Agency#BankOfAmerica 
Pro #Brexit ministers are at loggerheads over no-deal tariffs. Fox wants to slash and burn, Gove wants farmers protected. Neither is good. If we slash import duties farmers will go bust, but if we keep them at current rates food prices could rocket. 
Brexit is a catastrophe, full stop! @NFUtweets 
Honda to close British car plant as Brexit looms  
There’s no acknowledgement as to why the split happened, No acknowledgement of the anger felt at Labour’s insistence that Brexit must be pushed through, No acknowledgement of the racism crisis engulfing Labour, No idea, no clue, no interest. #WeDeserveBetter #LabourSpilt 
MACRON WARNING: Brexit is 'GRAVE' for Europe and could SPREAD - shock speech REVEALED  
Why haven't you deleted this tweet David? It's been confirmed by Honda that it has nothing to do with Brexit, and, once again, you are talking out of your substantial arse.  
Leavers - you've been busy saying that Brexit didn't affect the £!!BBC News - How Brexit hit the pound in your pocket  
'Propaganda'Police have launched an investigation after racist anti-immigration propaganda was found plastered on people’s doors.It’s all intended to appeal to the closet racists who have been empowered by the rise of Trump &amp; Brexit here. 
Swedish MEP Anna Maria Corazza Bildt has described Nigel Farage as “the biggest liar in Europe” and accused him of peddling “bullshit slogans” just weeks ahead of Brexit.  
Richard Harrington another minister threatening Article 50 will be extended and parliament "will take back control"Its Number 10 pushing this, as always in an attempt to get Brexit MPs to vote for her dealBrinkmanship that must be ignored. Vote the deal down, dare TM to do so 
The Shamima Begum situation is just the government trying to distract us from how terribly wrong brexit is going 
What an absolute utter mess. Brexit is already making us poorer and Theresa May is threatening to plunge us into a recession. We demand better. We demand a People’s Vote, now.   
Best #Brexit summary I've heard yet. Thorough and clear yet not at all dumbed down for American consumption. @benjaminwittes asks all the right questions and @A_Sloat of @BrookingsInst answers them. (Note: this is from 2/12 and thus before the most recent Parliamentary vote.) 
2017 - Honda to close Sayama plant in Japan by 2022.  Brexit?     
Bloody Brexit... 
What’s more the decision to leave was the PM’s personal executive act, and we have since learnt that she know the referendum is “tainted” (her QCs word) by alarming corruption and malpractice. And sh is not proceeding on the basis the referendum is even safe.  
SHE SAID YES IF I PASS MY UK TEST TO GET A BRITISH PASSPORT BEFORE BREXIT SO I DONT GET KICKED OUT FUCKGKGJGJFKFJF LMAO LAIDEASE IM CRYIMG IMSOFUVKNHBAPIT  
The lives of the vulnerable can't be put unnecessarily at risk on a No Deal Brexit.  
A No Deal Brexit means - the evidence says - drug shortages. Stockpiling will only work for a few weeks. And the measures Government has put in place to deal with shortages are unlawful and risk patients' health.  
Transforming Britain After Brexit kicks off: Coventry 4 March!Great speakers: @C_Lapavitsas @graceblakeley @anshu_64 @ExittheEU @DrLeeJones Free tickets: More dates:5/3 Manchester8/3 Liverpool25/3 London28/3 Durham#LeftBrexitTour #BritainSaysOXI 
UK likely to delay Brexit, former EU chief Barroso says  
You may want to put one line through Bentley Bentley becomes latest carmaker to warn of no-deal Brexit damage  
Spitting Image creator calls for TV show comeback to spit in the face of Brexit  
Viewed from Asia, Brexit invites puzzlement bordering on incomprehension. Britain was admired for its competent government and economic prowess. Little of that will survive Brexit, even if there’s a deal — A once-respected power unable to govern itself 
Inside the London tech scene's frantic plan to stop Brexit  - impressive stuff - kudos to @mikebutcher et al 
.@gavinshuker in your video to constituents you cited Brexit as a reason for leaving the Labour Party. Luton voted to leave the EU. How about a by-election. Let Labour put up a Brexiteer and let the people of Luton South decide if they want an independent or Labour Brexiteer? 
Tell me about the brexit, George...  
Please @GaryLineker - I promise to buy more crisps!@UKEUchallenge case - Wilson (that's me) vs. The Prime Minister is being heard in court on Thurs 21/2.We have strong legal arguments re unsound referendum & equally unsound decision to trigger A50.#VoteLeaveBrokeTheLaw 
A remarkable thing about this remarkable vox pop is that here's a bright, articulate person speaking. In three years of Brexit vox pops he is the first of his kind that I have ever seen. Not saying only bright, articulate people should be heard but some variety might have helped.  
Honestly, please do keep arguing over what type of Brexit we should have. The clock is ticking, and we're getting closer to a WTO Brexit . The more you argue the likelier a "no deal" will become! 
So BTS,,,,, have mercy on the ticket prices UK is on the verge of brexit miss thresa doesn’t like us citizens just please go easy thanks 
The devastating impact of a no-deal Brexit on farmers is one of the main reasons I am working with MPs from all parties to pass the Cooper-Letwin bill  
Dear @GaryLineker Saw your fantastic words yesterday. Brexit is destroying us and few, in a position to say something and be heard, stand up for what is right. Thank youMay I ask you to read this article (& the follow-up). It explains where we are.  
Yet still @UKLabour supports an illegally won advisory referendum, with all outcomes of Brexit leading to jobs losses, economic pain, loss of sovereign power, and theft of our rights. Could it be any clearer what the moral and appropriate cause of action should be? #PeoplesVote 
Under Article 50, #Brexit day can be delayed if all EU Member States agree unanimously to an extension. But how may an extension be requested? And how may it affect the European Parliament elections due to be held in May? Our Insight explains  
Brexit protester James Goddard charged with harassing MP Anna Soubry outside Parliament 
Brexit is all about short term pain, for long term pain. 
The see-through British remain establishment in action: We must make an example of the Brexit protester. And we must allow the remain ones to do what they like!  
"The truth is that the only thing that could now deliver us from #Brexit paralysis is the people" - @OwenSmith_MP writing for @TheNewEuropean about an excellent proposal from @peterkyle and @MPphilwilson that would take No Deal off the table. #PeoplesVote 
Honda has specifically said its decision had nothing to do with Brexit. I know you find facts annoying, but they remain facts.  
The public health community needs to make much more use of litigation. @JolyonMaugham and the Good Law Project show us why here#Brexit 
IEA is yet another Matthew Elliott/Tufton St. opaque right wing lobbying outfit, with direct access to Tory Brextremist ministers. It also falls under the Atlas umbrella. A rabid right wing global organisation funded by disaster Billionaires such as the Koch’s and Mercer’s. 
They have quite specifically said it is not because of Brexit.  
My local @PeoplesMomentum group calling for Ann Coffey to call a by election. Someone who supports a second referendum should of course support a parliamentary by election so that voters can decide on a independent or #Labour MP 
Just to help both Brexiteers and Remainers, I'd point out that making future investment decisions without considering Brexit impacts would be negligent, basing decisions on Brexit alone equally so. Should be obvious? 
(And remember how Brexiters promised us all cheaper food after Brexit thanks to removing tariffs? Maybe not so much!) 
Looks like the release of the UK's new post-Brexit tariff schedule (likely next week) is going to ruffle a lot of feathers... It wouldn't surprise me if Ministers drag their feet on revealing it to postpone the inevitable arguments.  
Will you do me a favour?If you see a TV station, newspaper, radio show, MP, Lord/Lady, EU stooge/agitator, (e.g. Blair, Jones Campbell etc.), still blaming the Honda closure on Brexit, then please let me know. I'm starting a "Lying Toe Rag" list so they can be held to account. 
The Minister must finally 1)Rule out No-Deal & 2)Establish a Brexit Redundancy Fund to support businesses collapsed due to #Brexit and this Tory Govt’s incompetence@LibDems are the only party looking out for British businesses & jobs, by consistently calling for a #PeoplesVote. 
The lives of the vulnerable can't be put unnecessarily at risk on a No Deal Brexit.  
It’s very sad @Honda_UK are shutting their operations in #Swindon Politicians like @DavidLammy and @Andrew_Adonis incorrectly pin this on #Brexit whilst others like @RLong_Bailey blame #Austerity Wrong! This is about changes in the car industry away from petrol & diesel. The end. 
The use of this image and Brexit hashtag on the Honda story is terrible and biased journalism from BBC biz desk - a Remoaner hotbed. Can anyone explain what they are up to @BBCNews. ? 
Far from creating a ‘Global Britain’, #Brexit is creating a nightmare for British businesses & jobs. Huge costs & logistical issues are forcing businesses to move or risk collapse, like the British airline, FlyBMI. They won’t be the last, unless we escape this #BrexitMess! 
We demand a peoples vote? **(To be clear, only on Brexit. Not our seats.)#ChnagePolitics 
Er.....Turkey ain’t thriving luv. It’s closing. Blame that on Brexit   
I was just thinking You know how you have firearms amnesties? Well couldn’t we have a ‘Brexit vote’ amnesty. Where people could hand back their Brexit vote without fear of being ridiculed. And we can forget the whole thing ever happened. Can we not do that? 
Companies saying in the last month that they disinvest or leave Britain:AirbusAXABank of AmericaBarclaysBupaCredit SuisseDysonFordHitachiHondaJLRNissanPanasonicP&OPhilipsPrudentialSchaefflerSonyToshibaUBSNothing to do with Brexit, though  
FM ⁦@NicolaSturgeon⁩ accuses those who’ve criticised her Paris visit as “a jaunt” of the worst “parochialism”.Says ministers “absolutely need” to promote Scotland abroad with #Brexit just over 5 weeks away.  
Theresa the lamb has an uncertain future. Her owners have no idea what she will be worth after #Brexit. Farmers are being forced to consider alternative forms of income - more on this story here:  
The Crown Prosecution Service says Brexit protester James Goddard has been charged with harassment and two public order offences involving an MP 
As of today Tim Aker, Jonathan Bullock, David Coburn, Etheridge, Farage, Nathan Gill, Paul Nuttall, Diane James and Julia Reid have changed allegiances from UKIP to the Brexit party. When Farage was leader he made potential MEPs pledge to resign and step aside if they did this 
Leave means leave @LeaveMnsLeave demand Honda Ford, Nissan. And airbus go home #Brexit  
Honda could not have been clearer: “This is not a Brexit-related issue for us.” But they’ll still try and spin it of course.  
Naughten was Replaced.  The sky didn’t fall in...   Fitzgerald was Replaced....   The sky didn’t fall in....    The #Brexit Excuse is fooling nobody but the #Spineless @fiannafailparty TDs......     A Vote for FF is a Vote for FG. 
#Erdington, rich in talent, one of the poorest constituencies in #Britain. With #Brexit uncertainty growing, nearly 1 in 10 are unemployed. Prime Minister, don’t tell me all is well in our country’s economy if the grim reality is 4,425 out of work in #Erdington @birmingham_live 
In case of a no-deal #Brexit, the @britishlibrary will be forced to take the Spare Rib archive offline. For the background see: 
We were all wrong, we believed in our country, we fought 2 world wars to protect our country, millions died for our country, we voted Brexit to protect our country from a dictatorship only to find our democracy has been stolen behind our our backs, we will fight for democracy. 
As you have absolutely zero humility/self awareness  you don’t realise how ridiculous you look & how much the NI people are at the end of their tether with your party & your unbelievable stance on Brexit. You are going to end up with egg on your face at the end of this farce! 
Thornberry becomes progressively more baffled and sulky at the idea that you're not opposing if you never once tell people what the damage of Brexit will be.  
So what if farmers are thrown off the land in despair and the masses suffer malnutrition and food poverty? Are there no workhouses? Are there no foodbanks?  Mogg will be okay, and that is surely what matters most to the supporters of hard Brexit. 
1/2 Who can answer these two questions (especially those with sympathies FOR Brexit)? Given that most of the finest Baroque orchestras & choirs are European, why would they hire a young, talented unestablished Brit singer earning roughly 20k pa,for a concert tour / recording? 
Tory BBC political commentator Norman Smith criticises the compere when Corbyn speaks to the Manufacturers Association & says the compere should have put JC under more pressure on a new referendum vote. Once again the BBC & Smith show their True Blue colours #JoinLabourNow #JC4PM 
A PLEA TO MRS @Theresa_MayYou seek a prime place in British History. Here is what to say to achieve it"We have studied Brexit & are far better informed. Brexit will do untold damage to UK people, economy & future. I have made a decision. Article 50 is hereby cancelled"@LBC 
On Radio 4 this morning, ex adviser to Tony Blair said that Corbyn is enabling Brexit. So according to him,Corbyn put a gun to Cameron's head and made him call a referendum. What is enabling Brexit is the arrogant narcissistic 7 who are enabling another Tory government into power 
Food prices to skyrocket! YAY!!Just another #Brexit dividend. 
Today we were at @MakeUK_ , the manufacturers' annual conference.Just HOW can British manufacturing survive if we Brexit?#HondaGonda #Honda #Sodem #theelephantintheroom@RemainingKind 
Ah so Gove has finally understood that Brexit is devastating for U.K. farming. This means farming will be saved and the consumer is looking at considerably higher food prices. 
delighted to hear you're going to listen to us! not sure how we can make it clearer, but here goes:WEDON'TWANTBREXITnot a Tory Brexit, not a Labour Brexit, not a BINO Brexit, not a No Deal Brexit, not a soft or a hard Brexit; we don't want ANY form of Brexit, so OPPOSE IT! 
For all the “nothing to do with #Brexit” speeches, the timing says it all. The UK is about to leave the EU, & so walk away from the newly negotiated EU-Japan trade deal. Desperately sad for Swindon.  
Emily Thornberry told by voter in her own constituency she will never vote Labour again over Brexit  
An excellent summation of the Honda Swindon debacle devoid of partisanship - WARNING - Don't read if you're a rabid quitter!  
"Insulin is perishable, without it so am I"Today I read out an email from a constituent for whom a no deal Brexit could be a life or death matter.  The Government must stop playing politics with people's lives and rule out a no deal immediately.  
What is Brexit @LiamFox? A "glorious opportunity to reset our global trading relationships" or taking credit for replicating what we already have with the EU? pic.twitter.com/d24Vmt1h0b 
. @AWMurrison "Can I urge him [Greg Clark MP] to be very careful about imputing motives to companies that might be relocating from the UK or to the UK... Honda is entitled to be taken at its word, and it has said unequivocally that this decision has nothing to do with Brexit" pic.twitter.com/kLjRDlc6TQ 
Brexit causing ‘palpable decline’ in UK influence at the UN  
What would a no-deal Brexit mean for cars?  
Worth noting that Jeremy Corbyn's strategy of saying two things at once continues (Brexit). While Tom Watson and to an extent John McDonnell strike a more conciliatory tone on split, Corbyn offers very little in terms of listening to concerns. 
A no-deal Brexit could cause the "mother of all messes" for Formula 1, warns Mercedes boss Toto Wolff  
The Real Brexit Lies and Distortions & Why Honda's Decision Is Not Down to Brexit  
‘It’s like Pompeii again - that's if Pompeii had voted for the volcano.' Brexit has turned us into an international laughing stock.  
Hillary voters refusing to support Bernie are the same as Conservatives/Theresa May refusing to dissolve Brexit.The option to redo everything is right there. All it requires is swallowing some pride and saying, okay, let’s do this over.Digging heels in = avoidable disaster. 
Difficult to understand why the new @TheIndGroup didn't join the LIbDems, both anti Brexit .. both 'progressives' and both anti democrats 
#MuellerInvestigation questions Cambridge Analytica director Brittany Kaiser who worked on the dark side of the #Brexit referendumPeople will be bewildered that the British government has no interest in establishing the facts of what happened 
Former EU President Barroso today has said the UK won't leave the EU on 29th March. This from the man who describes the EU as an "empire". He's not alone in his distain for Britain...   Email your MP to save Brexit @  
. @SuellaBraverman "Does he [Greg Clark MP] agree or disagree, for the sake of those who are failing to understand, with the Senior VP of Honda Ian Howells, who's confirmed this decision has nothing to do with Brexit, it is not driven by Brexit, and it is not because of Brexit?"  
Business Secretary, Greg Clark, tells Commons #Honda statement that to crash out of the EU on WTO terms would be a “hammer blow” to U.K. manufacturing and “unconscionable”. Time for him & other more sensible Ministers to stop May’s reckless pursuit of a no-deal #Brexit. 
Much as I hate to see anybody lose their job;Honda have made it quite clear that the closure isn't Brexit related.And you are causing trouble and  bullshitting as usual   
The Labour Party isn’t divided on #Brexit, it is divided on how best to thwart Brexit. Corbynistas want a Brexit in Name Only, while the #LabourSplit crew want to reverse it entirely. Both sides are shafting working-class Labour voters, writes Mick Hume 
“We have told both the EU and the UK government that Brexit should not damage the stable economic environment that we all enjoy today.” This is Japanese-ambassador-speak for "Fuck Brexit and the horse it rode in on!" 
"You may not be granted entry to a country outside the UK."#Brexit  
"I make no apology for saying that leaving the EU without a deal would be a catastrophe for British farming."National Farmers' Union President Minette Batters says a no-deal Brexit is "the stuff of nightmares"#PeoplesVote@lbc #newsnight #r4today 
For those UK franchised coffee houses who buy their sandwiches on "the Mainland" and truck them here.It looks as though your customers, who today, get yesterday's sandwich, will be getting last week's sandwich from 29/3/19(or you could #shoplocal instead)#brexit #allegedly 
You were right #Brexit voters! The EU is not a democratic organization. It is governed by the likes of @Antonio_Tajani (Berlusconi's spokesperson), who nobody voted, while the democratic elected presidents are banned from the Parlament.#shameOnEU 
The main economic case for Brexit was that, while manufacturing might be destroyed, food would be cheaper because we'd be free of the EU's external tariff. Now Gove says food from the EU27 & from rest of the world will be MORE expensive. Start stockpiling!  
UK will apply food tariffs in case of no deal, Michael Gove says, confirming imported food will cost more post #Brexit.#ProjectReality, the poorest in society will suffer the most from #BrexitBut....blue passports eh #Leavers 
Wonder if all books will be 1p when we bask in the Sunlit Uplands of Brexit? Or will the era of 1p second hand books end entirely as they become a primary fuel source to heat homes? 
So, having spent two years telling us how food was going to get cheaper after #Brexit Gove now announces it will actually be getting more expensive.#PeoplesVote anyone? 
We voted to leave, we did not vote for deals with the EU. In fact we have no trade deal with the EU after the 29th March. Just one big scam on a mega scale. We've had every shyster  trying to usurp  the referendum result. Democracy in the UK is dead, the British people betrayed. 
“I have challenged Jeremy Corbyn to a duel I have a musket from the Boer war in Glasgow and he has a Conker” #janeygodleyvoiceover #swearing #brexit  
Member of Metropolitan Elite saying how catastrophic no-deal Brexit will be. Sorry, that should read 'farmer'.  
The 2020 primary is a referendum and a test: have Americans finally awoken from our long neoliberal slumber? Are we ready to dispense with violence, scarcity, and greed, and build a new world on a foundation of solidarity and equality?  
Here's Daniel Hannan, another key member of Vote Leave who lied and cheated their way to delivering the EU referendum result, addressing the Atlas Network, who most of the Tufton St mafia are members, on how he's looking forward to dropping EU food safety standards after Brexit.  
Theresa May's botched Brexit is risking the peace in Northern Ireland. The only way out of this national embarrassment is a People's Vote with the option to Exit from Brexit >  
It’s going to be a no-deal Brexit, isn’t it? 
“Brexit will bring cheap food and clothes “ - Jacob rees mogg Captain pugwash doesn’t seem to agree with you old chap - he wants to slap tariffs onto imported food to make them erm ..MORE EXPENSIVE 
Why are you still peddling this lie? Honda have made a statement saying this has nothing to do with Brexit, you've been corrected on it countless times as well. You also sound like a petulant child with your constant "#BrexitShambles" hashtags. 
Yesterday we were in #Oxted talking to residents about the #Brexit process. We met Jason who is calling for a #timeout and the #righttovote Join him by writing to your MP here:  
UK twitter has basically had an unofficial referendum about whether Shamima Begum should be allowed back to the UK and its safe to say its a resounding FUCK OFF NO 
EU reiterates there can be no time limit or unilateral exit clause on the Irish backstop in the Brexit deal  
I don't think I have seen on here a comment in support of brexit that was not from a troll. That's how we know that the country is against brexit... because the only "people" here who care about it are working covertly for the Leave campaign!  #FBPE #PeoplesVote 
This is a beautifully written composition of cold rage against Brexit and its cheerleaders:  
I simply adore this... (And it makes a nice change from sharing Brexit chat!)  
Post Brexit there is actually no guarantee that we would be able to do anything !Why not be honest for once?Life will never be the same. Brexit is a sham which will cause nothing but harm every which way. 
What exactly is @theresa_may doing right now, like where is she? We’re less than 40 days away from leaving the EU with a catastrophic no deal and she’s nowhere to be seen. And... for that matter, where is @jeremycorbyn. Remember your jobs first #Brexit, um... #Honda 
The traitorous Labour MPs that quit the party claim they did so over concerns over Brexit & are calling for a 'people's vote' on the matter. As they were elected as Labour MPs, are they going to give their constituents a 'people's vote' on whether they should remain MPs?  
Barnier now getting intense: "Brexit is a lose-lose proposition. There is no added value whatsoever. The only aim here is to destroy the EU. This is what people like Farage want. We need to stick together. No European country, not even Germany, can play in the big leagues alone" 
JUNCKER: 'Cannot rule out' Brexit delay beyond European Elections. This would be an absolute disgrace!  
Imagine looking at Detroit after the collapse and thinking “Yeah, that’s what I want for my whole country.”That’s what Brexit will do effectively.And there won’t be a road back. 
Michael Gove has confessed - there WILL be tariffs on food imports after Brexit. If UK leaves the EU with no-deal, food prices will increase virtually instantaneously as WTO tariffs would apply. This is Project Reality! UK relies on imports for 70% of its food requirements...  
"Global free trade" deal between EU and Japan may mean certain skills/jobs being repatriated either way - Gain some, Lose some.With Brexit, UK at risk of just taking the losses from this deal.  
Brexit is for plebs. The leaders of Brexit are quitting the UK. Why aren’t more people more angry about this?  
Explosive UK Parliamentary Report Exposes the Molten Core of the Trump, Brexit, Russia Scandal   
Honda says the closure has nothing to do with Brexit. Hard core Remainers like the BBC beg to know better   
While car workers at Honda, Nissan, & Ford are losing their jobs due to #brexit - one MP is being paid £6 000 a month by a gold speculator whose business model depends on uncertainty driving up price of gold.Just 2 questions:1 Why are we allowing this2 Why is this unreported  
Honda: This has absolutely nothing to do with BrexitSarah: This is absolutely to do with the real world consequences of Brexit  
I've written to the editors. On the plus side, at least they kept in this nugget: "Some EU officials have privately blamed the United Kingdom for Brussels' accommodative approach towards Pakistan - and have suggested that they may take sterner measures after Brexit." 
Here is the minimum truth of the Honda tragedy: Brexit, which is supposed to make Britain a more attractive place run a business, has failed to persuade the company to stay. Another truth: Honda's operations in Belgium are not shutting down. 
British supermarkets battle to secure stocks as chaotic Brexit looms  
What political party would be the best at handling #Brexit? 
Leave to remain? The voters who have changed their minds over Brexit  
Brexit Part II, as drawn by @PatChappatte. Looks a lot like the first part. 
Michael Gove, a key member of the criminal group who lied and cheated their way to delivering the EU referendum result, plans to introduce tariffs to protect farmers and says, 'Brexit will not cause the UK to lower food standards in any way.' HE'S LYING! 
Japan ambassador is on #wato claiming closure of Honda is nothing to do with Brexit. But timing is everything, as were dire warnings - ignored - the Japanese govt issued to Theresa May a year ago. Honda & Nissan desperate not to upset their Brexiter customers. 
This season of Brexit is currently being sued by Lemony Snicket over “startling similarities” to their Series Of Unfortunate Events, in particular citing the “failure of adults to recognise the sinister deceits of Count Olaf” as the true cause of the misfortunes. 
NEW BLOGPOST: The Real Brexit Lies and Distortions & Why Honda's Decision Is Not Down to BrexitTakahiro Hachigo, Honda’s chief executive, said at a news conference in Tokyo this morning... "This decision is not related to Brexit."  
A no deal Brexit will be a disaster for our NHS - medicines will cost more, access will be delayed, back of the queue for medical innovations. We’re told the Justice Secretary & other ministers will resign to block no deal Brexit. But Health Secretary refuses to tell us his plans  
Worth listening to the thoughts of Patrick Minford on this as the Brexiters based the Brexitscam on his madness despite those who now advocate Brexit isn't about trade and the economy.....  
People didn’t vote for Brexit for my disabled son to be separated from his mother | Anna Maria Tuckett  
Tough break for all these companies to have to close or move UK operations due to non-Brexit related issues so soon before Brexit arrives to fix them all. 
Tory solicitor general complains that @theSNP haven’t offered any solution to UK govt’s Brexit mess.I refer the Rt Hon Gentleman to the answer @scotgov gave earlier. 26 months earlier to be precise. 
There were two elections in 1910. During the campaign for the December election, Tory Leader Arthur Balfour thought there was a sure way to resolve the issue once and for all. Rather than simply institute Tariff Reform if they won they would hold a referendum! A People's Veto!  
Dear Emily Thornberry, there is no 'jobs-first Brexit'. Just ask the car workers of Swindon. And whilst you're at it, why not consult Derek 'grotesque chaos' Hatton for some jobs advice. He cost thousands in Liverpool. Labour are an economic car crash.  
Do I look like I give a fuck you're losing your jobs? No because you all tried to get me fired x #Swindon #Brexit 
Blaming your own government for brexit uncertainty, when it was your governments policies on electric cars, you sir are priceless!   
Honda's announcement and other recent negative announcements by automative companies based in the UK have nothing to do with Brexit, PM spokesperson says. 
I am surprised at anyone who would treat the idea of 'should employers base who is laid off on political views?' (Brexit) - a topic being debated on @theJeremyVine today - as anything other than an absurd, reprehensible & presumably illegal idea to be dismissed in a sentence. 
Brexit & preserving peace in Northern Ireland -Solicitor-General agreed to read a new report warning about a possible return to violence in NI, after I questioned him in Commons just now.It shows how deeply irresponsible Tory Brexiteers & DUP are  
The President of the NFU tells it like it is when it comes to the disaster of a no deal Brexit.  
My company works for Honda producing tooling which enables them to produce the cars.Up until October ,November we were quoting tooling for a new model planned for  Swindon.However since the government could not agree a deal this has now been stopped to say this isn’t brexit wow 
If Parliament ‘takes control’ by extending A50 then the people should take control of their MPs’ futures #Brexit #LetsgoWTO 
Fierce backlash as ‘pathetic’ Alastair Campbell blames Brexit for Honda closure  
So let me get this right...No Deal Brexit means most imported food will have cost more and UK food exports will in turn be devastated.Great work everyone.  
Translation for non-BBC viewers; there WILL be tariffs on food imports post Brexit. Honestly. With this & his “Honda leaving isn’t to do with Brexit” & yet people STILL call us conspiracy nuts for saying the BBC is a mouthpiece of the state. This. Is. Not. Normal.  
This hasn’t aged well. Govt minister boasting in Sept 2018 that Honda UK would continue investing in UK despite Brexit.  
Disorderly Brexit would be shock to European economy - ECB's de Guindos  
Honda is shutting down a factory in England. The company's president and CEO says the decision is not related to Brexit.  
- Brexit commentators will collectively  and look forward to another week of being told that they hate the poor & that it’s all a plot to discredit Corbyn, despite 99% of their output being criticism of Brexit and the Tories’ handling of it.The clock will tick.7/7 
Fierce backlash as ‘pathetic’ Alastair Campbell blames Brexit for Honda closure  
Mindfulness and Brexit   
Jobs in the UK are getting lost by the thousands. That’s what #BREXIT populism looks like. It’s not too late: #PeoplesVote 
International observers warn of crucial evidence missing in the Catalan referendum trial  
Which completely contradicts what ERG and Brexiteers such as Tim Martin have been saying. So food will be more expensive. If British farmers can't compete in Brexit Britain without protectionist tariffs, what's the point of Brexit? 
Minister @jorditurull: "When we agreed to implement the Referendum Law, the law was not yet suspended"  
- @UKLabour, corbynistas and lexiters will then go into overdrive, claiming this is proof that their unicorn-based version of Brexit would be accepted, or even welcomed by the EU.- @MichelBarnier & @WeyandSabine will be too polite to say that it really doesn’t mean that. 6/ 
"I make no apology for saying that leaving the EU without a deal would be a catastrophe for British farming."National Farmers' Union President Minette Batters says a no-deal Brexit is "the stuff of nightmares".  
Exporting farmers ‘face extinction’ with new post-Brexit tariff regime #NFU19 
- JC will say that it was a useful and broadly positive meeting on alternatives to the Tories’ damaging Brexit.- MB will say it was a good meeting, and his door is always open.5/ 
Home truths on British influence at the UN. One senior non-EU diplomat: “Yes, I can feel the UK’s weight in the [security] council is dwindling, you can feel it. Definitely when Brexit happens things will change.” 
Was. "We will remove tariffs so imported food will be cheaper after Brexit."Now."We will apply tariffs so imported food will not be cheaper after Brexit."#Brexit  
Before these smart arse Remainer idiots blame Brexit for Honda's closure they should develop a basic knowledge of how the car industry works. 
My 3yr old son said“Honda leaving has nothing to do with Brexit!Do they think we’re buttoned up the fuckin’ back?”“I know” I replied “Brexit is a bag of shite” he said We hugged & looked out over the Great Barrier Reef & watched an octopus suck off a coral trout 
Honda's car plant closure in Swindon is being reported across Asia as 'Another Brexit Retreat' #HondaSwindon 
BREAKING: Analysts Warn of Lazy Idiom Shortage in No Deal Brexit Scenario  
If I were a prominent Brexiteer my heart would be sinking at the prospect of spending the next few years going “See? This latest crap thing is nothing to do with Brexit.” 
Trump lies and offends #Cuba, #Venezuela, all peoples and #US own citizens. We will respond by voting #Yes on February 24. Why doesn't Trump calls national referendum on his own policies? | #CubaVotaSí #YoVotoSí #NosotrosVotamoSí 
Don't like that Labour support #brexit Enough to resign? No. Then you are party over country.Unforgivable in these times.#stopbrexit NOW 
Should all the Remain MPs be fired who have lied about the Honda closure by blaming it on Brexit? 
"one" of the rationales.One of the reasons given for Brexit was that we could lower tariffs on food from outside the EU, and reduce the cost of shopping, if we were no longer inside the CU.Now Gove is saying that won't happen. 
At 10pm on the day of the referendum, Farage gave an interview to Sky News in which he said: “it looks like remain will edge it. Ukip and I are going nowhere and the party will only continue to grow stronger in the future.” Guess what, REMAINERS are going NOWHERE! #PeoplesVote 
Labour say they want to keep everything on the table, but the table is being taken out to the removal vans. Listen to what @Adamprice had to say on #Brexit  
Except that the car manufacturers cite Brexit as a factor.  
He has to be sacked for that comment. Completely contradicts official statements from PM and her brexit minister 
Nothing to do with Brexit.  
With the BBC politicising the Honda closure and basically lying with their claims its to do with Brexit surely now is the time to open the debate about privatisation 
Richard Harrington, business minister, says Parliament will ‘take control’ if PM fails to get a deal & force extension of A50‘I do not believe there will be a no deal Brexit. I think PM’s deal will get though. If it does not Parliament will take control, we will extend A50’ 
You want brexit, we don't. If you want us to pull together, stop pulling against your members and supporters. If you want what's right for the country, keep us in the EU.  
A no-deal Brexit will cost Ireland almost 4% of GDP over five years, according to the IMF   
"There can only be an election if the Taoiseach decides so. Ministers have left this gov and it hasn't caused one. Varadkar has said that there cannot be an election due to Brexit. Fianna Fáil cannot use an election as an excuse to protect the Health Minister." - @MaryLouMcDonald 
Another UK success story harmed by Brexit. Until only a couple of years ago,  was a cool brand people admired and wanted to be part of.  If we’d set out specifically to ruin that, we could hardly have done it better.  
Such sad news from British Library - Recently digitised #SpareRib #archive may have access suspended in event of #NoDeal #Brexit @SubjectGender 
Honda have spent years warning us unless we could ensure Brexit wouldn't disrupt its supply chain it was going to cost them millions and remove any reason not to relocation.Instead of fighting to keep them here our MPs has asked them not to blame Brexit when they leave. 
interesting that no conditions on the extension are mentioned! we'd still rather #RevokeArticle50 but the longer we're in the EU the more time we have to stop Brexit! 
Sceptics said the UK would fall apart after the BREXIT vote? But employment is at a record and wages are growing at 3.4%. What is cracking is Europe, which is a mess, while trying to impose its losing formula on others. 
Companies abandoning UK is nothing to do with #Brexit. Investment in UK manufacturing drying up is nothing to do with #Brexit. Big banks moving assets from the UK is nothing to do with #Brexit. Billionaires leaving UK is nothing to do with #Brexit.Just an unlucky coincidence ! 
It seems a number of Pro-EU, anti-Brexit accounts which follow people I follow, and who follow me back, have blocked me.The subdivision and echo chamber mentality is rather counterproductive and tedious, but such is life.I appreciate the chance to converse with the rest. 
Worried about your Great British future? Sick of the vast amounts of uncertainty looming overhead? Never fear, we've skipped ahead to give you the highlights of Brexit in Not Tonight, an alternate history management game/RPG! 
I know Brexit is a total mess. But at least we'll be able to blame everything on it... "Ahhhhhh no, local shop is out of milk again'... BREXIT..."Couldn't afford my rent this month"... BREXIT..."fell down the stairs this morning".... BREXIT 
... which everyone in Ireland has been saying since 2016, abdvis why NI voted against Brexit. 
Manufacturers' fears over no-deal #Brexit are "project reality" not "project fear", says @GregClarkMP.It comes after Honda announced it's closing its factory in Swindon in 2021, with the loss of 3,500 jobs - latest here:  
Are you a Brit living in Europe (or the UK) who has been turned down for a job or freelance contract because of Brexit?DM me if you are and would be interested in sharing your story.  
Our politicians may still not have done anything to sort out the Brexit mess, but we're not sitting around with 38 days until Brexit. Join us in Parliament next week to make sure your voice is heard   
It's almost as though the advocates of this Brexit thingy have not *entirely* thought it through. To paraphrase Michael Gove himself, "I think people in this country have had enough of amateurs". 
'Nissan, Toyota and Honda were encouraged to come to Britain in the 1980s as a pro-business gateway to the EU and have helped turn around a domestic car industry that had been decimated.' 
36 animal welfare organisations are fighting together for a #BetterDealForAnimals to stop animals becoming victims of Brexit. 81% of us want strong animal protection laws post-Brexit. Will you speak up for a brighter future for millions of animals?  
Honda VP Europe confirms “This is not a Brexit related issue”- I am deleting comments to my site that wrongly ascribe the planned closure of Honda Swindon to Brexit given the very clear statements made by Honda that it's about other matters. I'll comment in more detail tomorrow. 
It seems that Companies & Brexit-backing billionaires are keen to stress that Brexit is not to blame for their decisions to relocate outside of the UK.  Perhaps they could explain why they don't see  Brexit as a reason to relocate businesses *into* the UK. 
Woah, hold on a second: Gove has just casually announced the U.K. will after all apply tariffs on imported food to protect British farmers. That both demolishes one of the rationales for Brexit, and raises the spectre of an issue that crippled the Tories in the 1840s & 1900s 
Cannot wait for our no deal brexit as I've turned into a slob sat in front of TV as much as poss, or glaring at twitter. Housework/dogwalking takes a poor second place. Bring back normality!!! Bring on March 30th!!! 
A righteous burn from @PaulEmbery 'Like those who voted for Brexit, they are just a bit too working-class, too earthy and ‘populist’. Their unrefined views don’t accord with the pro-EU, liberal cosmopolitan agenda, so they must be kept at arm’s length.' 
Oliver used clips from Gogglebox before the EU referendum to point out how Brits didn't know what to expect from voting for Brexit.  
this is the direct link to the evidence #Honda gave to select committee hearing on impact of #brexit saying a no deal brexit could cost Honda “10s of millions of pounds”  @BethRigby @PickardJE @SamCoatesTimes @Peston @bbclaurak 
Hold on, what? A ship has left Felixstowe bound for Japan due to arrive after #Brexit day & they have NO idea under what terms its cargo will be accepted, if at all, when it arrives. Strong, Stable Government. Better Together. Faster, Safer, Better Change. How hollow those sound 
Honda’s decision to close Swindon will not be the last casualty. #Brexit is the only thing that has changed since they committed to stay in the UK a short time ago. Do the math! #FBPE 
Greg Clark says that fears of manufacturers about customs barriers, logistics and migration in event of a no-deal Brexit are not ‘Project Fear’ but ‘Project Reality’‘Yesterday the first freighter set off for Japan with no clarity about customs arrangements when it arrives’ 
Appalling from UK Health Secretary at questions this morning. @Dr_PhilippaW and others raise real concerns about possible medicine shortages after Brexit. His only answer is that Jeremy Corbyn is a “proto-communist”. That will reassure @DiabetesUK 
Honda to close UK car plant as Brexit looms  
2/.“Scaremongering?Absolutely notWhat's really scary are the politicians who claim it is.”For low-income families most vulnerable to food price increases “a no-deal Brexit holds no positive outcome - a fact that politicians seem to be ignoring in their self-serving posturing” 
But diesel is a tiny tiny percentage of the cars made at Swindon,  the majority are petrol.  Then there is the future electric cars why couldn’t these be made there.  It’s all to do with tariffs.  Japan doesn’t need the UK now as a “gateway” to the EU.  Brexit is finishing UK.  
Birds Eye boss says that food prices will rise virtually immediately after Brexit Tariffs of 2-20% will have to be passed on to the consumer. 
Tory Remainers warn 22 MPs could quit in private showdown with Theresa MayCabinet ministers Greg Clark, Amber Rudd, David Gauke and David Mundell confronted the Prime Minister over the continuing threat of a nno-deal Brexit 
My conversation with Anne Marie Water is available for download on iTunes and other podcast platforms!We speak about her views on Islam, Britain, White people Brexit and her vision for the UK. 
Brexit causing ‘palpable decline’ in UK influence at the UN  
LISTEN | Legendary actor @KelseyGrammer speaks sense on Brexit and Trump and refuses to apologise for being a conservative. The far-left are already out to get him for daring to think for himself!Support us at  
The Tory MPs trying to stop Brexit really need to take a look at themselves & remember they were elected on a manifesto to Leave the EU, SM & CU.   
Brexit is an opportunity for Britain to open up to the rest of the world. Email your MP to save Brexit @  
Brexit is 38 days away. #brexit 
'We're Financially Ready For Brexit', Insist Team Behind Children's Hospital  
Things that weren’t mentioned in the referendum:Economy could shrink by 10%Food prices up by 20% 
Honda closing has everything to do with EU #Dieselgate, their damaging green crap policies and the new trade deal. Factories closing all over EU. Nothing to do with #Brexit.  
...just a wee warning to any Brexit Zoomers out there who are trying to convince me that Honda's decision to quit the sinking SS Britannia has nothing to do with their dogmatic adventure...don't bother...I'm frankly fed up trying to re-educate the cult members...#indyref2  
Brexit fogs our horizon and we do need a more clear sighted view of our future Strategic direction,but it’s been very good to hear such warm appreciation of Britain’s continuing and irreplaceable contribution to NATO #aviewtingedwithsadnessbutadeterminationtolimittheharm 
Danny Dyer has gone full libtard. First, he became the luvvie's unlikely gobpiece on Brexit. Now he thinks ISIS bride Shamima Begum should be allowed back to UK and be "given a chance to explain"   
LISTEN: How Russian intelligence has impacted #Brexit, coopted western Christian Consevatism and how Trump has popularized old antiSemitic conspiracy theories with the help of Russia. @DryCleanerCast 
One could be forgiven for thinking this Brexit thingy has not *entirely* been thought through. To paraphrase Gove himself, "I think people in this country have had enough of amateurs". 
The Honda plant in Turkey is also closing. It has tariff free access to the EU. It’s also 5000 miles closer to the EU than Japan. Honda have already stated this is not Brexit related but when did David Lammy ever concern himself with facts!  
No doubt. The techniques they use are pure KGB. Personal attacks, twisting of arguments away from the core issue, whataboutism, etc. These efforts seem more successful in Britain, based on my exchanges here, which explains why the Brexit op remains (pun intended) so successful. 
UK likely to delay Brexit, former EU chief Barroso says  
While #Brexit dominates the EU agenda for another week, I will be holding meetings on the strategic goal of #Serbia to join the #EuropeanUnion .  We are preparing our membership from a position of strength, to make us all stronger. 
"It is because of Brexit obsessives that we are in this mess. It is time for obsessive moderates like myself to assert ourselves."  
OK so if we're blaming Brexit for the Honda closure then presumably we blame the EU for the loss of...Woolworths, BHS, Thresher, JJB Sports, Borders, Blockbuster, Zavvi (formerly Virgin Megastore), Comet, MFI and Phones4U.Yah?  
TV news on the Honda story today is a new low. A completely invented narrative of Brexit being to blame continues to run in the face of the facts.Such bias saps networks of credibility in the eyes of viewers. Particularly serious for the taxpayer-funded BBC. 
This should not be taken as a show of support for #TheIndependentGroup; that will depend on their policy positions. Although, in principle, an anti-Brexit movement is welcome, not least since it might force Labour off the constructive ambiguity fence. Also, pluralism is healthy. 
Remember that programme 'Aufwiedersehen Pet' where British workers got jobs in the EU using FOM when work dried up in the UK.No chance of that for workers in the UK now, especially those who lose their jobs directly through #Brexit. 
Hi @Jacob_Rees_Mogg, you rudely neglected to respond to my 27 previous questions on this. I will keep asking until I have an answer.Do you expect any hard Brexit-related spoils for you, your family, ERG cronies or your hedge fund?PLEASE RT  
Yes, we're still in the EU Jacob and, as seen today in Swindon, your policies threaten decades of hard work. 
2016Remain: "If it looks like hard-Brexit the car makers will leave"Leavers: "Project FEAR!!"2019Remain: "The car makers are leaving because of Brexit"Leavers: "Project FEAR!!"2022Remain: "You're eating rat because of Brexit"Leavers: "Tastes of sovereignty". 
The Civil Service has been plotting to reverse Brexit when it should have been planning post-Brexit policy:  
.@RosieDuffield1 – Uncertainty over Brexit means sadly no surprise tens of thousands of EU nationals left Britain  
BREAKING NEWS: Government reveals new designs for post-Brexit UK banknotes.  
I have a friend on secondment to Paris from a UK company. He was told no guarantee of a job after 29th March, as they don't need him back in the UK office  Ditto, his wife with a different company, who is now on garden leave, pending Brexit decision  
Russia is interfering in elections everywhere, if you think that the UK Brexit referendum is an *exception* to this, sorry, but you're a fucking idiot.  
Not sure this tweet has aged very well! #brexit #BrexitVote #Nissan #EuropeanUnion #ford #mini #airbus #honda 
I’ve worked extensively with Japanese clients. It is not their practice to be open about their businesses. Honda’s decision is unquestionably to do with Brexit. 
.@JLongworthLML: Brexit will allow us to boost the entrepreneurial part of our economy by investing that £39bn, slashing tariffs, and taking advantage of the lower poundWrite to your MP:  
"But The Independent Group has no policies, bar not being a soviet-loving, terrorism apologist antisemite...and also wanting to prevent an economically disastrous Brexit"STOP SELLING IT SO WELL. 
The question is whether absent Brexit, Honda would have gone. There will always be factors in a decision but Brexit looks to have been the one that tipped it. Brexit makes Britain less competitive.  Honda to shut UK plant by 2022 in another Brexit retreat  
This is Emily Thornberry's fiery response when a caller told her she was "horrified" by Labour's stance on Brexit.@EmilyThornberry | #Brexit 
1. #LabourSplit"We've seen this before" they say..ME: We've NOT seen THIS before.This is NOT 1981BOTH MAIN PARTIES ARE FRIT of a#Remain Backlash of aNew Party of the CentreCos that's where the real majority is.We just need the #TorySplit#RevokeA50 Stop #Brexit 
On behalf of Chuka:"We only want a people vote on Brexit, not our seats."#ChangePolitics 
It really is quite staggering that Chuka Umunna has been planning a so-called centrist party for 3 years, yet appears to have spent no time thinking about what his policies would be, other than ditching his previous opposition to a 2nd referendum and not being Jeremy Corbyn. 
Honda: "This is not a Brexit issue."Remoaners: "See, we told you it was about Brexit." 
It’s amazing to see the phrase “EU intransigence” on #Brexit creeping into quality UK papers. Brexit is a UK policy; the UK rejected a deal it negotiated; UK red lines frame today’s talks; the UK still doesn’t know what it wants. EU intransigence? @thetimes & others. 
Wouldn’t it be great if Teressa may holds a snap election over brexit.The 7 traitors would lose there MP position and we can get real labour mps. #Election2019 #LabourSpilt #Traitors #JC4PM2019 #GTTO 
UK elites want to cancel Brexit just like the US Swamp want to cancel Trump’s election and his presidency. They only care about their power and control, not about the will of the people! #TuesdayThoughts 
Leadsom is the MP in Brackley where Mercedes HPE and #TeamLewis are based. Not content with screwing Honda in Swindon now they want to screw F1 too. Brexit is for mugs.  
I think most people agree with the breakaway Labour MP’s about the appalling state of the Labour Party.I think far fewer agree with their anti-Brexit stance.For a moderate and pro-Brexit party please  consider the re-launched and fast growing SDP 
Brexit: 22 Tories could quit in private showdown with Theresa May  
Tweeted this yesterday and will tweet it until you read it. You’re sick of Brexit, backstops and borders. Fine. They are not just words. Ask @MiamiShowband 
Israel is the latest nation to agree a continuity agreement with Britain, ensuring trade continues unfettered post-Brexit. (Don’t tell Labour, they’ve had enough bad news this week...) 
As the Government deliberately runs down the Brexit clock to try and squeeze a bad deal through Parliament, demand whatever they decide they #PutItToThePeople. Join #LGBT4PV and @gaystarnews on March 23rd to demand a #PeoplesVote 
Anyone questioning the importance of the #GFA & the fragility of a peace threatened by a bad #brexit, the on screen msg below was a common sight. This was from Italia ‘90, I was seven, we can’t go back to that.  
Spoke to EU magazine on Brexit, was very clear: "Brexit has been an absolute nightmare. All forms of Brexit will make the UK poorer and weaker. We have been divided by a sham referendum that featured illegal overspending, foreign interference and lies." 
Brexit causing ‘palpable decline’ in UK influence at the UN  
The fault lies with the policies of the Labour party that fails to recognise all Brexit scenarios cause damage to ordinary people. Support a #PeoplesVote. Let the people vote on facts not lies and fantasies. 
EU Commission spokesman says Michel Barnier told Stephen Barclay and Geoffrey Cox were told they will not be allowed to reopen the #Brexit deal 
Yaaassss queen slay corbyn is a death eater we need to wingardium leviosa straight out of brexit!!!!!! I have never had a proper conversation with someone who lives outside of London  
.@MargSchinas says that: “in yesterday’s meeting with @SteveBarclay, @MichelBarnier reiterated that the EU27 will not reopen the Withdrawal Agreement. We cannot accept a time limit to the backstop or a unilateral exit clause.” #Brexit 
We have the troops on the ground. 100,000 members, 2,000 councillors across the country and every single one of them willing to fight to stop the national embarrassment, that is Brexit @vincecable  
.@michaelgove currently outlining the absolute nightmare scenario of a no deal brexit to UK farmers at #NFU19Maybe should have mentioned this stuff before the referendum..  
Farage quit UKIP and joined the Brexit party last week. Doesn't seem overly keen to resign as an MEP and give up that massive salary despite being elected explicitly as a @UKIP candidate. Hypocrite. 
Brexiteer on LBC: 'England gave everything to the world....we gave them the boat...we invented the wheel.....let Europe come and knock on our door for a deal'Emily Thornberry: Yes.....I agree with youThat's Labour for you....pander to the Brexit morons out of fear 
*Honda plant in Swindon closes factory as they make diesel cars here which not many people want to buy them anymore.*#FBPE cult: HaHahA BrExiT, stooooopid LeAvErs vOteD to lOse tHeiR jObs. True colours show that may as well remove the  from the  in their Twitter bio. 
We now have ‘Industrial Brexit’: Japanese firms exiting Britain on the same timescale as ‘political Brexit’ takes effect.  Brexit & Jexit 
The anti democracy politics of the Funny Tinged Party the anti democracy politics of the Broken British Media Militia the anti democracy politics of Theresa May’s Brexit  
Tory Remainers 'warn 22 could quit' in private Brexit showdown with Theresa May 
 @JunckerEU and @theresa_may to meet tomorrow at 18:30 CET in Brussels to take stock of latest state of play on #Brexit. 
Six months ago Honda said it was definitely staying. Now it is definitely leaving. What has changed? The reality of Brexit 
“It is simply not appropriate (or likely even true) for Tomlinson to suggest that Brexit has nothing to do with this."Adele Marshall-Reynolds gives her local opinion on Brexit’s impact on the community. 
David Cameron's political career wasn't the first casualty of the EU or will he be the last, especially if our MP's try blocking brexit, which is what we're seeing happening now, the battle lines are being drawn. 
Thing is, Honda arent saying that. Press conference here in Tokyo today at Honda’s offices confirmed Brexit is a factor. 
Are @SkyNews and @BBCNews going to apologise for spreading fake news and project fear? They both claimed yesterday that Honda were leaving the UK because of #brexit with no evidence.Today that has been proven to be a lie.So will they issue an apology? I want one.  
UK wage growth matches decade high, jobs creation strong as Brexit nears  
CASH! For all those who think none of this is related to Brexit, I will happily pass on emails from various African National Banks requiring assistance to look after $250 million if you will please forward your bank details  
I am incredibly sad re the loss of jobs at #Honda It is terrible news.BUTPeople have to stop using #Brexit as a convenient (and often largely innacurate) excuse for bad news.Belief in politicians / experts etc is at an all time low. We need to fix that, not perpetuate it...  
You old twit. You borrowed 3m votes because you made our that you were anti Brexit. We all remember. 
LOL! You obviously skim-read the article. It says "Is Brexit a factor? Most certainly."Diesel = 6% of Honda Swindon's production.Swindon was poised to be the centre for electric car production for entire EU. No longer. At Tokyo press conf: "UK no longer suited for investment"  
Brexiters - before you lazily shrug off company relocations and job losses as ‘project fear’, please watch this Honda worker express his very real concerns about Brexit. This is real life rather than your delusional project unreality.Via @Channel4News 
Brexit causing ‘palpable decline’ in UK influence at the UN  
""I am English first and Great British second, I support a No Deal Brexit because there used to be a Woolworths on every street, now there isn't.""@LBCpmsl 
The question is not did Brexit cause a closure or not. The question is why are so many companies pulling out of the UK when it is time to review their business case?That is the time they choose new investment or not.We are not attractive and Brexit is a factor in that. 
WE WILL NOT FORGETWE WILL NEVER FORGIVEThose in parties who have been complicit in this #Brexit debacle who:DeludeDelayDissembleDeferDeceiveDeflectDivideDENY an option to #RevokeA50 #StopBrexitWE WILL PAY YOU BACKWE WILL BRING YOU DOWNWE ARE #REMAIN! 
.@jorditurull's reply to #Spain's Prosecution declares #Catalonia's INDEPENDENCE MOVEMENT to be GRASSROOTS DRIVEN &BOTH #presidentMas' #9N Consultation & president Puigdemont .@KRLS' #1Oct #Referèndum to follow DEMOCRATIC MANDATES-9N2014-27S2015 -1oct2017-21D2017#FakeTrial 
Brexit isn’t just causing job losses because larger companies are choosing to leave. It is also causing real damage and anxieties for countless smaller businesses. No responsible govt would ever even contemplate putting people and businesses into this situation. Yet here we are.  
If #Brexit shows us one thing, it’s that the UK lives in the past. No one owes us a living and if you want to do business, you need to go and win it. Lucky for Scotland we have a classy FM in @NicolaSturgeon who can influence. Compare with the insults from UK Defence Minister. 
Then it's quite ironic that one of the reasons cited by Somerset Capital re its move to Dublin, is of 'considerable uncertainty as to the position of the UK...following its withdrawal'. Jacob lies to defend Brexit, but SCM has to be honest to investors. 
"Phone calls that I've had this morning have not been about splits in the Labour Party.They've been about the 3,500 people at Honda losing their jobs, and sorting out Brexit.That's what we need to concentrate and focus our minds on."John McDonnell.   
1) “This is a global change, not something that’s specific to the UK or is driven equally by Brexit...”2) “We’ve been very clear that Brexit is not part of this decision...”3) “It’s not driven by Brexit”Will the BBC listen?#StandUp4Brexit 
Incoming Brexit disaster and British Labour decide to spend the week discussing British Labour.  
Good morning @Andrew_S_Hatton & thank you. As you say, I think we all need a distraction from #Brexit & everything that goes with it! Here's one that I hope you'll like: this is "Essex Landscape" by Walter Steggles from c.1930. #Essex #ELG 
Did she expect 'Russia' would call people personally and ask them to vote for Brexit! What a silly remark! 
Like most Party colleagues I'm experiencing a mixture of emotions - anger sadness & profound disappointment #LabourSplinterI'm sickened by the biased MSM coverageBut I am NOT going to allow it to distract me from calling out the carnage of this Tory Govt OR the chaos of #Brexit 
The Remainer establishment has been loudly blaming Brexit for the Swindon Honda factory closure.In their statement, Honda doesn’t mention Brexit and says that the company will also shut a factory in Turkey.#DespiteBrexit 
Honda: This is Not a Brexit-Related Issue - Guido Fawkes  
The UK like - "The last days in the compound of a cult that once flourished but is now finally and fatally besieged" #Brexit 
Daily irony top-up: The 2016 referendum was 'advisory'. If it hadn't been, it would by now have been declared illegal. But it was advisory, so it can't be voided. Therefore it can be used by Brexiters as mandating. - We used to be a country of fair play, & against cheats. 
HONDAThe UK Government announces a BAN on petrol & diesel cars by 2040. MPs, city council leaders & the green lobby demand the BAN come sooner & threaten taxes & restrictions. Car makers warn they’ll leave UK. The same anti-car politicians react with shock & then blame Brexit.  
Honda, Nissan & Hitachi closures in last month portend the most serious deindustrialisation in Britain since the closure of most of  the mining & steel industries in the 1980s. It will devastate Britain beyond London & it is a direct consequence of Brexit 
Honda 2016, 2017 & 2018: #Brexit is a terrible idea, our factories could close.Brexiters: If you blame #Brexit we'll boycott Honda.#Swindon #Honda 2019:  We're closing, it's not #Brexit#Brexiters: See REMOANERS, it's nothing to do with Brexit!! 
Together with Jeremy, John and Caroline Lucas we campaigned against Brexit. If Brexit won it won because Remain was supported by Blairites, including some of those who now quit Labour. Those who loathe Brexit must support Jeremy's Labour,  not the discredited Blairite project 
Honda to close only British factory, says move not #Brexit related  
Honda says they arent closing Swindon plant because of brexit - in other words they dont e3ant the frothing at the mouth leavers boycotting buying their cars.  You can gave that for free.  Nissan next 
"Reunification has seriously been suggested by those grasping for a solution to the #Brexit mess. Let’s call it what it is; desperate. The political equivalent of getting a drunk text from an ex at 1am, suggesting you get back together." @peterflanagan 
UK wage growth matches decade high, jobs creation strong as #Brexit nears  
The big news of last 24 hours isn’t the ‘gang of 7’ but Honda’s closure in Swindon. The Japanese are now systematically withdrawing their 30 years of manufacturing investment in the UK, because of Brexit. People need to start to joining up the dots 
As the #BrexitShambles unfurls in the UK's car industry and Porsche announces a 10% Brexit surcharge, it's worth watching the warnings in this two year old, Feb 2017, Newsnight report - who to believe, the proven lies of Vote Leave criminals Gove, Johnson and Davis or the facts?  
So the Dutch Blue Brexit muppet has been more successful in preparing for Brexit than HMG.   
"We wanted to have a unified party, particularly at a time when the government was bungling Brexit.At a time when many of our constituents are facing terrible things, which is Universal Credit, rising crime, rising poverty levels.."Rebecca Long_Bailey.  
Picture this post-Brexit. Elderly landlord, hates computers, 2 prospective tenants: British or me Romanian with "settled status". Right to rent? "Yes, you just need to click this link on your email then write my date of birth then..."We tend to choose what's hassle free. 
More good economic news for Scotland - unemployment at a record low of 3.5%, and lower than UK overall. @DerekMackaySNP right though to point to risk that Brexit will jeopardise our progress.  
The British people deserve better opposition to Brexit. There's only one way out of the national embarrassment that is Brexit - a people's vote >  
Diplomats have been heard to call their new furry friend “the BBC” - the Blue Brexit Creature. Ahem. And most importantly, it’s been immortalised in gif form!  
Important Dutch Brexit Muppet UpdateHow we laughed, but it has successfully encouraged firms to use the Dutch government’s Brexit impact scan service... (1)  
“You can’t play politics with peoples jobs and services” Sound Brexit familiar? Watch to remind yourself about Derek Hatton’s past and aks which politician could deliver a speech like this today? I can’t think of one.  
We marched before.We march again.With high noon upon us, it's time to demand any #Brexit deal is put to the people in a #PeoplesVote.SIGN UP NOW to the #PutItToThePeople March.  
"What are we, like, 44 days away from #Brexit and they haven't got a clue, they can't even decide themselves what Brexit means."Honda employee reacts to confirmation of factory closure in England and the loss of 3,500 jobs.  
Good news that unemployment in Scotland fell to 3.5%, the lowest rate on record #ScotlandsLabourMarket This record low unemployment is however at risk from #Brexit. 
At 16:30 GMT tune in for @NicolaSturgeon setting out @scotgov views on Brexit and support for EU Nationals at @AssembleeNat   details here  
Absolute bullshit. Honda have admitted that brexit had nothing whatsoever to do with the decision which was occasioned by the severe government restriction and penalties on diesel vehicles. Who are the many you talk of ? Government, Remain. People are not stupid.  
This ‘person’ is trying to usurp the Democratic process and reverse the Brexit Referendum result. She will stop at nothing to ensure your country will stay deeply and irrevocably joined to the EU in all but name. She will lie and cheat but tell you her deal is Brexit. It is not!!  
Literally the whole point of the Russian meddling in the referendum is that those influenced didn't realise it... 
NEW:NHS consultant Tom Dolphin tells us why he's worried about Brexit's effect on the NHS."We are already stretched to the limit by years of inadequate funding, and Brexit in any form is likely to make things much worse." 
Good news so it must be in spite of Brexit.  
At last, a Brexit dividend – shame it’s for the pedlars of fake medicine | Elizabeth Pisani  
Emily Thornberry defending magical Labour brexit on @LBC this morning is painful. Why won't Labour be honest? There is no Jobs First Brexit. Stop wreaking our country #PeoplesVote 
Don’t worry everyone, none of it is Brexit related. It’s all a figment. 
NEW: Unemployment falls by 14,000. Don't forget the remainers said we would lose 500,000 jobs, they were the liars! Email your MP to save Brexit @  
So despite the evidence from yesterday's DCMS report that anti EU propaganda Sputnik/RT had nearly FOUR TIMES the reach of both Leave campaigns during #Brexit referendum, shadow foreign secretary @EmilyThornberry believes campaigning has no impact on voters!#WilfulBlindness 
All these Corbyn supporters arguing with me that Labour was always pro brexit, it was even in their manifesto. These Corbyn supporters who spent most of 2018 arguing with us that Labour wasnt pro brexit when we said they were and even insulted us when we said they were. 
They keep saying “Brexit is the biggest issue since the 2nd World War”. I don’t believe that’s it. It’s deeper.I actually think it’s the struggle between maintaining capitalist ideals against the rise of socialism.The issue is: the status quo battle.The many VS the few! 
Yes I do. What part of "This decision had nothing to do with Brexit" do you not get. Not me saying that. It was the Head of Honda. 
Why am I angry with BBC News and Sky News?Because they broadcast their own version of Brexit events,  which are spun to bash Brexit. That's propaganda designed to hoodwink the uninformed, not news. 
Honda confirms "global changes" and NOT Brexit dictated its decision to leave Swindon (and in fact Europe altogether) as it focuses on China, Japan & the US.Remoaners lazily use Brexit as a scapegoat for all bad news and qualify good news with "despite Brexit". Pathetic!  
“Aside from hating Jeremy Corbyn, what unites the new #IndependentGroup? Brexit. What explains their timing? Brexit. What do they want to do? Stop Brexit. This is a Remainer party. Worse, it’s a party that confuses its outdated Europhilia for moderation” 
I dont give a fuck aboutScumChelseaNorwichWBASheff UtdShaun HarveyEFLSpygateShamina BegumBrexitBacon Big MacsAll I give a fuck about is if Leeds get promoted#LUFC #ALAW 
Lord Adonis - Are we going to leave the #EU in 5 weeks with #NoDeal?... the answer is not to #brexit... hold a #PeoplesVote.. & have a radical program of rebuilding the country inside the European Union. #FinalSay #RevokeA50 @Andrew_Adonis 
This from the paper that did most to promote ‘Putin stole the Referendum’, Satanic Child Abuse, Saddam’s WDM, ‘Human BSE’ and a thousand other crackpot panics. Stop publishing @carolecadwalla @lukeharding1968 and George Monbiot would help. 
I wish I could believe in grand orchestrated conspiracy theories about the illuminati running everything - it would be so much more reassuring than thinking that everybody who's supposed to be in charge of stuff is actually an incompetent, bungling, moronic fucking clown. #brexit 
Post Brexit. Dublin will compose of Dubs who live in cabins out their parents back yards.Only employees of all the bank headquarters that are relocating in Dublin will be able to rent. Culchies will be sent to Connacht and will try to grow potatoes on a rock 
This morning:Honda spokesman: This isn't about Brexit.BBC interviewer: So *is* this about Brexit?Repeat. 
Under 27? Want to spend 10 months writing about politics for @NewStatesman and @thetimes? The Anthony Howard Award 2019 is now open  This amazing scheme gave me the chance to cover a referendum, an election, 3 leadership elections and a party split. Apply! 
Honda's Ian Howells confirms Honda closure nothing to do with #Brexit. Also said nothing to do with the EU-Japan trade deal. All to do with consolidation in major markets: China, the US & Japan. Also closing Turkey plant.  
Nick Ferrari asks Chuka Umunna to justify why Streatham can't hold a by-election after he resigned from the Labour Party despite calling for a second Brexit referendum.@NickFerrariLBC | #LabourSplit | #Brexit 
“It’s not you. It’s me.” ~ Every Large Manufacturer Fleeing Brexit Britain 
38 days to go till possible No Deal Brexit catastrofuck:Labour: pic.twitter.com/OJQrASEK6q 
State Broadcaster BBC  has got the record stuck, it’s nothing to do with Brexit, it’s nothing to do with Brexit.Working so hard to dismiss every job lost or car plant closing as nothing to do with Brexit. Disgraceful propaganda.#FBPE #PeoplesVote 
SNP leader to tell members of the French parliament that efforts to encourage EU citizens to stay in Scotland after Brexit are to be stepped up. 
I am starting to think Brexit is a radical way to cut our carbon emissions by getting rid of our manufacturing industry and making people feel like they can't be arsed to fly anywhere. 
Whose job have Leave got in their sights next? The Brexit vanity project is over.  
. @Honda VP for Europe Ian Howells "This is a not a Brexit related issue for us - this decision's been made on the basis of global changes."  
#LabourSplit has very little to stopping Brexit but a lot do with stopping Corbyn. 
As chaotic #Brexit looms, Britain biggest supermarket, Tesco, is stockpiling goods with a long shelf life and says that its options for fresh produce will be more limited  
For Wall Street Banks in London; One big Brexit beneficiary is Dublin, where Bank of America, Citigroup and Barclays are expanding their ranks. “Dublin is our headquarters for our European bank now, full stop,” said vice chairwoman of Bank of America  
Really, are people still wringing their hands about "respecting the referendum result" when Brexit is destroying thousands of jobs before our very eyes? As we watch this nationalist acid pour all over the economy, do we just say: "carry on! It's democracy!"? Unforgivable. 
Britain will continue to lead the world in setting food standards after BrexitWrite to your MP:  
I have to repeat this as the media are still blaming Brexit.. "Meanwhile, another official from Honda told BBC radio on Tuesday that the closure was not Brexit-related, according to Reuters." 
Only one in three Leave voters think May's deal is better than staying in the EUMay's Brexit deal is... 36% - Better than remaining in the EU21% - About the same as remaining in the EU22% - Worse than remaining in the EU22% - Don't know 
"Honda could not be clearer – the closure of its Swindon plant is unrelated to Brexit"  
“@Honda_UK are clear (their decision) is based on global trends, not Brexit” @JustinTomlinson#StandUp4Brexit #ProjectFear 
Unrepentant Jihadi bride compares 22 Manchester suicide bomb victims to Isis dead. To an even greater degree than a brexit betrayal, let this nasty piece of work back into Britain and government will suffer.  
We're launching what I believe to be a significant new case in the Brexit sphere at 10pm this evening.  Watch this space. 
All the businesses that have been announcing closures / huge disruption... it's just a coincidence that it's happening now in the months before Brexit.It's only Sainsburys, Asda, Dyson, Jaguar Land Rover, Unilever, Toyota, Airbus, Flybmi, Hitachi, Honda, Philips, Nissan, BMW...  
You see this clip of a bloke below?There’s going to be thousands of clips like this....for years. Every time #brexit causes job losses and closures.If I were an MP id be more afraid of them then 200 old racists in yellow vests on a day out in London.  
MEMO TO SKY NEWS. STOP PEDDLING AND ALLOWING YOUR GUESTS TO PEDDLE FAKE NEWS. HONDA MADE IT QUITE CLEAR THAT BREXIT HAD NOTHING WHATSOEVER TO DO WITH ITS FACTORY CLOSURE. STOP LYING 
Doesn’t matter which way you look at it, the government has made a mess of Brexit...(Photo @PoliticalPics) 
The Withdrawal Act allows the leaving date of 29th March to be put back or suspended. If there are Euro elections UKIP will fight them in every Region. I am raising the money now. We cannot believe a word the Govnt says on Brexit & UKIP will be ready.   
More from the asian press.Brexit accelerating Japanese exodus from UK: Analysts, Europe News & Top Stories - The Straits Times  
Adonis asked on Sky about Labour split. Answered blaming Brexit for Honda closure. Wtf? 
Are you joining the #PutItToThePeopleMarch on 23 March?Are you coming with your grandchildren?Tell us your story! Were you a grandparent Leaver with Remain grandchildren but  @RemainerNow ? We will have a meeting place for you. Grandchildren and Grandparents unite against #Brexit 
Honda CEO says decision to end production in UK not Brexit related  
KENYANS will not be cornered to support referendum just because the politician said so. The politician should first change his attitude and drop bad manners before he can lecture the constitution on its failures. 
But they also said it was about concentrating on their electric models, for which, not being part of the same rules of origin as the EU would have meant they would have been facing tariffs selling in to Europe. So there reasoning doesn't help the cause of Brexit, does it?  
NEWS! Brexit has nothing to do with Brexit, insist Brexiters  
It’s only bloody Frasier. In my radio studio. Meta. Got him to do a link and everything. We talked Trump, why he would vote for Brexit but most importantly - that Frasier is hopefully coming back but not as a radio host. His new profession? Running a dating agency. @bbc5live 10am 
Jobs go first Brexit.Labour isn't working.Well done the 7 who have stuck by their principles.Shame Labour haven't. 
Honda could not be clearer – the closure of its Swindon plant is unrelated to Brexit, explains @julianHjessop 
The Irish are kicking off because EU member states are more bothered about avoiding a no-deal Brexit than a time-limited backstop — when will they get it? Brussels doesn’t care!   
I have little faith that the government which shut down Leveson inquiry, is allowing the Met police to sit on evidence of referendum tampering, and threatens the BBC with funding cuts to bias its reporting will use this for anything other than to squelch critical speech.  
Patrick Minford must be the happiest man in Britain today. The (only) economist for Brexit, he is on record that the UK would have to "run down" its car manufacturing industry as part of the (hard) Brexit process. For him, it's just a milestone on the road to low tax nirvana. 
The notion however, that the threat of no-deal Brexit plays absolutely no part in the business thinking of any multinational, especially involved in imports or exports, currently operating out of the UK, is for the birds. And anyone suggesting so, is either ignorant or dishonest. 
Will there now be an apology from David Lammy for Brexit scaremongering and playing politics with people's jobs?This is a time to back Britain and back our factory workers.Yet Lammy & co only interested in Brexit fearmongering. Sad.  
PLEASE WATCH AND RETWEET ALL DAY TODAYHonda UK boss explicitly saying Honda closure NOT to do with Brexit.Please retweet and shame the liars and scaremongers for blaming the closure on Brexit.  
There’s only one reason why ultra-Remain MPs are so terrified of “no deal” Brexit because they know it represents and proper clean Brexit with no way back. 
Brexit can’t save unionism. Prosperity might 
Catherine Blaicklock talk with Nicky Campbell about the politically homeless on BBC Radio 5 Live in a few minutes. #brexit #thebrexitparty 
Hammond has worked in conjunction with May to create a deal which is Brexit in name only and this still isn’t good enough for the ultra-Remainers who dominate cabinet. “Pro-EU Tory ministers at odds over ‘spineless’ Philip Hammond”  
Thread on Honda, Swindon, cars and Brexit.Ok, let's play a game. A Brexit game.Let's imagine a large UK company has a factory in Japan making something the UK regards as both valuable and important. Jam, let's say. 
Are we a nation of animal lovers? World leader on animal protection? Or are we failing to recognise animals as more than objects after #Brexit? PLEASE RT to ask @michaelgove to bring forward Animal Sentience Law for a #BetterDealForAnimals to safeguard vital protections 
This advert in @thetimes today about passports and #Brexit. Feels all a bit  to me.  
France's Europe minister Nathalie Loiseau outlines view on Brexit delay.For technical reasons, a few days' possibleFor political reasons would have to be a "true advance" behind something that commands majority support among MPs that corresponds to EU red lines. 
My thread from last April on Brexit. It's not just banks that this is happening to now. Multinationals looking to close an asset will look to the UK first. Those looking to open one will look elsewhere. Repeat for several years.  
Dutch PM warns of ‘devastating’ impact of no-deal Brexit on UK  via @financialtimes 
Good. Political parties are best as broad churches but if you’re genuinely appalled by austerity or Brexit, you’re complicit in it every day that you stick with the Tories. Time for Allen, Soubry and co to put their money where their mouths are.  
Seems to me, companies citing Brexit as part of their business rationale, do so in the hope of influencing UK policy. Those like Honda, who have reached a point of giving up on the UK, have no reason to antagonise gov’t or consumers by citing Brexit. The latter is more worrying. 
‘New Centrist Party opposed to Brexit’ polling at 8% and most people think they should have the guts to call by-elections.  
The Nikkei newspaper has no political reason to cite brexit as a major factor in the Honda decision, but they have.What do Swindon MPs @JustinTomlinson and @RobertBuckland have to say about that?Swindon is #remainernow. You should back a #PeoplesVote 
BBC: "Honda leaving Swindon because of Brexit"Senior Vice-Chairman Honda: "This decision is not related to Brexit" BBC: "Honda leaving Swindon because of Brexit" Me: "I give up" 
Christ the state of this from @LenMcCluskey.Honda closing Swindon is not caused *by* #Brexit. IT LITERALLY *IS* BREXIT. If you support Brexit you caused this. It is an inevitable, predictable and predicted consequence of leaving the EU. WAKE UP!  
Brexit lexicon (or Blexicon?):"Talks are ongoing" = "The EU is still saying no." 
Brian Klaas wrote a book about how upset he was that Trump was on the verge of winning an election and that Brexit won, because apparently both were "threats to democracy" somehow.Oh, wait, he was co-author, I guess he "partly" wrote it, that makes him an expert.  
The denial to accept that businesses are quitting the UK as a result of Brexit (access to EU/ uncertainty) is frankly weird. Brexit is a religion. Blindly dogmatic. Sees loss, pain and even hunger as a virtue. It's rewards are non physical. It's medieval. Economic flat earthers. 
None of the above apply to the EU27, or to any country other than the UK. All apply to us in a no-deal Brexit, and most apply under any form of Brexit (besides, a Brexit with a transition period is just no-deal deferred).Now try saying "it's nothing to do with Brexit"! 
Timely to look at the impacts of Brexit on the motor industry...- Breaks just-in-time production model due to shipping/border delays- Tariffs on finished vehicles- Tariffs on car parts- Rules of origin issues- Non-tariff barriers to the movements of components 
Britain needs a day of reckoning. It’s a country paralysed, polarised and falling apart, yet deluded about its global status. A humbling must come to pass. Brexit will provide it.  
Umunna on Brexit:•Triggering A50 is the right thing to do•It would be wrong to have a 2nd Ref•We must end Freedom of Movement•We must sacrifice Single MarketEvidence•••• 
Arguing about whether Honda decision is or isn't to do with Brexit is pointless. 1. Such decisions are always multi factor. 2. Companies will give the reason most palatable to govts, employees, shareholders 3. Being part of a wider network like  wd have made  more resilient. 
HSBC is now predicting a 30% chance of a "long lasting recession with a weak recovery" in the UK, which explains why it has taken another Brexit provision of $165m (Total provisions now $410m).  
F*ck's sake John McDonnell you can't 'sort out' #Brexit..you have to #StopBrexit!!ALL Versions lead to Loss of RightsLoss of JobsLoss of BusinessLoss of TaxLoss of Public ServicesLoss of InfluenceLoss of CONTROLLoss of Union?#RevokeA50 #Remain in Control in the EU! 
Remainers who read this and don't at least adjust their prior assumption that Honda closed "because of Brexit" are not being intellectually honest.  
So working on the basis that EVERY single job loss in the UK is #Brexit related, the 800 #Honda jobs cuts in #Swindon that happened in 2013, must have been something to do with the #EURef vote that took place 3-years later? Isn't that how it works? 
Can’t help feeling that local Swindon MP @JustinTomlinson rushing around telling workers that everything will be fine because they aren’t losing their jobs because of Brexit isn’t the best of looks 
Senior vice-president of Honda Europe Ian Howells says "Brexit is not part of this decision"Read more on the story here:  
Why should they? The Labour party didn’t call for one when Frank Field went independent or when one of their MPs was sent to prison for perverting the course of justice. Or is only when people call out your criminally fraudulent Brexit agenda that you complain? 
Production is going back to Japan.Car sales struggling globally.Nothing to do with Brexit, their other uk operations are remaining to service Europe.Never sure if remainers are thick or deceitful.  
Today we want to share with you this interview by @spikedonline to @C_Lapavitsas ‘The left must fight for a real Brexit’  … Find it also on our website  #LeftBrexitTour #LeftBrexit 
I have respect and admiration for those making a principled stand against antisemitism, risking their political careers in the process. But these splitters say they want to fix our “broken politics”. Betraying the British people on Brexit would do the precise opposite. 
Of course they did, as soon as they heard we were going to give Japan a free trade deal with zero tariffs after brexit, they jumped in. That should tell even the most blinkered of remainers what the EU is really like. Jealous as hell because they know the U.K. will be successful.  
Assume there's likely to be a very public apology for this at some point in the next few minutes given that Honda have just very clearly stated that this is not Brexit related on @BBCRadio4 - wouldn't be right to falsely use people's jobs as a political tool would it @DavidLammy? 
It is even worse than it looksMay was told at the G20 summit in 2016 by Japan that unless the U.K. chose **a very soft Brexit ** Japanese companies would leave Leave also means  Leave in Japanese  
Honda Swindon Closure:“This is not a Brexit-related decision for us.” Ian Howells,Honda UK Senior Vice-President.  
Honda confirms that its Swindon plant will close in 2021. The company say this is due to changes in the industry, but many suspect Brexit has played a role.  
Where are the announcements of firms queuing to expand or invest in the UK because of Brexit?  It’s only 38 days away.  Shouldn’t they be well on with prep? Shouldn’t we be hearing about them from the Government desperate to tell us brexit is ace?  #FBPE #RevokeArticle50 
Brexiteer: Brexit has nothing to do with companies leaving Britain“Why they leaving then?”Brexiteer: Global market trends “What?”Brexiteer: Diesel “Eh?”Brexiteer: Paddy McGuiness “Huh?”Brexiteer: Your mum “Excuse me?”Brexiteer: Ribena doesn’t taste the same 
There is a very simple way of getting rid of the uncertainty regarding #Brexit. And we can do it now. #RevokeArticle50 
Your support for Brexit has enabled this.There is no jobs-first Brexit.Do your duty and #StopBrexit. 
“Not a brexit related issue - Honda”  
Good morning from the Newsroom. in Today’s paper: As Brexit looms, we bring you the definitive guide to the burning questions facing #OurPreciousUnion and NORTHERN IRELAND from globally hailed and respected historian Ruth “Deadly” Edwards: 
Brexit is the “mother of all messes” which could hand an advantage to Ferrari if no deal is reached, Mercedes boss has warned #F1 @MercedesAMGF1 
The number of political commentators, MPs and MEPs lying about the circumstances regards the closure of the Honda factory is frankly staggering. So many dumping the blame at the doors of Brexit when the official press release and comments from Honda confirm exactly the opposite.  
So in the News today the UK Head of Honda has announced that the decision to close the Swindon plant, was not a Brexit decision. Yet immediately in the following sentence the mainstream media are talking about how this is linked with Brexit. #ProjectFear going into overdrive 
New report from @IEEP_eu reveals significant risks to the environment from a ‘no deal’ Brexit -  
‘I’m exhausted explaining to British people the geography of their own country’. Another excellent article by an Irish person living in Britain, that all us Irish here can totally relate to. #Brexit  
Curious blindness. To set aside the result of the largest democratic participation in UK history, and to insist that #Brexit must be prevented so we remain in the EU, *is* to saddle Britain (and NI) with the same old, tired politics: it is not renewal, but sclerosis. #LabourSplit 
Interesting and rather depressing. And happily goes beyond the Brexit/no Brexit simplifications.  
Yet Japanese business press lead with this: “Honda to shut UK plant by 2022 in another Brexit retreat”  
As Honda confirms it will close its Swindon factory with the loss of 3,500 jobs, this caller demanded an apology from Nigel Farage: "Is this the glorious Brexit future you promised?" 
Lammy..... why do you need to mislead or tell blatant lies to support your viewpoint on brexit?  Is it because the ‘truth’ is just not powerful enough and does not stand up to scrutiny? Honda have quite firmly confirmed that their decision is nothing to do with brexit...  
'Brexit might be blamed for Honda's problems, but the truth is a lot more complicated,' says Andrew English 
We're marching on 23/3 - the government has utterly failed to negotiate Brexit and it's time to #PutItToThePeopleWill you be there?   
As UNESCO have highlighted in this new report, if Brexit leads to a hard border or is manipulated to force a border poll: both risk the peace & prosperity of NI. Both would be deeply irresponsible. We need the backstop guaranteed & the final say on Brexit.  
#HondaGonda.It really is Brexit.#StopBrexit 
Ahead of the release of their new album 'Eton Alive', Sleaford Mods speak about Brexit Britain, class divides, and online trolling  
Strange, I seem to recall you saying you would want another referendum if the result was 52/48.You’re usually a big advocate of a #peoplesvote when it suits you. 
Here's the problem: there is now an argument between people who say the Honda closure is nothing to do with Brexit and those who say it is only to do with Brexit.  Neither is true.  But the discourse is pitched between two extremes, as ever. 
It’s extraordinarily bad luck for the government that so many pieces of bad economic news just happen to be occurring at the same time it is mishandling Brexit 
"...the effect of Jeremy running this kind of campaign... positive, optimistic, dynamic, engaging in particular young people... has thwarted Theresa May's attempts to pursue a Hard Brexit. And I give @jeremycorbyn and the entire @UKLabour team full credit for that." #GE17 
With less than 40 days left until #Brexit, Alliance Leader @naomi_long outlines why a no deal scenario would be catastrophic and why a backstop is required. 
Tragic as #Honda ends 30 yrs in #Swindon as UK “no longer suited for investment”.Coincidence? Honda & Japan always clear on Brexit position3500 car jobs lostMore than double in supply chain/local servicesElectric vehicle opportunity lostMassive blow to UK’s #GreenEconomy 
It's quite unacceptable your right the constant blaming of Brexit for every possible downside of everything from traffic chaos no flights no food no drugs for NHS it's a pitiful diatribe! 
Honda are clear that Swindon factory closure is not Brexit-related. Those using this sad news as a political football should pack it in. This isn't a game.  
LETS BE CLEAR R4 reported that Honda closing Swindon plant has absolutely nothing to do with Brexit. But it has to do with global issues & the switch to electrical cars.Hmm last year Japan did a massive deal with France/EU. So why did those issues NOT stop that deal? 
SWINDON: Plant closure is not Brexit-related, Senior Vice-President of Honda Europe confirms.  
Theresa the lamb has an uncertain future. Her owners have no idea what she will be worth after #Brexit. Farmers are being forced to consider alternative forms of income - more on this story here:  
Ok  #r4today I’ve just turned you off. An interview with extremist ex- politician Derek Hatton and then encouraging Kelsey Grammer to give a political broadcast supporting Trump and Brexit. I suppose that’s your idea of balance. 
Disgusted with @bbcnews (again) this morning. Nina is in Swindon with an "expert" who is blaming Honda's woes on the impact of Brexit on JIT. 15 mins later Honda announces in Japan that closure has nothing to do with Brexit. Any apology from BBC? Of course not. 
Hey Cork, got that old Ford plant? #brexit 
Destroy the future of diesel cars; then have the EU agree a treaty that entirely removes the rationale for Japanese car makers to manufacture their cars away from Japan. Then, once you are done, blame Brexit for factory closures. Idiots. 
Rebecca Long-Bailey flannelling on @BBCr4today on the issue of a #PeoplesVoteIt's on the tableTory Govt messing up #Brexit..Waffle...waffle We have c 39 days left..the cliff is yds away.Keeping it on the table.Sums it up..never going to take it off!!#RevokeA50 
SonyDysonPanasonicLloydsUnileverGoldman SachsBarclaysAirbusFlybmiP&OHSBCJP MorganUBSFordHitachiToshibaAXAHondaMoneygramPhilips European Banking AuthorityEuropean Medicines AgencyBank of AmericaAll nothing to do with Brexit? Pure coincidence? 
The Bank of England did not calculate that Brexit could cause house prices to fall 30%. The scenario of a 30% fall was an element of the Bank's stress-testing, using worst-case hypotheticals to see what potential shocks banks could withstand.  
Labour’s Rebecca Long-Bailey on #r4today talking Honda and Brexit.Labour leadership team aren’t fighting Brexit, so they can feign concern about its impact on jobs all they like it, but while they’re facilitating it, they’re as culpable as the Tories. 
Brexit is not causing any problems for the UK economy.Politicians are causing huge problems for the UK economy. 
Today Business secretary Greg Clark — a man who knows Brexit to be a bad idea — will suffer cognitive dissonance as he tries to explain why Brexit has little to do with Honda closure 
If a corporate decision is #Brexit related, let’s say so. If it isn’t, let’s not say it is. This isn’t very difficult. It just requires us to behave like normal people. #Honda #Nissan etc 
The Hun Media are in meltdown over Celtic going 8 points clear with Broonys late goal.Celtic over next few weeks are going to be blamed for Brexit, Ebola ISIS & Novichok This I s just wonderful to see 10 and 55 is going to end them  
"The sun never sets on the British Empire" Mate since brexit we've been at maghrib for quite a while LOL 
Unfucknbelievable Tory MP from a couple of weeks ago Honda Swindon have full confidence in Theresa May’s Brexit plan  
Listening to Rebecca Long-Bailey weighing in on the impact of Brexit on the automotive industry. Dead right - if only there was a major party opposing Brexit eh?  
Honda bosses have said its nothing to do with Brexit.  Move on to your next project fear report. 
#BBC Breakfast ran a long piece today wrongly attributing the Honda closure to #Brexit.This kind of 'journalism' is not only dishonest, but seriously undermines public trust in the impartiality of the #BBC.#BBCCharter 
Would you invest in building electric vehicles in a country that was stupidly quitting its most important market when your own country now had a better deal with that market? #not_brexit_related_my_butt 
More lies - You can smell the desperation from those in the pockets of others.....although they won't look into the eyes of those who are losing their jobs and repeat these disingenuous and misleading attempts to deflect blame away from the ever present factor. 
#r4today Nick Robinson: Which policies from the Labour manifesto, apart from Brexit, do you disagree with?Chuka Umunna: Err, brexit, brexit, brexit. 
What has been presented as the greatest example of DUP-Sinn Féin cooperation on Brexit - a letter to the PM from Martin McGuinness & Arlene Foster - was actually written by civil servants with no recorded evidence of political involvement. 
Here's #Honda's evidence to Parliament, expressing why it cannot afford the possibility of a 10% #Brexit tariff.The decision to leave #Swindon is 100% down to #Brexit  
“It was nothing to do with Brexit, son.”  
The Asian view ; “The prospect of Brexit, scheduled for March 29, added yet more uncertainty to a business already mired in red ink.”.....Honda to shut UK plant by 2022 in another Brexit retreat - Nikkei Asian Review  
While the obsession / distraction of Brexit continues, a much bigger trend is at play. Honda admits the rise of electric vehicles are the reason behind its UK plant closure. Plans to revise strategy towards EVs.  
Just in: Honda will shut down its plant in Swindon in 2021 in the wake of the uncertainty caused by Brexit – marking what would be its first ever closure of a vehicle factory in its 71-year history  
Desperate apologists for #Brexit busily trying to avoid blame for Honda’s decision.  Read the letter from the Japanese Government to  the UK Government in September 2016 - @GovUK failure to heed that is the context for all these adverse decisions. @Tihanygirl @theweeflea 
Honda to shut major British plant in 2021, impacting 3,500 jobs.The Japanese auto giant has become the latest firm to announce a downsizing of operations as Brexit looms 
As we gain a better understanding of Honda's Swindon decision & where Brexit fits in I'm reminded of @TomKibasi's take on Brexit in general. The country doesn't suddenly collapse, but enters a long, sad decline directly attributable to Brexit.  
A snapshot poll in Britain puts a "new centrist party opposed to Brexit" on just 8%. Insert all usual caveats about a very volatile climate & low voter awareness.  
Honda is closing because of Brexit. Swindon and surrounding areas will be decimated by this tragedy.  
It doesn't matter to Theresa May's government whether 99% think Brexit is a mistake, she dares not upset the billionaire Tory backers, who are dreaming of a UK with reduced worker rights, pollution and food controls, where there is no pesky brake on their PROFITS. 
We're stuck hoping these Japanese investors leaving UK will say "And we had to do this because of your fucking stupid Brexit!"But Japan doesn't do that. They practice a tranquil fury. One that communicates in personal interaction.Our government has failed to perceive it. 
On @GMB I was confronted with same ridiculous claim that 'nothing to do with Brexit'. @Honda_UK invests here because we were 'gateway to EU Single Market. No longer. Up against Brexiteer John Longworth : "we don't need these multinational investors" 
More “top notch unbiased analysis”, baseless assertions from Sky’s @lewis_goodall ...Head of Honda UK explicitly said Brexit was nothing to do with the decision when challenged on #r4today ... might be useful to correct your tweet, being objective and all that @montie @ajcdeane 
Brexiters will no doubt jump on the fact that Honda haven't said #Brexit is one of the reasons for their decision to close down the Swindon plant. Why would they? But, it must surely be a factor. After all, the UK post-Brexit doesn't have a trade deal with Japan. The EU does! 
Brexit must be an opportunity for the UK to play to our strengths as a great country, and succeed.  
One of the key features of the Brexit debate is Remainers saying the Brexiteers make false claims to further their arguments. Honda have specifically said their closure decision is not related to Brexit. So why are Remainers continuing to say it was related to Brexit. 
Not just football but the whole of sport recognise Arsene Wenger as a legend and a supreme human being. But brexit Bradders , unemployed, single and scrounging fags from complete strangers thinks he's crap 
With 8 out of 10 voters passionate about keeping strong animal protections, & cross-party support on the issue, @DefraGovUK @michaelgove must commit to a #BetterDealForAnimals. We’re asking MPs to stop animals becoming victims of Brexit - get involved!  
Not to be dramatic but get me in a beer garden with a pint of brexit living the dream 
Looking beyond the Westminster procedures, the party splits, and whatever people though was possible on #Brexit two years ago, the options are narrowing on the #Brexitdisaster : 
“This is not a Brexit related decision,” says @Honda ‘s VP Europe Ian Howells on @BBCr4today This after @Dyson and others moving out of the EU, not just from UK, is a wake-up call for our government to create a better environment for business. 
This morning, @BBCr4today and @BBCNews are working incredibly hard to pin the blame for the painful closure of Honda in Swindon on Brexit.It is not working because it is not true. Honda’s senior manager in Europe just said this is not a Brexit related issue.  
Did YOU actually read the article, Julia?It says, certainly, the Honda decision is because of #Brexit, but not only because Brexit: there are other reasons too, diesel being one of them.For goodness sake, Julia. Stop misrepresenting everything all the time. 
"Macron will tell Europe that Brexit is a 'wake-up call' and means the EU must be more 'assertive' and stand up to Trump to stop other countries leaving."Do exactly the opposite of what this Rothschild puppet says, Europe... thanks!#Brexit#GiletsJaunes#France#Qanon 
Honda press conference and announcement confirms what I heard that it is under pressure to develop electric vehicles. Civic like X Trail is not where future lies. If it wasn't for Brexit,  could have been centre for electric vehicle development for  market. 
NO DEAL BREXIT: EU banks can access UK for £60 trillion of trading, UK can serve EU clients. “It removes the uncertainty.”  
Honda could not have made it clearer on @BBCr4today closure of Swindon plant is about the electrification of cars - nothing to do with #Brexit. 
Honda UK boss tells #R4today "This is not a Brexit related issue for us." Global changes to do with switch to electric cars. Says it was a choice between Japan and the US. 
Honda has confirmed it plans to close its Swindon factory. It's the biggest blow yet to Britain's car industry, which is already buckling under thousands of job cuts and the loss of key models before Brexit  
"This is not a Brexit related issue" - says Honda UK boss Ian Howells #r4today 
Coach now booked #YorkshireforEurope's rally outside Parliament next Wed - the day when future of Brexit cd be decided! Come & join us & help #StopBrexit! @LeedsEurope @48pcHullEYorks @York4EU @PeoplesvoteSWY @bradfordeurope @EuroMoveNELincs @Sheffield4EU 
Has there been even one major company that’s announced it’s moving any new operation TO Britain to somehow take advantage of brexit?  All the jobs are only going one way...  
2019: SonyDysonLloydsUnileverGoldman SachsBarclaysAirbusFlybmiP&OHSBCJP MorganUBSFordHitachiToshibaAXAHondaMoneygramPhilips Panasonic European Banking AuthorityEuropean Medicines AgencyBank of AmericaBut apparently, it’s got nothing to do with Brexit. 
Now confirmed, #Honda plans to shut #Swindon factory, putting 3,500 jobs at risk. Brexit is bad for business.We need a #PeoplesVote to #PutItToThePeople#Biz4PV 
Businesses, how are you preparing for #Brexit?All you need to know about customs duties, import and export licenses, customs authorisations, VAT and excise rules: #Prepare4Brexit 
From the same article: "Is Brexit uncertainty a factor? Almost certainly."  
So, @mgoldenmsp the First Minister is promoting Scottish trade while Brexit Tories are destroying Scottish business. Who were *you* promoting on this ‘jaunt’ to Israel? #AirMilesHypocrite 
More: Honda statement confirming plans to shut its Swindon factory in 2021 says the proposal comes as the company accelerates its commitment to electrified cars, makes no mention of Brexit. 
Failure to level with the public on the trade offs & costs of the Brexit options is a big political problem. Denying that Brexit is a key factor in the growing number of businesses leaving the UK is a manifestation of the problem. We cannot gloss over issues impacting livelihoods 
Every current cabinet Minister voted in favour of EU Withdrawal Act 2018? All ministers knew that if the EU failed to agree a post #Brexit terms of trade agreement with the UK, we would leave the EU at 11pm on 29th March 2019?Cabinet resignations will not change the Law! 
The National Farmers Union is demanding a written guarantee from the government that Brexit won't undermine British farming standards  
One major Brexit headache has now been solved officially  
Honda confirms the loss of 3500 jobs in Swindon, is there one MP among the 625 mice in Westminster with an ounce of leadership prepared to stand up and stop BREXIT or are they only concerned with their salary, expenses, pension, jollies and freebies? 
It's bad for them but not the end of the world. Unemployment is low and highly skilled people are in demand. Jobs for life are really a relic of a bygone era. And Honda closed their operations in UK due to lack of demand for diesels not brexit. 
No-deal Brexit could disrupt medicine supplies for 'at least' six months, DHSC admits  
HSBC sees UK business weaken amid Brexit uncertainty  
Media say Honda closing Swindon is to do with Brexit, Boss of Honda says Brexit has nothing to do with it, media find "experts" who say it's all because of Brexit... you gotta love it ;-) 
A man who has worked at Honda in Swindon for 24 years, on finding out his factory will close and 3,500 jobs will be lost. This is gut-wrenching. "They can't even decide for themselves what Brexit means. This is idiocy of epic proportions." 
I play the ukulele. Exactly how this is going to save the UK post brexit? Literally fiddling while Rome burns come to mind. 
What a contrast to the inward-looking, parochial UK Govt! Proud to belong to a Scottish Govt that welcomes EU Citizens to our country. We will redouble our efforts to take that welcoming msg to as many EU Citizens in Scotland so they stay here post-Brexit. #ThisIsYourHome 
So easy to use the word “lie” but now we are seeing the truth as Brexit causes the car industry to leave. Of course, if we weren’t  leaving the EU, we’d be in the EU/Japan deal. Not out on our own.  
Japanese car manufactures are leaving Europe.  Thanks to tariff free trade all manufacturing will return to Japan.  This is not because of Brexit - it's because of the EU, with the vast majority of plants based in the UK.  
As predicted by 'experts',the car industry is leaving the UK - the latest being Honda. These aren't just a few jobs, they're whole production lines with supporting industries, skill bases & communities. Brexit is a self-inflicted disaster, we need to stop this damage! #StopBrexit 
Julia posts an article that states clearly that Brexit is one of the reasons that Honda are closing their Swindon plant.She denies it’s because of Brexit.She tells anyone calling her out to ‘read the article’This is the shite we need to call out.  
Your daily reminder that the majority of the UK wants to #Remain in the EU.#Brexit 
'A ripple effect. The consequences are going to be huge, massive.'This is what Brexit is. This is what Brexit does. It destroys everything, and everyone.NOBODY VOTED FOR THIS.The march on Saturday 23rd March will be the biggest they have ever seen.#PutItToThePeople 
What about the new Brexit party ?  
“It took me 30 seconds to find something I believed supported a position I already held  so I didn’t need need to look at anything else and I also chose to ignore the part that suggested Brexit uncertainty was almost certainly a factor”. And people takes this woman seriously? 
Splits are emerging in the pro-EU faction in May’s government, with Philip Hammond coming under criticism for his “spineless” approach to Brexit. Some pro-European ministers fault Hammond for refusing to threaten to resign to avert no-deal scenario. 
"Democracy is at risk from the malicious and relentless targeting of citizens, much of this is directed from agencies working in foreign countries, including Russia.” 
Scotland’s first minister ⁦@NicolaSturgeon⁩ - in Paris -says Labour in “meltdown” following resignation of seven MPs. #Brexit  
We are going to see a lot of polite brand diplomacy from businesses pulling out of the UK. Few will blame #Brexit outright because it would damage their brand with UK consumers. The likes of Steve Baker will use that as cover. Eventually it will lose all credibility. 
Ruling out No Deal means ruling in No Brexit.So far, Theresa May has shown she fears No Brexit more than No Deal.What would it take to convince her otherwise? 
Commission expressed ‘concerns’ about the ‘viability’ of what what was coming from @SteveBarclay & AG yesterday on backstop. 38 days from Brexit #HMG is still dancing on the head of a pin. 
Britain is faced with three options.1. May’s deal2. WTO 3. No BrexitOf these only number three is sensible.It’s not a complicated problem to solve. Brexit was a big mistake and a muddle. Admit it and retrieve some dignity in rejoining our trading partners and allies.  
Very sad and also something poetic that the Honda factory is the old spitfire factory . Brexit voted for by people with flawed mix up of past glory with images of White Cliffs of Dover , no Jonny foreigner and spitfires kicking arse means the old factory will now lay empty 
Didn’t realise that the new Peterhead fish market received funding from the EU and Scottish Government, you don’t hear that from the fishermen on the tv moaning about the snp and eu constantly #brexit #justsaying 
Honda: what’s the price difference between shipping a car to (say) Denmark from Japan & shipping it there from Swindon? - This is Brexit’s fault. Devastating. 
Brexit fraud Vultures are circling us from safe nests abroad  
I voted Labour because I thought Corbyn would come out against Brexit, I won't make that mistake again and nor will millions of others. 
Please someone explain to me. The 7 ex Labour MPs have been demanding a second Referendum as the circumstances have changed for 2 years. However they are refusing to allow their constituents a by election despite their circumstances having changed. And their logic is? 
SonyDysonPanasonicLloydsUnileverGoldman SachsBarclaysAirbusFlybmiP&OHSBCJP MorganUBSFordHitachiToshibaAXAHondaMoneygramPhilips European Banking AuthorityEuropean Medicines AgencyBank of AmericaBut apparently, it’s got nothing to do with Brexit. 
90% of Honda Civics made there are sold in EU so I expect Brexit has a lot to do with it 
The truth is that Brexit itself has nothing to do with Brexit. It's mostly about deregulation of financial services, employment, environment, food standards, data, consumer protection; facilitating tax avoidance and disaster capitalism.  
Donald Tusk: Cameron only promised EU referendum because he thought the Lib Dems in coalition would block it."But then, surprisingly he won, and there was no coalition partner.“Paradoxically, David Cameron became the real victim of his own victory.”Then UK became the victim. 
If Remain had won the referendum this still would have happened & Europhiles would still deny the EU are responsible for the closure of the Swindon plant.  
One of the things that baffles me about British MPs trying to negotiate with the EU, is their utter disregard for how much our economy is tied up being the gateway to Europe.  They keep thinking UK post Brexit will have the same clout as now... it’s such a damaging delusion! 
The Honda closedown has nothing to do with Brexit and everything to do with the collapse of diesel sales (thanks eco cultists) and the Chinese market. And yet the legacy media try to link it to “Brexit fears” - just more smears.   
Lots of polling this morning, but given we are less than six weeks from the #Brexit cliff edge, this is the one that matters.The will of the people has changed. They want the #FinalSay. They want a #PeoplesVote with the option to #Remain in the EU. 
No doubt Remoaners will blame Brexit for the Honda factory in Turkey also being closed.Life is so simple when you're a Remoaner - any negative news anywhere is a result of Brexit.  
Read the room Owen.Many of us voted labour to remove the Brexit mandate from May.That won’t happen again .We expected labour to step up and fight Brexit but he just kept everyone on the ‘long finger’ .He failed us all .#RevokeA50 
Nicola Sturgeon to urge EU citizens to stay in Scotland after Brexit  
This absolute hijacking of our democracy produced the brexit vote. Everything that went into 'winning' that vote was immoral or outright illegal. We haven't legislated for the manufacture and distribution of bespoke disinformation and propaganda. 
Opinion: Trump is terrible, but the sabotage of Brexit will outlast him  
A Tory MP reminds me that it was in Swindon in 2015 that his party launched a manifesto that pledged to hold a referendum to settle the Europe issue once and for all. “I think we have settled Swindon once and for all”, he says. “Not much else”. #Honda 
There is an argument that as a nation, we deserve the harshest possible Brexit.Too quick to blame immigrantsToo arrogant to learnToo selfish to value co-operationToo deluded to realise we don’t matterToo complacent to think it won’t happen Too lazy to do anything about it. 
Businesses from across the South West have joined together to demand a #PeoplesVote on #Brexit.The business leaders are among thousands of small company owners from across the UK who have written to their MPs to demand they #PutItToThePeople. 
Why now? Brexit promises to raise costs for parts and reduce access to the EU - fatal for an already marginal plant. More importantly, it gives a company that hates to close factories or sack people a license to act. 4/ 
For the sake of balance she is indeed correct that it doesn't list Brexit as the key factor but she's purposefully ignored the fact that Brexit IS a factor. And her delighted followers go about busily sharing her tweet without reading the article 
How #Brexit hit the pound in your pocket  
First line second paragraph: Is "Brexit uncertainty a factor? Almost certainly." Indeed there are other factors as you mention. But Honda has over 30 plants worldwide and is closing just 2. Coincidence? Nope. 
The same people blaming Brexit for the Honda move, even though the company has said it’s not related to Brexit are the same people that voted labour arguing they were going to stop Brexit. They don’t listen to anything but their own ideological interpretations. 
“The understandable desire among voters for Brexit to be settled one way or another will turn to incomprehension and fury when people realise that exit is just the start of another 5 to 10 years of pointless negotiation in which the EU has the upper hand.” 
Literally the first line of the second paragraph reads:"Is Brexit uncertainty a factor? Almost certainly."But Julia Hartley Brewer obviously hasn't read that far.  
Man who worked at Honda for 24 years calls #Brexit:“idiocy of epic proportions”  
If you're tired this morning, spare a thought for all those in the Cabinet Office who've worked through the night trying to get Honda to leave any mention of Brexit out of their press release.  
I wish Scotland could sue the UK government over Brexit. But individual US States have far more power within the USA, than Scotland has within this "precious union".  
Labour's sole aim is to get into power. In the process they have forgotten about: Being the opposition,Doing what's in the national interest,Brexit,Decency It's cynical, selfish & misguided.How not to win friends  (and elections)  
30 years of continuous investment at their UK European hub.Then Honda decide to close the UK operations 4 weeks before we leave the EU.Cue brexiter chorus: “nothing to do with #Brexit!”A nation has gaslighted itself into insanity. 
If the rumours are correct and four MPs and one Minister do leave the Tory party, Theresa May will no longer have a majority in Parliament. This could be the opportunity we've been waiting for to save our country from this immoral #Brexit and  #RevokeArticle50. 
I cannot conceive of any circumstances where I (a lifelong Labour supporter) could ever vote Labour again after they have enabled a Tory Brexit and stood idly by while working people’s livelihoods were burned on the fire of nationalism. It is unforgivable.  
The BBC is plain LYING about Honda. Rupert Hayes quoting an unnamed source squarely blaming Brexit. He can't possibly know, Honda have said nothing.Can anyone control and punish the BBC for their fake news? 
How Brexit will affect me.I will be free.My Country will be free.My Parliament will be free & Sovereign.My Government will be free to pass Sovereign laws.We will be free from unelected EU officials.We will all be free from the ECJ That's freedom. That's what I voted for. 
British supermarkets battle to secure stocks as chaotic Brexit looms  
Morning Mice!..... Blow away the BREXIT BLUES With A Free CHEESIE CHUESDAY  Fab FREE 4 Cheese Gift Box! Just Retweet, Follow & visit  & tell us what cheese you want in your box #Fancyanibble #Sodbrexit #Itainteasybeingcheesie 
The UK Government's aim to end freedom of movement after Brexit is a 'self-defeating' measure, says Nicola Sturgeon.  
Good luck explaining to people that we ended up with a No Deal Brexit because a small number of MPs didn’t like the Irish backstop.Good luck with that. 
Leave's Brexit vanity project is stealing livelihoods from hard working people up and down the country. I've been where this man is.  Emotional.  
Find me a tree (moans about media handling). I don’t want to see the wood (nobody mention Brexit)  
Is a "Jobs First Brexit" one where the jobs go first? 
FAKE NEWSThe smurfs over at the BBC and Sky News are busting a gut to blame Honda closure on Brexit. Everyone else blames plummeting EU sales, diesel death, electrification and global market contraction.Honda has said nothing.The BBC should be utterly ashamed of themselves. 
The issue is UK credibility. Japan had warned the U.K. about the dangers of Brexit going back to the referendum but the Tory party are down the rabbit hole of Brexit where nonsense is rational . Japan now has a trade deal with the EU. Life has moved on. 
Read the comments under this. Len getting 100% hammered for his Brexit stance. #GTTO #PeoplesVote 
Too many businesses (like our family firm) are on a knife edge.With just weeks to go, we haven’t a clue how and with whom we’ll be trading (or not) post-#Brexit.Even if the hard Brexiters don’t get their way, many firms simply can’t survive this.Remind me why we’re doing this? 
Honda makes diesel cars in Swindon! Who buys them? Also the auto industry is globally in turmoil. Also I don’t see Honda transferring it’s allegiance to the EU! Maybe a little more balance might be fair. Brexit is a contributory factor to the closure! 
Facebook was "weaponised ........ to spread falsehoods" during the UK referendum, "intentionally & knowingly".@UKEUchallenge@BremainInSpain 
Brexit nerves mean holidays are put on holdNo it’s more about boycotting Spain,  France & Germany because of their Bully Boy Treatment of U.K.! 
WTO terms are still a google trend.They are, simply put, the Worst Trading Option for the U.K.Unelected bureaucrats  Giving Away Control  Opening The Doors  Costing British Jobs  Better For The Elite  WTO is not what even the most ardent Brexit voter wanted. 
Congratulations to the Independents, but you can't build the foundation of a party on trying to reverse Brexit  
Hi @DanielJHannan I work in Swindon and here’s your invite to come down and explain to the Honda workers how Brexit hasn’t cost them their jobs. Because as you say it’s a lie that car manufacturers might disinvest post Brexit. When can we expect to see you?  
Honda, despite the claims otherwise, is directly attributable to Brexit.Now would be the time for the community of Swindon to come together and tell their MP this is not what they voted for. 
If you are a Brexiter and genuinely believe this is not down to Brexit I have an unclaimed fortune from your deceased distant relative just ready to send you if you pay me £10,000 to do the paperwork first.  
Hizb commander Riyaz Naikoo is his latest audio states that Kashmiris don’t want violence but it has been thrusted upon them. They’ve been forced to turn into human guns and bombs. He calls for referendum and the end of India’s brutal military occupation of #Kashmir. 
A year ago I visited Honda and warned about Brexit risksLocal Tory MP responded ‘Honda has invested huge amount in Swindon plant; we are in a strong position with future models and further expansion.’Govt is misleading the country#JustMakeItStop 
Phillip is with dim or a liar. Probably both. Honda themselves categorically say not Brexit but global trends and ALL European manufacturing to be consolidated in Japan. More likely to be because of the EU granting tariff free access - the irony.  
Anyone want to buy a car factory in Swindon?   Capacity to make 160,000 cars a year.   You might need a friction free trade deal with the EU and dozens of cooperation agreements with the USA to be able to sell 90% of production but heh ho.  #Honda #Brexit Announcement at 8am. 
Thank you #FBPE.  My follow list is filled with people of all ages, ethnic backgrounds, politics, class, orientation and gender, united only by concern for our country and Europe. This community has enriched my life, no matter how the unbearable, cruel mess of Brexit ends up. 
I’m going to say this once and once only:The Labour Party is not more important than Brexit.One of them is a national crisis which could finish us in weeks.The other is a toxic festival of internal nonsense.Get a grip of yourselves. 
People in the future will look back to the Brexit and wonder how a nation could have been so gullible, so dumb, and, contrary to better knowledge, determined to go ahead with it anyway. As John Oliver said: “let’s step on the rake of history.”  
UK's Gove: Govt will use tariffs, quotas to protect farmers after Brexit  
In what would amount to a huge vote of confidence in the UK moving forward, US bank Citigroup are looking to purchase the headquarters in Canary Wharf that houses its European headquarters.  #Brexit #Croydon 
Honda’s closure marks the collapse of the only serious industrial policy this country has had in last 30 years - attracting highly productive Japanese & German manufacturers to set up in the UK. Part & parcel of Brexit 
BRITAIN has secured a deal with Israel which will allow UK businesses to continue with favourable trading terms after Brexit.  #LetsGoWTO #Brexit 
.@Anna_M_Anders on US military presence in #Poland, #NordStream2, #Brexit, and Poland's relationship with the #EuropeanUnion. Exclusive With Polish Sec. of State for International Dialogue @epochtimes @PremierRP_en @AndrzejDuda @MSZ_RP @ecrgroup @pisorgpl 
UK manufacturers warn of 'catastrophic' no-deal Brexit  
If all the firms going bankrupt and moving out of the UK are nothing to do with Brexit, where are all the stories about firms going bankrupt and moving out of the EU? 
Hey Theresa #May that road you keep kicking the can down.. is about to become a cul-de-sac...are you trying to charm the #EU 27 or begging them for an #Article50 extension?History will judge you!#Brexit march 29 ... it's the law! 
"Support to remain has been dominant for 18 months. So why have parliament and the media focused largely on the 40 shades of Brexit, at the expense of the arguments to remain?"New Brexit poll analysis shows most people now back remain  
Scotland to step up efforts to keep EU citizens after Brexit, Sturgeon says  
The nice thing about Brexit is how it reminds Americans that other people are as stupid as we are. 
Let's hope Soubry, Grieve, Morgan, Greening, Clarke, Hammond, Rudd and May and all the other libtard Remoaner quislings quit the Tory party and join ex-Labour's so-called 'independent' Losers' Party and get out of the way of a true and fair Brexit the British People voted for. 
It isn't the "handling of Brexit" ffs!It's Brexit itself!  
British news on my TL looks like the skipping rope songs we sang at school.brexitlexitlabour splithissy fitScotland quitholy shitin out OVER 
Brexit has not caused much economic damage. Until now  
L&T Technology: from 1700 to 1455 - after losing a client & reducing guidance to mid-teensCurrent P/E: 21Tata Elxsi: from 1450 to 860 - after Brexit & Tata Motors-Jaguar troublesCurrent P/E: 19  
My family has also not mentioned it, our major discussions right now are “coyotes are trying to eat our dog, ‘His Name is Earl’” and the large number of delicious wild turkeys currently wandering around and if we could get one, also my dad has gone DEEP into Brexit obsession. 
#Remain has yet to grasp that the crux of #Brexit is that #UK voted in #EUref for 'narrative identity' it shares with #CANZUK, shall we call it our #MagnaCarta narrative identity, NOT #EU’s alternative; a choice between 2 futures & the People chose #Leave by a margin of >1m votes 
I recommend this historical analysis of Irish attitudes to The UK. Particularly for anyone struggling to understand what shapes Irish attitudes to Brexit ....  
Note, of course, that the Government is committed to a binding referendum on the legalisation and regulation of cannabis at the 2020 General Election, per @NZGreens Confidence & Supply Agreement:  
UK's Labour urges government to back customs union Brexit plan ahead of Brussels visit  
National Farmers Union seeks guarantee Brexit won't undermine British standards  
7 MPS QUIT Britain main opposition Labour Party to protest leadership support for Brexit and a growing culture of racism, intimidation and abuse.  
Here's our piece on the current state of Brexit from last night... 
"British politics is now well and truly broken"7 Labour MPs have resigned and will sit as independents, after a split over the party's Brexit policy #LabourSplit 
The PM could not give me a straight answer on decriminalisation, she has agreed to the referendum but can’t answer basic questions.  
This is pretty much what is happening in UK with Brexit. They are trying to divide us along various lines north v south of the country urban cities v towns, working class v middle class, young v old. UK Government is refusing to acknowledge impact of Russian State interference. 
I love this sick burn of Paula Bennett today when she claimed that the Cannabis referendum was on decriminalisation instead of legalisation. Chloe Swarbrick is the real deal when it comes to the referendum. We are lucky to have such a well informed MP on this issue compared to PB  
As the Labour party splinters and Theresa May struggles to hold her party together amidst her exploding #Brexit fiasco .. Nicola Sturgeon reinvigorates the Auld Alliance to strengthen business and cultural ties between Scotland and French/EU partners#DissolveTheUKUnion #DayJob 
Meet the 96-year-old British veteran campaigning for a second referendum on Brexit  
Sarah. Nothing to do with Tariffs on European made cars being imported into America? Diesel Engines? Honda to close its factory in Turkey, also down to Brexit? Worldwide downturn in vehicle sales? On coming recession within the EU? FlyBmi losing money before Brexit? 
Seven lawmakers quit Labour Party citing Brexit 'betrayal', anti-Semitism  
#Poland's Secretary of State for International Dialogue explains the Polish-American alliance, “Fort Trump,” #NordStream2, and the prospects of a Polish #Brexit.American Thought Leaders  with @JanJekielek. Watch full:  
How refreshing to remove all the deep seated Brexit opponents in one go! Followed by deselections in many cases for grave disloyalty to country and for chronic misjudgement. Onward and upward!  
I said recently I thought  @realDonaldTrump should approach the UK about a US-Britain trade deal as a potential alternative to the UK-EU #Brexit deal. Here it is, from my friend @RaheemKassam:   
There is one single certainty with Brexit. Every single one of these Politicians screaming for it will be invisible on March 30th.Silent. And completely unaccountable for the shit they've caused. 
UK's Gove: Govt will use tariffs, quotas to protect farmers after Brexit  
UK manufacturers warn of 'catastrophic' no-deal Brexit  
Mueller's #TrumpRussia investigation just intersected with #Brexit.@carolecadwalla reports that a former Director of Cambridge America just flipped on Trump.My latest @OccupyDemocrats 
Here's my story on Mayor Schewel's state of the city tonight: The big news is he's calling for a $95 million #affordablehousing bond referendum. And he had a lot to say about other stuff, too, like #immigration and #lightrail and schools.  #BullCitypol 
Honda's Swindon plant to close. Honda have been very clear - “this decision has been made because of global trends and is not related to Brexit. The Turkey factory will also close as all European market production is being consolidated to Japan."  
Spanish warship ordered ships to leave British waters near Gibraltar, in the latest example of tension over the strategic port as #Brexit approaches  
Scotland to step up efforts to keep EU citizens after Brexit, Sturgeon says  
Morrisons doughnuts went from 50p to 60pThe Brexit chaos begins ...  
The PM didn’t confirm today that the referendum may be on decriminalisation. She said the Govt will be meeting a commitment in the Confidence and Supply Agreement. This is the C&S. The referendum is on legalisation.  
Mini Brexit: Seven MPs Flee Labour, Blast It As ‘Institutionally Anti-Semitic’  
The PM has confirmed today that the binding referendum may be on decriminalisation not legalisation of recreational marijuana. Very significant difference. 
When you say "all European market production", it's mainly in the UK. So it's certainly partially to do with our shifting situation vis-a-vis the new EU-Japan trade deal, and Brexit.  
Stop supporting Brexit and start supporting British jobs. I am disgusted at your stance, and hopefully your union members will be too. 
More EU-UK Brexit talks set after Cox sets out backstop changes  
"We are clear where we stand on Brexit. This is a national catastrophe and we want no part facilitating the disaster if it happens.” pic.twitter.com/8hh4tMyXXi 
Four cabinet ministers urge UK's May to stop using no-deal Brexit threat in talks: report  
He's worked at #Honda for 24 years: "What have we got - 44 days from Brexit? They haven't got a clue. They can't even decide for themselves what #Brexit means. This is idiocy of epic proportions." #StopBrexit #PeoplesVote #PutItToThePeople 
There are only 38 days left until  #BREXIT and #FREEDOM for #BRITAIN ! #StandUp4Brexit #LeaveMeansLeave #NoDeal #WTO 
“Not a single job would be lost in a hard Brexit, fears of leaving with no deal are nonsense". Iain Duncan Smith “No jobs will be lost due to Brexit”. Lord Digby Jones during a heated debate with Emma Barnett. (Google this at your own risk. I put my foot through the monitor). 
So, how's your 'jobs-first Brexit' coming along, Jeremy?  
No one in Europe would oppose extension to Brexit talks - Juncker  
Even after everything that's happened, the UK is still tighter than 48-52 on Brexit.  
Standing firm for Britain, being true to the people of Romford on Sky News - rock solid for the BREXIT we voted for! “No deal is better than a bad deal” @theresa_may so unless the EU back down from their absurd intransigence, time to walk away with dignity and confidence!  
In GE2017, @Survation proved to be the most accurate pollsters, correctly detecting the surge in Labour support.Both scenarios in this poll—inc & exc the centrist party—will make uncomfortable reading for the Lab leadership.Will they now reconsider their pro-#Brexit stance?  
Apparently its all a complete coincidence that there is turmoil in the car and aerospace industry and the many other industries where companies are reporting to be moving  and that there are staff shortages in the NHS when EU27 are leaving at the same time as Brexit. 
Does that include listening to @UKLabour members on #Brexit? If so @jackieschneider you’ll be supporting @peoplesvote_uk ? No? 
May has talked darkly about forces being unleashed if #Brexit was stopped or delayed. In doing so she was inciting and legitimising political violence. 
From Aug 2018Even right-wing Tory loving BBC interviewer Nick Robinson take the pure p*ss out of Fluffy MundellWhat an embarrassment to Scotland!!!Brexit fallout: car crash interview exposes Brextremist lie about global...  via @YouTube 
KASSAM: Trump Has Britain’s Back (and America’s) On Brexit  
We cannot "Take Back Control" by removing ourselves from the most powerful decision-making bodies on the planet.#Brexit 
No, it’s not bungled negotiations (though that doesn’t help). It’s brexit full stop. There is no jobs first brexit, no rebalancing if the economy brexit, or any other unicorn and cake brexit, deal or no deal, there is just brexit, and it’s all bad. 
It really should have been preventing the National Disaster that is #BrexitRights to be Removed w/o ConsentJobs lostBusinesses lostTax lostPublic Services lostWorse OffOn the basis ofLiesIllegalitiesLost Mandates37% Voters 26.5% of the PplBravo#RevokeA50 #Remain 
Brexit - "It feels like the last days in the compound of a cult that once flourished but is now finally and fatally besieged."  
8,000 retweets + likes for a lie. Honda have already confirmed but it has nothing to do with Brexit and everything to do with consolidating to Japan. They are also closing a factory in Turkey which no doubt you will blame on Brexit also.Swindon factory produces diesel vehicles. 
"Brexit is like Pompeii ....if Pompeii had voted for the volcano to erupt" 
Heidi, I know you like to blame Brexit for everything, but how about you educate yourself and see what the industry is saying.  
UKIP rise - EU Elections - PR systemSNP rise in Scottish Parliament - PR top up systemBrexit - binary choice every vote counted.Westminster FPTP1983 SDP Lib Alliance 25.4% 23 MPsLabour 27.6% 209 MPsSpot the problem with our Westminster voting system?#LabourSplit 
Honda had planned to start new Civic in Swindon UK after 2022 but as prospect of no deal Brexit grew, UK viability as an export base became questionable. This is the trouble about retaining the no deal threat - businesses have to take it seriously  
UK, Survation poll:𝗦𝗰𝗲𝗻𝗮𝗿𝗶𝗼: A New Centrist Party opposed to Brexit (NCP-*)CON-ECR: 39% (+1)LAB-S&D: 34% (-5)NCP-*: 8% (+8)LDEM-ALDE: 6% (-3)UKIP-NI: 5%  (+1)GREENS-G/EFA: 2%+/-  30 Jan. '19Field work: 18/02/19Sample size: 1,023➤  
If all EU countries are equal why does it only appear the German and French leaders have a say on Brexit.Wouldn't it be nice to hear the opinions of what the other 25 countries think as they all have an equal say. 
The pound has fallen 14% and we haven't even reached Brexit Day 1.  
UK's Labour urges government to back customs union Brexit plan ahead of Brussels visit  
The EU have drawn up an agreement with Japan with zero tariffs on cars imported into the EU. So Honda and all other Japanese firms no longer need factories in the EU or near it. Blame the EU...nothing to do with brexit what so ever 
Brexit is 935 hours away. #brexit 
HMRC have already confirmed they’ll throw open the doors at GB Port in the event of a No Deal Brexit - prioritising flow over collection and compliance - for a period of 6-9 month initially and held under review. Plans for managing Cross Border trade have yet to be published.  
Another mad dayA group of anti-Brexit MPs decide, after failing to reform an organisation as members, the best thing to do is leaveA group of anti-centrist Jeremy Corbyn supporters who’ve spent 2 years telling centrist MPs to quit spend the day insulting them for quitting 
At least one pork pie from Sammy Wilson on #CBLive. Says UK is a bigger export market for Irish goods than the EU. In reality, as the CSO says, exports to the EU are FIVE times greater. This guy is DUP Brexit spokesman but can't get basic facts right. 
250 companies are in talks to relocate to the Netherlands from Brexit Britain. These business partners explain why they're leaving  
I think you would get a very different reaction from Ms. Hartley Brewer if it was HER job and HER livelihood that was going down the toilet because of Brexit. 
#Brexit is a dagger in the heart of your party...your leader & a small group are actively complicit in helping it pass...It represents everything you are supposed to stand against...yet here we are facing disaster on the basis of the Non-Binding opinion of 1/4 of the population. 
I hope your members are very angry with you for pushing #Brexit even when it became obvious it would cause events like this.You are a disgrace to the trades Union movement. 
What I cannot stand, is how this fat stupid gammon thinks he has the upper hand over a whole country. This fool has been empowered by brexit,by ppl who don't even know where Northern Ireland is!!! 
Would you support or oppose having a People's Vote (Second Referendum):Support: 47% (57%)Oppose: 35% (43%)Second Referendum Voting Intention:Remain: 47% (52%)Leave: 43% (48%)Via @Survation, 18 Feb.(x%) = Don't Knows Removed. 
Amsterdam is winning so much business as Europe's post-Brexit trading hub that its financial regulator needs a budget boost to keep up  
Spare a thought for the Lib Dems, a centrist party opposed to Brexit that is behind in the polls to an imaginary centrist party that is opposed to Brexit.  
Minford also said that there should be *ten years of transition* to help the car industry and other manufacturing adjust:  Attempting this without a transition, just with a snap of our fingers, is Thanos Brexit  
Once again it's totally irrelevant how Northern Ireland voted on Brexit. It was a United Kingdom vote.Donegal didn't get to keep abortion illegal after #8thref.N.Ireland doesn't get to opt out of #brexit#TonightVMTV 
Honda's manufacturing supply chain stretches to all parts of the UK & includes precision engineering companies in #Cornwall.Brexiters claiming this is nothing to do with #Brexit have very short memories.#StopBrexit #PeoplesVote #PutItToThePeople 
Dublin/Monaghan bombings survivor remembers the attackBernie McNally was working on Talbot Street in central Dublin in 1974 when the Dublin/Monaghan bombings happened #brexit #cblive 
WHAT DID YOU EXPECT?! Do you STILL support Brexit?! #StopBrexit#StopBrexitSaveBritain 
Anti Brexit party on 8percent. As you were  
The results are in:New centrist party would win... 8% of the vote.By the looks of this poll it hasn’t damaged the Conservatives but has eaten into the Labour vote.Does this new party aspire for government or does it want to defeat the left?What will do they after Brexit?  
I hope so. The sooner we jettison Brexit the better.  
Finally, a brand new "centrist party opposed to Brexit" that now makes Brexit even more likely. Nice. 
Westminster voting intention:CON: 39%LAB: 34%"A new centrist party opposed to Brexit": 8%LDEM: 6%UKIP: 5%GRN: 2%via @Survation, 18 Feb 
i'm a socialist, but i understand their decision and am furious with Corbyn for ignoring Labour party Brexit policy, failing to tackle antisemitism, and driving these MPs out of the party. am i clearly not a socialist? should i resign my party membership? 
Currency for a post-Brexit Britain."Four Horsemen" by @wefail  -   
NO mention in nearly 3yrs of the FACT that Vote Leave broke electoral laws and the ref SHOULD be invalidated, but plenty of whiny little grumblings about electoral rules and by-elections tonight. The hypocrisy stinks! #Brexit #LabourSplit 
I visited the Honda plant after the Referendum - it's transformed the fortunes of the town & local people directly & indirectly employing many thousands. Honda leaving will be devastating - this IS what Brexit means!  
A 1998 agreement ended decades of violence over whether Northern Ireland should remain part of the United Kingdom or join a united Ireland. Now Brexit is threatening to rip open old grievances and unravel that fragile peace.  
If the @LibDems and @TheGreenParty joined forces with the new #independentgroup to fight brexit under 1 umbrella party, would you support it? 
Brexit is the problem! There is no good way to Brexit. There is no jobs first Brexit. The only kind of Brexit there is, is one that leads to disaster, and decline, and ruin for the people who looked to you for leadership. You have failed Britain, just as May has. Now #RevokeA50 ! 
Never Forget. Nigel Farage and his Hedge Fund friends. Ashcroft and his offshore money. Arron Banks and his Russian friends. They’re all laughing heartily as industry after industry pulls out of Brexit Britain. This is what they wanted. 
Citigroup is committing to London by buying its Canary Wharf headquarters for £1.2bnBritain’s place as the preeminent financial centre of Europe is assured long after Brexit and don’t let anyone tell you otherwise   
ATTENTION BREXIT DOCUMENT GEEKS. The Attorney General is expected to bring papers containing “technical details” on his return to Brussels on Weds. You say “draft codicil to the backstop?” I say “aides-memoirs”  But it’s not an alternative Withdrawal Agreement. 
"The biggest divide in Britain today isn’t between Corbynites and Blairites or even between Labour and Tories. It’s between the people and the elite. The people want Brexit and the elite does not — that’s the most important split right now."-  Brendan O’Neill: on Politics Live 
While it's worth always being sceptical about vox pops, this illustrates how Westminster may be severely underestimating the potential political ramifications of a disorderly Brexit. We live in an age of identity politics but competence still matters.  
BREXIT BOTTLE JOB: May infuriates Brexiteers as EU gets its way - ‘JUST FLOWERY WORDS!’. It's not difficult for the EU to crap on us when our prime minister is down on all fours begging them to do so. FFS let's be done with this.    
Dominic Raab keeps celebrating temporary measures the EU is unilaterally introducing to stem off the disaster of Brexit. But they're extremely time-limited, almost always worse than the status quo (never better, of course), out of our control, and don't solve underlying problems.  
Cars = Dead, Engineering = Dead, Farming = DeadBrexit dividend.... and we are just getting started 
Quote: "Is Brexit uncertainty a factor? Almost certainly"Cue leaver logic: It's not exclusively about Brexit. Therefore it's nothing to do with Brexit.It's logic, Jim, but not as we know it.  
My thing about Brexit being a doomsday cult shamelessly reheated here 
Asked about Angela Smith’s racist #funnytinge comment, Chris Leslie calls it a “slip of the tongue” then literally says “but we’re not just about racism, there are other issues, like Brexit”. Racism is a pesky footnote when it’s his side in the dock. #Newsnight 
People are losing their jobs - their livelihoods - because of your Brexit. But that was always the plan, wasn't it? The poorer they are, the more they'll need your socialism.Shame on you. Just resign, coward.#PutItToThePeople #RevokeA50 #StopBrexit 
Shhhhh all this stuff about Brexit billionaires leaving and car plants shutting down is definitely, certainly, unequivocally NOTHING to do with Brexit.  
Without significant changes to backstop or its removal, her deal is as dead as a dodoBREXIT BOTTLE JOB: May infuriates Brexiteers as EU gets its way - ‘JUST FLOWERY WORDS!’   
Would it be feasible to call a national strike agains #Brexit?If all the Remainers went on strike the country would ground to a halt... Much like #Brexit if we crashed on #WTO rules.I think it's time for some more direct action.#StopBrexit 
Hi @angelasmithmpYou recently signed a letter demanding Labour back a second referendum, arguing the "facts had changed" & the public deserve another vote.Given you've just quit Labour, why will you not give your constituents another chance to have their say in a by-election? 
Tuesday’s Financial Times: 'Honda plant closure deals blow to car industry weeks before Brexit'  #tomorrowspaperstoday #BBCpapers (Via @mshelicat) 
Ohhhhh “the people who *know* about  the car industry.”Presumably that doesn’t include any who warned about the adverse impact of Brexit. Like y’know — Honda. Or the Chair of Rolls Royce. Come to think of it, every single car manufacturer was dead set against it.   
DUP’s Sammy Wilson accusing Taoiseach Leo Varadkar of acting “abominably” during #Brexit. Claims Varadkar threatened to erect a Berlin Wall! He says Ireland will become the “next small country victim” of EU. It’s actually exhausting... #CBLive 
A realignment in British politics is long overdue. How can you be in the same party as far right Brexit zealots? 
BTW, Cambridge Analytica never left. It just purported to dissolve  only to re-emerge under a different name: Emerdata. The same weapons grade software that helped promote #Brexit, destroy Hillary, & elect Trump is STILL IN PLAY.  
Brexit means no NHSBREXIT MEANS NO workers rightsBrexit means povertyBrexit means criminalityBrexit means dictatorshipBrexit means AnarchyBrexit will destroy United Kingdom Brexit means HOMELESSNESSBREXIT MEANS end of freedom of movementBrexit means CorruptionStop it 
Your statement is bullshit I’m afraid. You should put yourself up for re-election. If you don’t,  I expect you to shut up about a “people’s vote” on Brexit until after the people in your constituency have been given a people’s vote on your decision to quit Labour.  
So, who's running a book?Will Mrs May score a hattrick and drive away all three Japanese auto-makers that Mrs T. attracted to the UK to rebuild a troubled industry?SMALL PRINT: If you win there's no prize, because nobody wins with Brexit. #Hondaswindon #Nissan #Toyota #WATON 
@LenMcCluskey I have the clarification you asked for about #Honda. They are leaving because any form of #Brexit is a bad deal for Japan. They have an alternative to Swindon thx to the EU-Japan trade deal that we are leaving thanks to your Leaver friends. Own it. It‘s your mess 
Did you know that if the referendum had been binding the result would have been voided as a result of the findings of breaches of electoral and criminal law?Ironically it’s only because it’s advisory that it’s being upheld 
It's the direct consequence of what YOU wanted Len. You want Brexit, well this is Brexit. This is what Brexit means. It means lost jobs, empty factories, broken families, children without food, young people whose futures are wasted before they've begun. #ownyourshit #revokeA50 
Anyone who has not ruled out No Deal is putting Brexit above peace on the island of Ireland. It is shocking that the PM continues to say it is an option. For all our sakes, rule out No Deal. 
It's this week's edition of the popular game show:"BLAME IT ON THE BREXIT"It does not matter to  Philip Lee that he doesn't actually know why Honda are closing (they haven't announced it yet). Nor does it matter that he is ignorant of the fact that they are closing Turkey too  
Seven lawmakers quit UK Labour Party citing Brexit 'betrayal', anti-Semitism  
What the hell? You support this McCluskey. If Labour had put up a proper fight against Brexit this wouldn't be happening. Just apologise to those losing their jobs and then shut up. 
The next Brextremist who claims this has nothing to do with #brexit needs their head examined. Japan has a FTA with EU just as we are about to leave. That makes the decision much easier to make vehicles in Japan. Were we remaining, that would be a different calculation.#Honda 
Their excuses for leaving: antisemitism (it's less than in the Tory Party or the general population) our Brexit-stance (let's see what the splitters achieve)Their real purpose is to weaken the opposition to the most murderous regime in British history... their natural home. 
Neither Brexit nor Catalonia are real threats to the EU. The real threat are the people who are managing the EU. 
In a sane world this vox pop should have been the moment that killed Brexit. Feel deeply sorry for this man and the needless devastation this pointless project has caused him. 
Note to @jeremycorbyn - it's not enough to care about those in poverty. You need to have an actual, feasible plan to do something about it. Sadly, everything you stand for would make things worse - Brexit especially. No-one needs that sort of caring. 
This election is mainly a referendum on Buhari in NE & NW, where he had 7.82m margin in 2015. Atiku might likely come tops in the aggregate of  other regions. It's important to understand this and wait for what has changed. 
Brexit benefits?Anyone?Anyone?Anyone?Anyone?Anyone?Anyone?Anyone?Anyone?Anyone?Anyone?Anyone?Anyone?Anyone?Anyone?Anyone?Anyone?Anyone?Anyone?Anyone?Anyone?Anyone?Anyone?Anyone?Anyone?Anyone?Anyone?Anyone?Anyone?Anyone?Anyone?Anyone?Anyone?Anyone? 
Life after Brexit was the topic of discussion among unionists at an event at Queen's University Belfast tonight. Organisers said they are keen that civic unionism is offered the chance to express its views.  
The two main Westminster parties are crumbling in front of our very eyes over Brexit. How anyone in Wales can continue to support them is beyond me. The time for change has come. Spread the word vote @Plaid_Cymru and support @YesCymru ! #indyWales #DissolveTheUnion 
‘You can’t play politics with people’s jobs’ On day Derek Hatton returns to Labour & Luciana Berger leaves, it’s worth hearing Neil Kinnock tackle Hatton’s Militant Tendency in 1985.Also very apt for Corbyn & McClusky’s support for #Brexit as yet more job losses are announced.  
A few thoughts on Honda and Brexit:1. Europe, including the UK, just isn't a big market for Honda any more. About 10% of Hondas were sold in Europe 10 years ago. Now it's about 5%.  
You are a disgrace. I joined Unite to protect manufacturing jobs, not throw them away on a Brexit vanity project. However, I can make a small dent in your plans.  
Honda leaving Swindon wasn’t about Brexit at all. Nothing to do with it. Who would suggest such a thing?  
WATCH: These fans at the #NottsCounty game voted leave, but, when they spoke to @ByDonkeys about @Nigel_Farage and the billboard outside the ground, it's clear they have regrets now they see the reality of #brexit.Respect to them, it's ok to change your mind.#RemainerNow 
Poor old Baker.No one much believes him any more1 arm chopped offThen the otherThen a leg.“It isn’t gangene” he kept on calling out.“IT ISN’T!  We were too fat” he explained.“We need to lose weight”NATURAL WASTAGE!  DO YOU HEAR ME?Let’s waste a bit more” #Brexit 
Honda is NOT closing its factory in Swindon because of Brexit.They make diesel cars at the Swindon factory and no one wants to buy them anymore.Honda produced around 160,000 Civic models at that factory last year, down from 250,000 a decade ago. 
The Labour Party is fracturing as the far right mounts a bid to take over the Tories.As #Brexit catastrophe looms, our political system is well & truly broken.As Gramsci put it: "The old world is dying, and the new world struggles to be born: now is the time of monsters." 
HM @campaignforleo, yr siatica-suffering friend @JunckerEU has handed #Brexit over to #God.Given that as our DearLeader, yr govt has had more than 2 years to prepare, and my friend @michaeldarcy @IRLDeptFinance is giving 'expert' advice, we're 'grand', r we?#JonathanSugarman 
.@BBCNews dumping blame for Honda Swindon factory closing squarely on Brexit. They even made a point of interviewing staff at the venue blaming Brexit.Nothing to do with Brexit and everything to do with Honda consolidating in Japan.They are also closing a factory in Turkey. 
BBC has a silly academic on the 10pm news blaming the closure of Honda’s Swindon plant on Brexit. But the true reasons have more to do with the new free trade treaty between Japan and the EU. Japanese companies can now export directly and without tariffs to Europe. 
British home secretary now urges his EU counterparts to prepare for the end of current joint policing systems on 30 March because of a no-deal Brexit:•Extraditions•Data sharing•Arrest warrantsPut it on a bus 
Yes. Quite. That’s because there’s no such thing as a “jobs first Brexit.”  
Can anybody tell me which car manufacturers, aerospace, chemical companies, pharmaceutical companies, any production or banking that is closing down in EU countries or is relocating from there into brexit UK? 
“Hedge fund manager and #Brexiteer #CrispinOdey made $284 million in one day by shorting the pound in 2016. Now he's at it again.”-via @BrexitI'll say it again: #BrexitIsAScamAlso:  get ready for the #BrexitBigShort 
Honda to close Swindon plant due to “ global trends, not Brexit,” says novice Steve. So that makes it ok, then ? Japanese economic nationalism alongside UK’s Brexit nationalism and MAGA nationalism ? I think we can all see where this particular global trend may be leading... 
Honda said they are moving to Japan in 2022 and it has nothing to do with BrExit. #BBCNews twisting the facts to fit their REMOAN narrative here. 
Citigroup commits to London in what is seen as a vote of confidence for post Brexit City influence  
KASSAM: Trump Has Britain’s Back (and America’s) On Brexit  
People should have the reasonable expectation that when they take in news on the TV or radio, people babbling absolute nonsense won’t be allowed time to spew stupidity alongside people bringing facts to the table. This equal time punditry is why disasters like Brexit gain steam. 
But Jeremy, you are facilitating Brexit with May. So surely you also bear responsibility for this utter disaster? 
Airbus Warns No-Deal Brexit Would Be 'Absolutely Catastrophic'   
This whole 'centrist party' thing really is nonsense. The only thing these so-called centrist Labourites and the so-called centrist Tories have in common is that they're EU sycophants.Once Brexit is done they would realise they have nothing in common at all. 
Of course, it’s not Brexit, it’s all about diesel. Presumably Dyson moved its HQ to Singapore because no one wants diesel powered vacuum cleaners. Panasonic. Diesel powered TV’s, and Unilever have had a surprisingly low uptake on their new diesel flavoured savoury spread. 
For the wee parochial, xenophobic, bitter mouthed unionists in Scotland: This is what is called 'getting on with the day job'.#Scotland #France #EU #IamScottish #IamEuropean #Brexit #indyref2 
I wonder how long it will take for students to realise that a Party that could stiff them on Brexit could also stiff them on tuition fees. 
Seven MPs have resigned from the Labour Party in protest at Jeremy Corbyn's approach to Brexit and anti-Semitism. There are reports tonight that more could follow. @TomSwarbrick1 asks: Do you support these MPs? 
Nothing to do with this Govt waging war on diesel cars?This whole green agenda is the cause of mass unemployment not BREXIT 
The extraordinary, unsung efforts of ordinary people, week in and week out, on streets across the country - this is the one inspiring story of Brexit, and the reminder that this country is not completely lost.  
#Brexit Divides Us - Let’s Stay Together. Then we can jointly work for peace, freedom, prosperity & democracy both within the UK & across Europe. Join our campaign now: . 
I’m asking this in a deliberately provocative way. If you voted for Brexit, are you embarrassed? Or ashamed? Or are you doubling down? Honda to stun ministers with closure of Swindon factory | Business News | Sky News  
You should be ashamed of your support for #Brexit 
SHUT UP WITH YOUR FACTS!Next you’ll be saying Honda closing factory in Turkey can’t be blamed on Brexit eitherYOU BREXTREMIST 
Labour's deputy leader @tom_watson warns more MPs could quit the party unless Jeremy Corbyn takes stronger action to address concerns over #Brexit and antisemitism.Get the latest on the Labour split here:  
Militant Tendency‘s Derek #Hatton returns to Labour on the same day that seven moderate anti-Brexit MPs leave. As the Corbynistas congratulate themselves they may pause to consider if this has improved #UKLabour‘s chances at the next GE. A clue? Long years in opposition await 
Since July 2016, increasing numbers of remain groups and Pro EU political parties have engaged week in, week out with soft leavers & dormant remainers. Leave have sent in the thugs. This is why remain will win. Brexit will fail. Thanks to people like this man, like YOU. Respect  
People being critical of Nicola Sturgeon's latest foreign jaunt are being a bit unfair. She's only going on a booze and fag run before we leave the EU. Scottish Government ramping up the No Deal Brexit preparations.  
Nigel Farage’s Brexit Party now boasting they've got 100,000 supporters. Why not sign up today 
Honda joins Nissan, Ford, JLR, Panasonic, Sony, Dyson, Phillips, Hitachi, Toshiba, FlyBMI in showing real world consequences of  #Brexit also relocation of other key sectors & associated expertise, jobs & investment eg European Medicines Agency. An absolute tragedy 
Occam’s Razor is screaming at us; it’s Scotland’s $1trillion West of Shetland oil-fields that were *always* the Brexit prize.  
Jobs first Brexit means the jobs go first then the economy tanks. Then there’s no hope. 
That’s because Japan has a trade deal with the EU whereas Brexit Britain doesn’t. Love your work Justin. Thanks.  
If the Brexiters had the courage of their convictions, they'd be straight on to Honda bosses with: "whoa, what are you doing? Brexit will bring an unprecedented boost to your business!" But they know it won't. They just want a tax break. 3,500 car workers can go to hell. 
Brexit is not the best future. We know that more clearly today than ever before. Labour will *never* be able to "deliver for the many not the few" if the party continues to support Brexit and if it goes ahead. It's that simple. 3/3 
Labour has, collectively, helped the Tories stay in power for several years now: 1) By failing to present a credible alternative.2) By enabling the Tory's Brexit.I'm not making a case for the new group - I have a lot of questions! But these mental gymnastics need to stop. 1/  
Millwall vs Brighton should settle Brexit imo 
With Brexit many think WTO is some last resort...quite simply its not. Countries are wanting to sign up to WTO rules all the time. Its basic rules of honest trade. Belarus an example.. 
A "shattering body blow at the heart of U.K. manufacturing" as Brexit draws near and another automaker draws away.  
Cambridge Analytica’s targeting software—deployed to push #Brexit, destroy Hillary, & elect Trump—was classified by the UK government as “weapons grade” technology. Think about that...  
A lot of Labour MPs are tweeting today.They're sad about antisemitism, sad about brexit. So sad, so very very sad. And for them, it's time to: "pause and reflect." Just like the republican: "thoughts and prayers."And of course, to do absolutely nothing about it. 
YOU don’t give a damn Len McCluskey. You are a liar. You want Brexit despite knowing it will destroy lives. Shame on you. 
The highest medical authority in the United Kingdom has already said that the No Deal Brexit you're promoting would be extremely damaging to the NHS.That is a huge loss of life that you're backing.But hey, bankers will be OK... 
Even more disgraceful that those supposed to be representing their interests and protecting their jobs are selling them down the river through their support for Brexit.  
Big thanks to everyone who came along tonight to take part in my public meeting on Brexit and what is means for Scotland. Thank you to @IanBlackfordMP and @SusaninLangside for their insight and for taking questions from the floor, and to Cathcart Old Parish Church for hosting us. 
If you have been paying attention you may have realized no one is talking about the benefits of #brexit anymore. This might be a sign. 
It is disgraceful that the leader of @unitetheunion is putting the jobs of hard-working, loyal workers at risk by enabling #Brexit  
Look. We need a public inquiry into brexit. 
Pogba  Herrra Brexit lil kesh We totally DISCOMBOBULATED the whole of London Ole still at the wheel Ole ole !!!!!!#CHEMUN #MUFC #GGMU 
Honda leaving Swindon may in fact not be to do with Brexit. Because Japan now has a trade deal with the EU, so the UK is irrelevant, with or without Brexit. UK was unbelievably stupid to tell Japan to "hurry up" with its trade deal in these circumstances. 
Another prime candidate to join Chuka.  Gauke is trying to stop Brexit. Doesn’t believe in jailing criminals. What the hell are people like him doing in a conservative government anyway?  
Hedge fund manager and Brexiteer Crispin Odey made $284 million in one day by shorting the pound in 2016. Now he's at it again 
Honda are moving to Japan and not an EU country. If your claim had the smallest grain of truth, they would relocate to Paris or Berlin. They have moved to Japan because of the new trade deal, as Honda have said themselves - This is nothing to do with Brexit.  
Anti-Brexit Independent Group is Run From Above a Wetherspoons Called 'The Unicorn'  
Tomorrow’s front page: Labour implodes as seven MPs quit party due to Brexit, Corbyn and anti-Semitism. It’s clear that only independence can save Scotland from this mess.  
Brexit is “IDIOCY OF EPIC PROPORTIONS” says Honda worker, whose industry is being destroyed by Brexiters who say Brexit is not the cause even though Brexit economist Minford told Parliament Brexit would destroy the car industry.  The CONSTANT LIES from quitters are unbearable  
It’s Brexit! How many times do you need to be told. There is no such thing as a jobs first Brexit! 
This is a much neglected point. 2nd referendum types should be horrified at this band of infinitely untrustworthy, anti-democratic, opaquely-funded opportunists jumping on board their campaign and completely toxifying it, but somehow they're absolutely delighted about it   
Even better to take Brexit off the table. The best way to guarantee jobs and economic security. Perhaps it’s time to say so Tom? 
I don't know why this tweet from the early hours of 24th June 2016 stuck in my mind. But it did. It was posted just after the referendum result from Swindon came in.Remember, it's not that we weren't told. It's that most voters preferred to believe it was merely "project fear".  
Parliament is all over Facebook and its complicity in #Brexit (and the rise of Trump). The US Congress? Not so much. 1/  
Time for @jeremycorbyn to accept his pathetic dream is over.Time to wake up, resign and call for an end to Tory Brexit, which will do nothing but harm ordinary people. That way, he might just save his party. 
No one in Europe would oppose extension to Brexit talks - Juncker  
EU arrogance!To think they can tell British people what to do!To think they can dictate to British people!We don't like dictatorships.We love freedom & we make their own decisions!We are not going to be told what to do by petty Eurocrats.#Brexit #EU 
From global-warming to Brexit and free speech, Vivienne Westwood took aim at an array of politically-charged topics   
Random question: If by some quirk of our constitution we could, by referendum, replace the current president for the remainder of his term by one of his predecessors, for whom would you vote? 
Dear @globeandmail - are you out of your effing mind? His campaign manager is Rebel affiliated. He supports a convoy with embedded white nationalist elements. He supports Brexit but not reproductive justice for women. What part of any of this is moral? FFS. #cdnpoli 
Brexit has been a story principally of pig-headedness, masochism, greed, ambition and cowardice - but just occasionally, as today, nobility. 
Project Fear. Nothing to do with Brexit. Just a coincidence. Just believe. Trust Boris and Jacob and Nigel. Nothing to see here.  
Bad day at the office? Seven of your MPs have left because of your delusional jobs-first #Brexit policy. Ask #Honda workers what they think! Then there‘s your inability to deal firmly with anti-semitism in @uklabour. But you can still turn it around by demanding a #peoplesvote 
I know we’re obsessed with Brexit (and today, the Labour split), but we need to take a moment to talk about aid. Very quietly—and very quickly—the Tories are destroying a consensus that has lasted a generation. (Thread) 
•Workers blame Brexit for demise of Honda's Swindon plant.•55% of the town voted for Brexit.•You get what you voted for.•Enjoy. 
@UKLabour were the second party in the two Swindon Honda affected seats in 2017. Might even have been winnable next time if you’d opposed brexit instead of ‘Jobs first’ BS. Both seats now majority #remain Where is our #PeoplesVote? 
‘man who has been with the company for 24 years blamed Brexit for the car giant’s decision. He said he had voted remain in the EU referendum and condemned the local Conservative MP @JustinTomlinson for campaigning for Brexit’  
Four cabinet ministers urge UK's May to stop using no-deal Brexit threat in talks: report  
This. I feel nothing but sympathy for EVERYONE young or old who loses their job because of Brexit - even if they voted Leave. This isn't on them. It's on those who lied to them.They need our support. Not our condemnation.#PutItToThePeople #RevokeA50 #StopBrexit 
The MP’s who left Labour spoke of a ‘betrayal on Brexit’.   Fact: They all stood on a manifesto to honour the referendum result. Fact: They have betrayed Labour supporters across the country who voted to Leave and believed the manifesto @jeremycorbyn @Keir_Starmer @labourleave 
NEW VIDEO ALERT! We're trying some British Beers before #Brexit. As expected, it was a bit messy! Watch:   (feat. @sharpsonmusic, @LolsyByrne, @BrianGallahad, @CiaraODoherty, @MCluvs2laugh and @DoyleAnnie.) 
you are the exhaust fitted to the Tory Brexit bus, Jeremy... own it..accept it..learn to live with the fact that you are part of the motor taking this country over the edge..learn to live with the fact that you are destroying @UKLabour and destroying jobs..live and learn.. 
Poor Jeremy, still can’t admit it’s #brexit itself that is damaging the country. History won’t be kind.  
The consequences of Brexit are job losses,that's why we are shocked you are not opposing it Len. Businesses need to be in the SM +CU. If you want to prevent any more job losses then oppose brexit @LenMcCluskey #StopBrexit #Savejobs 
We Love our Party but sometimes we no longer recognise it.It is a day of sadness for our movement. We have no anger for those that have left, only remorse and best wishes. We're gutted.We remain in Labour, we demand our Leadership rejects Tory Brexit. 
Ben, Honda are moving to Japan because of the new trade deal. They are not moving from the UK to an EU country. This has nothing to do with Brexit and all to do with the new EU-Japan trade deal. Don't let facts ruin your fictional tweets in a bid to push your warped agenda.  
The expression #bluecollar is American...for a guy who wore a  blue, short-sleeve shirt to work & carried a lunch pail & a thermos for his meal. That was my dad..six days a week...nightshift on the assembly line.The folks who invented #Brexit know NOTHING of this life.#Swindon 
This is an admission by the Home Secretary that leaving the EU with no deal will make the public less safe. Keeping it as an option is a dereliction of the first duty of government. With 39 days to go, no deal Brexit should have been ruled out. 
Those who are furious at what's happening with food banks should be furious at this, too. Instead we've had two years of the hard left hand-waving concerns about Brexit, poverty and hunger, as tho these things are totally separate  
Here is #japans letter re #Brexit - let’s do what #brexiters do and pretend it has nothing to do with #Brexit#PeoplesVote #StopBrexit #FBPE #BrexitLies #brexitreality #LeaveMeansLeave #LeaveEU 
The decimation of the car industry is nothing to do with Brexit, it's a global downturn in the car industry. We should prepare ourselves for:Global downturn in British agricultureGlobal downturn in supply of medicinesWon't be Brexit. #RevokeA50 
This admits what we all knew already  - a “no deal” #Brexit would be hugely damaging for law enforcement & security.  Pity the man responsible hadn’t twigged earlier....Sajid Javid warns EU counterparts of joint policing 'disruption' The Guardian  
Honda will reportedly close a car factory in western England, with the potential loss of 3,500 jobs, another blow to a British economy made jittery by Brexit.  
The absolute arrogance of this #Brexit loving Tory MP @JustinTomlinson to say he is worried that the Honda workers are going home tonight "WITHOUT ANY CERTAINTY OF THE FUTURE"  #Hondaswindon 
A lad who works at Honda lives over the road from me.Im gutted for him.He works all the hours God sends.Looking after his family.Doesn't deserve this.Another example of how the effect of Brexit will be felt most by the working class and the poorest. 
Workers blame Brexit for demise of Honda's Swindon plantYou mean, they didn't buy that global downturn crap? 
#Honda #Brexit @LeaveEUOfficial lies  
Still don’t know Brexit is for. Sincerely. NYT today.  
There. Is. No. Jobs. First. #Brexit. 
Brexit will push up food prices by up to 20%, 'virtually instantaneously'  
Len's 'seeking urgent clarification' everyone.This is on you, and everyone else that, even now, 'respect the result' of an advisory referendum  proven to have been the victim of illegal electoral law-breaking. Not to mention, the pending 11+ investigations into CA/FB/AIQ/SCL.  
You and Tezza should hold the great brexit festival in Swindon. That’ll cheer them up!  Don’t forget to let them know that the UK has a great future selling flip flops, innovative jams, ties and sunglasses. That’s their future sorted!  
FAO Honda Swindon employees (soon to be ex employees).For those of you that voted remain or want to remain for have changed your minds and want to remain then this pic below might interest you.#PutItToThePeopleFor those that still want brexit.. There is no helping you.  
Hugely important thread  indicating @sajidjavid is more concerned than he’s been admitting about the severe consequences of a #NoDeal #Brexit for #policing & #security. @theSNP @scotgov @HumzaYousaf & myself have been warning about this for months 
This is the beginning of the end Lisa ... and don't blame Corbyn ... look to ur selves and how u are striving to deny ur own people in the North of England ... their vote for #Brexit ... Shame on you all !!  
40 days to go and the latest @DefraGovUK guidance is issued, confirming reports from last summer. In the event of a No Deal #Brexit, our organic food & feed exports to the EU could be overHT @uk_domain_names 
Honda 'We will lay off 3k staff and move back to Japan'Remoaners 'it is because of Brexit, people's vote now!'Honda 'Nothing to do with Brexit'Remoaners 'Peoples vote now!' 
It is hard to pinpoint even a top ten of basic negotiating mistakes the UK has made in Brexit, but saying that because we're leaving the EU has to be the one to adjust would be right up there. Our lack of consideration for others has been widely noted. 
The Independent Group's office revealed - above a Brexit-backing Wetherspoons Pub called 'The Unicorn' 
In Commons voting lobbies tonight, struck by warmth & friendship shown to @TheIndGroup by many Labour MPs. A second brave wave? @LibDems must be the warm, open home for the politically homeless escaping the cold extremes of Brexit & Corbyn.Let’s #ChangePolitics 
Dana Rohrabacher is pals w/ Nigel Farage, & both visited the Ecuadorian embassy hosting Assange. So naturally the GOP-led House (pre-midterms) chose Rohrabacher to head the Foreign Affairs #Brexit subcommittee.  … 
Tune into @ClaireByrneLive later for more Government spin and Project Fear.  An imminent return to the Troubles according to @RTEOne #Brexit #Irexit 
The one upside to no deal Brexit: David Gauke rushing through the end of custodial sentences for non-violent crimes while we all fight over avocados. 
Yep, the @BBC six o'clock news correspondent did seem to point the blame for today's Honda bombshell at the trade deal between the EU and Japan. The very same trade deal that was backed by...... the Secretary of State for International Trade. 
It’s not about the “handling of Brexit”. It’s about Brexit itself. There is no such thing as a “jobs first Brexit” as you pretend.  
2. Again, if Juncker is right, then an extension long enough for a referendum to be organised is genuinely possible. 4/4 
Brexit lil kesh assisting the best midfielder in the world, in the home of the lots that gave him the name  
But if @JunckerEU is right that nobody in the EU27 would oppose a longer extension, this means 2 important things:1. It really would be a choice for UKGov to crash in a No Deal Brexit in March. They have 2 alternatives - revocation or an extension request. 3/ 
All forms of Brexit harm the economy. Yours too - and you know this. You are letting down your country. Please resign and let @tom_watson take over. 
English Tory Government slash budgets and pursue a Brexit that will destroy Scotland and you lot have the brass neck to go around creating a fuss trying to blame the only party that works in Scotland’s interests!  A hex on every single one of you! 
Extraordinary all 7 of the Independent Group were demanding a 2nd referendum, yet refuse to afford a by-election to their constituents.They're gutless cowards who've demonstrated time & time again they're not interested in their former party, constituents or country as a whole. 
This is the treachery inside the May Cabinet. Let the 22 resign, replace them with 22 Brexiteers.They are seeking to ensure Brexit does NOT happen.  
Honda closure may not be about Brexit, but it is about Brexports  
Brexit LIVE: ANOTHER deal signed! Liam Fox SECURES trade with Israel - 'An important step'  
Their MP might not be blaming Brexit, but the Honda workers certainly are. 
#Bitcoin up on #Brexit panic. Market starting to discount a chaotic March, 29. 
Yes... because that is how it works. Ooh... how I wish I couldn’t see this happening from day 1 following the referendum. It’s been 2 years of dread.  
The fall of #sterling affects wages and the  #costofliving.#Brexit is #austerity...and the poor and working poor are paying for it.Like they always pay for the mistakes of others.#Swindon 
It’s your Brexit too, Jeremy. It’s not a Tory Brexit. It’s the same one. It’s all the same whole unnecessary clusterfuck made totally possible by you, when you decided an advisory ref, won in the most dubious of circumstances, fitted your personal victim narrative 
Yes the problem with Brexit is Brexit! 
New Brexit poll analysis shows most people now back remain  via @ferretscot 
#Brexit needs taking off the table. It is lunacy to continue chasing unicorns based on a corrupt and illegitimate referendum. Please can we have some respect for the rule of law? Our democracy has been bought and sold. What are you going to do about it? 
Let’s get real on this, you would make zero difference on this because Brexit is the cause and you are facilitating it.#PeoplesVote #BrexitShambles 
He lied until the bitterest of endings...... 
@fidelmacook summed the BBC's role in #Brexit very well...  
Ben voted leave, but he has changed his mind and has been part of the #RemainerNow community for some time now.As a Swindon resident here he is involved in discussion about the sad news about Honda.Respect @Fiocca1983, a pretty fair summary.Brexit is not worth it!  
There’s no such thing as a ‘jobs-first’ Brexit. There really isn’t.  
It's not just brexit which sooner or later we will get and get completely, there are so many other things which need sorting out to make this country fit to live in for 64 million people. It simply requires disposing of the dross who for too long have been parasites on our backs. 
2/ Page 1. The Home Secretary admits that law enforcement alternatives in the event of no deal Brexit are "less efficient" and need more staff, ie cost more. UK has to change law. So might Member States. In six weeks?  
So how's Brexit going @jeremycorbyn ? - First Party split since 1981- Lowest Leader polling since 1982- 54% now predict Tory Win-  150,000 members quit- 3,500 jobs to go at Honda, 740 new jobs lost at Nissan- You ignored policy call of 86% of members & 76% of Labour voters 
Still support a jobs first Brexit Len?  
One of the first swivel eyed, neo-con, rancid right wing snake oil salesman to block this account was @DanielJHannan...So, if you'd be kind enough, please share the following. We wouldn't want Hannan not to be reminded. Thank you. 
It’s an impenetrably thick fog of denial. And if Honda issue a statement tomorrow citing uncertainty around Brexit as one of their reasons, the same people will say “well, of course, companies love using Brexit as an excuse” or “project fear 2”. There is no way through. None.  
The UK’s latest attempt to persuade Japan to agree a quick post-Brexit trade deal has backfired after officials in Tokyo reacted with dismay at British tactics  
Rather than oppose #Brexit, Labour Leader Jeremy Corbyn instead called for a “Jobs First Brexit”. Maybe he’ll now realise that jobs are the first things to go. 
The question is political. It's an European affair. The unity of Spain is not sacred. The catalan people needs a referendum of self determination agree whith the state. Today in Brussels. @JuntsXCat @ECampdepadros @francescd 
This didn't age well   #brexit #StopBrexitSaveBritain 
Stop lying  - they are pulling all production back to Japan .... 2022 .... looking after their own nothing to do with #brexit .. #desperateorwhat 
It's not the handling of Brexit. It is Brexit. 
Sick of Brexit? Make your voice heard on the 23rd of March 
I’m anti-Brexit, but to blame Sunderland for the 51.9% National leave vote is just plain stupid and very lazy. Have you heard of carboniferous capitalism? When was the last time you invested in the North East?  
Brexit is responsible for this. Any Labour leader should be opposing Brexit as this is the effect on working people. If you do I promise those who are flocking away will return. 
Brexit destroys jobs. Any Brexit destroys jobs. No matter have Brexit is ''handled'' it will destroy jobs. We must stop Brexit. 
Says the man who vehemently opposed a 2nd referendum and advocated leaving the Single Market and ending freedom of movement 2 years ago. You couldn't make it up.  
People genuinely forget that Atletico plays Brexit football, maliciously trying to injure our players in addition to their fans despising us? Guess some people are short-sighted or have an agenda against a certain Portuguese.  
.@RobertBuckland: "Whilst the timing of this is obviously at a moment when we have still to make important decisions on Brexit... there are longer term, more global issues influencing the decision makers in Japan..."  
Its not the handling of brexit. It’s brexit itself. There is no jobs first brexit ffs, a labour brexit would be equally devastating. At least be honest about your blind ideology 
So there you have it. I'm not happy there has been a split but I'm not surprised. I would have preferred labour to have stayed together and fought the tories and their illegitimate referendum. But it is what it is. 
TBH I would have preferred labour do the following:Reach out to remainersForce impact reports BEFORE A50 was triggeredNot voted for A50 until the reports were releasedJumped on allegations of illegalityRequested full investigation & put #brexit on pause 
Did all 17.4m Leave voters know what they were voting for? #Brexit If yes - what was it? 
Brexit is letting down the country, Labour is letting down the country on Brexit. Time for a better politics #LabourSplit 
Euro zone banks in Britain must be ready for Brexit by March  
Honda's decision to close its factory in Swindon is a huge blow to the thousands of workers and the whole community.The government's disastrous handling of Brexit is letting people down across the country. 
Yes Corbyn, do the decent thing, resign, rent an allotment in Venezuela, take Milne & co with you, and your Brexit buddies May & Farage while you’re about it.  
PLEASE RETWEET. First day of rehearsals today. Absolute Laughter medicine. The antidote to "Personality Theresa & her endless Book of Brexit". Did nothing but laugh all day. On for the whole of March at @RoyalCourtLiv @DaveKirby01 
‘Britain is basically Pompeii, if Pompeii had voted for the volcano’ - John Oliver, @LastWeekTonight on Brexit 
The Corbyn email: pro-Brexit, typically slippery on a second referendum now only to stop ‘no deal’ Brexit - his lies & Tory-backing agenda have blown his Party out of the water.  
Certain people are trying to argue that #Honda is nothing to do with Brexit (just like Airbus, Nissan etc etc). They are, at best, just wrong as Steve demonstrates.  
Jaguar Land Rover, then Nissan, now Honda announce thousands of jobs to be lost in the UK. The PM's bungled Brexit negotiations continue to send chills through the economy.  It's time to end this uncertainty and take the prospect of no deal off the table.  
Sunderland getting the blame for single handidly voting for Brexit . Its as if the rest of the country said "Oh Look Sunderland want to leave we better follow suit"Its because  we can count faster than the rest of the country . Simple as that 
Due to Hunt & Fox's “high-handed” approach towards a post-Brexit free trade deal, Japanese officials reportedly considered cancelling this week's bilateral trade talks They didn't, they just cancelled the Honda car plant instead. 
Brexit is literally killing off British manufacturing - and this is before the worst has hit.@DavidLammy is right: Brexit MUST be opposed and must be stopped. To proceed, knowing the damage it will unleash would be nothing short of criminal.#RevokeA50 
In September 2016 the Japanese Government issued this unprecedentedly blunt warning to the Prime Minister & her Tory @GOVUK about the possible consequences of #Brexit in terms of Japanese companies & investment.  She chose to ignore it.  
Yest Corbyn still supports the racist/fascist/liars/criminal Tory project known as "brexit". Maybe you can have a word with him, Yvette ? 
Forty-four days away from Brexit and they haven't got a clue."A Honda worker accuses the government of "completely incompetent handling" of Brexit and "idiocy of epic proportions".  
Bike man at Honda factory neatly sums the Brexit shambles. #C4News 
No, what’s disgraceful is your support of Brexit which is leading to more and more FDI and investment cancellations. A union boss that doesn’t get this?  
Govt announces ban on petrol & diesel cars by 2040, MPs & greens demand the ban come sooner, restrictions & taxes promised by city leaders. Car makers say they’ll go abroad. Same anti-car politicians react with surprise & anger - then blame Brexit!  
Don't blame Brexit – Honda's problems run far deeper than that, writes Andrew English  
And yet we can’t know who they are, so when pressuring for the sell out of Brexit, they’re not held accountable by their electorate. It seems unfair then, that people try to paint Brexiteer MPs - who have openly stated their case - as rebels and extremists...  
Almost nobody seems to be reporting the Honda story honestly. It's about many things, not just Brexit, but it's more about Brexit than most media outlets admit. They talk about the EU-Japan trade deal as if it's somehow unconnected to Brexit, but EVERYTHING's connected.  
Cabinet/backbench MPs had meetings with PM today, pleading for no-deal to be taken off table.. Up to 25 could be ready to quit. #EU #Brexit  
It’s global trends, Richard. And our lack of faith in Brexit. It’s not at all the fault of the conmen/women who lied to the people. Now, if we could just *believe in Brexit* a bit more, I’m sure it’ll all be fine. 
If May had a backbone, she would face down these Remainers, whose agenda is clearly to delay Article 50 in the hope that Brexit is eventually cancelled. Unfortunately, it does not help that our Remainer PM wants to prevent No Deal, so she is likely to cave in to their demands.  
Every member of the Mediocre Seven vowed to undermine Jeremy Corbyn from the moment he was elected leader. The idea this is anything to do with #Brexit, antisemitism or Corbyn's leadership is bollocks. These are pro-war MPs who hate the idea of peace and democratic socialism. 
Allegedly, 22 Tory MP's will resign if No-Deal Brexit is going to happen. (INCLUDING FLUFFY) 
Seven lawmakers quit UK Labour Party citing Brexit 'betrayal', anti-Semitism  
Somewhere in a glitzy office in London this evening is a meeting of Blairite lobbyists and second referendum corporatists who realise that it’s over.  In more ways than one 
Let these #Brexit blockers go - the party members do not want to pay £80+ billion to the dysfunctional #EU - 70% want to #leave now - May will lose up to 100 MP's if she delays Brexit - we all know the #remain fanatic plan - delay - delay - delay - so in time there is no #Brexit! 
 Westminster parties are letting Scotland down again, while the UK edges ever closer to the Brexit cliff edge. Here's how we're getting on with the day job: the real opposition in Westminster and a progressive government in Scotland.  
Love to see Johnson, Gove, Fox, Davis, Mogg, Bone, Redwood, Francois, Paterson, Hannan et al. look this guy in the face and tell him how wonderful their Brexit is going to be.......absolute bastards.  
Bless.... there goes over-paid smug git Jugs Lineker again, thinking anybody gives two shits what he wants... Gary Lineker backs new mass march calling for second Brexit vote  
The lack of Corbyn response to Honda is seriously very shocking. It’s like he believes in Brexit or something.  
It's not often I share articles from the Daily Excrement but ya gotta laugh that they've only just figured out what Brexit means for UK exporters... 
Will our MPs please show some grit and responsibility and kill the massively damaging right wing sponsored brexit 
Honda worker(24 years) - We are 44 days away from #brexit & they haven't got a clue.... this is idiocy of epic proportions.#C4News #PeoplesVote #FinalSay #RevokeA50 
PM was this afternoon warned by Amber Rudd, David Gauke, Greg Clark & David Mundell she faces resignation of 22 ministers & members of Govt over no-deal BrexitIn a meeting in No 10 they urged her to publicly commit to extending A50 in the event a deal cannot be reached 
You couldn’t make this up!Their new office is above Brexit backing Wetherspoons pub called “The Unicorn”.    
So @Honda says empphatically that closure of #Swindon is nothing to do with #brexitYet Mark Klyman @SkyNews claiming it isHe also says @JLR_News sacking staff because of #brexit even though JLR said it was only the 3rd biggest factor. Who do we believe? 
Brittany Kaiser is the SECOND known Cambridge Analytica employee to be subpoenaed by Mueller. Sam Patten [business partner to Russian GRU operative & Manafort assoc, Kilimnik] has already entered into a plea deal with Mueller. Kaiser is the first figure linked directly to Brexit.  
Today, 7 MPs left the Labour Party. They were right to do so. The Labour Party is a left wing cabal that condones racism and is completely out of touch with their supporters on #Brexit. More Labour MPs will follow and there will almost certainly be right of centre Tories too! 
#BREAKING -- @JunckerEU: If UK requested extension to #Brexit talks, nobody in Europe would oppose it; No time-frame in mind for length of Brexit extension. /via @Reuters 
Northern Ireland voted "remain" in 2016. As Brexit looms, people there fear leaving the EU will threaten peace on the island, writes Conor McCabe:  
My interview with the Palm Beach Daily News in which I highlight our #Brexit concerns & the importance of our economic links with the US.  
Is the problem that Jeremy Corbyn is too ideologically obsessed with socialism, or too economically ignorant, to understand how harmful Brexit will be? 
‘Idiocy of epic proportions.’ Good for @Channel4News for giving a voice to those losing  jobs as a result of Brexit  
This man who works @Honda_UK on #Brexit - watch @Channel4News NOW 
If all of these things are not Brexit related Alex we are witnessing a set of really strange coincidences. 
Funny how British politicians have hurried to dispel any links between Brexit and Honda’s intentions to close down operations in Swindon. Foreign press has already linked the two events. ’UK, Brexit claims another victim. Honda heading for a farewell, 3500 jobs at risk’.  
BBC has point blank lied about the Swindon Closure on Radio 4 news tonight. It said it was caused by Brexit carrying the opinions of a TU official. This is a disgrace. It is an insult. We are paying for them to lie to us. Their senior management are liars and hold us in contempt. 
Britain needs a day of reckoning. Brexit will provide it (via @IrishTimesOpEd ) 
Patients cannot force surgeons to undertake an operation that the surgeon knows will be harmful—and this analogy applies to #Brexit, argues Peter Bailey:  
Anyone who doesn’t realise by now that the proponents of Brexit are liars, is either complicit or in denial.  
Labour's deputy leader @tom_watson warns more MPs could quit the party unless Jeremy Corbyn takes stronger action to address concerns over #Brexit and antisemitism.Get the latest on the Labour split here:  
The sunlit uplands are not even a dream. They are fantasy.Years of tortuous negotiation in a transition limbo of non representation lie ahead.A grim prospect. And people still think a second referendum is a bad idea or somehow unjustified?/ends 
Currently, that trade is worth approx. £220 million a year. If things pan out badly, the way the Government spells it out, post-Brexit it will be worth £0 and farmers will go bankrupt. Simple as, no ifs or buts. 
Enabling a tory/labour brexit isn't serving anyone.But it isn't your job, home, pension or health being put at risk is it?  
Of course Lenny, by supporting a criminally procured Brexit vote you're going to be busy fighting all the fallout....if only there was a better strategy????  
This is the language of totalitarianism. If Trump had his way the media would be spewing out the praises of Trump 24x7. Let us harbour no illusions, the Trump-Brexit right is a threat to democracy. #PeoplesVote #Brexit  
Meeting up with @karinsmyth, @UKLabour MP who is the shadow Minister for Northern Ireland.Discussing the pressures facing our Health and Education and the huge impact of Welfare cuts and Brexit on our communities. @SDLPlive @SDLPWestTyrone 
@jeremycorbyn - care to make any statement at all about the thousands of high quality manufacturing jobs lost in Swindon because of the Disaster Capitalist Brexit you are working so hard to facilitate?Anything?At all? 
Final one from  me today. ‘Leaving Roundstone’ Val Byrne Irish Art,  wonderful.Thanks everyone.  Busy day for us but all ok.  Thank you everyone for retweeting favouriting commenting or joining our happy Brexit free site! Helen Dr S Toots and Max   
Once again this shows that brexiters are utterly out of touch with the 21st century and our position in it. Their delusions are way beyond some empire grandeur. One can only deduce they are consumed by brexit madness OR consumed by corruption. It is horrendous. #FBPE 
And even if it does work, in some mediocre way, then those folks in the ERG aren’t going to vote for it. Because virtually no remotely achievable Brexit shape is good enough for those guys. 
Finally some light humour... the Independent Group, whose MPs oppose Brexit, is based above a branch of Wetherspoons, which, erm, does not oppose Brexit.And the name of their new odd couple neighbour?'The Unicorn' 
Seven in ten Labour-held constituencies voted for Brexit. Yet the working class that the party says it represents are consistently ignored for the views of its pro-EU membership.  
A political solution based on dialogue and negotiation, always on the path of non-violence and democracy. The proposal is very simple: a #referendum on #selfdetermination agreed, binding and internationally recognized #CatalanEU 
"«We will defend the referendum being agreed with the Spanish Government, since it is the most plausible option for all. This offer of dialogue and consensus search will remain open until the last day» #CatalanEU 
Richard Dick Leonard speech's in EdinburghWhen will you sort out the DWP's universal creditDick that's not devolved When will you sort out Brexit Dick that's not devolved When will you sort out the tax system Dick that's not devolvedRichard Leonard F**K!! 
Not as disgraceful as having their jobs finished by a Brexit that you and your apparently ‘party of the workers’ chums in Labour are actively supporting. #StopBrexitSaveBritain 
Thank you for sharing this clip of the passionate and brilliant @CarolineLucasBrexit is like a slow motion car crash which will affect us all terribly for decades. It means endless austerity. Caroline is right - it’s not too late to think again.#PeoplesVote 
What would a no-deal Brexit mean for the island of Ireland?  
If I was Argentina, I'd retake the Falklands on March 29th, while British Armed Forces are busy at home trying to keep Brexit from becoming too fatal. 
"Even we did not realise that the downturn in the market for diesel cars could have such a devastating effect on apparently unrelated sectors of the economy like financial services and cut flowers. Still, it is undoubtedly all down to diesel and not Brexit. That is undeniable." 
When people die because they can’t afford to eat and because there is no medicine, I assume this will be part of a ‘global trend’ and nothing at all to do with Brexit! 
I just joined the Liberal Democrats - join me here:  via @LibDems - consistently opposed to BREXIT 
Yeah, then like the rest of them he decided to think of himself to the detriment of everyone else and the country...traitors one and all. 
We have proposed it dozens of times, but never has a Spanish government had the courage to face the Catalan case by listening to the majority of the Catalan people: 80% of Catalans would like to see an agreed referendum #CatalanEU 
It is hate and vengeance before rationality and the main principle of humanity is freedom. The rational solution for holding an agreed referendum as in Scotland and Quebec has been forcefully rejected.  #CatalanEU 
Striking how many of the tributes to Paul Flynn mention his commitment to Wales. It's inconceivable that an English left-wing politician would be celebrated for his/her patriotism. The left's failure to embrace let alone own Englishness is one cause of Brexit. 
The first stage of deselection is complete in Totnes as Sarah Wollaston's constituents fight back over her Brexit betrayal.  
Brexit is hitting workers hardest. Brexit is not about improving the lot of workers or the working class. Those who championed Brexit are public schoolboys who don't give a damn. 
Sometimes you have to wonder if Len understands Brexit at all.  
The only "lie" here is the idea that leaving the world's largest trading bloc would have no impact on jobs. Investment in the UK car industry has halved in 2 years. The charlatans who conned the country should apologise and we should hold a public vote on the reality of Brexit.  
"There is no evidence that so-called "Brexit Change" is man-made, or in any way related to Brexit. Just pure bad luck, unfeasibly unlikely coincidence, and near-perfect correlation."  
"this decision has been made because of global trends and is not related to Brexit. The Turkey factory will also close as all European market production is being consolidated to Japan where the company is based."My thoughts are with the workers affected 
Honda shut Swindon plant - 3500 jobs.Schaeffler and Michelin close UK factories - 1400 jobs.Dyson moves to Singapore- 300 jobs.Philips close plant - 430 jobs.Jaguar Land Rover cuts - 4500 jobs.Ford cuts -1000 jobs.Flybmi administration-500 jobs.Nothing to do with Brexit? 
#HondaBritain promised we would always be at the heart  of the EU.Britain sat back on The Japan-EU trade deal and allowed UK interests to be sidelined as they were obsessed by Brexit.10,000 jobs in total will be lost in supply chains and local area. #Swindon 
The Electoral Commission only opened a third investigation into me after political pressure from wealthy Remain campaigners – campaigners who are trying to use our courts to thwart Brexit.Find out more  
It's disgraceful that yet again workers' jobs are on the line because of your toxic #Brexit. There's no such thing as a jobs-first #Brexit. With Brexit, jobs GO first.Majority of your members & Labour members know that & oppose Brexit. Please respect & represent their views.  
I wasn’t aware that after Brexit the UK was moving continent...  
Received call from PM Theresa May on #Brexit. UK is and will remain a close partner. The carefully negotiated withdrawal agreement is a fair compromise and the best way forward to avoid no deal. New proposals must come from the UK and be politically viable. 
So 7 Labour MPs have left the Labour Party.Not great !But you know what ?As far as I'm concerned it's *business as usual**Let's sort the #Brexit chaos*And work to get the Tories OUTThe Labour Movement is bigger than any individual ! 
The current feeling among Labour MPs is that more resignations could follow, with how the Labour leadership decides to whip on the Peter Kyle amendment next week being a possible trigger. The amendment declares support for the PM’s deal as long as she puts it to a referendum. 
Does our electoral system really prevent political change as so many are claiming today ? FOR - failure of SDPAGAINST - creation of New Labour, rise of UKIP, triumph of SNP, Corbyn’s election & re-election, Brexit ...Next ? 
Brussels SLAMS DOOR on UK exports with 'restrictions' planned in event of no-deal Brexit. As EU ship more to UK than the reverse, Let us Threaten the Same! They will back down! Ask for driver permits from EU Drivers, take time vetting them!  
 @KRLS President Puigdemont: “The rational solution of holding an agreed referendum like happened in #Quebec has been rejected more than 10 times. We want to vote. If Spain is a real democratic Spain, it should listen to the demands of the #Catalan people”. 
THIS IS NOTHING TO DO WITH BREXIT IT'S JUST COINCIDENCE THAT ALL THE MANUFACTURING JOBS ARE FUCKING OFF JUST BEFORE WE JUMP IN THE FUCKING BATH WITH THE TOASTER.  
Meanwhile people who think Brexit is a failed economic project:HondaNissanJaguar-Land RoverFordAirbusFlybmiPanasonicSonyPhillipsHitachiToshibaBarclaysMorgan StanleyWaitroseMarks & SpencerSainsbury'sLidlGSKAstraZenecaNHSRoyal SocietyWellcome Trust#Brexit  
This is beyond parody Len.Cheerleading for #Brexit is driving automotive companies away from the country and costing jobs.You have a choice, back a #PeoplesVote, or accept that you are complicit in this. 
Brexit threatens peace in Northern Ireland, which voted 'Remain'It was both the single market and the Good Friday Agreement that made the border invisible and ensured that peace became a viable, ongoing reality. The two are needed to sustain that peace. 
Let me put it this way. At this point, a gun-fight between Theresa May and Jeremy Corbyn on the benches of Westminster would be a "distraction" relative to the loss of life that the HIGHEST MEDICAL AUTHORITY IN THE UK has attributed to a No Deal Brexit. 
Honda's exit is based on many factors, but Brexit is certainly one | Larry Elliott  
It is against more than two million Catalans who went to vote in a #referendum, against those who voted legitimately in favor of the #independence of #Catalonia and against those who voted to remain in Spain #CatalanEU 
Long after last business in  has left - when it’s one big nursing home - BBC will still be saying just a coincidence it began with Brexit. 
 “The political trial that is currently happening in Madrid is not a trial against 12 Catalan leaders, but against more than 2 million people that voted in the referendum, whether to stay or to leave the Spanish State”, says President @KRLS. 
Our exile in #Belgium, our time in #Germany, our exile in #Switzerland and #Scotland, have shown that this is a political trial. That in Western European countries we are considered free because organizing a referendum is not a crime #CatalanEU 
"In European countries, we are free, because organizing a referendum is not a crime. The unity of Spain is not worth such a violation of human rights.”—#CatalanPresident @KRLS 
Then you need to either stay in the EU or stay in the CU and SM with no say over the rules.There is no other “right sort of Brexit” or “jobs-first Brexit”.By refusing to see the logic and need for a public vote on this mess we tie ourselves up in grotesque contorted semantics  
The Tories are dismantling decades of progress to make this wholly unnecessary Brexit happen while Corbyn twiddles his thumbs. Honda workers and all of us have been lied to and cheated to facilitate the wet dreams of Jacob Rees-Mogg and Daniel mad Paddington Hannan. 
Everything #brexit related is just depressing so check Irish Twitter hoping for good news- to find this. Why is this fringe individual still considered to be ‘balance’? We #repealedThe8th - this should be over legally. It was a mistake not to provide #ExclusionZones immediately 
Please watch the clips in this thread, in which MPs argue against, misrepresent, and try to catch out a couple of leading experts in their fields who\ve helpfully come to help them, instead of listening to them, thinking about it, and looking for solutions.Brexit in microcosm.  
Lies lies lies from the BBC. Honda have announced this is not about Brexit but LYING BBC doesn’t report that. Cancel your TV licences!BBC News - Honda set to close Swindon car plant  
"The car industry in the UK over the last two decades has been the jewel in the crown for the manufacturing sector - and now it has been brought low by the chaotic Brexit uncertainty created by the rigid approach adopted by prime minister Theresa May." 
Such is their level of denial, Brexiters will soon be denying that Brexit has anything to do with Brexit.  
#President @QuimTorraiPla: "This is a trial against a referendum, against a democratic movement, but it is also the Spanish state that is on trial".  
And as you well know many of these are nothing to do with Brexit. Chinese car sales down 13%+ every month for last 7 months for example 
The desperation of generalists to pretend they know how the automotive sector works in their equal desperation to pretend Brexit wasn't the biggest factor in Honda's decision would be amusing if it weren't helping to lead the country onto the rocks.  
Stop lying you fascist Brexit supporting moron!80% of Unite members and labour voters want to stay in the EU!Literally no-one from 13m voters that voted labour supports Brexit. Only hard left militants like you & Corbyn supports Brexit & Theresa May with 3 lined whips!  
Anna Maria Anders, #Poland's Secretary of State for International Dialogue explains the Polish-American alliance, “Fort Trump,” #NordStream2, and the prospects of a Polish #Brexit.American Thought Leaders  with @JanJekielek. Watch full:  
#Funnytinge just represents a distraction from a distraction (#LabourSplit) from a distraction (internal political party problems) from a distraction (#Brexit) from dealing with about a 100 different national crises that our politicians should've been addressing the last 3 years. 
So, @BorisJohnson in what way are you going to take personal responsibility, as you said you would, for the loss of highly paid, skilled jobs as a result of Brexit uncertainty?  
Monday morning: You know what. I am actually done with Brexit news. I can’t deal with the lies anymore. I’m out.Monday evening: Me...  
Hello Mr Lammy, can you let me know your outrage of these job losses in 2012 in the UK:-HSBC cut 3k jobsBAE systems cut 899 jobs HP cut 24k jobs by 2014Unilever cut 800 jobsMorrisons cut 145 jobs in head officeFord cut 1500 jobsThey must of seen Brexit coming 
My wife and I have sent you multiple letters trying to talk to you about the damage of Brexit. We've been met with silence. At least the independents care. At least the independents stand for something. You're a joke.Sincerely, a constituent.  
So Sir Alan calls for Tory Party members who support their 2017 Manifesto to leave (and join the Brexit Party). Be careful what you wish for, Sir Alan. But as you reject the Manifesto on which you were elected, surely YOU should be the one leaving the Tories?  
How many times can Leavers claim "Not Brexit!!" about manufacturing job losses before the penny finally drops? 
If the UK doesn't want to trade with an independent Scotland after indy then it would do well to remember we get a say in the future relationship between the UK and the EU and they'd lose access to the entire EU market. | #brexit #scotref #indyref2 
Think the Brexit debacle has clearly proven an effective vaccine for other member states succumbing to to the temptation to follow this selfish, pointless and destructive Brexit anti EU path. 
The biggest divide in Britain today isn’t between Corbynites and Blairites or even between Labour and Tories. It’s between the people and the elite. The people want Brexit and the elite does not — that’s the most important split right now.Brendan O’Neill on #PoliticsLive 
How Inequality and Austerity have Divided Britain, what does Brexit tell us about ourselves - and what will happen now?  
Every British citizen should read this tweet and then investigate it for themselves.It's absolutely 100% right on the button. The Brexit betrayal summarized in one brilliant paragraph.  
As though on a one-woman mission to demonstrate that rural pensioners aren’t all in favour of Brexit, my mother - who rarely talks politics – is currently astonishing me with the vehemence of her opposition to it. ‘I like going to Europe, and I like Europeans coming here.’ 
Another destructive consequence of pointless Brexit. May it be a lesson for all for those who fall for the deceit of populists and British exceptionalists.  
Completely agree with @vincecable and I too recall the SDP. Now is a much different moment in hugely different times! We are all under huge threat from Brexit. Only the 'dim & distant' can't see that! 
Want to have a #PeoplesVote ?Think we should "Hold a second referendum on EU membership" ?Then SIGN and RT this petition calling for one!We need to increase the pressureIt's over 68,000 nowGo on, do it now! SIGN  NOW RT!! 
Honda told Swindon’s MP that it wasn’t Brexit related. Do keep up Alan. x 
As @theresa_may scrapes another bit of mould from her lovely jam, #Honda drives another nail in the coffin of #brexit. Surely even she can see that this is not working - this is not what ‘the people’ were promised nor what they voted for. #RevokeArticle50 #RevokeRemainRebuild 
Crocodile tears of @LenMcCluskey - the Tory Brexit enabler.   
Rich people escape #Brexit. 4 more Ratcliffes fleeing the #Brexit ship @InFactsOrg 
Japan signed a Deal with the EU and now have zero tariffs on all their cars, they no longer need to make cars in Britain for the European market so the EU shafted another british car manufacturing operation BEFORE BREXIT, not because of it! 
Not very clever @AlanDuncanMP you know what the brexit brigade are like in Rutland - you were treading on thin ice in 2017 doubt you will be forgiven for telling them to FoxTrott Oscar to @Nigel_Farage Brexit Party who as you know is VERY popular in Rutland @LeaveEUOfficial 
Brexit gives Honda uncertain access to the EU market.  So Honda will move production back to Japan to give them access to the EU market due.   Thanks to the new Japan EU trade agreement.   I feel really sorry for the Honda UK workforce and anger at stupid Brexit supporting MPs. 
Unite National Officer for the automotive sector Des Quinn blames Honda closure on Brexit, and says he wants "the right sort of Brexit", which he defines as "frictionless trade and no tariffs". 
Honda pulling out of the UK. Good. I'm right. Again. Again and again. The media will lazily blame Brexit. I said "it's got to hit rock bottom"  (everything we do)Before it improves. The REAL reasons :cycle lobby, non existent, nonsensical, mythical green issue. Lack of demand. . 
 Presidents @QuimTorraiPla and Carles Puigdemont (@KRLS) speak on "Catalonia and the trial on the referendum: a challenge for the EU". Watch it live at:  
1. EU signs FTA with Japan2. This incentivises building cars in Japan, not UK/EU3. Car manufacturers move production to Japan4. Politicians blame Brexit anyway5. Every job loss, for any reason, now leads to Brexit scapegoating6. I oppose hypocrisy, not cutting tariffs 
Leavers can't stick to a position."Brexit will be great.""Car makers won't leave.""We never said it would be easy.""A short term hit is inevitable.""We'll see the benefits in 50 years."What's next? 
This has EVERYTHING to do with Brexit. /End 
And if you’re argument for Brexit is that we can drop tariffs, then you don’t understand the argument.If your argument is that a company bringing its manufacturing closer has nothing to do with Brexit, then you don’t understand Brexit. 
Basically when we account for things like global trends and...you know... the laws of time and space, it all make up for a recipe of: Brexit is very bad for UK trade. Specifically UK manufacturing that contributes to supply chains which, statistically, is probably quite a bit. 
“Corbynistas want a permanent Customs Union, they want be aligned with the Single Market. That’s a betrayal of Brexit. The (Independent Group) want to prevent Brexit entirely. This is a cynical split over what’s the best way to sell out working class Labour voters”  
I'm sick to death of listening to #Lexit LAB MPs rattling on about "the kind of #Brexit LAB wants". Cameron F'ed up; May's keeping it going to try to keep the Tory party alive...AND YOU'RE HELPING THEM FFS! 86% of your membership and 60% of the public don't want ANY #Brexit. 
The anti-racist party: "funny tinge"?Leaving @UKLabour forming 'the independent party' who will campaign for the UK to become *more dependent* on the EU - ??"No, we're not standing for re-election, people have had enough of voting for things ... we want another referendum" 
The Unite representative of the Swindon Honda workers on #pm: “This closure is undoubtedly because of Brexit.” Are you listening @LenMcCluskey? Support a People’s Vote. 
The relevant Unite official on the radio now crystal clear that Brexit is to blame for destroying jobs at Honda. Shame @LenMcCluskey doesn’t share his concern and wants Brexit to go ahead whatever the cost or the consequences 
Nothing to do with Brexit? Well I can prove otherwise on that score.(Thread)  
These girls discussing Brexit finished me  
Corbyn And Brexit Turmoil Lead 7 MPs To Quit U.K.'s Labour Party  
We continue our #CountdownToBrexit series on Friday, 1 March with a keynote address by @tconnellyRTE, @rtenews #Europe Editor. As the clock ticks towards 29 March, he will give us the latest on the #Brexit process from Brussels. Sign up here:  
Internal disagreements over by-elections- some think defeating Labour in a Brexit by-election will make people listen. Chuka seen as most likely to succeed - others fear they will lose their seats- debate over whether to run in Peterborough/Newport  
This is why Labour need to ditch their misguided idea of the "jobs-first" Brexit, and instead rapidly come to the realisation that there is no good Brexit that can be reached. 
"The only people who want to delay Brexit are people who never wanted to leave the EU in the first place. They want to overturn the referendum result, but they're not brave enough to say that's what they want to do, they hide behind delay, and talk project fear"- Jacob Rees-Mogg 
Whether or not Brexit is cited as the principal reason for the closure, the manner of its communication perilous tells us something about UK / Japan relations. 
There's a global trend in thinking Brexit is really crap. 
That's just the tippy tip of the iceberg of Brexit destruction... 
I remember listening to Brexiteer MPs saying Brexit was good for Honda because the big Honda Civic market was on the USA . And Europe didn't matter - I didn't agree at time wonder if Brexiteers changed now?  
"Honda's been very clear – decision made because of global trends & is not related to Brexit. Turkey factory will also close as all European market production is consolidated to Japan where company is based"Let's back our factory workersPost Brexit  taxes, tariffs & red-tape  
Statement regarding Honda’s Swindon factory reported closure, from local MPs @RobertBuckland and @JustinTomlinson ‘...this decision has been made because of global trends and is not related to Brexit.’  
Of course there’s overcapacity in the world car market. That’s why manufacturers choose to locate their production to maximise their competitive edge. Which is why #Brexit and being OUTSIDE the European Single Market and Customs Union matters. #timetothinkagain 
I am fucking gobsmacked at the Swindon MP denying that Honda closing it's factory & losing thousands of jobs has any connection to Brexit. It's shameful. 
Just saw the clip of Rees-Smug on #BBCQT explaining to a successful business lady who had described the difficulties #Brexit was causing her business that we were breaking free from suffocating EU regulations to trade with the world. Surely nobody swallows this garbage any more? 
Of course it’s not Brexit. It’s global trends, our lack of belief, the EU, immigrants, the alignment of the planets, the weather, the full moon, it’s everything but the fact that we’re leaving the largest trading bloc in the world. Take responsibility!  
Oh so Brexit is the cause of the Labour Party break up, as usual when in doubt blame brexit. I just thought it was that the leadership were a bunch of left wing lunatics who should never be allowed anywhere near the treasury.  
#AnnaSoubry does NOT represent people of #Broxtowe She wants Shamima Begum back in UK, we don’t! She wants HS2, We don’t!   She led a campaign against our tram system,  we love it! ( links us to QMC &city) She fights #Brexit, We in Broxtowe voted for itOUT OF TOUCH! 
Now. This a major blow to Theresa May’s “deal”. Japan-EU FTA means that Japan can by extension export to U.K. with no tariffs if we have fake Brexit. WTO “no deal” means we can apply tariffs & support the next wave of U.K. carmaking.Honda leaving is because EU, not Brexit  
How much more of the UK economy has to be sacrificed to satisfy the economic fantasies of the hard Brexit ideologues? No coincidence in timing with no deal threat hanging and independent trade policy being exposed as a delusion. 
What did you expect, have your cake and eat it? Brexit charlatans. 
Minford such an imposing genius - "it'll be in your interest" to "run it down" . Great slogan for the Leavers: RUN IT DOWN WITH BREXIT  
Our supporter Randeep Singh wants a  #PeoplesVote as he believes the promises made in the 2016 referendum will not be kept.He believes a #PeoplesVote is the only way forward which is why he'll be at the #PutItToThePeople March on 23rd March. Join him -  
 via @GuidoFawkesHere’s another who should be deselected from the Tory PartyDamian Collins of the DCMS select committee investigated pro Brexit media sites by using a pro Remain group associated with Best for Britain .I sense corruption on this committee 
Here's a depressing thought.Supposing Brexit WAS cancelled. Today.How long would it take to sort everything out, & get the UK back in a position where we are *effectively* dealing with countries/partners again as we had been as part of EU?As I said, depressing thought. 
All those saying Honda job losses (like Nissan, Jaguar Land Rover, Ford etc) have nothing to do with Brexit, here's the main (only?) pro-Brexit economist, Patrick Minford, saying you'll have to run the car industry down. He's literally saying that.  
It would be staggering hypocrisy not to call by-elections in your constituencies. You’ve spent two years saying that a second mandate is needed for Brexit because the situation has evolved - clearly that applies here too 
Day 1 of the new centre party the Independent Group and one white MP member has already apologised for being racist . It is not a good look. Will it last the #39days until Brexit? 
Always sad to see people lose their jobs and #Honda Swindon will be hurting today (irrespective of how they voted). As @theSNP have been saying since 2016 1. We can’t get as good a deal as we’ve got now. 2. There is no such thing as a good #Brexit 3. There is no #Brexit dividend. 
Everyone who voted Brexit, YOU’RE SCREWING THE COUNTRY UP!You called it ‘Project Fear’, now you have to be honest and admit it’s a reality.  
Oh Len, you are facilitating Brexit mate. Own this state of affairs.  
"I hope the 7 MPs will feel able 1 day soon to rejoin my party. Once Labour has shown that it can & will seriously tackle antisemitism, that it won’t bully its own MPs & that it will stand against this Tory Brexit, it will avoid any further division"  
Brussels SLAMS DOOR on UK exports with 'restrictions' planned in event of no-deal Brexit  
You want Brexit. You own its fallout.  
Here’s the clarification for you @LenMcCluskey: Brexit. You know, it’s that policy you *want* us to pursue. The policy you told hard-working workers would not cause job losses. Own your Brexit.  
It's no fun watching this Brexit disaster for our country unfold. Everyone, write to your MP, write you your paper, if you can, go on the 23 March London march  We cannot let our country and people, young and old, be flushed down the toilet like this. 
A fascinating crazy time in politics. Just three points though:● A deranged no-deal Brexit is 6 weeks away ● Jobs are being lost already and key industries and workers moving abroad ● Mueller is doing work that UK agencies should have done to expose Brexit scammers 
Post-Brexit news to be available on Ceefax page 555 
Sir Alan Duncan doesn't seem to like the Brexiteers in his party trying to ensure he respects the manifesto on which he was elected. A friend of the MP told the @Telegraph they can "push off" and join the new Brexit party.Not a very nice way to talk about your local members!  
Amazing! Swindon Brexiter MP says devastating decision by Honda “nothing to do with Brexit” !!! What flat-earth fantasy. 
Crocodile tears, Mr. McCluskey! You support the claptrap about a "jobs first #Brexit". You have let your #Honda members down very badly. 
Labour are a Brexit party like Tories. There are millions of voters have that have been made politically homeless, voters you have lost. These 7 were bullied and told to resign or leave, so what do you expect? Labour is no longer a broad church.  
The remainers are howling and screeching again. Honda are moving because the EU are dropping the tariffs on Japanese cars. Nothing to do with Brexit and everything to do with Brussels. But why let the facts get in the way of their screeching and howling!#Swindon 
The financial landscape of Europe is changing as banks shift employees and hundreds of billions of dollars’ worth of assets from London to new subsidiaries across the bloc in time for Brexit  
Love does not respect borders, it ignores them.#FreedomOfMovement is a right that has encouraged love to flourish all over the place. However it is set to be scrapped soon and we believe this is one of the biggest mistakes of the whole Brexit mess. #LoveBroughtUsHere 
Dyson, Lawson, Rees-Mogg… wealthy Brexiters (or their assets) are moving out of UK. Leaving ordinary folk to mop up their mess is shameful.#Brexit #PeoplesVote #PutItToThePeople 
Caught up with Portuguese PM @antoniocostapm over the weekend for a good talk on #Brexit, #nodeal planning, this year’s European elections and the ever closer relationship between our two countries. 
Brexit is turning into one of those really awkward family holidays where all the secrets are revealed. 
Join our demonstration against Brexit on the 23rd of March 
"A no-deal Brexit holds no positive outcome - a fact that politicians seem to be ignoring in their self-serving posturing"  
You know how Brexiters post something like a picture of a tree lying on top of a crushed car and then accompany it with a sarcastic comment like 'blame Brexit' they never tweet a relevant graph do they?  
Crispin Odey, looking to profit from the Brexit mayhem yet again whilst those fooled by the Brexiters claims wake up to the reality of job losses, a stalled economy, suboptimal food and the sale of the NHS. 
#Honda close Swindon, 3500 jobsEMA to Amsterdam #FlyBMI into administration#Jaguar Land Rover 4500 job cutsHitatchi scraps Wylfa plantVarious banks to Dublin, Paris, etcSony HQ to Hollandand more... How much longer will they pretend there’s no down-side to #Brexit ? 
The Tories are split on Brexit and any of PM’s deals! Seven MP’s now split from Labour! Politics in England in total disarray! In Scotland these British parties have nothing to offer Scotland other than the same chaos of WM!Time to split and save ourselves Scotland! 
Look, if all these companies leaving isn't about Brexit, then it must be because you're all pricks. 
This by-election thing is a serious weakness for the #LabourSpilt. They are demanding people get another vote on Brexit because they were sold a false promise. That accusation thrown at them is pretty damn strong.  
-Jaguar Land Rover cuts jobs-Nissan moves production to Japan-Honda closes Swindon plantNotice a pattern emerging?Exactly – they all have absolutely nothing at all to do with Brexit. 
Green MEP calls it a 'terrible day' for Honda workersSwindon voted to Leave because of promises that jobs were safe. Those who deceived the workers at Honda are responsible for thisNow we see #Brexit reality #PeoplesVote becomes democratic necessity 
Panasonic goes "its not about Brexit"Dyson goes "its not about Brexit"Nissan goes "its not about Brexit"Schaeffler goes "its not about Brexit"50 chemical companies go "its not about Brexit"Honda goes "its not about Brexit"yep clearly this is all coincidence  
Seven lawmakers quit UK Labour Party citing Brexit 'betrayal', anti-Semitism  
Mercedes boss Toto Wolff fears Brexit will be the "mother of all messes" and will hurt the seven #F1 teams based in the U.K, strengthening Ferrari in the process 
When Thatcher closed the mines in South Wales and devastated the steel industry, many of my friends lost their jobs but they had the opportunity to find work in Germany. Brexit means no such hope. How can a government do this to its people? 
Winds of Change.This song keeps drifting through my mind.In Europe it seems 'the people' are rising up against 'the establishment' that politicians have created.The 'vested people' standing up to 'the vested interests'.The #Brexit vote is part of that. 
.@SimonHarrisTD reacts to our investigation and echoes @campaignforleo in saying US anti-abortion groups working with Irish activists here are trying to undermine the democratic decision of the Irish people in last year's referendum.  
And so 6 safe Labour seats become either Lab or Tory marginals. Hard to see even one of these MPs keeping their seats. This isn’t going to advance progressive parliamentary politics. It’s not going to stop Brexit’s car crash. 6 weeks from oblivion, it’s a maddening waste of time.  
This independent group is embarrassing. You know how many in the very left of labour saw through Blair and the Iraq war? But it’s Brexit you want to destroy your career over? Lol okay. The tories are smilinh because they look like the united voice of the people right now. 
Many rabbit holes to fall down in this DCMS Report. Dirty dark money behind Brexit via Northern Ireland with dodgy links to Ukraine and AggregateIQ. This BBC Northern Ireland special is exceptionally well-produced and evidence-laden.  
“A nightmare scenario.”Mercedes’ F1 boss has shared his concerns about a no-deal Brexit.Read 
Labour sources think crunch point for several other Labour MPs considering resigning the whip will be whether or not Corbyn accepts Peter Kyle and Phil Wilson amendment on Feb 27 calling for public vote on May’s deal, modelled on Good Friday Agreement referendum 
.@jeremycorbyn "There are none so blind as those who will not see". There were many people who voted Labour in 2017 because they believed (wrongly) that you would either #StopBrexit or at least reduce the impact of #Brexit on the British people. You have let those people down!  
Karin was born in Germany. After 35 years of living and working in Scotland, she is now worried about her citizenship after Brexit.  
This version of events from #Swindon MP @JustinTomlinson, is cold comfort to 3,500 workers & their families...Alternatively, you might see this as the day when the true scale of the social & economic costs of #Brexit hit hard in the SW.  
Businesses across Bristol are demanding a #PeoplesVote on the #Brexit deal:  
A leave voter  told me it was just Project  fear and nothing to do with Brexit . car plants shut all the time - just hand out fliers telling them its only short term pain there'll be millions of jobs paying 5 times more when we leave  
You've squandered your support, you've let down millions of people and you've thoroughly misjudged #Brexit. You've failed your party, you've failed to represent people in a dignified and calculated way, and as a result, your MP's are having to leave. You need to wake up.  
Automotive news since Brexit votePorsche - 10% price hike in the event of a hard BrexitFord - UK production could be pulledJLR - 4,500 UK jobs cuts Nissan - X-Trial production withdrawn from SunderlandHonda - Swindon factory to close UK investment down £1.1bn 
"Hijacked by the machine politics of the hard left." The destructive nature of leftists is threatening politics internationally, not just in the US.Seven lawmakers quit UK Labour Party citing Brexit 'betrayal',...  
BREXIT CRISIS: Fox and Hunt's Japanese fumble is a sign of UK's weakness /#EU #Brexit #FinalSay 
I have not spoken to any of them about their plans and am totally focused on working with MPs of all parties to stop no-deal Brexit on 29 March and to promote Common Market 2.0 as the best Brexit compromise 2/2 
Ireland’s Tánaiste (Deputy PM) ⁦@simoncoveney⁩ attended the EU Foreign Affairs Council in Brussels today; met counterpart ministers; and discussed Brexit with EU27 chief negotiator Michel Barnier. EU27 working as ONE TEAM  on Brexit. Another day #working4IRL 
This one didn't age well! Lies about Brexit are in abundance but overwhelmingly on your Brexiteer side Dan I'm afraid.  
This one didn't age well Andrew @afneil. All Brexit pundits consistently underestimated the resolve and unity of the EU27 partly because they projected the UK view EU was a flimsy fragile project about to implode and Brexit would serve as catalyst to destroy entire EU project.  
SMR: BREAKING: Honda set to close Swindon plant putting 3,500 jobs at risk. We're sure this has NOTHING WHATSOEVER to do with #Brexit."We survived TWO WORLD WARS! WE won, YOU lost!Suck it up, get over it... something about sovereignty...etc. etc!" 
Or let me explain that in more simple terms so anyone can understand by using pictures. | #brexit #scotref #indyref2 
May is delivering a “Jobs First Brexit”, in that the jobs seem to be brexiting first. 
"Why isn't the Indian government holding a referendum in Kashmir? Who is it they are afraid of?" said Kamal Haasan 
"The only people who want to delay Brexit are people who never wanted to leave the European Union in the first place. They want to overturn the referendum result but they're not brave enough to say that's what they want to do - they hide behind delay."  
Yeah, right.  The global trend to leave Britain in the wake of the brexit vote and consolidate in Japan because it has a new trade agreement with the EU and there is no threat  to JIT. Combine that with Japanese reluctance to speak bluntly, and you get the line you got. Suckers. 
Bryan blocked me before I could reply but the state of this. It’s hard to know what hope to have when there’s this much #stupid around. #brexit #RevokeA50 
These jobs are probably gone for good now, even revoking art 50 and going cap in hand to these companies isn't likely to change their plans. Brexit has completely messed up the country, I don't honestly know how this is going to be fixed or indeed if it can be. #BrexitShambles 
Looks like the ERG's favourite economist is right. Brexit will destroy manufacturing in the UK#Honda#StopBrexit#RevokeArticle50 
Deputy leader of second party in the state just admitted it had a big racism problem and could split further. Just five and a bit weeks to #Brexit. Entire Westminster party system creaking alarmingly, threatening to burst at the seams. 
Where have the Brexit job gains been so far? Or is it too early, because, we haven't actually Brexited yet? I'm confused.Actually, no I'm not. BREXIT IS A TERRIBLE TERRIBLE IDEA. 
It is still UNBELIEVABLE how wrong members of the Brexit Elite were on the impact of Brexit, and yet people like @johnredwood still have the gall to keep commenting like they know what they're talking about. Don't trust this lot? Don't have to.#PutItToThePeople instead.#FFS 
Outrageous that @JustinTomlinson (MP for North Swindon) is claiming that the terrible news that shutting down in Swindon has nothing to do with Brexit when he tweeted this last month. How can anyone believe a word he says?  
Seven Labour MPs have announced their resignations from the party in opposition to leader @jeremycorbyn, anitisemitism and #Brexit.Get more on the Labour split here:  
BREXIT: Jacob Rees-Mogg pledges to help the 3500 staff at #Honda by inviting them all to an English sparkling wine reception, sponsored by Wetherspoons. 
Announced since November:Honda close Swindon plant - 3500 jobs.Schaeffler and Michelin close UK factories - 1400 jobs.Philips close plant - 430 jobs.Jaguar Land Rover cuts - 4500 jobs.Ford cuts - 1000 jobs.There is no such thing as a jobs-first Brexit. We must oppose it. 
More a moral question. Leave voters said they expected short term pain - why should a remainer lose his job because of brexit inspired down turn he never voted for.  I was brought up to take some responsibility and pwn my decisions. Modern life eh - snowflakes  
I’m sure they specifically said companies would leave Scotland if we voted Yes. I guess they don’t do irony. Nor humility. Not one I know of has admitted their promises have been broken and their threats empty or that their campaign has dragged us into Brexit. British values, eh 
Britain's Labour Party splits over Brexit and anti-Semitism  
Is saving the Tory party really worth this? ........Honda worker watching the Brexit Monstrosity passing the Houses of Parliament on St Valentines Day 2019. #StopBrexit 
Seven MPs have resigned from Labour in protest at Jeremy Corbyn's approach to Brexit and anti-Semitism within the party  
Pre-referendum the nastiest people on Twitter were anti-EU.Post-referendum the nastiest people on Twitter are pro-EU.My tentative hypothesis is that people who feel unheard become nasty people. 
#Honda were only in the UK becos the UK was in the EU.  They have absolutely no loyalty to the UK, nor should they.  They, along with many others, will sue us under international law for breach of contract.  Moving expenses and loss of business will be paid by us. #BBCQT #Brexit 
With the perils of Brexit increasingly clear this is needed more than ever (2/2)  
I supply to Tier 1 w plant in Gloucester and Ebbw Vale they are a Japanese co supplying nearly exclusively to Honda, I hv basically lost another 2customers my business is shrinking daily. A jobs first Brexit is a load of Bollox and I am sick of Labour not pulling their finger out 
When the team sheet comes out tomorrow and origi’s up front, Fabinho in centre back with the Brexit midfield in the middle  
The majority of car companies are either re tooling to faise out the diesel engine, or moving the production elsewhere DUE TO NEW EUROPEAN LEGISLATION from 2025. Brexit is not the main reason, otherwise they would be moving production to Europe, as Nissan would have done. 
Of course @JustinTomlinson voted leave in the referendum and is denying brexit has played a part in Honda's decision. Imagine being so STUPID you voted to end the presence of the biggest employer in your OWN constituency? I hope you are out on your ear next election mate! 
Indians should have a referendum on whether Kamalhasan is an idiot or not. I bet the ayes will have it.  
Brexit is the "this is complicated, let's rewrite it" of politics 
Football legend @Peter_Shilton is on the ball. Watch @Peter_Shilton speak to @Nigel_Farage about why he's proud to be a Brexiteer and why, after Brexit, the Premier League will be even better!  
The official Referendum Commission told voters the Removal of the 8th Amendment was not about abortion The people were not given a choice as to the scale or limitations of abortion The Yes side never mentioned the word Abortion You are bending the truth  
WATCH | @Jacob_Rees_Mogg: "The only people who want to delay Brexit are people who never wanted to leave the European Union in the first place. They want to overturn the referendum result but they're not brave enough to say that's what they want to do - they hide behind delay."  
On #HONDA leaving the UK. Anyone else remember receiving this Vote Leave leaflet saying that Honda would stay no matter what referendum outcome.  
An election does NOT kill 2 birds with one stone. Precisely because it hits too many birds. Even if Labour stood on a manifesto of "We will stop brexit" you'd still have Leavers saying they voted Labour because of austerity but still want Brexit. People's vote = necessary. 
AND THEY ARE RIGHT. THERE ARE MILLIONS OF PEOPLE IN THIS COUNTRY WHO HAVE FELT POLITICALLY HOMELESS SINCE THE REFERENDUM.  
Tomlison MP was invited at Honda Swindon Spring 2017 and was told by Management they will leave if we Brexit (employees/Customers) told me this. He is still lying on the reason why Honda is leaving. I am one of their suppliers that’s another customer gone. I am really sorry 
I see the unionists are going barmy about Nicola Sturgeon going to France after America and Canada. Newsflash! It's kinda her job to try and stop international investment leaving like they're running from a burning building as the Tory arsonists torch the economy with #brexit. 
"Honda are clear this is based on global trends and not Brexit, as all European market production will consolidate in Japan in 2021."David. If this has anything to do with Brexit then why aren't they opening a new factory in Europe? Answer: They are consolidating to Japan.  
There aren't many people that will believe this. However, if true, all those about to lose their jobs will want to know why England cannot compete on global terms with all of the alleged benefits of Brexit just around the corner?  
You are not a broad church. You have a Brexit policy which supports the removal of our established rights to freedom of movement across our continent. 
A superb address, Tom. Plain speaking is now called for. Jeremy Corbyn DOES NOT REPRESENT 90% OF LABOUR VOTERS ON BREXIT. Either he changes that now , or he goes. It really is a binary choice - he and his inner circle are now demonstrably wrecking the Party with their EU-phobia 
Remoaners going into meltdown about Honda announcement and trying to blame Brexit. The truth?Honda say “low demand from Europe” is the reason. In other words it’s the poor performance of the Eurozone that’s to blame. The sooner we leave the better.   
#LabourSplit  The Independent Group name 7 Labour Anti Brexit MPs. With biggest clown  of the 7 Chuka look at me Umunna. Representing Labour in his expensive suits, & big flash watch The man that bottled it when he had his chance to become Labour leader. Go away you bore.  
Seven MPs quit Britain's Labour Party to sit as independents, after Brexit divisions and allegations of antisemitism  
We really don't care what you have to say about it. Labour's Brexit position supports the removal of our established rights to freedom of movement across our continent.That's all we need to know.#LabourSplit 
Eye watering hypocrisy that MPs who keep calling for a 'People's Vote' over Brexit to give the public a say on new circumstances, won't call a people's vote in their constituencies to see if their constituents still want them as MPs now they have resigned from the Labour Party!  
EU tells small businesses to brace for tax burdens in event of no-deal Brexit  
Le #Brexit en un tweet.  
Toto Wolff being dramatic because of Brexit and Horner‘s respond to that:"We don‘t even know how much we are influenced. It does not make sense now to paint any horror scenarios on the wall."#F1Testing 
MPs leaving their parties cos they want a second referendum even though they were all elected on manifestos to leave the EU.I presume each will call a by-election to confirm that's what their constituents want.All are elected by fraud at the moment    
Our first piece in a series on the impact of a no-deal Brexit looks at its potential effect on trade. Spoiler alert: it wouldn't be great  
MPs The solution to the ruin of "brexit" is now both simple, and entirely obvious: 1) Revoke Article 502) Remove the wreckers May and Corbyn from any power whatsoever3) Restore UK Democracy 
Honda & Nissan have since decided to build cars back in Japan rather than the EU. Post Brexit, we should place an import duty back on. The U.K. is a massive consumer of new cars. More car factories will be built in the U.K. It’s a blip.Mark this.  
Found this via a link from a Guardian article. What a powerful choice of words "The weaponization of ignorance". Can also easily be applied to the tactics used to achieve a certain referendum result in my home country... #wordporn 
Your policies end my freedom of movement. You're taking away freedoms I have had since I was a child. Your policies on Brexit area a catastrophe for businesses, including mine. HOW can we support that? You are 100% wrong on the EU, just as Benn was. 
Honda & Nissan have since decided to build cars back in Japan rather than the EU. Post Brexit, we should place an import duty back on. The U.K. is a massive consumer of new cars. More care factories will be built in the U.K.  Mark this.   
Excellent heartfelt speech, but you fail to grasp that millions of 'ordinary people' cannot afford Brexit, not just ND Brexit... ANY Brexit. As an 'ordinary person' who made a mistake in voting Leave, given the tumult Brexit is causing - don't I deserve a #FinalSay? @TheIndGroup 
The continued news of businesses leaving Britain shows why it is so crucial that we step back from the Brexit cliff edge and avoid economic disaster by giving the public the final say on Brexit with the option to stay in the EU. 
Unite: “The UK car industry over the last two decades has been the jewel in the crown for the manufacturing sector – and now it has been brought low by the chaotic Brexit uncertainty created by the rigid approach adopted by Theresa May.” 
Says one of the people working towards the very Brexit that caused the job losses. You share the blame for this Len. 
Semantics. You pay them don’t you? Well they’re not giving you your money’s worth! Every statistic shows the average working family are having a more difficult time making ends meet than anytime since WW2! And Brexit will make it worse! You Leavers just can’t handle the truth.  
Brexit may or may not be officially blamed for the closure - we accept that other issues in the global economy are also a factor. But Brexit uncertainty is weighing on the company, as is the inability of the UK Government to guarantee access to the recent EU-Japan trade deal. 
Swindon - and Wiltshire - voted decisively to Leave. James Gray MP for N Wiltshire called EU “ economically disastrous”. Apparently Honda doesnt share his ardour for Brexit  
Say that to the 3,500 at Honda about to lose their jobs because of Brexit.  
Since Jeremy Corbyn was elected leader, Labour is now the largest political party in the whole of Europe, with an exciting and transformative manifesto.Meantime, Tory membership’s in free fall and Lib Dem’s risk declining into irrelevance after Brexit.  
25% of UK auto industry closing down - Honda, Nissan, JLR & Ford - for reasons that have absolutely nothing to do with #brexit - just all happening at the same time as brexit by pure coincidence. 
Just logged on .... Brexit is being blamed for the Honda announcement, even though they've stated it has nothing to do with Brexit, isn't it?  
Britain needs a day of reckoning. Brexit will provide it | Nesrine Malik  
Honda are set to close their Swindon car plant with the possible  loss of 3.5k jobs.Honda and the MP for the area say it’s due to falling demand and the likelihood that production will move back to Japan.No doubt MSM will report that Brexit is to blame. 
Just heard a woman Labour leader of some committee or other on TV tell us George Osborne's Chancellorship and monetary policies made people vote Brexit. Why can't these Marxists understand it was mostly about immigration control; Merkel's refugee orders and our sovereignty? 
2/. “For low-income families most vulnerable to food price increases “a no-deal Brexit holds no positive outcome - a fact that politicians seem to be ignoring in their self-serving posturing,” he said. 
Tariffs levied by the UK after a clean Brexit will be collected by the UK Government. At present, tariffs levied by the EU on imports to the UK are transferred to the greedy bureaucrats in Brussels. 
Birds Eye boss says that food prices will rise virtually immediately after Brexit Tariffs of 2-20% will have to be passed on to the consumer.Scaremongering? Absolutely not. What's really scary are the politicians who claim it is.” 
One frustrating aspect to losing the 2014 independence referendum now Brexit is nigh, is knowing some car makers might have packed lock, stock and barrel and moved here, as well as a good few financial institutions. How short-sighted can a No voter get? Blind. Ireland has it. 
Poll Tax funded multi-millionaire says we should ignore the biggest ever vote of the British People #Brexit 
Labour split could spark a breakaway by pro-EU Tories threatened with deselection / #EU #Brexit #Tories #FinalSay 
That argument doesn't make sense. Yes, we need a GE for the reasons you mention. But there's no guarantee ANY Brexit policy would lead to a GE. So you're basically saying. "I know, Brexit hurts the country, but I'm willing to hold the country to ransom so I can get an election". 
Ireland spending 'hundreds of millions of euros' on no-deal #Brexit - minister  
The PM has written to all MPs urging them to “put aside personal preferences and unite in the higher cause of the national interest”. But can’t she see that those trying to deliver Brexit believe they ARE serving the national interest? And they’re right.   
It’s never Brexit, is it? It’s always something else.  
The Breakaway Labour MPs have today proven themselves to be undemocratic cowards and uber hypocrites.They are determined to impose a second EU referendum on us all yet refuse to call a bye-election and give us a second chance to vote on them! More betrayal of the electorate. 
The economic uncertainty of Brexit continues to hit British workers and businesses across the country.It's not too late. We don't have to settle for this Brexit chaos. Support a People's Vote >  
Real point:The EU has really damaged the U.K. by signing a free trade deal with Japan.They had planned to do this, even if we hadn’t voted to Leave.This proves the danger that the EU is to the U.K.  WE MUST SIGN OUR OWN TRADE DEALS. WTO not fake Brexit.  
There's an argument it is politically pointless supporting the Green Party because of the electoral system. But look how much toxicity UKIP has put into the British political air - Brexit included - with that same system. A strong support for Green could cleanse that air.  
Strange how all 7 Labour Splitters want people to have another vote on Brexit but won't let their constituents have another vote on who they want as their MP.To use the People's Vote brigade's own argument:The facts have changed - give the people another say!#LabourSplit 
Not the moment to say 'I told you so', but ..... I told you so.Honda plans to close its Swindon factory from 2022, more pain to an automotive sector struggling with the effects of Brexit-related uncertainty. Honda employs 3,500 people in the UK. (Mazda will be next.)  
Another 3,500 jobs sacrificed on the altar of a failing #Brexit economy.How many more jobs #Leavers? How many more will it take before the penny drops? 
Could the #LabourSplit mark the onset of a new dividing line in UK politics? - Those who believe the result of the 2016 EU Referendum is sacrosanct and must be implemented at all costs.- And those who believe democracy should be allowed to evolve according to circumstances. 
Last week in #projectfear: - Piss off Japanese & Chinese;- No closer to Brexit deal;- Labour splits;- TM defeated in pointless vote; - Honda announces closure of plant;- UK econ growth hits 6 yr low;- Children chant ‘fuck Theresa May;’39 days. It’s fine. pic.twitter.com/OezgeeMyny 
So then, shall we summarise? (1) Supporting a 2nd referendum after previously opposing it. Claiming that Labour is antisemitic after sitting on a committee which found that it wasn't. (2) Supporting austerity and not turning up for democratic local no confidence votes. 
Oh what fools our politicians look - and particularly Corbyn. 'A Brexit for jobs and the economy' - utter bollocks!We are heading into a recession followed by a Brexit depression.Honda can see the writing on the wall and they're off.STOP BREXIT NOW! Revoke Article 50!  
If you ignore the young activists screaming in defence of our futures, on behalf of a generation that voted massively against Brexit, you will piss off those who will be leading the political debates of the future.Good luck at your next elections....  
To the politicians who are supporting or failing to oppose Brexit, knowing it would ruin our futures...Just remember: We will remember.Sincerely,Young People. 
Honda now leaving UK (announcement tomorrow). After Jaguar, Airbus,  Toyota etc...Nothing to do with Brexit of course, Brexiteers -  nothing bad ever is, is it, in your strange little world ... 
BBC trials no-deal Brexit website:  
FM @NicolaSturgeon in Paris meeting Minister for European Affairs @NathalieLoiseau to discuss the new @scotgov office in France, opportunities for trade and future relations with Europe post Brexit    
READ: Cross-party group of Scottish parliamentarians say #PeoplesVote on the #Brexit deal will break logjam in Parliament:  
University fresher still believes in Corbyn’s Brexit ‘long game’ 
Honda's decision to shut its Swindon plant will be based on a mix of: 1) Japan-EU FTA (reducing need for plants in Europe)2) The decline of diesel3) Brexit4) Threat of US tariffs on EU-made carsProbably in that order but open to debate. 
Any illusion Brexit would ever help UK's poorest and most needy was always an illusion. Future generations will lose FOM and thousands in industry will lose their jobs. Some very wealthy may benefit from ERG slash taxes & tariffs policy but most Brits Remainers or Leavers lose.  
Hey Jacob Rees Mogg. Alright mate, how's it going? Just have a quick question for youIf #Brexit is so great how come you & your rich investor mates are moving your money out of Brexit Britain? It's almost like you know something that you're not telling the British public  
Wondering what to do about #Brexit isn’t rocket science - there are 2 stark choices - damage the country or DON’T damage the country. MPs should’ve even need to think about it.  #StopBrexitSaveBritain #RevokeRemainRebuild 
Email from @UKLabour today says they back public vote "to stop a disastrous 'no deal' Brexit"This NOT policy agreed at Conference which does not link public vote and No Deal@jeremycorbyn @SeumasMilne now literally making policy up to suit themselvesThis must STOP! 
McClusky & #Corbyn want #Brexit, this is what the reality means. Its their fault the nation is in this mess along with the Tories! Its their outdated thinking & pettiness that has put the UK back decades & decades. Only a #PeoplesVote is the solution to the harm they are causing! 
Nah. They’re good cars. Leaving the U.K. because of Brexit makes good business sense. Can’t blame them for that. It’s our fault for voting for Brexit. Time to take responsibility. 
The first attempt I've seen to say a Honda decision isn't really about Brexit. The obvious flaw being that the first part of the sentence and the second are not in fact logically connected - presumably those just in time supply chains are well established in Japan...  
As Brexit uncertainty continues, Honda is set to announce the closure of its Swindon car plant putting 3,500 jobs at risk. 
Seven lawmakers quit UK Labour Party citing #Brexit 'betrayal', anti-Semitism  
You’ve seen the devastation of the British car industry today? You had no plans for manufacturing. Minford told you Brexit would annihilate it. You went ahead anyway. We need the EU whether you my posh out of touch dinosaur like it or not. I can see where the failure is 
In today’s episode of Nothing To Do With Brexit: Honda.And another reminder that Flybmi, Nissan, Panasonic, Sony, Dyson, Ford, Jaguar Land Rover, Phillips, Hitachi, Toshiba, the collapse in growth and investment etc etc have also got nothing to do with Brexit.  
You forgot to mention that the just in supply chain method of keeping lines running will come to an abrupt end in a matter of weeks . Your excuses for brexit are becoming tedious 
the fact that several prominent members of the 'people's vote' campaign number among today's splinter MPs refusing to stand a by-election after reneging on the mandate they were elected under is obviously, obviously counterproductive to any chances of a second referendum 
In a worst-case scenario, the Bank of England calculated that Brexit could shrink the British economy by 8 percent and send house prices plunging by 30 percent. ⁦@amietsang⁩ ⁦@MattGoldstein26⁩ 
Swindon voted 54.6% leave. Honda is leaving and Swindon will have an extra 3500 unemployed. How far does this go before leavers wake up to the facts?#brexit#BrexitShambles#brexitreality 
Brexiteers told us repeatedly that warnings about the impact of Brexit on car manufacturing in the UK were false. If confirmed, news Honda is to close its Swindon plant show "Project Fear” was Project Reality. Every job lost is on the heads of those who misled people so badly  
Our hard-working passport office staff are under pressure due to a surge in Irish passport applications due to Brexit. It's time for the government to invest. Open a passport office in the north!  
Gavin Williamson latest minister too dim to realise he voted against the government’s Brexit deal by backing the Brady amendment. Where do they find them? 
Thousands of jobs disappearing. Brexit is of course a key factor as Japan car companies now close down or reduce their operations in the U.K.  
The Japanese are sending a message about Brexit. The UK would do well to heed it. All the denial in the world is not going to save this country when the reality of Brexit hits. 
Whenever someone doesn't believe in Brexit hard enough, another car plant closes. 
Indeed he could. Brexit is about the survival of the fattest.  
So, first it's Jaguar Land Rover, then it's Nissan and now its Honda who are closing down their car plant in Swindon with 3,500 job losses. Do I really have to say it again? #Brexit, any form of #Brexit, is a bloody disaster for our country. We must #RevokeArticle50 now. 
Nigel Farage's Brexit Party has surged to over 100,000 sign-ups in just one week. An army of people are ready to fight against a Brexit betrayal.  Support us at  
More directly significant than Brexit is the fact that Japan now has a free trade deal with the EU. All of a sudden the economic obstacles to making a car in Japan and sending it to the EU have diminished. More on this here  #Honda 
Local Tory MP Justin Tomlinson has confirmed the Honda news but said it was based on "global trends" and not Brexit... 
.@angelasmithmp your constituency voted to leave the EU. You’ve resigned over Brexit from Labour and other issues. Why not cause a by-election and and let Labour put up a Brexiteer and see who your constituents want, you or them? #PeoplesVote 
Hey, Len, your Brexit project is proceeding nicely. Not exactly on your terms, but you can't expect to exercise fine control, and your mate Theresa is in at least respecting the vote, right? 
RE Honda's plan to close Swindon plant in 2022: Perfect storm in the sector of diesel decline, global growth slowdown, potential US tariffs, rise of electric and driverless tech, and yes - Brexit. By all means shout about that last one but daft to ignore the others. 
It is Broad Church Yvette but the quantum shift to the Left makes Labour unelectable, the Anti-Semitism makes it reprehensible, and the support for Brexit makes it beyond reason. No church big enough for this mob. 
Who needs #Honda and their high tech cars? Let's buy British! #Brexit  
Want to help stop the Brexit betrayal? Email your MP today to ask them to deliver on the largest democratic vote in British history:  
The Labour split isn’t between Brexiteers and Remainers. It’s between two different shades of anti-Brexit. Both the Corbynites and the Blairites are betraying Brexit. They just disagree on what is the best way to stab Brexit voters in the backBrendan O’Neill on #PoliticsLive 
You'll be shocked to know that Tomlinson backs Brexit.  
September 2018 vs February 2019“Brexit is understood to be a factor in the decision.” There are families in Swindon that will be terrified tonight. Just awful.  
Even the #BBC concedes that "#Brexit is understood to be a factor in the decision, with the carmaker concerned about the imposition of new tariffs after the UK leaves the EU." 
Some will be tempted to put the Honda closure down to Brexit. But not so hasty: major secular shifts happening in auto industry: dieselgate, shift to electric powertrains, econ demand moving from G7 to China etc. They are likely to have played as big if not bigger a part 
After the Honda news, how many jobs have to be threatened before there is a #Brexit compromise? #PutItToThePeople @peterkyle 
Swindon and Sunderland both voted for Brexit. Did neither realise that Honda and Nissan would reduce/shut down their manufacturing centres if we left the EU? Brexit economist Minford has long argued that Brexit would cause industries like car-building to collapse. Surprise? 
As Honda looks set to close its factory in Swindon - local MP and Brexit backer Justin Tomlinson has a dilemma. Delete those old tweets - or leave them up and face ridicule.#Honda 
North Swindon MP Justin Tomlinson says Honda's decision to close its Swindon plant is "based on global trends and not Brexit" 
If you want Labour to pull together, then follow the wishes of 71% of its voters & 86% of its members. #PeoplesVoteThe Tories won't allow a Labour Brexit, so if any Brexit happens it will hurt the very people labour is SUPPOSED to care about.#LabourSplit 
At a recent meeting of car execs with MPs one of the top execs asked what he should tell the board meeting in Japan (making plans for new fiscal year) the next day about what was happening re Brexit - don’t know they shrugged. 
Mercedes F1 boss Toto Wolff on the risks Brexit imposes on Formula 1:  
5/Or this report from the UK about Facebook and the #Brexit which once again raises questions about the role Russia played in influencing this deeply consequential domestic referendum.   
Announcement of #Honda Swindon factory closure is a shocking blow to the Government's delusional belief that Brexit won't destroy British industries & won't cause thousands of job losses Ministers need to wake up to the truth now, there is no Brexit dividend only #Brexitdisaster 
Very sad news for the workers in Swindon. It's exactly what Brexit economist Patrick Minford said would happen: "[...] the car industry and other manufacturing [...] you are going to have to run it down. [...] just as in the same way we ran down the coal and steel industries."  
Toto Wolff worried about a no-deal-brexit. Expects big problems for all British based F1 teams - and a massive advantage for Ferrari & Alfa. AMuS (in German):  
What on earth were you thinking when you voted in the referendum Swindon?  
“Between this and Brexit we're f*****d”.  We’re all thinking it. The mic simply picked up the thoughts of the people. And the world. And literally anyone watching. Replace ‘this’ with any problem of your choice and it’s just everyone’s individual narrative. 
#Honda 3,500 jobs losses would be the tip of a supply chain iceberg! Well done #Swindon..#BrexitShamblesRemember Prof Minford the darling of the ERG...our car industry.. a necessary cost of #Brexit & 'Taking Back Control'...However they spin it Brexit Britain FUBAR#RevokeA50 
Now that Japan has struck a trade deal with the EU it can close its UK factory in Swindon and manufacture in Japan as there will be no tariffs...unlike remaining in a Brexit UK.  You have to laugh at the turkeys...the Christmas they voted for is just about here... 
Remember "nothing is ever the fault of sacred Brexit" #Honda 
One of the extraordinary aspects of #Brexit is the sheer ineptness of the UK side.I'd have expected the UK side to be malevolent but at least competent. But instead they're just hopelessly incompetent.  
Been chatting to a string of Labour MPs this today. There are lots who are watching this v carefully. Some MPs have made it clear that a bigger split might be coming, some talk of forming “real Labour” parliamentary group. Much will depend on the next month and Brexit endgame. 
Huge part of today’s context: Corbyn is committed to delivering a Brexit that will be a disaster for working people.  
You are helping to enable this Len . Brexit .  And you are doing NOTHING  to stop it . Working people, being let down  by both main  parties , and unforgivably , by you . 
It's hard to see how Brexit hasn't been a factor. Putting up barriers to a huge and successful trading bloc is just dumb. Barriers are bad for business and walls are bad for our society. 
Meanwhile, it appears that #brexit continues to take its toll...  
EU trade with Australia will be much less attractive to Australia, when it loses 40% of its export trade post Brexit. As one country (not 27) the UK will become very attractive to Australia, once its taken that 40% away from the EU.UK & Australia have already signed a MRA.  
UK Foreign Minister trying to isolate Ireland on a trip to Warsaw last week-1 of the most marked features of UK handling of #Brexit has been its persistent attempt to undermine the Irish position across Europe. Won’t work.  
Northern Ireland voted "remain" in 2016. As Brexit looms, people there fear leaving the EU will threaten peace on the island, writes Conor McCabe:  
3,500 jobs & livelihoods to go because of #brexit - have these people no conscience?  
Leavers: "I wonder why they've closed the factory"Company: "Brexit"Leavers: "It's really a mystery"Company: "We warned you about Brexit making it hard for us. It's Brexit"Leavers: "Global business is complex"Company: "True, but it's Brexit"Leavers: "Sadly we may never know" 
"Patriots don’t let their country fall over the cliff edge."Gary Lineker backs Put It To The People March calling for a second referendum on Brexit. 
Just a reminder that Honda, Nissan et al are not unfortunate casualties of Brexit. Brexiters deliberately planned to run down the UK car industry. This is Patrick Minford, the Leave campaign’s own pet economist giving evidence in parliament.  
'The facts have changed, they didn't kow what they were voting for, they must be able to change their minds.' So when are the by-elections for the Lab defectors? #People'sByElections #brexit #LabourSplit 
Okay I have a new plan for my YouTube channel where I do lengthy dramatic series like Shane Dawson but the production value is the worst & my subjects are like, hbomberguy solemnly eating a sandwich to royalty free suspenseful music while I do a voiceover about Brexit. Poignant. 
My letter to Oxford University Vice Chancellor on being dropped from Brexit debate. We must defend free speech on campus with absolute rigour and determination.  
It’s not #Brexit. It’s overcapacity. It’s China. It’s Diesel engines. Its global pressure. It’s Remainers not believing enough. The dog ate my homework. Must be exhausting to continue denying the catastrophe unfolding, rather than admit you were wrong.  
So Honda (soon),Nissan,Airbus,JLR,Ford have all made announcements. It isn't Brexit of course. Must just be a very,very strange coincidence.#WhatCouldItBe 
BREAKING: HONDA Swindon closing This is what Brexit means 100s of 1000s of job losses.Our car industry is finished Time for MPs to realise the damage respecting an unlawful ref outcome Grow-up people#RevokeArticle50 #PutItToThePeople 
Diesel is a tiny part of Honda, they haven't focussed upon it in years.EU-Japan FTA is great news for single market members, why would they need a factory in the UK?Any more straws you'd like to clutch at before you conclude it's not Brexit-related? 
If this is true (Honda comment expected tomorrow morning), it's terrible news for the UK car industry, Swindon and the 3,500 workers at Honda's plant. Seems unlikely #Brexit is not at the heart of this decision.And we haven't even left yet. #PeoplesVote 
The thing about Brexit is the economy won’t collapse over night. There will be a sharp initial fall, but the worst damage will build gradually. One by one businesses will shut and jobs will go until eventually the UK will be a much poorer place. That build up is happening now.  
This is terrible news for the 3,500 people who work at Honda’s Swindon plant.Far more serious than the personality-ridden soap opera that is Westminster politics #brokenbritain #WestminsterFails #Brexit  
I’m sure it’s nothing to do with #Brexit. This is only #ProjectFear2 . Stop scaremongering. We’re the greatest nation on Earth, we’ll manage. 
Honda set to close Swindon car plant - the car manufacturers are going. A pity that the Brexit Lie manufacturers don’t all leave and let us keep honest jobs.  And yes Swindon area where Honda are based voted for Brexit. Time to vote again. Very sad.  
 WHEN DOES THE ALARM START TO RING IN WESTMINSTER!? #Brexit #PeoplesVote 
Very sad news for the workers in Swindon. It's exactly what Brexit economist Patrick Minford said would happen: "[...] the car industry and other manufacturing [...] you are going to have to run it down. [...] just as in the same way we ran down the coal and steel industries."  
Hedge fund manager Crispin Odey renews his hotly debated wager against the pound 
This is far more important than today's Westminster circus. Scotland's response to Brexit has been to strengthen links with Europe. That's been warmly received. This work, effectively a soft foreign policy, is essential for our country's future.  
Swindon, where 54.7% voted to Leave, now faces the loss of 3,500 jobs.Three thousand five hundred.But what will Brextremists say? 'It's Honda's fault. It's Japan's fault. It's Gina Miller's fault.'Definitely not because of Brexit. Definitely not.Definitely.Not.Brexit.  
TWO YEARS AGO I said the car plants would go-it doesn’t take a genius to work out when you can’t transport the parts over borders because of barriers the lines will stop-Oh and the tariffs on cars as well . Still want brexit ? ( and yes I have delivered parts for all car plants ) 
This whole Brexit thing is looking like a catastrophically shit idea.  
Tragic. Production likely to be switched to Japan - which has a new, wide ranging trade agreement with the #EU from which #Brexit Britain will be excluded.  
One day the Brexit zealots will be made to apologise for what they’ve done  
MPs who demand that people get a second referendum will surely do the honourable thing and give us a chance to vote on whether we still want them to be our MPs now that they no longer represent the Labour Party values that got them elected.  Won't they? 
More bad news for Britain as Brexit disaster looms ever larger: Honda, the first Japanese car maker in Britain, is reported to be closing its pioneering Swindon plant 
Predicted this three years ago: Remainers are going to be blamed for everything that goes wrong with Brexit 
Nothing to do with Brexit, it’s all down to... (shakes Brexit Excuse Generator)... “Candy Floss Dragons”. 
Swindon, of course, voted leave by 54.7%. Brexit is the greatest act of economic self harm a populace has done since....well....since....  
Honda shutting it's Swindon factory, currently it's only factory in the EU. Hard to imagine the UK being more fucked than it is right now. Hard to imagine Scotland losing an independence referendum right now. 
I think a lot of people in the automotive industry will acknowledge that the 2016 referendum prompted the triggering of five year wind down plans almost immediately after the vote. 
HONDA now closing factory in England with 3500 job losses.#Brexit It's all going so well. 
Of all the forecasts made by Leave, will the only accurate one be that Brexit would "mostly eliminate manufacturing"?What a disaster they are wreaking on the lives and families of working people.  
Honda to stun ministers with closure of Swindon factory This is all down to the madness of disaster capitalism Brexit Bow your heads with shame.  
Very sad to hear of Honda very easy to blame BREXIT but car industry is changing fast Diesels are finished & electric coming. Manufacturers finding massive drop in sales world wide. When sales dry Japanese look after own & keep their workers & sacrifice overseas factories 
Now it is Honda in Swindon. Will the last Brexit fantasist please switch the lights off.  
Rees Mogg this morning was making it sound like failing companies like Flybmi are blaming Brexit ... is Honda a failing company?  
Frank believes in honouring the result of the referendum unlike the 7 who have left #LeaveMeansLeave 
This is enormous. There will be 3500 terrified families tonight. There can be no doubt that continued Brexit uncertainty is having a big impact on the UK’s latterly thriving manufacturing sector. It’s real and it’s happening.  
"The result of the referendum should be respected, even it's won by just one vote"-  Chuka Umunna: On the the evening of the refThe party will be known as the Independent party, which, considering they will 'remain' chained, and shackled to the EU, is actually quite hilarious. 
Cue: 'Project Fear', 'It has nothing to do with Brexit', 'We should all be driving Austin Allegros anyway.' And this is just the start. 
With the news that Honda is preparing to close its Swindon plant with the loss of 3,500 jobs, a reminder of what Michael Gove said about manufacturing before the referendum:  
Shocking news. My thoughts are with the many people I represent in Swindon who work for Honda. We’ll be finding out more details as soon as we can.We’ve heard Honda’s concerns about Brexit ever since the referendum but this has come totally out of the blue.  
This is utterly devastating news for Swindon and surrounding areas. #Brexit 
Honda to close their Swindon plant, expected to announce tomorrow, resulting in 3,500 job losses. Ford, Nissan, just a coincidence they are all leaving or withdrawing investment nothing to do with #Brexit!government and opposition should be ashamed. Time for change@RenewParty 
You support #BrexitThere is no Brexit that works "for the many" so your principles fell at the first serious hurdle.  
Brexit !!!  
Just had a newsflash Honda are closing Swindon with the loss of 3500 jobs.Jobs first Brexit? 
There should be a 2nd referendum but now there’s no time. But as he said, and as everyone who has any sense of reason left now knows, the 1st was done in complete ignorance of the consequences combined with lies(and Russian media manipulation!) There’s reason enough to negate it!  
BREAK @MarkKleinmanSky reporting Honda is preparing to announce the closure of its factory in Swindon, dealing a devastating blow both to its 3500-strong workforce and ministers’ hopes that the UK will remain an elite manufacturing economy after Brexit. 
(Brexit-aside) New parties alone won't fix the problems with UK politics. That only happens if votes actually count.Proportional Representation means EVERY vote counts. Right now, your vote only counts if your favourite MP wins by one vote in your area#changepolitics 
I'm not sure he's really grasped what is going on... Not just #Brexit either, polls suggest European #elections will put record levels of #Eurosceptic MEPs in their #Parliament. The EU is broken, and you won't listen or change. That's the problem! That's why we're leaving! 
It’s a shame that the 7 defecting MPs have an anti-Brexit platform. Plenty of Labour Leave voters would like a non-Momentum, anti-Corbyn, anti-anti-Semitic, non-loony-left party to support. Narrows their appeal #LabourSplit 
The British business community can see the benefits of a managed No Deal Brexit. It is a deal that will open up new markets and set them free from overreaching red tape. @AllianceBEGet involved @  
It's time for any Brexit deal to be put to the people. Sign up for the #PutItToThePeople march & RT this now:  
Brexit is going well. 
I'm so sick of the arrogance of this man.He believes the flocking of new voters to Labour was all him and nothing to do with remainers flocking to them in the hope Labour would fight off brexit after they led us to believe they would.  
Steven Camley on Theresa May's plea to #Tory MPs to put aside #Brexit differences and unite won't get off the ground. - political cartoon gallery in London  
WARNING: 100,000 sign up to Brexit Party in first week. “We haven’t really got going yet and already people are coming to us in droves via our website. “If Article 50 gets extended, support will go through the roof.” 
.@theresa_may is mocking Parliament and running down the clock, cos she can’t force MPs to vote for her deal. MPs deserve to be granted the little time left to take control of this Government-driven car crash and reject botched #Brexit through a #PeoplesVote. 
Here's our story from last night about Brexit (featuring a vocal cameo by @stephenfry): 
Labour needs to get real & fight Brexit (ditching these dinosaurs on the way): “Len McCluskey: Remainers need to calm down and back Corbyn - New Statesman  
So the Independence Group seek a confirmatory People's Vote (sic) on the emphatic EU referendum of 2016 which isn't yet delivered but absolutely not in their own Parliamentary seats in which they were elected as Labour candidates? Right....  
Brexit: Food prices to rise up to 20% 'virtually instantaneously' after leaving EU, warns Birds Eye boss - The Independent  
Labour increased its voters in the last general election because of remainers flocking to the party in hope Labour would fight to stop brexit after Labour led them to believe they would.Labour have since ignored those people and those people will not vote Labour again. 
It takes huge courage to step outside the tribe. We need courageous MPs to call out the mass idiocy that the last 2+ years have engendered, & to do it now.Labour’s leadership are facilitating a far-right Brexit, frankly abusing party unity. They should think now, not sneer. 
UK Labour Party Suffers Biggest Split In 38 Years Over Corbyn Anti-Semitisim, Brexit Bungle  
Must be psychic. John Curtice had to correct Mark Mardell twice on @BBCWorldatOne today when presenter stated no record of "smaller parties" making a difference in UK. SNP run Scotland, Ukip has been running the Brexit agenda (& cd have added DUP running the Tories) 
With Brexit only six weeks away, US bank Citigroup is in talks to buy its £1.2bn skyscraper office in London - an enormous vote of confidence in Britain's financial sector!  #BackBritain 
I deal with Japanese businesses: the statement that includes  “...[speed and flexibility] and hope that Japan is too...” is exceptionally rude in Japanese terms. As is turning up unprepared. Japan is already furious with UK -it sees Brexit as a betrayal of trust. 
MAY: Brexit is screwed. Our only hope is if Labour suddenly somehow punch themselves in the bollocks.AIDE: You won’t believe this ... 
On the basis that, when Chuka says something on an important issue, you can rest assured he'll say the opposite a couple of years later, he is now a leading campaigner for a 2nd referendum. Chuka is proud of his principles. But don't worry: if you don't like them, he has others. 
I do think leaving Labour is honourable, but when you're screaming about how we need a second referendum because "the facts have changed" and not triggering a by-election after leaving your party (thus also changing the facts) then do expect to be called hypocrites. 
Sorry Keir, but by supporting Labour's position on Brexit,  you support the removal of our established rights to freedom of movement across our continent. Let me repeat that. You support the removal of established fundamental rights. The 7 are on the right side of history. 
We cannot say if 7 swallows will make a good centre left summer.We can say Labour has allowed bullying, abuse and antisemitism. It has lied to members about Brexit and Corbyn has had nearly four years to put things right. He is a failure and is trailing in the polls. Truth 
In December 2016, Chuka urged Remain campaigners to abandon calls for a second referendum or risk being seen as a metropolitan elite “who think they know best".  
I support the Labour Party have all my life. Jeremys approach to brexit is following the vote at conference. Those 7 MPs should do the decent thing and call a by election. They  stood on labour manifesto with party money and activists. Now labour has no rep there. #JeremyCorbyn 
Christ we're a laughing stockA big #Brexit-shaped laughing stock   
World at One today wall to wall with @UKLabour Brexiters spouting off about how Labour respects the referendum and will take us out of the EU. How about respecting the wishes of the membership and the country and allow a #PeoplesVote ? 
Jeremy can ignore the anti-#Brexit maj in Party, Len can ignore a maj in his Union; yet #Remain isn't allowed to ignore a slim Non-Binding maj which actually = a minority of the Electorate & the Ppl!#LabourSplitBack the Real Majority wanting to prevent FUBAR UK#RevokeA50 NOW 
We have no idea what factor(s) led to an increased vote share for Luciana Berger.Could have been Corbyn. Could have been her anti Brexit stance. Could have been that Tory opponent was rubbish. Could have been changes to turnout. Could be that she’s good. Or something else.  
Mate, you don’t get it do you? I didn’t leave Labour because I oppose these things, I left Labour because it’s now an intolerant cult who demand loyalty to one man, ignore or engage in anti-Semitism, disregard the reality of Brexit and who are apologists for anti-West despots  
They also risk doing more damage to the call for a Second Referendum than to the Labour Party itself, which is why so many have been so quick to distance themselves from Chuka’s coalition today. 
It's passing STRANGE !Umuna , Leslie and the other five are keen to give the public a second vote on #Brexit.Hmm.But in resigning from the Labour Party - on whose Manifesto they were elected:They're NOT going to give their constituents another vote on THEM !#DoubleStandards 
“Fox warns the EU: No-Deal Brexit could send all of Europe into recession”Anyone else remember the cold war and “Mutually Assured Destruction (MAD)”?   
Millions of people do feel politically homeless. But many hold radically different views about the economy, the state, Brexit, migration & more..Political disillusionment is necessary but not sufficient  
This should be the start of a real change in British politics. PR, constitutional convention, reform of HoLs, proper funding of political parties. LDs will work with others help get that. But 1st we’ve to stop #Brexit ⁦ #LabourSplit 
Utter bullshit. You support Brexit, which will not only make your constituency poorer, but will also remove our established rights to freedom of movement across our continent. You should join UKIP. 
Does not take much imagination to predict Trump will screw UK on trade deal after Brexit. Complain about regulations on Scottish golf club  
Next week, the UK is expected to publish its new schedule of tariffs that would apply to imports under a no-deal Brexit scenario. That's when we'll get to see if we're going down the slash-and-burn route that would eviscerate UK industries. It will signal future price rises. 
Can someone tell #McCluskey that Labour's increased vote in 2017 was not due to support for Brexit but just the reverse, votes were lent tactically to stop May's autocratic progress towards a hard Brexit.#RevokeA50 #bbcwato 
'The Independent Group': bunch of self-important, pontificating Remoaners betraying the manifesto they stood on & trying to sabotage Brexit. If they had an ounce of integrity between them, they'd call by-elections.#laboursplit 
it was an anti-Brexit protest vote against the government you fool. you can kiss those votes goodbye at the next election. 
Hard to see where long-term electoral support for a new centrist party will come from, post-Brexit. Those who are left-of-centre on social issues, but right-of-centre on economic issues already well-represented. It’s the opposite group that are without political representation. 
I’ve stopped and counted, and I know 14 people who’ve left the U.K., directly citing Brexit. Mostly engineers and other tech types. But also academics and medical professionals. Other folks y’all about waiting to see if things get bad enough to leave. 
Sailing into the “fog of Brexit” ...as Mark Carney would say.  
I hope this marks the beginning of the end of the winner-takes-all politics that have led to the national self-mutilation that is #Brexit. 
The UK fishing industry could potentially double in size after #Brexit. Estimates by Napier (2018) suggest a rise in catch of up to £700-800m per year which with positive supply chain effects could see a total boost to output of around £3bn per year.@fishingforleave #NoDeal 
The increase in the Labour vote at the last elections was to a massive tactical vote campaign  by remainers. It was a concentrated effort to get the Tories out and stop Brexit. You would do well acknowledge that. 
They campaigned to get him elected, stuck with him through the IRA pictures, witnessed him speaking at MEND events, attending Al Quds marches & seen the video of him proclaiming Hamas & Hezbollah as friends..But..Brexit....really? 
VLOG | We had a great time mooching around Westminster, speaking to supporters from both sides of the #Brexit debate last week. Despite our differences, it was a nice reminder that we all have more in common than what divides us. Watch in full:  
Brexit has cracked open the structures that have defined British politics for decades  
. @lloyd_rm I'm one of your constituents. I voted for you. I campaigned for pro-EU tactical voting that helped Labour. You say you are pro-Remain, but your leader is using every dirty trick to enable a criminal #Brexit. It will not be forgiven or forgotten. 
And I am disappointed that you've ignored the majority of those Labour voters who voted for you to oppose Brexit. Instead, by supporting Brexit, you're knowingly enabling the richest 1% to get even richer and the poor to get even poorer. And then there's the antisemitism...  
"I listened to an interview from Theresa May before the last referendum and I was gobsmacked because she was such a Remainer.........  we have got to give them £39billion."Peter Shilton, Former England GoalkeeperFebruary 2019  
Seven lawmakers quit UK Labour Party citing Brexit 'betrayal', anti-Semitism  
With the Tories and Labour in a complete shambles and the country creeping towards a National Disaster Brexit at the end of March, young people, who refuse to let political chaos ruin our futures, are filling the halls of Westminster on 27 Feb.#ParliamentTakeover 
The Thalassa Mana left Felixstowe this morning headed for Japan laden with British exports. It will arrive on the 30 March, the day after Brexit. If the UK leaves without a deal the EU-Japan trade agreement may not rollover and the goods on this ship will face higher tariffs.  
I'm very pleased this has happened. I think it's 12 months too late in Brexit terms, but at least it's happening now. The question is, will any Tories and/or more Labour Remainers join them? #laboursplit 
"Not going to lie, between this and Brexit we’re actually f**ked."  
"British politics is now well and truly broken"7 Labour MPs have resigned and will sit as independents, after a split over the party's Brexit policy #LabourSplit 
I'm sure the new independents will not vote for Tory policies, and will be broadly aligned to Labour principles; but it is the damage that Brexit will do that divides the country - there can be no Brexit that is 'Jobs First' or that offers 'the exact same benefits. 
Putting Brexit and ISIS brides aside for a moment, the Tory Party needs to sort out their Chancellor  who's so out of touch with hard-working voters on incomes up to £40,000 a year. New tax thresholds will barely pay for a tube of toothpaste and a pint as pension payments rise. 
I live amongst ‘a few’ hard core Brexity sorts who are now terrified they won’t get access to FREE healthcare, cheap flights, cheap phone data, hire cars on UK license OR their UK based pensions! Some actually admitting they had ‘no idea #Brexit applied to them!’ #revokeA50 
LEADING Brexiteer Steve Baker warned the EU Brexit backstop arrangement is the "torture chamber" of the Brussels bloc which has turned out to be more difficult to leave than the European Union itself.  
Labour statement saying it's best for MPs to stay with the party and fight for changes from inside. Perhaps if they'd pushed that line with Brexit and the EU the party wouldn't be in this mess? @UKLabour 
Congratulations, Mike and I hope this sends a message to @jeremycorbyn and @uklabour to start actually opposing this godawful Tory government. Brexit is a disaster for the working class of Britain, and it's time for Labour to stop backing it in the name of socialism. 
As far as I’m concerned they absolutely deserve it. They should be called the anti-Brexit party let’s face it theyre determined the UK should not leave the EU and that is what the British people voted for....same old same old ‘nothing to see here’  
The confusion and disorganisation around #Brexit has exposed the effects of European integration on British parliamentary politics, says @gtbho @tfbrexit 
Britain is being held hostage to May’s Brexit vanity. A chaotic Brexit would be entirely Mrs May’s choice — a decision rooted in stubborn incompetence. Two years ago she set the clock ticking without a plan or strategy.By @philipstephens 
80% of the population wouldn't even be able to articulate how Labour #Brexit was different from Tory BrexitThere was no credible plan, only a Brexit with extra unicorns that no front bencher could explain without looking ridiculous  
Bearing in mind they’re wailing about giving the electorate a 2nd referendum they shouldn’t mind giving their constituents another vote in a by-election should they? @bbclaurak 
The "Irish backstop" is Brexit's biggest sticking point. What is it and why has it become the most complicated part of Britain's negotiations with the European Union?  
Theresa May ready for ‘howls of rage’ as no‑deal Brexit tariffs are settled 
Wonder if any anti Brexit Tories will put their money where their mouth is and join the new centrist group. Or will their job security and wealth remain more important to them than the future of the UK and of Europe? What do you think, @Anna_Soubry#LabourSplit 
With just 39 days to go until Britain leaves the E.U., seven lawmakers have quit the U.K.'s Labour Party over Brexit and anti-Semitism  
Steve Baker Says the Backstop Must Be Replaced with WTO Terms or an FTA!  via @The Great Brexit Debate @SteveBakerHW 
If this  had been the Labour strategy for the past 4 years, there would be no #LabourSplit and no Brexit. 
Dear @peoplesvote_uk Until you start unequivocally and loudly supporting the idea that EU citizens in the UK and those Brits in the EU currently excluded should be allowed to vote in this ref, I cannot support you. We're all affected by Brexit. @cliodiaspora 
Yellow vests rioting, Farage and his new, Brexit Party, No Deal, No Problem, Remainer MPs being forced from their homes. It feels like panic is gripping Brexiters. Is it because the impossibility of what they want is coming into clear view now? 
"I am an old man and the outcome won't affect me - but it will affect my family and many people that I know for years to come."Meet the 96-year-old British veteran campaigning for a second referendum on Brexit  
Steve Baker: Unfortunately, May's agreement as it stands is a Triple Lock into EU institutions & that’s what we fear.The Backstop is harder to Leave than the #EUI see it as a kind of Torture Chamber from which we only escape by permission of EU!#Brexit 
En route to Brussels for talks with @MichelBarnier alongside the Attorney General @Geoffrey_Cox to discuss solutions to the #backstop. Important that the voice of Parliament is heard as we deliver Brexit. 
This wholly misleading comment, from one who is read by thousands in a national paper, is another example of how #Brexit was procured by liars deliberately misleading the uninformed.  
From aborted China talks to Liam Fox’s failure to roll over trade deals, the consequences of striking out alone in a post #Brexit world are becoming clear. David Hannay explains 
Those who have praised Tory MPs for their independence and for opposing Brexit:Why aren't you asking why those Tory MPs haven't split from their party too? 
The awful day for the Labour Party was Corbyn whipping his MPs to support Article 50 knowing full well there was no plan or any hope of one in 2 yearsIt was Labour consciously voting  to damage its voters for political expediency, following a leader who wanted #Brexit  
How fantastic would it be for @UKLabour to reinstate @georgegalloway (about time) and let him stand against @ChukaUmunna in StreathamIt would be Man against Boy but I am sure George would be kind and take it easy on Chuka#Brexit@jeremycorbyn 
We love @Coldwar_Steve's brilliant satirical collages. Thanks @thamesandhudson for my advance copy of The Festival of Brexit - in the shop early March, pre order now.  
Columnist Brendan O’Neill tells #politicslive the Labour Party resignations are about “The most effective way of killing Brexit”#Brexit  
Seven lawmakers quit Britain's Labour Party over Brexit and anti-Semitism  
Why? Labour, collectively, has been throwing everyone who needs them under the bus for 2+ years. Because that is what supporting Brexit means. 
1/ Dear @guyverhofstadt, @MichelBarnier It seems that there was not only electoral crime before the referendum, but a cover-up. This means that Article 50 notification was not in accordance with the UK's "constitutional requirements"  @DavidLammy#Brexit 
 The UK is on the brink of the Brexit disaster, but both Labour and Tories are too busy being at war with themselves. This shambles makes it ever clearer that Westminster is incapable of serving Scotland’s interests – and always will be. 
A group of seven lawmakers quit the U.K.’s main opposition party over anti-Semitism and Brexit  
“The reality is that the Irish backstop risks (the UK) being trapped in the Customs Union Framework, which is unacceptable to those who feel we need to deliver a real brexit... we will be tied into EU decision making, without any controls over them” @annietrev#StandUp4Brexit 
Defenders of today's new 'Independent Group' now include Dan Hannan & Katie Hopkins.As Hannan, a libertarian architect of Brexit, says Angela Smith is the country's 'mainstream' on #politicslive, she nods furiously.Then why not call a by-election? The reason? They'd all lose. 
'Not gonna lie with this and #Brexit we're actually f*cked'A BBC microphone picks up a guy swearing during #LabourSplit  announcement. 
#PoliticsLiveAngela Smith; “I know what voters want so they can’t have a by-election”Angela Smith“ I know what voters want so we must have a 2nd referendum” Angela Smith doesn’t have a clue. 
UK politics summary:All the problems that angered people enough to vote Brexit (NHS, voicelessness, poverty) have been totally ignored for 3 years.Both major party leaders are offering Brexits that most Brexit voters don't want, and their own MPs don't want either.#LabourSplit 
Truth is both main parties are looking at split. Many Tories being restrained today when they might otherwise gloat. They are looking at centrist anti hard-Brexit MPs moving one way and hardline ERG types moving another - one or other may have to peel off 
JUST IN: Several UK Labour Party lawmakers resign over Jeremy Corbyn's handling of Brexit, anti-Semitism  
I’ve been broadly supportive of the Corbyn project, I rejoined in 2015 but I’ve lately questioned whether I can stay in the party because of antisemitism and Brexit. I hope the response to the split can be less abuse and more listening.Yours A naive fool*braces for more abuse* 
Welcome govt fulfilling pledge to ban Electric Pulse fishing post #BrexitGovt must also stop EU owned but UK registered Flagships to avoid banned EU Pulse boats reregistering hereMust reinstate Mrs Thatchers Economic Link overruled by ECJ @michaelgove 
Labour splitters quit because they want a "Peoples' Vote" on Brexit, but refuse to hold by-elections in their constituencies... The champions of democracy strike again... 
Sick of this 'no one ever voted to be poorer' nonsense on Brexit. Every time a person votes for a Labour government they are voting to make themselves poorer. 
There is another #Brexit VOTE on 27th FEB. We at #sodem need another BIG TURNOUT! @snb19692 and the team are there every day, all day. I go on Mondays and whenever my health permits.It's great fun & you meet amazing people!#wearesodem #stopbrexit #WATON #Iameuropean #fbpe 
A great pleasure to meet again with  Foreign Minister @LinkeviciusL of #Lithuania in the margins of the #ForeignAffairs Council. #EU27 unity  is based on continuous dialogue and trust. @LithuaniaMFA#Brexit  
Thank you, New Mexico, for voting to save our  s! Even without the spectre of an extreme white nationalist takeover of our country, ConCon would dwarf #Brexit as a clusterf*** of #NoConCon 
Gary Lineker backs new mass march calling for second Brexit vote  
John Oliver nails it a again and again: Brexit III  
10/ We'll be discussing all this, hopefully, at the @NewStatesman event on Brexit, Wednesday night ....  
'Between this and Brexit we're f*****d' - microphone captures man swearing during Labour split announcement  
Today’s news should be a wake up call to #Conservatives across the party, there is a real need to stick together to help shape the nation after Brexit and look beyond divisions over EuropeWe are stronger and more electable as a party if we are truly a broad church #OneNation 
In a poll published over the weekend , Leo ' I am the European Union ' Varadkar's approval rating has dropped to 39%( from high of 60%). Only 35% are satisfied with his handling of #Brexit .   #Irexit 
"Do your bit for the country by joining the #PutItToThePeople March at High Noon on 23 March" @GaryLineker explains why on 23 March he'll be marching for a #PeoplesVote on the #Brexit deal:  
9/ The main task is for the PLP to stick together; defeat May's deal (again), fight to get their own Brexit in the commons and, if that fails - as our conference instructed - campaign for a second referendum.  
John Redwood: Shackles forged by EUIf UK signed May's WA there would be No UK vote, No voice or veto on ANY law EU wanted to pass.#EU might deliberately or inadvertently legislate in ways that damage UK businesses & us being unable to stop them.#Brexit 
Delighted to meet a delegation from the Parliament of the Netherlands to discuss how we can reach a better Brexit deal in our mutual interests  
Next time any of the #LabourSplit brigade demand a second referendum, this should be said: But you won’t let constituents have another vote on whether or not they want you or a @UKLabour MP, which is what they voted for at the last General Election! Democracy deniers. 
So far the highlight of the day is the BBC apologising for the use of bad language after a man is overheard saying "We're actually f****d" during the Labour split anouncement. Full quote; "I'm not gonna lie, but with this and Brexit we're actually f****d" #ActuallyFucked 
The Labour Party has failed Londoners on Brexit and failed to stamp out antisemitism.  We all deserve better. I look forward to running an exciting and progressive mayoral campaign.    
I'd like Keir to answer this question and explain how people can trust Labour again if they voted for the party in 2017 and were told afterwards that they had supported Brexit. 
So Chuka Umunna is (a) Calling for a Second Referendum on the EU and (b) Very against having a by-election on him remaining an MP after he switched party . 
You stand on the right side of history re #Brexit.It's a disaster for the UK, leaves us Worse Off & Removes Rights w/o ConsentBut your leader & many around him have failed to back the case for a #PeoplesVote + #RevokeA50Labour's left them & #RemainTime 4 Change #LabourSplit 
Very brave decision from @TheIndGroup. We will work with like-minded MPs to stop Brexit & achieve our wider shared political agenda @LibDems @peoplesvote_hq 
WATCH | "Between this and Brexit we are f****d. The Conservatives are going to win."Is this a member of the BBC News crew? Good to know whoever it was is on board with the partisan views of the Brussels Broadcasting Corporation! Support us at  
The Independent Group posing as centrists. In the presser earlier they made it quite clear that they want to stop Brexit. Overthrowing the largest Referendum mandate in history and the following general election is not 'centrist'; it's a pretty extreme position. 
I completely disagree with the rebel Labour MP’s on Brexit but I completely share their anger at anti-semitism within the Labour Party.The SDP adopted the IHRA definition of anti-semitism unanimously and in full at our last AGM. 
Unionists not happy that in the midst of their catastrophic #Brexit the Scottish Parliament under #theSNP Our First Minister's busy building trade relationships with countries across the world with new Business Hubs established in USA, Canada & France, securing our future trade. 
EU citizens and even British citizens who have lived abroad for more than 15 years are denied a vote in general elections and referendums. Brexit directly affects their lives.Let's make their voice heard. 80 more signatures needed to reach 10,000. 
Brexit has revealed what is an impossible situation: that we have just two huge ‘camps’ in the UK that try to represent everyone, but can’t. This is simply not how politics works now. Millions of people across the spectrum feel ignored by a broken system #LabourSplit 
The Labour Party approach to Brexit #LabourSplit 
The MPs who have been calling for a second referendum because they want more democracy now refusing to hold by-elections to let their constituents decide who represents them.  
I can't keep up with Brexit. I'm going to wait till its over and then get it on box-set. 
The Labour MPs who've quit back another referendum because the facts on Brexit have changed and the people should therefore be asked again.Given they were elected as Labour MPs on a Labour manifesto, doesn't the same argument apply to them - to call by-elections? #LabourSplit 
What I would do in Theresa May's shoes (apart from hobble a lot)...1. Boot out the "useful idiots" (Liam Fox, Chris Grayling, Gavin Williamson etc)2. Swerve towards a much softer Brexit, and dare the ERG to vote it down. 
the splinter party's alleged purpose for existing is to better oppose the tory party and to widen democracy by pushing for another vote on brexit, and so obviously, the best way to achieve those aims is by weakening labour and not allowing their constituents a vote on the matter 
3/ I understand Umunna and Mandelson repeatedly tried to gain control of the PV campaign since last summer but failed because the serious forces inside know only Labour can mitigate or stop Brexit; hence the split today is more like a Plan B... 
Brexit is 39 days away. #brexit 
Westminster is failing Scotland. The UK is on the brink of a Brexit disaster, while Labour and the Tories are both at war with themselves. Westminster has proven itself incapable of standing up for Scotland's interests - the case for independence is clearer than ever. 
Started the week with colleagues from across the political spectrum in support of a #PeoplesVote. Four parties representing three quarters of Scottish public opinion - calling for the people to get the final say on #Brexit.  
Mike Gapes - Both the main parties are in favour of #brexit... I'm extremely angry & unhappy about the Labour leadership's complicity in facilitating #brexit... The #IndependentGroup is fighting against brexit & all of us are calling for a #PeoplesVote #LabourSplit @MikeGapes 
It's bewildering that the #LabourSplit comes as a surprise to anybody. This all comes down to @jeremycorbyn's inaction over Brexit and the @UKLabour's feckless attitude to a #PeoplesVote. 
Funny how anti-Brexit campaigners have now decided it's important not to "ignore how the majority of the country feels"...  
Had #Gangof7 left Labour in 2016, you might have said it was about Corbyn and socio-economic policy disagreements. Now, with antisemitism and Brexit in the mix, such claims aren't going to have the same weight. Responsiveness to this is going to matter. 
If The Independent Group forms a centrist political party, would you consider voting for them at the next UK General Election?@TheIndGroup #LabourSplit #ChangePolitics 
He still doesn't understand that the purpose of an opposition is to prevent disaster, not to develop an "alternative plan" for it. This man is unfit to be leader. Wrong on Brexit, on immigration, on Syria, on Venezuela, on Ukraine....No capacity for self-reflection.  
Anti-Brexit MPs want to overturn Leave vote of 17.4 million but won’t put their decision to constituents in by-elections. Gutless. 
Imagine. The Tories haven't split over racism, Brexit, a terrible leader, scandals like Windrush, ferryless companies + more...The Black women who face the bulk of the most vile racism everyday haven't left but it's you randoms that are splintering off. I'm this climate????  
Westminster politics has become a contest over who is the most divided between Labour and Tories, whilst the UK potentially hurtles towards a no deal Brexit.Meanwhile, Scotland's voice continues to be ignored.  
I got a reply to a letter I sent you recently. It didn't convince me Labour knew what they were doing. This tweet kind of confirms it.Utterly shameful of you to attack them and accuse them of simply using Brexit as a smokescreen for other causes.Really thought you were better 
Hey @franunsworth - is “between this and Brexit we’re utterly f*cked” an official @BBCNews line. Or just a lefty producer gone rogue? Thanks for helping clarify Katie Hopkins You can update on your staff’s thoughts here -  
From #Brexit and #JacobReesMogg to the early #Quakers and the #Bible, here's a blog I wrote on the symbolic parallels between @vnbateman's naked protest and another form of protest altogether: the prophetic tradition. 
Global Britain is off to a cracking start. Upset the Chinese with gunboat diplomacy and now the Japanese - and Brexit hasn't even happened yet. 
Hilary please join them, Labour is ripping the heart out of the country by backing brexit 
Either you want us to leave on the terms that the Government has negotiated, or you think the people should have a say on those terms.If there isn't a Brexit option with more than 48% support. Membership is the most popular option. 
Yep. The guys from @peoplesvote_uk have been doing a top job haven’t they. Only days from a second referendum aren’t we... 
Just wanted to say well done @ChukaUmunna for what you & your colleagues have done today. I left in 2017 & found it liberating. All strength to you & your colleagues. I will no doubt support & vote for whatever party you create in the future. #Brexit #LabourSplit 
Ridiculous from @BBCRadio4: #Brexit tanking the economy, Leave campaigns breaking electoral law, & Russian interference in the 2016 ref are all facts, not ‘Remainer conspiracy theories’  
WATCH | People's Vote campaigner @ChukaUmunna said on the night of the referendum the result should be respected, even if it was won "by one vote". Today he splits from @UKLabour - probably to be joined by Remainer Tories - to fight against Brexit. Good luck in the next election!  
7 of my respected, hard-working friends & former Labour colleagues leaving is v painful & sad. Things have to change. We need urgent action to eradicate antisemitism, genuine leadership on Brexit to give the public a final say & an end to bullying & intolerance in our politics 
I voted Labour in the last election to get rid of the Tories and to stop Brexit. Not for you. Not for your Tory enabling claptrap. You’re disappointed in the Independent 7? There are millions disappointed and disillusioned in you   
how can you say fight for Internationalism when you were to support that immigration bill? When you want to end FOM? When you are looking to BREXIT? Its not us you are fooling its yourselves. We don't want tories but we don't want what you are offering either on this record alone 
#Brexit Why no one likes Jeremy Corbyn  Albert Steptoe look a like. Plus be worst Prime Minister of all time if he got keys to number 10. One hopeless MP.   
That you can’t bring yourself to mention Brexit or Jew hatred says everything about why you’re disappointed but not surprised.You’ve broken the party you claim to love. Because you permit bullying. You lack courage. You’re foolish and vain. You promote ideology over talent.Go.  
Nick Boles asked if he could join TIG:“They’re all good people and I understand completely why they felt driven to leave Labour. I have not spoken with any of them about their plans and am totally focused on working with MPs of all parties to stop a no-deal Brexit on 29 March“ 
Thought Mike Gapes’ speech was particularly good. I don’t agree with them at all on brexit but who can deny the crap they’ve had to face from the hard left and the undeniable rise in antisemtism in their party. Lots of people will call them stupid but I think they’ve been brave. 
New:I'm told there's a lot of anger at @peoplesvote_uk over Labour splitters amid concerns it damages prospects of a second referendum'There's a feeling that Chuka has been trying to hijack People's Vote campaign so he can launch a new political party for some time' 
The far right is on the march, misogyny is rife, austerity causes great harm, disaster Brexit is a real possibility & the “left” opposition is split. If you are in #Wales and you want to be on the side of progressives, why not stand with @Plaid_Cymru? 
I am so frustrated with my government. Brexit is in 39 days and it is predictably a mess. Opposition is a mess. So many of us on the outside are exhausted and disheartened and it just leads to being thoroughly disengaged with it. Feels like we're about to walk off a cliff. 
1/. You just don’t listen and you are not democratic.  You ignore your members.Your arrogance means that you simply disregard how many votes were lent to you in #GE17 by Remainers trying to stop the Tory Brexit.  Not to get a LP Brexit.You do not listen. 
Labour are no longer an internationalist party Keir, They’re now a hard Brexit isolationist party that would sacrifice the poorest in society to placate Corbyn’s Lexit fantasies, Isn’t it time you resigned the whip as well? Isn’t it time you put your constituents first?  
#LabourSplit"You 7 MP's have no integrity. You should stay and fight to change from within""You 7 MP's have no integrity enabling a Tory #Brexit You should resign"Me I just say let's cancel #Brexit 
Fairly emollient words about Labour split from Unison boss Dave Prentis: "Labour’s overriding concern must be to look long at hard at the reasons why the MPs feel they are no longer able to stay in the party. The party must get its act together over Brexit." 
Tory Brexit splits deepen as Sarah Wollaston and Sir Alan Duncan facing deselection votes  via @PoliticsHomeThe Tory party has become unrecognisable, & decent, honest Tory politicians are being side-lined, & worse. 
We are working with national authorities to intensify “no-deal” customs preparedness outreach to EU businesses. #BrexitLearn more on how to #Prepare4Brexit here →  
Do Michael Barnier and Simon Coveney have a secret #Brexit handshake?!  
Im on left but facilitating a tory brexit is not what i want from a labour party. Mass unemoyment and recession will be the result.  Never known a labour party support tories as much  
How can you say that when your Leader is supporting the ERG in securing a damaging Brexit?You have all let us down.We need a new way. 
Pleased to join colleagues from across Parties & Parliaments to call for #brexit to be put to a People's Vote.  
How wonderful to see so many of those MP's who went against the result of the referendum now being made to account for their actions to their constituents. I can't wait to see Soubry get kicked out. 
I know you are a remainer Keir, but this has happened because of the leaders stance on Brexit..... pure and simple, it was a self fulfilling prophecy.... 
Japan almost cancelled Brexit talks due to 'high-handed' letter – report  
...and the answer is still no. Not a single other report that I've seen on how the Mueller inquiry has now reached Brexit. But, here's the always excellent @donie at @CNN on the case.. 
1st stage of “Kremlin Brexit” almost complete.Now onto stage 2:Destruction of the Conservative party & it’s replacement with UKIP.Putin must be laughing his arse off over this. A tv channel, troll factory & £8million bung to Aron Banks & you can wreck UK inside 5 years.  
Corbyn now has the golden opportunity to stop the destruction of Labour, the splintering of his great party, the devastation of Brexit and to do something bold and brave that could leave his mark on history and save the country from this madness.He could resign. #LabourSplit 
I continue to believe that the Labour Party is the most powerful vehicle for progressive change in this country. However this is a moment for deep pause and reflection. We have been far too slow to tackle anti-Semitism in our party. We have failed to oppose Brexit. 
#LabourSplitThis is NOT “the pro-Europeans leaving Labour”Most pro-#PeoplesVote MPs are staying in a party most of whose membership has same viewNow that those who were using Brexit for other purposes have left, the rest of us can get on with arguing the case on its merits 
It’s not Brexit or anti-Semitism that’s making the seven snides leave. It’s their loathing of Socialism. #JC4PM2019 
A snap-election could be called at any time, I’ll need your help to be re-elected as the Labour MP for Tooting.I’ve been fighting for a public vote on Brexit, stood up for our NHS and worked to tackle knife crime. Elections are costly, can you donate? 
I worked in Advocacy for 3yrs, I speak fluent French & I'm a spokesperson for a political movement...And I still can't find the words to say how little I give a crap about party-political drama when the country's moving closer & closer to a National Disaster Brexit.#LabourSplit 
'May’s complicity has been aided and abetted by jingoistic and fervently pro-Brexit large circulation media outlets like the Telegraph, Daily Mail, Daily Express and Sun and the pro-Brexit stance of Jeremy Corbyn.' 
A BBC microphone: "Between this and Brexit we are actually fucked... the Conservatives are going to win" pic.twitter.com/6LxUeGsjGZ 
Ah right. Yeah. They are going to stop Brexit. These 7 MPs. Of course they are. With their capes and x-ray vision 
Working with ⁦@MichelBarnier⁩ as ONE TEAM on #Brexit - nobody should doubt EU solidarity.   
I'm furious that Lab leadership is complicit in facilitating #Brexit, which will cause great economic, social & political damage to country.  
Instead of uniting and fighting the Tories and also supporting us through Brexit, we've had a Labour split. As a result we could now be stuck with the Tories for decades. Thanks for that. 
It’s so obvious this whole case of this girl is a scape goat to distract everyone from brexit people are doing literally everything that the government are aiming for the public to do 
"Yeah, all right. APART from Brexit, and losing the election, and letting Nazis into the Labour Party, what have the Corbynistas ever done to us?" 
Deputy Secretary-General of the @EU_Commission Celine Gauer is on the 18th stop of her trip to every EU27 member to help them prepare for a No Deal #Brexit. She must have a massive suitcase. 
Brexit kingpins update: there's the American billionaire who doesn't live, work or pay taxes here, the billionaire who left for the tax haven of Singapore, the billionaire who left for the tax haven of Monaco. Who's left? Catweazle and Arthur Daley in his Union flag socks. 
It was fear of a hard Tory Brexit that drove voters to you in 2017. We won't hold our noses and save you next time Jeremy. 
The only way Brexit is "denied" i.e. doesn't happen, is if there is a vote to reject the Brexit that exists today. If that happens, it means EU Membership is the new will of the people.Why are you so scared of democracy? 
"Never has our [EU citizens in the UK] uncertainty been greater than now. While Brexit poses many serious threats to many people, for EU citizens and our British friends at home in another EU country, these threats are existential." writes @cliodiaspora 
Brexit delayed would be Brexit denied. 
Yes Human, I’m sure the Labour Party is having a very bad #MondayMorning but I’ve had an ordeal at the V.E.T this morning, remember. I need treats! Put your phone down!#LabourSplit #BreakingNews #MondayBlues #Brexit#CatsofTwitter are cooler than Labour MPs 
With the uncertainty of Brexit and people suffering after a decade of austerity, a Labour government has never been needed more. I'm proud to stand in solidarity and fight for this under @jeremycorbyn's leadership. 
torn on this Labour split. On the one hand they're all EU fundamentalists who want Brexit killed & Britain to be in the single currency etc. On the other hand they're sending Squealer etc into meltdowns & potentially killing any prospect of Corbyn winning power 
"With vision on both sides we can find a way through" Foreign Secretary @Jeremy_Hunt is in Brussels for talks on #Brexit, Venezuela, Syria and Ukraine. #FAC 
Surely anti-Brexit MPs will now hold ‘people’s vote’ by-elections? Right?  
Devastating summation of Corbyn's Labour leadership from @MikeGapes, "I AM FURIOUS THAT THE LABOUR LEADERSHIP IS COMPLICIT IN FACILITATING BREXIT"  
the cognitive dissonance is too much. the news has 45 minutes of new footage daily from some racist rich guy going "well brexit means brexit! we're bringing back the empire!" like that's normal then yells at corbyn for being The Real Racist for being anti-genocide 
Airbus Senior Vice President: "There is no such thing as a managed ‘no deal’, it’s absolutely catastrophic for us."Airbus warns of ‘catastrophic’ no-deal Brexit. 
Billionare Brexiter Sir Jim Ratcliffe showing his confidence in post-Brexit Britain by moving his home and fortune to Monaco, in order to avoid paying £4bn in tax. It’s so good to know we’re all in this together#takingbackcontrol #taxavoidance #brexit 
Mike Gapes says he is 'furious that the Labour leadership is complicit in facilitating Brexit' and that 'Jeremy Corbyn and those around him are on the wrong side on so many international issues'  
Just reading about the Labour MPs splitting to become independents.The next general election is going to be utterly fascinating. My money is on the Brexit party cleaning up but we'll have to see. 
I voted Labour in the vain hope you'd oppose Brexit. I expect there are a few more like me. 
Brexit was not a party-management exercise gone awry. Cameron may have called the referendum for his own narrow reasons, but voters seized the opportunity to demand change. The story may have started off being about them, but it’s about us now -- Mick Hume 
Laughable from @jeremycorbyn "a unifying and credible alternative plan". Scrambled response to a serious blow to his #Brexit failure. Corbyn chose the side that broke the law, lied, stoked racism & unleashed the far right. Betrayed @UKLabour #LabourSplit 
Chuka upset and claims Corbyn not following conference policy on #BrexitIn 2013 CWU policy to renationalise Royal Mail carried unanimously by Labour ConfMinutes later shadow business Sec @ChukaUmunna ruled it outHe’s right - labour has changed. For the better #LabourSplit 
Ironic isn’t it?The members of the Gang of Seven, aka The Independent Group, demand that British voters be forced to have a second vote on Brexit, but are dead against giving their own voters a second vote on them as their MPs.Hypocrisy on stilts.#LabourSplit 
Independent Group MPs then:We need another  EU referendum because the facts have changed!Independent Group MPs now:We're not calling by-elections because we already won a previous vote 
hot mic BBC moment during ex-Labour MPs' press conference 'not going to lie, between this and Brexit we're fucked''it's going to be so divided''the Conservatives are going to win' pic.twitter.com/1dSqLYi4LO 
They're opposed to Brexit. You want Brexit and ignore huge numbers of Labour supporters who also oppose Brexit. Unfortunately by ignoring your members you bring this on yourself. 
Correct, they don't. @TheSDPUK is a democratic party that respects the referendum result. This bunch want to block it.  
.@peterkyle superb on @SkyNews just now. And deserves support in his and @MPphilwilson attempts on Brexit. If the leadership merely set the online and offline bullies off the leash, and listen to none of the important things said today, they will make a massive mistake. 
JUST IN: Seven members of Britain's opposition Labour party resigned on Monday, citing what they described as institutional anti-Semitism and the party's "betrayal" on Brexit  
I have to agree with @OwenJones84 Jones, although for different reasons: the new #Labour7 party is not “centrist” because any genuinely centrist party would represent widespread opinion, so it would be pro-Brexit. It’s actually a fringe extreme anti-Brexit movement. 
It is very interesting that the Labour Splitters have called themselves "The Independent Group" and not formed a new party - that suggests that  they couldn't agree on anything except that they hate Corbyn and hate Brexit. That's not exactly a strong foundation for a new party. 
Sad that a good group of colleagues feel pushed out of PLP by abject failure of leadership on Brexit, antisemitism & other issues. The intolerant culture promoted by the leadership makes it difficult for them. A dreadful, dark and divisive day for Labour 1/3 
“Rebuild trust in politics” say MPs defecting from one party, without asking their constituents permission, and who’ve been trying overturn a referendum result. 
Undoubtedly true. All second referendum supporters. "Politics is broken" really means  "we can't overturn the biggest vote in British history"  
Broadcast media dominated by an anti-Brexit agenda so will massively talk up Chuka's splinter.But don't be fooled. This is a group of ideological, neo-liberal, pro-establishment EU-philes desperate to block our democratic choice. It is not a moderate or centrist undertaking. 
I stopped supporting Labour because I was so fed up with Corbyn’s leadership, the anti Semitism in the party and the enabling of Brexit despite the fact so many Labour voters want to remain. I joined the @LibDems last August and it was completely the right decision. #LabourSplit 
Crucially, the company the 7 MPs join today was set up 13 days before Jeremy Corbyn tabled his amendment to hold a 2nd Referendum on a Labour Brexit Deal. We wondered why they were so livid when Jeremy did this, now we know. It deprived them of their chief excuse for leaving  
The Tories are bungling Brexit while Labour has set out a unifying and credible alternative plan. When millions face the misery of Universal Credit, rising crime, homelessness and poverty, now more than ever is the time to bring people together to build a better future for us all 
"I'm furious that the Labour leadership is now complicit in facilitating Brexit."MP @MikeGapes explains why he is leaving the Labour Party.Who are the Labour MPs now sitting as independents?  
Utter hypocrisy.  Chris Leslie is campaigning for second referendum.  Yet when it’s a question of him calling a by election he says the country doesn’t need to uncertainty 
Both Labour and Tories at war with themselves. Neither side offering a way out of the Brexit mess. Now a Labour split strengthens Theresa May and makes it easier for a hard-right, incompetent Tory party to stay in power.Westminster politics is fundamentally broken. 
The Labour party is deeply split, and the Conservatives are aiding and abetting a move towards No Deal. Can we really trust politicians with Brexit?No. They should #PutItToThePeople and let us have a People's Vote on the Brexit deal. 
If these Labour MPs feel unable to stay in the party, that’s a matter for them, but I can’t see how it helps to soften or stop Brexit. Labour needs more pro-Remain MPs in its ranks to help deliver party policy, not fewer. Now is the time to coalesce, not fragment. 
The #LabourSplit is not unexpected.We have seen Labour leadership missing in action in the biggest issue of our time: Brexit.Liberal Democrats are the real Brexit opposition. Join our fight now >  
All Labour & Tory MPs under deselection threat should quit, make common cause, & defeat Brexit, which is a huge threat to our country. “Labour split: Group of MPs including Luciana Berger and Chuka Umunna walk out over Brexit - The Independent  
Lab breakaway is hard-line pro-EU membership and for overturning the referendum result, I see.  
"I decided some time ago that Brexit wasn’t worth it, and should, with the express and informed consent of the British people in a suitable referendum, be binned. Embarrassing, but the right thing to do for the long term..." 
The BBC News feed of the Labour splitter press conference seems to have someone on the audio track mumbling commentary over the top. Someone just said "this is mad" and added "not going to lie, between this and Brexit we're fucked." 
“One minister from a major EU power was left so shocked after a meeting with a UK counterpart last week they concluded May is hell-bent on pushing crisis to wire in hope of last-minute concession, which will not materialize unless May narrows her Brexit demands — and quick.” 
“Some senior EU27 officials briefed by UK ministers over the past few weeks believe May is preparing to arrive at the March 21-22 European Council with a ‘menu’ of options for solving the border in a bid to force them to accept one, or wear the blame for a no-deal Brexit.” 
In EU capitals there is now mounting alarm that May has set Britain on course for a Salzburg II disaster by fundamentally misjudging how far EU leaders are prepared to bend at the last-minute summit a week before Brexit. My latest  
To the 7 MP’s - resign your seats and call by-elections to allow your constituents to elect MP’s who represent them and a party that actually stands up for them against Tory austerity and a hard Brexit. 
7 Former #labour MPs ride on to oblivion.✓ List incoherent reasons for quitting: Russia, Syria, Venezuela, Brexit, Antisemitism✓ None talks about #Poverty #InEquality #NHS #Homelessness etc as reasons for their actionsWe will rebuild & be stronger without saboteurs within 
Build a new consensus, says Chuka? When they have made clear they have no respect for the 52% who voted for Brexit. The issue that currently divides parties & the nation. And I say that as a Remain voter who has not changed his preference 
BREAKING: 7 UK lawmakers quit main opposition Labour Party over issues including Brexit, anti-Semitism.  
I fought @ChukaUmunna in the 2015 General Election. But today, I am impressed at his bravery, and that of his 6 Labour colleagues, who resigned from the Labour Party due to Corbyn's position on Brexit and the party's antisemitism. Work with us @LibDems to deliver a fairer society 
Tremendous sympathy and admiration for this - and they're right about the racism and ugly politics. But... I can't overlook that they're all anti-Brexit, or the timing. This is an ultra-Remain grouping and that limits its appeal. 
I have a feeling that when I'm fifty, looking back at the moment we're living through right now – I'll be so grateful that this happened during my youth! Brexit, the implosion of both main political parties and a realignment of politics in this country. #ThingsCanOnlyGetBetter 
The Liberal Democrats are open to working with like-minded groups and individuals in order to give the people the final say on Brexit, with the option to remain in the EU. We will be engaging in talks to progress both that campaign and a wider political agenda. #LabourSplit 
It is not unexpected, or unwelcome, that a group of Labour MPs have decided to break away from Corbyn’s Labour; in part motivated by his refusal to follow the party’s policy on Brexit. #LabourSplit 
"I am furious that the Labour leadership is facilitating Brexit."  Mike Gapes MP on the #LabourSplit.The British people deserve better opposition to Brexit.Liberal Democrats are the only party dedicated to fighting Brexit. Join us today  
So there we have it - The party to split over Brexit is... Labour. This is entirely due to the leadership refusing to listen, as promised, to members or anyone who doesn't share his vision.Well done Jeremy, seriously well done. 
Gapes is brilliant. The reality is Corbyn is wrong on almost every international issue: From Brexit, to Syria, to Russia, to Venezuela. 
.@MikeGapes: 'I am furious that the Labour leadership is complicit in facilitating Brexit, which will cause so much social and economic hardship.'  #independentgroup #LabourSplit 
Mike Gapes: "I am sickened that the Labour Party is now a racist and anti-Semitic party."I am furious that the Labour leadership is complicit in facilitating Brexit."A Corbyn Labour government would threaten our national security and international alliances." 
Mike Gapes sounds devastated. He’s been a Labour member for more than 50 years and an MP since 1992. Says Labour is now a “racist” party, which is “complicit” in facilitating Brexit and Corbyn Government will “threaten our national security” 
From all these speeches, this sounds like it's much less about Brexit and much more about Corbyn. 
Mike Gapes speaking now - says he has been a member since 1968, his voice is quivering and paper shaking... he sounds the most emotional so far. “I am sickened the party is now a racist, antisemitic party, I am furious the Labour leadership is facilitating Brexit.” 
And all of them prepared to completely ignore the result of the referendum -indeed most of them have spent their time in the chamber doing everything they could to stop Brexit  
What a lucky woman Theresa May is. Just as her Govt is about to totally implode over Brexit, Labour beats her to it. Whether it’s 70 or 7 resignations, Tories odds on to win any election while the left is split. 
Chuka Umunna: was anti-2nd referendum and now champions it, called Corbyn backers ‘dogs’.Angela Smith: pro-water privatisation.Chris Leslie: lied by saying Labour could double income tax.Mike Gapes: Milk.As for Ann Coffey and Gavin Shuker I don’t have a clue. #LabourSplit 
The inevitable question now:Will Tory MPs campaigning for a second referendum join Labour colleagues in the Independence Group in the days to come?If so how many? This isn't just a problem for Jeremy Corbyn... 
And so it’s *Labour* that gets split by Brexit. Amazing, really. 
BREAKING: Seven MPs quit Labour in protest over Brexit and antisemitism  
Tone of this launch so far the worst-case scenario for Corbyn. Not boring on about Brexit, not centrist sneering but a devastating attack on the hard left from a patriotic Labour perspective 
It was inevitable, the principles & values of Labour have not been upheld over Brexit & anti-Semitism. The listening party has not been listening. It has ignored Conference Policy, but most of all, it panders to the few, not the many. #LabourSplit 
"The scale of Labour's betrayal on Brexit is clear for all to see." @ChrisLeslieMP not holding back at the #IndependentGroup launch. 
Note that in event of a no-deal Brexit, the Falklands will starve. 70% of their revenue comes from fisheries exports to the EU (much of it to Spain and Portugal). 
.@ChrisLeslieMP clearly emotional as he says he and his colleagues fought to save @UKLabour from the 'hard left' but failed. Attacks @jeremycorbyn for 'casting aside' conference policy on Brexit and #peoplesvote#LabourSplit 
i do appreciate how the libdems are such a joke that the right wing of labour said "we need a moderate, centrist, anti-brexit party" and then basically just pretended the libdems dont exist 
Well done Labour. At a time the country faces a Brexit cliff edge, with the worst ever government, you’ve decided to self indulge yourself and form a new political party. #ForTheMany 
BREAKING: Seven Labour MPs have resigned and will sit as independents, after a split over the party's Brexit policy  
If another Europe referendum(which I'd welcome) is the goal of Labour's splitters they've the timing and strategic genius of a turkey  
I usually like your stuff Owen, but a lot of us have had just about enough of Corbyn giving the Tories a free pass on Brexit. He's been absolutely useless.  He wants it as much as Gove and Boris. 
Chuka Umunna, Chris Leslie, et al will cite #Brexit and "antisemitism" to justify quitting Labour. Bullshit. They opposed Corbyn from day one. Everyone with a functioning brain knows it's about thwarted personal ambition, hatred of socialism and over-inflated egos. #LabourSplit 
Well #Brexit significantly diminishes our ability to combat #climatechange So you people should care about #StopBrexit if they want to save the planet! 
Labour split is called "The Independent Group" and has a hashtag #ChangePoliticsThe first and most important change needed: stop a disastrous Brexit! 
On the Labour Split: I cannot speak for anyone but myself, but here it is: split, don’t split, split in a million different factions, I don’t care. What I do care about is action. Brexit is 39 days away. So this split better be about the people and not individual opportunity. 
I'm on @LBC standing in for @mrjamesob from now until 1 discussing Brexit and the future of British politics. Join me and call in on 0345 60 60 973. 
Here we go again, our European ‘friends and allies’ sending warships with guns manned through our waters intimidating trade vessels.All whilst we’re still in the #EU. We await the statements of horror from Tusk and Verhoftstadt...#brexit #NoDeal #wto 
#Luxembourg has been ranked in the top three EU financial centres in 2018. Luxembourg's regulators granted 80 new licences for banks, management companies, asset managers, insurers & investment firms due to their decision to relocate because of #Brexit.   
GLOBAL: Aussie Trade Minister wants quick UK trade deal after No Deal Brexit. “I would absolutely hope that we would conclude negotiations this year.” 
I only voted for my Labour MP in the last election because she took a strong anti-Brexit stance, if she quits I would still vote for her. I like a lot of your work @OwenJones84, but you sound like partisan hack when you write stuff like this, not a journalist. 
My blog for @UKandEU on where UK labour migration is heading after Brexit: 1) more temporariness/less settlement; 2) migrant workers in most lower-paid jobs, interestingly, *not* tied to their employers; 3) many, many things yet to be decided. See  @MigObs 
BREAKING NEWS.... Brexit to be outsourced to AI. Siri to give a statement to the House. Alexa to respond. ERG represented by Babylon, the EU by Deep Blue. Check mate guaranteed by March 29. 
A no-deal Brexit will lead "virtually instantaneously" to price rises on popular food products in shops, the head of Birds Eye in the UK has warned. Managing director for the UK and Ireland says manufacturers would have to pass tariffs of up to 20% on to retailers 
US bank Citigroup in talks to buy Canary Wharf HQ for £1.2 billion. Huge vote of confidence in Brexit Britain.  
We need an immediate extension or revocation of Article 50, and we need a Mueller type investigation of the crimes and cover-up. What would happen to our democracy if after #brexit it was found that it had been obtained by crime and a cover-up orchestrated from the top? 
@BBCPolitics still seems to be treating Brexit as a game. With less than 40 days to go.What serious broadcaster would invite Brendan O’Neill on to discuss anything?  
Labour splitters quitting in protest at Brexit to call themselves... checks notes... The Independence Group  
Sovranisti in ritirata alla luce della Brexit: Sweden’s Left party, that has campaigned against EU membership for almost 3 decades, this weekend ditched its support for Swexit. Sweden’s far-right party also dropped its pledge to hold an EU referendum 
Splitters are about to form a new party, so question them on what their policies will be.They’ll just attack Corbyn and be anti-Brexit - that’s all.You can’t build a vision for the country just by opposing.Ask them about austerity, education etc.NO vision. #LabourSplit 
Thank you to Euronews for sharing my view on the Good Friday Agreement, Brexit & IdentityAll three categories of citizenship that the people of NI are entitled to are now facing different degrees of inequality - a breach that risks the GFA #Brexit 
68. Wakefield Rd, Bradford"In a 52-48 referendum this would be unfinished business by a long way." - @Nigel_Farage 
This *should* be the Brexit story of the day! "The committee estimates that the state-controlled channels RT and Sputnik’s pro Leave websites garnered 134 million potential impressions, nearly five times the reach of the two domestic campaigns combined." 
Why is it just the EU referendum needs confirming @sarahwollaston? Why not AV, GLA, NE devolution, Wales, and Scotland too? Serious question, please, just to confirm you’re not just a #soreloser 
The UK is on the brink of a Brexit disaster - and the Labour Party is busy collapsing in on itself. Westminster, once again, proving itself incapable of standing up for Scotland’s interests #BrexitShambles 
BREAKING: Deal with FG could end if there is a Brexit deal, Willie O'Dea warns.Which means I should probably stick this photo on Twitter.Again.No, I don't really have a reason, but still . . .  
Should the SNP remove our MPs from Westminster if the British Gov refuse Scotland a Independence referendum? 
The obvious question for Labour MPs quitting the party today is: why now? You don’t like Corbyn’s antisemitic friends/Brexit support/incompetence? Fine, but why now when it’s been clear all along? 
I am quite excited at the prospect of a new party or at least a grouping that I feel more aligned to. At the moment I am Politically homeless. I would rather slide down a razor blade than vote for a Brexit supporting or enabling party. 
A sizeable chunk of Labour’s increased vote share came from Remain voters wanting to soften Brexit. Corbyn people have never really grasped that. #LabourSplit 
Is this the same 'vigorous, open and free Brexit debate' which you uninvited me from?  
Some UK Labour lawmakers to quit party over Brexit: source  
Citigroup is in talks to buy its London office for about £1.2bn, as the US bank commits its long-term HQ & future to the UK despite Brexit uncertainty; significant statement because UK expected to lose financial “passporting” rights into EU Single Market  
I’m devastated that a few Labour MP’s think it’s time to split. After 9 years of deeply damaging austerity ravaging communities across our nation and the uncertainty over Brexit, a split will only keep the Tories in power. Shame on you. 
It is pointless having a People's vote until such an inquiry has been concluded.Article 50 must be revoked.Democracy cannot be built on illegal means.We can have a Referendum after it has concluded and trigger article 50 again of leave win legally. 
Actually see this as one stage of a much bigger crisis: social change, devolution, Europe and #Brexit, social media use are buckling our politics out of shape and the shells of the old parties can't cope. There'll be more of this now, not less: new normal. 
Aaron Banks and LeaveEU cheated - this is electoral fraud of the highest order. Why have the Met Police delayed their criminal investigation? The Brexit vote is illegitimate! Article 50 should be revoked, now...  
I don’t blame the news programme for dropping me - I blame the Labour ‘splitters’ for choosing the worst possible day to announce their split. They couldn’t have helped Brexit more if they tried. 
Aussie Trade Minister: We want quick UK trade deal after No Deal Brexit  
In the shared used of data, voter profiles and targeting strategies that a deeper coordination and joint purpose can be found between the Brexit backing organisations and the Trump campaign. 
Minister @HHumphreysFG has urged businesses to contact their suppliers and service providers to get assurances about the continuity of the supply of their goods and services post #Brexit.Find out more: #BrexitReady 
AIQ worked for a host of Brexit-supporting organisations... Veterans for Britain spent £100,000 on their online ads, BeLeave £625,000 and DUP Vote to Leave £32,000. According to Jeff Silvester, these organisations approached him independently of each other. 
Theresa May must investigate ‘foreign influence and voter manipulation’ in Brexit vote, say MPs  
So can someone - anyone - explain to me the logic of spitting today? The ‘wait til after Brexit’ argument I got. 
Watching both Conservatives & Labour not even bothering to touch this issue - while the Americans investigate ties to the corrupt #brexit referendum is deeply disturbing.What will it take for the British to defend their own democracy?  
Absolutely spot on. When politicians leave their parties or completely reverse their commitments on the biggest issues of the day, they should let their constituents decide if they still have their support.Will Soubry, Ummuna & co call by-elections..? #brexit #LabourSplit 
Me for @BylineTimes on just some of the many revelations from @DamianCollins and @CommonsCMS landmark final report on Disinformation - especially what it reveals about the Trump Russia Brexit connection  
The biggest political news of the day shouldn’t be any split in Labour, it should be the report into disinformation and fake news. It won’t be, of course. Thanks, splitters, for playing exactly into the hands of those who manipulated the referendum.... 
Brexit was about cowards, running away from the EU and giving up on the fight. Brexit was about scared little public school boys storming off in a tantrum, or was un-British. MPs leaving @UKLabour because it’s easier to be alone is based on same motivation & action - #cowards! 
Any Pro-EU MP that resigns to form a new party will be aiding Brexit by reducing the Pro-EU voices in the party, we will find it harder to persuade the 20-30 pro-Brexit MPs to follow the whip. 
Care to withdraw your outrageous slurs against #Brexit supporting MPs @claireperrymp @GeorgeFreemanMP & @y_alibhai 
We were very sorry to learn of the death of @PaulFlynnMP for Newport West. We send our condolences to his wife & family. Despite his illness he travelled from South Wales to Parliament to take part in many important votes against the Government on Brexit. @RemainingKind 
True pakistani #KamalHaasan wants referendum in #Kashmir & calling PoK as #AzadKashmir !!!I am requesting anyone of politician to teach some politics to him #RemoveArticle370#PakistanAndCongress#PulwamaEncounter 
When I was growing up, if something good happened - not political - anything good - my Dad would describe it as a 'Labour Gain'.Can never turn my back on the fight to see @UKLabour win. The madness of #austerity, & how #Brexit turned out makes it all the more important. 
Yeah I don't get it. I don't get the timing. There should be credible threats to walk out of Labour unless leadership reflects members' views on referendum. But they should not actually leave until after Brexit, once chance has passed for referendum. 
Membership of the World Trade Organisation will be Britain's crash mat in the event of a no-deal Brexit. But it will not have a huge amount of padding  
"Brexit: Theresa May urges Tory MPs to unite and back deal"She says history will judge them if they don'tNo. History will judge her. She's presided over the greatest political betrayal in our historyIt won't judge her kindly 
Brexit will impact the economy here.The All-Island Dialogue last week offered an opportunity for Unionist voices to be heard but DUP and UUP declined to engage. After outrage over no Unionist voice at the New Ireland Conference, why? 
I get that they need to talk about anything but Brexit - as both are failing to protect Scotland from it and are actively enabling it - but attacking the SNP for attempting to help tackle climate change and boost Scotland’s economy, seems pretty daft. 
Thanks to @YahooNewsUK for clarifying the real reason for FlyBMI’s failure. They say Brexit was a major factor (naturally) then provide this little gem:“In 2018, Flybmi carried 522,000 passengers on 29,000 flights”. An average of just 18 passengers per flight, 37% load factor  
A spectre is haunting Britain - the spectre of a German-dominated EU. It haunts remainers and leavers, as @thatginamiller @LeadNotLeaveUK shows. It is, however, based on a myth. What we need is a better understanding of decision-making in the EU. This thread is Brexit-neutral. 
Important report on the danger of fake news & the subversion of our democracy, including in the 2016 EU referendum by all party @CommonsCMS 
If a #LabourSplit is to work & evolve we also need a #TorySplit...that really would create a new centrist momentum alongside a catalytic LibDem party.But it does not change the Parl nosWhatever the outcome...it's still of existential import that we #RevokeA50 & Stop #Brexit 
Yes! There are Benefits of #Brexit! The #ERG hedgefunding elite are already benefiting. The #DUP has benefited from taxpayer money! Putin and Trump will benefit from a divided Europe! Given we already trade globally and control our borders how will YOU Benefit? #Remain #RevokeA50 
Seen some tweets about people registering for the Brexit Party under false names.I’m as game for a laugh as anyone else, but where’s that line we all free between ethical and unethical behaviour?Cross the threshold and it all comes down faster and they win more.Please stop. 
How much more corruption needs exposure before we get an official enquiry or parliament sits up & takes note?The referendum is surrounded by so much dirt, it beggars belief that MPs & media aren't shouting from the roof-tops (with a few notable exceptions).@UKEUchallenge 
People living on the Irish border are unsure how technology will solve the Brexit deadlock, given it can take hours to e-mail documents and accessing Netflix is a nightmare  
Frankly, versus a Labour Party that has failed to oppose, indeed has actively assisted, the Tory Brexit, a split in Labour MPs is not going to make a difference either way. The UK is toast. Roll on dissolution. 
Exactly. I’ve been saying this for a while now. MPs should back Theresa May’s deal but only in exchange for a second referendum / #PeoplesVote on the deal or remain.1. It would win a parliamentary majority 2. It outflanks the ERG3. It stops the clock 
MPs call for government to examine Russian influence on Brexit - Sky News  
Late in the day! - but right: “Theresa May must investigate 'foreign influence and voter manipulation' in Brexit vote, say MPs - The Independent  
Maybe it's not about Labour? Maybe a Tory split is coming too, and they needed it to be today - so Labour is accommodating them? Maybe they've understood that we're now closer to Brexit Day than the transition time of freight to the Far East, so Something. Needs. To. Be. Done? 
#Cyprus Foreign Minister ⁦@Christodulides⁩ met this morning with #EU #Brexit Chief Negotiator ⁦@MichelBarnier⁩.⁦@CyprusMFA⁩ ⁦ 
WATCH | Conservative led Brexit... 
Good luck to the breakaway Labour MPs. If they start a new party, they’ll get my vote and, potentially, the votes of many others. Corbyn needs to understand that he won’t win an election by default. Millions of us won’t vote for a Brexit-facilitating Labour party.#r4today 
Days since referendum: 969Days till we leave: 39Agreed plans: 0  
The UK’s latest attempt to persuade Japan to agree a quick post-Brexit trade deal has backfired after officials in Tokyo reacted with dismay at British tactics  
James Cleverly & the Tories are treating the electorate with disdain. Cleverly tweeted: "The only thing that might make me change my mind is a bloke in a blue hat with yellow stars shouting ‘Stop Brexit’. Yep, that might do it." - People have genuine concerns, you cretin!  
Ordinary people: Brexit jobs food medicine future worry unclear. Scottish Labour/ScottishTories: Over here! Pay no attention to the man behind the curtain. Car parking! The hated car parking! 
Scotland based fish/shellfish suppliers D R Collin found out this week that it has not received a single permit (despite applying for SIX) which would allow it to transport its produce over to Europe after #Brexit and now wonders if they will have a business left after #Brexit  
Any Labour MP who abandons Labour this morning should resign as an MP and face a by-election. That’s if they have the courage. Any in leave seats resigning over Brexit- Labour should put up Leave candidates who support Labour and Brexit. Let’s get real Labour back. 
I’m sick & tired of hearing remain MPs on the news telling us we need to “compromise” on Brexit.These are the same people that tell us the Brexit referendum was a BINARY choice.The same MPs narrowly elected under FPTP brook no compromise on taking their seats in Parliament. 
Right in the middle of a serious discussion about Brexit, Nick Robinson gets to his real point: "Is Jeremy Corbyn fit to be Prime Minister?" #r4today Simply asking what is (in this context) an irrelevant question implies the answer might be No. We see you, Nick. We see you, BBC. 
If there is a #LabourSplit, Brexit shouldn't be the main driver. The main drivers should be the institutional anti-Semitism fostered by Corbyn and his allies, the threat they pose to Western collective security and their ambivalence about parliamentarism.  
. @peterkyle talking complete sense on @BBCr4today about the need for a confirmatory referendum. 
#Brexit: Will Brits living in the EU still get healthcare?  
The way the Brexit process has treated EU citizens living and working here is a national disgrace.  England has shown its ugliest side for all the world to see.  I am ashamed to be associated with the way we have treated our EU friends. #HandsOff our EU friends and neighbours 
Some Brexiter just told me to piss off back to Eton. I went to Mary Magdalene High School in Newark-on-Trent. The assumption of privilege simply for being anti-Brexit is so silly, especially as many of the top Brexiteers and also the PM who got us into this mess DID go to Eton. 
One big Brexit beneficiary is Dublin, where Bank of America, Citigroup and Barclays are expanding their ranks. “Dublin is our headquarters for our European bank now, full stop,” said Anne M. Finucane, vice chairwoman of Bank of America...  
Quite astonishing that @bbcnickrobinson asking Lab MP about his plan for a "confirmatory referendum" on Brexit did not ask him to clarify what the referendum question would be. Is it May deal v WTO Brexit or May deal v Remain??This is surely by far the most fundamental point. 
Good morning Twitter. A group of Labour MPs will be making a statement at 10am, which will likely be the party split we've been waiting for. As always, with less than 1000 hours till Brexit, Labour's timing couldn't be better. 
"We want to find out what was the impact of disinformation and voter manipulation on past elections including the UK referendum in 2016 and are calling on the government to launch an independent investigation" @DamianCollins calls for a Mueller-style probe 
We'd better get used to hearing what China is saying to us now: 'Brexit is not our problem, it's yours.'  
British cargo ship bound for Japan sets sail today - but the uncertainty surrounding #Brexit means its fate is unknown:  #PeoplesVote 
If the Labour party splits up these are our options.Corbyns Labour - wants to be like Venezuela so no thanks .New Labour - wants to stay in the EU so no thanks .Tories - Only pretending to leave the EU so no thanks .Pro Brexit party - wants to leave the EU so yes please 
Just landed in Brussels for a day of talks with EU Foreign Ministers. This week I’ll be travelling to visit 4 crucial European partners as well to discuss Brexit. It’s going to be busy...  
The strength of any idea is inversely proportionate to the level of dishonesty required to convince people of it. By that measure, Brexit is by some distance the worst political idea of my lifetime. 
I’m thinking that more, smaller parties might be a healthier way for British politics to progress rather than the duolithic see-saw we currently enjoy. Perhaps Brexit just underscored that.   #LabourSplit 
Britons stockpiling euros as Brexit day draws nearer  One knows when the Globalists Cartel puts out propaganda like this that the EURO is heading for a crash and they are panicking. 
Added to which what’s the value in a report that only called Brexit witness to attack and never once looked at the remain campaign? I’ll paraphrase the report - “shocking use of social media to win a campaign we lost , we are upset.....  
Hunt and Fox offend Japanese with letter saying can you please hurry up because we’ve pulled the pin out of the Brexit grenade — UK-Japan trade talks sour after letter from Hunt and Fox  
Only the workers and the poor will suffer from Brexit so if you voted for it please think again.  #StopBrexit #PeoplesVote 
INSTEAD of thinking of it as 40 days to Brexit, think of it as 50 days to a crash-diet flatter tummy. @TwopTwips 
the party because of a brexit stance that was voted on democratically by the party. A public vote is still on the table, this was in the party’s motion, and Corbyn was the ONLY MP to table an amendment to allow a public vote. What did these centralist MPs do? Voted against it 
We won the referendum & this is the longest run whine in British political history. Even you must be bored of it by now. All the so called facts are subject to legal cases where more enlighten minds will sort it out ! The Electoral commission don’t even hide there bias!  
This could be start of grand realignment - Brexit breaking our political structures - or it could explode into nothing - many in Labour Party will be absolutely furious with them, but a huge and serious decision for those who have taken it - more later 
I desperately want to stay in the EU and to have a second referendum because I think it was cruelly unfair to not allow 16/17 year olds to vote like they did in Scotland. BUT, the party voted at conference to support a soft brexit, therefore I think it’s ridiculous to leave (con) 
As our deselection campaign hits home for Tory Remoaners, our co-founder @Arron_Banks has a message for the anti-Brexit brigade: "Stop Brexit and we will do everything to stop you, now or at the next general election." Support us at  
Every country it seems is tempted to do its own Brexit, that is, to severe all links with what makes it alive & well, before it realises, alas too late, that it’s attached to the Earth just as much as England realises it was prosperous because of Europe. 
One thing is clear about the legacy of Brexit: Financial services will be spread across Europe, with no one city again dominating the financial arena as London has.  
9/... And there it is.Now it's established wisdom and the discourse around trade and Brexit gets just managed to discover a new depth of dumbness in which to dwell.I hope the extra clicks were worth it. /end 
As this illustrates perfectly when you put unionists under the microscope they run away, they have no answers .Whenever the next referendum remember this, Question the Union, Question the Unionists ! They have no answers!  
1/ Click-bait headlines are damaging the Brexit conversation. A rage thread.I woke up this morning to the news Australia was planning to "fast-track" the UK FTA.This was news to me, as I'm not aware Australia has multiple "tracks" or that one of them is faster than others. 
I don't know who's more dangerous, Anna Soubry or Shamina Begum. She has no right back here. You are out if touch with the British public and it just shows why Brexit is taking so long, you haven't got a clue!! 
Whether you agree with Labour's Brexit stance or not, they are spot on here regarding the SNP.  
Big flag in today’s DCMS report into disinformation - they’ve highlighted the extent of Russian interference in our elections and have recommended an independent investigation into Uk election 20172016 ReferendumScottish Referendum 2014. They clearly think all 3 were unsafe. 
Theresa May’s Brexit negotiations. 
Blaming #brexit is,ludicrous when their planes where ony half full (19) please tell me how #Brexit can be blamed? More like EU taxes and fuel costs. I await your answer John ....  
Some truths about BMI and Brexit with thanks to @leaversofleeds 
It’s an international embarrassment that foreign govts are the ones now investigating the criminality behind the Brexit referendum, while UK govt does nothing. At the very least the A50 process should brcsuspended while investigations are going on.  
"UK CONTINUES TO SUBSIDISE FRENCH FARMERS" - France still receives 2.5 times as much as UK from EU Agricultural budget.  #Brexit summary here: #GoWTO 
Loss making airlines, large and small, go bust all the time, Brexit or no Brexit. Alitalia has gone bust twice, but less famous ones regularly fail.  
Typical project fear in full swing, our MPs are faceless liars @ChrisLeslieMP Flybmi is owned by Sector Aviation Holdings Ltd. Here's their accounts.2014 Loss2015 Loss2016 Loss2017 Loss2018 Accounts overdue! Brexit blamed  
So @ikamalhaasan wants referendum in Kashmir!! Tere baap ka hai kya Kashmir?! Shameless traitor should be jailed for such seditious and demoralizing statements, especially when our Forces are giving up their all for Kashmir. 
The first stage of deselection is complete in Totnes as @sarahwollaston's constituents fight back over her Brexit betrayal. @TotnesCAThanks to our campaign these Remoaners are getting their comeuppance. Who will be the first to fall? Support us at  
Tory donor Crispin Odey donated almost £900,000 to various Leave campaigns. He also placed huge bets against the pound and government bonds before the referendum, and made a profit of around £220 million when the pound collapsed soon after. But he’s a Tory donor, so nobody cares. 
Theresa May must investigate ‘foreign influence and voter manipulation’ in Brexit vote, say MPs. 
We are very aware of the £25 a year Tory membership , since 10,000’s of our ex conservatives  members rejoined to get involved. The Brexit party will explode after the Tories rat on Brexit!  
Several backbenchers, who disagree with the Labour leadership over its handling of Brexit and the anti-Semitism row, are expected to break away 
Len, I’ll not take any lessons on democracy or loyalty to Labour  from you. But I will look forward to campaigning alongside you and Jeremy for a People’s Vote and a chance to protect your members and my voters from Brexit.  
There appears to be some confusion in certain quarters as to what a clean Brexit is. It is:OUT of the Customs UnionOUT of the Single MarketOUT of the jurisdiction of ECJOUT of the EAWOUT of the EU defence trapOUT of the CFPOUT of the CAPOUT into the world sealing FTAs! 
“Foreign influence, disinformation, funding, voter manipulation and the sharing of data” in the 2014 Scottish independence referendum, the 2016 EU referendum and the 2017 general election. Digital gangsters.   
I hope everyone watched John Oliver’s explanation of Brexit  tonight. I wish everybody in England could see it. 
Australia has the world #13 economy, according to the World Bank. Larger than Spain's. Australia wants a comprehensive bilateral free trade agreement with the UK. This will only be possible with a clean Brexit. 
NEW: Tory Brexit splits deepen as Sarah Wollaston and Sir Alan Duncan facing deselection votes 
After Swedish Democrats ditch policy of leaving EU, now Swedish Left party - ex Communist - does ditto. Brexit has persuaded all sorts of right and left populists that exiting EU is potty. Remember when Johnson 22.6.16 said 100s of millions European would follow  example? 
Why close co-operation with the European Union is safer for nature  #Brexit #LetNatureSing 
HISTORY WILL JUDGE MAY HARSHLYThe unnecessary crisis engulfing Britain, as we stumble unprepared towards a No Deal Brexit, was made in Downing Street. Created by a stubborn, inflexible Remainer who ignored the clearly stated instructions of the British people to leave the EU.  
This poll isn't going at all well for The Scotsman. Sample now over 40,000 and 80% voting Yes."Would you vote for Scottish independence in a second referendum?"  
"We applied for six permits, we submitted our application in October and heard back this week that we are getting zero permits." Tory Brexit, an ocean of disasters for the Scottish fishing industry:  
There is a farming spokesman on my radio telling me that a no deal Brexit will mean a tarrif of 40% on farm goods leaving the UK. He is predicting certain food items not being available in Supermarkets and a reduction in the standard of food imports. Brexit is sheer madness. 
Even the funeral pyres of our brave brothers haven't cooled n U r indulging in petty politics.Traitors like u shd be jailed.Ur remarks calling for referendum z extremely shocking n unacceptable. There should be a #completeboycott of such useless ppl. 
Australia will fast-track a trade deal with Britain in the event of a no-deal Brexit, the nation’s trade minister has pledged in a show of support to its UK allies.  
My thoughts in today’s Irish Times on how Brexit illustrates that UK has lost the capacity to manage complexity @BrigidLaffan @JoJohnsonUK @kevinhorourke @bbclaurak @hayward_katy @anandMenon1 @adamboultonSKY @SimonFraser00 @nicholaswatt @campbellclaret. 
The new party offers: No Corbyn or Corbynism  No May No ERG Not pro Brexit and the 2m+ job losses for the MANY A proper opposition at last  No pandering to racist kippers  Not dictated to by an extreme wingWhat have I missed? 
You don't have to 'recognise' it. It happened. Brexit was dropped and workplace parking was shoehorned into the spot. The Scottish Tories are contorting the proposal. The BBC is playing along.  
 UPR TV #UPRTV Mon allocution : point sur le #Brexit 
MPs have run out of time to force the government to publish details of over 320 Brexit "workstreams." - Theresa May's government has used 'blanket secrecy' to hide nearly all of its no-deal Brexit plans... #BrexitShambles #r4today 
Billionaire who backed Brexit ‘will leave UK to avoid paying £4,000,000,000 in tax’  
This is the real problem in society. Tax avoidance. It’s why nurses are visiting foodbanks & public services are collapsing. The EU’s plans to clamp down on tax avoidance are at the heart of the brexit heist. Tax is the most important issue facing humsnity  
Britain needs a day of reckoning. Brexit will provide it | Nesrine Malik  
Britain is the world's third-largest lamb exporter, and farmers will have a lot to sell if there's no Brexit trade deal  
MPs call for government to examine Russian influence on BrexitMueller+  
Latest report on Russian interference makes it clear that ‘will of the people’ was manipulated and result of EU referendum is unsound.We simply can’t go ahead with such a massive national change as Brexit on the basis of a flawed mandate and electoral criminality#StopBrexit 
I met a London-based Remainer on the plane. She was very nice, and entirely focused on #brexit being the cause of her cost of living going up as her reason for remaining.She was taking her child skiing in Switzerland. 
#KamalHaasan demanding for referendum in Kashmir is notorious! How can he think of giving option for Kashmir to chose between Ind & Pak, with the possibility of terrorists creating havoc to vote against India. Don't talk against the national interests for your vested interests. 
Along with it hold a referendum on implementing Dr. BR Amebekar's proposal of "complete transfer of population between India and Pakistan" so that India can get rid of Jihadi thugs who always bats Pakistan PoV.Get rid of traitors.Enough is Enough. 
Let's make it clear. I voted leave to be out of aCustoms Union.Single Market.Common Market.Customs alignment.Trade area.Parallel alignment.I want a "no deal" BrexitI want UK to negotiate bilateral trade agreements around the World as otherfree Nations do.Agree? 
Billionaire who backed Brexit 'will leave UK to avoid paying £4 billion in tax'  #lbc #fbpe #conservatives #labour #libdems #snp #plaidcymru #PeoplesVote #StopBrexit #brexit #itvnews #bbcnews #BBCBreakfast #gmb #Newsnight #c4news #5news #skynews #c4brexit 
Why is it people cannot see the bigger picture and what will happen when Brexit and Food Shortages Bites real hard do you honestly think people will accept it and not protest, Will things Not turn violent as their kids go hungry? 
If you are following them but they are not following you back, my friend UNFOLLOW them. You are not collecting signatures for referendum, you are making friends.RT to reach them 
Kamal Hassan wants referendum for Kashmir . The others who want it are Seperatists and Pakistan. 
#Idiot Kamal Hassan wants referendum on Kashmir.Let's have a referendum to decide whether you, Prashant Bhushan and others of your type are #Traitors or Not. As far as I am concerned You are a bloody #AntiNational and should be dealt with as such. #Kamlahasan 
Amsterdam is winning so much Brexit business that its financial regulator needs a budget boost to keep up  
"i do love to debate because i have life long tendency to be right on everything" @PaulFlynnMP on brexit  
Revoke Art.50 if there is no Brexit plan by the 25 of February SIGN THIS IMPORTANT PETITION   
Here's a thought then, @jeremycorbyn... Oppose #Brexit  
Fish processors are speaking out against a No Deal Brexit:  "We need frictionless borders. It has to be that for our industry to survive." - Graeme Sutherland, director of Whitelink Seafoods 
Brexit is Bannon.Brexit is Putin.Brexit is not British.It is time for a #PeoplesVote. 
Feb 2018:Farage’s Brexit Team ‘Mueller Interview’ over Cambridge AnalyticaAndy Wigmore, the right-hand man to Arron Banks and Nigel Farage, has admitted that he has been questioned by Mueller in regards to the TrumpRussia inquiry. By Louise Mensch 
4/60-IMHO, the most important thing @realDonaldTrump has done, is defy the #PC #ThoughtPolice & expose #Globalist corruption His 2016 speech was a YUGE #RedPill Now #WeThePeople defy the #NWO #MAGA #BREXIT #YellowVests@GrrrGraphics  
What a European education project can tell us about Brexit – podcast  
Kamal Hassan asks why are the afraid of holding a plebiscite (referendum) on J&K  
SNP’s 2014 Scotland’s Future more egregious than Brexit bus claim says Prof. Jim Gallagher. Andrew Wilson’s growth commission arithmetic not much better and his ‘soft independence’ is devolution by another name. Read it. @cultfree54 @2351onthelist @JohnLeoNo1087 @AgentP22 @BRRSC 
ICYMI: How uncertainty around #Brexit is affecting Irish border dwellers  
May issues unity plea to Tory MPs & warns 'history will judge us' if #Brexit is botched.IF???!!!It was botched from the moment you & Corbyn invoked A50 w/o Due Diligence or a bloody clue.The only plea you deserve to give is Guilty  via @PoliticsHome 
Shamima Begum is an anagram of Brexit Diversion Story. 
The Canadian link, AggregateIQ, between Brexit, Trump;and so much more. The Trinidad stuff is really bad. It’s in #TheGreatHack on Netflix soon. 
brexit is tainted by data protection law breaking that’s a big problem for britain  
Brexit and Trump were the SAME campaign. Let’s support our friends in the UK who are suffering it’s horrible effects, as we are here in the US. Pls RT. #PutItToThePeople 
When other countries refer to fake news, they mean the type of disinformation that fueled the Brexit vote and helped Trump “win” the presidency in the US. Trump misappropriated the term because he’s a manipulative SOB.  
European Union is a group of bankers. Europe is a continent of countries.Do not confuse them.The EU are the 21st century mafia.#Brexit #FREXIT #Gerxit#GiletsJaunes #YellowVestsUK 
side point, FB originally said Aleksandr Kogan signed his certification on June 24, 2016. When asked by @CommonsCMS about this date happening to be day after Brexit vote (which I publicly predicted would be material ), FB started saying Jun 11, 2016. /8 
We were so focused on Nunes that no one noticed that Putin’s favorite congressman, Dana Rohrabacher, was the head of the Foreign Affairs subcommittee on #Brexit. Brexit and Trump were the SAME campaign. We must not forget that. cc: @carolecadwalla … 
Banks and Andy Wigmore “showed complete disregard and disdain for the parliamentary process” when they walked out of a select committee hearing last June” NO @DamianCollins @CommonsCMS just your anti-brexit committee made up of remainers out to undermine Brexit. @Arron_banks 
This is important. Links the UK referendum with the Trump/Russia enquiry. All sorts of nasties coming out of the woodwork now and yet the UK goverment and MSM continues to ignore the evidence. Smells like corruption all the way to No10 
For #WallStreet #Banks in #London, It’s Moving Time  #fintech #brexit @amietsang @MattGoldstein26 @cgledhill @BarkowConsult @JimMarous @KMcDSAP @UrsBolt @Visible_Banking @JeroenBartelse @jaypalter @leimer @psb_dc @AntonioSelas @stratorob @FintechCH 
“Democracy is at risk from the malicious and relentless targeting of citizens with disinformation and personalised ‘dark adverts’ from unidentifiable sources, delivered through the major social media platforms we use every day." 
This could change EVERYTHING. Brexit. Populism. Climate change. Elections. Social media. Press freedom. Everything.A lot is happening in the world, but this - and I urge you to read it, not just the headline - feels very much like a huge event.  
I’ve repeatedly said that Zuckerberg & FB are threats to our national security.FB has been a huge purveyor of fake news, & influenced the 2016 election & Brexit vote.They’ve since been busy spreading anti-vax misinformation. They must be held culpable. 
Might we see the trickle of deserters become a flood, especially as the prospect of a no deal Brexit draws ever nearer? The next few days could be mighty interesting! 
Great to meet @BoysBreunion @rockforeurope in my pro-EU city of Liverpool where #music is a thriving industry that relies on Freedom of Movement. Our creative and cultural industries will be devastated by Brexit so time for a #peoplesvote #StopBrexit 
Theresa May must investigate ‘foreign influence and voter manipulation’ in Brexit vote, say MPs  
MPs call for government to examine Russian influence on Brexit  
Germany warns it will stop extradition of its citizens to UK after Brexit: FT  
These yellow vesters are nasty, bellicose, ignorant fools. If Brexit happens, hard or soft, they’ll really suffer. Abandoned by their posh white ERG masters (enjoying sunlit uplands) to spin in a hellish vortex of nationalist hatred, never understanding how they were used.  
If one wants a measure of the quality of the intellect of our current crop of MPs, just look at the individuals who think that what the UK really needs is yet another pro-Remain Blairism MK2 outfit, an ideology that has been done to death and lost the 2016 referendum. Real smart. 
Change in the law regarding donations via Northern Ireland - with particular reference to a Brexit referendum donation  
Because you unutterable twit it is much reduced access and runs out midnight on New Year’s Eve.Catch up.  You just make yourself look even more incompetent that you did as Brexit Sec of State, and that is a hard act to follow. pic.twitter.com/AOvEM12cTb 
Maintain EU electrical safety standards after Brexit, ministers urged  
Why would they need to hide it if it's really the land of milk and honey they're promising it to be........unless they're lying - again!Theresa May's government accused of hiding its Brexit preparations  
If I were a cynic I’d immediately think of #Brexit and the looming need for a sugar daddy after March 29th  
Come on @AndrewMarr9, you need to get your head out of the Westminster bubble. The grassroots battle against #brexit is going on all over the country. And it's our grassroots efforts that have prompted many pro-EU MPs to stand up and be counted. 
When #MPs say they want to take #NoDeal off the table, they really mean they want to take #Brexit off the table. No Deal is the only remaining option that adheres to what we voted for in 2016: a clean break from the #EU. Kill No Deal and you kill Brexit!  
Paul Flynn MP (LAB, Newport West) has sadly died.A by-election will take place in due course. In 2017, the result was LAB 52%, CON 39%, UKIP 3%, PLC 2%, LDM 2%, GRN 1%.I would expect a LAB hold, but the by-election will likely be around Brexit time, so who knows. 
If Labour had the backbone to stand with the SNP against the Tories and Brexit they might have a chance of getting into governmentUnfortunately Labour and Corbyn both suffer from absolute hatred of anyone North of the Border improving things  
can't fucking wait for my post-Brexit martinis but instead of martinis they'll just be straight Bacardi with a nice lil' slice of turnip  
So they'll stand in seats where nobody's heard of them or their party, with their only claim to fame being that they spent 3 years attacking the leader of their former party & their only policies being they hate Corbyn & are anti-BrexitWhere LibDem already have candidatesGenius 
Someone should ask the @scotlibdems whether they back #Brexit or #Indyref2Because they'll have to pick a side. It's simple really,  we stay in the UK out of the EU and at the mercy of Tory England or remain in the EU and get a genuine say in any decisions. 
Donald Trump has given Britain a massive boost by declaring that trade between the UK and the US will be very substantially increased after Brexit. BUT this will only be possible if we are out of the customs union and able to strike free trade deals!  
This ISIS girl story is an absolute Brexit wet dream x 
@VesperUK  Further proof that "brexit" is now simply a  major criminal fraud against the people of the UK . We have the misfortune that both May and Corbyn are part of that fraud , making their joint criminality that much harder to deal with, and May is "protected" by the Police 
Just thought that you should all be aware of this as we are doing everything we can to stop brexit. No one has been given mandate to take us out of EU, not Mrs May nor Mr Corbyn. Neither of them have acknowledged the country’s call for People’s Vote. Selfish leaders of 2 party UK  
Senior Conservative under fire after dismissing march for fresh Brexit referendum as ‘desperate stuff’  
3/ At the moment the UK Govt's only action is to push through the Immigration Bill which will remove our rights. Remove our rights without any adequate mitigating legal measures to protect us EU citizens in case of a no deal Brexit./end 
1/ Oh, we missed this gem. The British ambassador to Germany telling German @ardmoma viewers that the #citizensrights of us EU citizens in the UK are guaranteed even in case of a no deal Brexit. Maybe he should have read our myth buster before making such claims...  
What was it McDonnell said?? We're keeping the party together over Brexit ... we've kept a public vote on the table ... it might come about  ... there's no reason to split over this ... UTTER BOLLOX, JOHN!! 
If as appears likely there is a cover-up orchestrated by Number 10 of electoral crime by government ministers, and this were exposed after #brexit what would the remedy? How could we right the wrong done to the country?  #PeoplesVote 
It strikes me, Corbyn & McDonnell are 'dealing with' the likely split, with same lack of effect as they’ve shown in tackling anti-Semitism, & as incoherently as they’ve dealt with #Brexit. Corbynism is curious mix of populist nationalism & incompetence.  
Merkel turns SCREW: Germany vows to BLOCK extradition of nationals to UK post-Brexit  
Just in case anyone forgets about how pitiful Corbyn was during the referendum campaign.  
Interesting! Authorities across #Europe PREPARING for 29March #Brexit.IT'S NOW A MANAGED #WTOBrexit - Whatever huffing + puffing they try for #BRINO a, b....- WE SAY March29 NO LATER#YellowVests #France have been burning #EU flags#YellowVestsUK #BePrepared#WhateverItTakes 
Just remember, if you're horrified about the Labour leadership's failure to tackle antisemitism and weakness on Brexit your possible desire to leave is INVALID if you support something that, um, happened in 1989 
“When MPs say they want to take No Deal off the table, they really mean they want to take Brexit off the table. No Deal is the only remaining option that adheres to what we voted for in 2016: a clean break from the EU. Kill No Deal and you kill Brexit.”-  Brendan O’Neill on Sky 
Almost 40% in Scotland voted to leave the EU. Meet the minority who voted for Brexit  
UNITED KINGDOM: Airbus vice president says no-deal Brexit would be 'absolute catastrophic' for the company. 
Margaret Beckett has “come round to the no Brexit option”?  But we voted for Brexit in 2016. And we’ve legislated for it to happen on March 29th. So we don’t have a “no Brexit option”.  
Germany to Stop Extraditing Citizens to U.K. After Brexit: FT 
Spitting Image creator calls for TV show comeback to spit in the face of Brexit 
So Brexit is good for jobs.....But only if you live in Amsterdam  
Petition: Hold a second referendum on EU membership.  
Irish backstop can't be changed for Brexit deal - Estonian president  
@DamianCollins @tom_watson @eucopresident Hard to understand why May, Corbyn et al support the sheer criminality of "brexit".  Putin seems to be a key mover in all this , but it is difficult to see EXACTLY how he controls both May and Corbyn to follow his anti-EU anti-UK plans 
I see from Twitter that Hartley-Brewer and Quentin Letts are skiing. Meanwhile the anti-Brexit elite have to get up and go to work tomorrow morning. Good night. 
Once again, wee Willie 'what's his name' make a total dick of himself!!!Brexit turmoil has dealt ‘damaging blow’ to SNP’s independence hopes, says Willie Rennie  
Splitters are about to form a new party, so let’s question them on what their policies will be.They’ll just attack Corbyn and be anti-Brexit - that’s all.You can’t build a vision for the country just by opposing.Ask them about austerity, education etc.They have NO vision. 
Back in Brussels this evening. Meeting @MichelBarnier to discuss #Brexit in the morning after a Foreign Affairs Council meeting. Busy week ahead.... 
Airbus warns of no-deal Brexit, says has spent tens of millions preparing  
Opinion: A no-deal Brexit would destroy UK science – and this is how  
*POLL* How would you vote if the rumours were true and a New Anti #Brexit Centrist Party AND a New Pro Brexit Party formed?Retweet for a Larger Sample!#PeoplesVote #StandUp4Brexit #FinalSay #WTOBrexit #FBPE #WTOLetsGo #StopBrexit #NoDealNoProblem #BrexitChaos #BrexitBetrayal 
In the months before the referendum vote I watched how dismissive the EU was of David Cameron asking for concessions to in effect placate UK voters to vote Remain, this killed any hope I had of future EU reform! #BrexitDeabte 
Brexit uncertainty is causing sluggish growth.GDP data shows declining business investment and low economic growth.A managed WTO Brexit ends business uncertainty more quickly than any other option, and that is what business wants.#LetsGoWTO 
Why Britain Needs Its Own Mueller | by Carole Cadwalladr | NYR Daily | The New York Review of Books“Brexit, Wigmore explained, was the “petri dish” for Trump”  
It's now clear, there is no type of #Brexit that will satisfy the 52%. It's unlikely that any type of #Brexit will satisfy more than about 20%. Conversely, the 48% still want to #Remain and this is now probably closer to 60%. It's a no brainer. We must #RevokeArticle50 ASAP. 
Most Brexit voters did vote to be poorer for the first couple of years and we might have 0.5% to 1% less growth. However having your full control of your trade policy, laws and regulations would make us much better of after the 1st 2 years. Brexit wasn't just for Xmas!!!!!!  
The type of remainer who's waiting for a plan that Brexit campaigners  should have had in place before triggering Article 50 at the very latest... given they've been whingeing about leaving the EU for 40 years ... and are still whingeing! #wherestheplan Kate?#specialplace 
"The day of my birthday the Home Office rejected my 1st application for a permanent residence" - Thanks @alexandrabulat - @the3million's Young Europeans Chair, for your interview to @thebrexitfilm #Brexit #Brexitdocumentary #EUcitizenrights 
Every time you think the Brexit brigade can't get any more daft, they go out of their way to surprise you. Latest exibit: Quentin Letts, who elected to tell the whole world that he doesn't understand Schengen.  
Facebook are ‘digital gangsters’-Company must be subject to statutory regulation -Need urgent inquiry in #Brexit referendum -Devastating Parliament reportTomorrow’s Guardian  
Interesting the Scots Tories are upset about a car park tax, that, if even implemented, will cost at most £500, when they wholeheartedly support Brexit which will sting every Scottish citizen by at least £2000 a year. 
 If Labour can’t beat the Tories after creating this current Brexit catastrophe, just wait until a new Labour centrist party splits their vote. 
Before the referendum, Phillip Lee promised that if the vote was to Leave he would deliver on the result.Now he's chairing a campaign for a second referendum.  #RightTheFirstTime 
I have just spent the last 10 minutes listening to a man on the DLR trying to explain the legalities of the single market to his mate, and getting it spectacularly wrong. It’s amazing that #Brexit was ever put into the hands of the people. 
39 days until Brexit. Apparently that's the gestational period of a ferret. 
I suspect they do mate. It's Corbyn's lack of leadership ability & his facilitation of #Brexit that most of us "undecided voters" are struggling with. 
Brexit SHOCK: Economists claim UK should NOT have negotiated with Jean-Claude Juncker. Certainly Should Not have Used Eurofanatic Olly Robbins!  
Brexit leaders who are quitting UK  
Brexit scaremongers are red-faced as EU chiefs ensure UK transport links will be maintained under new measures  
Apparently the new so-called “centrist” party is being launched! Which MP is defecting first? Anti-equal marriage Gavin Shuker? Expense cheat pro-water privatisation Angela Smith? Chuka Umunna, former opponent of a second referendum who describes people as “trash”? Stay tuned! 
Maybe they are the type of Remainer that has been sacked from Flybmi or Schaeffler or a whole host of firms because of Brexit.  As Remainers, they recognised the damage of Brexit and expected support, not derision, from a Labour MP. Still laughing Kate? 
A reminder of the perennial truth that you could cancel Brexit tomorrow and not one single person who voted for it would know that you'd done it for the simple reason that Brexit as a reality is and always was profoundly irrelevant to their lives. 
.@BBCRadio4 broadcasting a programme on conspiracy theories...And they just described... 1) Remainers believing the economy went badly after the Brexit vote 2) Remainers who believe there was Russian interference in the Brexit vote...as "conspiracy theories"FFS @BBC. 
France denies it has softened stance on Brexit  
Memo to Sarah Wollaston: Does it never occur to you that millions of “moderate, centre ground voters” voted to leave the EU? Have you forgotten your pledge to deliver Brexit? 
No you shouldn’t you’re an elected public servant taking the piss out of the majority of your constituents. Many of whom are terrified at the prospect of Brexit. Not big. Not clever. And history will judge you 
The real problem we have with Brexit is that everyone who wants to can get away with believing there were no Leave Crimes, no Russian collusion because the Government, the Labour leadership , the BBC and the Met have conspired in the cover up.That’s what fucking hurts! 
Two more senior Tory MPs face deselection votesAlan Duncan, who said Brexit vote was a 'tantrum' by the British working classWollaston, the second vote campaigner who defected from the Leave campaignBoth represent Leave constituencies via @Telegraph 
So May is spending the next few days attempting to woo individual EU leaders to try and gain concessions.Still doesn't realise the EU speak as one. More time spent running down the clock to achieve bugger all.#StopBrexitSaveBritain#Brexit 
As we say in our letter, Mr. @EP_President @Antonio_Tajani, as lawyers deeply committed to rights and freedoms, to express our displeasure at, and deep rejection of, the decision to ban the conference "Catalonia and the trial on the referendum: a challenge for the EU" by the  
This isn't news or 'punishment', but the operation of the German constitution as regards extradition of German citizens to non-EU States. (Some Leavers said to me during the referendum "you can't be sure the Germans won't amend their constitution". Hey ho).  
Germany will stop the extradition of its citizens to the UK  after Brexit, even if the UK leaves the EU with a deal.Germany has strict limits to the extradition of its nationals.Allowed only under the EU Arrest Warrant, or to an international court. 
Disappointing that the Daily Telegraph should characterise as "moderate" those MPs who refuse to accept the referendum result!  
People are saying that the 23rd March protest is too late to stop Brexit.Yes, I would have preferred one much sooner.But even if it's less than a million to one shot, I will be there. You should be too. Never, ever give up. 
Theresa May's government accused of hiding its Brexit preparations>This should concern us all but is getting very little attention at present. A potential govt #clusterfcuk of ‘Grayling’ to the power ten proportions. Thanks to ⁦@julie4nw⁩   
It is staggering how many right wing idiots are falling over themselves to condemn last week's student climate protests. It's the only issue that eclipses Brexit in long-term importance.  
Ratcliffe, epitomises the true Brexit;  the low tax, small state, deregulated off the shores of Europe dystopian nightmare 17 million are about to wake up to. 
And a very strange one at that. People who refuse to implement referendum and disowning manifestos they stood on. Moderate - no. Duplicitous - Yes 
Amsterdam is winning so much Brexit business that its financial regulator needs a budget boost to keep up  
Although I support the tireless campaigning work of Tory Remain MPs like @sarahwollaston, Anna Soubry, & Dominic Grieve, they must be reminded that it was Thatcherism and Reaganomics that led to the finanicial crash, and subsequent Tory austerity that fuelled the #Brexit vote 
The Government is hiding the details of 320 different Brexit workstreams, rebuffing repeated FOIs and other attempts at forcing disclosure. Literally unprecedented lack of transparency.  
Morten Morland on #Brexit #FinalSay #PeoplesVote #PoliticalCartoon #Satire #BrexitShambles #BrexitChaos #BrexitDeal #Brexit - political cartoon gallery in London  
Germany warns it will stop extradition of its citizens to UK after Brexit: FT  
Brits deserve a Putin-free BREXIT vote. Even if first BREXIT referendum was unbridled democracy (it wasn't), a second vote now would hardly be disrespectful. Ppl are entitled to change their minds in democracies. In legal circles, we call that amending the contract.  
Brexit: "Look how weak, poor, pathetic, powerless and disenfranchised we can make ourselves. Soon every country in the EU will want to be as weak, poor, pathetic, powerless and disenfranchised as we are. Who wouldn't? We're ready to take on the world." 
David Lammy says the Met’s delay over its failure to decide whether leading Brexiters should be subject to a criminal investigation over referendum illegality.“smells more and more like it could be a cover-up from the very top”.#BrexitGate #Brexit 
Tomorrow's front page: Ian Blackford calls Theresa May a 'Brexit backpacker' and others warn she is wasting time as she prepares for yet another trip to Brussels + @carolynleckie on a lack of British tolerance toward Shamima Begum 
41 days to #StopBrexit - & curry vote swings remain! People realising they “swallowed Brexit lies” of Johnson, Mogg & hard right: respect for publicly admitting you were tricked!Demand a #FinalSay #PeoplesVote w #OptionToRemainTime to #LeadNotLeave 
Better stop Brexit then.....  
“We shall enter a federation which is composed in an entirely different way. I do not say it is the wrong way. But it is not our way.”#Labour’s Clement Attlee on the British application to join the European Common Market, 1962. #Brexit  
So, David Cameron decided a referendum on the UK's membership of the EU would heal the divisions in the Tory Party once and for all. But, within three years of his EURef, the divisions have never been greater and the far right now controls the party. And Cameron has "no regrets"! 
I hope so. Progressives, moderates, social democrats & liberals, who all support rational evidence-based decision making, need to fight back against the dogmatists & zealots who've seized control of Labour & Tory parties.#Brexit is a symptom; causes are populism & nationalism.  
A no-deal Brexit could mean Britain loses access to all the countries with which the EU has signed trade deals, such as Canada, Japan and Mexico  
‘Why on earth did you risk this?’ @jonsnowC4 to @David_Cameron during referendum campaign. Maybe the best question a journalist ever asked. 
Philip Hammond is a fifth columnist, doing all he can to help the EU and undermine government Brexit negotiations.His efforts to reverse Brexit include “laying the ground-work” for a second Brexit referendum in cahoots with a number of Tory aides. 
Trade in services after Brexit: @uk_tpo explains implications of May's Brexit plan:    This is why both our @UKandEU and UK govt's own analysis show large economic losses even with customs union & FTA. 
Opinion: We stand on the brink of a historic, national collapse – it’s time to take to the streets to stop Brexit  
Tories unveil their Brexit negotiating team....  
Six pro-Brexit protesters charged after London 'yellow vest' march - 6 Brexit protesters march, 6 arrests. 700,000 pro Remain protesters march, no arrests, lots of cake!  
Inflation down, wages up as Brexit approaches  
MOVING UP to 354,000 Signatures . This Petition is NOT a "Dead Parrot" Brexit could still be in the BALANCE . So SIGN TWEET PHONE a FRIEND . Please do NOT IGNORE  .Petition: Leave the EU without a deal in March 2019.  
The ERG want Theresa May to stand down as Prime Minister as the price for backing her Brexit dealThey are rightly opposed to May taking charge of the next phase of negotiations, to thrash out a trade deal with the bloc.She is a hopeless negotiator 
The Bad Boys of Brexit pic.twitter.com/FUmWZ4QgIz 
C4: "What swayed you?"The racist dumb fuck Dave: "Well the freedom of movement in Europe for the proper Europeans like us"Romanians & Bulgarians obviously not proper Europeans.Brexit IS racism.Why racist Farage is not in jail is beyond me?I blame BBC!  
968 days since the referendum939 hours until BrexitHow nuts is that?! 
.@flybmi blame "Brexit uncertainty" for it's collapse.Meanwhile the company has made losses over the last 5 years of the following:2013: - £4.5m2014: - £11.5m2015: - £10.9m2016: - £700,0002017: - £4mThey blame Brexit. Yet company losses before the referendum are telling!  
More excellent work in @SunScotNational by @MichelleThomson & @RogMull at @ChangeLtd analysing the cost of #Brexit particularly for business  
And Kaiser testified how Nige’s #Brexit buddies stole her plan and set up a data op at Ole MS #BigDataDolphins WHY did you help foreigners set up a political data op at a U.S. university, Gov @PhilBryant? Oh that’s right, you and Bannon hooked Trump up with Farage. 
James Dyson, Jacob Rees-Mogg and Jim Ratcliffe like to say how great Brexit will be for business.... ....as they take their business to Singapore, Dublin and Monaco. 
Adds “mid-life crises” to lengthening list of “things which will be more expensive after Brexit” 
I'm all for political disagreements and debating issues. But when an elected MP lies, doing it so nonchalantly, it's just disgusting.The SNP has had the same position on Brexit since before the referendum: opposing it, because it damages Scotland's people and economy. Simple.  
Working class lad who saw at first hand the devastation to jobs, families and communities that Thatcherism brought to Liverpool. Fighting Tory Brexit with all my heart and disgusted at frauds like you disguised as a Labour MP and facilitating a generation of austerity. 
Please God if there is another referendum let’s not have any of the people who screwed up the last one - @wdjstraw etc - anywhere near it. 
BIG NEWS: Westminster will urge investigation into election interference.Still respecting the 2016 referendum result? @TheresaMay @JeremyCorbyn @Keir_StarmerAs a basis for decision-making, it is fatally shattered.#StopBrexit #RevokeA50 
Discussing Brexit and champagne with David Garmston.  
Brexit and 2016 US election are two sides of the same coin: hostile intelligence services teaming up with transnational organized crime to literally undo the post-WWII world order.No accident indeed.  
The #Referendum on #Cuba's new #Constitution continues this Sunday in several countries, an exercise in which diplomats, cooperators and students already voted in over 100 nations on Saturday, February 16 | via  | @CubaMINREX #YoVotoSí 
Brexit Britain VICTORY as Australia pledge to FAST-TRACK UK trade deal in event of no-deal  
This final report of parliament's inquiry into fake news could be critical context for @UKEUchallenge in Court of Appeal for permission hearing on 21 Feb 2019. Challenging the PMs decisions to pursue Brexit despite the evidence of lawbreaking and criminality. #StopBrexit 
I see Guinness has no concerns about Brexit (via Belfast Newsletter)  
Margaret Beckett - Theresa May gave us 3 options:-1. #NoDeal2. My deal3. No #brexitI've come round to the no brexit option.#marr #Ridge #PeoplesVote #FinalSay 
Hi, Doug.  Yes, Julie also told me I should 'get over it'.  But I'm still basking in the referendum victory of 1975.  67% for 'in'!!! 
Brexit is it @ChrisLeslieMP ? Flybmi is owned by Sector Aviation Holdings Ltd. Here's the bottom line of their accounts (year ending):2014 Loss2015 Loss2016 Loss2017 Loss2018 Accounts overdue! 
Are there any business owners that can say, at present, that Brexit is helping their business? 
Britain's political classes need something to sharpen their minds on Brexit. The country's economy has just provided it (via @bopinion) 
Prepare yourselves, bigots! The Brexit apocalypse is coming. But there is hope. For a mere £250, you can learn how to eat dog food. There will also be self defence classes, so you can protect yourself from Tommy Robinson (not his real name) and his Nazis. 
As if Brexit couldn’t get any worse. It’s when it hits you personally that it hurts most.  
The centrist third party is starting to feel like one of those movies where so much of the plot is in the trailers that no one actually goes to see it. ‘Chuka splitting over Brexit? Didn’t that already... no, no wait, that was just the in-depth broadsheet preview’ 
Number of nurses leaving the NHS almost *triples.* The NHS is already 40,000 nurses short.Brexit is set to worsen this. #PutItToThePeople #PeoplesVote #peoplesvotemarch 
A tiny group of Umunnaites are planning to split from the Labour Party very soon. They’ll claim Jeremy betrayed the Motion agreed at Party Conference on a 2nd Referendum. This is a verifiable lie. Left is the Conference Motion. On the right is Jeremy’s Amendment tabled 29.01.19  
This is because of Brexit, Diane. Do you see now why so many, many Remainers are so passionate about stopping the lunacy that is Brexit? Brexit is a danger to our way of life. The Labour Party should be at the forefront of the battle to stop Brexit and May. Help us 
Another lesson to an excitable British commentariat. Unnamed EU, French, German etc #brexit sources carry little muster, a lesson for certain Irish commentators too......  
The Royal Mint release the new post-Brexit notes.  
Do we? Because of events in Belgium? Doesn’t follow at all. Anyway, biggest threat to security of the UK is Brexit, which you are supporting 
BREAKING: THE SUN ON SUNDAY BACKS NO DEALNo deal Brexit would be far smoother than the project fear lies   
Worst part of PM May's deal and Mr Corbyn's Soft BREXIT deals are UK cannot trade on any World Trade Deals it makes without the undemocratic EU's permission during the whole of the ( never ending ) Transition.Keeping that FACT very quite aren't they? Let's go WTO.  
No? Really? I’m shocked to think that someone involved with Brexit was economical with the truth. Any minute now we will find we can’t have our cake and eat it. Or that the sunlit uplands and the easiest trade deal are not real ... (contd for years)  
9/ Shall we judge for repeatedly lying about a Brexit dividend when her own government analysis shows every form of Brexit leaves the UK worse off? 
Berlin delivers Brexit extradition warning  
This is BIG for both the #Brexit sh#t show and the Trump sh#t show. I can’t believe it’s taken this long.  
France denies it has softened stance on Brexit  
Brexit won't affect European security cooperation, say intelligence chiefs  via @CityAM 
US Liberals & Neocons teamed up with UK/EU friendly conservatives. They used Silicon Valley to create the Russian bot hysteria. All to stop Brexit and fight Donald Trump. #SpyGate#RussiaGate#Propagnda 
Packed room, standing room only in Wilmslow this afternoon for Andrew Adonis’s talk about #Brexit and why, with Parliament in deadlock Mrs May will eventually have to #PutItToThePeople. Thanks to everyone who attended. See you in London on 23/3/19 @EUmoveMACC @Wilmslow4Europe 
Prediction: the EU will do what it usually does and strike a last-minute deal. Meanwhile, the U.K. government will secure a half-hearted #Brexit whose main “virtue” is that it has Leavers and Remainers grumbling in equal measure. 
Brexit Britain VICTORY as Australia pledge to FAST-TRACK UK trade deal in event of no-deal | Politics | News |  
Opinion: Marching for a second referendum could give us the Brexit clarity we need.@bremaininspain are going to march as if our lives depended on it, which, in a way, they do. 
The 44% (who still think Brexit's a good idea) every time another company leaves the UK or goes bust.  
The only other meeting between the march and Brexit Day is a Transport Ministers' Informal. They're not going to agree an Art50 extension there. How else can leaders discuss and agree? Email? WhatsApp? Heads of State and Govt don't fly in at the drop of a hat. 
Why is it that it those who have been campaigning for #Brexit, are leaving the UK or moving their business overseas? One thing looks likely by their cynical actions; is that frankly they don’t give a damn about these islands nor the deep damage caused#brexit @theSNP #BrexitChaos 
This is it guys. We can finish Brexit.Stand up and fight for it. Bring your friends. Bring your family and neighbours, bring work colleagues, bring your pets! We can do this.#PutItToThePeople #PeoplesVote #PeoplesVotemarch #PeoplesVoteNow #FBPE #StopBrexit 
2-MINUTE VIDEO: What @Jacob_Rees_Mogg said in response to the #MaroonJumperWoman on #BBCQT. She said how #Brexit is ruining her business and Britain. He said … a load of rubbish. Watch and share. #FinalSay #PeoplesVote 
UK lorries and planes WILL be allowed into EU after a no deal Brexit 
Just over a month ago and Brexit is obviously still an issue of national emergency and the Govt is obviously still useless. Still, enjoyed speaking to @CarolineLucas about what can be done & the solution remains the same #PeoplesVote 
Much has been said about how brexit is the betrayal of the young by the old. I cannot help feeling that it is also a betrayal of her and so many others of her generation. They inherited a Europe that was ravaged and deeply divided. And they built something beautiful in its place. 
A fascinating interview with #humanrights/freedom activist @RosaMariaPaya/@CUBADECIDE founder in Pulso Dominical/@RadioEducacion (3:30pm #Miami time) on the constitutional referendum in #Cuba on #24F#YoVotoNO #Ni1Mas #Mexico 
As plenty of people have been sharing stories about Brexit may affect their lives I would like to share one from my family. 
The most expensive apartment in #Paris sold for $44mn to an unidentified 'industrialist' who is reportedly leaving Britain because of #Brexit  
Britain's businesses are about to head into a post-Brexit world without knowing what it looks like  
Heathrow CEO John Holland-Kaye: Planes will fly even in 'worst-case' Brexit scenario.RyanAir are also planning 23 new routes at four UK airports this summer and a $300m investment to open a 14th base at Southend Airport from March 2019 - despite Brexit.#BBCQT 
unless brexit gets stopped this will happen. Corbyn and co making it impossible for many of their MP’s to stay in the party.New poll shows Labour and Tories on 37% BUT 59% of thise polled said they would bote for a new centrist party.We are sick to death of the “old two”. 
Brexit should be put on hold until we know what the hell went on... between Russia, Cambridge Analytica, Steve Bannon, Leave EU, Vote Leave, Farage and Wikileaks. Until Mueller finishes his report we won't know, as the UK government is doing nothing to unearth this  
Except more people want a hard Brexit than a second referendum ... a view that is growing as fast as support for a second referendum is decreasing...  
Airbus warns of no-deal Brexit, says has spent tens of millions preparing  
I've raised a petition on  proposing a referedum to decide whether to hold a 2nd Brexit referendum.  I need 5 people to accept and respond to an email link for the proposal to go public.  DM me if you're in favour and I'll email the link to you 
Brexit Britain VICTORY as Australia pledge to FAST-TRACK UK trade deal in event of no-deal  
Would you vote for Scottish independence in a second referendum?  Poll goes tits up for the Brit sponsored Scotsman propaganda rag 80% Yes at 1900hrs 17th feb 2019. watch the poll disappear soon as its not going the BritNats way lol 
Brexit supporters:Tommy RobinsonKatie HopkinsChopeToby YoungDorriesGoddardQuentin LettsAll right-wing extremists, so why does anyone support their version of Brexit?Just asking.#PutItToThePeople 
You be certain that @theresa_may has no intention of ensuring the "back stop" is removed from her toxic #WithdrawalAgreement She is simply playing for time, using fear of a WTO Brexit to gain Labour support. She has put the Con into Conservative 
Are you looking for me, on April 6th you’ll find me and @ken4london #TheOutsiders in #Manchester #TheDanceHouse shooting the breeze about history politics and life. Our lives, and yours. Tickets:  #Corbyn #Brexit #Labour #socialism #Palestine #Venezuela 
At @FinalSayForAll, we fight for the rights of #The5Million disenfranchised citizens. We’ve filmed and collected many moving stories about the personal impacts of Brexit. Our aim is to disseminate them, especially to those who can bring about change.   /3 
Like Wilson Pickett, we're going to wait 'till the midnight hour when the @CommonsCMS publish their final report into fake news; hoping it shines a light on the many outstanding mysteries concerning LeaveEU, Cambridge Analytica, Big Data and AI. Here's just a few of them....... 
Brexit. 
This is massive. The 2016 Referendum and triggering of #article50 was fraught with illegality. So much more will emerge. #StopBrexit 
Our Defence Secretary is still at a mental age where learning supposedly comes easily. Hopefully he took away from the Munich Security Conference #MSC2019 the realisation that #Brexit is pretty much the worst thing we can do in the current geopolitical situation.#RevokeA50 
I voted no in 2014, I think Scotland is better off in a union. But, Brexit changes the whole landscape of risk, it will kill the UK as Ireland reunites and I see an independent Scotland joining an FTA with them before full EUnion membership.Listening @AndrewBowieMP? 
Brexit trial, 2025.  
With the *very* small difference that Tory membership costs £25 a year. And anyone can sign up for Brexit Party with an email address. As I have just done. Doesn’t mean I want Farage as PM (I don’t)  
Irish backstop can't be changed for Brexit deal - Estonian president  
Tinpot Theresa.There's something more to this than meets the eye.To go from "We need the EU", to 'Brexit, no matter the cost, damage or other consequence', with only the slimmest of mandates as justification, isn't rational or responsible, given her duty of care to 65m. 
Sometimes I look at the sheer inadequacy of this whole generation of UK political leaders and think that Brexit is neither here nor there. These people would have made a bollocks of anything. 
Large & passionate ‘Stop Brexit’ meeting in Nantwich this afternoon - but really sorry to meet ex-Labour members who have resigned from the party in protest at local Labour MP @LauraSmithMP voting against @YvetteCooperMP’s bill to end ‘no deal’. ‘The last straw,’ one said 
What's wrong with people? Has brexit made us all a bit crazy? 
Here's what the UK media want.1. Brexit overturned2. Borders opened3. Shamima Begum back4. Conservatism destroyed5. Strivers punished the indolent rewarded6. British history re-written to make us feel badAny wonder I detest them? 
I never thought I'd go from #NoToYes but in 2014 I realised I'd watched our institutions asset-stripped and sold off, the social contract and values I grew up with torn apart by Westminster. We can't afford NOT to be independent. After the #Brexit vote, in 2016, I joined @theSNP 
It’s so clear with hindsight. Brexit never was the will of the people. It was the will of Aaron Banks, Matthew Elliott, Dominic Cummings, Cambridge Analytica and a few billionaire funders. 
Even if you think that Brexit should happen, given that the options for leaving are so massively different nobody can argue that it's somehow more democratic to deprive the People of a say now. 
A new referendum “undemocratic”?- Brexit is turning out to be v different from what was promised - Opinion has changed : you can’t say “it’s the will of the people” without checking - Not asking the people is tantamount to saying: “you had your say 3 years ago, now shut-up” 
It's not an easy road to navigate. We may need to have a few of our UK folks help reconcile the complicated mess that Brexit is. @The_War_Economy @Deepstate6969There are common threads & disinfo mixed into these converging stories. 
How the Treasury, Bank of England and Civil Service have let us down over Brexit  via @BrexitCentral 
‘Brexit was TERRIBLE mistake!’ Remainer Blair demands second referendum to SABOTAGE exit  
I think that ISIS bird story is a blag smoke screen for Brexit 
And, after decades of compliance and subjugation, the Silent Majority was no longer silent. It rose as a great political wave to engulf countries all over the world. Meanwhile, here in the UK, we calmly visited a polling booth and put a cross on a ballot paper. #Brexit was born. 
The depressingly predictable outcome of a catch-all Leave option that attracted support from individuals and groups who were united only by their loathing of each other's preferred version of #brexit. There never has been a majority for any implementable version of #brexit. 
Dutch friend talking to my German wife today. Both agreeing that post-Brexit vote rise of xenophobia & fascism in England (oozing across UK) scarily reminiscent of 1930s Germany. Same mistakes being made again. Friend left England just 1 week after vote due to nasty atmosphere. 
I wouldn’t worry Michael when the Conservatives rat on Brexit 100,000 will be small beer...  
“You want to keep your own freedom of movement, so that you can come back and forth between here and the UK?”Hundreds of thousands of British expats have settled in Spain. What do they make of a possible no-deal Brexit?  
'Bollocks to Brexit' stickers are a very popular fashion in Edinburgh these days!#EdinburghVigils4EU #PeoplesVote #RevokeArticle50 @peoplesvote_uk @OFOCBrexit #bollockstobrexit 
"Listeners heard presenter Bill Whiteford say Brexit had been dropped from that week’s opening slot and replaced with an item on workplace parking." 
Well because, Carole, no one but you is interested in these far fetched conspiracy theories that are quickly debunked and retracted. @carolecadwalla #brexit  
An Italian guy said to me the other day that "Italy is far more divided than the UK and whatever happens over Brexit the UK wills renew itself and come back united because it is that sort of country and will not be put down". Interesting observation from outside. 
Anyone excited about the prospects for "Singapore-on-Thames" might want to take a closer look at how Singapore actually works - or doesn't (via @bopinion) 
Mrs May's insistence on meeting the 29th March date is very much geared to creating the impression that Brexit will then be complete. I doubt she cares what happens after. But this is a very important observation - the Brexit debate proper will only just be getting started. 
Scots don’t want Brexit either but you lot are rolling over and do what WM tells you to do, regardless of what Scotland want! You have a cheek to talk about what Scotland does not want We have not fir 70 years and still don’t want Tories! 
This week’s guest Colin MacPherson of Germans for Scottish Independence Referendum.Listen,enjoy and please share  
If the Brexit Party can sign up 100000 members in a week, why can't the Conservative Party? 
Tony Blair: “Right now a coalition has got to assemble.. not between those who want a referendum and those who don’t; it’s [for] those that believe you need to have clarity over a future relationship and believe you should decide that before leaving.”  
Mueller has questioned Cambridge Analytica director Brittany Kaiser. She is the second former employee of CA to be questioned by Mueller, but the special first person connected directly to both the Brexit and Trump campaigns. 
Time to clock-in folks. Now we are finally going to see how #Brexit was so intertwined with #SpyGate & #RussiaGate.Grab a shovel. 
“Young people are at the end of their tether – which is why we'll march for a Final Say on Brexit”. Excellent from @kubared #FFS #PeoplesVote #PutItToThePeople 
Brexit's Yellow Vests, German Brown Shirts, Italian Black Shirts, and British Fascists. Can you see the connection? #YellowVests 
No Deal Brexit would be far smoother than Project Fear scaremongers would have us believe  
Piroshka uses gentle vocals and dreamy guitar pop to take on some very contemporary concerns, among them income inequality, school shootings and Brexit.  
I'm a 40 year old transplant patient that has just gone through his 2nd transplant and somebody Brexit will likely end up killing, especially if it's a no-deal Brexit.What sort am I?  
We have a @gaslitnation UK special coming up -- with a lot on Brexit and a special interview! 
Whether the #EURef result is safe or not, the PM and Davis lied to Parliament by asserting that the decision to leave had already been made through the referendum. That decision was never made by Parliament and thus it has no legal value. 
Given the ease in which you can sign up to The Brexit Party, if Nigel were to ever vet the applications, he'd find a curious amount of A. Hitlers desperate to fight for his cause.  
Brexit has shown our system up, many MPs are bare faced liars.  
France denies it has softened stance on Brexit  
The conversations @OFOCBrexit have been having with people who voted for Brexit show why we need a People's Vote is. For example, this one from Doncaster. 
They ALL FALL DOWN: #Trump, #Pence Mercers Bannon #CambridgeAnalytica #Brexit On the Testimony of Brittany Kaiser Cambridge employee subpoenaed in #MuellerInvestigation, there will be no way out for #GOP and the #TrumpCrimeSyndicate#SundayThoughts #ImpeachTrumpMUST Read:  
As a lexitist I can inform the exploited workers that #brexit will liberate tgem  from  exploitation by the heartless capitalist class by taking their jobs away so they are no longer workers so aren't exploited 
A thought. If May's deal, or something like it, goes through then given that many Brexiters regard it as a betrayal of Brexit we will be in the bizarre situation on 30/3 of the Govt announcing it has enacted the 'will of the people' but almost nobody being happy about it 1/2 
BBC News - Six pro-Brexit protesters charged after London 'yellow vest' march"The protesters were demanding a no-deal Brexit, an end to immigration, and an end to what they see as mainstream fake news." 
Theresa May would rather risk an election than lose a referendum | Matthew d’Ancona  
funny how TORY/BREXIT BACKERS they are all so patriotic until is comes to paying Tax then its off to Bermuda etc ect and the EU after them,,,,  
Informed decision? @heidiallen75 neither are you it seems...the only ‘informed decision’ you are remotely interested in is stopping Brexit at any cost - so we will do our upmost to get you deselected - you lied to your constituents. @LeaveEUOfficial @Arron_banks 
EU citizens! More tales of woe from the far-right Brexit Britain. The famine has begun, people are being forced to live on soup and beans.  The only other choice is Trumps fascist chlorinated hate chicken. 
So a brief summary of the UK/Brexit connections already subpoenaed by Mueller: Kaiser, Mermoud, Malloch, and that's not to mention the various Cambridge Analytica associates like Patten and Flynn. 
A week in Tory UK:- Theresa May loses Brexit vote- China trade talks collapse- Tories finally admit food bank increase due to universal credit- Seaborne Freight contract collapses- Privatised probation firm collapses- PM attacks Student Climate Change Protestors 
As the net tightens around Brexit, Trump and Russian interference, @SenFeinstein is subpoenaing Frank Mermoud - a Manafort associate who joined Arron Banks Security company Precision Risks last summer  
Trump & Brexit: same op, different countries.  
I can't believe the Yes Bar has gone bust.Most of the country is now Yes apparently because of Brexit so I just don’t see why this ‘business’ is struggling? It would surely be packed out the door? 
Indeed. Several friends mentioned @Jacob_Rees_Mogg’s concentration camp comments to me in DMs and emails. Just ordinary people from different places, incl outside the EU, with no particular interest in Brexit. The world sees this. The damage done is already huge.  
Hilarious thread about a loony Labour councillor who's stockpiling Our Pot Noodles and Our Tinned Food against the possibility of a Cliff-Edge Crash-Out Blindfold (etc.) Brexit.  
NEW More than 100,000 supporters have signed up to back @Nigel_Farage's new Brexit party in just nine days.That is nearly as many as there are members of the Conservative party - 124,000 at the last count.Which should worry Theresa May. 
Irish Gov should realise that if it is necessary for the EU project to survive they could be ditched Editorial: 'EU cannot allow us to burn as may fiddles over brexit'  
Britain and EU pledged to continue cooperation on security issues via institutions like Europol and Eurojust, after the UK leaves EU on Mar 29, with or without a deal.Brexit will not affect the UK's security cooperation with NATO allies France & Germany.  
1000 hours to Brexit.Spend ONE of those hours Googling "Schengen agreement", and you'll discover Switzerland has freedom of movement with the EU.  
#WTO #NoDeal #CleanBrexit #WithdrawalAgreementJust a reminder of what's wrong with the WA, for any MPs who *still* haven't got to grips with it:"The top 40 horrors lurking in the small print of Theresa May’s Brexit deal"Viewed @spectator without log-in. 
There appears to be some confusion in certain quarters as to what a clean Brexit is. It is:OUT of the Customs UnionOUT of the Single MarketOUT of the jurisdiction of ECJOUT of the EAWOUT of the EU defence trapOUT of the CFPOUT of the CAPOUT into the world sealing FTAs! 
No Deal Brexit would be far smoother than Project Fear scaremongers would have us believe, says @TheSun 
However, she also received notice that her application for German citizenship has been successful, so she'll be German before #Brexit anyway 
If May shuts down parliament (which she can) She can save the Tory party, and maybe her own political career ..Jacob Rees-Mogg, the chair of the ERG, suggested ministers should "prorogue" shut doen parliament  in the event of a cross-party effort to thwart a "no-deal" Brexit. 
I’ll never stop caring about the future of my country, and I’ll always act when I see such injustices. Brexit is an injustice, built on lies, cheating and electoral law breaking. That’s not democratic, it’s not right for the future of our great nation, and it must be stopped. 
Out of touch McCluskey and Corbyn need to look at the damage already being done to ordinary working people by Brexit. Open your eyes.  
The winner of RuPaul's Drag Race UK receives a one year's supply of Yorkshire Tea, a cash prize of £1,000 (post-Brexit) and will be the next in line for the British throne. 
Quick Search of 3,613 new Internet Research Agency accounts shut down by Twitter Oct 18 shows they tweeted about #Brexit 1525 times. All this AFTER @J_amesp had exposed Russian interference. When is the UK going to wake up and admit it has been played? 
I am campaigning to stop Brexit, and I’ll accept nothing less. You’ll have to drag me kicking and screaming, really upholding that Remainer tag I’ve been given! And if you do manage to shaft us all, and we actually leave, I’ll be spearheading the campaign to rejoin, immediately. 
Airbus warns of no-deal Brexit, says has spent tens of millions preparing  
Why doesn’t anyone who wants Brexit seemingly have any understanding of how the EU works at all?  
The right-wing press spends years whipping up hate. Tories including May threaten, and therefore incite & legitimise, violence & disorder if #Brexit is stopped. The hate-filled yobs lend credibility to the Brextremists' threats.This is low level terrorism.#FBPE #brexit 
You think that’s because of brexit  it’s been like that for years  
This letter is wrong. The referendum wasn’t a decision. May made the decision. Attached materials prove all this.  
#QUOTE "failure to..take through Parliament a WA which delivers on the result of the referendum will let down the ppl who sent us to represent them + risk the bright future..they all deserve"The many-flawed WA sells out the UK. Far from a 'bright future'. 
What would a no-deal Brexit mean for trade?  
Robert Mueller has subpoenaed Brittany Kaiser, a former Director of Cambridge Analytica. She is tied with the trump campaign, Wikileaks and Brexit. 
Experts fear a national shortage of celebs. Due to Brexit Britain is no longer producing enough to man all the celeb shows being developed: Celebs fart, Celebs go to Sowerby Bridge, Celebs clean public toilets, Celebs’s mistresses,and Brexit Celebs. 
A top Airbus executive warned that a no-deal Brexit would be "catastrophic" for the industry, adding that the company has already spent tens of millions of euros preparing for such a scenario  
'She's SUCH a Remainer!' Peter Shilton issues damning verdict on Theresa May's Brexit deal  
Completely ignoring the fact that Richard Branson who is a major supporter and funder of remaining in the EU was based abroad before, during and after the referendum... 
Some people supporting referendum; others opposing it. But no one is saying what the referendum will be about.Eventually, voters will decide depending on which politician they like; not on basis of merits of proposed changes. How sad...  
If you voted Brexit you deserve everything you get. I don’t. 
The Labour front bench are still supporting #Brexit, and some Labour MPs are thinking of voting for May's deal. Please RT this poll to help in the effort to show them what will happen if they help #Brexit to happen. #PeoplesVote 
So the EU are making plans to provide emergency food aid to the poor in the UK in the event of a No Deal #Brexit what's next, a charity telethon??!!!At this point it's getting beyond embarrassing. We're one of the richest nations in the world and we're choosing to blow it! 
Listening to #Ridge #Marr #Newsnight #bbcnews etc on #brexit, the debate is framed as if having a deal and avoiding no-deal means all problems disappear.Let’s refresh our memories about why May’s #BrexitDeal - and anything like it - would also be bad:. 
What Britain should do after a no-deal Brexit  
Brexit is over. It was based on fraud illegality and foreign manipulation. There was no informed consent as people were lied to the side of buses. Article 50 was implemented with no clue plan or practical agenda. The Only Answer now is #Remain and the MSM know that. 
Seems to be a lot of talk about Switzerland being in #Schengen...Without a mention of the 2014 Swiss Referendum on Mass Migration. 19,526 more Swiss voted to contain migration (mainly coming from the EU) than voted for it, giving a VICTORY for those who were against. 
Revoke Art.50 if there is no Brexit plan by the 25 of February - Petitions  
The government is using 'blanket secrecy' to hide its no-deal #Brexit plans. This is another attempt to subvert democracy by concealing information vital for democratic debate and decision-making.#Brexit is democracy abused. #PeoplesVote #FBPE 
Andrew has just offered to return to Cheshire for a debate on #Brexit with local MP Laura Smith. So, who wants to see @Andrew_Adonis & @LauraSmithMP debate #Brexit? RT, like or reply if you want this! 
People assure me that Trump will postpone the tariff hike and Britain will avoid a no-deal Brexit. But the lyrics of Bohemian Rhapsody keep haunting me: “Is this the real life? / Is this just fantasy? / Caught in a landslide, / No escape from reality.”  
2/ #JeremyCorbyn also got a good chewing for filing to lead the opposition, failing to represent labour party members and failing  to stand up to the #Brexit disaster  @AlbaWhiteWolf says thanks to @ijohnsDNS for her new @pethatestoys  
In the event of a No Deal Brexit on 29 March, 99.9% of people won’t notice any change at all. Unless of course they read the @guardian or watch the main TV news channels hamming it up. No big deal. Let’s get on with it. 
Will the SNP's relentless “war on the motorist” never end? Sorry. I forgot. It’s a myth, cynically peddled by those who want to distract us from the policy car crash of the century - Brexit.  
No way to run a govt in the 21st century. Ridiculous to pretend the govt can’t tell MPs about #Brexit preparations because it will undermine negotiating position - if preps were going well, govt wd say so, & strengthen its negotiating posn, so silence means they’re going badly.  
Brexit High Noon 23 March.  Saddle-up partners and ride with the Magnificent Seven to help clean-up Brexit city. Spread the word. Visit       to sign up, and make your voice   heard!  Please RT! 
If Brexit truly is the "will of the people", then it has nothing to fear from a new referendum but endorsement. So, those who oppose a referendum admit they don't believe it is the will of the people. #PutItToThePeople 
LOVE this. the fact that the party delegates, who wrote the Labour party Brexit policy, have come out and accused @jeremycorbyn of going against it is brilliant; it absolutely destroys the argument of all the apologists insisting that he's sticking to it.FAO #JC4PM2019 people! 
Theresa May's government accused of hiding its Brexit preparations  
Donald Trump pledges to increase trading with UK after Brexit, writes @Daily_Express 
Vivienne Westwood's #LFW show... stunning. Nobody has retained their voice and juggled politics, activism and fashion as well. Rose McGowan walked, the buy less/choose well message was as strong as ever and Dame Vivienne serenaded the FROW. And called Brexit a crime.  
EUROPEAN leaders are risking their own economies and could lose millions of votes in the next election by refusing to do a Brexit deal, Liam Fox has blasted..  
Who'll join me at the #PutItToThePeopleMarch ? Let's make our voice heard before it's too late. We still have time to end this Brexit nightmare. #ExitfromBrexit #PeoplesVote #PeoplesVoteMarch 
Turns out it is only *outfield* players from England’s 1990 squad who Nigel Farage thinks shouldn’t express an opinion about Brexit  
“Citigroup is in talks to buy its London skyscraper office for about £1.2 billion, as the US bank commits its long-term future to the UK despite the political and economic turmoil surrounding Brexit”#StandUp4Brexit #ProjectFear 
This is how Brexit is destroying the Tory party from within. No longer Conservatives, the party has transformed into UKIP. No longer a pro-business party of pragmatism, just a single-issue cult of fanatics. 
Has anyone ever heard of that "Freedom association"?With Chloe Westley's sponsor Halfon, Brexit the Movie "stars" IEA "We-need-the-USA-to-make-Brexit-a succes" Mark Littlewood and "Let's-Break-The-Spending-Limits"/"Let's-Wreck-The-EU" Steve Baker +Cato Institute Ryan Bourne?  
Irish backstop can't be changed for Brexit deal: Estonian president  
Britain's richest man, and prominent supporter of Brexit, Jim Ratcliffe, is quitting the UK in order to save £billions in tax. Ratcliffe wants to deprive the UK of £4bn in tax - government needs to come down hard on these tax avoiders! #PayYourTax 
Even journalists without a political agenda pretty much NEVER call out their own colleagues for their dishonesty - despite the fact this behaviour is doing deep deep long term damage to their reputation. This is how Brexit leaders managed to get away with their lies for so long. 
Peter Shilton: Gobsmacked May is such a Remainer!She negotiated this deal, which as far as I am concerned, we don’t get anything from EU & we got to give them £39 Billion!We have No control, No say,We are going to be worse off in my opinion.#Brexit #EU 
Damage & disruption caused by Brexit to UK business now really racking up - each case, of course, dismissed by Brexiters 'as nothing to do with Brexit'. It's going to have serious long-term consequences, whatever the eventual outcome. And this is happening by choice not necessity  
Glad you are enjoying Brexit so much Julia - spare a thought for the 'little people' who are losing their jobs due to Brexit such as the crews at FlyBMI - while you swan about living the high life in Geneva airport. 
Less than 2 months to go until Brexit day and this profoundly ignorant Brexity loudmouth hasn't even Googled #Schengen.And I thought this lot were against free movement of people?How on earth did 17.4 million people put their faith in absolute pillocks like this? 
Derry City: UK football club staying in Europe after #Brexit  
Mmm, your tweet says more about you and the supporters of #Brexit you represent than it does about me. I was born, grew up and spent the whole of my working life in the UK. I am happy with my life. You on the other hand sound rather disgruntled with your situation!  
PS. If we Brexit with no deal end March could you send the food parcels back? I think we might need them. At least that’s what my old mate Giles of the FT says. And he’s never wrong. Never. Well maybe once. But other than that. Never.  
Read how @julie4nw search for the truth on Brexit has uncovered an unprecedented culture of secrecy - swathes of information on how prepared the UK government really is for a no-deal Brexit are being deliberately kept secret from MPs. 
These “100,000 people become members of new Brexit party” stories. The website doesn’t allow you to apply for membership () So well done on credulously printing a press release: 
Off the weekly video call with my Da. His view on Brexit:"Seems like the country is coming out with the hardest possible Brexit. That Corbyn has been a bit useless, hasn't he?"Said by a lifelong actual Socialist who celebrated the ascension of Corbyn in the UK. 100% accurate. 
Brexit must happen for the sake of our great nation if we don’t change our ways and make sure we get Brexit then the electorates will feel betrayed and potentially the 17.4 million people will never vote what we need is a revolution to get rid of this mess what we have endured!! 
Packed ‘Stop Brexit’ meeting in Wilmslow just now, in ⁦@EstherMcVey1⁩’s constituency! 
Porsche warns UK customers of Brexit price rise  
Sadly this has been the government's plan ever since the referendum. Make the deal to leave so bad they can 'justifiably' renege on the result and stay in.  
I ask Corbyn fans continually how Brexit will help us fight climate change, how it’ll help us clampdown on tax dodging, how it will help end homelessness, how it will help us invest and grow the economy etc - I’m still waiting for an answer#StopBrexitSaveBritain 
Everyone is getting ready for a no-deal Brexit 
UK is leading a revival of vinyl records: 4.2 million sold last year. Music is recorded in UK; the disks are produced in Germany or Czech republic; then shipped back. No deal Brexit threatens this emergent industry, Deutsche Welle reports:  
Switzerland is also a member of Schengen. On the evidence you didn't understand the EU referendum or what you were voting for. Incredible ignorance in a supposedly major high profile political journalist. 
By failing to fully acknowledge and address the criminality and regulatory and legislative failings which impacted the 2016 Brexit referendum, Parliament has left any second referendum as open to abuse and, subsequently, as potentially distorted as the first.It’s an awful idea. 
Theresa May pleads for Brexit plan unity before talking again with EU leaders 
curious that disgraced tommy sheridan says another independence referendum is required because of brexit when he stood for the eurosceptic no2eu lot in 2009. 
Nissan is not leaving, Dyson moved 2 staff to Singapore, Airbus can't sell latest plane, BM airline mismanaged. You'd be pretty dumb to blame Brexit.  Oh wait - you're a nat.  
“When MPs say they want to take No Deal off the table, they really mean they want to take Brexit off the table. No Deal is the only remaining option that adheres to what we voted for in 2016: a clean break from the EU. Kill No Deal and you kill Brexit.”Brendan O’Neill on Sky  
Switzerland is a member of the single market and the Schengen area. Quentin Letts either doesn't know this or understand Brexit. Let's be honest and say it's both.  
So the small British skiing company I’m travelling with this half term has as from this season replaced almost all its British staff who worked in-country with staff from Poland, Romania etc in anticipation of Brits not being able to work here post Brexit. So much #brexitwinning. 
Hi @theresa_may we’re exhibiting at the lingerie tradeshow and no buyers or suppliers know anything about how their supply chain will work post Brexit. Can you update? Asking for an entire industry.. in your own time yeah?  
Sometimes Brexit feels like a scifi film in which one character is granted visions of a forthcoming apocalypse, only to find themselves peering incredulously around at people going about their daily lives, oblivious to the impending disaster. 
But why would mueller want to talk to someone working on Brexit, unless......  
BREXIT supporter and former England goalkeeper Peter Shilton has criticised the Prime Minister's withdrawal agreement with the European  Union warning it places Britain “worse off” than its current position within the Brussels bloc.  
Join us in marching against this disastrous Brexit. We must give the people the final say on this mess - we cannot give Theresa May a free pass.Join us on March 23rd >  
Hey Comrade, What rubbish are you blabering?  Britain can't manage BREXIT ...instead why r u poking it's nose in everything. Communist Leftist are radical Democrats in USA, Labour party in UK, Socialists in Germany and Communists Marxist in India.Totally failed ideologies. 
'100,000 banking jobs to move post #Brexit' Okkkk, well Citigroup who employ 9000 in London are moving...60 jobs to the EU. It also set up a financial technology innovation centre in London last year and is hiring AT LEAST 60 coders and programmers. So NO net change...! 
Dear #Labour leadership if you want to break up the party, destroy any chance of us governing. Stick two fingers up at the membership and facilitate a Tory #Brexit which would make you more hated than Ramsay McDonald. Carry on. If Lexiters control our party we are finished. 
Remember how all the banks were leaving the UK for Berlin and Paris after #Brexit?Well Citigroup is now attempting to buy its London office for £1.2 billion. A huge, huge vote of confidence in London and the UK. Another #ProjectFear myth busted!  
The EU has agreed a standard exit clause on almost every treaty it has ever negotiated – so why not the Brexit Withdrawal Agreement? Robbins failed to have such a clause inserted, and May stupidly signed up to a deal that Parliament wouldn't  accept.   
English racism has returned thanks to Brexit.1972 vs 2019  
A no-deal Brexit would mean a 40-45% tariff on lamb, quickly killing the continental market for this Shropshire firm  
'She's SUCH a Remainer!' Peter Shilton issues damning verdict on Theresa May's Brexit deal  
100,000 members in just 1 week for @brexitparty_uk #BrexitParty! @BrandonLewis @theresa_may @Number10press are you listening..... DO YOU UNDERSTAND?  @ConHome @TheConWom @Conservatives @CCHQPress @andreajenkyns @DCBMEP @BrexitStewart #Brexit #StandUp4Brexit 
We are planning and supporting a series of demos over the coming weeks to ensure our Brexit vote is honoured. We are non- party and will work with all who share aims.Sign here if you agree:  
S. Korea is...NOT in the European Single MarketNOT in the European Customs UnionNOT subject to the jurisdiction of the ECJNOT paying money into the EU budget...... yet S. Korea has a deal with the EU: a Free Trade Agreement.After a clean Brexit, the UK can have one too. 
Another sickening Brexit story. I hope you leavers are proud of yourselves and the little nazi England you’re creating. Wankers. #FuckBrexit #RevokeArticle50 pic.twitter.com/N0f6GArbHp 
Football legend Peter Shilton tells Nigel Farage why he is "totally against" a second Brexit referendum.@Nigel_Farage | @Peter_Shilton |  
The replies to this thread are very encouraging. Hearts & minds can be persuaded to independence provided @theSNP & #independece movement can put forward answers both policy & strategic to voters key concerns in #IndyRef2 campaign #Brexit  
The A to Z of Brexit contdNationalistic BrexitOmnidirectional BrexitParty-before-country BrexitQuixotic BrexitReckless BrexitStop BrexitTrezza's BrexitUnconstitutional BrexitVillainous BrexitWrongful BrexitXenophobic BrexitYellow vests BrexitZero-benefits Brexit2/2 
The A to Z of Brexit: Which did you vote for?Advisory BrexitBlindfold BrexitCustoms Union BrexitDUP bribe BrexitEgregious BrexitFarage's BrexitGrievous BrexitHellish BrexitIllegitimate BrexitJobs First BrexitKafkaesque BrexitLexit BrexitMeaningless Brexit1/2 
Young people are prepared to come out and protest against #ClimateChange but not #Brexit...We need to ask ourselves why?  
Blow for Theresa May as minister declares he will vote to stop a no-deal Brexit.Is it just me or are we seeing ministers popping up recently that I've neither heard of or seen before? @Bremaininspain via @PoliticsHome 
I believe there is more than a casual relationship between Trump's presidency and Britain's Brexit chaos and it appears to be something to do with malevolent external forces working against us. 
Richard Dick Leonard speech's in EdinburghWhen will you sort out the DWP's universal creditDick that's not devolved When will you sort out Brexit Dick that's not devolved When will you sort out the tax system Dick that's not devolvedRichard Leonard F**K!! 
Please all retweet. Cause as you and I know but Quentin doesn’t appear to know, Switzerland is part of Schengen, meaning total freedom of movement. I’m glad he’s enjoying his expensive skiing holiday sans borders and moving freely. Man of the people #Brexit #PutItToThePeoplemarch 
Margaret Beckett says she's come round to the 'No Brexit' option 
Hi Andrew, it’s totally true. I’ve been trying to get the Brexit workstreams (No Deal preparations) published to no avail. You may wish to raise this online and in the HoL.  
*significant* An MP concedes the advice which was the basis for the invocation of A50 is flawed.He calls for A50 to be revoked. PM herself conceded the referendum wasn’t untarnished in Wilson @UKEUchallenge.Brexit is not the Will Of The People.  
Clueless moron. Can’t manage Brexit, wants to interfere in a problem that’s the gift of his country.  
'I have never seen such chaos', said Margaret Beckett on the government in the Brexit era.  
Before the referendum, Phillip Lee promised that if the vote was to Leave he would deliver on the result.Now he's chairing a campaign for a second referendum.  #RightTheFirstTime 
The small airline that has just collapsed was mainly due to fuel increases and carbon tax, it is also reported it was often only half full. Can't blame Brexit! 
It really is NOT the first time Mueller’s team has interviewed a Brexit player. As I reported a long time ago. They interviewed @andywigmore repeatedly. 
De-escalation with N. Korea Lower Taxes Start winning at trade Lower Fuel prices Promoting LEO/Military Re-establish US nationalism Set example for Brexit Created jobs Lower unemployment for minoritiesI think we all know who I’m talking about 
Morning Lane, London. Always remember, the bullshit artists at @vote_leave *specifically* ruled out No Deal before the referendum pic.twitter.com/9CZqiwmAjT 
“Today, we see supposedly neutral civil servants issuing anti-Brexit propaganda, still hoping to reverse the referendum decision” Prof Patrick Minford of @Econs4FreeTrade dissects their “deceitful propaganda efforts“ in this must read article 
Remember, Flybmi going bust has NOTHING to do with Brexit.Also not to do with Brexit:Nissan changing mind re car productionDyson moving to SingaporeHitachi pulling out of nuclear plantsSony & Panasonic moving to HollandJaguar job cutsGrowth & investment stalledetc etc  
Australia to fast-track free trade pact in the event of no-deal Brexit 
About to to do @SkyNews discussing the #PeoplesVote march on March 23rd and the case for the public’s #RightToVote in order to secure their #InformedConsent before proceeding with Brexit. Such a #FinalSay vote is in the national interest and is essential for future national unity 
1. The police investigation will get to the bottom of the Jessie Smollett attack. In me meantime, can we please not use this incident as a referendum on hate crimes? Although, as a career prosecutor I can attest to the fact that there are occasionally false assault reports . . .  
I'm Anglo-Spanish with no Scottish blood as far as I know, so I wasn't involved in #indyref, but I supported 'No'. Now I feel honour-bound to support 'Yes'. #Brexit is a material change, a broken promise, and .@theresa_may & her govt's treatment of the home nations is APPALLING. 
This is what happens when you ask Brexit fan Andrew Neil with tax revenues diminished by £500m a week due to Brexit why he never challenges Brexiters assertions that there will be a Brexit dividend. #UnethicalLyingJournalist 
Opposing #Brexit is very easy. We've been discussing it now for three years and I am yet to hear a convincing argument in favour of it. There must surely be more to it than meets the eye! It's hard to believe that 17.4 million people can be that gullible. #RevokeArticle50 
March in London on March 23rd for a referendum on Brexit: ‘Put It To The People March’ 
Are you trying to distract from this bombshell old man? Isn't Sam Patten from #CambridgeAnalytica supposed to be sentenced this week? It looks like Mueller is tying together #CambridgeAnalytica, #Brexit, #ProjectAlamo, & your campaign. #KarmaIsComing 
Have just made my third meal of the day with a kettle (potato, onion and cheese soup from Smash, milk, stock, dried onion and dried cheese) and think I'll definitely survive Brexit at this rate. 
I was that teenager that had the Union Flag up on my wall, and had Union Flag socks that I wore after #IndyRef failed. I was proud to be “British, NOT Scottish.”It wasn’t entirely Brexit that changed my mind, @theSNP’s amazing work over the years did a lot to shape my opinion. 
The only political party in Westminster not actively working with other political parties over Brexit is the Labour Party.Here’s a photo from January 2018 (over a year ago!) where Corbyn failed to take his seat at cross-party talks.  
If democracy is impt, then as a country we cannot accept a referendum won through cheating.If you cheated in an exam, you’d have to re-sit. If you cheated in a race, you’d be disqualified.So let’s do it again, this time without the cheating.#PutItToThePeople #marr #ridge 
Tory Brexiteers are now constantly being told that we must either compromise or face no Brexit, but compromise what? Our democracy? Our vote? Even our (uncoded) constitution?Leave won. 70% of Tory voters were leavers. So why should *leave* have to be the ones who compromise? 
On Blair... imagine 3 months into the Iraq War - with no WMD and a raging insurgency - if we could have pressed stop and given the people a Final Say on if they *really* wanted Britain to be there. Of course by then it was too late. But on Brexit there's still time. Let's take it 
Oi, #Brexit Britain! While you're busy sorting out how to get rid of those pesky immigrants (and yet, curiously, have a skills shortage) Berlin is busy attracting them   
So now it turns out the ‘experts’ who said planes wouldn’t fly and borders would be closed in a #NoDeal exit were wrong. Again.How many times can one group (Remainers) be wrong? It’s almost oddly impressive.#Brexit #SundayThoughts #WTO 
Mr Sweeney has said something explicitly denied by the @theSNP #Brexit spokesman concerned @PeterGrantMP The onus is now on Mr Sweeney to provide the quote - or else explain why he said something he knew to be untrue. Scottish Labour finds itself in this position far too often. 
Latest polling shows Remain about 10% ahead, serious evidence that Brexit is NOT the will of the people now and May is dragging us out against our most up to date judgement. 
It took 40 years to create seamless trading between the UK  and the EU and only a fool would think it would take less time to restich that economic pattern of  trade after Brexit between the two. #TheresaMay 
It is funny how some commentators give Switzerland - a country with freedom of movement, in the Schengen Area (the UK isn't in Schengen)- as an example to make pro-Brexit political points. I thought "ending freedom of movement once and for all" is one of the "big wins" of Brexit? 
 @JennyLConstable, who voted No in 2014, eloquently explains why she would vote for independence in a future referendum on Scotland’s future.- Scotland being told that voting No in #IndyRef would mean remaining in EU.- Scotland’s remain vote being ignored after #EUref. 
Remember the scaremongering over Guinness? Guinness says a no deal Brexit will have a limited effect on their business & they are well prepared for a No deal Brexit (via Belfast @News_Letter) #Brexit @DCBMEP @DanielJHannan @Arron_banks @paulrey99 @oflynnmep @SuzanneEvans1 
Impossible for brexit to be a success - no deal will be as good as the one we have already. Its all fantasy and lies - leavers have been lied to from day one - most now see that - rest of you are like the brexit taliban - suicidal nutters no facts just irrational beluef  
Mrs May's Brexit message to MPs  'History will judge us all'Sorry Mrs May, history has already made up its mind about you. Whatever happens now, you will go down as the worst PM in British history. 'you've done a Mrs May' will be used as an insult to someone who betrays you. 
Without a doubt after brexit departing the hermit United kingdom through Dover will be sheer hell. 
Sean (@_seanogrady) voted leave in 2016, he wanted a close relationship with the EU but thought a #brexit vote would help strengthen @David_Cameron to reform it.Now he has seen the harsh reality of brexit he has serious regret, he is a #RemainerNow 
My German mother-in-law has become addicted to watching the live parliamentary Brexit debates on TV. Which is a bit like watching a car crash. When Germans watch the farce at Westmister, they find it hard to understand how we've survived as a functioning democracy for so long  
The wikileaks-Brexit-Trump campaign connection -- media other than @carolecadwalla may never cover it, but Mueller gets it anyway. 
The EU Withdrawal Act confers on the PM the right to trigger Article 50 to leave the EU based on an advisory referendum. That advice was flawed as the referendum was corrupted by illegal activity so had it been an election would have had to be re-run. So Art 50 should be revoked 
There is abundant evidence that Britain was as bamboozled into Brexit as the US was bamboozled into Trump. The difference: we are trying to reverse course. How about our cousins across the pond? Still gonna go head first into a catastrophe that was a con in the first place? 
Brexit is foundering...listen to the news! It can’t survive. 
Everyone having to bend over backwards to accommodate the shitshow caused by Brexit and the arrogant buffoon goads those with genuine concerns and those who are having to do all the work whilst he sits on his useless arse.  
The people peddling the "things can't possibly get worse" narrative around Brexit have the moral integrity of a mechanic telling someone their brakes are fine and just waving them off while holding the brake cables in their hand. 
The Brexit referendum in 2016 was based upon lies & misinformation. Dark money was used, Electoral Law broken & key players were referrred to the National Crime Agency. Time has taught us much on what Brexit really means.The public deserve another vote. #PutItToThePeople 
A PM who pushed ahead with the Brexit catastrophe knowing an EU ref was narrowly won by industrial scale criminal electoral fraud to keep nutters in her party on board so she can stay in Number 10 for as long as possible... She will be a notorious national disgrace for centuries.  
Delighted to see @Douglas4Moray out campaigning abt the increased powers the council in moray now have if they want to use it, it’s almost like there isn’t 40 days until economic ruin with #brexit.. which moray and Scotland didn’t vote for  
Project Fear just got shipwrecked in the English channel. Again.Go Brexit!  
UK Unity is organising demos outside Parliament and Nationwide! Come along and get the word out there! WTO Brexit now!#WTOBrexitNOW Weds 27th Feb Parliament- Sat 23rd March UK Wide-  
Please feel free to oppose Brexit on economic and practical grounds. I will stick to castigating it as a sickening assault on every value that makes for a decent society. We might just survive on tinned goods for a while, but if we lose our moral compass it's all over. 
When they announced the referendum result, like all Leave voters, I was euphoric.  But it only lasted about ten minutes, then I said to my wife, "It will never happen, they will never let us leave, they'll steal this victory from us".  Like you, I so wanted to be wrong, but...... 
JCB, Bombardier, Toyota - they’re all investing in industry in DerbyJoin the fastest growing Brexit movement @  
Brexit will not affect European security cooperation, say intelligence chiefs 
We fully support this letter to @jeremycorbyn from Party members who defined our Brexit Policy.Since November there's no doubt it's being undermined, watered down and calls to campaign for a public vote dismissed.History will damn our Party if it helps fulfil Farage's dream.  
Appreciate your stance on this, Tom, but the Labour Party's failure to take this up and argue against Brexit per se as a travesty of democracy will be to the party's eternal shame, and to the country's short, medium, and long-term well-being. 
Dear @theresa_may your “deal” IS NOT BREXIT. And it is not a “deal”. It is REMAIN indefinitely with true fines and tribute. If you persist YOU will go down in history as the destroyer of the Conservative Party. Well done. 
BREAKING Jacob Rees Mogg Arrives In Brussels For Emergency Brexit Talks  
If we vote to stay in - then there’s no Brexit glue left between Tories & DUP. Government can’t govern. I’m stunned that not many Labour people have seen this. Apart from it causing massive rupture within Tories, Govt falls because of DUP deal gone. GE follows. 
It not Kate. Its just fraud. Over 300 hedge fund companies represented  Vote Leave. They made millions 'betting' on the ref by adopting a short positions on the outcome. This is criminal market manipulation under ss. 89-91 of the FSA 2012. I am writing an article on this atm 
Scotland richest man plans to tax exile himself, either he is seeing brexit fail and protecting his erse from EU tax laws, or hes seeing Scottish independence impacting his oil income.Cant wait for Sir Ian Wood next step after Sir Radcliffe's, weird how oil guys have titles. 
Nigerian democracy is more robust than British democracy. Nigeria delayed their election as they SUSPECTED interference. We accepted a referendum result that has been PROVEN to have been corrupted. Why the silence on this? 
Quentin Letts skiing into a self burn so harsh that 'Schengen' starts trending is an unexpected Brexit dividend almost worth our upcoming national diet of turnip & rat surprise. 
Brexit Britain is not a good place. I clearly remember stepping out the door the morning after the referendum, feeling that everything had just changed. Looked the same, felt different. 
Please can we show Andrew #Marr that Brexit is far more than a "Westminster drama" ?It affects us all, wherever we live.Send us a photo of your last trip to protest against Brexit at #Sodem & make sure you tell us where you are from.#PoliticsLive #Marr@York4EU @Devon4Europe 
More important details on the significance of the story by @carolecadwalla about Mueller’s subpoena to Cambridge Analytica’s Brittany Kaiser, and her links to both the US election and Brexit, in this thread  
We must all stand up and be counted and help avert this national crisisIt's time to take to the barricadesJoin the #LibDems on the #PutItToThePeople #PeoplesVote rally on 23 March. Stop Brexit, pull the country back from the brink and stay in the EUJoin us and make history! 
How is Scottish independence "the only way to protect our society and economy" from Brexit @joannaccherry? How much will foreign exchange reserves cost? How will you offset the c. £10Billion annual loss to public services from the UK fiscal transfer? How will you address customs? 
Two more examples of small regional airlines that recently have gone bust elsewhere in the EU: Germania (Germany, 6 planes) and VLM (Belgium, 36). Unlike #flybmi (UK, 17) no-one is blaming #Brexit.  
“There’s no such thing as a ‘managed’ no deal," says Airbus boss in no deal Brexit warning.  
BOOM. A Mueller subpoena that goes to the heart of the #Trump #Russia #Brexit scandal. Trump - Cambridge Analytica - Banks/Wigmore - Assange - Putin  
More than 100,000 members have joined Nigel Farage's new Brexit party in first week. @Nigel_Farage 
There is still time to end this mess. A People's Vote will break the parliamentary deadlock and give the people - not the politicians - the final say on Brexit, with the option to stay in the EU. Add your name to back a People's Vote >  
Another  #MSC2019 take: as we Americans are focused on domestic polarization and UK on Brexit, our former special relationship doesn’t seem so special or important.  Sad. 
Paul as the SNP’s Brexit spokesperson I invite you to do the honourable thing, delete this tweet and apologise. It’s a complete fabrication. I said no such thing. 
Note to all Leavers who are trolling me about #PutItToThePeople march:1. I am not ignoring your 2016 vote - May & MPs are doing that2. You're welcome to join us on 23/03 as it's about all of us settling the matter of Brexit3. Try not to be so angry & rude, I'm not your enemy! 
I suspect, if Scotland, Northern Ireland and Wales were independent countries, they would all (yes, even Wales) vote to rejoin the EU post-Brexit. If I'm right, the UK's days are numbered. Brexiters will have destroyed our connections to the EU and also the UK. #RevokeArticle50 
The right wing lobby groups based at 55/57 Tufton Street have infiltrated the very heart of Government influencing Brexit and environmental policy. Their plans are far reaching including abolishing the NHS, state education and the welfare system -  
Quentin Letts skis into Switzerland from the EU.Forgets about #Schengen.Forgets Switzerland has been a member of Schengen for over a decade.Tries to make a point about #Brexit.Fails.In a truly epic fashion.  
Brexit is ruthlessly robbing every British person of rights enjoyed by every citizen of the EU, and the Prime Minister refuses even to admit that this is the case, as though she can simply will that fact out of existence. Brexit is theft ... at every level.  
UK's richest man and Brexit supporter Jim Ratcliffe loves The UK so much he is moving to Monte Carlo putting his money in a Tax Haven and depriving the UK economy of between £400m and £4bn 
    “That Brexit shows you, Border, you can spread shite everywhere but it’s only love and care that truly fertilizes the land”Barney McGettigan, 2019 
Earlier today I was sent a message by a distraught EU citizen: this morning they found that a window at their home had been vandalised overnight with a message that can only be interpreted as a hate crime directed at them because they are an EU citizen. This is Brexit Britain. 
The people who talk about austerity *only* in relation to Brexit don’t really care about austerity. Where have you been for the past 9 years? 
Dear Quentin,  first please look up what Schegen is, then explain how 13,000 goods vehicles a day could cross the Irish border on skis. Yours, people annoyed at misleading comparisons which don't add to the Brexit debate.  
Good news! Jaguar LandRover expanding r&d jobs, a new state of the art facility....in Ireland.Brexit means ...THANKS!  
 Give it a rest, guys...Parliament doesn't want a second referendumThe British people don't want a second referendumThere legally isn't time to legislate for, plan and run a second referendumTalk about flogging a dead horse.  
Grandparents visiting today. Looking forward to topics including Brexit, immigration, why teaching is easy, why ripped jeans are pointless, the colour scheme of my flat and everyone’s favourite: why aren’t I married/pregnant yet? 
No matter what MPs decide, the people need a final say on #BrexitJoin us on the 23rd of March as we demand politicians #PutItToThePeople   
Increasingly I am hearing this narrative from constituents & members of the public who stop me in the street to tell me similar things. Scotland’s treatment by the U.K. Govt during the #Brexit process is creating a new appetite for #independence #indyref2 
OK, I am British, I am European and I live in Spain. I am one of the 2 million people whose rights are threatened by #Brexit, and particularly by a no deal #Brexit. I am thoroughly ashamed of what is happening to my country and feel betrayed by people who voted to leave the EU. 
But Switzerland are in EFTA & Schengen @thequentinletts so they’ve got free movement. If a national newspaper commentator who’s a strong, prominent Brexit advocate can broadcast such misleading information, what’s the likelihood the public gave #InformedConsent? #RightToVote 
So, just 968 days since the vote, we still haven't agreed on a competent Brexit (i.e. one that is likely to do more good overall than harm). So either a competent Brexit isn't possible. Or our current crop of politicians aren't competent to deliver it. Or both. 
The Brexiteer politicians don't care about ordinary people. They only care about multinational CEOs like Jim Ratcliffe who themselves are fleeing the Brexit disaster they pushed onto the British People.  
Flybmi is part of Airline Investments Ltd and last year operated 29k flights carrying 522k passengers.an average of 18 passengers per flight.They use Embraer Jets which have a capacity of 68-124 passengers.They didn’t fill their flights nothing to do with BrexitPlease RT. 
No matter the outcome of #Brexit, London will always be open and inclusive. We are stronger because of our diversity, not in spite of it. Retweet if you agree. #LondonIsOpen 
Outcry at Jeremy Corbyn's plan to sell soft Brexit to Brussels 
This is such a shame that Sir Jim Ratcliffe, the Brexiteers' businessman of choice - looks like he won't be able to stay in Britain long enough to enjoy the benefits of Brexit. 
• On the left, the exact wording of the Brexit Composite Motion at Labour Conference.• On the right, the exact wording of Jeremy Corbyn’s tabled Amendment of 29 January 2019. • Facts matter  
'The Irish Republicans are playing a shrewd political game that will now see a united Ireland before another Scottish independence referendum - not by following the rules laid down by Britain, but by rejecting them, says @jeggit.via @RPJblog 
Is brexit journalist @thequentinletts a #RemainerNow or something?Seems to be backing UK joining schengen so a hard remain? 
We're marching against Brexit on March 23rd.Let Theresa May know she can't get away with this national embarrassment, sign up now > 
Hard Brexit or otherwise, can we take the opportunity to stop doing that thing where someone’s talking to camera and we cut for a few seconds to a tighter shot from a bit round the side. 
Brexiteers frequently accuse EU of secrecy & lack of transparency when in fact it is Brexit Britain that is hiding stuff from its own people Theresa May's government accused of hiding its Brexit preparations  
For what its worth consensus among Brexit followers at Munich is that May will get her deal through. If this happens textbooks on brinkmanship will have to be rewritten. 
Remainers plan mass march in last days before BrexitIt’s 23rd March. In London. Be there. It’s your chance to save your future from the Brexit catastrophe#PeoplesVote #FinalSay 
The brexit campaign was illegal. Why isn't there an investigation? Either rich/ influential people are involved or they will personally gain from brexit  
Word o’ the dayGOWKA fool, simpleton, dolt, loutAn ungainly person 1795 Burns "And even a Lord may be a gowk, Wi' ribban, star, and a' that"?2019 Boswell"We’re awe bein sent tae Brexit hell in a haun cairt wae that hideous, skreichin GOWK May guidin the wheels" 
When Sky News are not talking the country down over Brexit, they are colluding with terrorists   
me speaking in 2015/16  #brexit  
Glad to hear business leaders speaking up about the reality of what “no deal #Brexit” really means - Airbus boss says no-deal Brexit would be 'catastrophic'  
"Brexit is a protest against out-of-touch metropolitan elites."  
Hard Brexit is next month and they still haven't Googled "Schengen" or "EFTA"  
No Brexit deal ‘better than a bad deal’, say DUP 
Labour are so intent on frustrating Brexit, they're calling in to @RidgeOnSunday to say they still back a second referendum  
He campaigned to wreck Britain through #Brexit. Now the UK’s richest man is fleeing the nation. @thesundaytimes 
One of the origins of Brexit: the rise of a moneyed elite who feel no obligation to the rest of society. Perhaps we should insist that paying taxes is a requirement of holding on to your knighthood? 
Irish backstop can't be changed for Brexit deal: Estonian president  
Breaking: SECOND #CambridgeAnalytica employee to be questioned by Mueller investigation into #TrumpRussia collusion.Kaiser's work connected her to WikiLeaks, Trump &... #Brexit.#UK needs its own inquiry into foreign interference!#DefendingDemocracy 
Is voter manipulation in the America-weakening 2016 presidential election and in the UK’s disastrous #Brexit vote the same scandal?  
Finished the first draft of my next video (working title 'Brexit: An Analysis') and it's coming in at around 8,000 words  
If you are a #granny/ #grandma/#nan/ #nana  ~ whoever you are & would like to MARCH together, Follow me/DM me & we'll arrange to meet on the day and MARCH en masse with our banners etc~probably near the front! #peoplesvotemarch #putittothepeople #stopbrexit #brexit  
I'm assured by a journalist from @BBCNews that not a SINGLE employee of @flybmi wishes to say anything at all about how Brexit has destroyed the business. If he has this wrong, I'm happy to hear from any @flybmi staff and report without fear or favour what they might have to say. 
Less than a thousand hours to Brexit and you cunts still haven’t googled Schengen 
I'm trying to compile a full list of well known people who promoted Brexit and then either upped sticks and left or who never lived here in the first place. Might make some wallpaper out of it or something. All contributions welcome  
Opinion: A no-deal Brexit would destroy UK science – and this is how  
So John McDonnell says #PeoplesVote only “in extremis” & maybe “we’ll look at it”....Clearly rowing back on Labour’s conference policyThere’s a disastrous #Brexit in less than 1000 hours. And @UKLabour stands on the sidelines pretending to face all ways. What an utter tragedy 
“Eldon Insurance and Big Data Dolphins Ltd. signed a lease agreement to move into Insight Park in February 2018. Bryant got cozy with “Brexit Boy” Nigel Farage during Trump’s pres. campaign, & Farage even took the stage w/ Trump & Bryant at Trump’s rally in Jackson in Aug. 2016.” 
It doesn't bother you that the very rich people who promoted Brexit as a great opportunity for Britain, who told us to believe in our country and who enabled a movement that branded naysayers traitors and worse - are now leaving the sinking ship?  
British regional airline collapses and blames Brexit  
So Jim Radcliffe, UK's richest man and ardent #Brexiteer is off to Monaco to avoid paying taxes in post-#Brexit UK. Not the only Brexiteer scarpering from their own deeds. #Hypocrisy 
Theresa May is responsible for splitting her party and botching Brexit. She deliberately chose a fake Brexit over the heads of her MPs and against the wishes of the majority of Tory voters. She’s been an unmitigated disaster as Tory leader.   
Cancel Brexit, raise taxes for the rich, fund the NHS. 
NIGEL Farage’s new Brexit Party has recruited a massive 100,000 members just one week after being registered - and even before the party formally launched or even opened an office..  
Ian Murray just said that the People’s Vote should have an option to Remain. I am confused as I thought Corbyn’s take was to respect the outcome of the referendum. What IS Labour’s position on the referendum? 
Not saying Brexit invented racism in Britain, but it sure as hell encouraged, facilitated and normalised it.  
Meanwhile Wigmore, who was a diplomat of a foreign country while he worked on the Brexit campaign, throws a hissy fit 
No Deal #brexit would wipe out 12% of Merseyside’s economy  
“The option of going back to the people has got to be there” Labour’s Shadow Chancellor John McDonnell on another #Brexit referendum#Marr  
Former Brexit Secretary, Dominic Raab: “This pierces the Project Fear myths and shows that the UK and EU can work sensibly together” 
Brexiters: These CEOs complaining about leaving the EU. They run businesses. They should adapt & stop moaning.Remainers: They are adapting. They’re leaving the country & going to a better business environment. Brexiters: No!! That’s not because of Brexit! No! No!! No!!! 
Sorry mate,  but that's literally not true. We financially get way more out of the EU than we put in.  This was fully known before the referendum of you were willing to sirens an hour or two learning about it. 
Steve Baker of ERG told colleagues that May’s Brexit negotiations with EU were a “complete waste of time”.PM and EU were pretending to negotiate while “working together to run down the clock to force [May’s] deal through” with few changes.#BrexitNow 
What helped me: to look at it as a fight over national identity narratives and not as a question of trade, migration or EU reforms. As odd as that may sound, Brexit has surprisingly little to do with the EU. 
„techno only“ is like supporting brexit 
I might have been one of last pro-Indy supporters prepared to give Corbyn benefit of the doubt he was playing a strategic long game to ouse Tories & implement important social reforms. That ship's sailed over Brexit. Just another cloth-eared dogmatist of the Lab left. Bit sad.  
Urban regeneration e.g. Liverpool, Manchester, Glasgow etc, science funding, membership of open skies agreement, Euratom so that nuclear fuels, radioactive medicine etc can be transported safely. All will stop after no deal Brexit. Many, many, more. 
 This is neither a secret nor is it new: @EU_Commission adopted these proposals in Dec: In no way do they replicate the significant advantages of EU membership, or the #Brexit deal. Aim = basic connectivity, limited in scope & time. @MarrShow 
I’m sure there’s a benign reason for this. The thing is, I can’t for the life of me work out what it could be, or even what it would look like.Theresa May's government accused of hiding its Brexit preparations  
McDonnell says “we’ll look at” the backbench second referendum amendment > dozens of Labour MPs want the frontbench to support it. Big confrontation coming #Marr 
Leave supporters - this is what Brexit really means. Like this list of Brexiteers, you probably voted leave for idealogical reasons but their ideologies are different than yours. Brexit will make them richer and you poorer. It's not too late to change your mind. #putittothepeople 
‘... students who go abroad during their studies are 19% more likely to be awarded a first-class honours, and six months after graduating, are 10% more likely to be in a graduate level job.‘ Improve Erasmus, don’t scrap it through a no-deal Brexit.  
Brexit scaremongers are red-faced as EU chiefs ensure transport links will stay  
Interesting thread on the Gin ‘n’ Jag Leavers. As David Willetts said, Brexit was a vote of the excluded and the insulated. We’ve spent a lot of time talking about the excluded but not much talking about the insulated.  
BREXITERS LATEST:Rees-Mogg: “Open funds in Ireland because Brexit"Redwood: “Don’t invest in UK because Brexit”Lawson: “I want French residency because Brexit”Farage: “German passports for my kids because Brexit”UK’s richest man: “Leaving UK because Brexit” #marr 
2014: UKIP cleared up at the European Elections2015: David Cameron won the GE on a EU referendum manifesto2016: The UK voted to leave the EU in the referendum vote2017: Theresa May won office on a manifesto to deliver the referendum vote #PutItToThePeople? We already have! 
STOP. Read the image below. It amounts to this: the PM is pressing on with brexit in the belief that it may (or may not) be corrupt to do so. This is unbelievable The admission was in court on 07 Dec last year.  
Apparently the voting public want Britain to get on with #Brexit. Apart from being utter bollocks it now suggests that if you want to remain in the EU you are no longer part of the voting public. We are turning in to a fascist state, it's scary. #Marr 
No he doesn’t.The determination in parts of the British press and political leadership to detect cracks in the EU 27 position on Brexit is a source of exasperation, fascination and bemusement in Paris  
Thank you @labourlewis for this. When decent socialists like you & Dennis Skinner find yourselves on opposite ends of the spectrum over Brexit, it shows how divisive it is. But as long as our primary goal is to work toward a Labour government, we can get through this together!  
No deal #Brexit: “We’ve spent tens of millions of euros”Airbus boss Katherine Bennett on preparations for a no deal Brexit#Marr  
The world's largest aerospace firm @Boeing made a huge £40m investment into Sheffield AFTER the EU referendum. They're confident about the future of UK manufacturing.  
.@DamianCollins hitting nail on head. Kaiser was in middle of an extraordinary set of connections. She worked on Brexit. She worked on Trump. She met Assange. And she had *interesting* friends. In 2015, she introduced the firm to Israeli intel operatives...who hacked a president  
As Brexit day draws closer, the EU gets more hysterical. It is now promising it will send FOOD PARCELS as aid to the UK post Brexit. These gangsters in Brussels are our ENEMY.  
Put the date in your diary now!Brexit isn’t the answer to the very real grievances that led so many to vote Leave Join us on the march to say the PM must #PutItToThePeople And build the pressure to transform our economy & democracy so that they work for all. Please RT 
I'm yet another person cancelling my @UKLabour membership due to their lack of action against Brexit. #Brexit #PutItToThePeople #StopBrexitSaveBritain #BollocksToBrexit #StopBrexit #PeoplesVote 
Put It To The People march demanding fresh referendum to take place days before Brexit  
An important hearing will take place on 21st February 2019 at the Royal Courts of Justice in London. The UK in EU Challenge are seeking a Judicial review of the 2016 EU Referendum,  
This is it, isn’t it? Brexit and global warming denial are not really about the future or opportunity or freedom or any of that. They’re about last-gasp vindictiveness.  
The 'so' woman from Airbus works for a company that can get a 500 tonne aircraft in the sky but doesn't think it can organise getting parts across borders after Brexit. More Brexit bollocks.#marr 
This now the SECOND Cambridge Analytica employee to have been subpoenaed by Mueller. Sam Patten - whose business partner Mueller identified as linked to Russian intelligence - has already entered into a plea deal. Kaiser is first figure, however, linked directly to Brexit.  
No deal #Brexit: “Absolutely catastrophic” Airbus boss Katherine Bennett on a no deal Brexit#Marr  
The pound is creaking under the weight of a looming hard Brexit 
No, I'm simply making the point that yet another Brexit advocate chooses not to stay and live with consequences of what he has encouraged.  
Things the DUP's strength has helped deliver on:• record hospital waiting lists• blocking SSM• parents having to subsidise education• reproductive health that breaches human rights• carve up of council funding• damaging NI economy via Brexit• RHI reckless spending 
Lol. @chhcalling on @SophyRidgeSky admits he was not researching a book when he wrote to unis asking for Brexit teaching, as @JoJohnsonUK claimed at the time 
Brexit was never about ordinary people benefiting from taking back control of their money, borders and laws, WE ALREADY CONTROL THOSE, it was all to do with delivering an off the shores of Europe, low tax, small state deregulated regime for the benefit of the few not the many.  
BREXIT BOOST: Nigel Farage takes control as 100,000 people join new party in one week 
Dear @IrexitFreedom , the harp has historically been depicted mainly left-facing. The direction you're using is not only nontraditional, it plagiarises @GuinnessIreland and looks geografically towards Europe, which I believe is not your intent   #Irexit #Brexit  
Flybmi have been in financial trouble since 2009. They have load factors of approx 50% (their planes are half full). They blame several difficulties”, including “spikes” in fuel and carbon emission costs and wider regional airline issues. But when in doubt, blame #Brexit  
Derby South Labour MP Margaret Beckett tells #Ridge she's "come round to the no Brexit option".61% voted Leave in Derby South, according to Professor Chris Hanretty. 
Problem is, company after company have warned of the dangers of Brexit, not least during the numerous fact-finding sessions organised by Parliamentary committees. But there's no indication the Government is taking any notice whatsoever. 
If you were offered a referendum on introducing the death penalty for those proved to be terrorists, how would you vote. Yes or No. Don't forget its a vote so government would probably ignore it as they did with the referendum. 
But when is this going to be taken seriously by the establishment? Brexit needs to be revoked pending the outcome of a criminal investigation. Talk about sovereignty!!!! 
Another week of Brexit chaos and no real answers.Theresa May's strategy of running down the clock in order to scare MPs into backing her deal is irresponsible and unrealistic. Join our campaign to end this mess through a People's Vote > 
It doesn't add up. The people promoting Brexit know that. Their reasons are deeper, and significantly more unpleasant.  
 #UK  #LONDON: Proud members of the #YellowVests movement gathered yesterday trough the streets, chanting: "We will, we will rock you!" #Brexit #LeaveMeansLeave #YellowVestsUK #GiletsJaunes #PowerToThePeople #Resistance 
No mention of Brexit (stated reason given) in report on collapse of Flybmi in @BBCNews bulletin 
"If we face a #NoDeal scenario then we would be urging and encouraging the UK to negotiate and finalise an agreement as quickly as possible. I would absolutely hope that we would conclude negotiations this year."Australia's trade minister Simon Birmingham #Brexit #WTO 
Plans are being made to keep planes & lorries moving between the UK and the continent in the event of a No Deal. Project Fear is crumbling as each day brings us closer to a clean WTO Brexit - because the EU is desperate to keep our trade!Support us at  
Chris Heaton-Harris says food supply won’t be an issue post-Brexit.I first got to know Chris in 1989. Members of my family have been on holiday with him and his.I’m stockpiling. 
EU leaders are risking their own electoral success by pushing the UK towards a no-deal Brexit, says Liam Fox 
REALITY: EU 'agree reciprocal access for lorries and planes' after No Deal Brexit. @DominicRaab: “Allow the flow of lorries and airplanes to/from the UK and EU, if we leave on WTO terms. Why so little coverage?” 
Brexiter billionaire Sir Jim Ratcliffe should at the very least be required to leave his knighthood at Heathrow when he flees the Brexit Britain he helped dump in the shit 
Cosy. Delivering Brexit together.  
"My advice to the British people is: make it known to MPs that you will not stand for their bad economics" Don't let remainer MPs overturn Brexit, join us today:  
Only Jacob Rees-Mogg could continue to cite economist Patrick Minford who said on the UK car industry “you are going to have to run it down..in same way we ran down the coal & steel industries” & then deny what we’re seeing has anything to do with Brexit!   
England's two main political parties' focus, is entirely on England's Brexit problem.N.I and Scotland? Collateral damage, in England's continued imperialist delusion.The U.K is broken.#YouYesYet #indyref2 
Throughout the past two and a half years, the UK media has avoided any examination of what BREXIT means for the EU, for its faltering economy and its creaking budgets. They imply the EU is strong when it is weak and they suggest the UK is weak when we are strong. 
In truth like most trade policy specialists I'm still getting my head around the idea that the grand prizes of Brexit are trade deals providing a marginal uplift in GDP (offset against losses from leaving the single market) accompanied by large doses of controversy 
Brexit Britain is lost in hypocrisy and 19th century thinking.Thus: billionaire Brexiter Ratcliffe leaves for Monaco; defence secretary Williamson’s faux bellicosity leads to China cancelling Hammond’s trip;parliament frozen.Airline Flybmi collapses. Business flees. Anyone care? 
Unfortunately for the USA & ultimately the world, those 3 countries are run by globalists. They do NOT want to see the end of the Caliphate!Germany refused our request to extradite jihadists & is sending them back! WHY?Pray after BREXIT, the globalist EU will be unsustainable 
Brexit extremist Jacob Rees Mogg making the case for concentration camps... What a horrible individual and a terrible sign for the direction of the country that someone like this is repeatedly given a prominent stage  
For me, this clip of @theresa_may tells me what a nasty, selfish, xenophobic individual she really is. The day she's forced to resign cannot arrive soon enough.  #Brexit #FBPE #PeoplesVoteMarch #PutItToThePeopleMarch #JustMakeItStop #finalsayforall #StopBrexitSaveBritain 
ICYMI: The Tory party lost its way from 2010, not 2016  Ignoring expertise for ideological ends and causing great damage to the economy - it did not begin with Brexit. 
Nigel Farage/Tories achieved something that the Nazis, the IRA & the 7/7 bombers all tried and failed to do.#NigelFarage/#Tories turned the people of Britain against each other. And for this they can never be forgiven#stopbrexit #PeoplesVoteMarch #Brexit #putitothepeople #fbpe 
Margot,You voted two years ago to trigger Article 50.#NoDeal is the default option of  #Article50.Did you not know what you were voting for?You should resign now & be replaced with a Minister who believes in #NoDeal & #Brexit  
I've said it before & I'll say it againThe position of the UKG is that an international agreement such as the Belfast Good Friday Agreement has no bearing on UK lawThis is why it is so essential that we secure legislative protections for the people of Northern Ireland #Brexit  
If you're an employer who is having to lay workers off because of a downturn caused by Brexit - do the right thing and show brexiters the door first - they don't mind the short term pain. it may be tricky but do your very best to give them what they say they knew they voted for. 
‘History will judge’. This Brexit folly will go down as the single biggest peacetime Government disaster in history. It will define the Tory party for the next decade and this generation of Tories will be forever the ‘Brexit Tories’. History will judge alright.  
Brexit means Brits in Spain will now be hit by the "no exemptions on capital gains" if they sell their homes. So the many who voted Leave are going to get one heck of a shock.  
Looks like British planes will continue to fly into Europe and lorries can drive on the continent, even if we leave without an agreement on March 29 #Brexit#keepcalmandcarryon 
Margaret Beckett - I've never seen a government that treats Parliament with such contempt... the Prime Minister is tearing up our constitution.. Theresa May doesn't like a 2nd referendum, but she's asking MPs to change their minds every day of the week.#Ridge #marr #PeoplesVote 
Dreadful news for workers, their families and stranded passengers from W Yorks & E Mids. Tory Brexit is killing jobs. My party leadership should oppose & demand ⁦@peoplesvote_uk⁩Regional airline Flybmi collapses blaming Brexit uncertainty   
New: Government Brexit secrecy under the spotlight as it still refuses to publish details of 320+ “workstreams” despite multiple requests & FOIs. “It’s secrecy for secrecy's sake” - PAC chair @Meg_HillierMP. MPs know “next to nothing” about no-deal prep. 
The ERG tory MPs, the DUP and a handful of Labour rebels like Kate Hoey are the only people who have been true to the 2016 referendum result. The rest have totally betrayed our democracy and must be mercilessly deselected and voted out at the next election.  
Most UK citizens in EU were denied their democratic voting rights in re, like EU in UK, despite impact Brexit would have on us.We implore @peoplesvote_uk to give us a voice on 23/3 at #PutItToThePeople march.     @BremainInSpain @Andrew_Adonis @CarolineLucas @DavidLammy 
.@peoplesvote_uk, EU citizens in the UK and many British citizens in the EU27 haven’t had a voice in the referendum. We are the people too; we’ve contributed to the debate and witnessed the human cost of Brexit. Will we be given a voice too in this march? @InLimboBrexit 
Don’t you ever shut up about  the People’s Vote you halfwit. 24/7 tweeting about it. We had a referendum 2016 17.4 million voted leave the crumbling E U. Millions of Labour supporters voted leave E U as well. Shut up FFS going on about People’s Vote. Yawn, Yawn,Yawn, Yawn, Yawn.  
Margaret Beckett is for *no Brexit*  
Brexit might be a massive inconvenience for Remain MPs like Margaret Beckett who still don't accept the referendum result, but her constituency voted to Leave. It's time she listened to her constituents, respected democracy & stopped trying to block Brexit. #Ridge #StandUp4Brexit 
We stand on the brink of a historic, national collapse – it’s time to take to the streets to stop Brexit | @DavidLammy 
Don’t ever change, Japan: NHK explains an un-negotiated Brexit using a kaiju, its wings reading “currency instability” and “stock plunge.”  
No.10 have forgotten the crushing 230 vote defeat...“Brexit Secretary Stephen Barclay told the EU’s chief Brexit negotiator, Michel Barnier, during a private meeting Monday that the government is not pursuing a reopening of the withdrawal agreement” 
WATCH | Remoaner MPs told voters they'd accept the referendum result. Now they're doing their best to subvert our vote and keep us chained to Brussels. Join our huge campaign to deselect them at @Anna_Soubry @NickBoles @heidiallen75 @sarahwollaston 
A Final Say could be on the horizon – here’s how we could get a second Brexit referendum - The Independent  
MP for Derby South Dame Margaret Beckett says she is "very" worried about jobs and the impact on businesses in Derby after #Brexit.   She tells #Ridge she's "come round to the no Brexit option".Follow political updates here:  
Andy Burnham(Mayor Greater Manchester) - A 2nd referendum would cause lasting division in the country for a generation... the only thing worse than a 2nd referendum is a #NoDealBrexit.. at that point I would support a 2nd referendum.#ridge #marr #PeoplesVote #FinalSay 
A month until the cliff edge of Brexit and Scottish Tories are out deceiving people with talk of car parking, yip that’s right CAR PARKING!!Has anyone seen the positive case for Scotland being in the UK yet? 
"It feels like the Tory party is holding the whole country to ransom and that’s not acceptable” says @AndyBurnhamGM of the government's handling of the Brexit negotiations on #Ridge 
.@Peter_Shilton is coming on @LBC at 11.30AM because he feels it’s time he spoke out on the Brexit issue. #FarageOnLBC 
More businesses will collapse, more rich men will leave. Govt/BBC line it’s nothing to do with Brexit/a weird coincidence is unsustainable. 
EU want to minimise No Deal Brexit disruption. Looking to offer access to UK vehicles and air transport services. Let’s see how much coverage this gets vs. what hardline Remainers say ‘could’, ‘may’, or ‘might’ happen.  
Sky News giving airtime today to Labour’s Andy Burnham as he claims his Party’s moral High Ground over Brexit!!!Customs Union or Second Referendum is not what we Brexiteers  voted for!We do not care for Party Divisions any more !Get On With It!Comprende!  
May's Withdrawal agreement from HellA Withdrawal that keeps us in EU to follow EU laws!Years of Implementation with nothing to implement!No trade dealPay £39bn for nothing in return!No matter how you dress it upIt's NOT Leaving & doesn't honour Referendum Result#Brexit #EU 
Poll: If a significant number of Labour MPs help May's deal pass and #Brexit happens on March 29th, the Tories will almost certainly call a General Election, would you vote Labour?#PeoplesVote #StopBrexit 
Far from a fleeting phenomena, the #GiletsJaunes movement is in fact spreading to other countries around the world.  Here's footage from yesterday's #YellowVestsUK turnout in London.  Protesters sing "We will, we will rock you!" #Brexit #LeaveMeansLeave 
What Brexit means;-Free trade with the non-EU world, lower prices, higher competition & productivity-Setting our own regulations for tech, energy, & FS-unskilled immigration is no longer subsidised by the taxpayer-stop paying into EU budget   
Anthony Stewart Head hates #brexit - I love you Paris, I love France & I hate #brexit. #marr #ridge #PeoplesVote #FinalSay 
The announcement that it will be ‘transport business as usual’ in the case of No Deal, was put out by the EU late on Friday night. No shortages or delays. Brexit scaremongers are red-faced as EU chiefs ensure UK transport links will be maintained  
1) measures have been covered multiple times by multiple outlets since first set out2) it’s not a secret deal, but unilateral measures to ensure basic connectivity for a limited period of time. Conditional on UK reciprocating3) as former Brexit Secretary you should know this  
May's dreadful Brexit can only be delivered with Labour votes, but there is no Brexit that will protect jobs & workers' rights. #PeoplesVote #ExitFromBrexit 
My cartoon in this week's @thesundaytimes #Brexit #NationalEmergency  
Most striking read for me this morning the Graham Brady op-ed in the Sunday Times - an overwhelming sense that he just doesn't understand what is happening on Brexit (and is definitely not alone in that among MPs) 1/  
‘Without a withdrawal agreement we risk a combination forming in parliament that will stop Brexit altogether.’  Bring it on!  
It's 40 days until Brexit, when the UK takes back control of our sovereignty, laws, borders, money, trade, fishing waters & agriculture, & prevents the EU from taking control of our armed forces. MPs must not scupper this by voting for Theresa May's dreadful Withdrawal Agreement 
PS: EU citizens have been manning remain stalls for 2+ years; we are, together with our British friends in EU countries, those most affected by Brexit already. So if a supposedly pro-EU March again chooses to exclude us — it would send the most devastating message. 1/ 
It remains extraordinary that leading SNP figures continue to claim, against all the evidence, that independence is a way of protecting Scotland from the disaster of Brexit. In reality it would only increase the economic hardship already being faced by the most vulnerable.  
To all the young people who stood up for the planet & protested in the #ClimateStrike:#Brexit is a very real & present danger to our environment. Remaining in the EU will help us uphold essential environmental protections.Please RT & join the #PutItToThePeopleMarch - 23/3/19. 
This week, Theresa May lost yet another vote in Parliament.Despite countless promises, she’s no closer to fixing her botched Brexit. She’s just running down the clock.  
With Nissan leaving, Dyson deserting, Airbus threatening to leave, Barclays relocating, British Midland failing etc, etc, etc You’d have to be pretty dumb to think Brexit is good for the U.K. This may explain why the likes of @BorisJohnson #AndreaLeadsom@LiamFox support it. 
Brexit supporting richest man in Britain becomes a tax exile & Flybmi collapses because of Brexit but the left Leavers still don’t get it-this is about jobs, livelihoods & families. Brexit is a regressive not progressive movement  
And pursuing #brexit at all costs knowing full well that the referendum result was underpinned by serious levels of illegal activity is at best willful criminal negligence.Which is worse?#votesshouldbefair@A50Challenge @UKEUchallenge @Suewilson91 
We demand a #PeoplesVote, and come 23 March, it could be a case of now or never. Join us as we march on Parliament and demand that Brexit be  #PutItToThePeople. Please sign up & RT:  
This on top of the the damage Brexit will cause to our closest and most valuable trading partners could be disastrous.  
It's inconceivable that the Scottish people, having witnessed the past four and a bit years since the 2014 Referendum, will allow themselves to be so easily duped again, says @Scotpol1314. 
-Brexiter: Jim Ratcliffe, UK’s richest man, plans move Monaco-Brexiter: James Dyson moves company Singapore-Brexiter: John Redwood advises investors to put money abroad-Brexiter: Jacob Rees-Mogg firm opens funds Dublin-Brexiter: Nigel Lawson seeks French residency#Brexit  
Flybmi blames Brexit for collapse as hundreds of passengers left stranded with flights cancelled  
#Brexiter Sir Jim Ratcliffe demonstrates his faith in UK & his belief in #Brexit - by relocating to Monaco to save 4bn a year on taxes. He wanted you to #VoteLeave, you voted Leave, now he's running out on you. Sweet. 
Agreeing a good UK-EU Brexit deal is in our mutual interestsAnd it’s also in our mutual interests to move fast to minimise the issues arising from a WTO terms BrexitHere’s more progress   
A #PeoplesVote on #Brexit is the only course of action that will break the deadlock in Parliament. So join us on 23 March 2019 as we march on Westminster to demand that the government #PutItToThePeopleSign up: Facebook: Please RT 
#PutItToThePeople Because on 25 & 26 March, MPs of all parties say they'll be ready to rally behind a “lethal” amendment that will allow May’s deal to be passed, but only on condition that it's first ratified & approved by the British ppl in a referendum.   
The Brexit ‘mandate’ was never for *whatever* a bunch of ultra RW wingnuts decided they wanted and *however* incompetently they tried to do it.If MPs can’t call it out NOW and save us all from this ERG shitscape, then what’s the point of any of them?#PeoplesVote or #RevokeA50 
Mrs May and Mr Corbyn are complicit in Britain’s drift towards disaster | Andrew Rawnsley | Opinion | The Guardian#catastropheBrexit #Brexit #torybrexit #NoDealBrexit 
The prime minister urged her party to sacrifice "personal preferences" - and said the alternative would be no deal, or no Brexit at all  
Brexit Latest: Hoey criticises Guardian for ignoring carbon costs and EU decisions on Emissions Standards having read the article that cites carbon costs and EU decisions on Emissions Standards.#brexitdenial 
BREXPOSED Scare stories about transport chaos after No Deal Brexit demolished after EU chiefs agree secret deal with Britain to maintain linksBritish planes will continue to fly & lorries drive on the continent, with or without an agreement on March 29 
London: The Daily Express gets angry as EU prepares to deliver humanitarian food aid to British poor in the event of No Deal. #sundaymorning #brexit  
On Brexit, let us go on the facts, not the fantasies; the deeds of its backers and not their words.  
Is Brexit a tragedy or a farce? Britons veer between high anxiety, grim humor amid the disarray over the nation's EU departure  
The fact that Theresa May has written to all tory MPs urging them to 'put their differences over #Brexit aside' suggests she's not secured legally binding changes needed.#GoWTO 
Watch as @Jacob_Rees_Mogg cites Jim Ratcliffe and @INEOS against the Brexit induced problems of the owner of a medium sized chemical company.  Brexit is for billionaires  
ITN news made a big deal  of BMI collapse yesterday, although over capacity and bad management is the real reason they could not resist mainly highlighting Brexit was responsible: their propaganda is now so blatant and obvious, fortunately we are becoming impervious to this bias!  
Dear Brexiters,I'm starting to lose count of your leaders who - after convincing you you'd be better off after Brexit - are personally quitting the UK now we're about to leave.Admit it. You've been had.Regards,Tom.#BrexitForThePlebs 
Been stock-piling roadkill for no-deal Brexit. I've bagged 3 fox, a deer, numerous fowl and 7 head of badger. There is also a lump of something so mangled I'm awaiting dental records. May be a stoat.All will be well at Chez Adder.  
Morrison is doing exactly what Trump’s doing with his wall. Brexit also. Playing on hatred & fear of the *foreigner*, nationalism, racism 
The leaks from Brussels have begun. Unnamed EU "diplomats and officials" have suggested an opt-out for Ireland in the event of no-deal Brexit. Dublin will not have to erect customs infrastructure so no hard border required. The best option from the start..  
If the UK Government does NOT deliver a clean Brexit at 11:00pm on 29 March 2019, how will you react? 
Broken ties with a man I thought was a friend, brexit revealed him to be a closet racist and an 80 minute Welshman. One who dons a Daffodil and sings the anthem with no understanding of the meaning of the words. Imagine a Welshman who thought the Empire was a good thing ? 
Brexit. The gift that keeps on kicking itself in the nuts. 
Why isnt this top of the news cycle ⁦@BBCNews⁩ ⁦@itvnews⁩? Scare stories about transport chaos after No Deal Brexit demolished after EU chiefs agree secret deal with Britain to maintain links ⁦@TheSun⁩ ⁦@BorisJohnson⁩ 
Efforts have apparently been made to keep Sir David Attenborough quiet about Brexit in favour of far more globally highly respected figures like Lord Digby JonesSo please RT this to redress the balance  
Time to show Government the “Will of the People”.On 23rd March we’ll be marching for a chance for everyone to vote with more information in a legally run referendum.Can we get above a million? #PeoplesVoteMarch #PutItToThePeople 
Britain will see a recession in the next year, says Professor @MazzucatoM of University College London  
After an intensive weekend @MunSecConf discussing global affairs, security and #brexit, I am now travelling back to Brussels to continue discussions with UK gov this week. Time is very short...  
USA has already said they will press for post #Brexit reductions in UK food standards so they can send their produce here. This would leave UK farmers little choice but to lower their standards to compete. This is one of the best reasons to #Remain. 
The irony of French-made blue passports that cannot be imported to the UK because a no deal Brexit means that no trade agreement will be in place to allow the blue passports to enter the UK. 
Genuine Irish fears that to satisfy her ultras @theresamay is prepared to destroy two countries not just the one she nominally leads ... Editorial: 'EU cannot allow us to burn as may fiddles over brexit' -  
More than 100,000 members have joined Nigel Farage's new Brexit party  
Oh and British ex pats living in the EU have been told to get health insurance because the NHS won’t fund their treatment after a No Deal Brexit. 
Brexit billboard crusaders: Four 'working dads' are holding politicians to account  
Looks like it was Kate Hoey, who said it was rising fuel prices (caused by falling £) and uncertainty over being part of an EU emissions group. Not Brexit, no. The woman has the IQ of a house plant.  
There are 376 victims of this one Brexit business collapse. You’ll not hear the voice of a single one on the BBC.  
Majority of people want MPs to have free vote on Brexit deal, new poll shows.The public think MPs should be given a free vote on May's deal.The public should have a free vote too! #OnlyWayForward 
Full BBC online coverage of Put it to the People march ... Campaigners for another referendum on Brexit have said there will be a major protest the weekend before Britain's scheduled departure date on 29 March. IT FITS IN A TWEET!! 
Ministers scramble to undo the damage of Brexit to UK citizens living in EU who will have to pay for healthcare  
I agree with theSunday  express. They voted to starve and here is Brussels planning the undermine the will of the people by sending food aid to Britain's poor if it's no deal #Brexit  
“History will judge us all”?This is a Prime Minister who triggered Article 50 without a plan. Bribed the DUP with £1bn and deliberately ran down the clock towards a no-deal Brexit to spook MPs into voting for her terrible Brexit deal. History will be a harsh judge of her.  
While voters can't understand why UK has to ask the EU's permission to trade under any World trade deals it does during the many years of PM May's and Mr Corbyn's (never ending) Transition? This is not BREXIT in any shape or form.  
With Sky News talking of possible food parcels from Europe in the event of a “No Deal Brexit”without appearing greedy or opportune I am partial to a Hock of Wild Boar,White Truffles,washed down with a bottle of Cognac!Do you need my full Postal Address? 
Brexiters busily taking their businesses or themselves abroad, getting EU passports for their children or obtaining residency rights in other EU countries is truly appalling but also typical of the rich elites backing Brexit for us but not for them. 
Another Brexiter who tells us Brexit is going to be great - but decides he cannot stay in Britain to enjoy the greatness.  
Join me on the #PutItToThePeople March on March 23 where we will be demanding a #PeoplesVote on the #Brexit deal:  
LETS BE CLEAR - CAN ANY ONE ANSWER THIS  - How can HMGov demand British Councils prepare for Brexit when not one council knows what Brexit is yet? More importantly HMGov dont know what Brexit is yet!!!!! 
blog: The 'Put it to the People' march might be the last chance to stop the Brexit Elite destroying Britain  
If MP’s won’t accept Brexit they should  resign .......  
#PutItToThePeople march demanding fresh referendum to take place days before Brexit  
How the Treasury, Bank of England and Civil Service have let us down over Brexit, says Professor Patrick Minford @Econs4FreeTrade 
Attn Mrs#MayYour letter for’Unity’to your MPs over Brexit is entirely down to your craven “Keep Everybody Happy!”style which you have also tried on your now deeper split country!Your record as a Minister was poor, as a PM even worse!A letter of resignation is now due! 
Billionaire Brexiteer James Ratcliffe planning to save £4bn in tax with Monaco move Boss of fracking company INEOS argued EU  'no longer competitive' because of environmental regulationAnother Brexit rat leaving the ship he helped to scuttle 
U.K. hereI think the damage done to the US by p45 and his cronies is similar to the damage Brexit and their supporters have done to usI believe we are in ww3 and Democracy is under attackAi has weaponised social media, targeting its victims into acts of self destruction 
All Aberdeen flybmi flights cancelled as Brexit blamed for airline’s collapse  
'IGNORE THEM!' Chief economist TEARS APART Brexit fear-mongers in STEP-BY-STEP take-down  
Thanks @DominicRaab good news that will ease the pain, we can't believe that this makes wto and Brexit a good thing though. In my view it shows Europe's human side, also that we should remain. 
Scare stories about transport chaos after WTO Brexit demolished as EU chiefs agree secret deal with Britain to maintain links. British planes will continue to fly into Europe and lorries can drive on the continent.  
EXCLUSIVE: Senior Labour MPs Accuse Met Police of  'Cover-Up' and 'Unacceptable Delays' in Investigating Brexit Crimes  via @BylineTimes 
No Deal Brexit would be far smoother than Project Fear scaremongers would have us believe, says The Sun on Sunday  
Could a referendum on a United Ireland be the solution? #Think32 
#Brexit is not a move towards isolationism and separatism, but a chance for the #UK to re-establish its close relationships with the #Anglosphere, #Commonwealth and #CANZUK countries.#cdnpoli #auspol #nzpol #ukpolitics 
Make sure you are never judged as the 'nearly man', Keir. So obviously a choice for @UKLabour leader but, happy to sit on the fence allowing the #Brexit catastrophe to flow over him. STEP UP, for God's sake! Bring unity back to our party and country. #PutItToThePeople  
My amendment for the EU Deal only to be agreed in Parliament subject to a public vote will be re-tabled … Remainers plan mass march and key vote in last days before Brexit | Politics | The Guardian   
Brexit: BBC legend David Dimbleby announcing the EU Referendum Result in June 2016.  
Every week at PMQs, Theresa May LIES to Parliament and to the British people. She says "If you dont want a no deal Brexit, you must accept a deal". It's a monumental porkie! There is another option - a far better option. Parliament can end #Brexit uncertainty. #RevokeArticle50 
#ProjectFear Get ready for another day of Project Fear from usual crybaby Remoaner bores toady. We’ve heard it all before 2016 Referendum from George Osborne, Mark Carney, back of the queue Barack Obama trade deal with . 17.4 million still voted leave E.U. Shut up   
Given that @EAukot 's #PUNGUZAMIZIGO referendum presently has the clearest and most practical proposals for Constitution change, including over 1m signatures in endorsement, why is Kenya's media persistent in giving it a blackout....?....@gathara @dailynation @citizentvkenya 
The EU is, roughly, the Kaiser's plan for post-WW1 Europe: a Teutonic centre & currency plus a cooperative/vassal periphery. This is not some conspiracy but the EU working as it should esp where its economic & organisational centre lies. It is also what makes #Brexit inevitable. 
Brexit 'airbags' being tested by business with 40 days to exit day: KPMG  
Referendum split: Ruto takes on Raila.  
Their airlines are shutting. Thdy csnt handle Brexit. All of Mayfair, Chelsea is sold to Russians Arabs etc. Lords are landless. No money to pay NHS but will mock a test run Indian train. Sore losers.   
We stand on the brink of a historic, national collapse – it’s time to take to the streets to stop Brexit | @davidlammy | #PutItToThePeople 
May to hold Brexit talks with EU's Juncker; urges party unity  
Sick to the back teeth of the emboldening of the racist right. This toxicity isn't because of Brexit, brexit too is somewhat a symptom. It's the result of years of immigrant blaming & dog whistling from rags like the s*n & Daily Fail. We desperately need reform.  
UK PM May to hold Brexit talks with EU's Juncker; urges party unity  
Mauro Ranallo tees up Paul Daley vs. MVP:"Two brash Brits looking to tear each other to bits. This rivalry, more contentious than Brexit, only one can exit with the most significant win of his career." 
It has been more then 7 months and nothing!Justice delayed is justice denied!We need now public enquiry into all Brexit crimes including Met and NCA conduct and cover-up!  
U.K. Could Be Kicked Out Of Newly Launched Pharma Tech Security System Because Of Brexit  
We need a wide public enquiry that includes Met and NCA conduct!@metpoliceuk and NCA are failing to investigate Brexit crimes.Brexit is a crime that leads to the top of UK government!!! 
Paying less tax to the country they claim to love so much is the real reason so many wealthy people supported Brexit, it was never about the forgotten working man. 
Our new march will show MPs there is a price to pay if they allow such a damaging Brexit | @campbellclaret | #FinalSay 
The Sunday Express says that the EU is planning food aid for deprived areas of Britain in the event of a No Deal Brexit. They should give it to the gillets jaunes. And the unemployed youth of Club Med. 
The news agency of a country that had one of its major airports shut down for 3 days because of drones and is in a self inflicted Brexit fiasco making fun of a snag on a train that was on its trial run.   
If only we'd voted YES in 2014!We'd be watching the Brexit Shitshow unfold, with a totally different perspective.DON'T MAKE THE SAME MISTAKE AGAIN!#ChooseScotland#IndyRef2#VoteYES#DissolveTheUnion 
Brexit: Theresa May urges Tory MPs to unite and back deal  
LONDON CALLING!@KTHopkins 100% right on this:Regardless of your back ground, if you’re a #Brexit #LeaveEU person, it’s time we fought together as one!@UKIP @ForBritainParty @Conservatives@_BrexitTory @KurlyKrissy @saperkins @RosinaFrance 
What's Labour's Brexit position? There's some rank hypocrisy in Labour's Brexit policyBack in 2017 @jeremycorbyn whipped MPs to vote for Article 50Now Labour demand No Deal is taken off the table but won't vote for a Deal which would achieve just that  
UK's May to speak to every EU leader in bid to break #Brexit deadlock  
EXCLUSIVE: Scotland on Sunday front page reveals that WILLIE RENNIE IS OPPOSED TO AN INDEPENDENCE REFERENDUM.  This is sensational.  #WinningWithWillie 
Remainers, hold your nerve. May is no nearer to her Brexit deal | Martin Kettle  
UK regional airline Flybmi goes into administration blaming Brexit  
Flybmi goes into administration - all flights cancelled “directors say Brexit has been the major contributor to its demise” 400 people will lose their jobs.  
Brexit extremism is going nowhere. Now the moderate millions must act  
More worries about any European Defence Union. One of Belgium’s spy chiefs has just been arrested for spying for Russia. A German newspaper says that the EU has been informed of 250 Chinese and 200 Russian spies in Brussels. And Remainers say that Brexit threatens our security! 
Love it that the #FBPE crowd has jumped on this to attack Corbyn.  Mail has done more than most over the years to blame "foreigners" and EU for this countries problems and line us up for brexit and empower the right wing of an already right wing government.  
A teenager explains why he supports Brexit. 
Absurd amount of stuff happened in last 24h-ish...- Flybmi airline collapsed, partly due to Brexit-related carbon credit trading issues- Dyson job cut revelations- Secret Home Office plan to embed immigration officers inside large firms 
Brexit no-deal is better than a bad deal says leading DUP MP while senior Tory warns quitting EU without agreement would have 'very adverse affect' on UK economy ...  via @MailOnline 
Is this the fastest ever petition to the govt to exceed 100K signatures?We think it is.Mounting evidence that Britain doesn't want #Brexit#RevokeA50 #PeoplesVote #StopBrexit#Marr #Ridge #SundayMorning#PutItToThePeople 
There are only 40 days left until  #BREXIT and #FREEDOM for #BRITAIN ! #StandUp4Brexit #LeaveMeansLeave #NoDeal #WTO 
You are without question one of the toxic politicians I’ve ever encountered. Flybmi explicitly stated they’ve gone into administration because of Brexit. Take responsibility for what you and others did. The rising carbon costs are a direct result of Brexit!!!  
Typical under funded Airline blames a Brexit Britain even before we Brexit.Perhaps they should look more closely at their inefficiency and lack of planning.  
History will judge those who sacrificed Britain’s best interests in a futile attempt at Tory unity.The PM’s deal leaves us worse off, is not what was sold, and means we’ll be talking about Brexit for years to come.History will judge anyone who facilitates Brexit.  
Conference delegates who wrote Labour Party Brexit policy, very clear @jeremycorbyn is NOT following that policyMy petition to Labour NEC gets a mention in their letter to @jeremycorbynThanks a million and brilliant work @Fionafof 
We have many good NI/UK journalists. To those who don't challenge the steady stream of Brexit Unicorns:"If someone says it's raining, and another person says it's dry, it's not your job to quote them both. Your job is to look out the fucking window and find out which is true." 
Theresa May writes to all Tory MPs, a bibbly babbly letter that pretends only one amendment was passed a couple of weeks ago (Brady) while ignoring the majority against a no-deal Brexit. Pick'n'mix Government... just bizarre.  
Some very rich and powerful people have whipped up hate in order to intimidate politicians and the country into accepting a #Brexit which will make them even richer and more powerful. 
And I am with you all the way @Femi_Sorry - @OFOCBrexit the ones who have to deal with Brexit and it’s consequences do not want it to happen and know it is economically and internationally damaging. #brexit  
Come off it. Any opposition to Brexit has come from the backbenches, and all power to them. Corbyn (and by extension, the front bench) has been weak, has been ambivalent and has been deliberately vague. He wants Brexit, but without any responsibility for it. Own that. 
Brexit could put patients lives at risk...sick people, young and old may well die due to lack of staff, medicines and equipment. Scotland has a life boat from this utter stupidity, let’s use it #NewScotland 
“Brexit and beyond” ... a tad premature, but… By Jim Dornan -  
"Yes, yes, yes, yes." On the streets of Havana, it's hard to escape the government's campaign urging voters to endorse the Communist country's new Constitution in a February 24 referendum  
Newspaper headlines: Richest man quits UK and Brexit food aid plan  
It occurs to me that Brexit lacks a patron saint. The ideal choice is St Boniface. Born Winfred in Devon in 675. An English exceptionalist, he went to convert the Dutch Frisians, believing that only the English cd convert their ancestors. The Frisians disagreed & martyred him. 
Thank you, @sarahwollaston ! You have been one of the consistently sensible voices in this whole catastrophe and we will remember that. You will be on the right side of history when future generations read about Brexit. 
Sat March 23rd for STOP BREXIT march in London!  
If we’re still fucking about with Brexit by then, we should be storming the Palaces.Failing that, I’ll turn up with an amusing sign again.  
#flybmi goes belly-up blaming the uncertainties surrounding Brexit leaving Derry without a direct air link to London. DUP MP Gregory Campbell expresses "concern". It's a bit late for that now sunshine. 
Which basically means those people that support it do so because Brexit is whatever they happen to have imagined it to be.  
#brexit must be cancelled because of this terrorism. If it is seen to succeed our democracy will die. Female MPs have been forced to move house and hire bodyguards as tensions over Brexit fuel intimidation and abuse #PeoplesVote #brexit 
Plans for the next protest against Brexit have been revealed.  
I don't know about you but I voted to leave the EU when we had the referendum I didn't  vote on leaving the EU depending on whether or not we have a deal- and the EU has made it clear on numerous occasions that no deal can be negotiated whilst we are still apart of it 
Remainers, please note. When a company that leaves the U.K. or fails, and says that the reason is Brexit, they don’t mean it. That’s project fear. It has nothing to do with Brexit 
Remainers plan mass march and key vote in last days before Brexit  
Latest hot take from the @BBC: majority of Irish people now want to leave the EU and join the UK.Proof: they read something by Ruth Dudley Edwards, Brendan O'Neill and Ray Bassett #brexit 
Jeremy Corbyn has been accused of betraying the party’s Brexit policy by the delegates who wrote it, as they demand he finally backs a Final Say referendum on #Brexit Such a pity it's taken so long for people to see through JC's public image.#PeoplesVote 
The last time the eurozone went into recession, our growth slowed slightly for obvious reasons. At the time they decided to blame George Osborne and 'austerity', and totally ignore the eurozoneThis time, it's 'brexit'.Remember. It's never the eurozone. All hail the eurozone. 
what’s the most important March 29th eventRT for Club Penguin Shut DownLike for Brexit  
Pretty damning from collapsed UK airline Flybmi: ‘Current trading and future prospects have also been seriously affected by the uncertainty created by the Brexit process, which has led to our inability to secure valuable flying contracts in Europe.’ 
Jim Ratcliffe joins other Brexit  patriots like Lord Ashcroft, James Dyson, the Barclay twins, Louise Mensch, Lord Lawson, Richard Littlejohn, Rupert Murdoch, Steve Hilton and Vladimir Putin who all love Brexit so much that they choose to live in other countries 
Typical lie. The Guardian is quoting from the airline's own press release. The carbon emissions point is a consequence of Brexit. Take some responsibility for your actions.  
Predictions of a financial exodus from the City of London post-referendum have come to nothing and this weekend London has been named as the top European city for international technology talent for the second consecutive year. 
Over a million people expected. Tell your friends, family, work colleagues, everyone.Brexit will fail, but only if we take action. If you are not angry, you are not paying attention. Direct that anger against brexit, pushed through on the back of criminality #fightback 
Labour green group urges Corbyn to back second Brexit vote  
Hello @theresa_may, can I just bring up the start to your second paragraph “While the motion was not a binding one...” Do you mean just like the referendum itself was not legally binding? 
At this point, prominent Brexit wankers could be pictured holding a placard that says, “LOL, YOU DAFT CUNTS, THIS IS GONNA BE SHIT FOR YOU, WE JUST DID IT TO MAKE A FUCKTON OF MONEY,” and the thick racists who voted for it would still be insisting they knew what they were doing. pic.twitter.com/mBQGPZkWCC 
This is brilliant!Brexit extremism is going nowhere. Now the moderate millions must act | Nick Cohen | Opinion | The Guardian  
Yes but she’s the Prime Minister who only got the job because of Brexit. It was literally her one job & it’s been a total disaster. Like you, I’m dismayed by Labour but this is primarily her mess because of badly she’s played her hand. 
Not friends but people i know who.own very large businesses. Laying off brexiters first - its exactly what they voted for znd they are prepated for short term pain. And I for once wouldnt object to some police brutality - its what most the brexit gammon would like to see  
So this firm, FlyBMI, explicitly say they are collapsing is due to Brexit, and this deluded woman along with other Brexiteers say it is for other reasons as if they know the airline industry better than airline industry bosses. I have nothing but contempt for these nihilists.  
Demand a final say on Brexit! 23rd March London.  
#PutItToThePeople march demanding fresh referendum to take place days before Brexit  
Don't cry for me, I'm an arseholeThe truth is, I've loads of moneyIt might not sound pleasantDon't care for peasantsBrexit unemployment?No fly in my ointment 
Chair of Economists for Leave TEARS APART Brexit fear-mongers in STEP-BY-STEP take-down "My advice to the British people is to ignore the terrible economics of the ongoing Project Fear as you got it right and our public ‘servants’ have got it all wrong" 
2/ In a healthy democracy it would have been explained that the referendum was advisory. The right to oppose #Brexit would have been respected, there would have been no lies that A50 was irrevocable, no hiding of critical information & no cover-ups & complicity in electoral crime 
Join us to march for a public vote and remain on 23 March. Details and sign up to follow. We can Stop Tory Brexit.  
Majority of people want MPs to have free vote on Brexit deal, new poll shows  
We stand on brink of a historic, national collapse - time to take to the streets to stop Brexit /#Brexit #FinalSay 
Remainers if the worse should happen remember, every leaver insists they knew exactly what they were voting for and therefore knowingly voted to do terrible things to their own people if after  #Brexit they claim they were stupid or conned don't accept their excuses 
The British people will be marching for a #PeoplesVote on May’s #brexit deal on Saturday 23 March in Central #London. #skynews #ridge #marr 
'There is a time beyond Brexit and a world beyond Europe'  
I'm an innovator. Why am I moving my new business? Because the UK doesn't have the skills to deliver it - not enough programmers with the right skills. Before Brexit they were readily available from the EU. Now they don't come. 
Surprising (or is it?) that @BBCNews reports the bankruptcy of #Flybmi without highlighting that the company blames it in part on #Brexit. That inconvenient fact was only mentioned well into the detail. 
I think we should take a minute to MARVEL at the humongous coincidence of companies and jobs leaving the UK, investment pull-outs, NHS staff leaving, hate crime and fascist ideologies rising, etc...ALL happening alongside #Brexit but having FA to do with it. #Unfuckingbelievable 
“a huge march in London on Sat 23 March, aimed at demonstrating the scale of public anxiety about the two Brexit options May is offering, which will conclude with speeches outside the Palace of Westminster. Hundreds of thousands are expected to attend.”  
Brexit backstop: No deal better than bad deal says Dodds  
Incredible. Help to buy. Garden Bridge scandal millions. Naively too close to China. Making zero preparations for aftermath of losing the referendum. Still lecturing his former colleagues. Unbelievable cheek.  
.@Independent editorial: Let us march once more for a Final Say on Brexit #PutItToThePeople 
People's Vote campaign announces London march for weekend before Brexit day  
Brexit is 'definitely a contributor' towards #flybmi's collapse, an aviation expert has told ITV News  
MUST-READ: #PutItToThePeople march demanding Final Say referendum to take place March 23rd  
Young people are at the end of their tether – which is why we'll march for a #FinalSay on Brexit | @kubared 
If you persist in talking as though the key question of Brexit was one of trade and the economy, you are wholly complicit in betraying this country. Brexit is an abomination because it is full frontal assault on the fundamental values of a decent society. That's the issue. 
Remainers plan mass march and key vote in last days before Brexit  
The Referendum decision was the people’s choice & it is being wrested from them by their rulers. If the politicians betray the Referendum there can be no pretence that we still live in a democracy. Brexit will be the acid test.  
ANNOUNCEMENT It’s time to march again! Whatever MPs decide about #Brexit they must #PutItToThePeople. Join us, March 23rd in London to demand a #PeoplesVote for women, for everyone. #StillMarching 
We stand on the brink of a historic, national collapse – it’s time to take to the streets to stop Brexit | @davidlammy | #PutItToThePeople 
No deal is a million times better than the nonsense deal May is trying to push through. The eople wont stand for any more delay or dithering in delivering Brexit.  Let’s get on with it. 
MUST-READ: the #PeoplesVote campaign plan mass march and key vote in last days before Brexit - the cross-party alliance aims to build pressure on MPs in the run-up to 29 March. Please RT:   
It's high noon for Brexit, and we're taking to the streets. Join us in London on 23/3 as we march for a #PeoplesVote - it's going to be massive.It's time to #PutItToThePeople -  
pfffffft. i'll get behind it, but all the grassroots' feedback is that people are moving away from a #PeoplesVote and would rather just #RevokeA50 at this point.Brexit is a terrible idea and we know that now for certain.perhaps our placards should make that clear.  
So the schoolchildren raise your ire by marching peacefully for the future of the Earth yet we hear nothing from you about the Brexit Yellow Jackets kicking off in Haymarket today causing trouble and tying police  up for hours bringing mob violence onto the streets again?  
This is terrible news. It's the only flight between Derry and London. Derry is doing well but it's having to cope with a mental health epidemic, Brexit uncertainty and nutjobs who want to bring back the bomb and bullet. And now this.  
It cannot be doubted that May is a Hard Brexiter when she raises with alarm the prospect of Brexit being stopped & suggests this is harmful to democracy.Electoral fraud, Russian interference, dirty money, pandering to fascists like Mogg - THAT is the danger to our democracy.  
No matter what I read about Brexit, I cannot make sense of what the UK is doing. Possible reasons:1. Well, it doesn't make sense. To anyone.2. Don't know enough about UK history culture politics.3. Not reading the right things.4. Some unexamined belief keeps tripping me up. 
Absolutely right. We know so much more about Brexit than we did in 2016. Britain should be able to think again and #StopBrexit. 
Airline Flybmi has gone into immediategoes administration - all flights cancelled due to: "inability to secure valuable flying contracts in Europe and lack of confidence around bmi's ability to continue flying between destinations in Europe". #Brexit  
What will happen in your view to Britain?#brexit #VoteLeaveBrokeTheLaw 
Thursday, 9 March 2017: Asked on leaving the Embassy, if he’d been visiting Julian Assange, the former Ukip leader said he could not remember what he had been doing in the building.' 
I am so sick of the shit the ERG sprout. I am sick of the lies, I am sick of peoples ignorance of the EU and the benefits we all share, I simply sick of Brexit and the damage it continues to do. 
I would like to think we have reached peak Paul Sweeney here, but I think he has capacity to talk even more BS than this.Sad thing is, I actually think he believes what he's shovelling. Luckily, some of his own colleagues don't & voted with us.#Brexit #BrexitShambles #Article50 
Brexit extremism is going nowhere. Now the moderate millions must act.Britain doesn’t have to follow the Leavers over the cliff. There’s still time for a U-turn.Take action. Join a political party. Write to your MP. Demand #RevokeA50 & #Remain. 
I await some Brexit Tosser from down the pub telling us that 'Its nothing to do with Brexit'.Project Reality, folks.  
Because May, Hammond, Robbins *want* Customs Union and BRINO.  Conservatives will pay a devastating electoral price for Brexit betrayal. 
They say the people don’t want another referendum, those that say this are scared of the people that decide  
We're literally all going to die.Stop trying to appease imaginary racists in Nuneaton and just fucking oppose Brexit. Stop pissing about. Okay?  
Here's the front page of tomorrow's Sunday National: Warning over Brexit drugs move that could put patients at risk, as legislation is snuck through 'without even minimum of scrutiny'  
If anyone cares to go to Companies House and look at the accounts, they will see that the company has been making large losses since 2015. For the year ending March 2016, they lost 1.1 million. That was before the referendum even took place. 
Seeing a lot of tweets crowing about how Brexit was behind this. flybmi might be right about Brexit’s negative effects, but also it lost money well before Brexit was a thing:2013: -£4.5m2014: -£11.5m2015: -£10.9m2016: -£700,0002017: -£4m 
Almost the perfect Brexit story. The Express fulminates as it finds out that the EU is preparing to deliver food aid to Blighty in the event of No Deal. Obviously, starvation would be a better option than accepting help from perfidious Brussels.   #tomorrowspaperstoday 
Wise up, Nigel. You supported Brexit.Brexit destabilises everything. Including the union. DUP have no strategy other than self interest. Guiding Star is a nice touch though. Sounds like a nursery rhyme  
# Brexit Owen Jones out on another march with school children. Unbelievable they all look older than the MANBOY. Who’s 34 looks 10 Owen Jones. He spends all his time talking bollocks & marching. Done over 200 by now doesn’t know what he’s marching about most time.  
I’ve been trawling thru Flymbi’s accounts all the way back to 2010 & gave up. Big losses for British Midland Regional Ltd (registered in Scotland) every year. Blame it on Brexit if you will, but this is simply a loss-making business that investors have decided to walk away from. 
Tories plan to crown Boris Johnson PM in exchange for supporting Theresa May's Brexit deal  
Sunday Express: EU food aid for no-deal Britain.  #Brexit  
The same people who were adamant we should not “politicise” the murder of an MP by a Far Right extremist in the run up to the last referendum now claim the threat of right wing violence should mean we should not hold another. 
No deal Brexit: sensible policy calculationLiving wage: gunboat diplomacy  
I can't wait for Brexit as It will bring us closer to our wonderful American Cousins.   
The state of current Brexit tweets about Ireland. Some claiming Irish people increasingly want to leave the EU & brushing aside the evidence of polls. Others claiming the decision will be moot because the EU will force Ireland out first.Could they BE more blatant? 
While the Gov claim #Brexit provides an opportunity to create a Global Britain, FlyBMI name Brexit as one of the reasons for their demiseThe truth is, any Brexit puts jobs and livelihoods at risk. How many more jobs will be lost before a #PeoplesVote and a #exitfrombrexit ? 
I see no evidence of a mass movement backing Brexit beyond a one-off protest vote in 2016.  
I cannot seen any advantage accruing to any state, by removing the freedom of movement from its citizens. It is practically cost-neutral, especially by providing willing and reasonable seasonal workers for different purposes throughout Europe, when they are needed and valued most 
Kamala. Harris. Is. The. One. Trying. To. Make. The. Primary. A. Referendum. On. Her. Blackness. To. Distract. From. Her. Record. As. A. District. Attorney. 
UK airline flybmi files for bankruptcy citing Brexit  
Opinium: if referendum on PM's deal vs Remain, 46% Remain, 35% deal  
Of course, we're not being excluded from the scheme out of spite... it's because of Brexit, as we keep saying we'll be out on 29 March so it's impossible to participate in a market trading *annual* permits. 
Brexit or Remain dear Twitter?48,492 votes last time, and over half a million reads.Remain always has been our best option, it remains our best option.If you agree then let’s end the weekend with some optimism.Please retweet your view, thank you.Our best option is to 
A blast from the recent past... Theresa May is like a toddler paddling in the ocean of Brexit.  
They were conned - Brexit was stupud people who thought all their problems and the UKs were caused by a few immigrants. So easy for the tax dodgers to exploit that - they don't have to deliver it either - they've achieved their aim once we're out by 1st April  
I flew with FlyBmi from Brussels to Nuremberg to do a talk about Brexit. A British airline flying between two EU27 cities - something which I remarked at the event would be much harder after Brexit.Today’s announcement is another sad and avoidable consequence of this tragedy  
Today’s New York Times Newspaper @nytimes ‘How a ‘No-Deal’ Brexit Could Create Irish Unity’ #think32 
The #flybmi press release make it entirely clear that #Brexit was a key factor in this collapse. No question mark needed. I thinking about the 326 employees who are without jobs - the latest from this monumental act of national self harm but, sadly, they won’t be the last.  
The brexit debacle has at least,informed us all how thick, arrogant and incompetent Tory politicians are....covered up for years by an outstanding civil service. It's just the idiot politicians have given the civil service a problem that can't be solved. Brexit 
The Backstop is designed to permanently keep the UK as a whole in the Customs Union and much of the Single Market - the complete opposite of what the people voted for in the referendum.  
This is the rubbish Nigel Farage was peddling, pity more journalists in the UK didn't take Claire Byrne's approach on RTE, stopping him every time he tells a lie....which is most of the time. 
This one hundred times over. We can have a Brexit that hurts like hell or one where we are in such close orbit to EU, there’s no point.  
Flybmi - Brexit uncertainty has meant we have gone bust. Government - You’re talking nonsense! What does an airline know about how airlines are run! It’s obviously nothing to do with Brexit! The four letter word Johnson approach to business in action. #BrexitShambles #flybmi 
“Senior EU diplomat”. The most senior EU diplomats are Juncker & Tusk while Barnier handles #brexit - haven’t heard them say anything remotely like this. Only concern is for the inability of the UK to get their house in order over what is their own idea. 
If only we did have Margaret Thatcher running Brexit!  
Flybmi spokesperson: “Current trading and future prospects have also been seriously affected by the uncertainty created by the Brexit process.” Real people losing real jobs. More pressure on Theresa May.  
Labour Green group urges Corbyn to back second Brexit vote  
105k signatures now. Don't stop. Carry on sharing and signing. Petition: Revoke Art.50 if there is no Brexit plan by the 25 of February  
Flybmi collapses: "Seriously affected by the uncertainty created by the Brexit process, which led to our inability to secure valuable flying contracts in Europe & lack of confidence around bmi’s ability to continue flying between destinations in Europe"  
In tomorrow's Sunday National ... @Feorlean on normalcy bias and Brexit  
Amazing that the BBC are still putting the doom and gloom of Brexit over everything. It simply isnt true. Mays floundering and messing about is causing most of the uncertainty. But the eu and its financial mess isnt helping, nor their insistance on fuel hikes, diesel etc  
Remoaners, project fear , get over it. Ever wonder who fed you these lines to try and shut people up who are warning you that you're being conned and lied to.  Follow the money the tax avoidance laws and google that brexit funder Crispin Odey - you made him 200 million quid  
41 DAY TO CRAZY #BREXIT Whatever the outcome - Deal or no dealWe are all being damaged now and we will continue to be damaged in the future Time to get out of this mess #unityref Airline Flybmi ceases operations 
‘A Downing Street source said that while the company had highlighted Brexit, there were lots of reasons cited for the airline’s failure in their statement’Yet again, Brexiters try to deny the actual stated reasons businesses give  
.@thomasbrake on why the collapse of @flybmi shows that we need to divert away from the chaos Brexit is causing   
And another reminder of his role in the Vote Leave fraud: 
.@ChrisLeslieMP - Collapse of flybmi latest blow to UK business caused by #Brexit:  
Before all you start blaming Brexit about #flybmi going under just remember the airline carried 522,000 passengers on 29,000 flights in 2018. That's 18 passengers per plane. Now go away remoaners..... 
I would have thought, given you believe there will be no flights after we leave the EU, that they would be booming with people making the most of it.Fact is airlines, badly run, go bust.Several did while we were in the EU, before the Brexit bogeyman kept you awake at night   
Flybmi closing down. 400 people losing their jobs.Brexiters: you said you’d accept the consequences of Brexit. Tell us what that means here. What are you going to do? Are you going to offer to support those people? Or just put on a yellow vest & break some shit up? 
Here’s a poll that everyone can vote on. One couldn’t arrange Brexit in  nearly 3 years  The other is still lagging behind in polls against the one that couldn’t do brexit.  Who’s the biggest failure in British politics 
Oh look, a man smiling while calling for people to be lynched because of their political views.But no, of course, it would be a new referendum that would enable and encourage the far right, and definitely not Brexit itself.   
In tomorrow's Sunday National ..., @Dr_PhilippaW on the full scale of the Brexit threat to health care  
Just wanna shout out a big thank you to the #Remainers out there. Without your consistent blocking and incessant whinging, we wouldn’t have got to this stage where a #NoDealBrexit is a legitimate possibility. We’d most likely have a trade deal instead! #brexit #LeaveEU 
Straight up false Ms Dickinson. Last poll put Irish support for remaining in the EU at 92%, jog on with your #irexit & the unfolding chaos that you’ve caused with your #Brexit   
Yes, that's why #Brexit has to be stopped. If it isn't, we're doomed. #RevokeArticle50 
Today Brexit thugs causing trouble on London streets. I've been on 4 Remain marches, up to 700,000 people and acted as march steward. Behaviour exemplary.  I know which Britain I prefer. #StopBrexitSaveBritain @Devon4Europe 
I am really sorry but we never fail to keep to our promise!!!!a call for #REFERENDUM and self-determination is never a call for war that should be used against the indigenous people of Biafra!!This is Ebonyi province@Amaka_Ekwo @nlitvin @EmekaGift @MaziNnamdiKanu 
Nigel, believe me, no deal is going to be very bad as is is the May deal .  It would be a service to your constituents & the whole country if you stopped inhaling your own rhetoric now...Brexit backstop: No deal better than bad deal says Dodds - BBC News  
We have a corrupt Government pursuing a corrupt Brexit process. Those in power that fail to stop it are tainted with the same corruption and will go downing history as complicit. It's that simple now. #StopBrexit #RevokeA50 
#Brexit is a destructive act, which there is neither a majority in WM or the electorate for, being enacted on the 'validity' of an almost 3yr old ref which, had it been LEGALLY BINDING, would've been INVALIDATED by the EC for proven law-breaking. Democracy? Don't think so. 
Another #Brexit casualty , but the Prime Minister carries on wasting time in order to get her way, if she can......Airline Flybmi ceases operations - BBC News  
Impressive pro-independence demonstration of half a million people in Barcelona to protest against referendum trial in Madrid. @OmniumIntl 
And if Labour don’t try to put a stop to Brexit, they will go down as accomplices. Labour used to fight the far-right, not appease it. 
Airline #flybmi cites Brexit as a reason for its demise “Current trading and future prospects have also been seriously affected by uncertainty created by the Brexit process, which has led to our inability to secure valuable flying contracts in Europe." 
#Lavrov: Top leaders of the West came to #Skopje to openly campaign for the Yes vote at the referendum. And still it is #Russia that is being accused of interfering in #Macedonia  
FlyBMI has collapsed, putting over 400 jobs at risk, saying that it has been “seriously affected by the uncertainty created by the Brexit process”No one voted for job losses#PeoplesVote #Biz4PV 
This is what a no deal Brexit looks like.  
They have acted like carnivores who used the world to enrich only themselves, and whether it's the election of Donald Trump, or Brexit, the elites have realized that the people have stopped listening to them, that the people want to regain control of their destiny. Marine Le Pen  
Take 'ticking time bomb' no-deal Brexit off the table George Osborne tells Theresa May. That’s the Very Reason to Leave It On The Table!  
flybmi; "We sincerely regret that this course of action has become the only option open to us, but the challenges, particularly those created by Brexit, have proven to be insurmountable." 
flybmi; "Current trading and future prospects have also been seriously affected by the uncertainty created by the Brexit process, which has led to our inability to secure valuable flying contracts in Europe " 
Desperately sad news for the staff and customers of @flybmi#Brexit strikes again...and we haven’t even left yet.The most frustrating thing is, it doesn’t have to be this way.   
Flybmi are squarely blaming Brexit for the airlines collapse into administration. 
The filing for administration of one of the UKs biggest airlines because of Brexit meaning huge job losses and Scottish Tories are taking about car parks  
.@ChrisLeslieMP - Collapse of flybmi latest blow to UK business caused by #Brexit:  #PeoplesVote 
Will Brexiters who said no job would be lost due to #brexit respond to this?British regional airline #Flybmi (employing 450 staff) has collapsed with all flights cancelled with immediate effect, saying Brexit had created uncertainty in the industry. 
Oh yeah?@jeremycorbyn is aiding  and abetting the PM on her #Brexit mission, every inch of the way. Brexit is Jeremy and @theresa_may's joint enterprise.They will both be found guilty. 
Back in London after European Movement events in Middlesbrough, Stockton & Edinburgh. Here for 15 hours then back North to Macclesfield & Nantwich. The message everywhere: STOP BREXIT! 
FlyBMI collapses, blaming Brexit uncertaintyI wonder which 'expert' Brexiter will say it's nothing to do with Brexit. 
'The challenges, particularly those created by Brexit, have proven to be insurmountable.'  
And that’s for everyone who voted Remain. Cause we’re tired of skirting around the issue with witty Buffy quips. Brexit is an absolute disaster. And we live in Belfast so double the angst. 
The Brexit right has failed. May is finished. It’s time to think again. Me in @ObserverUK 
"The company said it had been badly affected by rises in fuel and carbon costs and uncertainty over Brexit"Airline Flybmi ceases operations  
With right-wing thugs on our streets, anti-#Brexit women commentators and MPs shockingly bullied and harrassed on social media, in real life and in Parliament, is it any wonder that Sylvia, below, feels unwelcome and afraid?@Anna_Soubry @HarrietHarman @cliodiaspora @BBCNews 
Great goal from Foden. Superb Stockport locomotion. Close control over rough terrain. Brexit defenders to beat. Lashed it in the onion bag. 4 goals in 11 appearances. They said he would be better off leaving. He didnt listen. He's living his dream & your watching it live on TV. 
The company said it had been badly affected by spikes in fuel and carbon costs and uncertainty over Brexit. 
41 days to go till possible No Deal Brexit catastrofuck:The whole Tory party decides to go batshit crazy about some kids missing a few hours of school because they don’t want to burn up in an extinction event. 
This is me, Indy, getting an early start oan playing fur Scotland puppies in da World Cup  Course we'll be independent by then - poor ol' Brexit rUK won't be able tae get the hauf time oranges through customs never mind send a team tae another country   
Outcry at Corbyn’s plan to sell soft Brexit to Brussels, he intends to meddle in EU negotiations on Thursday  in a desperate attempt to get Barnier & Verhofstadt on side, they’ve already welcomed his letter re alignment to a CU & SM - as if we don’t have enough foes in Brussels. 
British airline Flybmi says it is filing for bankruptcy and all flights have been canceled, saying the challenges, "particularly those created by Brexit, have proven to be insurmountable" 
This #flybmi statement on going into administration sets out reason after reason for why #Brexit has destroyed the business. 376 direct jobs lost. An indictment of Theresa May's leadership, and a stark warning of what's to come if this madness doesn't stop.  
Britain could slash environmental and safety standards 'a very long way' after Brexit, Jacob Rees-Mogg says. As if this wouldn’t be something to be ashamed of. Jesus! 
EU debate about threat to single market posed by a 500 km long open border on the island of Ireland post #Brexit could become brutal. Spiegel article quotes German MEP musing that German voters worry more about chlorinated chicken than NI peace process..  
To be a true #YellowVestsUK warrior you need to :A) Support BrexitB) Use "there" and "their" randomlyC) Pretend to understand the WTOD) Believe in at least one lunatic conspiracy theory you "researched" by watching a video on YouTube. 
Some Irish border dwellers say they’ve 'given up' trying to prepare for #Brexit  
& before any @UKLabour supporters respond with bullshit about ‘oh so you don’t support helping the poor, equality, blah blah blah’, don’t bother. @UKLabour does not have a monopoly on that, & the leadership’s support of Brexit is going to make that far worse. 
The European Commission article that described the protests against #uploadfilter as mob (no joke), victim of Google and compared to the Brexit campaign has now been removed.#article13 #SaveYourInternet 
The more EU, the worse you do!Rees-Mogg: Eurozone project is an “utter failure”.UK’s refusal to join the euro been “an enormous advantage” to Britain as #EU heads for recession.Eurozone 1997 to 2017 saw economic growth of 26% against 46% for UK.#Brexit 
Some concern in Irelandthat EU solidarity may not survive a no deal Brexit. Rumours are rife that Ireland could be “shut out” of the single market to avoid non regulation products flooding in through open border on the island of Ireland post #Brexit  
A PM who's wasted 2 years chasing a unicorn Brexit deal that doesn't exist & and is now wasting more time to run down the Brexit clock...has the nerve to accuse young people of 'wasting' a day by protesting against climate change. The hypocrisy!  
It's not too late. Brexit can still be stopped  via @LibDems#RevokeRemainRebuild 
Austerity is a political choice. There is nothing about Brexit that makes austerity inevitable. If there's a recession, cutting spending is economic incompetence.When Corbyn gets elected and does NOT pursue austerity after Brexit, will Berger campaign for austerity?  
Incredible that @catherinemep would be dropped from a debate, against a man known to have pedaled lies and deceit about #Brexit and the EU, @DKShrewsbury . Even more worrying that it’s in a university setting. 
The city where Brexit is being negotiated thrives on eavesdropping, gossip and subterfuge — and is crawling with Russian and Chinese spies  
The #Brexit debacle is proving difficult for anyone to predict what will happen next, but this from @VinceCable seems realistic. I believe May will eventually be forced into a #PeoplesVote #FinalSay on her deal v #Remain via @financialtimes 
MPs must be brought to understand that millions will regard a #Brexit obtained via a criminally corrupted referendum as a crime, and the MPs who push it through as criminals who deserve substantial jail sentences.#PeoplesVote 
Kids: we protest peacefully against global warming Tories: skipping school today are weFascists: let's draw bloodTories: now that's proper, let's appease you lot with some Brexit otherwise you'll be unhappy 
.@Telegraph cartoon#Brexit #Remainers #nakedprotest #TheresaMay 
Just so I get this straight. If this had been a binding referendum then it would have been voided by the EC findings? But because it was advisory it can't be voided as it has no legal status? So TM is doing something she knows is invalid but is too fixed on Tory politics to stop? 
Austerity is a political choice. All this means is that Berger would use brexit to push for more austerity 
You were the man who gave one of the best quotes (so far) of #Brexit - one that I happen to agree with:#RevokeArticle50 
People like me do not want to live in an isolated inward looking country. This is jeremy corbyn’s and theresa May’s vision. Demand better by joining the Libdems. Labour and Tory parties care more about purist ideology than the people. A jobs first Brexit means the jobs go first 
We all hate POVERTY. Those telling Nigerians to embrace poverty as a way of life are themselves not poor. Their children work in NNPC, CBN and school abroad but they share TraderMoni to buy votes. This election is a referendum on poverty. Vote out hunger. pic.twitter.com/KiA89zPggd 
If the crisis passes, it’s the appeasers, the bridge-builders, who win. If it sharpens, things are pushed to the extremes, paranoia starts that you can’t trust anybody and they start devouring each other. Amid chaos, new leaders emergeBrexit as Catalonia 
Because I genuinely wish the EU well in its pursuit of ever closer union: their flourishing is in our interest and that of the whole world. It is inconceivable to me, having worked 25 years for Brexit, that a Conservative government would not honour democracy and deliver it.  
Tory Brextremist Steve Baker demanded that the EU be "torn down". That would bring poverty & conflict to Europe, and would benefit only Putin & the worst disaster-capitalists. Why should we not say Baker and his cronies like Rees-Mogg are traitors?#Brexit 
Five Sundays to Brexit – cartoon  
Things you want your MP to do? Sort out brexit.Sort out pensions.Sort out welfare.Sort out defence spending.You Ken, the reserved stuff! Things he actually doesGurn about bins,makes my town look crap, moan about the council & give wee speeches in parliament about nothing. 
Some media & politicians keep referring to ONE ‘no deal’ scenario. In fact there are MANY. No one wants total no deal with no agreements, but this is very different to Article 24 GATT ‘soft hard Brexit’ with a few bilateral deals in key areas & where no tariffs and quotas levied 
New post Brexit bank notes designs have been leaked...  
Most commentators treat Yellow Vestism as some kind of outlying phenomenon in the story of Brexit. They are wrong. It runs deep in the DNA of the whole project - Brexit is cynical, bullying, nativist thuggery even when it wears a suit. Brexit is thuggery. 
The next three acts of the Brexit drama  
Important to highlight that British regional airline ‘Flybmi’ have long been concerned about #Brexit — given the carrier operates multiple EU to EU country flights, while being registered in UK  
Jeremy Corbyn's proposal for Brexit would keep us locked in the Customs Union and large parts of the single market. We wouldn't be taking back control of our laws, trade, borders, or money - it would not be Brexit in any meaningful way.  
With exports shipped by sea taking 38-40 days and Brexit just #41days away, time has just about run out already 
remainers look on the bright side if its no deal #Brexit  leavers will not only have to live with  food shortages job loses and deaths through lack of medication they will have to live with us too and wel be fucking furious at what they insist they knew they were voting for 
"Austerity would look like a walk in the park compared to Brexit" - @lucianaberger.#rockforeurope 
Very happy to have spent another hour with @nmdinedi and support him and others at the Edinburgh #vigil4apeoplesvote. Great to see so many people, let’s make it even more next week(s). Sorry @cliodiaspora that the “non politics” weekend was turned into anti Brexit yet again  
Britain's main political parties are led by two types of people:1. Those who want Brexit as they think the EU is the Soviet Union2. Those who want Brexit as they think the EU is not the Soviet Union. 
This pro-#Brexit march in Manchester is awesome. *12* people!Variously garbed in yellow vests, a crusader outfit & a Trump flag.Even more incredible is that a small clique of fools & extremists at Westminster has been holding our country to ransom. 
Leavers are inherently selfish and backwards looking - I have never seen a single concern how Brexit will help:-NHS-schools-universities-social housing-food banks-mental health-industryThey only ever moan about stopping a few Romanians arriving & reducing our freedom. 
"IF you cancel Brexit the far right will be rioting on the streets"Looks like they are going for it anyway so we may as well give them good reason, right? 
I literally had Tory Councillors talking to Arthur Scargill over #Brexit over a Earl Grey. Like, what is happening??? 
Just met @spennog. Once, he was driving over the Runcorn bridge and got into an argument with his French-born wife over who would pay the toll. She wanted to pay it so she would be on record as having been active and living in the UK despite living here for over 15 years. #Brexit 
I'm sure you'd be more comfortable in Farage's Brexit Party too, @sarahwollaston. What with you voting 12 times against a right to remain for EU nationals already living in the U.K. & the 14 times you voted against UK membership of the EU. #GTTO 
Most Scottish Labour MPs now support a second Brexit referendum 
Remember. Our PM is currently fixated on delivering a #Brexit for scumbags like this... While decent ppl/business are totally ignored!  
So what the chuff are you doing about the 2016 referendum’s corruption?  
Brexit news: Why soft Brexit should have been OFF the table from the start | UK | News |  
Hundreds of thousands take to the streets of Barcelona to protest the trial of Catalan politicians charged with 'rebellion' for organising independence referendum "self-determination is not a crime" #Alcemnos #AutodeterminacióNoÉsDelicte 
Theresa May warned of mass Cabinet resignations if she fails to stop no deal Brexit' | via @telegraph I'm sure the UK will manage 
@LeaveMnsLeave Your banner (check the footage)Forget the 'grid girls' you turn out at Westminster.THIS is the *real* you, Isn't it?Nasty, violent, brutish thugs?#brexit #stopbrexit #RevokeArticle50 #leavers #WTOBrexit 
Trade deals can be negotiated , travel can be negotiated ,sharing security information can be negotiated ,but sovereignty can not. It belongs to the people of the United Kingdom and as the Referendum result showed , they want it back. 
Imagine if the £800,000,000 per week lost due to Brexit had been used to address, say, the problem of carbon emissions...#JustSaying #StopBrexit 
Ha ha! Pro Brexit ‘march’ in Manchester. Shall we just agree now that Manchester really doesn’t want to leave the EU? 
Honing the old, 'the people gave us an instruction in the referendum' argument, which, come the inquiry, will become the new Nuremberg defence.  
Fascinating thread on an old Brexit plan touted by Carswell and Hannan. Surprise! It makes false claims about EU membership.  
Theresa May's failure to win a majority does not bode well for her ability to get a deal through before Brexit day   
Commentator tells two Remain MPs that the Brexit deadlock is unacceptable"You both stood on manifestos that said we would be leaving"You both voted to trigger Article 50“Well that started the clock. MPs have a responsibility." 
Finton o’Toole: Farage, Brexit  
“I swallowed the Brexit lies. Now I regret telling curry house workers to vote leave.With Indian restaurants in crisis, Boris Johnson & Priti Patel said we would be able to employ more chefs from South Asia.We made the mistake of believing them”#FBPE 
No prime minister should be putting Britain in the position that Theresa May has with Brexit, @joswinson says  
“We're heading for the great Brexit trap -  so why not stay in and wreck the EU instead?”A fascinating suggestion   
Nicola Sturgeon wants mass immigration, wants to keep fighting against #Brexit, wants Scottish borders open to huge numbers & wants to give everyone access to benefits, schools & the NHS because she thinks she can blame Westminster for all of Scotland’s problems.#SNPlogic #Fail 
George Osborne tells Theresa May to take 'ticking time bomb' no-deal Brexit off the table  
The Brexit effect. Sickening. Leave, a decision based on ignorance, jingoism, false information, and just plain lies. #StopBrexit #RevokeArticle50 
Senior #Labour MPs accuse Met Police of  'Cover-Up' and 'Unacceptable Delays' in investigating crimes of the #Leave campaign in the 2016 #Brexit referendum:  via @BylineTimes 
Another Saturday, another street stall, another 200 MK folk signing to send emails to their MP demanding @peoplesvote_uk with #OptionToRemainEven Leavers agree Brexit is a mess and this isn’t what they voted forExpect another bumper inbox @MarkLancasterMK @iainastewart 
As a counter protest, I was going to take a naked picture with "Leave the EU now!" Written on my penis, but I think I'll have to settle for "Brexit". pic.twitter.com/eMxOcwn2FB 
I'm flattered when asked for my opinion/advice, as if I were the font of all knowledge on Brexit.Flattered, but exhausted & I'm not a flippin' encyclopaedia! I'll smile, while continuing to do my best to answer, but inside I am thinking "HAVE YOU NEVER HEARD OF GOOGLE!?" 
If The Brexit Party can deliver Brexit (as UKIP effectively delivered the referendum) it will have served its purpose. Voters will know what it stands for, unlike Labour & Tories who promised Brexit but are straining every sinew to avoid delivering it.  
It's almost like there's a form you must fill in before you can join.Do you: Back Brexit Like Trump Disbelieve in climate change Hate vegans Suspect a 'white genocide' Struggle with grammar?Congratulations. You are now a member of the far right. 
The privatisation of the NHS has been going on for a long time under the Tories & New Labour but has been hugely accelerated by the Tories since the 2012 Health & Social Health Act. But, yes, after Brexit a desperate Theresa May will throw the NHS under a bus. Unless we stop her  
This. This. A thousand times this. This small-minded, mean-spirited Brexit demeans us.  
But economists, businesses and representatives of NI manufacturing and farmers all state that no deal is the very worst case scenario for NI. It couldn’t be clearer - a No deal Brexit is an impending disaster that must be avoided.  
British football continues to portray Brexit more accurately than its politicians ever have...  
Former chancellor @George_Osborne says @Theresa_May "needs to take no-deal off the table".He says it is "not acceptable" for the UK to tear up its economic and security relations with the EU. More on his #Brexit comments here:  
The last thing that #Brexit is about is patriotism. Nor does it represent the Britain and indeed Europe that my forefathers fought and died for. #ForeverBritish #Àjamaiseuropéenne …. #RevokeA50 #Remain 
IMHO, the Government should adhere to the "will of the people" with regard to #Brexit. Not the "will of the people" in 2016, but the "will of the people" in 2019. Its clear that the situation has changed significantly now that we know what's on offer. And it ain't that great! 
Lovely afternoon on the doorstep in Gloucestershire with council byelection candidate Liz Ashton. Talking recycling, Brexit, cuts, post offices, fairness. @cdblabour #LabourDoorstep @UKLabour 
February Independence vote: If we had a second referendum on Scottish Independence in the next 6 months, how would you vote. Please retweet and share to get a more balanced and accurate result. 
Women are the silver lining to this #Brexit mess @TulipSiddiq took a stand and helped changed #proxyvoting@YvetteCooperMP has tried to make parliament see sense and stop running down the clock. @Anna_Soubry is leading the way for a #PeoplesVote.  
Meet #Brexit Britain. This is central London. In the past hour. The Met Police being ambushed by a bunch of violent hooligans. #YellowVests If you still support Brexit you support this vision of Britain. It really is that simple. I don’t. #Remain and save our country x 
Fuck Brexit, I want a date for MEXIT!!Theresa May’s exit from public life.She’s shamefully ill-equipped for public office, let alone any position of real responsibility. 
Today’s Brexit views collected by @PeoplesvoteSWY from Leave voting Hemsworth show clear preference for @peoplesvote_uk! 
I wonder what she said when you were fined £20,000 for breaking EU referendum spending laws.  
Feel free to arrange a pro Brexit march and see how many kids turn up. 
RT widely please @abcpoppins @WernerT_Man @terrychristian @UKEUchallenge @Suewilson91 @A50Challenge @_Tim_Ashton @PaoloBrennan @brexit_sham @eyejosh @wolchover @thehydrogenans @JasonJHunter @sturdyAlex @carolecadwalla @DavidLammy @CarolineLucas @YvetteCooperMP @LPrivileged 
Any Brexit backing MPs been given the same warning? Nope.  
March 29 we leave the EU,Brexit Day. March 29 is also the day in 2017 A50 was invoked. Dominic Grieve is facing a no confidence motion at the annual meeting of Beaconsfield Conservatives on Friday March 29. A coincidence? Clever chaps.Who cares, it will be a double celebration! 
Focus on your Brexit .... Beggars ... 
The country is divided as it can't agree over #Brexit, but we should all be able to agree that Brexit has divided our country. How can we stop those that want to control politics using fear as a weapon? #SaturdayThoughts 
Theresa May condemns British school children for taking time off school to protest against climate change, but is happy to make a Brexit trade deal with Faroe Islands, where they teach their children this cruel barbarism   #climatestrikes #FaroeIslands 
How about focusing on your no deal brexit ? 
'After Brexit, the UK will need to raise its game. That means getting rid of underperforming civil servants and coming up with compelling policies rather than just tinkering at the edges' 
Brexit news: [Traitors>>] Ministers 'ready to quit Cabinet' claims Grieve  
Given that it’s us, the 50+ year-olds, who are currently ‘masterminding’ the clusterfuck that is Brexit, perhaps talking down to the youth is a touch inappropriate. Time for us to shut up and listen. 
We can all agree the Conservatives are making an absolute mess of Brexit, but we also need opposition that holds Theresa May to account.That isn't Jeremy Corbyn. That's the Liberal Democrats.Demand the final say on the deal, and option to stop Brexit >  
THANK YOU!!!    THANK YOU!!!   THANK YOU!!!REVOKE A 50 Petition SMASHES THROUGH 100K Signatures!!!!We DID IT!!!Another Remain petition gets to be debated.Another bit of pressure appliedMore support for our MPs fighting this chaotic brexit 
Another really good canvassing session and very positive results with @theSNP Loch Ness branch team in Drumnadrochit today - we covered a lot of doors - and nobody had a good word to say about Westminster rule or Brexit.#ActiveSNP 
If #Brexit wasn't serious, before it is now.Belgian supplier is suspending shipments of world-famous gueuze to the UK the week before March 29. SH*T JUST GOT REAL.  
This is absolutely outrageous I know there are many students who would have liked to have heard you . Most of all why are they protecting the stupid ERG promoters they need to be exposed to intelligent debate.# PeoplesVoteNow# Why are the ERG so scared ?# Brexit is a coup 
Mark Harper was David Cameron's Chief Whip and he voted Remain - but he understands the importance of delivering on the referendum mandate, even if that means we leave without a deal.  
The reason I converted from a lukewarm unionist to a supporter of Scottish Independence was because of this article written by @kmckenna63 back in January 2013. The words are even more relevant today.#indyref2 #Brexit 
Thanks to Sunny Govan Radio for a cracking consultation event, talking to folk outside Govan X shopping Centre. Lots of anger about Brexit and frankly at the Tories in general. Alot of good chat also about the regeneration plans and what more the community wants to see.  
If you think we are too consumed by #Brexit and associated "panic" now, just think about the scenario if the UK leaves the EU with no withdrawal agreement. You wont  have anything else for months and months on end. I for one would like to focus on something else 
Businesses fleeing Tory Brexit UK, &  100,000s of rEU citizens here fearing they may be ejected from their own homes by Tory Home Office, and all you can do is posture against a tax that councils may choose to impose or not as they wish? No wonder you’re increasingly irrelevant.  
Wait til they find out how hard they've been screwed by Brexit.You and your buddies will be the first people they'll go for.And frankly, it'll be delicious.  
I’ve just spoken to a couple of friends and we have decided 48% is more than 52% and so remain won the referendum.  I realise there are a few mathematicians who might disagree with me. But people are tired of experts... 
Don't believe the Remainers, Brexit Britain's economy remains strong. 
Here’s Mr Stop Brexit himself, @JokyonMaugham, distorting what I said in order to justify shaming me as a bully. I did not refer to @GretaThunberg as “idiotic” and “self-important”, but to the so-called strike. But I imagine he knows that. 
Why was no one talking about this before the referendum??  
nearly 4 hours in and the stall's still buzzing! apparently we've had a really positive response today, 10 people who want Brexit stopped for every Leaver! lots of young people who really know their stuff! @euromove @peoplesvote_uk @BestForBritain #PeoplesVote #RevokeA50 
'Purple Momentum' Tory activists planning deselection ambushes before Brexit day via @telegraph 
loki starts brexit  
In a flash insight I’ve realised that not only is Brexit a tragedy it’s an extendible tragedy.It’s as if at the end of King Lear, when everyone’s weeping and wailing, someone appears from stage left and says,‘I’m afraid there’s another act.’ 
That's me front & right, campaigning as Hon. Pres. of Environment Link for a Scottish Environment Act now - because whatever happens with Brexit, we must continue, for all our futures, to build on the environmental protections we've had as EU members. Support the campaign now!  
I will be writing to the Oxford University Chancellor on Monday about this event. It is simply unjustifiable to drop me because I share a different point of view on Brexit than Daniel Kawczynski MP.   
A 3rd rate power isnt even able to manage Brexit !  
SKY News anchor Stephen Dixon stunned cabinet minister @DavidGauke  after questioning whether senior Government figures were trying to  “betray the electorate” and stop Brexit from happening  
Utterly bonkers Labour MP claims Brexit will lead to war in Europe and warns that children will return to the Continent "in uniform" 
Sure, but Osborne scathing? Please. Led the way in hopelessly naive policy of crawling to China. File it next to his involvement in the garden bridge fiasco and his 2016 referendum strategy.  
Without a hint of complacency,come & take your best shot Ade. You’d like folk to conveniently forget the Lib Dem’s role in Coalition induced #austerity &the decisive part it played in the conditions for #Brexit. Don’t douse your house in petrol & then blame us when it’s on  lad  
Hilarious. Days from Brexit disaster and just look at these tossers.  
Whether it's breaking up Britain or trying to get Corbyn into power - both the SNP and Labour are more concerned with their own self-interested agendas. It's high time they put the people first, backed the deal and delivered Brexit.  
Marina Hyde: "I hope someone publishes a coffee-table book detailing each of the irrelevant arguments we had on each day as the #Brexit doomsday clock ticked down. T-minus 42 days: was Churchill a shit or not? T-minus 41 days: where do you stand on the Boer war?" 
An Australian reader emails a novel Brexit solution: “The only option is to have Australia annex the UK as an Australian state.” 
Leavers wanted something they couldn't define, and they had no plan to achieve it.Their wafer thin victory was based on illegal financing, illegal data theft and targeted disinformation.If they still want Brexit based on everything we know now, they own the chaos 100%  
Out talking to voters in Sunny Govan about brexit & independence. #activeSNP #wecan 
The referendum is bent. And it is all May can point to when asked why she alone decided (as we proved)  to leave.  
Lady Haw-Haw at peak gammon!Apparently, opponents of Brexit need to be “stopped”Should the authorities intervene to stop us?Are internment camps the next step?How about compulsory patriotic re-education?  
Good to join @JoStevensLabour and @SDoughtyMP at @LabPeoplesVote meeting. Members and activists agreeing that we must fight this Tory Brexit and make sure we put it to the people for a #finalsay @peoplesvote Thanks to all those hard working campaigners and activists for coming! 
Superb from Dominic Grieve, When Grieve says he's getting close to withdrawing support for a Conservative Govt, we must realise the moment that #Brexit has a seismic & irreversible effect on Tories & Labour is imminent.Change is coming but not the change the Brexiters hoped for!  
Great to be out speaking to dozens of voters in Leith Walk to help elect @robm2. Substantial support for @theSNP position on #Brexit & our local plans for housing, transport & range of other issues! #ActiveSNP 
With #Brexit looming, the people of Scotland need option to choose their future - as a backwater of #BrexitBritain or a modern European state, taking its place in the wider world! #Independence #ScotRef 
If her constituency voted in favour of Brexit then she should be subject to the deselection process. If anybody knows better or otherwise please say so. With May it will like trying to catch a weasel in a barrel of oil!  
#Brexit is about a lying, cheating gang of rich bastards exploiting the fears and prejudices of ordinary people in order to slash their tax bills and tear up the health, safety, environmental and workplace regulations which eat into their profits. #PeoplesVote #ClimateStrike 
Great team in Byker today talking to residents about #Brexit & asking if they want a #PeoplesVote. Lots of residents told us they regretted voting to leave. Almost everybody wanted a @peoplesvote_uk 
...but not for criminally cheating in a national referendum. Why aren't you in jail yet?  
Good news! In 2035 you can celebrate 16 years of sitting on your hole as Clown Car Brexit happened and the worst Tory government in living memory continued to beat Labour like a dirty carpet.   
MPs need reminding Prolonging Brexit uncertainty by extending Article 50 would be the worst-case scenario for markets and the UK economy, JP Morgan has recently warned. 
Porsche asks UK buyers to commit to 10% no-deal Brexit surcharge  
Did not every current cabinet Minister vote in favour of the EU Withdrawal Act 2018?If so, were these seven cabinet Ministers not aware that if the EU failed to agree a post #Brexit terms of trade agreement with the UK, we would leave the EU at 11pm on 29th March 2019? 
Being pro-EU institutions and against the referendum result does not equal being liberal and decent. Those claiming a battle for the soul of the party would perhaps be taken more seriously if they had been in the lobby voting for the most significant social reform in decades 
REES-MOGG latest:"Concentration camps in South Africa weren't that bad!A #NoDeal Brexit wouldn't be that bad!"Not sure an old Etonian disaster capitalist Tory MP with a £5million townhouse and a private hedge fund betting against the UK is any kind of judge of 'that bad'  
Brexit gridlock shows Britain needs a better Parliament, reconnected to communities, working cross party on laws that improve lives. Here’s my proposal to reform Private Members Bills, shake up the system & bring Parliament closer to people. #makerentcount 
Petition: Revoke Art.50 if there is no Brexit plan by the 25 of February Almost 100,000 now, please sign and retweet. 
Thousands of children march for a better future for the entire planet and Mrs May tells them to shut up and go away. A handful of thugs intimidate women in central London and she vows to deliver the twisted Brexit of their basest fantasies. 
I’ve left with my forrin wife, forrin child, assets and business. Bye Britain, I won’t be back, too many nasty xenophobes for me. Many in parliament unfortunately. 
Retweet if you think it's time to close our borders and stop the permanent settlement of immigrants into our country. Immigration has become colonisation!#giletsjaunes #Brexit #BrexitChaos #Immigrants #ImmigrationReform 
Another correct move by Scotgov.Scottish government demands lost EU funding be ‘replaced in full’ by Treasury after Brexit  
Whilst our case may appear like just an immigration issue on the surface it is actually a window into a much wider problem.A systemic disregard for our rights under the Good Friday Agreement. Evidenced by the persistent appeals against us by the UK Home Office #Brexit  
“There is an arms race among European capitals to capture what London has done.”Outside Silicon Valley, the UK is home to the tech capital of the world - but some of the industry’s leading backers have warned they could “shift their investment” away from the UK after Brexit.  
Parliamentary democracy and the rule of law are bigger than brexit. And they are most certainly bigger than Madame May. Do your job @metpoliceuk @NCA_UK @NCA_LynneOwens The PM didn’t care if the referendum is tarnished Here’s her QC in court on the point:  
No-one could have predicted that a luxury sports car company facing inelastic demand would pass tariffs on to consumers.Porsche asks UK buyers to commit to 10% no-deal Brexit surcharge | Business | The Guardian  
Tony Blair: "The relationship between  and  in the  was central to the @BelfastAgmt." Mary Robinson: "And that relationship was never better than just before your referendum." #Brexit #MSC2019 
The public are in mounting alarm about thisHe PMs QC has admitted the Brexit is proceeding (as her decision alone) on a referendum she admits she didn’t know or care is “tarnished”.  @NCA_LynneOwens @metpoliceuk @NCA_UK @thomasbrake @tom_watson @AdamWagner1 
The likes of @afneil have absolutely poisoned the whole organisation. There is so little by way of journalism coming from the BBC it's shocking. Its @carolecadwalla who is doing what the likes of the BBC should be doing & exposing the lies & the dirty money behind Brexit. 
There's so much about Brexit & the UK Gov's behaviour that shames the UK, but the most loathsome has to be the inappropriately-named 'settled status'.It makes me want to apologise personally to all 3 million+ EU citizens in the UK.@InLimboBrexit 
The referendum debate..  
“We will say ‘no’ when the deal is not suitable but we will not be afraid to ‘yes’ when the deal is right. We will measure any new draft Withdrawal Agreement against our own tests of both protecting the Union and respecting the referendum result.”@DUPleader 
Lorries queuing at Dover ports today, just imagine a #NoDealBrexit, a glimpse into the future #brexit  
    UNITED KINGDOM                The Only Union We                     Need.      29th March 2019  INDEPENDENCE DAY                #Brexit  
Sir Richard Dearlove, the former head of the British Secret Intelligence Service, believes that Brexit won't hurt our security relationships with European countries and in fact they might even be strengthened.  
Brexit is now less than a 1,000 hours away not long to wait. Then we can party, party, party, and watch all the Remoaners drowning in their tears. 
Strength to deliver??  Yet somehow can't deliver a green energy project without it costing 500m. can't deliver a functioning Stormont, can't deliver Brexit, can't deliver commitments to the St Andrews Agreement or GFA, can't even deliver a judgement on one of it's disgraced MP's. 
#Derry human rights lawyer, Professor Colin Harvey, has said those who have dismissed calls for a unity referendum either haven’t read, or have been selective in their reading of, the Good Friday Agreement. #Brexit 
It’s time to vote for the deal, The Sun says.  #Brexit  
“The decision to call a referendum was an abrogation of parliamentary democracy in my view because we didn’t know the facts. We weren’t presented with the facts. I still don’t know the facts really!" David Attenborough.  
Shame on you, ignoramus John. Look at your crazy Brexit and lesser democratic country first. You’ve got no moral right to lecture Spain on ANYTHING. 
The liberal democracy in UK, we've all taken for granted, is under attack from both Labour & Tories as both parties shift towards extremes.Those that oppose populist nationalism & nativism & its by-product #Brexit, need to coalesce. This possible move would be a positive step.  
Updating DUP members on the latest Brexit developments.The Union of the United Kingdom remains non-negotiable.  
UK business owners, managers & workers; write, email or call your MP this weekend. Tell them what Brexit is doing to your business, your job, your future. Don’t hold back. The ‘fu%k business’ party should never be forgiven for the damage they’re causing. 
The city where Brexit is being negotiated thrives on eavesdropping, gossip and subterfuge — and is crawling with Russian and Chinese spies  
Watching a @SkyNews report. The fashion industry earns £34bn for the UK, hugely bigger than fishing, employing almost 900k people. It relies on freedom of movement of people, goods and services. #Brexit is greed, ignorance and bigotry harming Britain. #PeoplesVote 
Most importantly, I know that the vast majority of those who know more than me, because they work on these issues every day, they think a No Deal Brexit is even worse than I do.And I'm not someone who thinks he knows more than those who know more.  
why on earth should we believe that? you're not taking their concerns about Brexit seriously; you've absolutely shafted the young people who voted for you. they won't vote for you again now. you've lost their trust.resign. you're ruining Labour.@SeumasMilne @johnmcdonnellMP 
From the things that I know, I've concluded that ON BALANCE a No Deal Brexit hurts the UK. The positives of No Deal in relation to Fish, Agricultural Policy, sovereignty and tariffs all come with their own downsides. And don't come close to making up for 
Remainers in Scotland who oppose independence have to accept that Scotland in this isolating, economically ruinous Brexit Britain is the best Scotland can ever be. Imagine thinking this Brexit ugliness is the best we can aspire to. Join us to make Scotland better than this. 
Thank you @YoungLiberalsUK for the warm welcome this morning as we chatted Brexit, building a liberal future and #schoolstrike4climate - and well done on choosing Glasgow for your conference! 
“The long-predicted doomsday scenario of 30th March won’t happen, even in a no deal rupture. At that moment Brussels will lose the Article 50 leverage. It will instead find itself having to explain to the EU27 how it so misjudged the Brexit negotiations” 
Fabulous pics of Lily, the Beyoncé of dogs, for those bored to tears by Brexit, the Tory Party and me...  
The sound of wailing, sobbing, hysterical shrieking, foot stamping, head banging and involuntary bowel movements emanates from the BBC; Sky, Remain and democracy attacking MP's all of whom have been rocked by Presidents Trumps promise of a huge increase in our trade post brexit. 
I studied EU law for 2 years in 2 different languages, and I worked in & around the EU institutions for 3 years and I STILL don't know all the consequences of a No-Deal Brexit. How about you?How can anyone who claims to love this country support something so reckless. 
The most extraordinary thing about the aftermath of the EU Referendum is that the most vociferous losers (Remainers) are treating the winners (Leavers) as a beleaguered minority. We're leaving the EU because a clear majority of us voted for Brexit. 
Not only are they technically better negotiators, but morally they have something they all believe in. We have nothing. It’s the moral vacuum at the heart of Brexit that hobbles it. It comes from misplaced anger and there is no consensus on what’s next. Let’s just stop. 
Because it wasn't a referendum to be in the EU.The EU didn't exist in the 70's.Nobody has ever voted to be in it  
Maybe @Jacob_Rees_Mogg can explain why on his Irish prospectus it warns of the impact that Brexit will have on the UK economy and sterling, yet is on TV telling everyone everything is going to be fine? We are investors too Jacob. We invest in the UK's prosperity not offshore 
Reading EU legislation, talking and arguing about it, trying to convince your MEPs, is not what has caused Brexit. In fact, it’s the exact opposite. Having a lively debate on EU legislation BEFORE it is passed is the EU’s salvation. @EU_Commission, you’re making a huge mistake. 
I found this really moving. Of all the things we’ll lose with Brexit, it’s the people we’ll lose which is most devastating. Those who won’t come, those who will leave and those who won’t be born. We will feel it very hard in the Highlands and Islands. And we didn’t vote for it.  
Theresa May actually moaned about the time wasted by youngsters on the #ClimateStrike yesterday. This is coming from the same person that has wasted more than 2 years trying to bodge together a Brexit deal while running down the clock in the hope of forcing MPs in to backing her. 
Tommy Robinson would do “extremely well” in the European elections if MPs delayed and prevented Brexit, Jacob Rees-Mogg warned. 
How can we have a prime minister and 95% of all MPs who won’t talk about the £100bn annual cost of Brexit? In normal times, that loss of GDP and revenue would be a political catastrophe. And worse, loss of freedom for 66million citizens is a “gain” according to Theresa May 
We must leave the customs union to do trade deals around the world. A Brexit boom can happen, our allies want to finally sign deals with us!Email your MP to save Brexit @  
So, girls and boys: the abuse and threats Brexit has unleashed must be addressed by all of us. It can’t just be on the women to sort this out ... the simple reality is that, on the whole, we just don’t have the same equal platform yet. We can do it, but only with your help. 15/15  
So here you have it from the horse's mouth. We did not previously trade with the USA on WTO terms. #Brexit  
Tired of waiting for something to be "officially" announced... so...I will be marching AGAINST #BREXIT in London from noon on Saturday 23rd March.On my own if necessary.I will be bringing sandwiches and an amusing placard. 
BBC Dateline London. A guest from a German paper says Govt was wrong to ask the people to determine their future. And the result is the mess we're in now.He ignores. We voted Brexit.THAT was the instruction. May has openly ignored the instruction and has created this mess! 
The extremist #ERG wing of the #Tory party are hell bent on destroying the peace & prosperity of the UK (& the unity of the country)It's almost like these crazed, #Brexit at-all-costs zealots are working for a hostile foreign government & for disaster capitalists#StopBrexit 
France's President Macron 'will give Theresa May legally-binding assurance that Irish Brexit backstop is only temporary'Hold on - when did he become President of the EU? 
If it’s not broke don’t Brexit 
BREXIT:MPS: ‘There might be a slight delay to Brexit to pass all the legislation necessary.’MAIL READERS: ‘The streets will run red with the blood of the traitors.’  
It’s called political suicide, not Brexit.  
"Revoke Art.50 if there is no Brexit plan by the 25 of February"This is now on 94,000 signatures!! Let's get it over 100,000 today! Sign & share.  
A bit like Brexit...... When a sheep thinks it’s a dog but the dog knows the sheep is a sheep and shouldn’t be played with as dogs play. So is the sheep equate to UK while the dog is EU? With everything so back to front tiz quite confusing, or is it the other way round?  
“The Good Friday Agreement is clearly a plot to thwart Brexit by time-travelling Remainers determined to use their mastery of space and time to keep Britain shackled to the EU!”  
Tories complain about #FBPE being anti-Tory while Labour complains about FBPE being anti-Labour.Here's a clue for the hard of thinking: FBPE is anti-Brexit. If your party leader is headbanging for #Brexit then FBPE is opposed to that lunacy.Why does this need to be explained?  
Lib Dem MEP @catherinemep dropped last minute from Oxford #Brexit debate with @DKShrewsbury over 'unicorn' tweet. 
What can we do to make them listen - BREXIT under WTO . BRING BACK HANGING, CANCEL HS2 , STOP IMMIGRATION - I am so fed up of successive governments telling us that they know better than us common people - They are destroying our country & we are letting it happen . 
The Economist this week.It isn’t just farmers’ organisations who warn of the dangers of a disorderly Brexit.Required reading.  
Following the success of yesterday's Global Warming school walkout, would you support a similar school protest For OR Against Brexit and give the youth a chance to have their say? #FBPE #Remain #brexit #EU 
Throughout their desperate Agricultural Bill the Brexit Tories talk of ‘transitioning’ away from CAP payments when what they mean is ‘transitioning’ away from offering any financial support at all. Could decimate Scottish farming.   
Thank you @VeroVero777 for this passionate thread. I feel every bit as angry as you, but I am also exhausted by it all. This is what I needed to read to reignite my anti-Brexit spirit. It would be good to hear from @NickyMorgan01 but somehow I don't think that she will reply. 
There’s .@michaelgove giving farmers assurances re post-#Brexit funding. What happened the £160m nicked from Scottish farmers, Michael? Why did it go to English farmers, Michael? Have you apologised for that, Michael? Do you see why we don’t trust you, Michael? #NevertrustaTory 
It's no wonder the EU offered us such a bad deal, given EU leaders have been listening to the likes of Tony Blair, wrongly telling them that Brexit would be stopped.  
Rees-Mogg now saying on @BBCr4today that Brexit can only be a success with the “right” policy decisions.Problem is, Jacob, that those policies you have in mind screw over workers - and will never be acceptable to the public. That leaves us with a Brexit even you admit is bad. 
Britain is the world's third-largest lamb exporter, and farmers will have a lot to sell if there's no Brexit trade deal  
The world is a small place. But it will be so much smaller for 65 million British people by this Tory #Brexit. Living, working, studying and retiring abroad will be more difficult. Mediterranean holidays will be the preserve of the rich. Its a retrograde step. #RevokeArticle50 
Richard Harrington on @BBCr4today absolutely smashing no-deal Brexit and calling the ERG “deluded”.Also says Tories “hijacked” by “infiltrators”. This is explosive stuff. Gloves are coming off and rifts opening in heart of government. 
Brexit abuse forces MPs to move house | News | The Times. ⁦@HumanRightsCtte⁩ conducting inquiry. Then will make robust proposals for wide-ranging action. Democracy requires our MPs are safe. 
Lexit Len says 'Remainers need to calm down & back Corbyn'. Here's an idea @LenMcCluskey, u calm down & back what 86% of Labour members want, a #PeoplesVote, & explain how the Labour #brexit plan that would cut £24bn from economy is good for your members  
*Massively* under-appreciated political point:If Brexit happens in the next few months, there is almost zero incentive for either major political party to split afterwards. Things could fizzle out *fast*. 
Interesting that several #Catalan commentators have referred to EFTA as a desirable framework for #europeanintegration. Especially after #EuropeanParliament canceled an event with #Puigdemont. Any comments on #EFTA and democracy? #catalunya #europa #brexit @EFTAsecretariat 
#Brexit: reclaiming democracy - If the European Parliament serves any function at all it is as a goalkeeper - our last line of defence against the EU executive. But like any defence system it's only as good as the early warning radar. We have none at all. 
If Brexit demonstrates one thing, it’s that the idea that people get wiser as they get older is pretty flawed. And I say that as a distinctly old fogey. 
Why I want @peoplesvote_uk: When democracy breaks & ugly nationalism passes for politics, women pay. The poorest will pay for the economic shock of #Brexit as they paid for austerity, while women MPs pay in abuse and intimidation. For shame. #PeoplesVote.  
I’m now of the view that despite our Remain-backing parliament’s attempts to stop no-deal, it’s going to happen anyway. Great! It’s no leap into the unknown, but into the familiar. Yes, with some disruption – but to me, a World Trade exit is now the only way to deliver Brexit. 
So the police cannot protect anti-Brexit MPs, but if a few school kids start shouting about climate change in Parliament Square they break out the horses. 
Meet Olly Robbins, the unelected bureaucrat who wrote the worst deal in history. Email your MP to save Brexit @  
When I was elected 5 years ago, after Germany had passed a lobby-drafted law that crushed small media & helped Google, I never imagined that opposing the same law at EU level would inspire the @EU_Commission to compare me to the Brexit campaign:  #Article11 
Once again the ERG described as "extremists" for simply wanting to honour the referendum result & their manifesto commitmentsWanting *actual Brexit* deemed "hardline"If this is an extremist position in the party, tells you alot about the Conservatives  
"It is entirely irrational for the Prime Minister to treat the referendum result as binding which, had it been binding, would have been voided following the EC findings. "  
Julia Hartley Brewer won't be affected by Brexit beyond a little inconvenience. Nor Mogg. Nor Johnson. None of them. They've made hay out of the chaos. 
Im getting very concerned that brexit is having an adverse effect on the economy seeing as retail sales are up 4.5% since a year ago and our growth is double that of Germany and EU in general - we should have remained - NOT 
@metpoliceuk This man was able to freely walk around Parliament Square threatening people with death by public hanging but children protesting against climate change were kettled and kept in line with police horses. Get your priorities right. #ClimateStrike #Brexit  
Here we go... Dyson axes 100 UK jobs. The cuts come a mere few weeks after announcing they were moving their HQ to Singapore. Not a Brexit poster child any more, eh!  
While MPs quiver about Brexit, people are getting on with their lives regardless. Record employment. Record sales figures. Let’s stop this pathetic fearfulness and embrace our freedom from the wretched, failing EU.   
Robert Peston makes it clear he sees the conservative splitting irrespective of what happens with #Brexit.So @Anna_Soubry @sarahwollaston let’s just get this done. Britain needs leadership. 
One thing you hear a lot in Brussels is that the UK could have imposed immigration controls within the EU. Many states do, but they rely on ID cards to do it. Interesting counterfactual to think whether we’d have Brexit now if the UK’s own scheme hadn’t been canned in 2010 
So where are the Magnitsky sanctions?Where is the @Metpolice investigation in Referendum Interference?Where is the Inquiry the Security and Intelligence Committee asked May to spearhead.What is the NCA doing.Why are we Brexitting giving Russia what they want?  
From yesterday’s #Brexit debate at Telford College. Much agreement between fellow former MP, Peter Bradley (Lab), & the Green Party rep, & myself. In contrast Tory & UKIP speakers virtually indistinguishable from each other as English exceptionalists, nativists & nationalists.  
The referendum was a scam. Leave won by committing CRIMES. We must NOT let May drag us out of the EU. @eucopresidentEXCLUSIVE: Senior Labour MPs Accuse Met Police of  'Cover-Up' and 'Unacceptable Delays' in Investigating Brexit Crimes  via @BylineTimes 
If only the Tories could show the same level of unanimity over Brexit they’ve demonstrated with their across the board condemnation of the young people’s Climate Change demo...  
Always good to talk to local school children about issues they’re concerned about; thanks @SponneSchool Year 9 for having me yesterday. Discussed climate change, school uniforms, Brexit and lots of other important issues!  
The #SchoolStrike4Climate reminds us of the deep connections between the pro-#Brexit lobby and #ClimateChange denying groups. Our campaign to #StopBrexit is part of a much greater struggle for a better future.  #ClimateStrike 
Brexit has shone a spotlight on the fact that the UK's not applying the law correctly when it comes to the Good Friday Agreement and British/Irish citizenship. If it had, the Irish border issue would have been even more obvious.  
Amazing. Brexit is now fewer than 1,000 hours away. #BringItOn 
Asset managers in the EU are considering moving to the UK because of Brexit, in order to avoid draconian EU rules:  
The editor of our @timesredbox political newsletter, @MattChorley, dressed up as all of your, ahem, favourite Brexit characters. Warning: May cause your eyeballs to sting  
Britain, there is still time to prevent this madness.“Do not go gentle into that good night.Rage, rage against the dying of the light.”#PeoplesVote #Brexit #Resist 
Unbelievable. We have a group of moronic amateurs running the country and only a little over a month until Brexit deadline. 
Bluntly, the Conservative Party need to be buried by this Brexit debacle.They let their extremists take over. Our country has been dragged into madness.  
Brexit SHOCK: Rees-Mogg explains EXACTLY why Olly Robbins WANTED to be overheard  
"Brexit is going to turn the clocks back, dragging us back into the dark ages" Angus: Hold my beer.  
Rousing respose at packed gig in Wales. “Brexit sucks and I’m tired of being England’s little cousin” declares @charlottechurch #YesIsMore #YesCymru #Annibyniaeth #CymruAmByth  
Donald Trump's anti-migrant lies, and the Tories' Brexit calamity - I'm discussing two epic political disasters on #DatelineLondon, BBC News channel, 11.30am 
Ex MI6 boss: Brexit could improve our security  
Brexit aside, the Government's had a great week:Justice Sec admits probation privatisation has failedWork & Pensions Sec admits Universal Credit has driven up food bank useDefence Sec's belligerent speech on China aborts Chancellor's trade mission to ChinaA fine effort. 
I love the way that the great fear propagated by Tories about not delivering Brexit is that people will take to the streets in protest, but when people actually do take to the streets they find it really easy to laugh it off and belittle them like it’s nothing. 
We should "stop the clock" and pause on Brexit, according to the finance minister of Cyprus, who calls a no-deal split "unthinkable"  
Edinburgh, view from my hotel window. About to set off on another day of ‘stop Brexit’ campaigning  
At a ‘bleak’ breakfast yesterday Barnier told EU ambassadors May‘s strategy for getting the Brexit deal past MPs has ‘failed’. One replied she‘s on a ‘self-defeating path’ of putting party before country. Another now rates chances of no deal at up to 90%.  
"In Greek mythology, you paid the ferryman to cross the River Styx. Brexit mythology is more complex. There is no ferryman – indeed, there are no ferries – but Chris Grayling pays £800,000 to management consultants to get told this, and somehow doesn’t go to hell." (Marina Hyde) 
Brexit enthusiasts still seem incapable of grasping the fundamental fact that the outcome of the referendum vote did not change the probability of Brexit itself being successful, any more than one could eg vote to win the lottery. Cause and effect simply don't work like that. 
To make sure EU citizens & their families have the information they need about living in London after Brexit we’ve created the EU Londoners Hub - containing free, & regularly updated guidance on what this means for you. Sign up here for more: #LondonIsOpen  
Brexit food standards explained  
Rise of the far right empowered by leading leave figures is by far the biggest concern this country has faced in a generation.The rhetoric around #Brexit is only a symptom, fascism is the disease, a disease the justice system seems reluctant or impotent to deal with! #Fascists 
In the age of Trump and Brexit it’s the adults who behave like children and the children who behave like adults. My column on #schoolstrike4climate featuring @CarolineLucas @benatipsosmori and @RabbiWittenberg 
A no-deal Brexit starts to lose its terror as the EU draws up survival plans 
Brexit is 997 hours away. #brexit 
This hasn’t aged well. The levels of European solidarity on #brexit have been total, much to the chagrin of certain architects of chaos in the UK  
Len McCluskey: Remainers need to calm down and back Corbyn... Erm, no, no we don't, not today, tomorrow  or next year, if Brexit happens, the fight will be carried to the next election, an election the LP will have to try and win without our votes!   
"When an investor is tired of London" after #Brexit, he moves his investment fund to Dublin.  
It is becoming clearer that the long-predicted doomsday scenario will not happen even in a no deal scenario. At that moment the EU will lose the leverage of the Article 50 process. It will find itself having to explain how it misjudged Brexit negotiations.  
Can't remember Remainers mentioning this in the referendum.Had voters known this truth the result would have been:LEAVE    90%REMAIN   10%Free Movement Of 700 East European Killers 
Pots & kettles: Darren condemns other middle class kids for climate change protests. Yet they are at least addressing a more urgent & real problem that Darry’s own Brexit opportunity cost. Strange that  his old mam does not chastise him. Spare the rod & spoil the economy, eh ! 
Full interview is available now on BBC soundsExpecting Irish citizens to formally renounce British citizenship in order to fully access their EU rights & fully realise their Good Friday Agreement right to be accepted as Irish is an infringement on our rights #Brexit  
The lengths middle class white women will go for something like brexit, imagine if they cared about poverty or police brutality or something that actually affected them lol  
If WA passes our leverage over money is gone and the future option on trade is either stay in backstop or move to customs union. True Brexiteers will have been totally outmanoeuvred.This is why WTO on March 29 is what Brexit voters should now be backing.May has betrayed us. 
“A no-deal Brexit starts to lose its terror as the EU draws up survival plans”  
The brexit dream is sold by people who don’t understand that fruit needs time to grow, think Ireland is part of the British empire & choose to ignore settled science on climate change. They are ignorant and dangerous. Why do they hold office?  
Yesterday's post: The Tory party lost its way from 2010, not 2016  Why austerity was a Tory mistake on the same scale as Brexit, and why it and scapegoating immigrants led to the 2016 defeat. (And of course 2010 didn't come out of thin air) 
Watch #Japanese Who Is 100% absolutely In Support Of Biafrans #Referendum In Nigeria also urging the #world and #UN to rise up against injustice And Support Biafra  Referendum,we have suffered Enough, #Biafrans  future is very important, 
David Gauke was just asked FIVE times whether he would quit if no-deal was delivered... Five times he dodged the question. #EU #Brexit  
So: as from yesterday, Brexit with no deal means the UK must find a bilateral agreement on Gibraltar with Spain... in the middle of an election campaign, and with the right turned into hard Spanish nationalists and serious options of winningCc @jonworth @AndrewDuffEU @piris_jc 
We are all Palestinians living in a global Ziocracy that sacrifices its core values of freedom and tolerance in the name of the  imaginary suffering of its oppressors ....#Antisemitism #Gaza #Palestine #humanorigins #Brexit 
.@DavidGauke said around the cabinet  last year No Deal Brexit was ‘a unicorn that needs to be slaughtered’ Now gearing up with colleagues to kill if off at on Feb 27 if May won’t  
Glasgow Loves EU group will be in Buchanan St today (by the Donald Dewar monument) between 2 and 4pmWhy not drop by and tell us how you feel about BrexitWe are calling for Article 50 to be revoked and supporting demands for a final say on the Brexit deal - hope you can join us!  
And how come @BBC doesn't need to bring in a drivelling moron churning out factually unsubstantiated opinions & rhetoric to counter balance commentary from relevant legal experts/academics on Trump's latest misdemeanor? If you don't do it for #Trump, don't do it for #Brexit! 
Thatcher would have WALKED AWAY from Brexit talks – 'Would've seen through EU bullying!'  
This week, lots of news outlets suggested Mark Carney said Brexit could usher in a ‘golden era’ of free trade. Theresa May was even asked a question about it in PMQs. But he didn't say it.  Here's what went wrong—and why it matters: #brexit #PMQs 
Gosh it would be so nice to have an electable political party that put people’s needs above their own greed for power. Maybe one will come along soon because, after Brexit, these two are surely finished. 
They’ve just cancelled Nigerian Elections for a week as there is a SUSPICION of impropriety. Britain accepted the result of a PROVEN Illegal referendum. 
Labour rebels should stop blaming Jeremy Corbyn for the Brexit crisis and turn their anger on the Tories, writes @LenMcCluskey on @TheStaggers. 
The motion unanimously agreed by the NSCA Exec was: The Executive continues to support the stance taken by their MP Owen Paterson in relation to Brexit in asking for the Conservative Manifesto commitments to leave the Single Market, Customs Union and remit of the ECJ. 
Great honour to be readopted for the 7th time as @Conservatives Parliamentary Candidate for North Shropshire last night. Many thanks NSCA Executive for unanimously supporting a motion on my Brexit stance, asking for the Conservative Manifesto commitments to be delivered.  
Odd I never hear on BBC the voices of people who’re losing jobs as their companies move abroad because of Brexit.  
Porsche ask their small UK customer base to pay a No deal Brexit surcharge & some Remoaners sadly appear to be pleased; desperate to be proved right & attack the views of others on a personal basis. Porsche aren’t BMW or Ford or Mercedes or VW. 
May's Withdrawal Agreement traps us in the EU's orbit and betrays Brexit. If Lab had come up with it almost every Lab MP would be enthusiastically backing it as a Remainer version of "Brexit" that leads inexorably to a permanent customs union. 
Amazing the amount of people who think 52 per cent is a conclusive Brexit result but won’t accept the 98 per cent of scientists who believe we should take urgent action on climate change. 
Gavin Williams backs sending an aircraft carrier to S. Pacific.China pulls plug on UK/China trade talks visit.#Brexit Britain Taking Back Control You couldn't make it up!Don't you get it?1 x 65m alone in the World isn't as strong as EU28 500m.#RevokeA50 #Remain in Control 
May and Corbyn pushing this aggressively regressive #Brexit is robbing future generations and sentencing them to diminished futures. Already burdened with tuition fees, kids will be stuck in a country set on damaging deregulation. #votesat16 #ClimateEmergency 
Interesting report on whether Scots & English judges will continue on #CJEU during #Brexit transition period. I’ve raised this issue repeatedly in ⁦@HouseofCommons⁩ with U.K. Govt but as usual there’s no clarity #BrexitChaos 
My former Ministerial colleague Brian Wilson OTT today blaming Nicola Sturgeon for prospect of No Deal Brexit! By same logic he could blame whole of Parliamentary Labour Party but why should any opposition MP cave in to My Deal or No Deal strategy when so much better is possible?  
Is it time that we 'bare all' for Brexit?Dr. Victoria Bateman is doing so quite literally!  
Did leave voters genuinely believe that brexit wouldnt lead to huge job losses and devaluation of the pound. Please ask yourself who were the luars who told you it was ' project fear'. and how long do you think 'short term pain' will last. 
Lord Kerr’s speech in the Lords this week explains why Mrs May’s hard Brexit deal is fundamentally wrong - & changing the backstop will make it even worse  
If threats come from both sides, my point’s made even more strongly. UK horribly divided because of Cameron’s referendum, trying to escape petty internal Tory spat. Scots, too, sadly divided after Cameron’s independence referendum. Cameron may go down as most damaging PM ever. 
Shame on @BBCThe failure of our national broadcaster to adequately & impartiallly report on European politics is at least partly responsible for the #Brexit voteTheir continued inadequate reporting since the referendum makes them complicit in delivering this disaster#BBCBias 
Leavers in Cabinet have agreed to offering the EU a backstop that would take us to 2024 - EIGHT years after the referendum.That would mean Tories fighting the 2022 general election, with us trapped in the backstopAnd what would stop them extending it again?Truly outrageous!  
- May won't try to renegotiate Withdrawal Agreement- Trump predicts increased trade with UK after signing deal- EU investors consider move to UK over Brexit 
Are you or is someone you know an EU citizen who calls London home? Our EU Londoners Hub contains free, regularly updated guidance on what #Brexit means for you. EU citizens are always welcome in London. Sign up for updates & share↓ #LondonIsOpen 
Failing to deliver Brexit is what will destroy the @Conservatives party & put out the welcome mat for Corbyn... 
Apologies if you exist in that razer thin slice of the Venn diagram that contains anti-Brexit climate change deniers. You should both know that normal service is now resumed 
The latest #CallansKicks is online. Paschal outlines €100m worth of “oopsie daisies” Bertie in Westminster. Leo’s Valentine. Huw Edwards’ Brexit roundup. Podcast the hell out of it pls.  
TORIES using mounted police against our children! If they can do that against our children God knows what they got planned when there MESS of a BREXIT is overconsidering we know they have TROOPS on standbyTory UK is looking scary times under these TORIES!They need to GOoo!! 
Tom voted leave in 2016, he stood by his decision after the vote initially but now having seen brexit reality is so different from what he was promised, he changed his mind. He is yet another #RemainerNow Respect @TPARKES_1986 it's ok to change your mind. So many feel as you. 
MANDRAKE: David Davis pockets £150,000 since quitting as Brexit minister  
I am shocked by the side effects of BREXIT on British society. This is NOT normal. It is disgraceful.  
March 31 local elections will be a turning point for the struggle for democracy and decentralization in Turkey. It will be a democracy referendum against AKP's authoritarian regime and its appointed trustees. #BirlikteDemokrasiye 
“Labour appears to be losing members and voters, who have finally seen through its absurd attempt at “constructive ambiguity” over Brexit and realised that Jeremy Corbyn has every intention of facilitating the UK’s departure,” Dr and Tory MP Phillip Lee  
We'll be in Hemsworth today! It's not a busy town centre, so there'll be plenty of time for #Brexit conversations! Come and say hi if you're in the area ~ you too @jon_trickett! #PeoplesVote  
Don’t let Dominic Grieve or Soubry put their foot in it! Are you watching, Brussels? Donald Trump announces HUGE Brexit trade boost   
1,000 hours to stop Brexit on 29 MarchYes we can 
“Unionism has one last chance to make Northern Ireland work for everyone. Prosperity rather than Protestantism will protect the Union. And of course, Brexit makes prosperity less, not more likely.” 
An all-party Lords committee (international relations select committee) concluded unanimously that the "UK is on the wrong side of the law" when it comes to arms sales to Saudi Arabia. But with Brexit so DISTRACTING, don't expect anything to come of it... 
This one tweet from @NickyMorgan01 whom I've known for 20 years before she was elected to Parliament sums up the political basis of the sad shambles of the HMG eminently avoidable Brexit debacle. I called for softest Norway+ Brexit in 2016 but noone listening to Remain MEPs!  
Mother’s Day is coming upFeels soon doesn’t it?Not that long away.Don’t want to worry you but ..It’s after we Brexit.And we still have no idea what that Brexit will look like.41 days to go.That’s including weekends. 
The Remain Parliament tries again to stop Brexit - This week the same MPs who look down on Leave supporters & want to dilute or defeat the decision of UK voters to exit the EU were repeating the same tired lies of Project Fear.  
'Remainers will resign unless May postpones Brexit'What's not to like?Let them go.  
Brexit Britain. The most toxic, damaging and worthless ideology we have faced post-war. Bin it!  
984 hours until BrexitFantastic, less than 1000 hours now until we leave the unelected undemocratic extortionate EU.43 years of lies & deception by bought propogandists.The most audacious fraudulent scam ever perpetrated against the British taxpayer.Free at last  
For a moment I thought the tweet was about Brexit  
“If a clean Brexit is either supplanted by the dog’s breakfast that is May’s deal or delayed by extension of Article 50, both govt and parliament will have lost their legitimacy. The governmental compact will have been unilaterally broken”#StandUp4Brexit 
Fewer than 9,000 signatures needed to get this petition over 100,000: "Revoke Art.50 if there is no Brexit plan by the 25 of February"  
The #indyref2 timetable is for @NicolaSturgeon ⁦@theSNP⁩ leader but debate within the party & movement is healthy & I respectfully disagree with a narrative which risks kicking the can down the road when #Brexit is imminent   
Write a piece for the magazine, they said. Bit of fun about Brexit, they said. So how the f@!$ did this happen?  
Only a foolish or greedy person could be fearful of Brexit. It's about keeping  sovereignty in the long term than financial comfort in the short term. If we stay in the EU our long term prospects will be nil because the EU is collapsing. via @telebusiness 
Oh lighten up...they're young people fighting for their future. Ok, maybe they shouldn't bunk off school but it's not a crime is it? It's not as if they lied to a whole country that Brexit would be easy and marvellous. I mean, anyone who did that should really be ashamed.  
Theresa May accuses the #climatestrike protesters of disruption. Meanwhile she fanatically ploughs on with the monstrous disruption that is #Brexit. The hypocrisy of the Tory Brexiters knows no bounds. #PeoplesVote 
Brexit is 999 hours away. #brexit 
The  deselection campaign is in full swing! Join our campaign to deselect the Tory Remainers trying to stop Brexit:  
The EU has not offered us a deal that delivers on the referendum result. If they won't offer us a better deal, then politicians need to be clear that we're leaving on WTO terms.  
Stop the Brexit betrayal.#StopBrexit@RemainingKind 
Reading so many negative comments from Brexiters about yesterday’s demonstrations by young people who are trying to save the planet confirms to me that Brexit is nothing to do with sovereignty and all about people’s core values, their humanity and how they view the world. 
Theresa May vows to ignore Parliament defeat and pursue her rejected Brexit plan  By far the worst bit of PM May's plan is that Britain cannot trade on any trade deals it makes without the undemocratic EU's permission. Keeping that very quiet. 
I was appalled to see the climate change kids patted on the head metaphorically on @Channel4News, then they laid in later with the usual Project Fear stuff on Brexit. The 'News' is almost entirely politicised now, especially Channel4, it's just about become unwatchable. #LIBERTY 
If @HackneyAbbott knows Brexit 2016 Referendum result was achieved by deception & lawbreaking it is impossible to justify respecting the result & pursuing Brexit on that basis. On the contrary, it is in the national interest to stop it: MPs must act. #RevokeA50 #PeoplesVote 
12 angry ministers could quit Theresa May's cabinet if she won't delay Brexit  Good the sooner the better for Britain and it's people. Time to replace them with Patriots. 
My bit on Steve Baker and the rest of the Brexit allstars  
THERESA May and EU negotiators may be in cahoots to deliver a "kamikaze" Brexit plan that will see both parties act at the very last minute to force MPs in the UK to vote in favour of the deal,Brexit news: Theresa May and Brussels in CAHOOTS   
You're a University of Brighton Fashion school drop-out who got busted for having a £675,315 Brexit habit. Ease up on the white middle class bit. 
4 of my old school pals are the same. Each voted no for variety of reasons. All none told me they have switched to Yes. Reasons, Westminster madness over Brexit, threat of fracking and falling food standards. "Indy can't be as bad as Brexit"  
Both Tory & Lab MPs threatened with death for opposing BrexitJo Cox was actually killed. Even just opposing NO-DEAL Brexit earns Yvette Cooper this: “I’ll kill your kids & grandkids”Such extremism is tip of snarling iceberg that is the deeply divided UK 
So why don’t you ask Jeremy Corbyn why he’s helping tories deliver Brexit which was full of lies, fraud and dark money? 
Nicola Sturgeon need only say one sentence to ruin Jacob Rees-Mogg’s hopes for a no-deal Brexit, writes Brian Wilson. 
@JuliaHB1Freedom of speech, including the right to oppose is a *fundamental* principle of democracy,whereas scapegoating and calls to ”stop” or forcibly suppress opposition are an early warning symptom of fascism.Which do you really support Julia Hartley-Brewer?#brexit  
Whoopsie! Not sure it’s big or clever to  threaten people?? What exactly does Julia mean here? How does she imagine I should be ‘stopped’?? Or other Remainers. Doesn’t sound very democratic to me. Sounds a bit desperate and definitely irresponsible from a broadcaster #brexit  
School children went on strike for climate justice. Why can't Scots go on strike for an independence referendum? 
Boris Johnson & the Brexiters bragged of a Brexit 'dividend' that would save the NHS - in fact, already, the UK economy has contracted by £800bn per week - before Brexit. The UK is screwed and the NHS is screwed... #BrexitShambles  
Right-wing politicians like Rees-Mogg and the ERG are pushing #Brexit because they see it as a chance to slash the taxes and regulations that eat into the profits of the rich. Environmental regulations are just the kind of thing they want to scrap. #ClimateStrike #ClimateChange 
#Brexit.Is it even possible for the EU Parliament to ratify an agreement that is known to be the upshot of a criminal referendum?Asking for hundreds of millions of EU citizens.@guyverhofstadt @eucopresident#RevokeA50 
Brexit is 1000 hours away. #brexit 
1000 hours to #Brexit! 
Finally done it...Finished with @skynews ....I can't watch it anymore...sad but true.Loved it for years but these days it really is ridiculous.What with its totally Liberal agenda and anti Brexit narrative..it is totally biased..Bye bye Sky News...these days you're rubbish. 
Because #DonaldTrump sticks to his word so much I don't suppose the #DailyExpress is analysing which regulations we'd be required to relax in order to agree a deal with, let's face it, a partner that would hold a better hand of cards.#Brexit  
US President @realDonaldTrump last night gave Britain a massive boost by declaring that trade between the UK and the US will be “very substantially increased” after Brexit.   
Here's how a no-deal Brexit is shaping up, from banks to food supplies  
A no deal Brexit is like having a bad fall which hurts for a while but soon you are back fighting fit. May's Brino is like having a bad fall and suffering long lasting or even permanent pain. 
Female MPs have been forced to move house and hire bodyguards as tensions over Brexit fuel intimidation and abuse, The Times can reveal  
I swallowed the Brexit lies. Now I regret telling curry house workers to vote leaveOli Khan, head of Bangladeshi caterers, believed lies from @patel4witham and @BorisJohnsonAs a Bengali, businessman and proud Brit he is now calling for a #PeoplesVote 
The trip from London to Lincolnshire showed me the Brexit divide’s depth | Ian Jack  
Wow over 10k signatures in less than 12 hrs  please retweet and get this heard-Petition: Revoke Art.50 if there is no Brexit plan by the 25 of February  
The #UK's close affiliation with #Canada makes #CANZUK the best choice after #Brexit.Contact your local MP today and ask them for their support: #cdnpoli #auspol #nzpol #ukpolitics 
Raila Odinga hints at referendum this year  
Have a wonderful Saturday everyone today. Let’s have a day without Brexit bashing & Donald Trump bashing be first day ever. Get out on your bike like me. Go shopping, have a drink in pub ,or watch football  on TV. Can’t beat listening to fantastic music.  
Raila alisema ametusomea hii katiba na iko sawa. Now he wants a referendum for short term political gain. Surely how selfish can one be. Kenya is bigger than anyone. Anyway wacha ni kunywe chai. 
Brexit will spell end for UK as Scotland, Northern Ireland, will depart |   
In 1999, Jason Kenney pressured the AB govt to adopt the Taxpayer Protection Act, requiring a referendum before a PST can be introduced. The #UCP would repeal the NDP’s carbon tax and then require future governments to hold a referendum before re-introducing one. #ableg #abpoli 
We cannot be complacent! May is dedicated to subverting Brexit and keeping us in the tentacles of the evil EU.Prepare for her next trick - it's likely to be on a grand scale!  
And here’s the problem!The people placed their trust in their Politians to honestly carry out the process of Brexit and now stand back in utter dismay as they  trash our Democracy and wilfully delay and obstruct the process.ResultUtter loss of trust in the Establishment! 
The people who voted for Trump and Brexit aren’t violent or far right either - they’re also just ordinary people for whom the current system isn’t working 
BREXIT BEGINS: Brexiteers praise Trump’s trade announcement – are YOU watching Brussels?  
Pro-EU panelist strips on Sky News to call attention to Brexit  
Be careful what you wish for.We cannot do better than Hillary!The media does not know better!We must correct,reverse trump/brexit!  
Sky News has a fashion executive saying “Brexit is all about raising barriers”. No it’s not, fellah. It’s about tearing down the EU’s protectionist Common External Tariff.  And about time too. 
Someone who agrees with me that Brexit is not going to happen. More and more politicians are prepared to admit that.  
Voting has successfully begun for the Constitutional Referendum until February 17. Cubans are voting for the new Constitution that guarantees, protects, and defends the revolutionary and socialist future of #Cuba, and the happiness of its citizens. 
What Prof Minford does not say is the post-Brexit trade policies of the UK will be shaped largely by bigger trade partners , and without the cushion of the EU single market, the UK will experience the greatest loss of economic sovereignty since 1945. 
Given how hard Theresa May is working to keep Brexit-Russia connections from being investigated, might I suggest starting there? 
US-UK trade - complex article, WELL worth reading#quote"This is a massively important agreement, saving huge amounts of time + money..will do much to facilitate post-Brexit trade between the UK + the US..UK govt is to be congratulated for concluding this" 
we need a post-brexit skins reunion 
The Conservative party has approx 124K members= average of 200 members per constituencyAccording to a retired MP membership is only 10% of what it was a decade agoWhy?The Purple Peril aka ERG has driven out anyone reasonableHence the pressure for No Deal #Brexit#r4today 
"The uncertainty around Brexit and the relocation of the European Medicines Agency from London to Amsterdam means Britain has slipped down the list of priorities when it comes to filing for approval for new drugs."  
“Kashmir’s fate was undecided when the British partitioned India in 1947. Since then, India has ignored UN resolutions to hold a referendum in the disputed territory, allowing local residents to decide whether they want to join India or Pakistan.”  
Remaining in the customs union is not brexit, it is a stitch up. We remain tied to the EU but with no say over the rules or ability to strike bilateral trade deals. That’s not sovereignty. Only No-Deal delivers the freedom & self-determination we voted for  
“Brexit news: Theresa May and Brussels in CAHOOTS to deliver 'kamikaze' Brexit plan.” This is not new. Theresa May & her Civil so-called Servants have been colluding with the EU since the beginning to subvert British democracy.  
The Brexit mess is nearly at an end on the 29th March we officially leave the EU, We have no idea what kind of Brexit we will get. What is clear Scotland voted against Brexit by 62% TO 38% Providing the deadline is not extended Let's make the 2nd April the day we announce indyref 
Rugby league Immortal Mal Meninga writes: Australia needs a referendum on national anthem #NRL 
Brexit: nothing is clearer - the UK-US continuation of the MRA on conformity assessment is a massively important development, and illustrates clearly how we need much more that WTO rules. But you wouldn't guess that from the media coverage...  #Brexit.  
Tory party: “who wants to take February recess or who wants to resolve Brexit. Tory party “you had me at February rec... 
Brexit is a coup within a coup within a coup. ERG and Momentum are both trying to take over British politics  
May’s Brexit StrategyMay’s Brexit Strateg May’s Brexit Strate May’s Brexit Strat May’s Brexit Stra May’s Brexit Str May’s Brexit StMay’s Brexit SMay’s BrexitMay’s Brexi May’s BrexMay’s Bre May’s BrMay’s BMay’sMay MaM 
Brexit is not the best reason for a split. The best reasons for a split are that Labour is now led by an anti-Semite and run by a faction which would end Western collective security if it could and which is at best ambivalent about and at worst hostile to parliamentary democracy.  
EU Investors Considering Moves to the UK Because of Brexit  
Colm Who are you fooling? Your compassion would normally be admirable but listen to yourself! You were ruthless in your pursuit of the innocent little human being in the abortion referendum just like the people you now condemn. I can't take you seriously  
Every school and college visit I do - be it Brexit or climate change - lifts me up.The next generation is so much more talented, energised and ready for change than the cacophony of wretched failure represented by Andrea Leadsom.When this shitshow is over, there will be hope  
Our campaign to deselect those MPs trying to STOP brexit is starting to work - help us by joining the @Conservatives and forcing deselection of these anti-democratic hypocrites @LeaveEUOfficial @Arron_banks @christopherhope 
Newspaper headlines: IS teen baby plea, and Trump Brexit 'boost'  
Like taking a crystal vase of sanity, and dropping it from the top of the Shard. Down, down, down it goes, glinting with inner fire as its facets catch the sun. Then it hits the pavement of reality and shatters into so many fragments, a unicorn couldn't put it back together. 
Watching politicians devote so much time to Brexit is rather like witnessing the rearranging of deckchairs on the Titanic. Why has it taken children to force adults to talk about climate change? Do YOU care about our planet? Join me from 1 on @LBC 
The racist Brexit Party rather marvellously allows you to sign up with totally fake details! Looks like "Ivana Bollocokov" "H Hitler" & "Rae Cyst" all want to be candidates! And under GDPR they have to go through them all #Trolling 
Andrew Neil on the night of the 2016 referendum: "The European Union will be divided on how it should now deal with Britain. France & Germany will be divided - the North & South will be divided on what their negotiating position should be"  
BREXIT BEGINS: Brexiteers praise Trump’s trade announcement – are YOU watching Brussels?  
French wine makers may be "selling like crazy" to Britain as their clients stock up ahead of Brexit, but they say the country's looming departure from the European Union promises nothing but problems   
Getting elected on a false nanifesto twice is not principled. Neither is voting for all of the EU Referendum enabling legislation & then refusing to live with the political consequences.  
At 7am tomorrow morning, Brexit will be 1000 hours away.I became a Eurosceptic in October of 1990 when I was 19 years old. I've voted, argued and campaigned for this for over 28 years.To everybody out there who wants to annul my vote now...FUCK RIGHT OFF. 
How many times have we heard young people are abandoning Labour over Brexit? Yet, somehow they still feel the urge to chant Oh Jeremy Corbyn at a rally about Climate change...Funny that#climatestrike 
17.4 million voted for a brexit that cant be deliverd. Apart from the moron fringe, betrayed is how they must feel. Direct your anger to the ERG and their ilk, not the EU. We were played by elite turds. 
It's hard to believe that 967 days have passed since the 2016 referendumAs long as our MPs don't vote to extend our misery, we will be leaving the EU on schedule in 6 weeks timeThen party time will usher in the dawn of the UK's new future as an independent nation (once again) 
What has just happened to kill Brexit#AnotherBrexitNailInTheCoffin 
British woman strips naked on live TV to make sure people paid attention to her talking about Brexit 
Speaker of the House: "Who wants a holiday break as the country is torn apart by Brexit?"MP's: "You had me at holiday break." 
Thank you sir for enlightening us on the good new regarding US/UK relations, our MSM are too preoccupied with promulgating their anti-Trump agenda to mention it, I hope U forgive them as the MSM no longer represent the will of the people since Brexit!@gerardjasper @BrexitKnight 
Dominic Grieve understands the problem. You don’t. Any Brexit is bad for Britain and Article 50 should be withdrawn. May should be sacked and sectioned. Grieve should lead the party in mending the fences you all broke 
Welcome to #Brexit Britain. Coyod someone explain to me how Satan and the paedophiles have anything to do with it? Can we all start becoming alarmed at the lunacy. Thanks  
If Labour fight to stop Brexit, I'd vote for them in a GE, with or without Corbyn, because it's not actually about him for me - it's about stopping #Brexit and not much else at this stage. #StopBrexitSaveBritain #RevokeRemainRebuild #PeoplesVote 
Theresa May's latest humiliation makes a chaotic Brexit more likely  
So Rees-Smug has said that concentration camps aren't necessarily a bad thing..... let that sink in.i wonder if he's laying the ground to reintroduce workhouses as part of the ERG post brexit campaign. The voice of the working man my arse #selfservingprick 
You misunderstand (not for the first time). Whichever side of Brexit you’re on this is not a proud time for British politics. 
So it seems the Brexit party people got upset  
Michael Moore’s new Doc on the state of America makes Brexit look like Eurovision. @MMFlint 
As opposed to, say, breaking the law to try and influence a referendum illegally. 
I have been thinking a lot about Brexit tonight in the context of the response to the climate change protest by young people. My conclusion is that the population is divided and will neve heal. We have bridges v borders, tolerance v intolerance, light v dark. We simply wont heal. 
Talk slowly, sound reasonable and posh, and millions will think you are the Messiah - the Jacob Rees Mogg School of Fake Politics. How anyone in the Question Time studio listened to another word after it should make us all despair #brexit #boerwar #southafrica #JacobReesMogg 
“We must do something about Russia” says party that’s taken nearly £1m in Russian-linked donations since 2016 and refuses to investigate Russian interference in the referendum.  
Sarah Wollaston embodies everything that is wrong with our political class:→ called for referendum, promised to respect decision→ campaigned for Leave→ then changed her mind for Remain→ opposed a second referendum→ called for a second referendum  
Eu nationals make important, and in some cases life saving, contributions to the people of Scotland. They help us maintain communities and grow our economy. They are welcome.  The policies of the UK government are not. #Brexit  
She stood on a Conservative Manifesto in 2017, she voted to grant a referendum, she voted for delivering Article 50She switched from #Leave to #Remain about a week before the ReferendumMove on shall we .. best ignored ... not to be trusted@sarahwollaston 
Read and weep Remainers. The UK is a great place to do business. EU Investors Considering Moves to the UK BECAUSE of Brexit -  
The US President promises that transatlantic trade will  increase very substantially after Brexit  
WTF is wrong with you #Tory #Brexit zealots? Leave the kids alone. They are gonna have to deal with the disaster you leave them for a long, long time. Long after you rancid #Tories have left this earth 
Tory MP finally admits he was wrong about Britain not receiving aid after Second World WarHow he chooses to come clean over Brexit next.   
#Brexit Poll: The Tory government has voted not to retain the European human rights charter in UK law after Brexit. Do you trust the government to protect our human rights? 
Saturday’s Express: “Trump’s Brexit Boost For Britain” #bbcpapers #tomorrowspaperstoday (via @AllieHBNews) 
Porsche warns U.K. buyers of a possible 10% hard Brexit price hike  
“Brexit sucks and I’m tired of being England’s little cousin” - the legendary @charlottechurch #YesIsMore #YesCymru #Annibyniaeth #CymruAmByth pic.twitter.com/viIeyjZ7ya 
Nicola Sturgeon has to call a second referendum. 
This could be significant 'Purple Momentum' Tory activists are planning deselection ambushes before Brexit day Dominic Grieve and Heidi Allen are facing having no-confidence at local party annual meetings over the next six weeks via @Telegraph 
Brexit’s one thing, but Downing St’s flat-footed, tin-eared, patronising response to the schoolchildren climate protest should really worry the Tory party. It currently has nothing to say to young voters, & few (with honourable exceptions) are even thinking about the problem. 
#LondonFashionWeek is kicking off, but collections won't hit stores until after #Brexit  
It's no coincidence that Caroline Lucas, leader of the Green Party is one of the most passionate supporters of staying in the EU.  Nor is it surprising to learn that some of those arguing so strongly for Brexit are climate change sceptics such as Owen Paterson. #Climatechange 
Why the surprise? The kids can't stand this govt. They've been victims of austerity. Only people who've been in a bubble of protection not affected by austerity policies, could be surprised by these chants. Ask any teacher, youth worker. BREXIT woke them up. They see  
A no-deal Brexit starts to lose its terror as the EU draws up survival plans  via @telebusiness 
Really enjoyed speaking at the public meeting on #brexit tonight with @JoPike3 in Shipley with lots of #Yorkshire good sense about the perils of brexit for our region and beyond. We need a #PeoplesVote to avoid #BrexitChaos 
Just one of the eye-watering misjudgments of Brexit is to forget that leaving the EU does not escape its presence, its influence, or our own lengthy past within it. The casual observer can spot this. Why can't the leaders of our country? 
#quote "EU fund managers..up in arms over EU rules which wd force them to trade dual-listed shares on uncompetitive EU exchanges after Brexit..'real possibility of EU27 fund managers locating operations in the future in the UK'"  
My minor contribution to today’s Brexit car crash: councils have been told to plan urgently for a Brexit but they don’t know what it is or how to do it  
This is NOT project fear. Any sort of Brexit will cost us all dearly. It must be stopped democratically ⁦@peoplesvote_uk⁩ ‘Chaotic and Catastrophic: What happens with a no-deal Brexit?’| Richard Corbett  
There’s no such thing as “hardline” Brexiteers. There’s people who want Brexit and people who don’t. The ERG are the former. Those MPs backing May’s appalling sell-out deal are the latter  
To understand the deep internal party divisions and new electoral cleavages over #Brexit, see  
Despite Brexit  
Could you just clarify what the 2016 EU Referendum was if not a People's Vote? 
This really is an extremely articulate explanation of the problems of Brexit, far clearer and more sophisticated than anything I have heard from any politician recently  
I’m going to repeat a thought from a while back. @michaelgove is far too bloody quiet. Having bravely led the Brexit charge he’s now calculating that, when the proverbial hits, he will be the palatable alternative to Johnson to succeed May. It’s always been about self interest. 
“BOLY THE ALBUM” featuring @RadicalRashf0rd @Brexit_Bennett @EnforcerNgolo @wwfcjack2 @FiringFirmino @tonyisred @marksmanmarcus @LFCthan @jevans28 @LovelyLingard @GloriusGuendouz                      Huge shoutout too @____CCFC____  and @SilkySead 2 s 
Ultra capitalists want no regs that they consider obstacles to profit. Includes environmental regs, want them gone, so they deny responsibility. They also hate EU regs, want them gone, so orchestrate #brexit. It is the same people behind #climatechangedeniers & #brexit..  
If a group of kids took the day of school to express support for Brexit, or oppose unmanaged migration, or express support for capital punishment, how many people would say "Good for them. Great to see young people being politically engaged". 
Today, Mr. @Antonio_Tajani, @EP_President, you have single-handedly explained with absolute clarity the main reason for #Brexit: the EU is not a democratic regime.No democracy exists without freedom of speech. 
Just did a interview with a New York Times journalist on NI, covering trauma, mental health, suicide & #Brexit. It really was difficult to remain positive about what might happen here- and then I saw #ClimateStrike. Incredible. #Hope 
Joining campaigners against #Liveanimalexports #Ramsgate is always a humbling experience to share their tenacity against this dreadful trade that scars our town. I hope this will be stopped with our new found #Brexit freedoms. @michaelgove @ConservativeAWF 
KASSAM: Trump Has Britain’s Back (and America’s) On Brexit  
Brexit CONSPIRACY: Theresa May and Brussels in CAHOOTS to deliver 'kamikaze' Brexit plan. It's been like this almost from the word go. This is just another scam to lock us in the EU cesspit. May is treacherous and should be removed from office immediately.  
You are literally facilitating the ERG and its roadmap to a devastating Brexit. You have absolutely no right to criticise nor question the ethics and principles of others whilst you sell your own down the river. So, no thanks, you're a sellout.#PeoplesVote 
I was trying, but I can't even find a gag. Am just straightforwardly affronted by rich 50 and 60 somethings longing for the hardest possible Brexit on the basis of 'democracy' while moaning about schoolkids peacefully protesting climate destruction. 
Awesome spatial illustration of voting in the House of Commons on Brexit, by @Josh_H @SeanClarke & @7091lapS. Perfect for legislative voting geeks! @bjornhoyland @philipjcowley @johncarey03755 @SimonJackman @Nolan_Mc @bshor 
Labour MPs tempted to vote for May's deal need to grasp that if May succeeds the Tories will call a general election, Labour's vote will be sunk by Remainer defections & the victorious Tories will set about breaking the WA and implementing a brutal tax haven #Brexit.#PeoplesVote 
In addition to fighting for a Hard Brexit,Far right Yellow vests also want to remove the ‘Satantic Paedophiles ‘ running our country #FBPE 
WHY DON'T ALL REMOANERS QUIT?Claims up to ten Labour MPs could quit over Brexit as soon as TODAY  @MailOnline 
Wait. Didn’t your Somerset Capital Management grew tired of London because of #Brexit and moved to Ireland?.. 
Cares about the children missing ONE day of school .. Yet couldn't care less about destroying their actual futures. #Brexit #FinalSay 
We need to connect with the #ClimateStrike youth, by pointing out the connection between climate change denial and #Brexit.@BrexitBin @MadeleinaKay @Scientists4EU @mikegalsworthy @EUflagmafia @Tommoriarty16 @fascinatorfun @snb19692 @Eddystone506 
Wetherspoons' boss Tim Martin pledges to reduce beer prices in event of no-deal Brexit      Wetherspoons' boss Tim Martin pledges to reduce beer prices in event of no-deal Brexit  
Deeply shocking but the intolerance that has now surfaced  has come directly from this awful process of Brexit that has descended our country into the gutter. Each day I feel I don’t belong, but by fuck I will remain. 
The idea you think the BBC has been pro Brexit (or anti) only confirms you are on very high quality hallucinatories.  
250 companies are in talks to relocate to the Netherlands from Brexit Britain. These business partners explain why they're leaving  
That sneering attitude @andrealeadsom is why young voters are turning away from your Government in droves... #climatechange and #Brexit could be a double whammy for our next generation. These kids have my full support. #SchoolsStrike4Climate #ClimateStrike 
When the facts about the Ref. campaign & negotiated WA outcome change I also change my mind. @sarahwollaston is right to do so as a sensible Tory MP who sees the damage of Brexit &no deal one particularly. UK needs #PeoplesVote #FinalSay #InformedConsent to decide Brexit outcome  
It's clearly the least risky alternative. The City is prepared and businesses want it - as against any long drawn out uncertainty. The die is cast. Get on with it. A no-deal Brexit starts to lose its terror as the EU draws up survival plans 
President Trump promised UK he would help out all he could to make BREXIT happen!Trumps stands for sovereign nations & staunchly opposed to globalism!BHO THREATENED the UK with bad or no trade deals if BREXIT went through. Obama is a globalist who tried to destroy America! 
Obviously, Owen rocked up. Never met a protest he didn’t like, unless it’s about Brexit or racism in the Labour Party and then he’s nowhere to be seen.  
REALITY CHECK; This so called “biggest cash boost” in NHS history is to be paid for by a Brexit “dividend” the Gov’ts own OBR says won’t actually exist & the conservatives “approach to the economy” has left 14 million people living in poverty & sent millions to food banks!  
Tech entrepreneurs say sector could be ruined by post-Brexit immigration rules 
#Brexit is Dunkirk in reverse. Brits desperately trying to escape Britain as toffs start torching proles in the streets for laughs. 
Why Churchill's successors gave away our hard earned freedom to the EU is a mystery.#Brexit means we can get our country back.  
I watch BBC News & SKY News on & off during the day: on in the background as I work.Anyone else noticed they haven't been reporting progress on rolling over trade agreements for #Brexit day 1? I've seen one reported!Current list of rollover TAs at  
The EU has exploited the Irish in order to shut off Britain’s negotiating options and to shoehorn the UK into a customs union under EU legal and regulatory control:  #Brexit 
Fifth columnists amongst the people entrusted to look after our national interests; they're not even attempting to hide that they've been working all along to deliver us up to another country.......their no deal benefit! 
.@AnnCoulter on The @LarryOConnor Show: President @realDonaldTrump signing this spending bill is "so much worse than Brexit".  
#Brexit thugs are not arrested, children standing up for their future are. Tory #Brexit and #ClimateChange denial are closely linked together, a connection centred on #55TuftonSt. 
So many brexiters seem to think that if you're a remainer, then you are anti-British! You can be a proud Brit and a proud European. The two are not mutually exclusive! #Brexit #PeoplesVoteNow #RevokeArticle50 
We need to face the truth about Brexit: a reckless referendum left the UK with no good options, writes @georgeeaton. 
So Theresa May is doing a terrible job of Brexit, and ruining the U.K.Now the POTUS has declared a #FakeTrumpEmergency and is ruining the USA.Meanwhile, Putin is watching from Russia like... 
Sick of people in media and political establishment referring to brexiteers as "hard brexiteers". Both major parties pledged a complete Brexit in 2017 and in 2016 it was made clear a leave vote meant leaving the EU, Single Market and Customs Union. Not hard Brexit. Just Brexit. 
The only adults in the room are teenagers, and they’re on the streets.  #ClimateStrike #brexit 
Adam Price head and shoulders ahead of the field on Any Questions  tonight. Has there ever been such thunderous applause for Welsh Independnce in contrast to  Westminster s total failure to resolve Brexit. We can do better ourselves! 
Unionists residing in Scotland what will it take for you to vote for Scottish independence? What circumstances can possibly be worse than a Brexit we didn’t vote for. Look at the mess WM party’s are making of this defunct union, how can you sit back and applaud our demise! How? 
EU DECEIT: How Jean Claude Juncker ADMITTED he would IGNORE result of EU referendum  
The Constitution of Kenya 2010 with its robust Bill of Rights and the independence of the judiciary was supposed to end tyranny. Mr. Hand-Cheque must stop singing about the referendum until he insists on @UKenyatta obeying the 15 court orders in my favour. #FreedomOrDeath! 
Former Foreign Secretary David Miliband tells ITV News that the UK is 'staring in the face of no-deal Brexit economic carnage'  
Hey, I've just had a great idea to resolve the #Brexit problem. Why don't we just #RevokeArticle50 and get on with our lives. Does that sound like a plan!!! 
People say men have a one track mindBut obviously never met may with her one way only Brexit Hers Job and party before country Rich before poorDeath before healthCash before compassion 
Totally disagree that going through with Brexit —and disallowing the public any opportunity to ditch it— equates with democracy.I also disagree that overriding Labour’s own democratic decision-making is somehow a ‘democratic’ thing to do. 
You've already split the left and benefitted the Tories @GloriaDePieroYou and the "yes please" Tory Brexit cabal have acted against Party Policy and against the express wishes of the members and voters in every constituency in the country.Cut the crocodile tears. It's yours.  
I’m no fan of the EU, but #Brexit means U.K. run by extremely disturbed sociopaths like @Jacob_Rees_Mogg who, as we see here, advocates for ‘concentration camps.’ If you can, escape that shithole while you can.  
Very proud of my daughter Lydia just behind banner in 4th pic who linked #Brexit when she spoke & said we can fight climate change far better with our EU friends than by ourselves @EK_EuropeanMove @Labour4EU @RosieDuffield1 @maryhoneyball #SchoolsStrike4Climate 
@metpoliceuk Yet yellow jackets can scream literally threats to life & police ignore it. Are You attempting to teach them a lesson so they never protest again? It’s not going to work. Shouldn’t your lot be investigating the corrupt referendum? No? Oh yeah uber elite rule you! 
It’s important to remember that the struggle to preserve Holyrood as something more than just a “pretendy parliament” is an integral part of protecting Scottish identity, sovereignty and our hopes for a progressive future - my @ScotNational column #Brexit  
A lot of Brexiters on here seem concerned about my TV career but I've got a new show coming soon called 'A Place In The Shit'  where over sunburnt racist pensioners have to come home from Spaindue to the BREXIT they voted for & pick a dismal flat to live in a multicultural area 
In contrast to the usual diet of endless, partisan, often pointless jostling over Brexit, the lead story in tomorrow’s paper makes me happy and hopeful.  
Amsterdam is winning so much Brexit business that its financial regulator needs a budget boost to keep up  
Why are we constantly told that businesses are already moving jobs to the EU as contingency planning as an argument against Brexit, but then the employment figures show the opposite? Manipulation is the entire purpose of those that don’t want to leave. 
I can't say the word 'anaesthetist'. I can spell it fine, just can't fucking say it - so I say 'anaesthesiologist' which should be harder, but it isn't. Anyway, there's some randomness just because I didn't want to keep mentioning what absolute fucked up pile of shite #Brexit is. 
Six days in St Lucia and six days without hearing the word ‘Brexit’. There may be a god, after all. 
The women will save us from Trump. The children will save our environment. I'm not sure who'll save us from Brexit. But it's clear the men can just make the tea. 
With the £100bn losses caused by Brexit, the UK could have:-nearly DOUBLED NHS spending-DOUBLED defence spending-provided hot school meals for every child in the UK for the next 15 years!-funded Cancer Research UK for the next 150 yearsBrexit: it really is catastrophic 
Dozen or more ministers could resign to stop no-deal Brexit, claims Dominic Grieve  
Labour MPs like @CarolineFlintMP @lisanandy @gareth_snell @GloriaDePiero read this.You are being played like fiddles. You will damage, split or destroy our Party with a Tory Brexit. May will succumb to her hard right whatever scabby deal you do with her. 
Labour has been clear about wanting to stop a no-deal Brexit but the moderates in the Tory party have been all talk with no action. When will they act? 
Good point. An elected politician, free to live everywhere except Spain (withdrawn of EAW) banned to talk in the #EU parliament. Well, don’t ask about why #Brexit is taking place. Simply we are not managing it well. Will be react? I doubt it. Better spread #IamEuropean nonsense. 
I can't talk because I wrote an article about the Churchill thing but historians might find it very funny that a month before Brexit Jacob Rees Mogg was busily whitewashing Britain's conduct in the Boer War and Aaron Bastani was busily whitewashing Stalin. 
Don't believe all you read in the news! I am in Paris and i can tell you honestly this is not the same 'populism' as Brexit or *r**p in usa. there are several factions but only very few are violent/extreme right, most are ordinary folk, and still largely supported by the public 
"Our policy is to honour the referendum, and gradually people are realising that our policy is built on a lie. Oh, and you're right: I really am a senior frontbencher who is seemingly incapable of identifying this glaringly obvious idiocy before I tweeted it to the nation."  
Shame Brexit isn't being opposed by the effing Opposition then. 
Strange isn't it - a teenaged girl "pushes" a police officer (allegedly) and she is wrestled to the ground and handcuffed, whereas Tory MPs vote en masse for deliberately homicidal welfare policies and bring the country to the brink of a Brexit disaster, and they get a pay rise! 
THEY MUST HAVE GOOD DIALOGUE: BETWEEN CATALONIA AND THE SPANISH STATE ON A REFERENDUM.WHERE WE RISK BEING VULNERABLE TO SPEAK AND LISTEN .IT'S MORE EPHEMERAL. IF THEY ARE DIFFERENCES OF VIEWS OF DIVERGENCE OF IDEAS,THEY CAN BE RESOLVED THROUGH DISCUSSION AND DIALOGUE.GOOD LUCK!  
European Union: ''It's anti-democratic': EU making Britain suffer over Brexit, says Marine Le Pen' 
It's not our job to ensures the EU doesn't hv to change its budget post-Brexit. It's not our job to ensure the EU doesn't hv to change its Irish border-management post-Brexit. & it's not our job to ensure EU rules apply to goods in the UK just as much post-Brexit. Not our job. 
Help fight climate change by leaving the largest environmental regulator and biggest advocate for climate change action on the planet.Brexit logic. With a red rose.  
It deploys the false language of Populism: apart from the utter ludicrousness of an unelected Peer berating 'The Establishment', it fails to recognize that having successfully made Brexit the defining policy of the country, Brexiters *are* the Establishment. 4/5 
May’s deal is a hard Brexit...don’t people understand this? It’s being contrasted with no deal which is catastrophic...May’s deal is ‘catastrophic lite’...but catastrophic none the less!Time to wise up...we are sleepwalking into a disaster...and all for NOTHING! 
Brexit will have an impact on the UK & the EU. It isn't the UK's job to stop it from having an impact on the EU. Yet the EU seems to think it is. The "divorce bill"; the Irish border; May's rule-taking deal- all attempts to stop Brexit affecting the EU. That's not our job or goal 
Youth are our hope and bright future not the fascist Brexit thugs with the yellow vests supporting rich toffs like May and Mogg!RT and watch this please  
Hundreds of thousands marched then, were ignored by Labour leadership & UK was pushed into an unlawful conflict causing untold harm & loss of life.Hundreds of thousands marched for a #PeoplesVote you ignore them & push a Brexit built on law breaking. Reckless. #StopBrexit 
Electoral crime, cheating, a rigged electorate, foreign interference & a decade long campaign of lies & fear-mongering by the tax-dodging #Brexit billionaire press. There is no mandate for Brexit. But there is one for a massive inquiry into Brexit abuses of democracy.#StopBrexit 
Compare and contrast these two statements from @SteveBakerHW’s website, pre and post referendum. It’s a bait and switch.  
There are still some gentlemen around. Take Michel Barnier, for instance, he was polite enough to refer to Theresa May’s Brexit “strategy.” How gracious. Such good manners. He was just too polite to say “shitshow.” #BrexitShambles #BrexitChaos 
It is astonishing how the far right of the Tory party have been allowed to move the goalposts. On @Channel4News, asked to respond to tech startups saying a hard Brexit would damage them, Minister for Digital Industries @margot_james_mp responds: “The only hard Brexit is no deal.” 
While I get people's disappointment at Rice, the situation has brought out a strain of Brexit-style nationality in a minority of Irish people. Some of the anti-English stuff is dismal.* (third day of this) 
How can we expect our ruling class to take responsibility for the enormous human consequences of austerity and Brexit when they still can't face the reality of British colonialism? A delusional view of history stated with absurd levels of certainty 
BREXIT will destroy the Tory Party. I have been a lifelong Tory voter. I'm now 70, but at present, I have no intention to vote Tory again. Theresa May has been a disastrous Prime Minister, preceded, by just as arrogant David Cameron. I saw through Cameron. May is toast IMO. 
The latest Skripal conspiracy theory from the @RussianEmbassy in the UK is @Bellingcat is getting information from the UK intelligence services to distract people from Brexit. What's scarier: They know they're lying, or they don't know they're lying?   
So, apparently today was the last day that ships full of British exports could leave for Japan and guarantee arriving there without the risk of being empounded if there is a no deal #Brexit. Six weeks to go and the catastrophe has already started. #RevokeArticle50 now! 
Just watching a @Channel4News report on the damage #Brexit, including the ending of Freedom of Movement, will have on the UK tech industry. #Brexit destroying the future while failing to return to the past.#PeoplesVote 
Labour MPs tempted to vote for May's deal have to grasp that if May succeeds the Tories will call a GE, Labour's vote will be sunk by Remainer defections and the victorious Tories will set about breaking the WA and implementing a brutal tax haven #Brexit.#PeoplesVote 
This is fucking sick.Brexit needs to be stopped.  
Steven............were you born as "bright" as this, or did you take private lessons?You ARE the epitome of Brexit, sonny  -  an illiterate, thick Plank.BTW  -  You had to Google "epitome" didn't you..................LOL!!! 
#Youth4ClimateJustice shows:1.@Theresa_May is in practice a #Brexit secretary, no wider remit.2.@Conservatives are ideologically opposed to medium term thinking.3.@TheGreenParty is the only party with policies aligned to the physics of #Earth.Image from article by @Freedland 
Shame on Europe! Shame on @EP_President @Antonio_Tajani I’m Pro Brexit, friends of England don’t doubt about it, better out of Europe than in in this European Comission of corrupted an without values and dignity, not democracy!  
So Labour MPs threatening to leave the Labour Party. Conservative MPs threatening to leave the Conservative Party. The common denominator? Those MPs are opposed to Brexit, yet it’s the leavers that are called extremists for standing by democracy.  
Porsche asks UK buyers to commit to 10% no-deal Brexit surcharge 
EU Investors Considering Moves to the UK Because of Brexit  
Friend: O HEY, how’s Brexit going? Britain: Boris Johnson’s sister just showed her boobs on T.V and now we are at war with the children.Friend: WTFBritain: Mouldy jam is fine now too.Friend: U ok? 
UK & America sign deal on post-BREXIT trade!Agreement will allow British & American businesses to keep trading as freely as they do today, without additional bureaucracy.After BREXIT, UK & US will work to strike an ambitious new free trade agreement.  
If we are being pedantic, it’s called Fraud, not Brexit 
Prodigy star Keith Flint says even though he’s devoted his life to anarchy and general mayhem, even he’s a bit fearful about the prospect of a No Deal Brexit  
See you on the next anti-Brexit march? Project of the right for the right by the right  
Surely if the one of the heads of a campaign whose main message was that Brexit would help the NHS, is someone who wishes it didn't exist, that MUST be enough, right?No reasonable democracy could continue with this, knowing that such a massive lie produced such a small majority.  
Get that feeling that you are being ignored in the Brexit process?That it seems our future is being decided for us and we simply do not have a say? Do something about it and join YC4PV.It's free and here to ensure that young people are given a voice in the #Brexit process. 
Please can all these children who have the sense to care about the planet get their not-so-sensible parents and grandparents to sign the petition of Revoke Article 50 and save Britain from #Brexit catastrophe?#ClimateStrike #schoolstrike4climate #c4news 
Could you get back to making a generation-defining horrendous mess of Brexit and stfu? Cheers. 
This brexit commentary just in from a big-four accounting firm.  At least we know there’s a 105% chance that there’ll be an outcome!   
Goodness if you thought Brexit was crazy and mixed up   
Trade expert David Bannerman @DCBMEP has to correct the BBC's misinformation about Article 24 GATT, which is now the best way forward for Brexit negotiations. Several errors were made by @BBCChrisMorrisThis thread is worth reading 
When @patel4witham & @BorisJohnson pitted the British Asian community against EU migrants during the referendum they pitted immigrants against immigrants. Brave & admirable of Oli Kahn from @BCA1960 to admit they were wrong to have trusted Vote Leave. 
Just when you think the UK couldn't sink any lower with the banal soulless idiocracy and deceit of Brexit along come the London police to take school children away in handcuffs for protesting against climate change. It's utterly bleak and Scotland needs to break free.  
When you're sold a faulty, dishonestly described and dangerous product, you have every right to send it back.Let's have a #PeoplesVote and see who still wants #Brexit.#Cornwall #RevokeArticle50 #StopBrexit 
Thanks for responding on here, Lynne. It's refreshing to have such openness. So you've confirmed that you have had more than one referral regarding the referendum. Can you confirm if you have more than one active investigation? 
It's the open university of the airwaves! George Galloway's Mother Of All Talk Shows tackles Brexit, Donald Trump, and declining insect populations. Have your say and call George on 0344 499 1000.@GeorgeGalloway |  
Jacob Rees-Mogg’s warning to MPs trying to derail Brexit: “If you had European elections, my guess is Tommy Robinson would do extremely well”  
ON AIR NOW |  Call me! Tonight we’re talking with @Nigel_Farage, looking at the New Centrist Party, the New Brexit Party, Trump and the decline of insect numbers. Every Friday from 7/10pm GMT exclusively on @talkRADIO Listen online worldwide:  #MOATS 
Was just on @bbc5live discussing the climate change protests. Whilst it’s great young people are passionate about politics bit concerned about prospect of teachers encouraging political activism. Would they be as keen to let kids take a day off to march for Brexit?  
Theresa May is a normal rabid nationalist, preferring to engage in pointless conflicts with neighbouring nations rather than to engage in the mundane business of seriously addressing her country's problems.#PeoplesVote #Brexit 
Despite taking aim at the EU, Brexiter Sir Jim Ratcliffe - Britain's richest man - is reportedly moving to Monaco in Europe to avoid UK taxes on his £21bn fortune.#Brexit is all about slashing taxes and regulations. 
 Well done @BellaLack“Nobody speaks about the ecological apocalypse, so we wanted to start that coversation”I still don’t understand why #cimatechange is not the main government priority. #climateaction instead of #brexit would make so much more sense.#climatestrike 
Each of these children has more responsibility in his/her little finger than all Brexit-supporting Tory MPs put together. 
Our director @Lugey6 calmly dismantles EU-funded @CBItweets's Carolyn Fairbairn's worries over #Brexit  
Dr Dani Loughran, MD of Aston Chemicals, brilliantly sums up the business-related impacts of #Brexit.(this clip does not have JRM's limp, evasive and mendacious response including his well-worn lie about Brexit bringing 'cheaper food and clothing')  
The tyrant @UKenyatta plans to use the much hyped referendum to institutionalize impunity, electoral fraud and other injustices in Kenya. We must mobilize and deny him the opportunity to create a monarchy for the Kenyatta, Moi and Odinga families. #FreedomorDeath! #PayNursesKE 
While much of the adult population is obsessed with Brexit, blue passports and borders, these children see the planet we all live on being destroyed, and are doing something about it.There’s nothing heroic about Brexit and Brexiters. These children are real heroes.  
This is an interesting move"Porsche asks UK buyers to commit to 10% no-deal Brexit surcharge"Neatly illustrates one of the problems of No Deal 
So did I118 days ago, in the 2nd biggest march after that one, 700,000 of your fellow citizens protested in London against brexitBut you don't give a shit about themDouble standards all the wayP.s., even though I disagreed with him on Iraq, I'd take Blair over you any day 
Just looking in the Guardian at the names of the Labour MPs who are thinking about forming a new party.Chris LeslieChuka UmunnaAngela SmithGavin ShukerLuciana BergerAll of them were up here campaigning for No in the indy referendum. It'll be just another Unionist faction. 
"Give #Brexit a chance." ????MPs handed the decision on #Brexit  to voters.MPs can't now turn around and say they want to overturn the biggest democratic vote in the history of our great country.The arrogance of most MPs is breathtaking.  
EU Investors Considering Moves to the UK Because of Brexit  via @GuidoFawkesYou couldn't make it up .. what joy this brings ... what will the #Remoaners have to say now ? #Naysayers 
What else to say  in one word about a PM who is in contempt of parliament, still has no credible Brexit plan , continues to ravage our country with austerity and is reasonable for thousands of deaths of vulnerable , sick and disabled people. 
Thanks Wener for a very moving tribute. Tragic it's taken Brexit to recognise our role as MEPs.  
Brexit news: a small group of Labour MPs on the verge of leaving the Labour Party are stockpiling farewell messages. 
Amazon’s claim to local popularity is about as legitimate as the misleading Brexit campaign’s claim to represent the general will among Britons...My latest @theintercept, on the Amazon pullout and the need to replace capitalist Democrats with leftists: 
Surprise, surprise. A Putin troll emerges to attack my thread linking #Brexit and #ClimateChange denial. Putin opposes measures aimed at slowing or stopping climate change because that would impact Russia's oil and gas dependent economy. #ClimateStrike 
Oh, European Union - TRUMP WINS AGAIN! Who needs you? Brexit - leave and no deal!! Thanks Stranger great info, here!  
Memo to Andrew Wilson: Brexit is happening right now. Did no-one tell you? -  #indyref2 #ScotRef 
Porsche asks UK buyers to commit to 10% no-deal Brexit surcharge  
Terrific news and should give May the impetuous and clout to get hard headed with the EU UK and US Sign Deal on 'Post-Brexit' Trade, Plans Massive Free Trade Agreement-Via - @NeonNettle#NeonNettle 
4/ Another excellent article by @DeSmogUK showing the links between UK #Brexit supporting and #ClimateChange denying organisations and their US counterparts and donors. 
Hope @UKLabour MPs thinking of voting for May’s Brexit deal realise that her promises won’t be worth anything when there’s a new Tory leader. That leader is likely to be a hard line Brexiter who will be in charge of negotiating the future EU relationship. 
85,000 and climbing.  Please sign and/or share!  We want this debated - properly! Petition: Revoke Art.50 if there is no Brexit plan by the 25 of February  
She is obviously not aware that if all Brexit MPs were to join the new #BrexitParty they would wipe out the left leaning @conservatives treacherous party. The ERG are honouring the manifesto, unlike her! 
The EU will surely win this round of #Brexit when MPs eventually fold and vote for the WA.But the #Leave genie is out of the bottle, and by surrendering, MPs will release unassailable democratic forces.Populist politics is coming and the Establishment will have no answer. 
We were promised more money for the NHS after #Brexit, there's surely no way this would be a lie... right?! Listen back to #TheFloorIsYours with @Femi_Sorry and guests @mikegalsworthy & @RiaB_22 now   
UK Remainers make Brexit as difficult as possible, weaken UK negotiating position and boost fear of no deal to panic levels. EU negotiators refuse to change the bum deal they’ve given May. A clever coordination which undermines Britain and traps Theresa 
Lads, I know Trump and Brexit and all that shit is fucking terrible, but I don’t think I can go on living in a world where this abomination exists. pic.twitter.com/z3wcpv6kWq 
Leave kids as kids: educate, but don’t activate. What about if the kids went on a demo you or I disapproved of - eg for or against Brexit, anti-Islam or anti Danish cartoons, anti or pro-abortion? That would also be “making your voice heard.” Once allowed, harder to pick causes.  
“Austerity represented political deceit at its worst. Voters accepted nonsense pushed by govt about its credit card & allowed Tories to achieve an ideological goal of a smaller state which was otherwise unpopular. If was not bad enough, austerity helped sow seeds of Brexit” 2/2  
Was Jacob Rees-Mogg and most of the ERG right to abstain from last night’s Brexit vote? He's live on LBC #MoggOnLBC 
Digital minister @margot_james_mp tells me: "I could not be part of a government which allows this country to leave the EU without a deal." Full interview on @Channel4News at 7 #Brexit 
Is it the underlying May/EU plan that Brussels drops the backstop on March 21st, and in a flood of relief the HoC votes the WA through? Too much attention on the backstop: the whole deal stinks. And a Customs Union is NOT BREXIT. 
The fool who boasted that #Brexit would increase the lethality of Britain’s armed forces has just used the apparent lethal force of his own limited abilities to sink trade talks with China  
Brexit voters knew it would be a rocky road ahead. But they’re willing to trade short-term uncertainty for a brighter, long-term future. Business and well-to-do Remainers cannot understand this because they are petrified of risk, writes @patrickxwest 
Labour MP claims Brexit will lead to war in Europe and warns today’s children could one day return to the Continent ‘in uniform’ 
The more you reflect on it the more of a disgrace it is that the English political class spent the entire build up to #Brexit vote with barely a thought to the island of Ireland & now are irritated that there is robust push back.That's why #AllIslandDialogue is vital. 
This awful person would pursaude people far less intelligent than her to vote for something much worse than #Brexit simply because she believes it will bring her power and influence.  Her brazen self-interest is typical of nationalists leaders everywhere.  
“I pretty much burst into tears in a management meeting,” says one British European Commission official of his reaction to the Brexit vote  
My bit on Steve Baker and the rest of the Brexit Allstars  
So why is Labour enabling this fraudulent Brexit? 
President Trump Hails ‘Very Substantially Increased’ Trade With United Kingdom Post-Brexit  
“I swallowed the Brexit lies. Now I regret telling curry house workers to vote leave” Gradually, people that voted leave are realising that they were lied to  
WTO has 'huge goodwill' for UK as Brexit approaches  
The self immolation of Trumpism and Brexit in a nutshell. "This Store Owner's Anti-Kaepernick Boycott Cost Him His Entire Business"  via @vice 
Exactly right. Liberal elite sneering at ‘stoopid people’ helped Brexit & Trump happen, and none of them seem to have learned the lesson.  
Someone who has not cleared File of the sedition case against Tukde Tukde gang,Someone who had Binayak Sen as his team membersomeone who wants referendum in Kashmir  
Well that’s America officially a dictatorship,not long till the post Brexit fuck up which declares Marshall law.just as well I got the medieval axe throwing lessons as a gift the other day 
My latest Brexit Blog post on this week's developments (with, for those who have already read it, an update analysing the significance of last night's government defeat):  
People from across Ireland came together this week to plan for Brexit  
The invisible & porous border. What Brexit has literally come down to. Irony, as it was never a consideration.The backstop keeps the border like this. If you don't like the backstop, no problem. We'll just remain then #BridgesNotBorders 
This is one of the most illuminating things I’ve read about the origins of  #Brexit. In today’s ⁦@IrishTimes⁩ podcast I discuss it with its author, @kevinhorourke  
Jugs, you can mock away, as you so often do... but given you can’t understand why Brexit happened, or why Trump happened, or why almost anything happens.... do you think there’s a tiny scintilla of possibility that you might not be the best judge of popular opinion?  
While you are dicking about with Brexit and poetry some one has to deal with the grown up things. 
“Everybody’s efforts at the moment need to be focussed on getting us out of this #brexit nightmare & ensuring the Party leadership honours our unanimously-agreed conference motion”.  My @LabourList interview today 
A European diplomatic source describes today’s meeting between Brexit secretary Steve Barclay and EU27 ambassadors as “completely useless” 
 via @GuidoFawkesThe Irish Govt getting a nervous tic now that time is getting near Brexit deadline.Seems that the EU have sent a communique stating that Ireland have to choose between building a hard border or leaving the single market.Never trust EU!! 
The Oscars; from Harvey Weinstein to Liam Neeson. Is Hollywood’s reputation in the (trash)can? And from the Brexit imbroglio to the Venezuelan swamp: are we in a period of very very turbulent change at home and abroad. @georgegalloway @DerbyChrisW @FrostReporter @RTUKnews pic.twitter.com/EHdBSeM26e 
Trump, surrounded by every imaginable emergency, fakes one. Theresa May, into the last weeks of her no-idea Brexit and no-legislation government, accuses activists of wasting time. We need the next generation of politicians, and we need them now. #activate 
49% of you agree employers  making people redundant because of downturn in businessd due to Brexit/weak pound etc should lay off the Brexit voters first. It's harsh , but shows brexiters don't mind short term pain - as long as it's not them. Just - chocolate soldiers 
We voted to leave the EU, which means no customs union.#Brexit #WTO #NoDeal 
There is an NHS crisis this winter which just isn't hitting the headlines. Its like Brexit means it doesnt matter. But Our patients need a backstop too. So I've written to Mrs May in the vein hope that she we will have a read and realise she needs to act. #nhsbackstopneeded 
Thank you, @realDonaldTrump. Good to see our allies from across the pond excited about the idea of Brexit Britain. If only our own government were as enthusiastic...!  Support us at  
2016: Britain could slash environmental and safety standards 'a very long way' after Brexit, Tory MP Jacob Rees-Mogg says  
Dear UK,a reminder that you have only 42 days left of protection from chlorinated chicken, hormone beef and pesticide-treated soybeans, and of full access to your Netflix and Spotify accounts when travelling abroad.#Brexit 
But Vince and #ChickenChuka told me the next generation won't forgive Jeremy Almost like people care more about other stuff than Brexit. #schoolstrike4climate 
EU investors considering moving TO the UK BECAUSE of Brexit. Naturally, they see the opportunities! This wasn't in the project fear script, was it? #WTOBrexitNOW 
Last of the run tonight.  Just enough time to solve Brexit and find out what happened to all the bees. Miles is joined by @hugorifkind, @zoelyons, @SusanCalman and @paulsinha.  @zebsoanes reads the news. Back on 12th April. Why not mark it on the calendar? @BBCRadio4 18:30. 
MPs face a simple choice. Forget the idea of an extension to Article 50.The choice is between a customs union and a 'no deal' Brexit.Only the latter delivers on the referendum result. 
Vote last night shows mad ERG will kill any hope of #Brexit deal. Options now down to #peoplesvote or no deal disaster. Labour need to wake up and smell the coffee 
Brexit is not some noble enterprise, it’s just a shit load of damage and anxiety for people, a slamming of doors in the faces of our kids, an ongoing insult to our European neighbours. Why anyone still ‘believes’ it can lead anywhere good is beyond me.#JustMakeItStop 
This is why Brexit is a disaster and why the EU is such a great organisation. The Irish have the EU's solidarity which will 'will not diminish'. 
Gerald Scarfe on #TheresaMay #Tories #Brexit #BrexitShambles - political cartoon gallery in London  
How will you facilitating Brexit help with the economy exactly? Hypocrite.  
Also: "Being in a customs union would be a repudiation of the referendum result," is really hard to square with the, "Brexit wasn't about trade" message I get every time I point out that from a trade perspective, it's not a policy move with many upsides.  
.@JLongworthLML: "If Mr Harrington truly has his beady eye on the Brexit Party and is determined to deliver Brexit in name only, or no Brexit at all, my political advice to him is to be afraid, be very afraid"Get involved:  
Great to hear a positive message about what this country could be doing instead of Brexit at the @LeedsEurope march last night. Plus some inspiring speakers: @natalieben @emmyzen @mdbuckley @OFOCBrexit #LetsStayTogether 
Today outside Parliament.A powerful reminder that there are important issues other than Brexit...  
Corbyn: “Everyone is having a go about my leadership and my Brexit position. What shall I do?”PR: “Dig out some old footage, showing you on the right side of history 16 years ago. I’m sure no one will remember the massive People’s Vote march that you completely ignored...”  
Tory government votes NOT  to keep European human rights charter in UK law after Brexit  
Dear English commentators sitting in London TV studios, Stop lecturing Northern Ireland on the peace process, the GFA and what’s best for us in the Brexit process. I think those of us who - you know - live here have that covered. 
You hardly have the moral high ground, Andrea:Tory govt has been called out for contempt of Parliament and ministers caught out for lying over Brexit. Many co-Brexit-pushers are climate change deniers and YOU even had to ask.@BrexitBin @Kean1S @VesperUK @tfoale @smilinglaura 
Woman hailed for taking on Rees-Mogg over Brexit on Question Time  
Lot of talk about how fast support for No Deal Brexit would fall after 29 March. I'd like to place my bet. Sunday 31 March. Mothering Sunday. When none of the mothers or grannies get their flowers. 
NEW POLL75% believe Irish gov should start preparing for #IrishUnity80% would vote in favour of unity87% believe unity referendum will happen66% think Irish gov should address unionist fears70% believe gov should establish all island citizens assembly 
Given the number of people I'm seeing cautiously prepping for a hard Brexit, you may wish to read this report from when the entire city of Lancaster lost power in 2015.Short version: We need power for basically everything. Get an FM radio and batteries. 
YUGE in your faceObummer suggested Britain would be sent to “the back of the queue” for a trade deal if it left the EUPOTUS has moved them to the front of the lineBritain and America Sign Deal on Post-Brexit Trade, Plan Huge FTA  via @BreitbartNews 
12 angry ministers could quit Theresa May's cabinet if she won't delay Brexit  They are not as angry as the millions of voters that see their democratic vote to leave the EU rubbished by a few greedy MP's. Fight is now the People versus the Parliament. 
USDA Allows Pink Slime to Be Labeled “Ground Beef” #Brexit #FridayFeeling #SaturdayMotivation #GoVegan 
Top quality graphic work by The Guardian to show how the House of Commons has split into camps on #Brexit votes.It leaves you with the inevitable question: how do you get a majority for *anything* in this situation? 
Extraordinary to remember that, less than 4yrs ago, Chuka Umunna was lambasting benefit scroungers and supporting Tory austerity. And less than 2yrs ago, he was opposing a 2nd referendum and advocating leaving the Single Market to end freedom of movement. Bloody Corbyn, eh?  
EU Brexit lawMember States agree positions on two proposed no deal laws - must still be agreed with European ParliamentFlights: Road haulage: Both laws would be unilateral and apply for a limited period. 
Brexiteers rejected the Brexit motion last night because they suspected it takes no-deal off the table. That’s the price Number 10 pays for two years of ignoring ministers and crossing red lines. Those who really want Brexit no longer take this Government’s word on trust. 
 Another busy week in Westminster has passed, with the Brexit shambles in the spotlight again. This is your brief roundup of the key events and highlights from your SNP MPs, as they stand up for Scotland and hold the Tories to account. 
11/ That this means the U.K. will become the EU-27’s largest market in the world after Brexit?Can you confirm too the Civitas estimate that the EU would be paying £13bn in tariffs on its goods annually, particularly as their exports are concentrated in high tariff sectors 
Donald Trump predicts US-UK trade will "increase very substantially", after deal was struck to preserve existing arrangements after #Brexit 
Has Irish unity become more likely because of Brexit?  The New York Times asks.   
Around 650 MPs who bunked off their collective responsibility to act in the best interests of the nation have now wrecked hundreds of companies. And they're worried about Brexit? What about the economy? 
Gosh, yes, imagine! Except that support for remain in 18-24 year olds is about 80%So, your imagination is the only place young people are going to strike for Brexit. Because they actually care about their future. 
Stephanie is demanding a #PeoplesVote because she doesn't believe #Brexit is working. She thinks the #OnlyWayForward is a #PeoplesVote. 
“That whole idea that Britain could be Greece to America’s Rome, it now seems as if Britain has become Laurel to America’s Hardy.”Jeremy Shapiro @JyShapiro about how Brexit has damaged Britain’s soft power 
I saw a sign today that read “stop wasting time with #Brexit & solve the real issues we are facing every day”. How much clearer could that message be? It was being held by a 14 year old school child who seemed upbeat but saddened by our political class. #BinBrexit #ClimateAction 
and last year 700,000 of us marched against Brexit but you snubbed us. 
Four months ago, we marched against Brexit. Spot any similarities?  
A Withdrawal Agreement is needed to avoid a ‘no deal’ outcome to Brexit. An agreement needs a majority of MPs to support it & legislation to implement it. Will enough Labour MPs keep voting with Tory Ministers to achieve that? Seems unlikely to me. 7/9 
We were told ‘now is not the time’.  The ERG amendments were approved. The CU change was defeated. The calls for a second referendum grew louder.  We were left with Chequers 6/9 
The time to get Brexit to develop differently was Summer 2018. A number of us wanted the Govt to face down ERG amendments to the Customs Bill & we voted in favour of a customs union in the Trade Bill. We asked Cons MPs now saying they can’t carry on to resign/vote with us 5/9 
This has to be a little bit what Brexit feels like, right? For the UK? We're like kids on a school bus driven by just a fucking total maniac and we're all trying to figure out how we stop him from being the driver but we don't really know and he's driving us toward a quarry edge? 
4/ 2.) You didn’t show Dr Lorand Bartels excellent one page basic Free Trade Agreement. @Lorand_Bartels is a Cambridge law fellow who can never be accused of being pro Brexit but is an Article 24 expert. He says that this one page FTA is all that is needed to trigger Article 24 
I'm thinking of travelling up to Mansfield and cajoling kids into holding a one-day strike to defend Brexit. 
"Ireland's concerns have become EU's concerns. Despite many attempts to bilateralise issues, or to divide the 27, solidarity has been strong and resolute. Those who believe it will break at the last moment are in for a nasty surprise”Varadkar on Brexit 
Ireland’s prime minister Leo Varadkar has said anyone hoping that EU solidarity with Ireland will falter on the Brexit border backstop is “in for a nasty surprise”.  
“a forceful argument could be made that it must be legitimate for children to take part in climate actions, for they do not even have recourse to the democratic channels (such as they are)that adults take for granted.”Especially when Brexit has abused it  
The Green Party MEP @mollyMEP has set up a website to document what she calls the #Brexit Syndicate, "a murky network of powerful and secretive organisations [that together] are rewriting the rules of British democracy to suit themselves":  
We were never as great as we thought we were but there was a time, not long ago, when Britain was ‘cool’ and had enormous ‘soft’ power. Brexit ended it. Countries around the world now look at us with pity and bewilderment. Tragic.  
"No reason" for Spanish police firing rubber bullets during independence referendum, man who lost sight tells court  
Leo Varadkar: 'Nasty surprise' for those who think EU unity will falter over Brexit If you are in the club, the EU are on your side. It's not rocket-science, & I want some of that! 
Just listening to the World at One recording of the discussion on Brexit and Scottish independence held at Glasgow Uni.   Glad I did cos I'd forgotten what a pompous, condescending twat Douglas Alexander is. 
The EU doesn’t keep us safe. It leaks like a sieve and damages the two organisations that actually work and DO keep us safe - NATO and 5 eyes.Stay away from the EU’s military organisations like the plague.#Brexit #WTO #NoDeal 
Britain’s exporters face an early Brexit — A container ship can take up to six weeks to sail from Britain to East Asia, meaning today is the real Brexit day for exports there: nobody knows which terms and tariffs goods will be subjected to on arrival 
We’ve co-signed this letter calling on the Govt to take urgent steps to protect people in #poverty from the financial impact of #Brexit. @jrf_uk @Shelter @CPAGUK @actnforchildren @ncbtweets @PovertyAlliance @turn2us_org @barnardos @ATDFourthWorld > 
Corbyn to hold Brexit talks with Barnier and Verhofstadt 
The problem with Centrists is that they are obsessed with Brexit and don't do anything to help homeless people. Anyway I'm off to my local Labour party meeting to discuss how evil Winston Churchill was, and how we can help the people of Palestine by tweeting Rachel Riley. 
"Limiting freedom of expression is not just censorship, it is also an assault on human nature.Without that freedom of expression, all other freedoms fail". ~Salman Rushdie#IAMTommy#FreedomOfSpeech#Brexit#MAGA 
well, if you weren’t thinking 25th amendment before, this — rambling, unfocused announcement — ... yikes. moving btw China, Brexit, drugs 
“I’m very, very aware of the serious risks around no-deal."Justice Minister @RoryStewartUK says he does not think a no-deal Brexit will happen and that everyone understands “how tense this is getting, how close to the line this is getting.”  
After a couple of weeks of No-Deal Brexit do you think that the UK will do an emergency re-application to rejoin EU in April? 
Forget BrexitThree biggest dangers to the world are1) Censorship of free speech2) Indoctrination of our young3) Domination of Government by elitist party machines. 
Brexit has not caused much economic damage. Until now. Nearly three years after the referendum, there are signs that the economy is stuttering 
RBS managed to lose £28 billion and go bust all on its own 10 years ago.  Now it tries to blame Brexit for its failings.   Pathetic.   
If Parliament rejects the PM's Withdrawal Agreement, the UK will leave the EU on 29 March without a deal. A ‘no deal’ scenario requires legislation - our latest Insight answers which Bills are necessary & which may be considered optional before #Brexit day  
Glad you recognise this Diane. Given the huge mess we’re now in due the awfulness of the referendum, the lies, the law breaking, the data hacking, will you now move to backing a #PeoplesVote ? You’ve a long career of doing the right thing, please do so now and stop the madness. 
BREAKING: President Trump announces trade with the UK will  'very very substantially increase' post Brexit. If he delivers on this pledge (which he has been consistent about incl in our last interview)then this is clearly very good news. 
Leo Varadkar: 'Nasty surprise' for those who think EU unity will falter over Brexit  
"We have a very good trading relationship with the UK and that's been strengthened further."President Trump says trade between the US and UK will increase after #Brexit. For more news and videos, visit:  
British woman strips naked on live TV to make sure people paid attention to her talking about Brexit 
Donald Trump just said in a speech in the White House Rose Garden. "We are going to increase our trade with the United Kingdom"Great news for post Brexit. 
After the Brexit vote, Britain's economy held up better than expected. Nearly three years on, the decision is beginning to take its toll   
.@andrewismaxwell and @colmoregan try to make sense of the Brexit jargon to figure out what #Brexit really means for Irish businesses. Take our 5 minute Brexit Ready Check  #backedbyAIB #ad 
So Beto O'Rourke says he would tear down the border walls already in place and believes a referendum would pass to do so.Yes. He said it out loud.Blatant disregard for the sovereignty of this country.This guy is dangerous. 
So Brexit is the national emergency? 
Bank of England: "The vote to leave has cost theUK about £800 million pounds PER WEEK since June2016”  and "As we approach the March2019 deadline without a clear way forward ... investment has weakened further"Is #brexit worth it? 
 via @GuidoFawkesHS2 is now being rumoured to cost £100billion.In the spending review in 2015 the cost was set at £55.7b.It’s time to bin it.We need that money to cover all eventualities of Brexit.Stop prevarication and pull the plug now. 
Students take a day off to bring attention to climate change. May criticises them after spending 2 years negotiating a piss poor Brexit deal then voting against herself. Who's wasting time here?  
One of the most persistent Brexit illusions has been that if only May could get round those pesky EU officials, Merkel and Macron would cut a deal. It hasn't happened.It was EU leaders who threw out helpful language on the backstop last December. 
Socialist Worker placards are ubiquitous on #schoolstrike4climate (with anti-Brexit anti-Tory slogans, too). Is this orchestrated? Has #ClimateStrike been hijacked? Where are the pro-@michaelgove or @CEN_HQ-supporting placards? If these were @UKIP banners, there'd be questions. 
And what’s making it worse, is that has now started to spill over because part of the psychology of Brexit has allowed the dehumanisation of people into voting groups so now those groups are naturally subdividing to re-establish a more familiar and comfortable order. 
Do you know why Leave won? It was a rebellion against better off people who look down at everyone else.That’s something that has actually worsened over the time since the referendum, not improved.You may not like it, but it’s true and down to a choice in behaviour. 
Powerful men break the laws of our democracy in the Brexit referendum and @metpoliceuk still haven’t investigated three years later. Children demand their future isn’t burnt and the Met rush to the scene and attack them with horses. 
Conservative backbench colleagues & ministers who fear a ‘No Deal’ Brexit must now vote to give Parliament the power to instruct the government on what to do next. Enough of the can kicking and displacement activity. It’s time to act #RightToVote #FinalSay 
February 15, 2019Dear Lovely Children,I am fully behind your strike, clogging up Whitehall etc, in an attempt to focus attention on our melting, poisonous planet. The weather has been bollocksed since 1976 and it makes a change from fucking Brexit.Yours,A STATE PENSIONER 
To those cabinet ministers 'threatening' to resign... don't threaten, do it.To Remainer MPs calling for 'a people's vote'.... be honest, you're trying to overturn the referendum.To Remainer women.... stop taking your damn clothes off, we don't want to see your floppy bags. 
MUST READ: @DrPhillipLeeMP - #Brexit without a #PeoplesVote will be truly undemocratic: 
Brexit could be a catalyst for major constitutional reform. Including a political realignment which creates a home for millions of progressive people who are disenfranchised by the two party system. A social democratic politics based on evidence not dogma. 
MPs promised to deliver on the result of the referendum. That is exactly what they should do.  
I'm sick to death of @Anna_Soubry thinking she can tell the country what the national interest isThe national interest in terms of Brexit was determined by the people of this country. We decided it was in the national interest to leaveShe has no right to tell us otherwise 
Yet there you were a month ago sharing a clip of Neil systematically taking Dellingpole apart on Brexit on This Week. See that’s the problem today, people would rather just debate in their own echo chamber on twitter with like minded folk even at the expense of good journalism. 
If he was Brexit Secretary we'd be in the Euro by now. 
Many young people haven't had a say on Brexit, and as we approach the cliff edge it's important they make themselves heard. Sign @metecoban92's petition and say #NoToNoDeal   
@DavidLammy  Sir, if this statement from @NCA_LynneOwens refers to any Brexit referendum crimes, does it not follow that Brexit, as the basis of the decision (Will of the People) is suspect or not fit for purpose until conclusion of @NCA_UK investigations ? 
' its the harsh reality when you lie and mess with people's lives for power and greed. Hopeful some people will end up .in prison over this brexit scam 
 A few more spaces have opened up for my upcoming constituency meeting: Brexit, Scotland and the Southside. A chance to hear from me, @IanBlackfordMP and @SusaninLangside, as well as put your Brexit questions to us. Registration required  
Labour vows to be the 'greenest government ever'Labour is taking the environment and climate change seriously, as they should.Climate Change is the biggest single issue facing us today (yep, even bigger than Brexit)Vote ⁦@UKLabour⁩  
@RenewParty were at #ClimateStrike to hear the shout. It was loud & they are right, we need to act. I’d love to stop wasting time on Brexit & start concentrating on all the other issues that matter...& there are many! We are in a change of era, time for institutions to listen  
Theresa May needs to tell Brussels to ‘sod off’ to get better Brexit deal 
“I swallowed the Brexit lies. Now I regret telling curry house workers to vote leave” Gradually, people that voted leave are realising that they were lied to. 
Can't believe I missed this. Gary Lineker being anti-Brexit is old now; Gary Neville backing HS2 is the freshest ex-footballer policy position.  
EU, America and China will all get new medicines ahead of Britain after Brexit, drug company boss warns  
1/ Last but not least on the Immigration Bill committee were Jeremy Morgan QC & @Frenchcricket09 from @BritishInEurope.Jeremy laying out the major consequences of the UK's approach of 28 unilateral #citizensrights guarantees in case of a no-deal Brexit.  
“I hope the Brexit Secretary is going to take the #MalthouseCompromise to Brussels as Govt policy.“We’re prepared to compromise and vote for the Withdrawal Agreement, if we sort out this dreadful backstop. Let’s see some compromise from the other side” @bernardjenkin 
This guy should do a weekly Brexit update...can you imagine that!  
@KhanOli Sec' General Bangladesh Caterers Assoc:'Priti Patel & Boris Johnson approached us & we made the mistake of believing them. The promises were all lies. We were taken as fools & used by the leave campaign. These false promises will not be kept.' 
And so the madness begins............Tory government votes not to keep European human rights charter in UK law after Brexit  
EU investors are actually considering moving to the UK because of Brexit. 'London’s pull as the financial capital of the world is just too strong, whether the EU likes it or not."That wasn’t in the script." via @GuidoFawkes 
Today @laylamoran stood with thousands of students in the #ClimateStrike. Climate change poses a serious threat to global prosperity, security and wellbeing but the Government is too busy making a mess of Brexit. We demand better for our environment and your future.  
AGAIN: Things unacceptable to the British public that will lead to political oblivion for the Tory’s 1. May’s Deal with the Backstop2. May’s Deal without the Backstop3. May’s Deal in any shape or form4.Delaying Brexit 5. Ruling out No Deal6. Any form of customs union 
No-deal Brexit could lead dozen ministers to resign, says Grieve - The Guardian: - No-deal Brexit…  #Brexit #News 
Interesting fact via my pal Boo:- if the same amount of people voted today in the same way as they did in the Brexit vote, the remain side would win cause many of those who voted “out” are already deed! 
Remainer MPs like Grieve have voted against the Govt again and again, trying to defy the people’s vote. Brexiteer MPs must stand united. They’re the only ones fighting for what the British people voted for, against the tide of the establishment who’re trying to stop Brexit. 
But we must remember that ERG MPs have voted against the Govt once and abstained once, in support of what the British people voted for - both in the referendum AND the General Election manifestos.  
EU, America and China will all get new medicines ahead of Britain after Brexit, drug company boss warns  
‘Time for an all-Ireland conversation on unity’, Sinn Féin leader tells civic forumRead the full story here:  #Brexit #AllIslandDialogue 
How Brexit revealed four new political factions  
On this week's @brexitbroadcast former Cabinet minister @patel4witham tells @christopherhope why she wants the government to publish legal advice underlying the Brexit deal, and why she thinks Mrs May should say 'sod off' to Brussels Listen here:  
Brexit Monster latest: Dutch PM Rutte tells weekly press conference that he knows the identity of the person wearing the furry blue muppet suit, but will not disclose it. (He also said he spoke to Theresa May on Tuesday...)  
As a pro #European it pains me to admit that #brexit needs to happen. Deal or no deal. The #EU has morphed from an organisation which prevented #Fascism in europe to an organisation which enforces it. 
Mobile phone company texting customers to tell them they will still have free EU roaming in the event of no deal Brexit. Another Project Fear lie crumbles.  
What kind of "concessions" might EU give on #Brexit? Thread by @BBCkatyaadler  
The stink from the #NCH scandal has just intensified....How can a government survive this?? #Brexit?? Jesus, it’s incredible.#BAM offers to pull out of National Children's Hospital contract if the board wants. #liveline ⁦@rteliveline⁩ 
At the final session at the #AllIslandDialogue in @dublincastleopw discussing #Brexit and Business Preparations with @JohnJMcGrane of @BrIreCham; Stephen Kelly @Big_Kells of @ManufacturingNI and Tara McCarthy of @Bordbia - session being chaired by @lawlor_aine 
WATCH: With less than six weeks to go until we crash out of the EU without a deal, MPs in both parties need to put the national interest above narrow party political interest and work together to stop a no-deal Brexit.  
 Ted Malloch: This Ugly Man Wants To Reinstitute The Guillotine!!Damn! Fix Your Teeth #BluestarZone#Brexit 
Our friends in @OBAylesbury are also running a @peoplesvote_uk street stall tomorrow (Sat 16 Feb). And they manage to get local media coverage too! If Aylesbury is easier for you than MK, drop by Market Sq and tell them how you think Brexit is going  
EU Investors Considering Moves to the UK Because of Brexit  via @GuidoFawkes 
Which is why you moved funds to Dublin...Brexit chaos presents opportunities for millionaire disaster capitalists like yourself, very different outcomes for everyone else. 
With just six weeks until the UK is due by law to leave the EU, the options include a disorderly Brexit, a delay to Brexit or no Brexit at all  
The narrative of a mass exodus of City jobs has already been consigned to the dustbin of history, with just 2,000 jobs now expected to move in the event of no-deal. Now EU asset managers are considering moving to the UK because of Brexit. No mention by BBC  
It wouldn’t do any good. The members of the ERG are now so obsessed with attaining their goal of Brexit that most of them have probably forgotten why they wanted it in the first place. 
People like Jacob Rees-Mogg want to use Brexit to turn the UK into a low-tax, low-wage Thatcherite utopia. The only way to stop them is to lay out a vision for the post-Brexit economy that puts people and planet first.We need a #GreenNewDeal now. 
.@ByDonkeys @andrealeadsom @Conservatives oooo, look, Brexit a disaster for the economy eh? But let’s go ahead anyway as at least the rich Tories & their supporters will dodge the new EU anti tax avoidance laws #Crewe #Cheshire #Stopbrexit #RevokeA50 
As a British resident in Spain, who has felt supported & encouraged by your support of those who wish to remain in the EU, not to leave via Brexit, I can´t find the words to express how shattering it feels to read this. I live in Andalucía - we have seen Cs & Vox together. 
Everything he just said #FridayFeeling #HumanRights #Brexit  
Section of the #AllIslandDialogue dealing with Brexit & Rights Sometimes you don’t know what you have till it’s gone.Brexit will harm us all  
Grateful to @tobyperkinsmp for coming to Outwood Academy today to answer questions from his young constituents on Brexit - maj of students were clear they wanted a people’s vote !  
Britain and America Sign Deal on Post-Brexit Trade, Plan Huge Free Trade Agreement  
Love @theSNP interviews where they complain leaving the EU is so much harder than anyone claimed during the referendum All with zero self-awarenesszero sense of irony and zero reflection about what this might imply for #indyref2 
Don't hold your breath waiting for Our Totally Unbiased BBC or Sly 'News' to mention this latest Hate Story, folks. After all, a Z-list nonentity baring her breasts on live TV in protest against Brexit is so much more exciting, innit? 
As you say @carolecadwalla intriguing and good of @NCA_LynneOwens to respond, but ultimately it isn't good enough, the future of the country hangs in the balance and there's a major question mark over the legitmacy of the democratic process in use  - Democracy Dies in Silence. 
“The gap between the Brexit that was sold and the one being delivered increases by the day.” - Oli Kahn, Secretary General of the Bangladesh Caterers Association @CFOBUK #InformedConsent #RightToVote #FinalSay 
Those who berate the uncertainty created by Brexit must accept that sticking to the March deadline and leaving on that date is the only way to ensure the certainty that businesses clearly want.  
58. Notts County football ground (Nottingham)"In a 52-48 referendum this would be unfinished business by a ling way." - @Nigel_Farage 
With Digby Jones & others blaming us 'Remoaners' for the abject failure of Brexit, I want to be very clear: WE WILL NOT BE BLAMED for any of this shitstorm. We've pointed out the consequences based on facts & analysis, highlighted the drawbacks & set out our plan: #StopBrexit 
Peter Reid schooling Peter Shilton on Brexit. Absolute scenes. Let's get the whole England squad from Mexico '86 on a televised debate   
... nahh it’s Brexit scare mongering   
What is WRONG with these shameless women?!Another remainer (anti-Brexit) woman goes naked on a major TV show @ThePledge with the men around her looking very uncomfortable.This is a really rotten thing to do. 
Ah classic. The use of the word "cave" here to suggest capitulation or weakness. In reality, the gov could see sense and reflect where the country now is, revoke a50 and re-evaluate given that brexit promises are of course all complete bollocks and reality is hitting. 
UK Prime Minister Theresa May's hope of presenting a united front to convince Brussels to make changes to her Brexit deal suffered a heavy blow. What's next? . Read our #Brexit coverage  
Bent referendum mate, do some research on it. Not enough characters on here. hope your well. 
LETS BE CLEAR-If 17m people voted in an advisory referendum 4 food shortages medical supply issues energy outages travel chaos repatriation of jobs & industries martial law & troops on streets-should the other 50m or so people accept it?The answer is No. Revoke Article 50 NOW. 
Oh please do enlighten us @YvetteCooperMP on who funds you and why. Then perhaps we may discover why you are so  determined to defy the will of your constituents in respect of Brexit 
How dare politicians claim a desire for a #PeoplesVote referendum is undemocratic when their own failure to act, or to ensure those entrusted with the task do so, is their interpretation of what democracy looks like?We haven't yet had an honest, legal referendum!@UKEUchallenge 
Great to hear that the government are planning tax cuts post-Brexit. But why wait? Let’s cut corporation tax to 10 per cent right now.  
ICYMI: Y'day @BylineTimes revealed @metpoliceuk unlikely to begin any criminal investigation into #Brexit leave campaigns until after 29 March. @DavidLammy said delays smacked of political expediency & could be a 'cover-up'. What do you think? Let us know. 
@DailyPolitics once again platforming death or glory Brextremist Lucy Harris - yet another Tufton St. plant - without informing the audience of exactly who and what she is.The short thread below reveals the truth........ 
Where does one even start with this?! The cuts and public sector pay cap affecting teachers? Brexit time wasting? I cannot wait to have a PM that celebrates young people being active citizens and fighting for what's right!!! #gtto #schoolstrike4climate #JC4PM #GreenNewDeal 
'Barnier raised the Labour party’s ideas as a way to secure parliament’s support when he dined with the Brexit secretary, Stephen Barclay, on Monday in Brussels, EU sources said.'Bet that was a comfortable conversation! 
Just met a local small business in Wallington They rely on time sensitive imports from Holland.  They are panicking because of the risk of #NoDealBrexitWhen will @theresa_may confront the wealthy wreckers in her party who salivate over the harm No Deal #Brexit will cause? 
The Brexit dictionary according to Sarah Woolaston:> cliff> edge> disaster> catastrophe> crashing> horror> terrified> car crash> calamity> collapse> crisis> tragedy> fiasco> harm> cataclysm> depression> ruinWatch Sarah get all these words into one sentence. 
Another clear piece of analysis by @anandMenon1. But it assumes the EU27 would allow an Art.50 extension. I'm sure they would a first time, but not a second, in which case at some point the Parliament will be faced with May's Deal v. No Deal v. No Brexit  
NEW: Brexit voting patterns reveal four new cross-party political factions in parliament  
Very pleased to share that I’ll be giving the next History Scotland lecture — come join me in Dundee on 11 April. I’ll be talking about “Scotland in the Age of Brexit” ... and I guess the April timing makes it all the more relevant and interesting.  
Backing a Tory Brexit could wipe out Labour, warns Clive Lewis. Shadow minister says party would never be forgiven as calls for second referendum grow.#PeoplesVote #brexit 
If you can’t deal with someone telling you you’d probably lose a second referendum without changing the way you campaign, I can tell you now a no deal Brexit will kill you. 
Independent Bank of England economist Gertjan Vlieghe estimates Brexit costs the UK 40bn a year - or 800m a week - more than double the infamous battle bus slogans. Just who is still trusting the Toxic Tories with the economy? Oh! Wait! Vlieghe is an expert so what wld he know? 
The 1pm news on BBC1 is a perfect example of what I mean in the Thread below: lengthy item on the Tories Brexit mess, no mention of Labour’s plan or Corbyn’s EU meetings next week. They still can’t accept the Tories can’t solve this, they have to start talking about Labour.  
"A big part of being a socialist is you think democracy trumps growth".@michaeljswalker on why he thinks the Labour leadership should have been more honest about Brexit.Subscribe to Novara Media on iTunes, Spotify and Soundcloud.  
.@AlexSalmond looks at #Brexit from a European perspective & talks to some of Britain’s Brexiteers-MEPs who’ve campaigned to make themselves redundant. He finds disillusionment with PM May & a determination to launch a new party if their cause is betrayed  
met my matein the pubhe was Brexit I was remainhad 7 pintshad rowa bigunhad more pintsthat was ithe had a few pointsso did Imade updont forget 3D kids its outsidewhere it always wassame was it ever wasbeware of twitter rage grandstanding in a digital cul de sac 
#Brexit #EU #StandUp4Brexit | Brexit interest poll, how would you vote in a #PeoplesVote? 
By now most will have seen the picture of @ischinger wearing an EU-hoodie at the opening of #MSC19.But has everyone realized there is one of the stars missing in the EU-flag? Subtle message to UK, Wolfgang! #Brexit  
The year is 2040. Everything is either on fire or underwater. Theresa May encourages the last pupil in the only remaining school in the ruins of Britain to study hard, do what they’re told, and one day they might be a scientist. Meanwhile Brexit negotiations continue. 
#brexit Message to all MPs all parties. Stop playing games with 17.4 million that voted Leave the EU. Your pissing us all off. We’re leaving the CRUMBLING EU March 29th. Stop pussyfooting around with Brexit just do it. Worst bunch of politicians of all time now in Parliament ALL. pic.twitter.com/1uvsRLarzp 
Nicola Sturgeon said right after the EU referendum result that consensus across the 4 Nations was key. Where is May now? Without consensus. Labour have performed abysmally as opposition. The case for Scottish Independence strengthens each day. Do you want a spare ⚿? 
Reasonable Brexit voters wanted more control, but expected we'd still be able to trade with our own continent just as much. They're not the extreme globalists who think increasing our average trade distances by 1000s of miles is economically wise.Their Brexit isn't on the table. 
I swallowed the Brexit lies. Now I regret telling curry house workers to vote leave | Oli Khan  
Why should we have a second Brexit referendum just because Remainers think people didn’t know what they were voting for,WHAT PROOF DO THEY HAVE ?Like any election the democratic vote should be upheld!! @BrexitBexit @Nigel_Farage 
Theresa May on the climate change protest: “disruption increases teachers’ workloads and wastes lesson time”.So just to recap, that‘s Batshit Brexit Busted Flush Theresa May, accusing someone other than herself of causing disruption and wasting time. Who said satire was dead? 
Trump is invoking emergency powers. Is No Deal Brexit being pushed so that similar powers can be invoked here? The synchronicity is striking:2016 - Trump elected. Brexit Ref passes. 2019 - Trump declares a national emergency bypassing congress. And here??Wake the fuck up 
Today I've complained to Little, Brown about publishing transphobic crap and the BBC about pandering to religious extremists on abortion, so I guess it's time to write to my MP again about Brexit for the full "I hate everything and everyone" trifecta. 
#Brexit: EU-Irish solidarity 'will not diminish', says Varadkar  
While there is widespread disagreement about whether the EU will blink or not over #Brexit (spoiler alert: the bloc is more flexible than it wants to indicate right now) it’s arguably more useful to think what kind of eventual ‘concessions’ we might be talking about from the EU 1 
“They'd be much more comfortable there" Tory MP @sarahwollaston on ERG colleagues possibly joining Nigel Farage’s new #Brexit party“If they were dictating policy, they'd be getting the deal they wanted” Telegraph’s @christopherhope#politicslive  
Born in England. Spent the first 40 years of my life in England and last 20 very happily in Scotland but was NO in 2014 referendum. However, as the ultra brexiteers in Westminster have taken over the asylum pulling the UK to a populist right, I will YES in Indy2 and to stay in EU 
"A lot of us that are pretty fed up at the moment in terms of the Labour Party's Brexit position" Labour's @IanMurrayMP on talk of party splits#PoliticsLive  
Great chatting to so many young people who have the overwhelming opinion that they don’t want our givernment to be wasting time on #brexit when they could be tackling real issues like #climatechange@OFOCBrexit @Strike4Youth 
And the conversation went... “What’s  on the brexit pizza?” he said "we promise it comes with everything but it actually comes with nothing and its also expensive and very hard to digest". @guyverhofstadt @eucopresident @thomasbrake @EdwardJDavey 
. @Anna_Soubry rightly describing Tory split, with right wing UKIP’ers taking over. Lab members sick of the Corbyn support for Tory #Brexit exiting party in droves. @LibDems united  in desire to stop Brexit & get a #peoplesvote #FBPE 
.@Jacob_Rees_Mogg states very clearly what the real choice is: a deal with meaningful changes especially to Backstop or no deal (Article 24 soft hard Brexit)  
I may have just facilitated the first truly successful Brexit. I told the British exchange student on my youth football team, Lord Stonehands, that I was going to call the UN and have them revoke his passport for his shitty downfield blocking if he didn’t quit. He left in tears. 
Some threaten to resign if no deal not taken off the table;  others to resign if it is.@Suewilson91 :  "Shame there are no Tory ministers threatening to resign unless Brexit is taken off the table."   #RevokeRemainRebuild 
This is an exciting time in our country’s history.  What we do now will shape our country’s future. Time to stop the divisions and unite on Brexit. #TimeForATurningPoint 
Brexit is the single greatest advert for EU membership there will ever be. 
“That whole idea…that Britain could be Greece to America’s Rome - it now seems as if Britain has become Laurel to America’s Hardy.” Former Obama aide Jeremy Shapiro discusses the effect Brexit is having on how the world sees Britain  
Oh, come off it, Jezza! You support a Brexit which will take us out of the Single Market, destroying jobs, decimating the British Services sector and damaging the NHS  
Why is the UK paralysed over Brexit? Because of a truth too few acknowledge: there are simply no good options.  
Gertjan Vlieghe, Bank of England rate-setter, says that Brexit has ALREADY cost £800m per week ("in bus units" is his term). That's more than twice Leave's claimed Brexit savings, & Brexit hasn't even happened yet. Project Fact trumps Project Fear. 
Brexit vote ‘shambles’ blows hole in Theresa May’s authority  via @financialtimes 
Apart from the fact that Brexit is bad for Britain, the credible evidence of illegality, allegations of MPs involved & a cover-up is sufficient reason to revoke Article 50 now, Nat Unity Gvt & inquiryI can't see a free & fair #PeoplesVote in a climate of corruption & propaganda 
Great thread on the reality of British use of #ConcentrationCamps during the #BoerWar in #SouthAfrica. It is a terrifying indictment of #Brexit Britain that Amanda like #JacobReesMogg should wield ANY power & influence in our society 
Hola #Brexit twittersphere. Given the complete misunderstanding in Britain of the (little) weight #Gibraltar has on Spanish politics, I am going to perform a public service in the run-up to the April and May elections and tweet everytime I hear a politician talking about it. 
Theresa May says children shouldn't complain about the terrible damage being done to the environment that she herself won't have to live with, but should study hard to fix all the stuff she's allowing to happen when Brexit wipes out dozens of environmental protection measures 
People are changing their minds about Scotland‘s future. The Brexit debacle is impacting on how many people think. Exactly the kind of changes @progressscot is researching #ProgressScotland 
#Politicslive current head of CBI states brexit is a disaster. Former head of CBI , no longer bound by the EU script...says uk will thrive. 
Here's an A to Z list of Brexit lies  
I swallowed the Brexit lies. Now I regret telling curry house workers to vote leave | Oli Khan  
After my dad's memorial someone asked me if I would live permanently in England. And I had to pause b/c with #brexit coming, I don't think I could contemplate it as Britain is going to change in a way that will make it harder to love or understand. Hard times will become harsher 
Meanwhile, this has occurred. Only 13m to go and we officially overturn the Referendum result – it's the law. CHECKMATE, MOGG.  
Having tried for 3 years to work out who will benefit from brexit, I have come to the conclusion that only those who want to  turn the UK into a tax haven will have that dubious pleasure. 1/3 
A friend saw the Brexit pizza. When he asked the waiter what was on the brexit pizza, he said "we promise it comes with everything but it actually comes with nothing and its also expensive and very hard to digest"....  
#Labour left-wingers call for ‘final say’ on #Brexit deal:  
Heads up, Natalie, we don't need "democratic guidance" on the "type" of Brexit. Leave means Leave. Now stop whining, accept the people have spoken, and embrace the leaving of the EU.  
Brexit is a bit like buying a house without seeing it and moving to a house with rising damp, huge mortgage, negative equity, stuck in the middle of nowhere without access to supplies while secretly missing the old neighbours and blaming everyone else for the mess you created. 
Clue of the day: Pablo Llarena should never have been the judge in the Catalan leaders’ case. A short video by @orioldebalanzo giving key information on the trial of the Catalan referendum.  
British Prime Minister Theresa May was dealt another humiliating defeat as lawmakers voted against the latest incarnation of her Brexit plan  
Another Brexit vote for May another humiliation  
Protest billboard in Andover highlights hypocrisy and lies of Brexit politicians /#Brexit #FinalSay — @ByDonkeys 
Jeremy Corbyn, if you help #brexit through, the Tories will call a general election, Labour will be sunk by Remainer defections, the Tories will gain a majority, tear up the deal with the EU, and set about creating a brutal #brexit tax haven. Why do you  want this? 
For the last few months any of @GeorginaEWright @pmdfoster @BrigidLaffan @nick_gutteridge @BBCkatyaadler myself and many others have predicted accurately how the EU will respond to UK on Brexit. So why do Gov and many MPs still say EU will back down against all our advice? 
How Brexit changed Britain from a two-party system to four-faction dysfunction 
“I think a WTO Brexit is a good Brexit. It’s a clear Brexit. We’re in control of our laws, our money and our borders on day one." - @Jacob_Rees_Mogg#MoggMentum | @Stop_The_EU 
GOOD: Major BBC politics show 'This Week' axed after 16 years after presenter Andrew Neil quits /#Brexit #FinalSay 
BBC News - UK retail sales bounce back in January  No surprise with wages outstripping inflation.The last paragraph is a typical gloomy speculative supposition that is the hallmark of lefty bbc reporting. Nobody is stocking up 4 Brexit. 
2-MINUTE VIDEO: In less than two minutes on #BBCQT last night, the woman in the maroon jumper explained how #Brexit is “going to be massively damaging long term for the UK.” She did better than any of the panellists. She should have been on the panel. Please share. #FinalSay 
The prime minister is trying to pull the wool over people’s eyes on workers' rights. We're not buying it. The truth is that the government hasn’t offered any substantive change to the Brexit deal. My latest   
With just six weeks until the United Kingdom is due by law to leave the EU, the options include a disorderly Brexit, a delay to Brexit or no #Brexit at all.  
Less than 20,000 signatures to go. If you've not signed due to signature fatigue then please, PLEASE, make this last effort because once this gets to 100,000, it'll coincide with the massive votes at the end of this month. Thank you. #Brexit 
"People voted to leave, they didn't vote for a deal" @Jacob_Rees_Mogg sums up perfectly why May's deal fails to honour the Referendum result! Get involved:  
Travelling to @MunSecConf to discuss #Brexit & #FutureofEurope. We need to construct European sovereignty today for tomorrow’s world #EUdefence #digital #economy #environmentThanks to @SorbonneParis1 for giving me the chance to reflect on this recently: 
Remember take back control .. with 1920s style driving permits - I had a leaver in the queue moaning and I told him to get used to queues post brexit .. and the women who issued  them admitting they were told lies . This is reality ..  
Just have a listen to these three girls from Camden, aged 11 and 12, on strike today for #YouthStrike4Climate “All you hear about is Brexit Brexit Brexit... this is our planet, the politicians don’t care.” @LBC 
Re-Grieve. People are of course entitled to change their mind. But I don't think he has. I think he's always opposed Brexit. I think he said he backed Brexit for the purposes of winning his seat in the election. And now the election is over he's reverted to his original view. 
Multiculturalism is a Globalist political weapon.Hungary are 100% right to reject it.Brexit Britain should follow.  
The main reason they are having to do this protest is because the country has spent the last 2+ years dealing with Brexit rather than address other really important issues like climate change. I think the younger generation are great and are doing a better job. Keep going! 
Prime Ministers who cancel meaningful votes on Brexit because they know they are going to lose, waste days and days of parliamentary debate and a whole month of negotiating time that the EU has carefully prepared for.  
Big news for Ligue 1 as an export market for the Premier League & French players currently in the PL: status of current Brexit negotiations between the PL & FA would require half of PL teams to cut the amount of non-homegrown players & sell, per @Guardian. 
With Brexit now forty-three days away, the possibility of Britain suddenly losing its place in the international order is becoming palpable:  
For @RailaOdinga to use BBI to force constitution amendment and costly referendum just to satisfy short-term interests of politicians to be in the eating trough when majority Kenyans are suffering is very insensitive, irresponsible, irrational and dangerous. Must be rejected 
Project Fear latest: EU investors are considering moving *to* the UK after Brexit if the EU tries to cut them off from London because the EU's financial centres just aren't competitive enough  
I love the comment “extension looks increasingly likely,” in respect of Brexit.It looks *desirable* to the British.It looks *necessary* to the British.Authorisation is increasingly unlikely.It’s increasingly undesirable to the EU.It’s increasingly unnecessary to the EU. 
Irish premier Leo Varadkar says that Brexit May have to be extended. Thanks for the advice chum but no thanks. 
NFU President @Minette_Batters joined @SkyNews #skydebate this morning where she stressed the difficulties facing food businesses around Brexit and called for clarity from the Government  
Small thought on the McDonnell/Churchill thing. We're regularly told Labour has to facilitate Brexit, to show respect to traditional Labour voters in Leave areas. "It's vital we keep them on side." But how will those same voters take to Churchill being branded a villain? 
Dominic Grieve, 2017:  "I strongly support the Prime Minister’s determination to secure a negotiated arrangement for leaving the EU".  Dominic Grieve, 2019: "Every form of Brexit would be bad for or country". 
Live scenes as MPs reject Theresa May’s Brexit plans yet again:  
Thousands of on-strike schoolchildren have taken over Parliament Square as part of the #YouthStrike4Climate movement - calling for politician to do more to tackle Climate Change.Signs here saying “The Is No Plan-Et B” and “Brexit Won’t Matter When We’re Dead” @LBC 
Interviewed under caution for ripping off expenses, Anna Sour-bry is nothing but a self opinionated, self important, egotistical untrustworthy dishonest hypocrite who also thinks 17.4M Brexit leaving decision does not count. #BrexitNow #LeaveNow  
WATCH: Dominic Grieve is absolutely right - MPs are gridlocked in Parliament as they will not vote for any form of Brexit that damages our country. It's clear the only way to clear the impasse is to put it to the people in a #PeoplesVote. Please RT: 
2. We no longer see Tories or Labour, PM or Corbyn as the only alternative to each other. That's a false conceit you want us to swallow. Tactical voting & social media played out in GE2017. #Brexit is toxic & will continue to be if U don't #RevokeA50. A plague on both your houses 
There are close links between the climate change denial lobby, Trump and right-wing Brexiters  #climatestrike #climatechange #brexit #55TuftonSt 
“We need an all-Ireland conversation & forum such as this to look to the future. To plan for all possible outcomes. To look beyond Brexit and look beyond partition. To look at how we live together. How we work together. How we share this island together” @MaryLouMcDonald 
Are these the six Cabinet Ministers plotting a MASS resignation over no deal Brexit?   Let the traitors go Britain needs you Brexiteers >  @patel4witham @andreajenkyns @SteveBakerHW @DominicRaab @SuellaBraverman @ABridgen 
This angry, embittered parliament has been defeated by Brexit | Anand Menon  
I’m speaking on Brexit in Stockton-on-Tees at 5pm today alongside Dr Paul Williams MP- Stockton Arts Centre, Dovecot St, Stockton TS18 1LL. All welcome & no need to book! #Tees4Europe @PaulWilliamsMP 
The EU is right and it’s not often I say that. Brexit Sec has been to Brux once since appt last Nov.Tell EU what you want, don’t back down, give ultimatum date and walk away. They’ll come running.I sit in debates with Juncker & co, you don’t.  
Immigration takes #Switzerland’s foreign population above 2mn, new referendum to cancel free-movement accord with EU is being prepared  
A crime against humanity is spun as an act of altruism.Utterly Orwellian.This is the Westminster tribe that my grandparents in Mayo fought against.To show that the emnity is in the past, Mr Rees Mogg has moved his business to Dublin to escape the Brexit chaos.Fáilte romhat.  
Brexit: Ford 'steps up preparations to move production abroad' . Leave definitely means everyone leaving it seems. Oh what a tragedy is this foolish Brexit. We can only thrive together. 
With #42daystoBrexit sobering reminder from Taoiseach @campaignforleo at fifth #allislanddialogue  ‘The possibility for a no deal outcome is real until it is removed...planning for a no deal Brexit is Intensifying..contingency planning for no-deal, very real possible outcome..’  
When are we ALL going to ‘Demand’ answers from @metpoliceuk re criminal investigations into Electoral Fraud... Stalling or Cover-Up?Do we really want a #PeoplesVote or #GE with those under investigation feeling they ‘Can’t be Touched’? @peoplesvote_uk @openDemocracy @brexit_sham 
Today thousands of school children will strike for their future, demanding better from this government in tackling climate change. This Government is too distracted by Brexit to look at the big picture facing our country and the world  #schoolstrike4climate 
Today would be a good day for an MP to appear on TV and say "enough of this, those pushing Brexit are damaging us and don't even know how to do it - we should revoke Article 50 and tell them to go away and think it through". Start *that* ball rolling. 
About to debate #Brexit at Wrekin College, Shropshire. Fellow former MP, Peter Bradley (Lab) & local reps from Tories, Green and UKIP make up the rest of the panel.Naturally I’ll be arguing for a #PeoplesVote #FinalSay so the UK can #ExitFromBrexit 
Tits out for Brexit is the new dicks out for Harambe 
Are these the six Cabinet Ministers plotting a MASS resignation over no deal Brexit?  
Meanwhile #Brexit has already strengthened the NL politically. It will fill in the post-Brexit void with sensible ideas on how to push for greater liberalisation of the single market and improve EU's democratic legitimacy! @CER_EU 
Pro-EU MPs vow to take control of the Government and delay Brexit in fresh assault on May’s plan 
So a handful of remainers are seeking to block a true Brexit by any means necessary. Their local associations should be preparing deselection processes immediately 
No-deal Brexit is still on the table, says Leadsom, with total disregard for parliament.Wake up, people, democracy is dying. 
#allislanddialogue #brexit@campaignforleo states:Ireland is at the heart of Europe.Throughout these negotiations the EU has been strong & resolute.Those who think it will break at the last moment are in for a ‘nasty surprise’. 
Tones, why don’t you just stick to advising the Poms about Brexit, a subject that seemed to mesmerise you only a week ago. FFS. 
Sinn Féin Leader @MaryLouMcDonald is today addressing the all-island civic forum on #Brexit.Ireland cannot be collateral damage in a Tory Brexit.  
Here I am talking to the naked Brexit protester, in which I ask, in 20 years time when people look back at political debate in Britain, what on earth are they going to say?  
Spot on. Boles and Cooper's  plans are last gasp to thwart BrexitCaroline Flint says MPs' attempt to block no deal is a 'Trojan horse' to stop Brexit  
BBC - why do you continue to share this drivel? NOBODY knows what the fu*k Brexit actually is, even with days to go! You might think it entertaining, or even provocative - but to the rest of us, our lives and livelihoods are at stake. Please start doing professional journalism. 
"It's cost me thousands of pounds (I've stopped counting!) of my own money, which as a pensioner I can ill afford, and I'm working longer hours than I ever did during my career."  #Brexit @BritishInEurope 
This is more than good news this is Great news #Brexit WORLD'S LARGEST ECONOMY VOTES FOR BREXIT  via @facts4euorg 
Here's an A to Z list of Brexit lies.If there were 1000 letters in the alphabet, it wouldn't be enough.@bremaininspain 
At least there has been an effort here on this island, by all parties with the odd notable exception north of the border, to engage & plan for #Brexit If only one had any sense of a civic, or better yet civil, dialogue in the UK, things might look less bleak #AllIslandDialogue 
Terry Christian encouraging people to break the law.  Terry Christian is clearly suffering from well-advanced Brexit Derangement Syndrome.  Either that or he’s a knob  
siri show me "what unifies britain after brexit"  
Sometimes it can feel that it really is The People vs Parliament, but once in a while you’re reminded that there are good guys in there, like ⁦@CarolineFlintMP⁩, standing up and cutting through the crap for her Brexit-backing constituents.   
Cabinet minister @andrealeadsom said the EU is pretending the UK doesn't know what it wants from a Brexit deal when that is not true.  
Anna Soubry says “Theresa May is the WORST Brown Owl Britain has ever had” and never borrow a cardigan off Sturgeon” #brexit #brownowl #janeygodleyvoiceover contains swearing 
We have been weighing up the Pros / Cons of our options in Scotland. Option A (Independence) Possibly make an arse of itPossible craicOption B (Brexit) Everything is fire Jacob Reese Mogg’s eldritch smileCraic VoidBlue passports 
But you might be thinking: "Yeah, but surely that total disregard for how Brexit is hurting ordinary people isn't shared by those who've actually been running Brexit, like @DominicRaab" 
BREXIT UPDATE: The BBC could have used this headline every day for the last two years:  
RBS profits double but they have the nerve to query the future after BrexitThey should remember their bale out in 2009 when the banks crashed through their own inefficiency .RBS and HBOS rec’d  £62b in handouts.They stole our money and caused austerity 
This which @NIESRorg @cep and @TheIFS put out before the referendum has, sadly, worn well. The pound is down, prices are up, real wages are lower than they would have been, the economy is about 2% (£40bn) smaller than it would have been.  
Wow. Just been informed I 'stigmatise' people with mental health issues because I SWEAR. I've honestly not heard anything more ridiculous since, well, fucking BREXIT. If you have an issue with the way I speak, block me, it's a CHOICE - like #Brexit. 
Brexit: Why have UK citizens in the EU been left to fight for their own rights?  via @TheLocalGermanyNot just @BremainInSpainA big up to all groups fighting for us all right across Europe.@BrexpatsHOV @RemainInFrance @InLimboBrexit @BritsinGermany 
Brexit is a battle between people who want low taxes, low public services, zero workers rights so they can make more money and people who want to take over private companies without compensation and dismantle capitalism while having nothing to replace it with that works. 
Watch Michael Moore’s #fahrenheit 11/9.This is what happens when corporations run wild.They poison people with inpunity.(ie water scandal in Flint).reins them in with law&regulations 2 protect people.Outsidewill become a big cemetery if ppl don’t wake up soon! #Brexit 
Flying the Green & Gold again #TeamIreland #RoyalCounty #AllIslandCivicDialogue @dublincastleopw #Brexit  
Former Cabinet minister Priti Patel tells @christopherhope Theresa May should have told Brussels to 'sod off' to get a better Brexit deal on this week's @brexitbroadcast. Listen to the full episode:  
The next time someone tells you the EU is a “rules-based organisation” just remember this shoddy scandal:  #Brexit 
MPs might still vote for May's deal out of last minute desperation. We need to make it clear to them that we would regard pushing through a #Brexit won by crime, the abuse of democracy and exploitation of legal loopholes against the will of the majority as a crime.#PeoplesVote 
That's a wrap on this round of engagements in London. Thank you to everyone who took the time, during another tumultuous week in Westminster, to speak with meThe Good Friday Agreement, in all it's parts, is non negotiable #WeAreIrishtoo #Brexit  
Four men with a ladder: the billboard campaigners battling Brexit  @ByDonkeys 
Morning all!Today’s a big day at Dublin Castle, when @campaignforleo & @simoncoveney host fifth All-Island Civic Dialogue on Brexit.Political parties, business & community groups discuss Brexit preparations.It will be live-streamed & we’ll try to bring you link via @dfatirl 
This naked anti Brexit lady has her tits out in Owen Jones’ latest video. Not age restricted even had an ad play at the start. But if you make a video talking (with no nudity) about something really controversial like a conspiracy vid it gets scuppered pic.twitter.com/FogmFYrKiF 
Economists and businesses are issuing grave warnings about the impact of a No-Deal EU Exit.  With the benefit of hindsight let's look back at the considered view of @NIESR, @CEP_LSE and @TheIFS published before the Referendum on the impact of an Exit Vote. 
On @SkyNews in a few mins to chat about the dystopian political void that is Brexit. 
May’s Brexit plan which is not the worst case scenario would see a fall in GDP of 3.9%The best US trade deal will only offset that by 0.2% of GDP and the best China deal by 0.4%There is no way of Brexit to do anything but make us poorer. 
@TwopTwips BBC: SAVE MONEY on Brexit coverage by pinning this story to the top of your news feed 
Thank you US. BBC ignores this #Brexit good news. #GoWTO 
“It was different because we did it.”That is the very basis of #Brexit for people like Rees-Mogg. Britain - its ruling classes especially - could long hold different standards for themselves due to their power. They resent the EU because it demonstrates that that show is over. 
An increase of external weight of Spain within the EU is linked to political stability, if Spain is to compensate for Brexit. Spain is quite far away from political stability as long as the territorial 300 years old crisis with its minorities is not solved. Good luck.  
We may disagree about Brexit, but @graceblakeley is absolutely spot on here! #bbcqt 
This seven-year-old boy with type 1 diabetes needs insulin to stay alive. But the uncertainty over Brexit means many - like George - are worried about the supply of life-saving drugs. The government insists it has a detailed plan. @KarenFAddington | @JDRFUK  | @ClaudiaLizaTV 
We analysed and are implementing actions to mitigate impact of potential no deal #Brexit on #Malta #tourism. Effect on £/€ exchange rate,fluctuations in #UK consumer confidence are main challenges.We are confident we will manage even this scenario -JM #mediterraneantourismforum 
The sneering of London journalists against Brexit campaigners is very telling.If we shut down today, millions of Brexit voters would be almost entirely unrepresented on the media/online. The elite have always looked down on Brexiteers, we must always fight back. 
Snap poll. Do you think the people who phoned the police when KFC ran out of chicken voted leave or remain in the EU referendum 
"World's largest economy votes for #Brexit" - UK-USA interim deal signed.  Yesterday the BBC failed to give this important news the prominence it deserves, so Brexit Facts4EU brings it to you : #GoWTO 
A great analysis from @IanDunt on the woeful state of our government, prime minister and the ridiculously tribal party politics that are all utterly broken because of Brexit. 
42 days until Brexit & other than Switzerland, the only nation Britain has a trade agreement with is Faroe Islands, who encourage their children to celebrate this barbarism, makes you weep #Brexit #Faroes 
Remain MPs may be in turmoil “but public opinion isn't changing. People still back Brexit." @FraserNelson#BBCNewsnight #StandUp4Brexit 
Let's not forget that there is still the likelihood that the NHS will be privatised after Brexit and sold to US firms.  If the PM cannot confirm that it will remain a public service we should be alert and demand a #PeoplesVote 
It appears the prospect of Brexit is making Remainer ladies remove their clothing in public. First the lunatic Bateman and now Rachel Johnson. Hahaha - fully unhinged! 
Jess Phillips: “Luciana has by no means been the only MP to criticise Labour’s position on Brexit, nor is she alone in standing up against racism. So it’s funny how she seems to receive the lion’s share of abuse (by ‘funny’, I mean antisemitic)” 
Monday 18th at 6.30pm in the European Parliament.‘Catalonia and the trial on the referendum: a challenge for the EU’With Catalan Presidents @QuimTorraiPla & @KRLS Puigdemont 
Brexitons who have abandoned their post before the reality of Brexit dawns:DavidcameronBorisjohnsonDaviddavisDominicraabJohnhumphrysAndrewneilNigelfarage(& Barren Wanks has now not tweeted for 3 weeks)Any more? 
I'm starting to get a bit annoyed by Brexit 
It's a horrible thing when you get to an age and realise the world is not run by competent people.It's run instead by Etonian confidence tricksters. Always making fast money then dashing for the exist before anyone points fingers.Like those who sold you brexit. 
May's latest Brexit defeat: The edifice of nonsense comes tumbling down  
Strange sensation that there are thousands, maybe millions of us all thinking the same thing at the same time...I had been mulling how my faith in humanity might be restored just a little if just one advocate for Brexit, one Vote Leave staffer even, admitted they'd been wrong.  
High Spanish official repeats the lie that half of Catalan society is against a self-determination referendum. For years now, surveys have consistently shown that around 80% of Catalonia's population want such a vote, and an even higher percentage say they’d respect the result.  
A new low was last night’s BBCQT where Rees-Mogg shamefully informed a concerned business woman, worried about the damage Brexit was doing to her small business, that she was wrong. 
We are still short of 9 full acts and about 600 Statutory instruments for brexit dayAnd the PM alone madevthe decisionAnd now she admits she can’t be confident the advisory referendum wasn’t seriously corruptBut she isn’t even proceeding on the basis that it was not corrupt 
JOIN US IN BIRMINGHAM On Saturday 23rd Feb we'll be in Birmingham city centre promoting the benefits of a #WTO Brexit. Sign up for free below  
New post: The Tory party lost its way from 2010, not 2016  Did Cameron just make one big mistake? I argue that his ruinous austerity policy and his immigrant scapegoating ensured he lost the referendum he should never have called. 
May’s premiership lies in tatters after another Brexit defeat.You wouldn’t think this if TV and radio were your only source of news.@UKLabour have the answer to this impasse.It makes sense and the EU have approved it.But the MSM are still banging on about a 2nd referendum  
Those opposed to #PeoplesVote don't believe in Britain. They fear the British people. They a terrified that the British people will kick their precious #Brexit tax haven or xenophobic little Brexit England into the dustbin of history. 
How Remainers try to convince Leavers to stay in the EUBy calling them....ThickRacistBigotGammon facexenophobeAnd they wonder why the nation is divided.#Brexit 
Take a minute to listen to this business owner's story. Eloquent, emotional testament to the real damage Brexit is causing. Jacob Rees-Mogg deflected the whole thing by saying that Ineos has previously said EU regs are bad for its business. That's Ineos, the giant multinational.  
So people fighting to actually deliver Brexit, are now no longer welcome in the @Conservatives  guess most of their membership should leave as well then. 
Into my second year as a non smoker. I still have 30 cigarettes. I’m holding onto them. In the event of a No Deal Brexit they’ll be worth a fortune. I’ll trade them for tins of beans. This is my only plan unfortunately. 
Theresa May vows to ignore Parliament defeat and pursue her rejected Brexit plan  
Churchill was a "war hero" but he was also around in the aftermath of British Imperialism. A time where many atrocities were carried out. The Tories are equating imperialism with Brexit. This narrative is being continually perpetuated as we plunge towards a no deal & is dangerous 
Which proves #Brexit is a psychological issue caused by an outbreak of narcissism. 
Let's face it. If there was any political will, #Brexit would've been stopped a long time ago.If there was any respect for the rule of law, #Brexit would've been stopped a long time agoIf there was any real concern for the public, #Brexit would've been stopped a long time ago 
Cost of Brexit to UK economy running at £40bn a year!   In big red bus units that's £800 million a week! 
Whether it's #ClimateChange or #Brexit it is our young folk who will ultimately suffer the most. So impressed by those youngsters who are giving a voice to their own generation. Our politicians must listen to them. 
Why does Ms Soubry think she has a God-given right to a Tory seat in Parliament to advance her #Brexit views  even though the party's membership and the party's voters don't agree with her? It's that untenable disconnect which has "broken" the party, not a "Purple Momentum". 
CLAIM: 60% of people in #NorthernIreland against #Backstop CONCLUSION: Inaccurate: 35% opposed; 65% support #Brexit @jimshannonmp @LucidTalk @BBCNewsNI @duponline @FullFact @TheJournal_ie #factcheck 
The absence of viable solutions to the @BorderIrish is now considered a given, to the point where the Brexit debate centers on what to do when it inevitably remains unresolved two years from now, and possibly in perpetuity. That should worry more people. 
If Labour are going down in the polls atm, it's not because we are not backing remain or not backing a hard Brexit, it's because we are not backing either & trying to find a compromise. It will hurt us in the short term but in the long term we will be proved to be right! 
This Churchill debate shows how piss poor our history education is and how off the scale British nationalism and exceptionalism is. Brexit was inevitable. 
Interesting thread from a mum on the anti-Brexit protesters...  
Brexit: Theresa May pushes on with her deal after latest defeat  
Until you can answer the questions below, you cannot begin to bullshit that Brexit is good for the UK. 1) How much extra will Brexit make the UK in £ over the next 20 years?2) When?3) How? Which assumptions? Which tariff changes?4) Which countries will we sell more to? Why? 
Has she read Goebbels?Black is White...repeat....Stop the #Brexit BS#RevokeA50 #StopBrexit #Remain in Control in the EU with our Best Possible Deal & #Reform UK. 
More than half of UK farmland is only suitable for sheep and cattle grazing but breeding ewes will be slaughtered in no-deal brexit “We’d sell them for meat because there would be no demand for them to be sold as potential mums for next year,” #RevokeA50 
Petition: Hold a second referendum on EU membership.  
Imagine the surreal experience of being a Leaver, remaining tight-lipped while being verbally probed by a man in a B0llocks to Brexit hat, another dressed very flamboyantly as Beelzebub and another with face completely concealed behind a mask of some horned, goat-like demon. 4/10 
I realise that that statement will instantly render her rights and views worthless in some people's eyes, particularly the people I most hope will see this. However....As we approached the theatre late at night we passed the giant caricatured float of the Brexit protesters. 2/10 
May will fall if she relies on opposition to pass Brexit deal - Baker  
Brexit was not a party-management exercise gone awry. Cameron may have called the referendum for his own narrow reasons, but voters seized the opportunity to demand change. The story may have started off being about them, but it’s about us now -- Mick Hume 
Happy Friday, guys! Six weeks until Brexit Day!  
Sorry Hilary Benn @BBCr4today..much respect but this #Brexit debacle has gone way beyond compromise..or exts to drag out the non-deal making.This madness needs 2B stopped NOW.Just #RevokeA50 & #Remain in Control in the EU with our Best Possible Deal!! 
Apparently, the government is preparing to tell the EU is does not want to renegotiate the #Brexit deal after all.  
This video:>Completely ignores the real issue of our time, the ecological crisis.>Perpetuates an illusion of endless economic growth based on industrialism.>Perpetuates the illusion that Labour has a ‘strategy’ for an ‘alternative Brexit’.Frankly, it’s pathetically outdated.  
#Brexit No dealers are Brexit Jihadis. Prepared to blow up everything for fanatic beliefs. This is what I called Spiked ed Brendan O'Neill on @SkyNews last night. ERG, @BorisJohnson, @Nigel_Farage, @KateHoeyMP are even more maniacal Brexit Jihadis. Name them. Fear them. 
A container ship can take up to six weeks to sail from Britain to East Asia, meaning today, for some exporters, is the real Brexit day  
Proud of my two teenagers who are on #schoolstrike4climate today and will be heading into central London soonNo issue - not even Brexit - is as important as this oneHope the kids can get the adults to push this to the top of the political agenda@ExtinctionR 
Brexiter I know, this morning. 'I just want Brexit to go away, I'm sick of it, they should sort it then come back to us. I'm sick of hearing about it'Same bloke a few weeks ago was saying 'it doesn't matter how many votes they have, I'll vote leave every time'.Not any more 
She's obviously been re-reading "1984", or, as the post-it note she stuck on the front cover of her copy reads, "Roadmap to a post-Brexit Britain." 
Sheep farming is one of the U.K.'s oldest industries, but it could die out in a no-deal BrexitAlan Hutton, who runs a 150-year-old farm, tells us his story:  
With cancel culture at it's peak is there any chance we could cancel Brexit? 
The Brexit negotiations are not standard negotiations. In standard negotiations, no deal doesn't present both sides with a wholly new and distinct relationship. I wish more people understood this. 
You can take away my medicineYou can take my #cancer drugsYou can take my food & waterYou load of #Tory thugsBut you CANNOT crush my spiritYou cannot stop my strifeAnd I will shout and I will yellI'm a SABOTEUR  for lifeNo @theresa_may I won't be *crushed*#brexit  
UK grows faster than Germany, France and Italy in 2018, when whole world, even China is spluttering. Great news to celebrate, perhaps thanks to Brexit.....  
DOMINIC Grieve warned Theresa May she faces mass resignations if the British Government fails to take no-deal off the table. Never mind a few anti-democracy MPs, the country faces mass protests and civil unrest if she fails to deliver Brexit..#NoDeal 
We now have an advisory Referendum turned into a mandate and a 'sovereign' Parliament reduced to a merely advisory role? 
No. The reason some MPs think we should honour the result of the referendum is because their constituents voted Leave, they stood on a platform in 2017 of taking us out of the EU and they voted to trigger A50. The bug-eyed zealots are those trying to reverse the result.  
I imagine #Brexit as Theresa May desperately trying to solve a Rubik’s cube, failing, and then trying to pretend it’s grand by picking off all the little stickers and reattaching them. 
BBC News - Cardiff gig to discuss Welsh independence post-Brexit @grifflynch @charlottechurch @yesismore @superfurry 
The House of Commons voted 303 to 258 against a motion reiterating support for Theresa May’s approach to Brexit  
To put it crudely...Brexit is like bad sex. The foreplay has not been going well. Do we now want to say “oh just get on with it”? - to get “closure”? When we don’t know how long it’s going to go on for? 
As things stand, Britain will leave the E.U.—with or without an agreement—in less than two months. Is Theresa May's Brexit plan to wait until the very last minute?  
When you can’t win a Referendum or a General Election or even with a Remain loaded parliament, what next? “An opinion poll of 250 people? No ” Portillo speaks for us all on the Remain Campaign’s latest ‘People’s Assembly’ idea.#BBCThisWeek 
‘We’ll crash out. Why would anyone offer us the trade terms we get in the EU?’Erm, well, the biggest economy in the world just rolled over our current agreement .cliffedge. #ProjectFear #Brexit #FridayFeeling #WTO 
#Brexit means leaving with a deal/ backstop, no deal, staying in custom’s union - which one? What about staying in the EU?  @peoplesvote_uk 
The #Brexit betrayal! I didn't vote for a deal I voted to leave. What do you think? Please retweet 
Labour will be 'destroyed' like Lib Dems if it ushers in Tory Brexit, frontbencher Clive Lewis warns  via @PoliticsHome 
It’s incredible that some Tory #Brexiteers still advocate a “no-deal #Brexit” Even as a negotiating tactic, it’s like saying “Give me what I want or I’ll shoot myself in the head”. A reminder of what it would mean:. 
This image of Labour abstaining yesterday is ominous. When faced with the final "May's Deal or No Deal" vote, this'll be what happens. They abstain, get the Brexit they're pretending not to want, and claim it was nothing to do with them. The left have so much form on this.   
Andrea Leadsom on @BBCr4today trying to pretend that people ‘just want to get on with it’......to get ‘certainty’. May’s deal does no such thing.... it provides no certainty, no closure.May’s deal just officially starts a deeper Brexit mess. 
'Decide what you want to do over Brexit, and hurry up!' - French minister  
You don’t hear so much about Brexit these days. 
A great example of "Brexit Denialism" - the belief that the UK can leave the EU and still nothing will change. Sure, Brits will still be Europeans after Brexit. They just won't be EU citizens.  
Rees-Mogg“We represent the bulk of the Conservative party membership but most MPs voted to Remain whereas the country voted to Leave.“The ERG are sticking up for what people voted for. We should trust the people and deliver on manifesto commitments and referendum results.”  
The only Brexit statistic you need to remember:'The vote to LEAVE HAS COST the U.K. 800 MILLION POUNDS PER WEEK since June 2016, or about 2% of GDP.' 
Fun being interviewed by the brilliant @christopherhope for his @brexitbroadcast. Tune in for our discussion on #Brexit, publishing legal advice & what we should be telling the EU in negotiations..... 
In a bizarre move, the Dutch government has unveiled a hairy Brexit monster to warn businesses about trade risks after Britain leaves the EU #PoliticsTamed 
‘The whole British political system is imploding in on itself’ May's latest Brexit defeat: The edifice of nonsense comes tumbling down  
I see Terry Christian  has triggered the #brexit snowflakes, calm down people, it's just that freedom of speech that you all pretend to be fans of when it suits you as an excuse to spout racism @terrychristian 
Our Brexit debate got so heated, Terry Christian tried to kill off Tim Martin. @terrychristian | #Brexit | #GMB 
If brexit is so great like certain MPs and the media tell us, why dont we have a string of multi national businesses lining up to get into the UK to trade on WTO rules? 
Will the BBC please stop pushing the idea that the Withdrawal Agreement is in any way acceptable to sane people?Their constant sniping at those opposed to taking #NoDeal off the table simply proves their intention of using our license fees to overturn #Brexit. 
Crystal clear tremendous Brexiteer @Jacob_Rees_Mogg, the ERG and the DUP want to deliver the Brexit 17.4 million people voted in good faith for.Utterly galling how many Remainer traitors across Parliament are putting two fingers up to voters and subverting democracy. 
Britain's dangerous obsession with war and Winston Churchill informed Brexit and stifles our world view - me getting angry for Politico  
Still no clarity on #Brexit financial arrangements for any sector of the economy - as a result there is now considerable anxiety, real hardship & increasing damage : Scots and Welsh ministers quiz Treasury on post-Brexit cash - BBC News  
Interesting isn’t it?The EU - incomplete,imperfect, struggling at times, but focussed on the defence and well being of its citizens.The UK - short term, inward looking, full of Brexit hate and bigotry, focussed on the well being of wealthy elites and ideological throwbacks. 
Judge Ian Forrester from Scotland does not know if he’ll still be serving on the European Court of Justice after #Brexit day 29 March, even though the court’s rulings should still apply in the UK for another 2 years and longer in some cases...  
The views of Terry Christian is exactly why this country is in such a mess, personally attacking a decent buisness just because they have different views, maybe if our government had a backbone and stood up to the EU then this mess wouldnt have happened #GMB #Brexit 
Why don’t you ask Theresa for a second referendum? She is in power with a majority bought without our money. She’s in the position to call one. Careful, though, she could make it her deal vs no deal. What would you do then, @sarahwollaston? 
NORMAN Tebbit insisted Brexit will allow the United Kingdom to avoid falling "into the trap of authoritarian power" as he claimed Margaret  Thatcher had realised the risks to British democracy the European Union posed.  
#Brexit: Is there a 10-year-rule to sort out trade?  
Terry Christian on GMTV says his savings have shrunk by 18% since the referendum in 2016. Aahhh the mask slips Terry, It's a selfish decision on your part to Remain, it's all about the money in your bank. 
Brilliant flags and chants on College Green yesterday evening.Brexit's a lie.Brexit's a con.Brexit's rubbish and we want it gone.@operabinoculars #Sodem 
Rees Mogg is pathetic charlatan. He has his own, very narrow, 'interests' in mind when he campaigns for brexit. His dismissive, casual, arrogance wrapped up in Eton plumb is exactly the same on this issue as it is on climate change...he couldn't be more wrong, on both subjects. 
An outstanding contributionPlease can we hear more of her views & analysis of of the current unfolding #Brexit chaos. #bbcqt Small & local businesses employ hundreds of thousands #FBPE 
Medicines hysteria: On @bbcquestiontime last night @lisanandy and a woman were saying No Deal Brexit means no medicine from the EU. Which medicine is only available from only one factory in the whole world and, even so, why would any country embargo any medical supply to UK? 
British Prime Minister Theresa May's latest humiliating defeat in the House of Commons has pushed Britain closer to a no-deal exit from Europe -- and put her Brexit strategy in even greater disarray | Analysis by @janemerrick23 
Brexit is bleeding Britain dry  
Unhinged. As predicted, Brexit is going v badly for the U.K. Rather than acknowledging that Brexiter fantasies get into trouble whenever in contact with reality; Brexit headbangers try to blame those who suggested years ago that Brexit was a bad idea and wouldn’t work. 
Britain needs more time on Brexit, but we shouldn’t entrust it to Theresa May | Gary Younge We need more time, but not so May can use it to go unicorn hunting. 
Excellent wee video on the UK land border problem, showing its history and how Irish unification is now the ONLY solution to guarantee Theresa’s red lines. Thanks #brexit.   
Two yrs ago 77% of MPs voted to issue Article 50Article 50 said that #NoDeal #Brexit was the default if a deal wasn't agreed.Now a majority of MPs want to rule out #NoDeal.Did they not understand what they were voting for?#Brexit has shown up most MPs for being what they are. 
A march, yes - but that alone won't be enough.We also need to strike. We need to roadblock. We need to peacefully protest this every weekend.We cannot allow the Tories & Labour to pull us out of the EU on the back of an unsafe referendum without being given a #PeoplesVote. 
Incidentally, we already may have an answer of sorts. Here is @SteveBakerHW explaining why he misled voters before the referendum vote.  
Julia: "We voted for Brexit to bring sovereignty back to the British people. It's the remoaners who are the hardliners. It's the remoaners who are the extremists. In a democracy those kinds of people need to be stopped."@JuliaHB1 |  
It will be calamity and unpredictability on Brexit until the end of March with this PM. Potentially longer. As this @garyyounge column says this morning, we need more time, but not with this PM, that would be pointless 8/ 
Interesting from @terrychristian — firms who have to make workers redundant should "lay off the Brexit voters first"  
If Theresa May wants to avoid a no-deal Brexit and get her Brexit deal through Parliament, she should attach a second referendum (her deal v Remain) amendment to the meaningful vote. If she did this, I suspect her Brexit deal would win a parliamentary majority.#PeoplesVote 
1 positive that can be taken from brexit is Scottish Independence.Thats why I no longer campaign for a peoples vote, that and those  wanting a GE 1st, with no remain on the ballot.Brexit doesnt mean brexit, it now means Engxit, a unified Ireland, Scots indy.Poor Wales tho. 
People that laughed when Nnamdi Kanu called for referendum are now saying South East did not register, so won’t vote anyway.Nnamdi Kanu has called off his boycott and  #SEWillVote .We were going to vote anyway, now more people will vote. 
Being in a customs union, insists @SteveBakerHW on @BBCr4today, “would be a repudiation of the referendum result”. Yet, in a briefing he sent to constituents in 2016, he described EFTA/EEA as options “with advantages and disadvantages” and WTO “the worst-case scenario”. Please RT  
Brexit: History will not forgive May’s reckless push to the no-deal precipice ⁦@pollytoynbee⁩ 
See also Brexit, Yellow Vests, etc etc People have been played and are still being played.  
People say the referendum question was too complex to ask ordinary people.I actually think it was perfectly simple. "Do you want to ruin your country by withdrawing from our biggest market, or not?"And still they got it wrong. 
It is increasingly clear that the PM is not competent to handle Brexit given months of repeated errors dating back at least to Chequers, where she found the exact point that was unacceptable both to her own party and the EU... 1/ 
On the day of Theresa May's big Brexit defeat in January, the DWP slipped out news of a cut to pensions credit. It transpires that the cut will hit 40k pensioners, who will lose £5500 each per year. A Tory manifesto pledge was to protect pensioner benefits! #ToryShambles 
If the “grown-ups” could stop tearing Brexit chunks out of one another for just a few hours today they might notice that our young people are focussed on - and desperately worried about - what really matters.  #YouthStrike4Climate 
It’s a customs-union party-splitting Brexit or no deal - ITV News  
Why EU leaders are not ready to budge on #Brexit  
austerity ravaged social care is already 90,000 staff short! More than 2.3 million elderly people are missing out on vital social care because of Tory cuts to social care budgets & its estimated Brexit will leave the UK short 380,000 care workers by 2026  
No Eu deal is now the only option.We must make a clean break & then negotiate globally 'Theresa May's Brexit strategy' does not exist at all.It is a Brino strategy, plain to see for everyone save remain MSM.  
Days to go until Brexit - 42Alternative Arrangements - 0Trade Agreements last week - 2 (Faroe Islands & Switzerland)Trade Agreements still needed - 78 (starting with EU 27) 
"For all the bluster of leading Brexiteers about “global Britain”, the referendum was won on a clear pledge to halt one of the main features of globalisation: the flow of migrants seeking the jobs created by the flow of global capital" #politicstamed 
Last night staunch Brexiteer MP @AnneMarieMorris voted against Mrs May's motion for a non-Brexit Brexit approach to negotiations.  Anne Marie backs our public #GoWTO campaign.  Pls tell her if you support her!  
Brexit is 1024 hours away. #brexit 
Only 7 out of 70 trade deals the  has with the world have been carried over. No-deal could happen next month. Businesses will be blindsided by new tariffs created if a no-deal Brexit happens. @NicoleSykes_ on @BBCNews 
Why EU even less likely to budge now - the morning after the night before in Westminster. My #Brexit thoughts from Brussels:  
Great atmosphere at last night’s anti-Brexit rally in #Leeds - #PeoplesVote #LetsStayTogether @LeedsEurope 
As an MP on the #Brexit Select commitee I’ve watched this disaster proceed in the face of all the evidence.  I’m also aware that many of #EU27 are very sympathetic to #independence for Scotland & once UK is 3rd state that can translate to action #indyref2 
Dominic Grieve is heroic. There are no winners in this mess, he says, and he is right. Brexit diminishes us all and diminishes this country. We must delay. 
Dominic Grieve speaking lots of common sense on need to end Brexit democratically on  @BBCr4today 
Tory-Labour BrexitERG collaborating with Labour politburo of Milne, Murray, Murphy, McClusky and puppet Corbyn working to force Brexit against our willNasty authoritariansThis is not democracy 
The BBC didn’t show you this yesterday, so #Brexit Facts4EU are bringing it to you.  UK outperformed top 3 economies in the EU last quarter of 2018.  Brilliant summary and analysis is here: #GoWTO 
the other night dreamin about my french ex last night dreamin about my australian ex ??? brexit means brexit fuck off 
On @GMB at 7.40 am to argue moral case that if a company has to lay workers off due to Brexit downturn they should try and lay those workers who voted brexit off first - it's the short term pain they voted for 
Cost of Brexit to UK economy running at £40bn a year or £800m a week – Bank rate-setter. Didn't see that on any buses.   
End the charade!  Last night’s humiliating defeat for Theresa May,  good men and women from all parties should coalesce round a single motion to prevent No Deal Brexit.  That will finally focus minds on Credible alternatives.  #BrexitCrisis 
Yes, spam & canned peaches: that’s in the event of a No Deal Brexit, which hellish cliff-edge this Govt & this Opposition are ineptly & casually walking us towards. But remember: we still don’t have to do this. We can still #StopBrexit via a #PeoplesVote, & we must. 
You don’t have to be a “Marxist revolutionary” to disagree with this softly softly strategy. #Brexit is a catastrophe about to   hit Scotland & the only way to protect our society & economy is #independence #indyref2 
Britain needs more time on Brexit, but we shouldn’t entrust it to Theresa May | Gary Younge  
NEW: Theresa May says her latest Commons defeat makes no-deal Brexit 'more likely' 
In last Wednesday's #PMQs MP Henry Smith said that the governor of the Bank of England, Mark Carney, described post-Brexit trade deals as a potential “golden age of trade”.Except, he didn’t:  
Good morning! Please join me for my #NoNonsense @talkRADIO breakfast show from 6.30am-10am. We’ll be talking about the Isis bride, latest Brexit shenanigans, pupils on school strike for climate change today, A&E waiting times & farewell to the Mars Rover...  
"BREXIT" , "BLEXIT" , now lets Flex It & show the Demagogues the EXIT! 
Is this where post Brexit chaos is taking us ?  
Hezvoko bwaaa! UK Tory government votes not to keep European human rights charter in UK law after Brexit@ali_naka @xandatoto @DrNkuSibanda @nyashaneta @Mavhure @daddyhope @jewels_bbyju @RMajongwe @Auzqn @misscailah 
The TMB Guide to HMG Brexit Strategy terminology:* Delaying making a decision - Kicking the can down the road* Also delaying making a decision - Running down the clock* Delaying Article 50 - Kicking the clock down the road 
I’m speaking on Brexit in Stockton-on-Tees at 5pm today - Stockton Arts Centre, Dovecot St, Stockton TS18 1LL. All welcome & no need to book! 
"A PRO-European Union Labour peer and former cabinet minister is urging the North-East to campaign for a second referendum in a bid to stop a “catastrophic” Brexit." @Andrew_Adonis 
Businesses are running out of patience. Investment deals are being put on hold & cancelled. Real money is being spent on contingency plans for a no-deal Brexit. It is happening now. Politicians need to compromise make progress & find a way forward. @NicoleSykes_ @BBCNews 
Another Brexit vote for May another humiliation  
Less than 23,000 signatures needed to get this "#RevokeArticle50 if no #Brexit plan by Feb-25" petition to 100,000.After yesterday's abysmal session in parliament, what are you waiting for? C'mon #Remainers & #RemainerNow: let's get this to 100,000 today 
‘I might follow this up with a demand for the BBC to employ just one person, anywhere within the organisation, perhaps as a cleaner or something, who supports Brexit, and maybe a couple of people who quite like the idea of controls upon immigration’  
Tory Brexiteers played for fools. These remain MPs don’t want you  - ‘Richard Harrington told Tories demanding changes to Theresa May’s EU divorce deal they should quit and sign up to Nigel Farage’s new Brexit party instead’  
“We’re sticking up for what people voted for.“Fundamentally I believe you trust the people and deliver on referendum results.” 
Theresa May defeated on Brexit again as ERG Tories abstain  
Brexit has wiped £40 billion from Britain's annual economic growth since referendum, top Bank of England official reveals @swns @PA @AP @AFP @jonsnowC4 @peterjukes 
Enjoy learning, hell yes. but man brexit seems like a real bucket of snakes. Only way the UK is going to get out of this is from work like you're doing - inform inform inform. I believe people want to make rational decisions and that starts with videos like yours. Keep going! 
"Criminal investigations into Leave campaigns still stalled amid allegations up to a dozen MPs in the frame."Apart from the fact that Brexit is bad for Britain, the strong evidence of illegality & cover-up is sufficient reason to revoke Article 50 now.  
MPs need to wake up and see reality: the choice is a customs union or no-deal Brexit  
Well, since my husband is now on a pirate kick, I shall present my accomplishments to you instead.  Behold, my colony is proceeding as planned. I am a kind and benevolent dictator.  They can have their referendum.  As long as I win.  
Brexit was part of a plan by ideological extremists to deconstruct the European Union and return to the identity politics that helped cause two world wars.The only winner will be Putin.Britain should have another referendum. 
So what will Brexit teach children about democracy? It will teach them you can illegally buy it when it’s on sale to the highest corrupt bidder... 
New podcast episode: @toadmeister talks to @GoodwinMJ, professor of politics at the University of Kent, about Brexit, Trump, & the rise of national populism in Europe & America.  
The hashtag #ChickenChuka simply demonstrates that the Corbynistas really have become a cult within Labour.All he’s asking for is the implementation of Labour policy on Brexit as agreed at conference.What’s Chicken about that?#PeoplesVote 
Beto O'Rourke when asked, since Rep. @DanCrenshawTX asked on Twitter, if he would tear down the walls that are already in place: Yes and I think a referendum to do so would pass.  
Jacob Rees-Mogg's response to someone explaining how Brexit has hurt the business she built, as well as 1000s of others around the UK, is truly shocking. #BBCqt 
Investors flee European stocks at fastest pace since Brexit vote  
You can attempt to run and hide but there'll be no escaping... not with the size of that yellow streak.....What must Jacob, Patrick, Owen and Matthew be thinking! 
Great piece by Polly Toynbee.“Someday a judicial inquiry will expose the reckless Brexit chaos into which the Cons party cast this country. Inquiries go on for years, but in the end a mighty Domesday tome will record what was done, by whom and why.” 
What an excellent piece of writing @brexit_sham. Looking forward to the next installment. Thanks @RobertCPalmer13. 
Does Britain want #Brexit, Mr Humphrys?Apparently not.Supermarket delivery man this evening:"I voted Remain but most of my friends voted Leave. But now they know what Leaving means they want to Remain. And they'd like to have a second chance."#PeoplesVote #Salisbury #r4today 
Tories: We must deflect attention from #Brexit.  Let's wheel Churchill in.Kippers: Yay. Deflect from our scam.FBPE: Shut up you thunderclowns.  What about the #BrexitShambles?Labour: Best help out the Tories.  Churchill Churchill!Corbyn cult: Yes yes, Churchill!FBPE:  
Just goes to show how impotent & broken the Westminster system has become when the future of 65 million people has got to this perilous stage without a single benefit or plan in place to convince anyone that Brexit is  anything other than a disaster.  
The true target of the People's Vote is Corbyn, not Brexit  
Brexit: Scotland government demands lost EU funding be ‘replaced in full’ by Treasury after UK's exit. So the socialist republic of Scotland wants to pay less and receive even more from the UK Government. Perhaps it’s time to scrap the Barnett Formula..  
The stark choice may yet become No Deal #Brexit vs#RevokeA50 unilaterally #Remain in Control in the EU with our Best Possible Deal, take the flak & promise UK #Reform to address the real probs facing us.There is nothing to gain from this #BrexitShamblesNOTHING TO RESPECT. 
Brexit is far more important to me than any misguided Tory party loyalty, as I imagine it is the same for much of the country.I hope May realises this over the coming month or The Brexit Party could do real damage. 
Dominic Grieve: The truth & the reason we find ourselves where we are, is that Brexit in whatever form it takes is going to be damaging to this country. It doesn't matter whether it's Norway or Canada style agreement or indeed the agreement negotiated in good faith by. . the PM 
SNP demand to see Tory government advice on Brexit but hide any record of legal advice here in Scotland. Transparency is not recommended for nationalism?Scottish independence: Top law officer refuses to reveal if Nicola Sturgeon asked for indyref2 advice  
The EU’s deepest fear is that Brexit Britain will succeed, which is why they are desperate to agree May’s deal to keep us under their control, unable to conduct trade deals and regain sovereignty. When Britain does succeed other EU nations will follow, freedom, self determination 
This is a joke these MPs go off on holiday when the UK is falling apart a sick person is too sick to attend a job center and they get sanctioned for 8weeks to months on end . These MPs should not be allowed out of the HoC until this BREXIT Cluster F**k is sorted once ,& for all.  
The party is together. Lucy Powell, Lisa Nandy and many others who cannot be considered hardline Corbyn supporters back the party’s Brexit position. Chuka is in a tiny minority on this issue.  
Scottish government demands lost EU funding be ‘replaced in full’ by Treasury after Brexit  
It’s even more extraordinary that the Labour front bench are happy to support brexit which literally removes real and tangible rights from ordinary citizens up and down the country in order for billionaires to gather more riches. 
Psssssst - Though May AND Corbyn are still trying very hard to suppress the facts, "brexit" is built on a 2016 vote to leave the EU which has been shown to have been deliberately procured by criminals. The UK MUST not implement this criminal project - pass it on ... 
It took two years from Woodward and Bernstein first reporting the Watergate break in to Nixon’s resignation. Two years ago @carolecadwalla first exposed the Bannon, Mercer, Cambridge Analytica involvement in Trump and Brexit. Truth is the daughter of Time 
Over 100 MPs are off on holiday next week, even though their recess was cancelled. Shows how little real work is going on in Parliament, and makes it super-obvious that Theresa May's just running down the Brexit clock.  
#bbctw #ChurchillWell said Andrew Neil @afneil Pity we don't have anyone with Churchill's courage leading the UK through Brexit :/  
Michael Portillo's face #chooChoo priceless - how he stopped himself from laughing is beyond me. The state of these MPs in parliament has now reached farcical proportions. No wonder #Brexit is in deadlock, these kids now couldn't make a decision on what to wear let alone #Brexit  
EU, America and China will all get new medicines ahead of Britain after Brexit, drug company boss warns  
Rees-Mogg doesn't trust the people, he fears them. He fears that they will kick his dreams of a #brexit tax haven for the rich into the dustbin of history. 
A high-ranking US pork lobby chairman has urged the UK to change its food production regulatory standards in the aftermath of Brexit if it wishes to secure a trade deal with the US.Now we've got the Faroe Islands on board, who needs the US?  #agriland 
Opinion: No-deal Brexit would starve diabetics of insulin – this government really are ‘lower than vermin’  
“This deal leaves us tied into a Customs Union & ECJ potentially indefinitely, and splits up the UK. This isn’t a question of people like me letting you down, it’s of the Govt having come up with a deal that doesn’t deliver on the manifesto or referendum” @Jacob_Rees_Mogg#BBCQT 
Stella Creasy making the case for a citizens’ assembly on #bbctw. Possibly the most pitiful and desperate scheme to overturn the referendum since the days of Gina Miller. 
Sturgeon’s salary and that of her husband transcend not only independence, they transcend everything as do the expenses, the ego trip jollies, the chauffeur and the free Bute House tenancy. Lose the referendum it’s back to Broomhouse and, with a bit of luck, the Govan Law Centre.  
"It's not an opinion poll, it's like a jury" @stellacreasy tells Michael Portillo on her call for a People's Assembly over Brexit #bbctw#bbctw 
"We already asked 32 million people and they gave us a verdict"   #choochoo Portillo on @stellacreasy calls for a People's Assembly   #Brexit#bbctw 
On @BBCNewsnight I called on Theresa May to stop treating Brexit negotiations as an internal party matter. The PM has to accept she doesn't have a stable majority and must now show political courage by working across Parliament for a compromise to defend jobs and the economy.  
Backing a Tory Brexit could wipe out Labour, warns Clive Lewis.Shadow minister says party would never be forgiven as calls for second referendum grow#PeoplesVote #Brexit 
A reminder of how some of our MPs are just in it for themselves and care very little about the views of their constituents when it comes to #Brexit...Thanks for this @NeilEllis3.  
They have underlined the fact that Theresa May is most unlikely to get any deal past the HoC, and thus made it vanishingly unlikely that Brussels will offer any concession. So they have increased the probability of a clean Brexit in 43 days’ time. Well done those guys.  
"Any Brexit deal will be worse that what we've got, a no-deal would be catastrophic.. But the Brexiteers don't seem to care." #bbcqt #Brexit  
The best thing about tonight's #bbcqt was @Jacob_Rees_Mogg who tirelessly stands up for Brexit and the British people. Top respect to Jacob!  #StandUp4Brexit 
Why do pro #Brexit Tory MPs keep saying "The EU writes the textbook on 11th hour deals"?It's Theresa May who is kicking the can down the road and trying to delay an actual #MeaningfulVote until the deadline in a conceited attempt to force her shoddy deal through. 
Americans, please read about the trial of the legislators from Catalonia who are being prosecuted for holding a referendum. This case is a microcosm of European politics. Much valuable information to be gained. Especially for political leaders and fx/bond market investors. 
‘With Brexit, we are probably at one of the most significant points in our history… it is really important to understand where we have come from, how we have got here’This audience member says there needs to be an honest discussion about Winston Churchill and his legacy. #bbcqt 
I swear to you, I've never hated the EU and their fucking cohorts as much as I do right now.....I hope they implode.#Brexit 
Such a wonderful atmosphere at tonight's @LeedsEurope march. Let's stay together, not let Brexit divide us! We must keep fighting and marching and campaigning and writing. It's not over! #PeoplesVote #stopbrexit #LetsStayTogether #LoveBroughtUsHere @guyverhofstadt @BBCLookNorth 
I had a chat with a lone Leave protestor today.He was quite friendly.He retorted the usual nonsense #Brexit arguments which I gently challenged.But he said he admired me & even though I was a "hate figure" for the Leavers he didn't agree with the abuse I receive#DebateNotHate 
Feb 6: Not opposing Brexit could lose Labour 45 seats, says leaked report. Remainers make up around 70% of Labour voters and if Labour helps #Brexit over the line many will abstain or vote for pro-EU parties.  #PeoplesVote 
Fantastic. The truth about Brexit on the BBC for once. #bbcqt  via @YouTube 
William George brian thank you for making sense. This nonsense of jobs and what average pay was going to be is just nonsense.This is about the future of NYC. And these dimwits ruined it. It’s the brexit of New York. Today people just read headline news. How about critical thought 
Today @duponline posted a statement from @DianeDoddsMEP claiming @europarl_en approved a Report on new digital technology for customs. They cry foul, given EU has said tech can't yet solve post-Brexit @BorderIrish.This is worth investigating...1/9 
Is it any wonder we’ve made no headway in these negotiations when every-time we achieve something of a united front, some1 goes and speaks “for the UK” with a different voice  -  ‘Corbyn to hold Brexit talks with Barnier and Verhofstadt’  
Such unreasonable nonsense from Dutch PM. #Brexit uncertainty is certainly hurting UK today but UK economy remains one of the world's largest and when it settles after leaving EU, its success will be a big embarrassment to the EU and a threat to the Netherlands' EU membership.  
Labour is redTories are blue May's deal is dead What shall we do?#Brexit #ValentinesDay 
Jacob Rees-Mogg makes a great point about the sunk cost fallacy and HS2. But exactly the same argument applies to Brexit. #bbcqt 
Why is no one questioning the validity of the referendum?It was only ever an advisory vote but everyone is treating it as set in stone.If Cameron had made the ref legally binding it would have been void due to the illegal actions of leave .eu campaign & @Arron_banks.#BBCQT 
But, Lisa, the referendum was flawed. The Leave campaign broke electoral law, made grossly inflated claims and mounted an unprecedented social media campaign using funds from a dubious source, now subject of a criminal investigation by the NCA. A 50 must now be revoked #bbcqt 
Cost of Brexit to UK economy running at £40bn a year – Bank rate-setter. That’s before we’ve even left, good grief.   
Get ready for the Biafra Referendum.It’s a deal not just with the zoo.Be happy, we are winning, big time. 
‘If you have another one it might be just as close, but the other way, then where are we? Back to square one’This audience member does not want another referendum on leaving the European Union #bbcqt 
“Our underfunded services are gonna suffer and when that happens it’s won’t be the Rees-Moggs and the Johnsons that’ll be hit, it’ll be us the working people of the UK. Any Brexit deal is gonna be worse than what we’ve got” So very true #bbcqt 
I see the ERG has launched its new line of Brexit posters  
"We had a referendum" yeah and Leave chose to criminal cheat on an industrial scale giving them a brief lead. #BBCQT 
If you haven’t seen @PeterGrantMP doing the most amazing mic  drop ever ... yer in for a treat ! #Brexit #GFA 
Britain's PM May could face another #Brexit defeat in parliament  
"MPs are trying to get a deal, but we are being held to ransom by an extreme wing of Tory Party.. PM has to stand up to them" #bbcqt #Brexit  
"We can see the party system breaking apart... the MPs are in turmoil but public opinion isn't changing. People still back Brexit."- Spectator editor Fraser Nelson@FraserNelson | @maitlis | #InsideThePapers 
Tonight’s business headlines:- Amazon cancels plans to build NY headquarters- Airbus CEO: "Painful" to stop making A380- UK PM Theresa May loses Brexit vote in Parliament- US stocks bounce back from early losses 
‘I think we should scrap the whole thing, it was a bad idea to start with’@jimmy_wales says he wants another referendum on leaving the European Union. #bbcqt 
@mrjamesob Unmissable Exchange With @Jacob_Rees_Mogg  Over #Brexit Vote - LBC @LBC  #bbcqtSee what happens when shysters are actually questioned by competent journalist 
Brexit is hurting UK businesses and ruining British lives... Do you care?#BBCqt 
Oh what a fucking surprise. When confronted with a woman recounting her own experience of Brexit destroying her business model, all Jacob Rees-Mogg can do is recite tired old slogans in response.What a miserable worm. He's got nothing. #bbcqt 
This has been obvious for years - long before the referendum. But it seems to be news in Conservative circles  
Embarrassing loss for Theresa May in symbolic vote on #Brexit plan  
I'm sick of 17.4m lie!Different people had different expectations.Majority 65% Leave voters expected to stay in SM & keep FoM.Only small minority racist 12% of electorate are supporting Mogg's, May and Corbyn Brexit at all cost destroying the UK, because they hate immigrants. pic.twitter.com/LdOeVygUnb 
The UK is a laughing stock eh?Just how much more of a laughing stock would Scotland be if it hung around on the deck of HMS Brexit and sank with it?#Fannies 
Killing Democracy, Softly "Forget whether you want Brexit to happen or not.  The key issue is that failure to tackle alleged criminality and cheating in the EU referendum leaves all FUTURE elections at risk." via @BylineTimes 
‘In parliament there is a disconnect between what people voted for and members of parliament’@Jacob_Rees_Mogg says he is willing to compromise on Brexit. #bbcqt 
Jacob Rees-Mogg is a big supporter of the #peoplesvote. He called for a second EU referendum back in 2011.#bbcqt 
#CakenotHate today at @SODEMAction. Well done to everyone who came, it was brilliant as always. Well done @snb19692 and the crew! #Brexit #PeoplesVote 
Newsnight talking about codes of conduct , yet not addressing the fraud cheating and lying involved in the referendum 
Our second question is about Brexit. #bbcqt 
The economics of today. #Brexit is a sunk cost. We shouldn't make the irrational choice to go ahead with it just because it has already cost us.  
Conservative MPs should be reminded tonight that two-thirds of their members support No Deal Brexit vs. rejected deal.  
Jeremy Corbyn will hold talks in Brussels next week with Michel Barnier, the EU’s chief negotiator, as he seeks to break the Brexit impasse and persuade Theresa May to sign up to a customs union  
I still do not understand why people are so sure that Theresa May is opposed to a no-deal. She is a compulsive & shameless liar, and her track record points to her being a xenophobic, authoritarian nationalist, just the kind of extremist who would want a no-deal.#Brexit #FBPE 
Why EU leaders are not ready to budge on #Brexit  
Oi, you odious toad, STFU. You’ve been told time & time again to keep your anti British/Brexit gob shut. You should be busy mopping up the blood split on the streets of London.  
"I'm not Theresa May's minister - I'm her majesty the Queen's minister. Just to set that right- I'm not here is a puppet of the prime minister."Brexit minister Kwasi Kwarteng responds to Emily Maitlis@maitlis | @KwasiKwarteng | #newsnight 
I’ve posted 100s of times about how damaging Brexit will be to NI jobs, businesses, farming, manufacturing & the incompatibility of a hard Brexit with the border with hardly any replies from ardent brexiteers but one mention of a concerned pet owner and they go nuts ! #GoFigure 
Brexit midfield or Black excellence midfield v Bayern? 
Excl: 50 Tory and 50 Labour MPs have already been 'paired' off against each other so they can go on holiday next week despite the Government officially cancelling recess due to Brexit:  
Friday’s FT: “May’s credibility takes fresh blow as MPs shoot down Brexit plan B” #bbcpapers #tomorrowspaperstoday (via @AllieHBNews) 
Let's see if @Anna_Soubry can get through her latest hysterical interview on #Newsnight without blaming @jeremycorbyn or @johnmcdonnellMP for the ineptitude of her own party leader and her shambolic handling of #Brexit. I won't hold my breath. 
Thank goodness! Now that Despicable May has no mandate from MPs for her disaster plan We Desperately need @JeremyCorbyn Statesman to sort this out.#DangerousHeroCorbyn to hold Brexit talks with Barnier and Verhofstadt  
A map of the post-#Brexit UK circa 2025.  
These are definitive times. People will look at how their elected representative represents them. Until #Brexit many people believe they lived in a representative democracy. But a shoogly peg beckons.....  
Just read the letter by football hero and social justice champion @GaryLineker to Germany where he apologises for Brexit. Thank you Gary, you're the best a man can get   
IPOB called for election boycott unless they give us a date for a referendum. Do you have any question why the boycott has been called off? 
The first "Scottish" british party parliamentarians to switch over to independence will be in a prime position to shape, if not lead, future parties.Those that refuse, & continue to pedal lies about Scotland & see us dragged into Brexit isolation/ruin will have no credibility. 
Jacob Rees-Mogg is totally opposed to gay marriage and abortion. His 'Victorian era' position is an affront to many - he shouldn't be near government, let alone able to dictate Brexit terms to Theresa May! #BeAfraid #bbcqt 
After tonight’s voting debacle, the EU has more-or-less given up on @theresa_may delivering any kind of Brexit deal. For them it is now a party-splitting customs-union based deal backed by Tory and Labour MPs or a no-deal Brexit. This is a big moment  
On #Brexit. It may be okay to take an irrational decision for yourself. But it's not okay to take an irrational decision on behalf of others. We owe our country better than that.  
The #ERG represent the #electorate who voted #Leave #Brexit #Lexit #EU and you should be sacked #deselected immediately. 
I’m speaking on Brexit tomorrow in Middlesbrough & Stockton-on-Tees; on Sunday in Wilmslow & Nantwich. All welcome! See separate tweets from me earlier today for details 
WATCH: another day, another shambles over #Brexit. The PM has no clue what she’s doing and is pouring our money down the drain while jobs are lost. It’s time we put this back to the people for #FinalSay @peoplesvote_uk 
'Utter shambles': Theresa May has now lost control of her own party on Brexit  
If you vote @ForBritainParty or @UKIP we Won't need to sign these petitions.   As we have weak appeasers in power, during this term,   Pls sign & RT #Brexit 
"FINE!  IF THATS WHAT ITS GOING TO TAKE TO GET BREXIT, I'LL GET MY COCK OUT ON TV.  SOMEONE CALL QUESTION TIME!" pic.twitter.com/xQAI9XDQxX 
Remember Grenfell? It’s one awful example of absolutely nothing getting done in this country at the hands of Brexit and the Tories  
Great vibe outside parliament today with protesters from Devon, Oxfordshire, Leeds, London, Liverpool all saying #STOPBREXIT , #loveeu #endthechaos, it’s a MESS! MPs stop playing games - let’s cancel Brexit & have a #peoplesvote 
Jeremy Corbyn suffers revolt as 41 Labour MPs back SNP call for 'immediate' delay to Brexit @AngusMacNeilSNP @IanBlackfordMP @DickWinchester @BerthanPete @ScotNational 
Brexit fc with the   
On March 19th, Our Revolution urges Georgia voters to vote YES on the MARTA Referendum for Gwinnett County.To learn more:  pic.twitter.com/gljROvRt2u 
sounds like a Brexit voter.  
Tory minister Richard Harrington launches scathing attack on Theresa May’s Brexit deal and Tory BrexiteersHe called members of the hard Tory Brexiteer European Research Group ‘treacherous’ and said they should join Nigel Farage’s new Brexit Party   
Those brexiters who thought the day after the referendum all the foreigners would have been rounded up and sent home  imagine any other modern society having that level of sad deluded victims - shaming to us all 
Today saw HMG defeated in a meaningless vote over its inability to act on a non-binding referendum to #Brexit. Which would seem like a bad panto for anoraks, except that the result of the paralysis is the  dissolution of 759 treaties and decades of shared lawmaking & cooperation. 
Ok, I admit it, I’m not in control of Brexit anymore and I’m a bit worried 
SMR Loves @ByDonkeys - the BEST new Pro-European / Anti Brexit initiative out there! Check out their Twitter Feed and follow the link to their Crowdfunder!#PeoplesVote to #Stopbrexit and #EndTheChaos 
Just in case it hasn't quite sunk in with some people yet - #Lexit IS #Brexit - the ONLY difference between the two are the letters at the beginning..... 
It's perfectly clear @LenMcCluskeyYou covet Brexit irrespective of the wishes and interests of your members or the inevitable consequences it has for jobs and living standards.You're a small minded, insular, past your sell by date, scheming and conniving Lexiter. That is all.  
Britain safer with no deal. Brexiteer Anne Marie Morris explains why no-deal Brexit is SAFER for Britain  
Guardian front page, Friday 15 February 2019: Another Brexit vote. For May, another humiliation  
ERG are the only MPs upholding the result of the referendum. The rest are conspiring in every possible way to thwart it without appearing to do so.It’s not the ERG that are the traitors. 
Have to say Ian Dunt has had a good Brexit. ‘If Parliament was a person it would be sectioned’. May's latest Brexit defeat: The edifice of nonsense comes tumbling down  
Sajid Javid might hope we're too distracted by Brexit to notice the sweeping police powers he's proposing.By @emilyapple 
Fresh blow to PM’s Brexit plan after huge defeat by Brexiteers 
BREXIT: Clive Lewis attacks Jeremy Corbyn over failure to oppose Tory Brexit /#EU #Brexit #Labour #PeoplesVote 
The Decline and Fall of the British Empire has reached the last chapter Rachel Johnson exposes breasts live on Sky News in aid of Brexit  
Communications Director of the Middle East Forum is so mad keen to help 'Tommy Robinson' deliver a hard Brexit she flies out personally to help organise the Brexit Betrayal demo. Ok.  
I refuse to make my mind up about brexit until I see Jacob Rees Mogg’s uncle get his cock out on The One Show 
Breaking: ERG & Brexit Party - A Match that could split the Tories? #CabinetOfChaos #TroubledTories 
#Brexit motion: How did my MP vote?  
“Brexit is now a first order constitutional crisis”. Hard to disagree with any of this.  But even the author admits he hasn’t a clue how to prevent this “slow motion car crash”  
Even a curry and a few beers with Michael Heseltine down the Kennington Tandoori can’t cheer me up tonight. The place was full of fake lovebirds pretending their lives are full of happiness when secretly they’re as depressed about Brexit as I am. Oh well, we go again. 
Tomorrow's front page: May suffers humiliating Brexit defeat as hard Brexiteers refuse to back her strategy + BBC Scotland is forced to apologise for misleading GDP report  
Brexit chaos has only ever been - is now - and will always be entirely the fault of the Conservative Party - who have sacrificed the people of the UK to try and save their Party - and failed.  
While MPs at Westminster continue to prevaricate & fight with themselves, tomorrow the Irish government hosts latest All-island civic dialogue on Brexit. It brings together political parties, business, unions, sectoral orgs to achieve consensus on Brexit. 
Morally speaking Brexiters should volunteer for redundancy and show some conviction - after all its only short term pain and they believe they'll get a much better job post brexit that pays much more #respect 
Arsenal are the first English team to lose away at BATE Borisov in European competition, Brexit Enugu Rangers. 
Nail on head by @spikedonline's Hume.Brexit isn't about the future of the Tories, but about that of democracy itself.And UK politics' big split is not between Tories pro & anti EU factions, but between the people & the ruling elite. 
Incredible that with the PM deliberately absent, the Brexit Secretary and then the Govt Chief Whip declined to respond to the vote when asked by the Speaker.An absent Govt., out of ideas, out of their depth, and out of time, facing and EU27 that’s out of patience. Stop this.  
Ask @Jacob_Rees_MoggIf he, his hedge fund predator cronies and family would profit from the deranged no-deal Brexit he and his millionaire ERG chums are pushing the UK towards. If they profit at all, then this would seem like TREASON.#bbcqt 
It has taken Brexit to confirm to the people of the UK that Parliament isn’t there to serve or deliver to the people. But rather to give arrogant, self-serving MPs A career & a roof over their head. As Cromwell said “Ye are grown intolerably odious to the whole nation.” 
A second leave/remain referendum really could go either way. It’s essentially flipping a coin between no deal and no Brexit.That’s not the safe or responsible policy it’s portrayed as.There is more grounded logic to a managed exit on Labours terms.  (IMO) 
My neighbour told me he took his dog to the vet today. The dog is now on anti-depressants as he's got a severe case of Brexit anxiety disorder.  Unbelievable isn't it. 
Labour's two-faced Brexit stance fuels the very uncertainty they claim they want to avert. They cannot be trusted by Leavers or Remainers.   
Someone with guts like @BenPBradshaw who is not letting the government& PM May getting away with the colluding in the referendum fraud.Why did she decline an investigation in Banks illegal funding sources?The biggest fraud in British democracy.@brexit_sham 
Labour MP asks a Tory: ‘How does this end?!’ – as Brexit chaos continues 
The UK parliament has been sending a very clear message for months now: it feels excluded from the Brexit process, and it is divided. The various EU deciders see this: they aren’t stupid; they have no incentive to try to pin this cloud down through renegotiation. 
It is not the handling of Brexit Mr Corbyn. It is Brexit, every Brexit.Let us #StopBrexit , end austerity, invest in the regions, protect our democracy against future campaign lies and fraud & remember the truth that membership of the EU is a good.#LoveEU #ThankEU 
I'M STOPPING FUCKING BREXIT RIGHT THE FUCK NOW*waves cock at some passing motorists* 
Labour is redTories are blueThey both want BrexitYou know what to doJoin @Plaid_Cymru  
Brexit latest news: Theresa May says no deal 'more likely' after Tory truce is shattered by Commons defeat' | via @telegraph 
I respect the sincerity of @CarolineFlintMP but this is rubbish. The government would never ask for an indefinite delay to Brexit, a majority of MPs would never approve it and the EU would not agree to it. Even I wouldn’t vote for it.  
'Corbyn to hold Brexit talks with Barnier and Verhofstadt'Everyone knows that @UKLabour offers the best #Brexit deal for Britain. It's about time that @theresa_may accepts she has failed and steps aside. Retweet if you agree #JC4PM2019 #GTTO 
I'm afraid @jeremycorbyn that I absolutely despise you & what you are doing to this country for a project, go now & let Labour elect a leader who can win a GE, Brexit will break Britain's poorest & you are a Tory enabler.  
Dear Everyone.Here is the latest on Brexit: we have lost it.Love, the UK.  
Another amazing experience today down in Westminster. Fortunate enough to be on the Main Camera for BBC’s Afternoon Live presented by @BBCSimonMcCoy. Thank you to @AndySmithTV for mentoring me and also for taking these cool photos. #CollegeGreen#Politics#Brexit#AlwaysLearning  
My passport is redSoon to be blueIf you want BrexitA sincere ‘fuck you’ 
It seems to me every decision the people make...on Brexit.. immigration..returning ISIS supporters..allowing  Somali gangs here...our Government seem to do the opposite of what is voted for........ 
I hate to disappoint, some of them have been knocking around since before 2010 coalition talks, tragically no secret Brexit messaging to decode,fuschia or no fuschia  
Massive Brexit development. Everyone knows Labour’s practical Brexit plan is the only way out of the Tory mess. Game on! 
Corbyn to hold Brexit talks with Barnier and Verhofstadt.Corbyn is the grown up in the room & future PM. Very soon.   
.@RosaMariaPaya updated me today on the Cuban regime’s efforts to dress up the Feb. 24 constitutional referendum as democratic. Real political reform would reflect the will of the people, not tighten the grip of #Cuba’s Communist Party. 
Constructive beginnings with Fianna Fáil on Brexit!I was delighted to be at first meeting between @SDLPlive & @fiannafailparty Reps yesterday with a strong focus on Brexit & breaking the political paralysis & stalemate failing people in the North.#AllIrelandPartnership  
7/7 In U.K. May will soon face stark choice: No Deal catastrophe that brings down her administration, calling an election or a #FinalSay referendum - all are routes to the end of Tory austerity 
#BankofEngland analysis: #Brexit is costing UK economy £40bn/year. Heartbreaking that the UK’s wellbeing is being destroyed by the extremism & divisiveness of this despicable #Tory government. 
Soubry voted against this amendment. None of the loudest anti-Brexit voices are anything other than self interested.  
The Labour MPs who voted for the SNP's Brexit amendment, including three of their seven Scottish ones (92%):  
Jacob Rees-Mogg's financial investment firm has set up multiple funds in Ireland,the EU zone. The hypocrite is driving to push the UK off a NoDeal cliff while ensuring he's insulated from the effects of the hardest Brexit. Do not trust this disaster capitalist! #StopBrexit #bbcqt 
Brexit is the only deal in the world where the buyer has:-paid a huge amount of cash today-to increase his probability of losing a huge amount of cash tomorrow It is literally insane. 
The people voted for Brexit. You’re right that there’s no parliamentary majority for any deal, so it has to be No Deal on March 29th.  
So far as I can work out, after almost three years of incompetence and duplicity, #Brexit has ended up as simply a game of political chicken. So shaming. 
So, if you get your tits out for Brexit you're making a political point, but when you get them out for Greater Serbia, it's a crime? Interesting! 
Ok I give in - just fucking do the Brexit - but please make this stop. 
A Labour Party worth electing would be saying that there is no form of Brexit that is in the national interest. Instead it’s just a midwife to Brexit... but one of those midwives that can’t understand a CTG and ignores the 2L ante-partum haemorrhage.  
“Declare a national emergency to build a Wall” is a bold move on the US’ part, but is it enough to stay at the top of the Punch Yourself In The Face charts when no-deal Brexit kicks in next month? Let’s find out!! 
Corbyn to hold Brexit talks with Barnier and Verhofstadt.. 
Those Labour MPs thinking of voting for a Tory Brexit must be out of their minds.The Blindfold Brexit May brought back would be defined by ERG and DUP votes. You'll scream and whimper from the opposition benches for years whilst poverty and austerity rules supreme.Wake up. 
Tits out for Brexit is 2019’s dicks out for harambe, I want 2,000 words on my desk by Monday  
Sorry to break to you, but No Deal Brexit has already been voted for and is enshrined in law. 
Embarrassing loss for Theresa May in symbolic vote on Brexit plan  
WATCH: Former Labour Transport Minister @spellar calls on #FailingGrayling to “Scrap ever more expensive, budget busting #HS2”, with support from former Tory #Brexit Secretary @DavidDavisMP. @CherylGillan reveals @HS2ltd spent £5m pounds on just 89 agency staff in 6 months. 
It's 965 days since the Referendum.With 43 days to go the deal that exists has been overwhelmingly rejected by Parliament and is deeply unpopular in the country.If this had anything whatsoever to do with taking back control, the people would have another say.#PeoplesVote 
United Kingdom: We have so much work to do. Brexit is just 47 days away.Westminster:   
Wouldn't it be fantastic if the Tory and Labour parties threw off the 80-ish most extreme MPs on each side, and merged into a Party of National Unity with a giant super-majority? It could then cancel Brexit, HS2 & Trident, and throw £100s of billions at hypercharging the economy. 
Hundreds march through #Leeds in anti-Brexit protest - as Theresa May suffers another defeat in parliament - Yorkshire Evening Post#LetsStayTogether 
Anyone that thinks we will not have food after Brexit is a f**king moron. Do the future generations a favour and do not breed. #Brexit 
What watching #Brexit on a daily basis does to you.  
Outside parliament  #stopbrexit #brexit  
The engineering company I work for is planning to close it’s last factory in UK and moving production to France unite are leading the employees opposition against closure. Mccluskey and in contact with gov but refuses to mention brexitPrevious one closed moved to Germany 2018 
My heartfelt thanks to all the schoolchildren on the #Youth4Climate #Youth4Nature strike tomorrow. Otherwise #Brexit could take on a whole new meaning:#Brextinction! 
Imagine if @ChukaUmunna had actually become Labour leader. We'd be on our 35th Brexit postion and people really would be able to genuinely say. in whiny voices, 'so what's Labour's latest Brexit position' but it'd be true  #ChickenChuka 
This #ValentinesDay please love & protect our furry friends who are at risk as we leave the EU & prevent them becoming victims of #Brexit - ask your MP to support the #BetterDealForAnimals @HouseofCommons reception on 26 Feb here:  
I didn't see this response coming, but she's done the country a service by publicly confirming that we currently have what Lord Hailsham called "An Elective Dictatorship"!Theresa May vows to ignore Parliament defeat and pursue her rejected Brexit plan  
Two weeks ago the PM was boasting she’d reunited the Tories and pundits were writing off #PeoplesVote. How the tables have turned.Tonight’s defeat of the govt’s nonsensical #Brexit policy isn't legally binding. But momentum has shifted away from the PM 
Rachel Johnson exposes breasts live on Sky News in aid of #Brexit  
Government announces next Brexit defeats will take place tomorrow at 1, 3 and 5pm and then again first thing Monday morning. 
In Belfast City Hall tonight making the case against a damaging Brexit. Tomorrow we’re taking our message to the Irish PM in Dublin. As children of the peace process, we’ll continue to stand up for our futures. Thanks @DonalLyons for listening to us. 
Richard Harrington, the Business Minister, tells ERG members to quit, and join Nigel Farage's new party. Shows just how fractious the Tory Brexit divisions are getting. Mind you, it's a good point. High time to lance that boil, and damn the consequences!  
Not only did Theresa May not turn up to the latest Brexit vote in UK parliament, but her Brexit secretary and her government's chief whip refused to respond after losing the vote.  
Thank God for the #ERG and the #DUP.They are the ones who are voting to deliver the #Brexit  the 17.4m voted for.  
Alan Partridge star Steve Coogan has said Brexit is responsible for the hapless presenter’s return to the BBC.  
EXCLUSIVE: Senior Labour MPs Accuse Met Police of  'Cover-Up' and 'Unacceptable Delays' in Investigating Brexit Crimes  via @BylineTimes 
 UK Government suffered another humiliating defeat, Tories are ripping themselves apart, while Labour shamefully abstained on SNP amendment to extend Article 50. Here's the latest on the developing Brexit farce. 
For #Valentines Day, I mapped the 2000 referendum in Alabama to remove the state's unenforceable ban on interracial marriage. The proposal easily passed in suburbs, cities & the black belt, but failed in many white, rural counties. Polls showed 30%+ supported the ban #alpolitics 
Lads, BREAKING BREXIT NEWS, stay tuned. HUGE announcement at 9 pm. 
Backing a Tory Brexit could wipe out Labour, warns Clive Lewis  
I've tweeted this previously and make no apologies for doing so today, or tomorrow, the day after that and every day  from then on until the result of the referendum is respected. A reminder that #17.4millionbetrayedPlease retweet if you feel the same, thank you  
BREAKING: Tory Business Minister suggests pro-Brexit ERG MPs join @Nigel_Farage’s Brexit Party.  
Do you remember a time when the U.K. Prime Minister pushed for an EU military force? I came across this 1999 paper by @RGWhitman in the @EU_ISS archives today! It makes for interesting reading. My, my, what different times...  #brexit #EUdefence 
Chris Leslie is talking a lot of sense.  This is the reason I’ve joined the Liberals as they are opposing Brexit and talking about a second vote on Brexit.   
For 3 years, UK politics has obsessively focused on Brexit. The impact can be seen in the ignorance of many commentators about the state of the NHS.A&E performance is now at its worst since records began. That’s a fact, not a partisan point.  
Inflation down below 2%despite brexit,wages rising above 3% despite brexit,exports are soaring despite Brexit,state spending deficit falling despite brexit,unemployment falling despite brexit,employment at record levels despite brexit,FDI highest in Europe despite brexit, 
Labour’s Caroline Flint says Yvette Cooper-led  MPs' attempt to block no deal is a 'Trojan horse' to stop Brexit, on this week’s Commons People podcast (link in story)  
BREXIT: History will not forgive May’s reckless push to the no-deal precipice | Polly Toynbee /#EU #Brexit #FinalSay 
New: @CarolineFlintMP tells @HuffPostUK that "Cooper2" would be "even worse" than CooperBoles cos it would allow indefinite Brexit delay. Also calls it a "trojan horse" for Remainers. Warns Lab MPs breakaway party wd only help Tories.  
Yet another defeat! PM has no majority for anything, having lost all credibility. This is actual incompetence! time we in the Labour Party stay focussed on getting rid of this disastrous Tory govt & their continued ideological attack on poor; our communities are hurting #Brexit 
I am so utterly fed up with MP's of one hue or another telling us why they shouldn't honour the Brexit vote. IT'S NOT YOUR BLOODY CHOICE! What part of this is a still a democracy don't you get? #ActOnYourInstruction #DoYourDuty 
Roses are redLilies are whiteFuck off with BrexitYou shower of shite 
Dave Brown on Theresa May's latest Brexit vote defeat #TheresaMay #cartoon #Brexit #BrexitVote - political cartoon gallery in London  
EXCL Business minister calls on Tory hard Brexit group to quit the party and defect to Nigel Farage’s new outfit, and adds: “In my view, they are not Conservatives.” @PolhomeEditor’s full interview here 
In an interview with @theHouse_mag, business minister Richard Harrington:* Says Tory eurosceptic MPs are 'traitors' who should quit and join Nigel Farage's new party.* Says the Malthouse Compromise is 'fanciful nonsense'* Slams PM's Brexit strategy 
Hell of an interview with Richard Harrington in House magazine tonight:Harrington, a Remain minister, accuses ERG of 'treachery' & says they should join Nigel Farage's Brexit party'They’re not Conservatives... if I were them I would be looking at Nigel Farage’s party' 
Theresa May has been soundly defeated yet again over Brexit so here comes Chuka Umunna to the rescue with a handy distraction! If rumours are true he's finally found enough spine to resign the Labour whip. We knew this was coming, govt on the ropes, the #SplittersCoup commences. 
Yet again, Theresa May's Brexit deal has been defeated.  
It is indeed incredible that we have “come to this”. In Scotland, we didn’t vote for Brexit, we have been ignored and undermined at every step. How on Earth did we “come to this”?  
May loses symbolic Brexit vote in parliament  
*whispers* The 2nd referendum we actually need isn't Brexit or IndyRef2, but a referendum to let England leave the UK and thereby simultaneously exit the EU, while Scotland & NI just stay as the rUK in the EU--with Wales staying with us or leaving like England as they so desire.  
Theresa May and the Tories suffer another massive Brexit defeat in the Commons and the focus is on... the Labour Party. Getting beyond a joke now. If the Tories and their friends in most of the mainstream media want Labour to be in power so bad they should order an election! 
From today's @FT #Brexit #Ford #CarProduction 
Theresa May loses another battle – but she may be zigzagging towards winning the Brexit war. Me for ⁦@Independent⁩ 
Enjoying Valentine's day and brexit  
Bernard Jenkin, an arch #Brexiteer , has just described this as a “non week” in #Brexit terms thus further confusing and dispiriting the vast majority watching @Channel4News as it isn’t a “non week” for businesses & individuals paying the price of  irresponsible #Brexit chaos 
I just joined the Liberal Democrats as I feel I need to do something to fight against Brexit & this arrogant & destructive government - join me here:  via @LibDems.  If all of us opposed to Brexit join, we can change politics in this country for the better 
An extension of Article 50 would be granted for a maximum of three months. There would be no further negotiation but the EU would use the time to activate their no deal plans. If the UK wants a deal then its the deal on the table. Anything else is just noise and pretense.#Brexit 
The ERG are the only politicians who #StandUp4Brexit, & adhere to what 17.4million people voted for. If ERG were charged with delivering #Brexit the #UK would #TakeBackControl & be in the smooth transition stages of #WTO #FTA's & simultaneously finalising a EU-UK #CanadaStyle FTA 
It appears that @terrychristian comes across as the type of creature we would get if we were to breed James O'Brien, that guy who shouts "stop Brexit" outside of parliament & a random alcoholic together. 
Forget Brexit. If you want humiliation in Europe, Arsenal will do the job #BateArsenal 
The Prime Minister cannot command a Parliamentary majority and that is clear to the #EU27 for whom there is now zero incentive to change  position as she is unable to deliver any acceptable #Brexit alternative. Surely way beyond time for her to go  and #Brexit to be halted. 
A friend said to me yesterday that her current feelings about Brexit were now just a “mixture of anxiety and boredom”, which we need a word for. 
@RobertCPalmer13  Can I suggest that you distribute Dr Palmer's two recent articles on the illegality of Mrs Mays "brexit" procedures to EVERY MP , Mr Starmer , so that they are ALL now properly and fully informed ? 
To those in any doubt where DUP stands. Tonight they voted to essentially kill a true Brexit. Tonight they voted in favour of vassalage for the UK. They aren’t true Brexiteers. Thankfully they lost. 350,000 leave voters in NI should take note in future.#WTOBrexitNOW 
"As the Brexit deadline looms ever larger, Parliament is still gridlocked - and there's no sign of anything changing soon." @joswinson 
ERG strategic nous strikes again Changes from EU now harder to get, so Cooper-Boles 2.0 more likely to win to protect against 29/3 No Deal + Brexit ends up delayed/softer than they claim to wantStarting to be convinced this is a bizarre exercise in self-sabotage  
Funny how Ministers are now so quick to dismiss a non-binding motion, but a non-binding referendum is apparently sacrosanct. #C4News 
-Do you know if any ex-members of the #Catalan gov expressed opposition to a referendum deemed unconstitutional?-I doubt it, they all went to vote that day.Laughs.Prosecutor: The law forbides... laughing... anyone laughing again will be removed from the court.#ShowTrials 
Has @Anna_Soubry given any interviews in the last 2yrs in which she hasn't blamed Labour's front bench for her own party's ineptitude over #Brexit? She hates Corbyn/McDonnell because they represent a real threat to the rigged economy. She loves Umunna because he doesn't. #c4news 
The bizarre spectacle of people witnessing Scotland having ZERO say on Brexit in the UK union and yet still thinking that is better than the power and support Ireland gets as an Indy country in the EU is, frankly, gobsmacking.  
Watching Anna Soubry on Channel 4. Party rivalries aside,she is speaking total sense. A contrast to the obfuscation from John McDonnell before her. I hope there are enough collegiate anti Brexit MPs in all parties that can work together to avoid a hard Brexit and vote accordingly 
Roses are red, violets are blue, I don’t really have a job, and soon you won’t too.  #brexit 
NEW: 66 Tories abstained as MPs defeated the Government on its Brexit strategy motion. Here's how they all voted - and also which MPs backed an Article 50 extension  
people are suggesting theresa may is resigning at 8pm, time to do the usual:1. prepare strong mandate meme pic2. watch her come out half an hour late and say "brexit means brexit"3. drink an entire gallon of absinthe 
Steve Bell on Theresa May's latest Brexit vote defeat – cartoon  
If there is even a 0.1% chance Brexit could prevent diabetic children getting the drugs they need, how could anyone think leaving the EU is a good idea? And they wonder why we say Brexit is a cult - there seems to be nothing they wouldn't sacrifice at its altar. 
Watching Brexit tragedy unfolding on Channel 4 News. Rory Stewart MP (not the worst) :  ‘We have to get the EU 27 over the line’. Is there even a thin thread still connecting British Government policy with reality? Dominic Grieve, as always, a man on intelligence + principle 
GATT was subsumed 100% into WTO in 1997. The clause that will most impact BREXIT is WTO Article XXIV, an old GATT regulation. 10 year "implementation period" using WTO with EXISTING (i.e. ZERO) tariffs until we replace it with a new FTA. If anybody believes that any of the   1/2 
I know it's going super well now, but what if the whole Brexit process ends up being a little bit of a mess? 
The ERG want to do two things:A) Honour the referendum result and uphold democracyB) Honour the manifesto commitments upon which they were electedHowever the media and remain MPs paint them as "hard right" lunaticsIt's a disgrace 
PM’s Brexit strategy defeatedIt is still not clear how, or whether, we are leaving the EUThe fight is on, and giving people the  final say on Brexit is the way out of the deadlock UK  EU still in play  
Come off it Tim.  The ERG are trying to deliver the Brexit which 17.4 million people voted for. They are doing it in the face of vicious vilification & abuse from the Remain establishment. That makes them not wreckers but HEROES.  
Corbyn's Remainers threaten walkout unless he vows to reverse Brexit - The Sun  
Where is the evidence that onchain governance is a good idea, aside from the idea that it "feels right"? In real world, voting has strong sybil defense, fraud is punished externally, & exiting system is v costly. Even then, there is no actual govt functioning by referendum. 
Could Brexit mean a road less travelled for Irish horses to England and France? Eamon Horan reports from Gordon Elliott's yard in Co Meath. #rteracing @GoRacing 
We have a bunch of jumped up political popinjays treating Brexit as some sort of parlour game. This is not a game. Nor is it in the national interest. Millions of people will suffer the consequences of this political game-playing mess. It’s an absolute disgrace. 
"BBC News:  PM defeated over Brexit strategy"Strategy? I didn't realise that hubris, bluster and dragging the flyblown cadaver of a British bulldog around the streets of Brussels was a strategy. 
I despise the whole bloody notion of Brexit, but I could just about live with it if it were being done carefully, and crucially, with at least an attempt to understand and accommodate Remainers. But no. It's a total  shambles, with venal idiots scrapping like weasels in a sack. 
'Labour is red, Tories are blue': MPs read Brexit poems on Valentine's Day  
This is extraordinary. Oliver--an old and good friend--is prepared to mount a kind of constitutional coup to prevent a No Deal Brexit for which he and 500+ MPs voted a year ago. It doesn't sound either conservative or prudent to me (though others will doubtless see it as both.)  
Good: Theresa May says no deal Brexit more likely after Tory rebellion leads to another Commons defeat  via @Telegraph 
Winston Churchill, like all historical figures, was complex blah blah blah. Okay: here's the thing: whatever you say about Churchill, it is undeniable that the cult of Churchill is in fact harmful. Its one of causes of this Brexit mess. 
Speaking from London, Sinn Féin MP @ElishaMcC_SF said it has been another day of mayhem and chaos in Westminster. Our message is clear – Irish interests and the backstop must be protected. #Brexit  
Jezza, why do you support electoral fraud? Not once have you mentioned the fraud used to win the referendum. 
Pound breaks new ground lower after latest #Brexit vote fails. House of Commons votes to reject May’s approach to renegotiate Brexit by 303 to 258. Wide margin (302-258) leaves doubt even amended plan could pass.  
Labour abstain. The most ineffective opposition in a lifetime against the most incompetent UK government in a life time. The Tories want Brexit. Labour don’t want to stop Brexit. The SNP want the people of Scotland to have their own choice on their own future EU relationship  
Theresa May has said a No Deal Brexit is now more likely after her motion to take No Deal off the table was defeated. The 60-strong ERG took a "collective decision" to abstain from voting on it.WTO, here we come! via @Telegraph 
The ERG are the only ones staying true to what the people voted for in the referendum. So stop peddling lies. 
Didn't read the memo? Dutch brandish big blue Brexit monster  
Parliament has once again rejected Mrs May, Mr Corbyn and others plans for Brexit.The UK is still on course for an unencumbered exit on March 29, 2019 - real Brexit, a UKIP Brexit. 
These bastards don’t deserve Brexit frankly. 
Full write-up of May's latest Brexit defeat: The whole edifice of nonsense is collapsing in on itself  
Tonight’s vote showed there is no majority for the Prime Minister's Brexit plan.She needs to admit her strategy has failed, shift her red lines and come back with a proposal that can truly command support in Parliament. 
Dominic Grieve makes powerful case for a #PeoplesVote.Threatening to leave without a deal is "frankly the behaviour of a 3-year-old who says they're going to hold their breath unless they're given the toy they want."#RevokeArticle50 #StopBrexit #Brexit 
The word is that at 8pm @ChukaUmunna and potentially others will be resigning the Labour Whip. Of course timed to attempt to create maximum damage at time when Party unity is of the utmost importance #Brexit.#SplittersCoup 
Theresa May loses another parliamentary vote on her Brexit deal and doesn’t even have the guts to turn up for the result and face the music. She’s a coward. When facing adversity, you show up. Always. 
Three rumours circulating: 14 resignations from Labour Shadow Cabinet in response to Jeremy Corbyn’s Brexit stanceA number of Blairites will quit Labour and will form a new centrist party led by Chuka UmunnaAnother leadership coup over anti-Semitism 
With the Tories in disarray, the anti-#Brexit left of #Labour should be preparing for all possibilities - including a General Election.Join @paulmasonnews, @NadiaWhittome, @mikegalsworthy & more on 25 Feb to discuss & plan  
The Churchill row is part of the glib approach to history that gave us Brexit | Simon Jenkins  
The Guardian view on parliament and Brexit: Theresa May’s approach has failed | Editorial  
Protesters about to set off from City Square on their march in #Leeds earlier this evening @LeedsEurope #stopbrexit #brexit @stopbrexitmarch 
The ONLY way out of this mess is Corbyn's deal. May's deal has crashed. Again. There is no appetite for a 2nd referendum.Corbyn's deal is supported by the EU. It will allow effective trade, protect the economy & protect jobs.#JC4PM2019 
I've come to think of Brexit as just a permanent feature of British culture, like Big Ben or high tea. 
Hearing rumours this eve that Chuka Umunna may resign the Labour Party Whip in a matter of hours. A man who said he opppsed a 2nd Referendum & opposed Freedom of Movement, now says he is quitting because he wants a 2nd Referendum. For him it has only ever been about hating JC. 
The Tory Government just suffered a massive Brexit Defeat. We know what happens next don’t we? Blairite MPs will now figure out a way to attack Jeremy Corbyn. Like they always do immediately after a Tory defeat. 
Labour are red,Tories are BlueBut thanks to BrexitI can’t see the difference between the two 
Are you suggesting #Remain campaigns have lied!?! Scandalous..! Haven’t you seen the recession and mass unemployment we are all suffering since from the Brexit vote?!?  
I actually watched this right up until he said "alternative brexit"... at which point I'm thinking "fucking stop with this shit will you!" #FBPE #PeoplesVote 
Red Len: Second Referendum Threatens "Democratic Fabric" of the UK  
British Prime Minister Theresa May was dealt another humiliating defeat as lawmakers voted against the latest incarnation of her Brexit plan  
Tories are in trouble right now, but Labour has its own Brexit tensions too. More from @HuffPostUK from 8pm. Watch this space. 
So Khan wants to revoke article 50 and have another referendum.What happens when leave wins again, do we spend another 3 years watching politicians try to stop Brexit with more project fear.Just leave on the 29th of March, we can't agree a deal so no deal it is  
A senior EU source has told Sky News "there goes the strong mandate" in response to Prime Minister Theresa May's Commons defeat after MPs voted down her latest Brexit plans by 303 to 258 
The national interest dictates that we put party politics aside, and that sensible, decent Ministers like Tobias Ellwood resign and give us their votes to extend Article 50 and stop Britain falling off a cliff in a No Deal Brexit.  
Brexit's already cost us 1.5 HS2s in lost growth. Why don't we cancel THAT white elephant? 
As the UK government goes through another Brexit meltdown it's a good time to support @progressscot and boost the case for Scottish independence. If you've still to subscribe pls visit the website belowPls, subscribe, follow, share/RT #progressscotland 
And she does not think she is playing a key role in that comedy. Stands on a manifesto supporting referendum, says result must be honoured then does everything she can to reverse it! #Brexit @Anna_Soubry 
I’m speaking on Brexit in Nantwich on Sunday at 4pm - Crewe Vagrants Sports Club, CW5 7EP. All welcome and free to attend!  
Over to the @metpoliceuk and the @NCA_UK for an update on their investigation into the already proven corruption and criminality committed by the Leave campaigns and all the MPs involved who delivered the unsafe 2016 referendum result....  
I see May is asking MPs to vote again and again on her deal. By her logic this is trampling on the democratic will of MPs expressed in January 2019. Remind me why May is permitted to call endless votes, whilst the referendum of 2016 (lost by a far smaller margin) is sacrosanct? 
Corbyn will not lift a finger to expose #BrexitGate crime because he wants Brexit no matter how big a mountain of right-wing lies, hate and crime he has to stand on. 
Your routine reminder that David Cameron called the referendum to settle the question of Europe... 
Listening to Nigel Farage’s Brexit hot take on his radio show, because I don’t want to ask my driver (who seems to like it) to turn it off,  feels like a special place in hell. 
I want to say #ThankEU for enduring the painful & frustrating process of Brexit. But there are many of us who have campaigned & protested for over 2 years to be able to remain in the EU. Here is a tribute to all my fellow campaigners, thank you all.  
Maybe, just maybe, the penny will now drop with Prime Minister and her Chief Whip that the hardliners in the ERG want a no-deal Brexit and will stop at nothing to get it. Responsible MPs of all parties must come together on 27th and 28th Feb and stop them. 
BREAKING Theresa May vows to ignore Parliament defeat and pursue her rejected Brexit plan 
Let’s face the obvious - Britain is broken and Westminster isn’t fit for purpose #wakeupcall #Brexit  
Here is Downing Street’s reaction to latest Brexit defeat for ⁦@theresa_may. Apparently “some Conser⁩vative colleagues” were concerned about “taking no deal off the table AT THIS STAGE” (my caps). I’m not sure the “at this stage” qualification reassures those colleagues! pic.twitter.com/i6QSKSOgpT 
#TheresaMay heading even further into a dead-endEven bland motion (“keep on trying“) can’t get throughEU27 won’t re-open deal for a PM who can’t even make a specific proposal to them &has no majority for anything#Brexit just isn’t working outThere’s no #brexit that works 
Where's Theresa? The House of Commons votes against supporting it vote against a 'no deal' Brexit, and Theresa May goes into hiding. This is getting bizzare. The PM and MPs need to stop these silly votes and submit to the will of the people - a clean-break WTO Brexit! 
Theresa May's defeat confirms what we already know: you can't win a majority with Conservative and DUP votes for a Brexit that can actually be negotiated with the EU:  
Utter shambles on #Brexit from both Govt & Leader of the Opposition.  Time for PM to change tack, suspend A50 & put her Deal to the people with an option to remain & for Corbyn to come off the fence and support a #PeoplesVote 
After losing another Brexit vote and with no plan in place, the PM and the Government are risking the chance of a no-deal Brexit which would have devastating effects on London. It’s time she agreed to withdraw Article 50 and gave the public the final say. 
So where do things stand on Brexit? Theresa May has...- no plan A- no plan B- no mandate for her current approach- no help from the EU- a massively divided party, including ERG open warfare- 4 out of 40 trade deals rolled over- 43 days til Brexit- suspicious jam habits 
The #BrexitGate cover-up breaks into the news again. This is much worse than Watergate - a huge , destructive and irreversible change being driven through by a government that is clearly covering up electoral crime. #Brexit  
Tories and Labour are two fighting dinosaurs in their death throes, happy to bring us all down with them#Brexitinction #Brexit Everdecreasing #circlesofhell 
Jeremy Corbyn suffers revolt as 41 Labour MPs back SNP call for 'immediate' delay to Brexit  
Government defeat shows again that May's Brexit deal is doomed. It gives no clarity about our future relationship with the EU and no closure on Brexit: just years & years more wrangling. The way out is a #PeoplesVote with the chance to keep the good deal we have: EU membership. 
On the subject of a Citizens assembly, this was how the Irish state navigated it’s way to the outcome of the recent #repealthe8th referendum. It was citizen led, with recommendations made to govt. An idea we should consider to discuss our joint future?  
May aiming to whittle down ERG to small hard core with changes to Brexit package shifting Cox's advice on backstop. Changes will include strengthened pol decl, alongside other lures, to woo enough Labour MPs to offset the hardcore. That's what Barclay told EU this week 
Dear FBPEers,You see. You've spent your whole time insulting Corbyn/left Labour supporters - exactly people most likely to support Remain or be won over to Remain cause - when it's your precious 'centrist' MPs most likely to vote with Tories to push through Brexit.Regards,Tom  
Our future is at stake – my union @GMB_union say it should be the public who have the final say on Brexit.RETWEET if you agree.  
"What an absolute fiasco this is" - Tory MP @Anna_Soubry says UK politics is "becoming the laughing stock of the world" Follow #Brexit latest:  
Are you referring to the only group of Tories who actually respect the result of the referendum and their own party manifesto in the last election? 
How a Brexit defeat for Theresa May used to feel vs How it feels now  
Parliament, rightly, has just defeated the Government because of their woeful approach to #Brexit and threatening MPs with No Deal. Threw down the gauntlet in the debate to all MPs who back #PeoplesVote. On the 27th Feb when we have a meaningful vote we must seize the moment. 
Russia's hopes for Brexit dashed; thots n prerrs  
HBO just did a movie called Brexit. Its well done. It illustrates how info is obtained online these days... Dilley knows how it works & discusses..Tune in   
The House of Commons has voted against @theresa_may and government’s approach to Brexit.This is huge, even though lapdog media will play it down. 
In Cork -Talked to three shop keepers so far - all were polite then I said “good 2 be away from Brexit madness”, ALL bar none empathised - uk is not ok - it’s ill 
Remain MPs are trying to use Parliamentary process, like the Cooper amendment, to delay, frustrate and even block Brexit.  
They're not hardliners. Just a group of MPs who actually respect the referendum and who understood the implications of triggering A50 which means we leave next month with or without a deal. This pantomime cannot continue any longer. 
It really does take some believing ! Honestly it really does. @theresa_may has AGAIN suffered a most embarrassing humiliating mind boggling own goal Brexit defeat. @conservatives are a shabby shocking shambles. Move over for @UKLabour & @jeremycorbyn @GE2019#wheresTheresa 
As the UK government loses yet another #Brexit vote we're reminded that 'omnishambles' wasn't actually an option on the ballot paper in 2016. It's time for both the Conservatives and Labour to agree to give the public a say with a #PeoplesVote 
I watch every one of these Brexit votes -even those with inevitable outcomes- with goosebumps up my arms.With so much at stake, these are chances for MPs to show businesses in their constituencies that political leadership is still alive.These chances are squandered every time. 
This is the moment Theresa May suffered a fresh defeat in the House of Commons as MPs voted against her latest Brexit strategy.  
A Brexit defeat for @theresa_may that changes nothing for her. And that is why it is such a disaster for her ability to get a Brexit deal   
This is a referendum on Governor Cuomo and Mayor de Blasio and backroom deals with no public input. We are watching. #noAmazonNYC #AmazonHQ2 
Amazing that Theresa May keeps getting annihilated in Parliament on her Brexit ‘strategy’ but just carries on as if nothing’s happened. Amazing.. and absolutely absurd.  
Makes her doubtful for Brexit away  
As Theresa May suffers another Brexit defeat, @Nigel_Farage asks: “Is the PM still fit to lead the country?” 
The PM has lost yet another vote on the biggest issue facing her Government. She has lost all credibility as a negotiator. She is simply unable to deliver her Brexit deal.The PM must now face reality and back Labour’s sensible deal on Europe that can reunite the country. 
So after tonight’s Brexit vote we’ve learnt that:- May’s Brexit deal does not command the support of the Westminster parliament- Labour don’t want to delay Brexit- Scotland’s voice is still being ignored 
The House of Commons has, in effect, just expressed its lack of confidence in the Prime Minister’s Brexit strategy. She has no majority, no plan, no deal and no alternative but to seek an extension to Article 50.  
Does it never occur to you Nick that there are over 17.4 million of those you describe as extreme Brexiteers? There's no such thing as an extreme Brexit or Brexiteer. Extreme Brexit is a duplicitous term made up by Europhiles to describe the act of merely #Leaving the EU! 
This is a massacre for the government and a damning indictment of the Prime Minister’s Brexit plan. In order to get a decisive verdict either for or against her deal she should put it to a public vote versus the option of remaining in the EU.  
The Prime Minister’s Brexit strategy has once again been defeated. She can no longer claim to have a ‘substantial and sustainable majority’ in Parliament.  We can’t go on like this. Parliament must decide what happens next.  
Brexit vote: Theresa May suffers embarrassing defeat as Tories rebel over no-deal anger  
Mrs May’s defeat by 45 means there is now almost certainly a majority to rule out ‘no deal’ and extend Art 50 - via the new Cooper-Letwin Bill - in a fortnight. This will destroy her ‘my deal or no deal’ pretense & open the way to a second referendum. Remainers, we are back! 
The Brexit news now sounds like commentary on American Football: '303-258 reverse on the amendment facing a 2nd upland return 3-amendment sitting in the 3rd looking at 290-288, how do you see this one Jed?' 
British Prime Minister Theresa May suffers embarrassing defeat on Brexit as lawmakers reject a motion reiterating support for her approach. Lawmakers had expressed support just two weeks ago.  
What on earth is wrong with this parliament. They are now talking about the only way to get around the brexit arguments is for a peoples vote? How long is this desperate crap going to be spoken. The way to solve the problem is honour the referendum. 
Another massive defeat for the Government tonight. They have no mandate for this reckless Brexit Deal - and no means of securing a majority for it. Parliament must now ask the people to accept or reject this Brexit catastrophe. 
Brexit, Theresa May, and theMeaningful Vote: An academic analysis  
T May’s reward for wooing her Brexit hardliners yet again in recent days... another defeat. 
This is the leader of the UK's biggest trade union, and the Labour Party's paymaster, warning that trying to “deflect away” from the result of the 2016 referendum “would threaten the whole democratic fabric on which we operate.” – he's right.  
"Vote shows there is no majority for the prime minister's course of action"Government "cannot keep ignoring Parliament... without a coherent plan" - Labour leader Jeremy Corbyn responds as UK PM Theresa May suffers fresh #Brexit defeat  
A reminder of what @theresa_may told the House of Commons on 29 Jan. She neither has a ‘substantial and sustainable majority’ for her Brexit plan or a ‘mandate’.  
There is no majority for anything in the Commons. Brexit can only be resolved by a #PeoplesVote 
Thanks Jenny Chapman. Not quite there yet but still... Thank you.There is no Brexit deal that the country can support. A Public vote is the ONLY way out of this mess.  
The government has been defeated again over Brexit & Theresa May couldn’t even be bothered to be in the Commons chamber to hear the result!#ToriesOut 
The world is laughing at us, not with us. Venice. When I asked the waiter what was on the brexit pizza, he said "we promise it comes with everything but it actually comes with nothing and its also expensive and very hard to digest".... Genius!#facciamoeuropa #fbpe #brexit  
Maybe, just maybe, the penny will now drop with Prime Minister and her Chief Whip that the hardliners in the ERG want a no-deal Brexit and will stop at nothing to get it. Responsible MPs of all parties must come together on 27th and 28th March and stop them. 
Cowardly of May to duck being in the Commons chamber when her Blackmail Brexit backfires, the PM humiliated by 303-258 vote against her running down the clock plan. Symbolic but shows depth of opposition to her, including Tory no dealers 
Crushing defeat for the Government’s disastrous #brexit strategy. May’s authority is in tatters. The only way out for Parliament & the country now is to put May’s deal to the public in a #PeoplesVote & end the #brexit nightmare now. 
 Another humiliating defeat for the UK Government. More Brexit chaos and uncertainty. @IanBlackfordMP: "This is a bourach. The Prime Minister should be here to accept her responsibility for this defeat. Where is she?" 
The Brexit farce gets even more farcical.  
Bercow says the Brexit secretary can respond. He refuses. "Or if the government chief whip wants to do so?" He refuses as well. 
That, folks, was the end of Theresa May's negotiation. She can't command a majority in the Commons so she can't be trusted bu the EU as a negotiator. We must now do everything to prevent a chaotic and dangerous no deal Brexit. 
Theresa May has gone into hiding, not even in the chamber to hear her Brexit strategy defeated again 
BREAKING: UK lawmakers vote against government motion to reaffirm support for Prime Minister Theresa May's plan to seek changes to her #Brexit deal. Watch Live:  
So @theresa_may suffers yet another humiliating defeat by 303 to 258. @jeremycorbyn says it shows there is no majority for @theresa_may's Brexit strategy. That is certainly how the EU 27's leaders will see it. This is a serious blow to her ability to get any deal approved 
Government defeated by 45 on their Brexit motionTheresa May’s ‘run down the clock’ strategy in tatters - which may be why she is refusing even to speak in the Commons after her defeat 
PM Theresa May suffers a fresh defeat in Commons vote on her Brexit strategy by 303 to 258  
Sorry spectacle of Labour whipping their MPs to abstain on @theSNP motion to extend Article 50 - so important to protect Scotland from being shoved into a no deal Brexit. Fair play to those who did support.Labour on Brexit still every bit as damaging and confused as Tories.  
Break: Govt suffers its EIGHTH Brexit defeat in Commons - loses motion to endorse May's renegotiation by 303 v 258. No legal consequences, but a big humiliation. 
BREAK: Government DEFEATED on latest #Brexit vote. Ayes - 258Noes - 303Non-binding but makes Theresa May's team look chaotic. Won't give Brussels much confidence she has backing for her plan. 
Are we not way way beyond the point of accepting the Government's word when it comes to Parliament's role in Brexit?  
I will not be blackmailed into voting for Theresa May’s bad #Brexit deal that will harm our economy, jobs & communities.The PM has failed, the Brexit she promised was never possible. People must have a final say on the deal with option to remain. @peoplesvote_uk @LabPeoplesVote 
Eurozone industrial production was down 4.2% in December led by a 6.7% collapse in Spain, 5.5% in Italy, 3.9% in Germany and 1.7% in France. In the UK the figure was down by 1.2%. Yet Remainers think this is due to Brexit. Thank God we aren’t in the Eurozone! 
Good to know that some Labour MPs had courage of convictions to vote for @theSNP amendment to extend Article 50. The fact that the majority didn’t underlines concern that Labour leadership could be gearing up to be the midwives of a Tory Brexit.  
It’s an odd thing when Ken Clarke and Jacob Rees Mogg - who couldn’t be further away from each other on Brexit - are both abstaining. They’re sat next to each other on the green benches having a lovely chat instead. 
More pathetic attempts to thwart Brexit with parliamentary amendments have been defeated in the Commons. 17.4m people voted Leave but a sad minority of very bitter sore loser MPs just can't resist trying to defy the will of the British public! 
MPs reject SNP amendment by 315 votes to 93Follow the #Brexit debate latest:  
MPs vote against SNP amendment for Article 50 to be extended by at least 3 months.Follow all the latest #Brexit reaction here:  
Unbelievable - Labour MPs have once again joined with the Tories to vote against Scotland's interests. Sat on their hands abstaining, while SNP MPs vote to extend Article 50 and prevent Scotland facing a disastrous no deal #Brexit  
It is only fair to recognise excellence.In my view @jeremycorbyn’s handling of #Brexit has been simply magnificent. A political masterclass.He has completely outwitted not only the Tories but also the saboteurs within his own party.Watch and learn.#JC4PM2019 
So a majority of our elected representatives believe it is fine that anxious people across the UK and businesses that need certainty will not know what Brexit means in practice just a month before it happensPlease never vote for them again  
 Labour abstained on the SNP amendment, which would extend Article 50 and prevent a disastrous no-deal Brexit. What a shameful dereliction of duty from a party that claims to be the "opposition". Just like Tories, they're putting party unity above common sense. 
Biggest load of bollocks ever. 5 presenters on different days all hate Brexit every single one of them next week. LBC now worse than the Bias BBC, and terrible Sky News . Once a great Radio Station now pathetic Brexit bashing station. Why not call it BREXIT BASHING LBC.   
'It is incredible, in my view, that the British parliament has allowed it come to this' #Brexit @simoncoveney 
Labour sitting on the benches not voting for @theSNP amendment to delay Brexit by just 3 months to give UK Gov time to get their act together. Labour now undoubtably just as complicit as the Tories in this Brexit disaster.  
Dominic Grieve just attacked the Shadow Labour government, his own Conservative government, Theresa May, the negotiations and the very concept of Brexit, and then called for a new referendum.  
MPs are currently voting on a vitally important motion, backed by the @LibDems, to delay Brexit and avoid the potential calamity of no deal.But Labour are just staying in their seats, and can't be bothered to vote. They are propping up the Tory ERG's hardest of Brexit plans.  
The Labour amendment to the Brexit bill fails. It's time @jeremycorbyn respects the Labour conference resolution to fight for a People's Vote. Demand the final say on the deal and the option to stay in the EU > 
Tune in to BBC Parliament right now to watch Labour abstaining on a key Brexit vote in real time.  It's really quite a striking image. 
 With 43 days until the Brexit cliff-edge, and the UK Government in total mess, we must extend Article 50. While MPs are voting on the motion and the SNP amendment, here's a reminder on where we are now.  
MPs have voted AGAINST Labour’s amendment to the Brexit negotiations motion which asked the Government to bring a new proposed withdrawal plan to the commons for vote by Wednesday 27 February. Ayes 306 Noes 322 More self serving recklessness from the Tories 
Why give them two weeks of breathing room? That's two more weeks for businesses to execute Brexit contingency plans in. Either they are willing to publish, in which case your amendment makes no difference, or they're not, in which case it's absolutely vital! 
Brexit, the Dutch have decided, is a fluffy blue monster with an oversize head, blue eyes, black pants and a white T-shirt emblazoned with the word "Brexit" in red  
Conservative MP Chris Heaton-Harris: "I'm not sure a shortage of viagra in a no-deal Brexit stands up. Hard Brexit? Soft Brexit?"@chhcalling |  
Looks like Labour are abstaining on @theSNP amendment today. They really do want to be the midwife to a hard Tory #Brexit. Why would an "opposition" party not want to oppose the Government and pause #Article50? #voteSNP 
I'm absolutely sick to death of everyone saying the ERG are "the extremists"THEY are wanting to deliver #Brexit You know that decision you entrusted to US the public, the decision YOU ALL agreed to implement. THEY are NOT EXTREME #Remainers are because they are ignoring 17.4m 
COMING SOON | Our “Let’s Go Global” stickers are almost ready!  Let’s say bollocks to “Bollocks To Brexit” Stay tuned for updates!  #GlobalBritain 
The only thing that's actually moved forward today is time. Perhaps the most significant development is that we are a day nearer to Brexit and still no idea of what happens next. 
Tánaiste Simon Coveney: 'It is incredible, in my view, that the British parliament has allowed it [Brexit] to come to this.' |  
'Respect other's opinions'#Brexit isn't an OPINION - it's an ACTION which negatively affects the lives of people who didn't ask for it. We have every RIGHT to speak out against, to oppose, and to refuse to RESPECT that - we WON'T be quietened by anybody. #RevokeRemainRebuild 
Government has agreed to meet to identify and then publish the relevant papers detailing the devastating effect a #NoDeal #Brexit will have on business’s and trade. No need to push my amendment to a vote & if Govt does none of the above I’ll be back on Feb 27 ... 
Valentines Day update  Nothing has changed, but here’s my latest thoughts on this Brexit mess... in short we need a #FinalSay 
Chris Heaton-Harris is defending the government's Brexit deal even though the country AS A WHOLE hates it.He's the same MP who made lists of university academics who challenged the government's Brexit propaganda.I don't like the phrase 'government stooge' but....  
'Barnier is working' is always the answer to 'where is Barnier?'. He meets everyone, he explains, he listens, he takes note, he meets them again to update on development. Did I say that he listens? It is the best possible #Brexit negotiator the EU could have.  
#Brexit uncertainty is causing the economy to stagnate.Growth in the service sector has stalled. Even if we avoid 'no-deal', we’ll have to face a blind Brexit. It won’t take much to push the country into recession.We are on a cliff edge.We need an #ExitfromBrexit now! 
ERG Brexiter Tory MPs will abstain on main motion. Difficult to see how @theresa_may wins. A defeat changes nothing of substance. But it undermines confidence in Brussels and EU capitals that any concessions from them would actually secure a majority for a Brexit deal 
BREAKINGERG to abstain on the Government's main Brexit motion. Means defeat is likely 
Corbyns in charge at the Met ? Corbyns in charge at the Ministry of Justice ? Corbyns in charge at the Electoral Commission ? Blimey he’s busy, on top of being a spy, Putins right hand man, brexit facilitator, Terrorist, Labour leader. How on earth does he fit in antisemetic duty 
MASSIVE - Criminal investigations into Leave campaigns still stalled amid allegations up to a dozen MPs in the frame. 
See, everything is wonderful in the Eurozone. The land of milk and honey. Unlike the far-right Brexit Britain, where the first cheese famine cases are already putting the NHS under strain. 
Join me on the show this week to see a medieval roast battle, learn how to save Brexit by getting your bits out and the amazing Stacey Dooley and I having a chat.Catch the full show tonight at 10pm on @SkyOne 
Dialogue with stakeholders on #Brexit continues.Happy to meet the @eufafisheries today and examine all possible scenarios 
Tánaiste Simon Coveney has said it is incredible that the British parliament has let the situation over Brexit "come to this"  
Funny enough @carolecadwalla just asked @MollyMEP this morning if she'd heard anything from the Met or NCA over the letter she organised and signed by over 70 MPs, Lords and MEPs - it appears these people are a law unto themselves, or is it something else? 
As MPs return to Parliament for another set of votes, we say it’s time to #StoptheClock on #Brexit so there is time to come up with a plan that Parliament can support. Crashing out of the EU without a deal will cost jobs and the economy  
Reminder:Any MP who votes for a deal containing any form of 'backstop' is betraying the UK to government by a foreign power and to be nothing other than EU Colony One.It is not Brexit.It is Remain. 
What cancelling Brexit "requires" is being prepared to see the end of the Conservative Party by overturning the largest democratic vote for anything in UK history.  
I couldn't care less. When i met Dutch Ministers in December 2017 they whined about "big brother" UK leaving them alone with the impecunious Southern Europeans. My heart bleeds. They had plenty of time to show some concessions to the UK in 2016 & since the referendum. And failed  
Message to the future; It's less than 50 days to Brexit and politicians and the news media have been arguing about who loves Winston Churchill enough.  
In EU Withdrawal debate saying we need to deliver on the Referendum and get on with leaving the EU. It’s time to move on and focus on building Brexit Britain. 
UK's parliament will hold #Brexit debate. This is not a re-run of a vote last month on whether to approve the exit deal Prime Minister May negotiated with the EU. Here is what will happen:  For the latest Brexit updates:  
Meanwhile, as the Commons devours itself over Brexit yet again this from the real world: a new survey confirms virtually every council in England plans to increase council tax AND cut services this year. 25% say they will cut social care and 25% will cut children’s services. 
Corbyn to hold Brexit talks with Barnier and Verhofstadt next week  
Mainstream media favourite Terry Christian Urges Bosses to Sack Brexit-voting Workers First.“Brexiters were conned – maybe it won’t hit home until they get that P45,” Christian asserted on social media. 
Do you  agree party politics are out. Conservatives and Labour have merged into one. We have uncontrolled immigration, no free speech, and now no democracy. I believe the next election will be all about Brexit, and those who have betrayed the 17.4 million. 
They're going to sell Brexit down the river but that was always going to happen  
 WATCH: @StephenGethins brilliantly explains @theSNP's amendment - requesting extension of Article 50 to avoid Brexit cliff edge - and why every responsible MP should back it today.If Labour don't act to prevent no-deal, they'll be abdicating responsibility. pic.twitter.com/oJr9tEFVCj 
In London before and after Brexit vote, in Spain during Catalunya independence referendum  
An update on where I stand on Brexit since the Prime Minister's deal was decisively rejected by Parliament last month.  
Backing a Tory Brexit could wipe out Labour, warns Clive Lewis  
There are some other trips that could be interesting, or could be a total coincidence: "Fedotov" was in the UK when the Brexit vote was taking place, and in Barcelona during the Catalonian referendum. Again, we don't know if there is significance to this or mere coincidence.  
Friends! My Far-Right cat, 'Fatcha', is very fussy and will only eat the high-quality 'KangaChunks' which I import in bulk from 'Angela', a German lady, who says she won't let me buy any more after Brexit.And yet, when I tell Leavers this, they just laugh.Talk about uncaring!  
Roses are redViolets are blueA special shout outIf you're from the EUAnd came to our countryAnd fell for a BritOnly to find yourself screwedBy this Brexit bullshit.It hurts us to seeHow your love has been shaftedBy liars and cheatsAnd the lies that they crafted. 
Brexit was about sovereignty, not the economyBrexit was about sovereignty, not the economyBrexit was about sovereignty, not the economyBrexit was about sovereignty, not the economyWe will not let you betray our democracy so rich people can retain their privilege  
Brexit timeline:14 Nov (135 days left): PM agrees deal10 Dec (109 days)- PM pulls vote, asks for more time to negotiate15 Jan (73 days)- PM loses vote29 Jan (59 days)- Brady passes, PM asks for more time14 Feb (43 days) - PM asks for more timeThere's a pattern emerging. 
That is why I have tabled an amendment for a #PeoplesVote to give the public a #FinalSay and a chance to #ExitfromBrexit. It is the only way out of this Brexit disaster this Tory government have created. Nobody voted for this car crash.  
43 former British ambassadors have called for @theresa_may to extend art. 50, arguing that a #PeoplesVote is the only way out of this #Brexit Mess. There is strong support within parliament & across the country for a #PeoplesVote. Time the PM listened. 
Jeremy Corbyn seems to keep forgetting the Labour Party policy to fight for a People's Vote. We've tabled a change onto the Labour amendment to the Brexit bill just to remind them of their agreed policy.  
Britain is lobbying the US not to impose a 25% tariff on EU produced cars. Apparently this would still be imposed on UK cars after Brexit thanks to May’s deal with the EU on goods. Another reason for ditching the deal. 
"Lobbyists for the American meat industry have urged the US government to demand Britain drop antibiotics restrictions and the ban on ractopamine-fed pork as part of any post-Brexit trade deal."No one voted for this. 
Dominic Grieve - An overwhelming majority of MPs believe that #brexit is going to be damaging to this country.. the labour front bench have bought a plastic cake & pretends it's edible rather than concluding we are going to have to go back to the public. #FinalSay #PeoplesVote 
A Labour MP has warned that his party is ‘helping to facilitate a Tory Brexit’  
The prime minister is promising a non-existent #Brexit dividend to bribe Labour MPs to back her miserable deal. The way to get cash for “left-behind” communities is to stay in the EU. @HugoDixon explains 
Being opposed to no-deal is not the same thing as being opposed to #Brexit - Repeat 
Any attempt to extend Article 50 would damage the certainty that business wants and damage public faith in democracy. It wouldn't make anything in the Brexit process easier - it would only make things worse.  
This is utterly ridiculous. @HouseofCommons and press pack waiting on the words of the #ERG - Prime Minister in office but not in power. No mistaking who is running the show now. Disgraceful situation the Tories have dragged us into. #Brexit #43daystogo 
Brexit midfield carrying us to CL. Black midfield to PL. Unbelievable depth/hybrid.  
He was also wittering on about Viagra. Presumably because he wants a hard Brexit 
Conservative MP David Davies says warnings about food shortages in a no-deal Brexit are a scare story because there are "orchards in Monmouth where we grow plenty of fruit and vegetables." 
EXCLUSIVE: Senior Labour MPs Accuse Met Police of 'Cover-Up' and 'Unacceptable Delays' in Investigating #Brexit Crimes  
Tory David TC Davies says people aren't going to die  due to a lack of food after Brexit because the orchards in his Monmouthshire constituency have loads of apples. Seriously. 
Every MP, when considering which way to vote on any issue, should make their decision on the following basis: Is it in the national interest to vote for this motion? And, if it's not, they should vote against it - even if it goes against a referendum result. #RevokeArticle50 
"The 2016 referendum was advisory only and did not compel Parliament to act on such ‘advice’. This has created a ludicrous legal loophole where in any other election in history, the result would have been annulled following the EC reports findings of corrupt & illegal practices."  
"I certainly feel like we are being played like fools by the leadership of the Labour Party". @ChrisLeslieMP questions why his party isn't backing calls for a new EU referendumLive updates:  
Trump's US ambassador to the UK saying all the right things this Valentine's Day Global free trade, including a bespoke free trade deal with our largest trading partner is one of the key prizes of Brexit. So what are we waiting for?  
Brilliant riposte by Chris to the default Blairite bleating. Tories are the main problem. NOT Brexit. 
‘Backing a Tory Brexit could wipe out Labour’ - @labourlewisClive Lewis is right - enabling Brexit would be Labour’s tuition fees moment. The only way to gain a @UKLabour Government is to oppose Tory Brexit and support a public vote.  
Knock knock Theresa, we have a delivery for you Email your MP to save Brexit:  
Airline cancels UK flights 'due to Brexit' Affected passengers said they were told by email all Blue Air flights to and from Liverpool after 28 February would be cancelled due to “operational reasons”. 
Who’s the biggest failure in the Brexit cabinet: Chris Grayling – or Liam Fox? | Martha Gill  
Went out to talk to @Liverpool4EU about the #Brexit motion and amendments being discussed in @HouseofCommons today. They want a #PeoplesVote and so do I 
The ERG want Brexit delivered not some god awful half in half out trapped in a customs Union deal. 
Those post brexit trade talks are going well......  
A fluffy blue monster is warning the Dutch about Brexit — but the prime minister’s comments are much scarier  
The total incompetance of this government is staggering...rather than making the UK look like a world power Williamson has made us into even more of a laughing stock. #brexit #FinalSayForAll 
Corbyn to hold Brexit talks with Barnier and Verhofstadt next week  
5. Labour has already lost 3 seats in its top 50 marginals (2 resigned, 1 in prison). Attacking Labour MPs in super-marginals, like Ian Austin, for voting with his constituents on Brexit, is utterly counter-productive. Labour MPs should be encouraged to stay, not goaded to quit. 
This trade unionist wants Brexit at any cost. Well, f*ck him and the horse he rode in on.#PeoplesVote 
Impassioned speech from ⁦@angelaeagle⁩ Wallasey MP condemning what she describes as ⁦@theresa_may⁩ ‘s brexit policy aimed at keeping the Tory party together rather than doing the best for the country ⁦@GranadaReports⁩ 
Lovely to pop out from today’s #brexit debate with my colleague @sarahwollaston to welcome the large contingent of #PeoplesVote supporters from #devon. Thanks for the cake! 
People’s Vote supporting Labour MP Jess Phillips admits she could vote FOR May’s ‘sh*t show’ Tory Brexit deal  
Here's a thought:The referendum was advisory, hence outside the scope of the Venice Commission.But, the Cameron Govt promised people to abide by the result, hence in words and deed, it made it 'binding'. If so, the Venice Commission would declare it void.  
Hilary Benn - What a mess, what a complete & utter mess our country is in.. we are staring down the barrel of no agreement at all.. companies are in a state of despair.. 42 companies have already relocated to the Netherlands citing brexit as the reason#peoplesvote @hilarybennmp 
Since when did Remainers have to tell the truth about anything?All Remainers have done is LIE since they lost the referendum.A truly ghastly breed.  
Listening to another Commons Brexit debate just after spending two days in Brussels I am struck yet again by how little Tory Brexiteers (even ministers) understand the EU or how it works (thread) 
May's botched Brexit is putting unnecessary pressure on our economy, hitting millions of people all across the country, putting their livelihoods at risk. The only way forward is a people’s vote with the option to Exit from Brexit >  
"PM has allowed Tory Eurosceptic virus to infect politics, her and her party will never be forgiven for the damage she is causing." #Brexit  
A Labour MP has demanded a second referendum with a choice between May’s deal and remaining in the EU. She argues that this would enable a ‘reality check’ on Brexit. But there can be no reality check until we have been out for years. And May’s deal is a Remain deal not Brexit. 
Eventually when the dust finally settled @Femi_Sorry would be knighted for his contribution on Brexit education. So proud of you brother, hold your breathe for......... #SirFemi 
Remain must march before it’s too late — The Resistance needs to show it is once again capable of resisting, to turn out in force for another mass public demonstration in London before May gets Brexit through by default and wrecks UKBy @Andrew_Adonis 
Sorry Dutch Brexit monster but David Davis is still the biggest Brexit Muppet to us. 
Delusional Remainer MPs in Parliament claiming ‘no one wants No Deal Brexit’.In Remain-voting Leeds, Sky News found 54% in favour of No Deal.  
Dutch Foreign Minister typifies  #Brexit as a big blue hairy Monster , as part of a campaign to make sure Dutch Business is ready for any implications of UK #EU exit. 
Gloves off today on the Tory benches - open warfare on what to do next on Brexit. 
Nervous times as crisis grows. My latest Brexit Blog post on May's contradictory messages, the dangers of normalising no deal, why remainers shouldn't lose hope - and what Bogart in The Maltese Falcon can tell us about Brexit brinkmanship:  
I agree with @GMB_Union – it should be the public who have the final say on Brexit.RETWEET if you agree.  
Just switched on the Brexit debate o BBC Parliament and it's very hard to know whether this is live or a repeat 
Go Soubry!I've got no sympathy whatsoever for May. She's deceitful, disrespectful & dictatorial. She & toxic #Brext are running the country down. We need to #StopBrexit, get shot of May & sort ourselves out (including fixing problems that gave rise to Brexit in the 1st place). 
Yesterday evening @philip_ciwf gave a talk on the animal welfare threats and opportunities presented by Brexit. The UK has the opportunity to implement a fresh vision for food & farming, but to do this it needs to prevent lower welfare imports & recognise animal sentience in law.  
I agree with my union, the @GMB_union that the People should have the final say on this botched Brexit deal.  
Cabinet ministers have argued the papers detailing the dreadful consequences on trade & businesses of a #NoDeal #Brexit  should be published & Oliver Letwin agrees they should be made available to everyone.  
Backing a Tory Brexit could wipe out Labour, warns Clive Lewis.They are some very able, intelligent, passionate Labour ministers in Westminster, being let down by their leadership.  
Chance of article 50 extension seen here as high in EU. Though there’s no appetite for it. Brexit fatigue runs deep here 10 
Frustration and #Brexit despondency  reign right now in EU circles. “This new round of EU-UK negotiations is essentially window dressing” -one official tells me “Each side just repeats well-known red lines to the other. And all this with time running out.” 1 
Backing a Tory Brexit could wipe out Labour, warns Clive Lewis  
there was confirmation by @oletwinofficial that PM would be bailed out (sort of) if @Anna_Soubry were to win her amendment forcing PM to publish latest government papers on impact of no-deal Brexit, because that Soubry victory would mean there would not be a vote on... 
These votes today are such a mess for @theresa_may. If Tory ERG Brexit MPs abstain on main motion, as looks highly likely, PM would lose her main vote - which would undermine her attempt to prove to the EU that a reworked Brexit deal could secure support of MPs. But... 
I've just watched @ChrisLeslieMP in the Commons attack his own party, claiming "we are being played for fools by the leadership of the Labour party".I'm a Labour Party member, Chris, and I fully support the leadership on Brexit, and the only person playing us for fools is you. 
The sooner these parties fall apart, the better. Brexit has proved that neither of them is fit to represent us. May is a Remainer pretending to deliver Brexit. Corbyn is a Eurosceptic who shelved his principles at the one moment it mattered, says Mick Hume 
When @adamboultonSKY asked how Brexit could be stopped, there was only one response...Tell your MP face to face at our Parliament Takeover on Feb 27!SIGN UP   
Roses are red violets are blue FOM is beautiful, thank you EU It helped when #LoveBroughtUsHereTo make the UK our home from far and nearHome is where your  isMine is broken, stopping Brexit would fix this! #RevokeArticle50 
Labour MP Chris Leslie says it is "heartbreaking" to see his own party fail to argue against the "disaster" of Brexit.He says "we are being played for fools by the leadership of the Labour party." 
So @ChrisLeslieMP has brassneck to accuse Labour leadrshp of playing 'party politics' for trying to oust Tory Govt that has failed on every measure, inc #Brexit, when he himself is playing factional politics & would rather see a Tory Gov than a Corbyn Labour Gov #SplittersCoup 
Memo to @BBCr4today on reporting Brexit.  
"... because I didn't do my job and plan for Brexit actually happening"  
The irony of Brexit that we pretend to accept an advisory referendum that wanted to see parliament take control & ignore the advice given by the parliament on the direction Brexit takes is the height of ridiculousness  
What a surprise. Chris Leslie taking #Brexit debate as an opportunity to attack Corbyn instead of holding failed Tory Govt to account#SplittersCoup 
A new page has been added to Brit or Bot.It is analysis around Leave vs Remain social media and includes a prediction for any potential second referendum.The landscape is not going to make people happy, but it’s important people see it clearly.  
.@oletwinofficial captures magnitude of what he and fellow backbench rebels are trying to achieve for all backbench MPs in respect of the most important decision this country has faced for generations: "we will have to take on for a period the government of this country" #Brexit 
'Roses are red, Violets are blue, Brexit is bollocks, And so are you...'  
Our future is at stake – it should be the public who have the final say on Brexit.RETWEET if you agree. @GMB_Union 
Unions are there to stand up to government and big business and defend the interests of ordinary working people.They know the damage Brexit would do to people. 
Sigmar Gabriel, Germany’s ex-foreign minister, has advised the #EU to rewrite the Withdrawal Agreement or risk consigning Europe to geostrategic oblivion. “#Brexit will damage Europe’s role in the world in a way that we Europeans currently seem unable to grasp”#NoDeal 
MPs starting to debate Brexit again. I am no scholar but surely there is only so much you can say on one subject. These MPs are going over the same old ground over and over again, why don't they accept the Democratic Will of the people and just Leave on the 29th of March Simple. 
Theresa May has repeatedly lied in Parliament by claiming the referendum was an instruction. But like a cheap con-trickster she exploits the loophole that an advisory referendum cannot be voided because of electoral law-breaking.#PeoplesVote #Brexit 
Jeremy Corbyn to hold Brexit talks with Barnier and Verhofstadt next week Labour leader to meet key EU figures as he seeks to break impasse and get PM to back customs union  
Shockingly brazen fascism, and just outside Parliament too. The strongest correlation between Brexit vote & anything seems to be support for the death penalty & corporal punishment. #ThisisBrexit 
*******THE BBC HAS NO CREDIBILITY LEFT AS AN IMPARTIAL BROADCASTER*********Brexiters are only ever invited on the BBC as a device to put Brexit down in biased programmes dominated by pro-EU panelists and audiences.  
Hilary Benn HoC debate: 43 UK companies relocated to the Netherlands in 2018 citing #BrexitThis before we've left & very much more...10,000s automotive industry jobs at risk..excl the supply chain impact.Dear PM..f8ck 'Hold our Nerve'...Hold you head in your hands in shame! 
Thank you Catherine. Those are very kind words and they mean a lot. Please know that you and many other Brits, that contribute to the Netherlands and Europe in all aspects of life, are valued dearly. Brexit will diminish us all.   
Even if Britain were to somehow reverse Brexit, I suspect that the damage to Britain's reputation is so strong that European business community will forever hesitate to invest in the UK. The damage to Britain's reputation maybe irreversible. 
What's big, blue, furry and monstrous? While the British government has had trouble imagining what #Brexit will actually look like, the Dutch government has unveiled its vision -- in the form of a hairy beast.  By @dannyctkemp 
Now Hilary Benn moaning about what a mess Brexit is. Well its there bloody fault. If they'd supported Brexit as per their manifestos we'd be out by now. Just keep blaming each other and leave, no deal 29th March that we should of done 2 yrs ago. 
Talking #brexit, #UK politics, the Middle East politics and the #youth with #British MP @Rehman_Chishti 
I agree with my union the  @GMB_Union – it should be the public who have the final say on #Brexit.RETWEET if you agree.  
Concerned about #Brexit - you are not alone. Join us in Dumfries on 2nd March for presentations and an open discussion. 
WHY?! where was "go to Brussels & try to negotiate with the EU yourself" in the conference composite motion on Brexit policy @jeremycorbyn??  a customs union won't fix May's deal!RIP Labour party democracy.@SeumasMilne @HackneyAbbott @johnmcdonnellMP  
My last word today on the Tonypandy villain but I think his reputation is the loser in this clash with edgy McDonnell when far more know a fuller truth about Churchill. Now, Brexit... 
Labour will back Anna Soubry's amendment to force the government to publish the most recent cabinet briefing on the effect of a no-deal Brexit, source tells me 
I am about to retire shortly. I'm not short of a few bob and have set myself the following challenges:1.  Revert CO2 levels to less than 400ppm2. Put the ALP into power in Australia3. Stop Brexit4. Replace D.Trump as POTUSAny ideas?. 
We have made the local press and the main local BBC news tonight at 6.30. Don't miss this chance to express you resistance to and rejection of this disastrous #brexit Join us @LeedsEuropeTonight 5 30pm City Square.#stopbrexit 
British MPs are lazy. Big on opinions but thin on facts.Less than 6% of MPs and peers asked to see the Brexit impact papers, with only 83 having visited the restricted access reading room where they were placed.And the EU Withdrawal Agreement or Belfast Agreement? No chance. 
Trotskyist inclined newspaper expresses outrage that “Stalinists” are running Labour’s Brexit policy. Some wars never end, just change battlefield.  
Today: “Join Leeds for Europe as we show that we will not let this #Brexit pass without us raising our voices in a howl of anger and rage." City Square, #Leeds 5.30pm Read more at: 
I predict a Brexit but without the actual ‘exit’… the deal before us isn’t really leaving the EU at all, writes Rod Liddle  
Corbyn ally Clive Lewis: "My fear is that what we are now doing is we are helping to facilitate a Tory Brexit. And the ramification for our party, I think, will be severe.” 
Because you are the white elephant & we can pay for HS2, & lots lots more, by not doing your Brexit  
Grant [SNP]: Someone who came here as a baby in arms after the defeat of Nazism in Europe has been told she has to make a 100mile trip to register as a foreigner... What have we become? If we have become this before #Brexit? And where in the name of God are we headed afterwards? 
Backstops are dead,Tories are blue,Brexit means Brexit,So bollocks to you.#ToryPoems 
"Will he except the referendum itself was advisory?.. And why are we hurtling off a cliff on an advisory referendum?." #EU #Brexit  
"I am being persecuted for my ideas and not for the facts [...]Nothing of what we did is a crime. Voting in a referendum is not a crime”  
With the Eurosceptic PVV hot on his heels and a paper-thin majority for his awkward four-way coalition, is it any wonder Mark Rutte is trying to deflect attention by lashing out at Brexit? Get your own house in order!Support us at  
A significant and weighty question put forward by @MartinJDocherty on Tuesday about the difficulties NI born Irish citizens are facing when exerting their Good Friday Agreement right to be accepted as such #Brexit #WeAreIrishtoo 
It's that he exercises independent judgement - against Brexit, against a People's Vote, for customs union membership, prepared to support May's deal. 
New! @FinancialTimes has gained access to the private membership lists of the ERG and Brexit Delivery Group. Explore all the Tory Tribes in this brilliant interactive database.  
With all my respect Len, sincerely, but do you “take no-deal off the table” when you’re negotiating”? #Brexit 
Government's position on No Deal #Brexit is not just criminally reckless - it is plain stupid.EU knows No Deal would hurt us far more than them.Threatening to put a gun to our own heads is not a clever negotiating strategy.PM must rule out No Deal now.  
56. Christchurch, Doset"Brexit means Brexit and we're going to make a titanic success of it." - @BorisJohnson 
54. Ilkley, Yorkshire Dales"We could have two referendums. As it happens it might make more sense to have the second referendum after the renegotiation is complete." - @Jacob_Rees_Mogg 
 While Westminster descends deeper into Brexit chaos, SNP MPs are standing up for their communities. @DavidLinden is leading the charge in a debate about Santander closures, urging the UK Government to take action on local bank closures. 
Today I asked my successor as Brexit Secretary @SteveBarclay to confirm that, if the EU are not willing to agree a deal by 29 March, we will be leaving without a deal. He confirmed this is the case. 
51. Otley, West Yorkshire"If Brexit is a disaster I will go and live abroad, I'll go and live somewhere else." - @Nigel_Farage 
Remember this? Theresa May suggests NHS could be part of US trade dealThis isn't historyThis is on the table post BrexitWell I #LoveMyNHSJust like youAnd I won't let it be sold off to a US company for profitRT if you have nothing but  for #ourNHS 
They fake the number of people who take part in their marches. They fake attacks on opponents. And now the second referendum campaign is running fake ads.  
50. Andover"We could have two referendums. As it happens it might make more sense to have the second referendum after the renegotiation is complete." - @Jacob_Rees_Mogg 
I take huge issue with what Ken Clarke has said about ERG MPs being the Conservative Party's Momentum. A very insulting & inaccurate claim to make. In fact, they're the most loyal MPs as they're simply sticking to the party's 2017 manifesto when it comes to Brexit #StandUp4Brexit 
If you #LoveMyNHS-then you cannot support #Brexit.They are not compatible.Born and raised in the US,  believe me: the #NHS is this nation's platinum asset..the thing US #BigPharma and  #Trump really want. #NHS: information;language convergence;capacity. 
It’s 19,744 days since Winston Churchill died.It’s 43 days to Brexit 
The Leave campaigns committed multiple breaches of the law during the 2016 campaign, but the government is exploiting the loophole that because the referendum was advisory it cannot be voided#Brexit 
What’s really evident about today’s Brexit debate is that it’s actually a negotiation between the Brexit Secretary and the ERG about whether they will support the Government motion rather than a negotiation about what’s best for the national interest. 
Keir Starmer is so wooden the birds are trying to nest in him #Brexit 
Roses have thorns And Brexit has pricksLeaving means liesAnd a land run by dicks.#ValentinesDay #BrexitValentines 
Paul's anti-Brexit posts before the referendum included the vile claim that if Britain voted to leave the EU there could be another holocaust. 
Govts Brexit strategy “an appalling shambles” - Ken Clarke 
It's simple. Put May's Brexit deal to the people and give them the option to remain. "It's the only thing that doesn't need more negotiation. Either you accept the deal or you remain, basta" @laylamoran  
Our generation didn't vote for a blindfold Brexit - many of them didn't get a say at all.Young people front and centre in Parliament Square to reclaim their futures.  You can too on Feb 27 -  
The referendum was not a decision to leave:  
Exclusive: Massive howler from @peoplesvote_uk - their poster boy who claims he changed his mind about Brexit has actually been a fanatical Remainer all along, even making vile comparisons between Brexit and the Holocaust before the referendum in 2016 
No blindfold #Brexit. Hundreds of #PeoplesVote campaigners gather to say MPs cannot vote for a deal that provides no closure & no clarity 
TAKE ACTION & RT! Animals risk losing vital protections after #Brexit, please join us - & 35 other NGOs - in urging your MP to show some lovefor a #BetterDealForAnimals. It takes 5 seconds to tweet your MP here  Thank you!  
Dear Wazzocks, who spout the BS that business negotiates keeping No Deal on the table...pls note.When a business walks away it is on the same basis as when it walked in.If UK plc walks away w/o a Deal #Brexit UK becomes FUBAR!#RevokeA50 & #Remain in Control in the EU.#ABTV 
Dutch PM on Brexit: UK is a waning country too small to stand aloneA bit of hard love 
Clive Lewis - ⁦@UKLabour frontbencher⁩ : 'my fear is we are helping to facilitate a Tory #Brexit'  More ⁦@BBCRadio4⁩  #wato c120pm 
Labour in a messTories in a messPM in a messBrexit in a messYou deserve betterWe deserve betterWe need a clear out and a reset button before the damage to our country is irreversible, QUICK SHARPISH. 
 at my mum extolling the virtues of Brexit to members of her Italian class (at their request) in fluent Italian. 
"It's obvious what the prime minister is up to, she's pretending to make progress while running down the clock" - Shadow Brexit secretary Sir @Keir_Starmer criticises Theresa May's negotiations with EU#Brexit debate latest:  
MPs like @RachelReevesMP, @ChukaUmunna and @ChrisLeslieMP love to tell us we are all gagging for a 2nd referendum.I know I'm not. I know thousands of member's just like me are not. Please RT if you DON'T want Labour to call a 2nd referendum. 
NEW: Anti-Corbyn MPs discussed quitting Labour in a "Valentine's Day breakup".Thursday and Friday were discussed as potential dates to resign the whip.Senior Labour MP indicates they will go around next major Brexit vote. Others could quit in "drips". 
Labour's amendment today tackles the #Brexit mess at its core. Stop the PM running down the clock. Rid us of the nightmare of no deal. And find a compromise across the Commons for where next. @UKLabour 
Called transport agency to ask about transferring to a Swedish driver's license since the UK/EU one will no longer be valid here. She said, "We HAVE to get this done before Brexit day". Or, I don't have a license and have to re-take my lessons/test from scratch.Thanks, Brexit! 
. @OwenPaterson "Could he [the Brexit Secretary] confirm that the 'Malthouse Compromise' is stated government policy, and has been put to Monsieur Barnier, and that it now has the full force of the Civil Service to work it up into legal binding text?"  
Brexit already costing UK £800m per week, Bank of England economist says  
THREAD. There now follows some killer quotes that sets out the truth of who is responsible for the brexit decision (the PRIME MINISTER *alone), and here attitude to the corruption.  Support @fairvoteuk and @UKEUchallenge to expose this before it’s too late. 
"40 hard-line Brexit Tories are rebelling against the government"Translation: "The vast majority of Tory MPs (plus the rest of the commons) oppose a no-deal Brexit and it should be taken off the table before we lose more jobs. Predators like Mogg won't change, so fuck them" 
The revelations from #OllyRobbins that @theresa_may is plotting to force her awful #brexit deal through or delay brexit for a long time has confirmed brexiteers suspicions. May has been betraying Britain from day 1 trying to derail Brexit, working against our country & democracy!  
The public should have the final say on Brexit.Agree? SHARE   
Labour are RedTories are Blue #Brexit is bollocks Time for #Indyref2! 
Corbyn & McCluskey employ Stalin apologists and Kremlin sympathisers Seumas Milne and Andrew Murray. This should be as absolutely unacceptable as May or Cable employing a Kremlin-friendly Holocaust denier & suggests that Corbyn & McCluskey have no love for democracy.#Brexit 
May's Brexit negotiations have been like Remain 2.0. Had enough of MPs trying to overturn Brexit? Write to them today:  
Brexit has already cost the UK economy at least £80 billion since the EU referendum, about 2% of GDP,  according to a Bank of England rate-setter. 
"Even if the economy didn't grow as quickly, or even if it shrunk a little bit, if we're committed to redistribution we could lift living standards." MP @DerbyChrisW on #bbcpolitics, saying he opposes a #PeoplesVote, backs Brexit & wouldn't mind if it led to a recession. Grim. 
Because this is what matters right now, to the shadow Chancellor with 43 days to go until Brexit. (I'm not arguing with an assessment of history; just with the bloody grand standing.)  
The Prime Minister is on record as embarking on brexit, her personal choice, in full knowledge that the referendum is tarnished, but with no idea how much. This is the only foundation for her decision 
That was a truly awful performance by the Brexit Secretary just now at the Dispatch Box in the @HouseofCommons 
We have the official transcript in the Wilson caseWe are able to confirm absolutely that yes the PM is proceeding with brexit, which she admits is her own personal decision, in full knowledge that the referendum is a site of corruption which she will not investigate or quantify 
#BrexitBETRAYAL#BrexitLIESWE THE PEOPLEWON THE RIGHT TO LEAVEDEMOCRATICALLYTHIS WASN'T A SUGGESTION FFSTHIS WAS A LEGITAMITE ORDERFROM THE U.K. ELECTORATETHIS WAS AND IS AN ORDERBBC News#Brexit: No 10 says Tory revolt could damage EU  
Remoaners cry about Hard Brexit “economic collapse”. Over the last month, FTSE 100 has risen significantly. As we move towards Real Brexit, Financial investors clearly think Remoaner forecasts are utter nonsense.  
"The media and the Corbyn Labour party do not understand the white-hot fury at Brexit that is raging through liberal Britain" me in @spectator on why everything might change 
44 days to go till a possible No Deal Brexit catastrofuck:Prime Minister tells cabinet about scraping mould off some jam.43 days to go:Everyone loses their shit over whether a man who died 54 years ago was a good guy or bad.This country has gone insane. 
Project fur: Brexit is a big blue monster, say the Dutch  
[bangs gavel]I declare it TOO NICE OUTSIDE to be discussing Brexit today, all Brexit-related discourse to be adjourned until it is no longer sunny and warm 
Brexit has wiped £80 billion from Britain's economic growth since referendum, top Bank of England official reveals - Evening Standard. Amounts to £800m per week. Didn’t see that one of the bus. #Lies #Charlatans #BrexitShambles #BoJo #BrexitFacts 
1/ Today we are giving evidence at the immigration bill committee. If the bill is passed as proposed then it will remove the legal basis of our rights without any replacement in case of no-deal Brexit. A far cry from "no change" & "automatic" as promised by Vote Leave.  
"It would not be possible to complete procurement and make it operational for 29 March..."Government admits it has ‘run out of time’ to find ships to bring in emergency supplies under a no-deal Brexit scenario.Shambolic at best. 
Spent some fascinating time last week looking at the case of Derry City... for whom Brexit throws up unique challenges. 
Oriol Junqueras: ‘I consider myself a political prisoner’ ... 'Nothing we did is a crime, nothing, absolutely nothing. Voting in a referendum is not a crime' ... 'preventing voting from going ahead by force is.' #CatalanTrial #SpainInEnglish 
Andrea Leadsom has a Brexit #Valentines Day poem for MPs 
Ken Clarke (father of the house) on how the govt could simply extend Article 50 instead of 'catastrophically' crashing out. #EU #Brexit  
Did you hear her on Sky? The casual way she talked of dismembered heads in bins and, oh yeah, I had two babies but they died, yes the caliphate's finished unfortunately... Psychopathic terrorist. We don't need her in the UK. 
House of Commons Speaker John Bercow has selected three amendments on the next steps of the Brexit process to be debated by MPs from Labour leader Jeremy Corbyn, SNP Westminster leader Ian Blackford and Conservative Remain-supporting MP Anna Soubry 
#BadNews #BreakingNewsMy amendment to #RevokeArticle50 has not been selected by the Speaker of the Commons ... This dangerous nauseating #Brexit could be over in an afternoon. 
 BREAKING: SNP amendment was selected by the Speaker and will be voted on after 5pm.It requires the UK Government to begin immediate negotiations for an extension of Article 50, so we can avoid the Brexit cliff edge.   
Next time someone tells you we have to push on with Brexit no matter the consequences, show them @lara_spirit standing up for democracy on @SkyNews  
No amendment for a second referendum has been selected   
It’s a love-in for WTO outside Parliament right now  #LetsGoWTO Help fight for Brexit @  
Not long now until some mad Tory fucker proposes exhuming Winston, reanimating him with a car battery and have him deliver #Brexit. 
LATEST: Spanish Secretary of State for @EspanaGlobal @lozanoirene responds to interview on @SkyNews when she compared 1st October Catalan independence referendum to rape. 
Very early in today’s brexit debate and already the secretary of state is cosying up to the minority of no deal enthusiasts. Looks very much like Scotland is going to be forced to choose between no deal brexit and no UK. 
Britain is a country with an incredibly fragile sense of self. That's evident from the sheer bullheaded approach to Brexit negotiations. With that in mind, it's no surprise criticism of a "British Icon" like Churchill would create such a disproportionate stushie. 
Jobs aren't *at risk*. Jobs have left Britain, gone forever, because of a vote your general secretary @LenMcCluskey continues to endorse. He believes that questioning legitimacy of referendum would undermine "democratic fabric" of UK. I hope his members don't fall for this lie.  
Soubry amendment “instructs the Government within seven days to publish in full the most recent official briefing document, relating to business and trade, on the implications of a no-deal Brexit presented to Cabinet.”. 
Britain has secured post-#Brexit continuity for only £16bn out of £117bn of its #trade deals with rest of the world.That's less than 14%Pretty bad news for the economy, jobs & public finances...Remember - #Brexiters promised it would be "easy"!. 
BREAKING: our amendment to the PM’s Brexit motion, forcing the Govt to publish cabinet ‘no deal’ briefing documents, HAS just been selected by Mr Speaker and will be voted on at some time from 5pm - the only cross party backbench amendment to be selected  
Mr Speaker announces that he has provisionally selected three amendments for the debate: a) Labour Opposition - backstop, i) SNP - Three month extension of Art 50 and e) Soubry - publish no-deal Brexit plan. Votes at 5pm. 
BREAKING: Speaker has called the following amendments tonight to PM's Brexit motion:Labour - have a meaningful vote by end of monthSNP - delay Article 50Anna Soubry - publish implications of No Deal 
“Britain has received demands to roll back its human rights standards in exchange for progress on post-Brexit trade deals, including from some countries that ministers are pushing to secure agreements with”  
MPs begin debating ahead of next vote on Brexit deal  
So, no second referendum amendment selected  
Published today, my book on vices of the mind, including philosophical reflections on Brexit, Trump, and the Iraq war:  
Brexit has cost the UK an estimated £800 million a week in lower growth since the referendum. (And for anyone saying "how can growth be a loss?", these things are RELATIVE. If you expect a 5% payrise but get 2%, that's a real 3% worse than you thought.)  
Happy to confirm that like @Nigel_Farage and a number of other MEPs I am now designated as The Brexit Party in the EU Parliament.  East Midlands MEP Jonathan Bullock has designated as Brexit Party  
“Labour is red, Tories are blue…”Andrea Leadsom has written a Brexit poem,and Pete Wishart has, too.  
Can-kicking mode has been activated by the Prime MinisterSomething has to change, join the @LibDems campaign to get an Exit from Brexit   
Why are the Tories ignoring what is happening.  Brexit is destroying this country.   The country is more important than the Tory party.  #endthechaos 
Grateful to the BBC for the wide-spread coverage today. It is imperative that our rights under the Good Friday Agreement are fully implemented and respected by the UK Government. Imposing British citizenship on Irish nationals is not compatible with the GFA #brexit  
New:The ERG will abstain over Brexit vote - leaving Govt facing defeat - *unless* PM commits to making Malthouse official Government policyIt's a price that No 10 appears unwilling to payWe'll have ERG's final decision at 4pm but it is not looking good for Downing Street 
An ‘emergency’ debate on a man who has been dead for half a century  sums up Britain in 2019 as it hurtles towards the Brexit calamity. Sums up parliament too  
Hey @Jacob_Rees_Mogg, your fervent support for a second referendum has hit the streets of Ilkley in Yorkshire!  
Labour shadow minister Clive Lewis says he’s loyal to Corbyn *but* warns: “We saw what the Tories did to the Lib Dems...They were utterly, comprehensivey destroyed for facilitating austerity... My fear is we are facilitating a Tory Brexit and the ramifications will be severe.” 
Remain must march again before it’s too late, says @andrew_adonis. It is the least we can do so May doesn’t get Brexit through by default and wreck our country.  
In the 2014 referendum the Yes campaign took a pillow to a sword fight. Unsurprisingly, the swords won. Some people seem to suppose that for the coming campaign all the Yes movement needs is a bigger pillow. They are wrong. #UseTheMandate #DissolveTheUnion 
I voted Remain but as a democrat feel duty-bound to help ensure Brexit is delivered  #brexit 
Unreported in our pro Brexit dominated media, but there is a gathering exodus Today we learn 250 businesses relocating to Holland ;Bank of America to Dublin: Research fortnight report research teams going. We are a diminished country. Never forgive the Brexiters - the wreckers. 
A second Brexit vote would betray British democracy. Had enough of patronising MPs? Email your local MP today to let them know you want a real Brexit:  
Brexit is 43 days away. #brexit 
As the pointlessness of #Brexit becomes ever more glaring, as more and more firms up sticks and more and more jobs are lost and the lifeblood of public services, tax revenue, drains away, the world looks on in amazement that our politicians seem incapable of calling it off. 
Kate Hoey and David Davis admitted before the referendum that they didn't understand how the EU works.   
Labour's Jim Fitzpatrick is absolutely right: delaying Brexit would mean we have to send even more money to the EU, and the public won't stand for that.  
This former vice chair of the Conservative Party admits the promised 40 Brexit trade deals will not be in place when the UK leaves the EU next month.@bbradleymp said: “Clearly, 40 are not going to be signed and sealed by that date.” 
“O wad, some po’er the giftie gie us, tae see oorselves as ithers see us”. Brexit is not in Scotland’s name.   
Days to go until Brexit - 43Alternative Arrangements - 0Trade Agreements last week - 2 (Faroe Islands & Switzerland)Trade Agreements still needed - 78 (starting with EU 27) 
We are being betrayed by the political establishment.Britain needs you to stand up for Brexit.Stand up #ForTheNation Join UKIP NOW:   
A no-deal Brexit would affect more than just British trade with the EU — As a member of the EU, Britain participates in around 40 free-trade agreements with over 70 countries, which it will lose if it leaves. 
BREAKING: China cancels trade talks with UK after Gavin Williamson's idiotic sabre-rattling.So much for "hard power" and "taking back control".This is where the #Brexit ideology leads - to a weaker, poorer & more isolated country.#StopBrexit 
“We’re now effectively being invited to endorse the Spelman amendment that rejects a No Deal Brexit. The Govt’s own motion undermines their negotiating position, why are they endorsing the abandoning of the alternative to leaving with a deal?” @bernardjenkin#StandUp4Brexit 
Labour are redTories are blueBrexit is stupidLet’s stay in the EU#Valentines⁠ ⁠ 
Britain is a “waning country” and too small to stand alone on the world stage, after #Brexit the Dutch prime minister, Mark Rutte, has claimed.As the world's financial center, the pre-eminent global soft power, the backbone of NATO and one of the top 6 economies, we disagree. 
Like the rest of the country, we have our differences over Brexit but this CLP is firmly united behind the leadership - only a Labour government can make a difference! 
In @Channel4 Political Slot tonight at 19.55, just after @Channel4News , Elena & I argue that #EU Nationals in Scotland are not only welcome but esssential & especially in the Highlands & Islands. #Dunoon gets a look in too.#Brexit @theSNP #ScotlandLovesEU  
roses are redcarnations are thriftythe UK can unilaterally #RevokeArticle50 roses are redturtle doves come in pairs#VoteLeaveBrokeTheLaw and nobody caresroses are redLeavers are pissedthe Brexit they voted for doesn't exist#EUlovepoems #Valentines #Valentines2019 
Northern Ireland in 1971 by Don McCullin. It is hard to believe that we are only a few weeks away from the Government sacrificing the Good Friday Agreement on the altar of Brexit.  
Why is Brexit falling apart in a mess?Because people need their problems solved, not exploited.#Brexit is just a mess of political exploitation. 
Opinion: No-deal Brexit would starve diabetics of insulin – this government really are ‘lower than vermin’  
Parliamentary Brexit Preparations are now at the the delaying-exam-revision-to-make-a-mixtape-of-Dylan-covers stage. 
Brexit has cost UK economy at least £80bn since vote – Bank rate-setter  
Britain's PM May could face another Brexit defeat in parliament  
#Lexit= #Brexit= Tory Brexit over time.It can only lead to Rights Removed w/o Consent, Jobs lost & Irrevocable Damage to UK interests & Econ26.5% of the Ppl isn't the Ppl.Evidently, ignoring the real Maj Will is rife.NOTHING LEFT to RESPECT 
The economic outlook in Germany continues to look pretty dismal, with the country only narrowly avoiding a fall into recession.The German economy dipped by -0.2% in the third quarter of 2018, and flatlined at 0.0% by the end of the year.#Brexit  
This is unbelievable. Pure fanaticism. Spanish official compares holding independence referendum with rape. Nice PR work by the way @GlobalSpain 
'Border buster' legacy highlights opposition to hard border |  #brexit  
100% THIS Brexit voters have surrendered any “employment rights” they once had.They should be branded on the forehead and forced to live in colonies away from civilised people like Terry and me.  
Now Caroline Spelman is supporting a motion that delays Brexit. She should keep her promise instead. 
More than 40 former British ambassadors and high commissioners have written to Theresa May warning her that #Brexit has turned into a national crisis and has already weakened the UK’s standing in the world  
The loudest supporters of #Brexit are the ones who will personally gain from a weakened UK - domestic AND foreign. That alone should have us ALL asking 'WTF?' The UK is under attack - choose your side wisely. #RevokeRemainRebuild #StopBrexitSaveBritain 
This is the real story of the economic impact of Brexit (apart from the initial inflation shock from the depreciation of sterling) - a persistent drag on business investment - from Jan Vlieghe's excellent speech  
Dutch PM on Brexit: UK is a waning country too small to stand alone  
Shock horror: former senior civil servants unexpectedly come out against #Brexit.Who'd have thought it? Surely, they're apolitical, yet here they are following the Brussels line. Just like the rest of the establishment. 
Magnificent opportunities ahead for independent UK. Let’s hold our nerve and be ready for WTO Brexit.  
.@JACOB_REES_MOGG SEEMS TO FORGET HE BACKED A SECOND REFERENDUM IN 2011, BUT SEVEN YEARS LATER MADE A MASSIVE U-TURN. RETWEET TO REMIND HIM!  
In the lack of self knowledge stakes, Liam Fox’s statement today that MPs who rebel against May’s motion might make Brussels doubt the “consistency” of the UK #Brexit position must be a global prize winner.    Though such cavalier disregard for the truth is also revolting. 
Dutch PM on Brexit: UK is a waning country too small to stand alone “Who will be left weakened by Brexit is the United Kingdom". This from May's friend. 
Hey Siri, show me an allegory for life before and after #Brexit, no holds barred.  
"The media and, more seriously for its supporters, the Corbyn Labour party do not understand the fury at Brexit that is raging through liberal Britain." Good stuff from @NickCohen4. I hope he is right. 
The potential ramifications of a No Deal Brexit on Britain’s motorsport industry are vast. It’s no over exaggeration to consider the potential for European outfits finding the situation so grave they would move back to mainland Europe. Nor of entirely British outfits folding.  
I feel like I’ve read enough articles on Brexit in the past few years to send this valentines to my UK pals. :)  
2016:"A vote for SNP is for another independence referendum"*SNP wins election*After election: "Nobody wants another indyref"2017:"A vote for SNP is for another independence referendum"*SNP wins*After election: "Nobody wants another indyref"Funny that. 
We've joined forces with @JDRFUK to call on @GOVUK to urgently publish concrete details on its plans in the event of a no-deal Brexit. We’ve since had very positive conversations with Government and the NHS, committing to sharing more information with us:  
Germany narrowly avoids recession; Brexit is already costing UK '£800m per week' - business live  
You can join the fight against Brexit too. Add your name here to join our campaign to give the people the final say on this Brexit mess, and the option to stay in the EU >  
Liberal Democrats have fought this disastrous Brexit for over two years. We are still fighting. That is why we have tabled this amendment today, and any MP who supports giving the people the final say should back our amendment. 
Liberal Democrats have tabled an amendment today calling for a People's Vote on May's Brexit deal, with the option to remain in the EU. 
When you think they can’t get any lower - a Spanish Minister compares Catalan referendum to rape - El periodista de SkyNews alucina "Está comparando votar con violar? -while Spanish legal system denies ‘gang rape’ by #LaManada, still free to walk the streets #SpanishShowTrials 
 "I am being persecuted for my ideas and not for the facts [...]Nothing of what we did is a crime. Voting in a referendum is not a crime nor it is working peacefully for the independence" says @junqueras at Spanish Supreme Court#JunquerasAcusa #DemocracyOnTrial 
Also, given Milne and Murray wield so much influence over @jeremycorbyn and Labour Brexit policy why have we never seen them asked how they voted in the referendum? Brexit is a failure of media not just politics 
“The word inside the party is that many former foes on the back benches, impressed by Corbyn’s statesmanship in the Brexit issue and beyond, have quietly decided to spurn any attempts to woo them to the centrist venture.”⁦@UKLabour#VoteLabour  
I met the  of my life, @pjcella, thanks to #freemovement. We were two young  who had studied abroad and were working in  - Then we moved to the  to work and start a family. But that was all before this #Brexit shambles..... #Valentines⁠ ⁠@InLimboBrexit @the3million 
Liam Fox's track record at DFIT is rightly coming in for more scrutiny now. @DavidHenigUK gives an admirable round-up of the highlights (or lowlights) of this woeful story. As with so much in Brexit, what's infuriating is that the warnings were clear, but contemptously dismissed.  
Anything less than leaving the EU Customs Union would be “Brexit in Name Only” and an out and out betrayal of democracy:  
Sinn Féin leader says a referendum on a united Ireland is a ‘democratic imperative’ if UK leaves EU under a no-deal Brexit. 
Dear Donald, I've got a concrete, realistic proposal from London:1. Rule out the economic carnage of No Deal.2. Extend Article 50.3. Hold a public vote which offers the choice between Theresa May's Brexit deal and remaining in the EU.  
“You are accused of pursuing the independence of Catalonia.”“Where does it say that the independence of Catalonia is illegal? Holding a referendum is not illegal. Working for independence is not illegal. Voting is not illegal. We did nothing illegal.”—Catalan VP @junqueras 
I don't believe ppl voted for a 'pig in a poke'. Every day sees news of impending disruption. No one voted to impoverish themselves" #Brexit  
Remainers, hold your nerve. May is no nearer to her Brexit deal | Martin Kettle  
Why is it left to a brilliant but skint/people-funded think-tank to make the concrete and ambitious case for Indy, while the main party of Indy footers around with WM amendments, soft power expeditions, & a Brexit framing? Asking for (a few hundred thousand) friends...   
A digger on the Irish border - the 'border buster' - stands as a monument to the lengths communities went to keep roads open during the Troubles. Now, it represents why the frontier matters so much in the #Brexit debate  
Memories of Northern Ireland's violent 'Troubles' are at the heart of the #Brexit debate  
'The country is stockpiling beans and body bags – but they won’t save us from Brexit’s bad politics' | Zoe Williams  
If Labour MPs enable #Brexit, Labour will be destroyed at the polls with many of its Remain voters turning to other parties or abstaining. And with FPTP that would divide the opposition vote in a way that would give the Tories a huge victory in terms of seats won.#PeoplesVote 
We need to step up to the plate, the clock is ticking. Brexit is an atrocious mess and the only way out of this is a people’s vote with the option to Exit from Brexit >  @joswinson 
It doesn’t get much clearer than a letter from 47-people who have represented Britain internationally for the past 20 years, demanding Theresa May put an end to this #Brexit buffoonery. Can Theresa May really ignore Lord Kerr and his band of Diplomats? CM 
All Remainers. And three want a second referendum. Are they handpicked by you @mrjamesob ?  
Brilliant @junqueras in the trial against the Catalan referendum.Accused of rebellion and facing 25 years in prison as the general prosecutor demands, he stands up and defends himself and the rights of the Catalan people: “organizing a referendum is not a crime!”  
#Brexit 'monster' urges Dutch to prepare.Hilarious. Whoever dreamt up this muppet had a great sense of humour, or has been taking far too much LSD...   
Colette and her children are demanding a #PeoplesVote because they're worried about the impact of #brexit on the NHS, business and their futures. Join her and demand a #PeoplesVote on the #Brexit deal:  
International Laughing Stock..... 
The #Brexit letter from the 40 former Ambassadors and Foreign Office figures hits the nail on the head:  “If the Prime Minister's deal is passed in Parliament, it will not be the end of Brexit but will in fact mark the start of year upon year of negotiation and renegotiation” 
The legacy media opposes Brexit. Like much of the political class at Westminster they reveal themselves to be profoundly anti democratic. Not worth watching. Turn off.  
In my fantasy world, the MPs wouldn't be having a pointless vote tonight.  Instead they'd be hearing from each Secretary of State about the #Brexit impact studies they had done on their respective sectors.  But alas I can only dream on....the reality is pure farce #endthechaos 
Campaign kicks off for Okinawa referendum on U.S. base relocation plan  
Brexit 'muppet' urges Dutch to prepare  
Roses are red,Violets are blue,Cancel Brexit,‘Cos I love EU.  
And if the Government had taken the time to discuss the wording of the motion with MPs on all sides of the Brexit debate they’d have achieved a clear & united signal to the EU as Brady did on 29th January  
Roses are pickedViolets are pluckedIf you support #BrexitYou can get fucked  #BrexitValentine #RevokeRemainRebuild 
Roses are redViolets are blue Enjoy them for Valentine's Cos Mothering Sunday falls after Brexit and on no deal there'll be no imports, no surviving florists and no flowers for you.#BrexitValentines 
Brexit - A Valentine's Day poem:Labour is redTories are blueNeither of them careWhat happens to you 
Boris Johnson is the Conservative MP most at risk of being voted out of parliament by his constituency! They're angry at the Government's handling of the housing crisis - on top of Austerity & Brexit disasters rained down on the UK by Tories! #ToriesOut  
Roses are redViolets are blue.Next year, post-BrexitI may need to eat you.#Valentines 
Nervous times as crisis grows. My latest Brexit Blog post on May's  contradictory messages, the danger of normalising no deal, why remainers  shouldn't lose hope - and what Bogart in The Maltese Falcon can tell us  about Brexit brinkmanship:  
To put this into context: imagine the Nigerian High Commission in London issuing a statement threatening British politicians with a travel ban to Nigeria if they don’t stop using abusive messages during the Brexit debates. That would be absurd right?  
RETWEET If you agree that both Politicians & Individuals (#FBPE) should #RespectTheResult of the 2016 referendum! #StandUp4Brexit #LeaveMeansLeave  
We met in Amsterdam 25 years ago. I followed him to London a year later. We are getting married this summer. He wants us to move to France because of Brexit and the hostile environment created by the Tories and Corbyn. Time to #RevokeArticle50 #WeLoveUK #LoveBroughtUsHere 
European venture capital funding for technology by country (2018):-UK £2.49bn -Germany £1.38bn-France £1.03bn-Switzerland £531.80m-Spain £275.05m-Ireland £110.76mSource: PitchBook 2018#DespiteBrexit #Brexit #WTO #NoDeal 
Striking chart from BoE’s Jan Vlieghe shows just how much UK business investment has diverged from the rest of the world since the referendum  
Brexit is changing everything, and also any economic effect is fake news.A weak EU is falling apart, and also has united to humiliate us.The UK is powerful, it holds all the cards, and also is being bullied.These narratives co-exist simultaneously for many. It must be hard. 
Retweet if you love the UK as much as i do. #Brexit  
It's not really about Churchill of course, anymore than Brexit is about the EU, or Gillette adverts are about gender relations. It's just the wrapping paper they put around their dreary fucking daily culture war bullshit. 
China is the UK's great hope after brexit (cunning plan huh?), don't our enlightened leaders know what that entails?  
New: 43 former British ambassadors & High Commissioners sign a letter urging MPs to reject May's deal and extend Article 50. The letter adds there is a "powerful argument" for a referendum.Sir Nigel Sheinwald, former ambassador to US, backs a People's Vote for the first time.  
Good! Get on with it and bring some sanity back!Corbyn 'faces 10 resignations over failure to push for new referendum'  
Final list: Valentine's Day Brexit amendmentsCorbyn: Meaningful vote by Feb 27Clarke: Indicative votesMacNeil: Revoke A50Soubry: Publish no-deal papersWollaston: Indicative votes, PM adopts winnerBlackford: Extend A50Four others: Mix of extending A50/2nd ref 
Brexit is national crisis, former diplomats tell Theresa May  
“Our country’s national interest must always be paramount. The Brexit fiasco has already weakened the UK’s standing in the world. We strongly advocate a change of direction before it is too late." With 43 days to go, 43 former ambassadors speak out 
Part David Cameron, part Piers Morgan – Alan Partridge returns in time for Brexit  
Great to see 43 former British Ambassadors - with 43 days until 29 March -  including 3 former Permanent Representatives to the EU (leading experts in their fields) calling to extend article 50 and for a #PeoplesVote on #Brexit  @peoplesvote_uk 
After 2 chaotic years of negotiation we have a Brexit deal which both remainers and leavers hate. Time to call a halt and start a national conversation about the future we want for our country. Then an informed public vote. 
ICYMI: The economic cost of the Brexit decision that Leaver voters do not get to see  If you asked each Leave household for almost £2000 as their contribution to Brexit, because that is how much its currently costing, would it really not be about economics? 
Make sure #Brexit does not get in your way when doing business! With this Brexit media campaign, the Dutch government urges companies to prepare for all Brexit scenarios.  
Brexit is national crisis, former diplomats tell Theresa May, as they add their voices to calls for a #PeoplesVote“The Brexit fiasco has already weakened the UK’s standing in the world. We strongly advocate a change of direction before it is too late."  
Here a Labour MP publically states that she will be voting with the Tories on Theresa May Brexit Plan and up to now there is not a single comment of dissatisfaction from any people who support the #PeoplesVote or those with #FBPE in their name. Now I wonder why that would be ???? 
With 43 days to go until #Brexit, today 43 British diplomats told the Prime Minister to delay #Brexit and hold a #PeoplesVote: 
"Jeremy Corbyn faces up to 10 resignations from the Labour frontbench if he fails to throw his party’s weight behind a fresh attempt to force Theresa May to submit her Brexit deal to a referendum in a fortnight’s time, frustrated MPs are warning." 
I've had enough of EU centric politicians bitching about Brexit & trying to put the UK down. Most of the worlds economic growth is occurring outside the EU. Australia, Canada, NZL, Japan, South Korea, Norway, Iceland, Vietnam, etc, all thriving outside the EU. Give it a rest.  
Bank of England MPC member Jan Vlieghe says the Brexit vote in 2016 has cost the UK economy £40bn per year - or £800m per week... that's more than double the £350m printed on the side of the Leave campaign's battle bus. 
I'm tired of hearing people in the Labour Party talking about a GE and a Labour Government negotiating a better deal. All types of #Brexit are bad (some are worse than others). And there's no guarantee that Labour will win a GE anyway. The only solution is to #RevokeArticle50 
Knowing #Brexit would hurt the car industry the Tories made a £61 mill. deal with Nissan in 2016. Despite this, Nissan have cancelled UK production of their new model. No deals or promises will protect our businesses from the full impact of Brexit. We need an #ExitfromBrexit! 
READ: 43 senior diplomats have called on the Prime Minister to delay #Brexit and hold a #PeoplesVote:  
Costs £0.00 to mind your own damn business despite price hikes, brexit etc. All currencies as well. Just in case you forgot. Aboa 
Wilson submits that it is irrational for the Prime Minister to treat the referendum result as binding which, had it been binding, would be void following the EC findings as they satisfy the conditions over and above those required to void an election or binding referendum.  
The entire piece is a continuation of the effort to try and hound Prof Brewer out of his job because he thinks a no deal Brexit is shite and has very little (read: nothing) to do with detailing any accusations of systemic discrimination or marginalisation in QUB.  
There's something magic about Brexit and 10% (if we allow a bit of vigorous rounding...)- 10% of the trade deals we need- 10% of the haulage permits we need- 10% of financial assets of the City moved to the EU27- 10% fall in GDP after a no-deal Brexit- 10% tariff on cars  
There was a whole country That swallowed a lieI don’t know whyThey swallowed a liePerhaps they’ll die#Brexit 
This is no Fellini film. These are independentist "Human walls" obstructing the Spanish police on the 1. October referendum. Scary movie, isn't it? #muralleshumanes 
Labour is redTories are blueThey both want BrexitWhat can we do? 
Why is Rutte being so harsh? Because it's for domestic consumption, not that he just fancied some Brit-bashing. His Govt isn't the stablest. The 2 major eurosceptic parties are together polling over a third of the vote. There are EU elections in May. He has to be hard on Brexit. 
Brexit: Sturgeon steps up no-deal planning - BBC News  
Uh-oh... Another possible post-Brexit trade deal scuppered, this time with China, after Gavin Williamson's bizarre "let's stomp the rest of the world with our massive army" (paraphrased) rant the other day...  
Let's hope the Speaker selects my Amendment to #RevokeArticle50 today - Brexit hassle/hell/boredom could end in an afternoon!... If he doesn't I will still make the argument for it & try again the next time ... There are however only 43 days to #RevokeArticle50 #Brexit 
Brexit really is a stitch-up, isn't it? This stinks to high heaven. An investigation into the forces undermining UK democracy is urgently needed, but don't hold your breath... 
Because Germans don’t sell anything to countries outside the EU. That’s how they ran up that huge trade surplus. - Daftest Brexit tweet yet, and that’s saying something. 
BBC reporting that situation in ISIS held "pocket" in Syria now *so* dire that ISIS wife wishes to return to UK, DESPITE BREXIT 
Roses are redViolets are blueFuck fucking Brexit We love the EU!  
Roses are redViolets are blue#Brexit is bonkersIt's not good for youOr meOr our kidsOr our welfareOr our businessesOr our livelihoodsOr our inclusivenessOr our neighbourlinessOr our rightsOr our healthcareOr our freedomsOr our futures#EUlovepoems#StopBrexit 
If Ford drives out of Britain because of Brexit will workers who voted to quit Europe volunteer first for redundancy to take back control?  
I understand why some on the far right think Brexit is wonderful for their hedge funds and shady backers, but I still can’t quite fathom why a trade union leader believes Brexit brings anything but misery for his members.  
Mark Rutte giving the Churchill lecture at Zurich university last night: "If the chaos of Brexit teaches us anything, it's that there is no such thing as splendid isolation."He was even more outspoken in interviews...  
Roses are red , Violets are blue, It’s now fairly obvious that Brexit is  #Valentine 
.@Anna_Soubry & I have tabled this important @eurelationsappg amendment to the PM’s Brexit motion to be debated+voted on later. It wld force Ministers to publish the most recent Cabinet briefing on the affects of a ‘no deal’ Brexit on business & trade. Good chance of a win  
I am a signatory to @sarahwollaston’s amendment to the PM’s motion today providing for the @HouseofCommons to decide what to do next on #Brexit by way of a series of indicative votes including on #PeoplesVote! 
There is no hope in #Brexit - it is a wretched episode in our history, reimagining a past that never was. It is the failure to understand the world as it is in the 21st Century and the challenges all human beings must face. It is the last refuge of a failed nasty nationalism. 
In case you're just tuning in: The government has somehow managed to screw up the wording of a neutral motion on Brexit which means large numbers of Tory MPs are threatening to rebel against the PM. 
Roses are redCats are courageousIt’s increasingly obvious thatBrexit is fiscally disadvantageous...#ValentinesDay⁠ 
On February 16 almost all the voters will chose a billionaire businessman to lead this country "Nigeria" based on his ability to conduct business and lead, rather than his personality.This election is a referendum on poverty.#AtikuWillWin#BuhariMustGo 
So, I understand the ERG will vote against the PM's deal tonight TO KEEP A NO DEAL BREXIT ON THE TABLE. Make a note of who these people are. They are people who want to see this country fail. There's a word for this! #RevokeArticle50 
I'm just amazed the Guardian didn't use the opportunity to deploy "despite Brexit," like this. "London schoolgirl who fled to join ISIS wants to return to UK despite Brexit" * P.S. the ISIS "schoolgirl" is now 19  
Roses are redViolets are blue... Arguing we can’t have a second referendum because of of the will of the people despite the overwhelming evidence of a catastrophic omnishambles so dire it would make the keystone cops blush...Is not a good view.#BrexitValentines 
I keep reading that to back out of Brexit now would be an “embarrassment”; we are LITERALLY *the laughing stock of the world* right now BECAUSE of Brexit.Backing out would be our only hope of regaining a shred of dignity.  
More than 40 ex-diplomats calls for second EU referendum  
Martin Selmayr used grubby tactics to get himself in a position of tremendous power. EU officials like him are totally unaccountable to the public. This is why we need a clean #Brexit, says @FraserMyers 
A Valentine's Day poem to our politicians, written and shared with love:Roses are redViolets are bluePlease cancel BrexitOr we're royally screwed. 
This eloquent and angry denunciation of the Prime Minister’s handling of Brexit is essential reading. The Letwin/Cooper motion ruling out no deal is the last remaining hope of avoiding looming disaster.   
Brutal stuff from Dutch PM Rutte: 'It's the UK that Brexit will leave weakened. It's already on the wane compared to 2-3 years ago. It's going to become a middling economy stuck out in the Atlantic. It's too small to appear on the world stage on its own.'  
More than 40 ex-diplomats calls for second EU referendum over Brexit 'fiasco'  
UK fastest growing G7 country in Europe:Q/Q ; 2018Q4 v 2017Q4UK 0.2% ; 1.3%France 0.3%; 1.0%Germany 0.0%; 0.6%Italy -0.2%; 0.1%#Brexit 
Lasting damage: Bank of America has spent $400m on preparing for Brexit, which has seen the bank move operations from London to Dublin and Paris. They say the decision to reorganise its business would not now be reversed, even if Brexit did not happen.   
Carole Cadwalladr finds out things that no-one else does and sees the connections way before the rest of us. This time she's joined the dots between Brexit apologist Andrew Neil (chief political interviewer for the BBC) and shadowy Ulster PR men with links to Russian mobsters.  
And the whole history of Brexit is that of a minority of MPs successfully agitating for an outcome which the majority of MPs fecklessly tolerated. 
What an earth have they been doing since we voted leave? .....Theresa May must pass over 450 separate outstanding laws before Brexit Day  
A good exercise for any Brexit reporter is to be asked to explain the backstop while reclining in a dentist’s chair, seconds before your check up starts. 
"Daddy, what was the world like before the Great Brexit Famine?"'Well, we spent most of our time arguing over a dead man named Churchill, now eat your rat it's getting cold.' 
Should Madrid allow #Catalonia to hold an independence referendum? 
13. That's quite different from the argument that Eurosceptics used during the referendum. Instead their argument was based on the fact that companies, such as Unilever, got it wrong before so they're wrong this time. But also quoting newspaper article titles, which is weird.  
Liam Fox getting roasted on @BBCr4today about South Korea and trade deals.Amazing thing is that if you want “free trade”, then the EU provides the world’s greatest network of trade deals.Brexit isn’t about that. It’s about one thing: Slashing standards. 
PM is promising last minute cash for areas that desperately need investment after years of cutsBut if she was interested in listening to #Brexit voters – not just winning their MPs’ support for her deal – she’d also overhaul our democracyMy @NewStatesman piece on @DearLeavers 
The Government wants Brexit to end with a Deal with the EU. That can only mean the Government will allow the EU to have some strings attached where they will keep some control over the UK post Brexit. That is not Brexit. 
Every time you think the Brexit debate has bottomed, it reaches a new low.   McDonnell attack on Winston Churchill is a deliberate distraction from Labour’s divisions.  But thanks @NSoames for introducing  “Poundland Lenin” to Lexicon of putdowns 
Imagine you are Putin, imagine what a ‘successful Brexit’ would look like to you. Now do those Brexiter-Russian connections look a little less innocent?  
All our friends are in productive relationships with other countries, engaging in delightful exchanges of goods, services and cultures.... While our country is sat at home alone just f***ing itself.Happy Brexit #ValentinesDay  
Remain or leave, a no-deal Brexit would be a betrayal of all Britain's young people, @metecoban92 blogs 
#r4today - today a crucial #Brexit vote. Main report about possible splits in Labour and Tories. Nothing on good of country. Fault not @BBC, but #brokenpolitics. We need modern, functional democracy where parliament reflects people's views. @MakeVotesMatter 
Government now favouring a meal-deal Brexit, which is the Norway model plus crisps and an Aero. 
Brexit was voted in off the back of criminality. Any comments on that Len? And that is why we need an untainted #peoplesvote with an option to remain. #BrexitCrisis 
If the Dutch really wanted to represent Brexit with a big hairy bumbling character who just gets in the way and contributes nothing of value, why not just call Boris?  
1. Why is Ford leaving? Is it the risk of hard Brexit? Or because we’re abandoning the Customs Union? Is it because we’re leaving the Single Market? Or is the Euro? (Thread)  
Corbyn wants BrexitTheresa does tooBut nobody knowsHow to leave the EU #BrexitValentines @DavidHenigUK 
I think the most nuanced view of Churchill was actually expressed by the man himself, who famously said, “We have 43 days until fucking Brexit. Stop arguing about fucking Churchill and focus on the imminent fucking disaster ahead. FFS.” 
"Forty-three days before the UK left the EU, Brexit finally had enough power to assume physical form in the Netherlands."  
Omg this really is for real. A Brexit Muppet. Lordy I love the Dutch.  
The #UN and #EU should organize a referendum in Catalonia and respect the will of the people, whatever it may be #Catalonia 
Only the Catalans can determine their own future.  Maybe they want independence, maybe not, but to know it we need a referendum #Catalonia 
How can people say Brexit is not having an effect already? Look what it’s done to the Honey Monster.  
The Spanish Socialist Party is complicit in the denial of self-determination to millions of Catalans.  At the very least a new referendum must be held #Catalonia 
#HAPPYVALENTINES DAY!!! "Roses are red Violets are blue #Brexit is a mess,I want #EU!"  Please tweet your love poem today using the hashtag #EUlovepoems  let's spread a little #Love  #WeAreEurope #StopBrexit #ValentinesDay2019 
What is in the best interests of the country is to #RevokeA50, which arose only because of an illegally procured advisory Referendum result, (a very narrow result at that, one which would not be repeated today) and #Remain in the EU. 
Today’s A380 decision has nothing to do with Brexit. It’s a business decision driven by changing global patterns of aviation technologies #AirbusResults #A380 #Airbus 
Brexit allows the UK to seize international opportunities. Let’s embrace it! #GlobalBritain #students4brexit 
“Brexit voters’ critique is rational and forward-looking: it’s Remainers who are obsessed with past dreams and still see sunshine, prosperity and peace when they look over the Channel, rather than gilets jaunes and criminal levels of youth unemployment” 
Roses are redViolets are blueMade a personal BrexitBecause I love EU. 
Why does @KateHoeyMP always put a positive spin on Brexit as if there could be no downsides whatsoever? Is it the passing of the years that has incapacitated her from seeing the broader view?  
“Threatens the whole democratic fabric on which we operate” What Len McLuskey - the fabric of lies, misinformation, dark money & Electoral Law being broken? Is that the fabric you’re talking about? #Brexit #BrexitShambles 
The Foreign Office knows very well that Brexit is catastrophic for UK influence and foreign policy.  
Roses are redAnd Brexit means BrexitUnless an amendmentTotally wrecks it 
THREAD (New York Times).“The Post-Brexit Food Chain: ‘This Is Really, Really Scary’.Food retailers and producers warn that supermarkets and food outlets would be the first to feel the impact of Britain crashing out of the European Union with no deal”.  
Everyone can see this except swivel eyed Brexit loons.  
We are winning the argument for a #PeoplesVote.Every day more #Labour voters, members and MPs declare that we must campaign to #Remain in the EU.The clock is ticking, but #Brexit is not inevitable.  
Brexit is national crisis, former diplomats tell Theresa May  
What was voted for isn’t on offer.No-one is going to be thanked for delivering something that makes people worse off, and which doesn’t fulfil the promises made in 2016.We have to get real. Pretending Brexit is fine will do far more damage to trust in politics than the truth  
People in Wakefield- your country needs you.Brexit protest TODAY Leeds 5.30pm.  
Roses are red Brexit is blue Britain will be better off Outside the EU 43 days to go!! #ValentinesDay  
An interesting fact:Google Trends for the term “No Deal” are being flooded with crossword related searches to bump all Brexit related content down the rankings.That’s dangerous for the public. Whether it’s deliberate will be seen by tomorrow. 
And more savage criticism of the PM's negotiating approach here - in the FT. Which bear in mind global business leaders will be reading. The message about how badly Brexit has been handled is spreading, and the economic damage growing daily.  
Good Morning Mr Raab. I'm sure it is an oversight on your part but you appear to have blocked these good people. I say oversight because I'm sure you agree freedom of speech and to protest is a cornerstone of democracy. So here is a reminder about what you said regarding Brexit. 
The Dutch must be so well prepared for Brexit that they even had time to hoist an intern at the foreign ministry into this suit.  
Heroic Brexit MPs are set to defy May tonight by voting against a disgraceful motion that would rule out No Deal. In any serious negotiation, No Deal should ALWAYS be an option - it's time for May to wake up and get behind a clean Brexit!Support us at  
70-80% of fish caught in the UK is sold to Europe. A no deal Brexit would take Scotland out of the CFP but an overwhelming majority of a fresh product could end up going off sitting at a border. That’s if trade happens with countries no longer allowed to fish in UK waters. 
It's quiet. Too quiet. So what on earth is going on with the Brexit negotiations?  
Behold the Dutch government's Brexit muppet, which is being used to inform businesses of brexit risks by disrupting biz and trade.That's the Dutch foreign minister with the blue monster, which could be called Brexy my sources suggest.  
#brexit is what happens when schools teach the curriculum of the past, not the future. 
The Choice of Biafra Referendum Over Nigeria Election: February 14, 2019 By Desmond Ajah |…  
EDITED - Not interrupted her! - EDITED HER RESPONSE! So they invite a right winger on to abuse an SNP member of parliament for a minute and a half, then edit out her response. I dare any unionist to tell me the BBC isn't biased. Go on! | #brexit #indyref2 #scotref 
He’s right. May is a remainer, her top negotiators are remainers, the only Brexit she will deliver is Remain.  
NB Olly Robbins may be a poor negotiator and IMO should be moved to other duties, but he is NOT Prime Minister. The policy he is implementing is her policy.He is being made a whipping boy by people who find it inconvenient to confront the fact that the PM is selling out Brexit. 
Roses are redViolets are blue Brexit is shiteAnd May is too Roses are red Violets are blue Corbyn is crap And hasn’t a clue Roses are red Daffodils are yellowVince is invisible But a nice fellow Roses are red Grass is GreenCaroline Lucas Is the best I’ve seen 
Roses are redBrexit makes me blueSo let's have a public voteTo stay in the EU#ValentinesDay 
Brexit is sadIt‘s driving me madDon‘t know what to doBut UK: I  you. 
They can make all the plans they want. #Brexit is not about business. It’s more important than that. Business should adapt to what the people voted for, not the other way round.  
Everybody keeps saying ‘Brexit uncertainty’, but what they actually mean is ‘Brexit’.  
An astonished Sky News to Spanish Govt official: "I'm sorry, you're comparing holding a referendum against the wishes of the central government to... RAPE? And are you honestly saying that that should earn a sentence of 25 years?"  
Irene Lozano (@lozanoirene ), Secretary of State for Global Spain (@GlobalSpain), compares the Catalan independence referendum with rape.@SkyNews reporter Dominic Waghorn's (@DominicWaghorn) shocked reaction:"I'm sorry, you're comparing holding a referendum... to rape?"  
Comparing a referendum to a rape is just sick. It does explain however why 5 rapists are free while democratically elected politicians are in jail for following their electorate mandate which by the way happens to be their job. 
moment of truth is looming for Labour rebels wanting to start a new party, multiple sources say the schism will come if and when Corbyn doesn’t support amendment for 2nd referendum in two weeks time...which will also trigger several frontbench resignations  
Roses are RedViolets are BlueBrexit is going as wellAs this rhyme.#brexitvalentines 
Brussels collectively wonders whether the U.K. prime minister can deliver any Brexit deal  
This is a very interesting video to dissect and examine. First, she compares a referendum to rape and then when the journalist faces her with her own statement she denies it and it seems that we all did not understand what she meant. Let us open a tiny thread   
Might this finally be the moment when Brexit breaks Labour?   
The UK government has had almost 3 years to negotiate Brexit with the EU and still they are behaving like immature, self entitled playground bullies. And like all bullies, they are behaving like this because of their inherent inferiority complex. 
Jeremy: This is awful! Half the Shadow Cabinet'll resign if I don't back a 2nd Referendum!Seumas: So?J: We'll lose the election! Voters hate divided parties.S: So? Brexit happens, Tories win, economy tanks. Riots. Another election.J: Then we win!S: Long game.#r4today 
Corbyn 'faces 10 resignations over failure to push for new referendum'.Even McDonnell acknowledges that a General Election is unlikely. Time Corbyn did the same & Labour supported a #PeoplesVote. 
Oh my God... The Dutch government has finally unveiled its Brexit muppet...  
I voted Remain but as a democrat feel duty-bound to help ensure Brexit is delivered, writes @Harry_J_Todd 
The leader of the new Brexit Party, Catherine Blaiklock, who is backed by Nigel Farage, has claimed that Foodbanks “are creating a dependent, obese population.” The average user visits a Foodbank twice a year. This new party claim to have gathered 35,000 supporters in just hours. 
Good to see @johnmcdonnellMP back @Keir_Starmer over the anonymous briefers in Jeremy’s office. No way Labour can force an election before #Brexit day. May has rejected our offer. Time to honour our unanimously agreed policy for #PeoplesVote 
Could there be another defeat for @Theresa_May? Tory Brexiteers have suggested they are ready to rebel in a #Brexit vote later today  
Leave's Brexit vanity project put 863,000 Welsh, English and Scots auto jobs in the firing line. Now Boris, May, Corbyn, Farage, Rees-Mogg, Batten, Leadsom, Patel, et al are pulling the trigger to save their political skins. Sickening.  
Spanish Government official Irene Lozano (@lozanoirene) compares holding a referendum to rape in an interview with Sky News. Sky News presenter can't believe what he is hearing.  
Britain is due to leave the EU in 6 weeks but nobody knows how. All this Brexit uncertainty means the pound looks increasingly vulnerable  
And I repeat, the 4 M’s (Murphy, McCluskey, Milne and McDonnell) want Brexit. They said over their ‘Dead body’ would they support a People’s Vote. They mean it and democracy in Labour be damned. Institutional parties have failed.  
The EU have published legislation which guarantees the Channel Tunnel remains open for 3 months after a no deal Brexit giving time for the UK and France to renegotiate the treaty that underpins the crossing.@LeShuttle  is #NoDealReady 
Remainers, hold your nerve. May is no nearer to her Brexit deal | Martin Kettle  
It is unreasonable to treat the 2016 referendum result as binding, since it was only advisory.  Had it been binding it would now have been voided, because of the wrong doing. We should not be tied to a three year old fraudulent decision. #StopBrexitSaveBritain 
Brexit: National self-harm. We don’t have to do this!  
Today’s the day that we need you!If you can get to London, please go & support @SODEMAction. If you can get to #Leeds, please come to City Square at 5.30pm as we march in solidarity with those protesting at Westminster. From South to North, the people are rising up! #Brexit  
'Border buster' shows why Brexit frontier checks in Northern Ireland would matter  
NEW: Labour frontbenchers in 'threat to quit' if Jeremy Corbyn fails to back second Brexit referendum push 
In a post-Brexit world, men like Len McCluskey would retire to subsidised accommodation on gold plated pensions while their members watched their jobs disappear forever.  Four legs good, two legs better. 
Only 6 out of 40 trade deals will be ready in time for Brexit - that includes the Faroe Islands. The 40 trade deals will cover 70 countries but the vast majority are classified as 'off-track' or worse. The whole of Brexit is off-track and should be binned! #StopBrexit #SaveTheUK 
Nicola Sturgeon says the Scottish government will do everything in its power to stop a no-deal Brexit. Problem is, as part of the UK, Scotland has no power. #UseTheMandate 
I'm definitely getting ground down by this relentless and expensive brexit fiasco. I'm sick of it! I've turned from simply wanting to leave to hating the eu with such a passion. Having looked into it,  PLEASE just get us away from the vile thing. It's destroying Europe! 
“We in Unite put more money and resources in campaigning for a remain vote, but we lost and you have to accept the democratic decision of a referendum.”  
Ford now preparing to leave... apparently the PM will offer some compensation, no doubt tax breaks and subsidies etc, further defunding the State according to their doctrine. Who's gonna pay? We are, in taxes and cuts. Brexit is a scam. #FBPE 
It’s an absolute basic fact of all negotiations* that if you walk away, you keep the status quo ante. (* But not this one.)I wonder how many passing commentators have ever actually successfully conducted an Article50 negotiation. #brexit #basic 
The #UK's close affiliation with #Australia makes #CANZUK the best choice after #Brexit.Contact your local MP today and ask them for their support: #cdnpoli #auspol #nzpol #ukpolitics 
I honestly could not believe what I was hearing, Andrew. A Spanish minister-Irene Lozano? comparing Catalan vote to RAPE. Also talking about fake images during the actual referendum. "I normally use this metaphor of sex"... On SKY news world news overnight and this morning ..  
Britain's housing slump endures as Brexit causes both buyers and sellers to hesitate on deals  
No it isn't. It's about fucking brexit. It's like saying the 10 yr economic downturn has nothing to do with the financial crash.   #FFS these people..  revisionism  in real time 
John Ruskin’s ‘universal law of obscurity’ is that ‘WE NEVER SEE ANYTHING CLEARLY’ (his capitals) - from Andrew Hill’s new biography. A profound insight which stands against guff about modernity & helps explain collosal errors like Brexit  
Thank you for standing up for the majority & our rights. The referendum was run fraudulently with foreign interference & lying propaganda. We are stuck with outdated first past the post 2 party tribalism which doesn’t represent what the majority of people want which is #remain 
The @pngnri Bougainville Referendum #Research Program released its sixth report titled “Status and Implementation of the #Bougainville #Peace Agreement (#BPA) and Implications for #Referendum” . The report was... @janet_rowaro  #PNG 
kind of unfortunate this got overshadowed by may's "just take the mold off your old jam and we'll all get through brexit"  
Brexit goes mouldy  
The heavy cost of May’s Brexit vanity  
Britain is being held hostage to Theresa May’s Brexit vanity  
75% are STILL voting #LabCon, even though #LabCon have betrayed them over #Brexit.Why?#LabCon will continue to betray you until you stop voting for them. 
I was there at the Brexit rally at Labour conference. Heard all about the union leaders nonsense about "getting Corbyn in to No 10 to negotiate a 'worker's Brexit'."Those of us here in reality aren't just going to indulge your nonsense.#StopBrexit 
May urged to stand ground against 'EU bullying' – Thatcher 'would've CELEBRATED Brexit'  
After a v long day at   I kicked back with @sarbjeetjohal talking biz models, tech strategy with life, the universe & everything else thrown in (inc #Brexit)! But.... #cloud #ai #iot #ThirstyThursday #sanfrancisco #nomoney #excuses @TmanSpeaks @digitalcloudgal @IBM 
There is no positive slant that can be put on #Brexit by anyone who's being honest.The Brexit Broadcasting Corporation has tried its best to do the government's bidding, as you do, but even the BBC are finding it difficult to hide the sheer scale of the impending disaster now. 
Activists in the U.K. plan to put up 150 billboards quoting promises and predictions politicians made about Brexit."There is something about the digital news cycle where all these kind of untruths and lies just fly past you and you forget," one man says.  
Uluru. Voice. “If we are elected as the next government of Australia, we intend to hold a referendum on this question in our first term as our partners have asked us to do. I'm optimistic the reform can succeed, the referendum can succeed” @billshortenmp is Listening AND Hearing! 
The referendum was marred by corruption & lies. How do you honour lies? And corruption which would annul a mandatory referendum?Speaking of lies, Mrs May: Why did you lie about no payment to Nissan?About corruption: Did you stop the NCA from investigating Banks/Kremlin money?  
I just want to say ‘Thanks Brexit.’ I’ve been trying for years to convince my brother that an independent Wales is possible. He’s always disagreed. But yesterday, he finally agreed with me. And it’s due to the f*cking shower of self-serving Tory-Labour MPs at Westmonster.  
A Universal Credit claimants is sanctioned for 8 weeks just for arriving 15 minutes late for an appointment, while Tory Transport Secretary, Chris Grayling, blows £800,000 on his failed Brexit ferry contract  
Court dismissed case against student activists for Vote No campaign in junta constitution referendum in 2016. Campaign OK afterall. จับๆ ฟ้องๆ ไปก่อน แล้วค่อยยกฟ้องทีหลัง   
The Government could only muster 69 votes in the House of Lords last night against a ‘stop no deal Brexit’ resolution - the smallest Governmemt vote, on a whip, I can ever remember on a major issue 
If this doesn't kill Brexit, nothing will: 
I predict a Brexit but without the actual ‘exit’… the deal before us isn’t really leaving the EU at all  
Len McCluskey is lost.A union leader that actively now wants Brexit. A situation that will guarantee to cause thousands of his @unitetheunion members to lose their jobs!The excuse of 'democracy will suffer' is worn out & tired. We now know electoral fraud bought the result. 
Brexit: a paucity of deals - concluded trade deals cover just £16 billion of the £117 billion relying on EU FTAs. Add non-FTA agreements  and the lack of continuity could prove devastating to our overall, post-Brexit export effort...  #Brexit.  
The Brexit “fiasco” has already weakened the UK’s standing in the world.  We strongly recommend a change of direction before it is too late.Brexit is a national crisisMore than 40 ex ambassadors & High Commissioners write a letter to the PM 13/2/2019. 
Hey TheresaYou have no plan.No one supports your deal.The ref was advisory.Leave's victory was won with illegal money and lies.Your red lines are incompatible.All forms of Brexit harm the UK.We only have 43 days left.At this point, if you're not nervous you're insane. 
BREXITEER Jacob Rees-Mogg congratulated International Trade  Secretary Liam Fox on securing a Swiss trade deal and highlighted the opportunity for the UK after Brexit to escape from the "protectionist"  European Union.  
Aside of the unfortunate comparison, a non authorized referendum is NOT a criminal offense. It had been, but it was removed from the code of law years ago. 
Brexit is national crisis, former diplomats tell Theresa May  
Unlike the backward-looking Remainers yearning for a glorious EU past that never existed, Brexit supporters are forward looking, both in understanding the EU’s future superstate plans & it’s coming failure. Brexiteers are safeguarding our children’s future.  
A huge thank you to @ChefConsultant @HouseOfFeasts for agreeing to speak to @BBCNews @BBCWorld about #Brexit, #settledstatus and of course #Polishcooking. 
Len, I am quitting unite over your brexiteer-ing. Been a member for around 15 years. Left Labour too. There is no good Brexit. 
“Our country’s national interest must always be paramount. The Brexit fiasco has already weakened the UK’s standing in the world. We strongly advocate a change of direction before it is too late. It is clear that Brexit has turned into a national crisis.”  
#Minnesota needs to have a referendum and remove Omar now! 
Wow. Begs the question, "Why on Earth is the UK Govt implementing Russian Foreign Policy: #Brexit?We must pause #Brexit until we know:- Source of Banks' £8mn- Why PM blocked investigation into Banks pre-#EURef- What Cabinet knew of #EURef illegality before triggering A50 
Sick & tired of MPs talking 'Compromise' & finding ways to bring #Brexiters & #Remainers together!!How do you bring IN or OUT/#Brexit or #Remain together?!!We had the Compromise...IN at low cost but out of future integration. Opt Outs & Vetoes secured MAX CONTROL.Wazzocks! 
Roses are redBrexit is stupidMarry a migrantDo your bit for Cupid 
Got some new toys but I think they caused Brexit.  
I'm by no means a Bertie Fan by a mile, but he absolutely nailed it here & on previous questions from committee today in Westminster - look at Sammy GAMMON Face Wilson.DUP = wrong side of history Just remember  is by far *united* on the need for the backstop #peace #Brexit  
Roses are redFuck fortress BritainAt least after BrexitNobody will want in  
The public have had enough of Brexit.56% of the public now want to #Remain.Write to your MP to support this amendment to #RevokeA50. 
The difference between Ireland 2nd ref on Lisbon Treaty and a 2nd ref on Brexit is that the Irish govt learned from the first ref, spoke w Brussels and educated the public. The UK gov't have had propaganda, censorship of dissent & industry leaving, disinformation, incl. by BBC 
Brexit is the world’s biggest slow motion car crash. Theresa May needs to let go of the wheel and let Parliament take the drivers seat 
Tennessee is beating the shit out of South Carolina so bad the announcers have started talking about Brexit 
Brexit: MPs to debate next steps  
I was a lifelong Labour voter. I became a member when Corbyn became Leader & even paid £25 to support him. I believed he would put the country & it’s people 1st. Then came the Ref. I cancelled my membership when I realised @jeremycorbyn supported Brexit. Brexit will destroy UK 
Mary, I don’t think he cares.He and a friend are looking forward to when they are elevated to the House of Lords. He has a great pension, and nice union salary; precisely the kind of person who will not be affected by Brexit. I’m interested in those who will be affected by Brexit  
Totally this...  Well said Jack. Same thoughts here. It isn't over until #Brexit is finished and the UK is safely a full EU member.  #RevokeArticle50#JustMakeItStop #FinalSayForAll #PeoplesVoteNow #StopBrexit 
Would the UK thrive in our out of the EU? #brexit #eu #fbpe #StandUp4Brexit 
BREAKING POINT for Labour? MPs warn Corbyn ‘back second Brexit referendum or we quit’  
Then why are you moving not one but two of your funds to the EU to avoid brexit?  
Brexit Explained  
Funnily enough, was tweeting about The Firtash Foundation earlier, which Burnside advises/advised. And of course, as well as the Russians......he is also close to the DUP. Small world. 
Ive today resigned my membership of @unitetheunion and have cc'd in @ThangamMP  into the email.  I won't fund your support for brexit that will make our members poorer+curtail their rights.   We need to unite the party behind our agreed party conference motion now #peoplesvote 
Part David Cameron, part Piers Morgan – Alan Partridge returns in time for Brexit  
People’s jobs and livelihoods going up in smoke but no matter,  post Brexit we take back control of the spare parts.   
Brexit is 1055 hours away. #brexit 
@billshortenmp giving a brilliant Close The Gap speech, talking about a Recognition Referendum, shared partnerships & respect, dignity, Makarrata & Truth Telling.@ScottMorrisonMP talked about his Uncle Bob & Aunty Robyn and one day when he learned about aboriginals.#auspol #qt 
What is the point of a People's Vote?Quitters can't decide what Brexit they want.So the 'People', the majority wanting the same thing, want to Remain.Lets just Revoke Article 50.It's democracy. 
Yvette Cooper on why she's bringing forward a Bill to take a no-deal #Brexit off the table, and why it's absurd to think that stopping Theresa May from using the threat of massive national self-harm is "weakening her negotiating position".#RevokeArticle50 #PeoplesVote  
"Today I'm proud to declare again that enshrining a voice for First Australians will be Labor's first priority for constitutional change."Says the referendum will happen in the first term, if Labor is elected. 
Bank of America spending $400m, to move 1300 jobs and $50bn of assets from London to Dublin and Paris because of #Brexit. This is irreversible and irrecoverable. Good job, UK. #ProjectFear #ProjectFact 
Unless @theresa_may @Conservatives deliver real Brexit, WTO article 24, you will lose the next GE. From the beginning you have underestimated the passion behind the leave vote! People waiting decades to get that chance, not to deliver is political suicide. @BorisJohnson 
Double Bonkers .. Brexit is bad AND the UK is not a nation   
Vince Cable has finally proposed a formal amendment demanding a 2nd referendum. When it inevitably fails, will the People's Vote campaign finally accept that there is no majority for a 2nd referendum in the Commons?  
Don't miss @A_Sloat as she breaks down all things Brexit with @BenjaminWittes on the @lawfareblog podcast 
If Jeremy Corbyn opened up a cat shelter Jess Phillips would complain he is neglecting stray dogs.it’s not about May or Brexit.... it’s a calculation of what damages Corbyn the most. 
Pete Wishart on the SNP's very own workplace parking tax.Apparently, it's a "Brexit Tory tax".I've seen it all now.  
Extraordinary. Your own investment outfit literally opened up in Dublin, explicitly because of the economic risk posed by no deal Brexit.  
The Leavers keep telling me it's over, and that my campaign work is futile. Well guess what, I'm not going anywhere and I will continue to expose Brexit for what it is: 1. Bought 2. Fraudulent 3. Build on lies 4. Undeliverable 5. Bad for Britain 6. interfered with. #NotGivingUp 
Theresa May threatened the unleashing of forces if #Brexit is stopped or delayed. And such words from the PM and ministers serve to incite, encourage and legitimise political threats, violence and disorder. It's very close to terrorism. 
What we shouldn’t let the Tories “get away with”- 120k deaths due to austerity- 800k on Seabourne - Windrush- Contempt of Parliament- Tax dodging- Bribing DUP for votes - Hostile environment- Brexit shambles- Brexit blackmail (my deal or no deal) - UC shambles  
Brexit is national crisis, former diplomats tell Theresa May ⁦@spconnolly⁩ ⁦@Ianbostridge⁩ ⁦@roseandfriends⁩ ⁦@AliceCoote⁩ ⁦@DavidLammy⁩ ⁦@DavidButtPhilip⁩ ⁦@paulcareyjones⁩ ⁦@CarolineLucas⁩ 
Most using Brexit as the excuse to attack @jeremycorbyn and of course one or two of them hoping to be the next Leader ! 
I re-read All The President's Men this week (last read 25+ yrs ago).Honestly, the parallels with Trump & Brexit are staggering. It's like they used it as a blueprint. Even down to the type of language employed ('elites') & the vote corruptionDont stop what you're doing, Carole. 
The First Minister @NicolaSturgeon on @itvpeston once again providing the level of leadership that has been in such short supply throughout the #Brexit process. The fact that @scotgov is discussing plans for food shortages during peace time is truly astounding! #BrexitChaos 
Perhaps if Darren were prepared to provide EC and other Brexit investigations with evidence of the  dishonesty/ criminality involved in the Brexit vote, so the REAL culprits are brought to book, he may find that the errors of his youth are looked on with greater compassion...  
Why did people vote for Brexit:1) people was annoyed with mass immigration which they had no say in2) people wants to hold there elected representatives to account not the EU3) we want to make our own laws and have our own say without being manipulated Missed anything? 
Do you know what pisses me off? Welsh Labour MPs who are anti Brexit and who want a cross party approach but who, when asked a question from a Plaid voter, ignore it. Tribalism runs deep. 
I strongly object to the abduction and sham prosecution of the Catalan legislators for organizing a referendum. - Erik Willey, South Bend, Indiana, U.S.To: @SpainInTheUSA 
58% of Britons say EU has been harsh towards UK during Brexit negotiations•83% of Conservative voters•84% of Leave voters•78% of over 65s•37% of 18-to-24-year-olds•48% of 25-to-49-year-oldsJust you try to negotiate a trade deal with China or US 
AGAIN: Things unacceptable to the British public that will lead to political oblivion for the Tory’s 1. May’s Deal with the Backstop2. May’s Deal without the Backstop3. May’s Deal in any shape or form4.Delaying Brexit 5. Ruling out No Deal6. Any form of customs union 
⁦So, we have the Maybot botching Brexit, failing Grayling giving a ferry contract to a company that doesn’t have any ferries, and Bojo the bozo spending £43 million of public money on a bridge to nowhere. The Tories’ rep for competence is utterly shot.  
Brexit has been great as reinvigorated national democracy. It's got people involved and passionate again in the political process.Like a torch it's shone light into dark areas of the body politic. That's why many are so upset. They don't want people involved.Good 
As did fishermen & farmers who could not continue without EU subsidies.As did Wales, Devon, Cornwall & North East. Areas that received big EU funding. Remain did a poor job of pointing out these facts in the referendum. However, it shows that Brexit was emotional not logical. 
May’s statements so far:Brexit means BrexitNo deal better than a bad dealNo deal no BrexitMy deal or another 2 years of procrastination.Her duplicity is beyond the pale, sidelining Davis & conspiring with Olly now been exposed, it’s a stitch up!@gerardjasper @BrexitKnight 
Champagne Len McCluskey is a rich man entirely insulated from the dire consequences of the Brexit he is happy to inflict on millions of ordinary people. He is no different to Rees Mogg, Johnson and the rest of the Tory hard right. And his views are exactly the same as Corbyn’s. 
Activists in the U.K. are putting the promises politicians made about Brexit on billboards to encourage citizens to hold public officials accountable as the deal's deadline nears. 
A new poll makes it devastatingly clear that if Labour is perceived as having enabled Brexit, it will lose 45 seats – including five of its seven precious Scottish seatsLabour’s true heartlands are remain: 4/5 of Lab voters think May’s deal will hurt UK 
Unite members think leaving single market will be bad for jobs by 57% to 18% and back a final say referendum by 57% to 34%  
The only thread you need on Brexit. Excellent work   
As #Cuba prepares for an upcoming final vote on proposed changes to the Constitution, state security agents have cracked down on activists by carrying out multiple arrests and raiding the homes of those who have called for a NO vote on the referendum.  
Thursday’s Guardian: Labour MPs warn Corbyn: back a second referendum or we quit #bbcpapers #tomorrowspaperstoday (via @MsHelicat) 
“The overwhelming feedback is that a no-deal Brexit would be extremely damaging… politicians are still not taking it sufficiently seriously” – our Economics Editor Ben Chu on what he’s been told by both big and small business firms today@BenChu_ | #newsnight 
My birthday is around Brexit day, will accept stockpiled goods as gifts 
My mentions are garbage right now. Fed up of Wetherspoons-frequenting gammon-faced brexit arsebastards attacking me simply for pointing out that they are subhuman scum, which they are. The more I block, the more inbred spunkpigeons keep popping up. It's exhausting  
'RTÉ rehabilitate Bertie Ahern #OperationTransformation. But, independent journalists remind the scumbag that #Mahon found he'd €275,000 dirty money.Fianna Fail corruption destroyed the country. He should ALWAYS be told#TonightVMTV #Brexit #ge20 #ValentinesDay #GRAMMYs 
Kay, your former chief political editor and now editor at large Adam Boulton implied that only riots can Stop Brexit. This might explain why Sky News comes across so anti Brexit which in turn causes a lot of frustration.  
The sunlight uplands promised by the Brexiters turns out to be the land of spam and tinned peaches.As #Brexit reality bites we need to find out what flavour the will of the people is now. We need a #PeoplesVote #FinalSay with the option to #Remain so we can #ExitFromBrexit 
Does anyone honestly believe Brexit is going to be stopped? I appreciate MPs are trying to do this, but I don't sense it has enough support in WM. 
Approx 10% of PhDs and MW Fellows get jobs in UK universities - to the benefit of UK HE Pragmatically, as with the rest of Brexit, it’s a shot in the foot - and that’s not even mentioning the Pension bill that will be in the post on March 29 if they go ahead with this  
"It is irrational for the PM to treat the referendum result as binding which, had it been binding, would be void following the EC findings as they satisfy the conditions over & above those required to void an election / binding referendum"@RobertCPalmer13 
But, having that conversation may facilitate the mitigation of that risk.It’s just important people realise that *if* a second referendum were to take place, it is *far* from a given it would change the outcome.Down to you all to make that change happen. 
I’m sick of this.If McCluskey *really* believes in democracy, why don’t we ask Labour’s internal democracy their judgement about a public vote on Brexit, rather than rely on McCluskey’s diktat on the matter?Oh wait. We have.  
Brexit is national crisis, former diplomats tell Theresa May  
Theresa May and the ERG are deliberately running down the clock to obtain a no-deal #Brexit. Article 50 says that notification must be in accordance with a nation's "constitutional requirements" (not laws). The referendum was corrupted by crime so it was not in accordance.  
We are sleepwalking to disaster with Brexit. When will @theresa_may respond to yet another wake up call. Extend article 50. Remove the cliff edge. 
Hard to believe how fundamental these 20 key, business-critical Brexit questions the British Chamber of Commerce has identified are. Firms all over the UK are stuck treading water, or forced to take gambles on what *may* happen.  
Leave that thing & the jihadi spawn where they are.  Wants free everything at our expense & will then blow innocent people up & DEPORT it's entire UK family#Brexit #ukip #ForBritain f 
Based on the data available to me, any second Brexit referendum would likely result in a lower voter turn out than 2016, but a significantly higher margin in favour of Leave.I know that may be challenging to hear, but it’s an important discussion to have. 
3. The interview covered JM’s youth, working life before politics, Brexit, labour plans for govt, anti semitism...and that answer is the big takeaway?! You don’t have to be a Labour supporter (I’m not) to find that weak #playbooklive 
Excl: Tories target Jeremy Corbyn’s integrity as secret polling reveals just 11% now think he is principled after Brexit flip flops 
The taxes these companies and their employees pay go to fund our schools, hospitals and old age pensions.When they're gone, those who voted for Brexit in rejection of years of austerity, like the rest of us, are going to be very angry.#PeoplesVote 
Thursday’s GUARDIAN: Labour MPs warn Corbyn: back a second referendum or we quit #tomorrowspaperstoday 
Oh look, a war monger and Merkel, with people like him, who needs enemies German government 'told by Blair to expect second referendum'  
Doing Papers @SkyNews as 10 Labour MPs vow to quit frontbench if @jeremycorbyn doesn’t back 2nd referendum. Some may quit party altogether 
Violets are blueRoses are redGet the body bags for Brexit as soon we'll be dead. 
Whatever type of Brexit people voted for, I doubt it was an incompetent one. @Conservatives have only themselves to blame. Another grand political promise fails spectacularly. 
Do you remember when the Tory Government said austerity was coming to an end. Mmm, they lied! If you listen to Jacob Rees Mogg, the benefits from #Brexit are 50 years away. How do you feel about 50 more years of Tory austerity? And please don't think Jeremy Corbyn will end it! 
I know all the experts and business leaders are saying Brexit's going to be awful and that, but what about Steve from Portsmouth who has a "gut feeling" everything will be fine? Shouldn't we listen to Steve's intestines? 
The words “Ireland rejoining the UK” have trended countless times during Brexit. Regardless of the speaker and their intentions - the word REJOIN should never be used them. As it assumes we joined you. Political Unions under free will and Colonisation are highly distinct acts. 
Brexit is national crisis, former diplomats tell Theresa May  
Labour MPs: second referendum or we quit-Tomorrow’s Guardian  
Champagne Len McCluskey is a rich man entirely insulated from the dire consequences of the Brexit he is happy to inflict on millions of ordinary people. He is no different to Rees Mogg, Johnson and the rest of the Tory hard right. And his views are exactly the same as Corbyn’s. 
UK exports in 2017: (£bn)EU  £274.00bn USA  £46.50bnChina  £16.91bnJapan  £5.79bnCanada  £4.90bnAustralia  £4.59bnSaudi Arabia  £4.26bnIndia  £4.13bnSouth Africa  £2.15bnBrazil  £1.83bnSpot the problem. #Brexit 
The usual scum trying to stop Brexit.Not trying to delay but to stop.It’s time we stopped them.  
“The people had a say 3 years ago, so they must now shut up and accept whatever #Brexit turns out to be, even though it’s very different from what was promised“  says @LenMcCluskey 
British PM rallies her people by telling them she has nothing to offer them but Brexit, mold, and expired preserves.  
McCluskey doesn’t care.  He supports Brexit.  
Varadkar admits to being 'lowballed' by the #NCH builders yet @fiannafailparty wants them in charge for #Brexit .Riddle me that  #TonightVMTV 
BREXIT REVOLT: 80 Tories threaten to REJECT May's Brexit plan in Commons showdown TOMORROW  
Brexit as seen from the Irish borderlands, amid fear & anger about the prospect of No Deal, and what leaving the EU might mean for the peace process... the new #AnywhereButWestminster 
At the request of @terrychristian I have deleted the poll about his views on employers laying off Brexit voters first.I'm a huge fan of Terry and I respect his views. Please show him the respect he deserves x 
What is the point of @LenMcCluskey? His job is to protect his workers. Every form of Brexit makes the people he represents poorer. Oh and Unite members and Labour members back a People’s Vote. Guy’s a disgrace.  
Guardian front page, Thursday 14 February 2019: Labour MPs warn Corbyn: back a second referendum or we quit  
Delighted to hear that Brexit won't be quite as bad as WW2.  Stick it on the side of a bus, please. 
We shouldn’t have to be planning for a no deal Brexit with all the risks that brings when PM could take it off the table now. Tomorrow Parliament has the chance to instruct the UKG to stop a No Deal Brexit.  
EU officials: UK only 'pretending to negotiate' over Brexit  
And he is also dictating the policy of the labour leadership. There is not one, not one benefit from Brexit for the members he is paid so very highly to represent.  
Tonight’s business headlines:- Shutdown fears subside, trade hopes lift stocks- Google announces $13 billion investment in US- Sawiris: If Maduro leaves, I will invest in Venezuela - Ford warns of risks from no-deal Brexit for Britain 
Can't wait for the first "but Poch hasn't won anything" reductive, Brexit, Keysian, shite bollocks.He's a fucking great manager.  #TOTBVB 
“Dublin is our Headquarters for our European bank now, full stop. There isn’t a return. That bridge has lifted.” - @BankofAmerica VP @AnneFinucane tells FT. BoA is creating a 500 person trading business in Ireland & moving $50 billion of assets. #Brexit  
13.2.19 UK car industry is being decimated by Brexit. Real people. Real jobs. Real families. Real poverty. This far right project is corroding the country, decimating real lives. May the puppet of the ERG. Corbyn delivering an opposition void. Putin satisfied. #StopBrexit 
Brexiters constantly respond to business warnings either disbelieving them or blaming anything other than Brexit. Business is not political. It’s about the best place/staff/value for money.The UK no longer meets the criteria. Job losses will get a lot worse. 
Theresa May braced for fresh Brexit defeat as MPs accuse her of ruling out no deal   via @TelegraphFully deserved! May is just trying to get her rubbish vassal state sell out passed. 
She is one of a long list of traitors, Corbyn, Letwin, Starmer, Greening, Soubry, Grieve, Bowles and many more, all trying to prevent Brexit and betray the Referendum result. Labour and Tory voters will not forget your actions at the next GE. Deselect them all.  
Spain’s Catalan political prisoners face jail sentences of up to 25 years for ‘rebellion’. I wonder what Brexiteers would get if Brexit were overturned? Our own Supreme Court of course would be as impartial as the Spanish one. 
President of EU Council Donald Tusk 'Still waiting!'Blistering Barnacles we just want to Leave!There is Nothing to Discuss!We are Leaving 29th March 2019...EU are the weakest link - Goodbye!#Brexit #EU 
Here is the food parcel I bought for my racist Brexit supporting brother in law for his birthday last year. Lovely staff in Sainsbury's helped me find it all  
Martin Selmayr’s anti-democratic manoeuvrings and ruthless power-grabs serve as an important reminder that the EU is a democracy-free zone:  #Brexit 
.@CBItweets President and Chairman of @Tesco John Allan says that many businesses are currently making plans to transfer out of the UK due to Brexit uncertainty.  
“If we’re happy to live on spam and canned peaches all will be well...”@CBItweets President and Chairman of @Tesco John Allan talks about life after a no-deal Brexit.  
Hell last week.  Now the guillotine.  EU behave like jilted psycho Ex.  #Irexit #Brexit  
Defeated the govt by 86 votes on its Brexit ‘policy’ tonight - Lab, #LibDems, Crossbenchers and some Tories. Third time in a month. 
During world war 2 this country was on its knees. We didn’t have food because the ships bringing it kept being sunk. People were being killed and bombed in our cities. A no deal brexit is nothing in comparison so stop the embarrassing and pathetic scare mongering and grow a pair! 
"A Brexit that delivers on the referendum result" simply means "a Brexit that I personally want to see implemented". This is true of every single form of Brexit, whoever espouses it, and however charming they may sound. 
House of Lords votes against no- deal Brexit again -beating Gvt by      86 votes 
Almost all the people who voted Remain do not support this deal. Most of the people who voted Leave do not support this deal. For the Prime Minister to insist that this deal “delivers on the result of the referendum”, in the face of total lack of support, is simply extraordinary. 
Time, money and effort wasted on Brexit to be poorer, weaker and more divided is a 21st scandal. Discussing the latest madness on @SkyNews with one of the guilty, Brextremist Right-whinger @toryboypierce 
If you want to know what kind of Brexit we face, and about antisemitism in Labour, please watch  at 10.45 on @itv. Gripping stuff from @LenMcCluskey @NicolaSturgeon @YvetteCooperMP @CBItweets John Allan, @jessphillips @stevedouble @HenryNewman. I was shocked and reassured 
Hope everyone in his union who loses their jobs post Brexit reminds him of this for the rest of his life.  
#brexit damage getting worse as #Ford tells #TheresaMay it’s off to alternative production sites outside UK| Reuters 
Dark money is pushing for a no-deal Brexit. Who is behind it?It must be made a serious criminal offence to engage in large scale political advertising without full transparency regarding those involved and those providing the funding. #FBPE #Brexit 
If Brexit happens McCluskey and all those who take this view will be spending a lot of time telling Unite members that keeping their job was ‘not the best option for our nation’. Oh, and if you are a Unite member in Ireland, tough luck.  
@LenMcCluskey another dyed in the wool #brexiteer dinosaur along with his incompetent lickspittle @jeremycorbyn consigning @UKLabour to the political wilderness for a generation with their determination to facilitate #brexit the project of the real establishment elite tax evaders 
BREXITEER MP Andrew Bridgen warned Prime Minister Theresa May that a  European Union plot to keep Britain closely aligned to the bloc after  Brexit through the controversial backstop proposal is Brussels’ “special place in hell” for Britain.  
I despise Mrs May's abhorrent Brexit cynicism with every fibre of my being.Fortunately I have found that I possess a whole bunch of fibres that I never knew I had that allow me to despise Mr Corbyn's Brexit cynicism beyond anything in this universe has ever been despised. 
Post-Brexit trade partners ask UK to lower human rights standards  
Why I think we are #BetterOffOut of the EU and why we should ensure #LeaveMeansLeave @LeaveMnsLeave #Brexit  
“If we’re happy to live on spam and canned peaches all will be well...”@CBItweets President John Allan talks about life after a no-deal Brexit.  
Corbyn faces frontbench exodus if he fails to seek new Brexit referendum  
Brexit preparations in the news today: 1. Royal London granted permission to move £1bn+ of assets to Ireland.2. Barclays have spent £100-£200m moving staff & operations out of UK.  3. Bank of America has spent $400m on Brexit.  What a waste of time, effort and resources. 
.@CBItweets President John Allan says that many businesses are currently making plans to transfer out of the UK due to Brexit uncertainty.  
When I first heard the word "Brexit" I thought it was stupid - especially when spouted by those who famously declared it meant "Brexit". Now, all it means to me is TOTAL SWIVEL-EYED INSANITY! #RevokeA50 #Remain 
I honestly hope the new Brexit Party gives a pass to true pro-liberation MPs of all notional parties, from Cash to Hoey to JRM, followed by a pincer movement targeting winnable seats and the worst Remoaners Eg Starmer, Rudd & Sourbry.Then,if funds allow, target Hammond et al. 
The second "350M a week for the NHS" turns into "We're stockpiling bodybags", you know it needs to be stopped. #Brexit 
Labour can fund all schools so every child can reach their full potential or it can do Brexit. It can’t do both.  
Business backs a WTO Brexit. John Longworth, former Director General of the British Chambers of Commerce explains why... Email your MP to help save Brexit:  
Brexit seems like a great excuse to go vegetarian.  
Brexit could be delayed for 2 Years if Parliament rejects Theresa May’  next proposal.  In 2 Years  anything can happen... like NO BREXIT. 
I’m Jess Phillips constituent. I want her to back Jeremy Corbyn and Labours policy on Brexit.  
Startling?  She does nothing but attack him personally.  And there has been no second referendum flip-flop.  Good grief, Tom. Be a bloody journalist, not a stenographer for the Tory government! 
.@LenMcCluskey says he has only met the Prime Minister once and the “stuff in the papers” about him negotiating Brexit is “all lies”.  
I know we should never judge on appearances but knowing that this is the arrogant, ignorant, swaggering face of Brexit Britain fills me with profound contempt and utter dismay.  
I spend most of my working week in EU countries and they are still mystified by Brexit, but when their sources are pro-EU European MSM and pro-EU UK TV channels I am not surprised. They have been told that it’s all about immigration and is a right wing movement. So I explain... 
If there is a simple Brexit truth it is this: May doesn’t care if it’s a no-deal Brexit or a deal Brexit, as long as it keeps the Tories from splitting. She’ll use no-deal as a prod to get them to support her deal, but if they don’t, no deal is a price she’s willing to pay. 
Deeply concerning when I agree with @LenMcCluskey twice on @Peston tonight. Firstly in our admiration for @LFC and 2nd in our belief that the result of the 2016 referendum should be respected. 
Peter Brookes on #JeremyCorbyn #Brexit #FinalSay #PeoplesVote #PoliticalCartoon #Satire #BrexitShambles #BrexitChaos #BrexitDeal #Brexit  - political cartoon gallery in London  
The lady we met yesterday in Truro would no doubt be surprised to learn that her thoughtful remarks about #Brexit have attracted all sorts of comment from Twitter accounts that look like Putin sockpuppets & far-right trolls. They hate the idea of people changing their minds.  
I understand what you’re saying Jess but is Brexit in the long-term interests of your constituents? 
Ford warns a hard Brexit could be "catastrophic" for the car industry and its own factories  
Maybe the Brits ought to have a second Brexit vote, only this time sober.  
The anti-Brexit mob are fond of shouting: “Who funds you?“ So it will be interesting to see their response to this!  
Nicola Sturgeon tells @itvpeston Theresa May is being 'increasingly reckless and negligent' by not ruling out a no deal Brexit 
Should firms, as had been suggested, sack leave voters first when Brexit bites?No.Save your wrath for those who allowed leave to become a valid option on a ballot. Save it for the liar politicians.Without indemnity in the polling booth, democracy just can't function. Sorry. 
Spoiler alert. But Brexit doesn't end in socialism but fascism and a corptocracy that is going to make you pine for the days of a crony corporate EU. #BrexitCrisis 
You want to really know what a no-deal Brexit looks like?Read this article by @IanDunt 
Tory Brexit descends into Mussolini style delusions of national grandeur. @GavinWilliamson  in a speech entitled "Defence in Global Britain" said"We should be the nation that people turn to when the world needs leadership". #PeoplesVote #Brexit 
Will @Jacob_Rees_Mogg and his fellow extremists vote for something that rules out no deal, even if it is non-binding? Tory Brexit truce on brink of collapsing as Theresa May faces another defeat  
sporadic shout-out to all the lovely Remainers still supporting each other  we're all angry and stressed about Brexit; it's easy to snap and take your frustrations out on other people. it's a conscious choice to be kind to each other and work together.  #StrongerTogether 
"Brexit gold mine - thousands of jobs and millions flowing our way" Widest read newspaper in the Netherlands...  #loss 
Welsh dragon emblem must be prioritised over the union flag when branding food and drink exports from Wales after Brexit, industry leaders and farming unions have urged —British branding on products like lamb and beef could be a disadvantage in key markets 
As a Dutch woman in today’s toxic Brexit Britain, I can do nothing else but speak out against this lunacy and be active to stop it.  
Britain is due to leave the EU in 6 weeks but nobody knows how. All this Brexit uncertainty means the pound looks increasingly vulnerable  
Brexit: Ford warns Theresa May no deal would be 'catastrophic' for UK industry  
Bernard Ingham: The EU will blink first if we hold our nerve on Brexit – here’s why  
Oh that’s typical – just because WE decided to have a referendum, triggered Article 50 without a plan, agreed a deal then voted against it… suddenly it’s all OUR fault?  
For non UK citz who wonder how we are getting on with Brexit, this is where we are. In amongst the brilliance, my one misgiving with this clip is that it somehow makes Rees-Mogg ‘cooler’ than he really is.  
I'm no longer bothering to argue with no deal advocates. If they haven't grasped non tariff barriers by now they're never going to. Looks like they'll have to learn the hard way. #Brexit 
Only if they don't deliver a clean sovereign #Brexit Andrea.  
New no deal Brexit guidance for the space sector is stark: "UK-based businesses, academics and researchers will not be able to bid for future work on EU space programmes." Nothing equivocal about that. Bang, that's a massive market gone, just like that. 
Congratulations@secretstranger9 Just reached 15kHe is a true Brexit patriotAndA Great FollowYou deserve it my Friend  
Donald, your regular updates are vital to counter the UK Government and the misinformation handed to our media outlets by #Brexiters on a daily basis. Thank-you.  #FBPE#Brexit #PeoplesVoteNow #FinalSayForAll #JustMakeItStop 
Yep. At least it was only mine and not 520 other people's complaints they refused to consider. Phew. 
I think i'm suffering from Brexit fatigue, I am actually sick to death of it, I'm still of the opinion we should not do it but honestly I can barely think about it anymore, a stupid idea championed by stupid people. Utterly depressing. 
I imagine most people who know the EUI (or who were there, like me) were unaware that this exit would automatically occur with Brexit. Yet another indictment of this disastrous decision - and a tragedy for our social scientists wanting to study and work abroad 
Very kind of Peter Bone MP @PeterBoneUK to take time out this morning to tell me how well Brexit is going. #Lostforwords 
I hope my Irish family & friends enjoyed my hilarity at my @theSNP colleague @PeterGrantMP’s laconic tongue-in-cheek questioning of the hugely impressive Bertie Ahern. The idea that Ireland would want to rejoin the U.K. is, of course, ludicrous. #Brexit  
Preparing for No Deal doesn't mean the sky is about to fall in. Email your MP to help save Brexit:  
8/. If you do nothing else in the next day, find time to listen to at least the first 15mins of this @CommonsForeign Bill Browder hearing today.@brexit_sham @carolecadwalla @peterjukes @BenPBradshaw @AdamRamsay He pulls no punches. 
However the LibDem position is that no matter how bad #Brexit is we must jump off the cliff,  bound to the Tories & Westminster.  They say we must never aspire to be like #Finland or #Denmark in the #EU What a paucity of ambition for our country. 
I could of been a national hero if id of been put in charge of Brexit. Me to EU. " naff off. You owe us x amount. Keep out our waters or be sunk, and heres you migrants back"  
Germany's Brexit NIGHTMARE: Firms demand EU CAVES IN and ends UK no deal uncertainty   
No-deal Brexit would lead to vote on united Ireland, says Sinn Féin  
Labour MP submits plan for referendum on Brexit deal.Front bench May not like it, but the party will!  
In 1970's Pig Farmers fed pigs fish meal. UK bacon tasted like smelly fish for a very long time. What the pigs eat enters the person eating the porkUSA is 'pumping' pigs (and beef etc) with hormones, drugs and other widely banned substances. @LBC @mrjamesob #Brexit  
While we were still relishing Brexit Lil Kesh, Twitter NG decided to release another hit on Tobi. I present to you the first of his name Shoprite Dothraki, aka Ikorodu Zoro also know as Thanos Bakre I have lost all ability to can  
Large crowd of republicans gathered in West Belfast for a political update on Brexit and the campaign for Irish unity from @conormurphysf and @LindaDillon81 #Time4Unity 
Steve Bell on May's search for fresh Brexit thinking – cartoon  
And of course, Vote Leave and Darren have already been laughed out of court....... 
A no-deal Brexit would affect more than just British trade with the EU  
If anyone questions now stressful Brexit has been for some people, my mother got her settled status the other day and actually cried from relief 
So @KayBurley says there are laws that ensure the broadcasters cannot be biased or they lose their licence. Any chance of these supposed laws ever being applied to the pro Brussels BBC and Sky News? #Brexit  
Brexit is the biggest catastofuck this country has faced in generations. So it's mystifying why so many politicians seem determined to cling to the wrong side of history. They're all supposed to be legacy-obsessed; don't they fear the judgement of posterity at all? 
banter when theresa may finally eats that jam corbyn gave her for christmas and has to be rushed to hospital in the middle of no deal brexit 
The UK is in a bloody mess, and this would be the case even without Brexit. Nine years of austerity, Local Authority cuts, a reduction in police numbers and the disastrous Universal Credit are all symptoms of a totally incompetent Government. And still they're ahead in the polls! 
Let’s say it as it is. We are evicitng foreigners so hey, British kids, step up and look after the elderly either a) because they are your grandparents or b) because you are paid to. If the latter please treat them like your grandparents. #brexit #truth 
Swiss government announced it will limit the number of British nationals that can enter Switzerland to work to 3,500 in the case of a no-deal Brexit on March 29. In effect, they will be treated like all other non-EU citizens. 
Caroline Spelman's Brexit Delay Hypocrisy  
No ford cars,No VAT,No body bags,Or enough ferries,No truth just lies,To make you poor,We’ll cut your rights at a stroke.God bless Brexit Street,Viva Brexit Street,Long live Brexit Street,C'est magnifique, Brexit Street.Magnifique, Brexit Street. 
Absolute Tosh! I’ll never forget the bias you showed to me the first time we met Kay, when your first question to me was: “Are you a fruitcake?” The bias against Brexit is clear and overwhelming.  
Preparations for Brexit are getting a little intense.  
Petition: Revoke Art.50 if there is no Brexit plan by the 25 of February.Please RT and then put the link in one of your own tweets - it reaches more people that way :) #Brexit #peoplesvote 
Presidents @QuimTorraiPla and @KRLS will hold a joint conference at the European Parliament next Monday 18 February. "#Catalonia and the trial on the referendum: a challange for the EU"  
I generally block anonymous accounts spouting bollocks about Brexit, but I wonder whether the ones claiming to be businesses doing really well out of it need a different response? 
.@MaryLouMcDonald TD speaking to BBC News from Westminster: "The responsible thing for Dublin & London at this stage is to plan for every contingency- & the ultimate contingency in the event of a no deal Brexit is a referendum on Irish unity." @IrishUnity @Think32_ @ldnirishunity 
Theresa May “is the most duplicitous Prime Minister we’ve ever had in our lifetimes”, says Nigel Farage@Nigel_Farage | #Brexit  
Activists are putting recent promises politicians made about Brexit on billboards across the U.K. to encourage citizens to hold public officials accountable as the deal's deadline nears. 
Letters handed to 54 Yorks MPs demanding end to #Brexit  All filmed by local TV & private audience with some MPs @York4EU @GrassrootsEU 
Friend in the street on Brexit: It feels like we are waiting for the grown ups to turn up. 
.@RuthDavidsonMSP's still on maternity leave, but that's no reason not to remind ourselves of her #Brexit statement from last July.Aged well, eh?  
Tune in for our Lord and saviour @Jacob_Rees_Mogg on #BBCQT for some excellent insight on Brexit tomorrow night.#MoggMentum 
So the #bbcqt panel has 4 people are supporting #Brexit even though this is not the view of the country. Where is the balance? Continuing to aid and abet an alt right agenda in UK politics. WTF!! 
EU officials: UK only 'pretending to negotiate' over Brexit impasse  
Speaking after meeting Labour leader Jeremy Corbyn, @MaryLouMcDonald said Ireland will not be the collateral damage in a Tory Brexit. Obligations to Ireland under international law must be respected and honoured. #Brexit  
Fantastic day with #WeareSodem outside Parliament. London left in no doubt Yorkshire does not want Brexit! We'll be back Feb 27th  
Brexit is based on myths, bullshit and lies. As someone once said, the truth will set you free. pic.twitter.com/HVstA98Cdp 
This morning Migration Watch published — and then withdrew — a study claiming that the government’s Brexit plans could see immigration increase by about 100,000 people a year.Here’s where we think they went wrong:  
No. That is the default. EU membership is the status quo. It is cynical to conflate the two. It plays into the narrative that Brexit can’t be stopped. It can. The ECJ has explicitly said it can. 
Hold on folks. The leader of the ten MPs holding Parliament to a billion pound ransom and walking Britain off a cliff edge Brexit wants to rant about minority parties and preconditions. 
Just to save you a click: it tells you fuck all about Brexit, because it’s a fucking jacket. 
Are you new to EOS?Read the following guides we wrote for you:- Anatomy of an EOS Account ()- Account Security Best Practices ()- Vote for Referendum ()- Vote for BPs ()Go EOS! 
The soft border between Northern Ireland and the Republic of Ireland has been keeping the peace for 20 years. Brexit could change all that.  
Brexit uncertainty pushes insurer Aviva to move $10 billion out of the U.K.  
The Dutch are such an incredible people. They’re environmentally on the button, speak English like it was their first language (often better than the Brits) and most importantly speak out against Brexit. They seem to feel our pain and take ownership in helping us. Power to them.  
44 days until Brexit…And 1 hour 'til the action kicks off! @Peston and @GuardianAnushka will be joined by @NicolaSturgeon, @LenMcCluskey, @YvetteCooperMP, @CBItweets President John Allan, @HenryNewman, @stevedouble and @jessphillips. Live @ 8pm Twitter, @ITV 10.45pm  
You miss the point entirely Gerard.It is not all about you.It is about getting the #Brexit the 17.4m voted for by having just ONE #Brexit candidate in each seat.It is not about who was loyal to @UKIP or not.Keep your eyes on the big picture and stop the sabotaging of #Brexit  
This is the Digby Jones who still says no jobs have been lost because of Brexit. Right? Is that the guy whose insights you’re defending Iain? Him. Because I can point you to far far more successful business people than him who are happy to explain how catastrophic this thing is  
Finally, a Brexit breakthrough........  
Bank of America says no going back on its $400m plans for Brexit move  via @financialtimes 
The International Commission of Jurists has issued a strong statement on the trial of Catalan independence leaders - saying the Spanish Government must be held responsible for the police violence, not the politicians who took part in a peaceful referendum.  
Confirmation in small print of statutory instruments that in the event of a no deal Brexit direct payments post 29 March will be funded by HM Treasury but that we will no longer be part of the EU CAP - schemes will continue in 2019/2020.  
More than 78,000 people have signed my petition to #SayNoToNoDeal - here is my piece for the @HuffPostUKBlogs on why a No-Deal Brexit would be a betrayal of Britain’s young people. Read here  
Then support the SNP's demands for control over immigration. You know Brexit will destroy workforces across Scotland. What are YOU doing to stop this? ....  Nothing, Corbyn wants Brexit, it's Labour policy 
Theresa May in the HoC today made a point of saying that it was the House's vote that triggered Article 50. Is she trying to distance herself from responsibility?#Brexit #BrexitShambles #StopBrexitSaveBritain 
Inflation Falls to Two-Year Low Despite Brexit  
It was a UK referendum for all of the “remain” areas. The difference is that the PM obtained bespoke deals for NI and Gibraltar to effectively remain due to their unique needs.  As for Scotland?  They took our parliament to the highest court in the land to obstruct the same. 
#Brexit shouldn't actually BE a debate. The fact is that in ANY form it damages the country, ultimately damaging us, for MANY years to come - and that's just WRONG. #RevokeRemainRebuild #StopBrexitSaveBritain 
Brexit reporting by most of the British media neatly summed up by Alice In Wonderland:“Why, sometimes I've believed as many as six impossible things before breakfast.” 
Getting all these angry Brexiteers shouting ‘it was a UK referendum’ as if for a minute they think I’m going to say ‘OK then’. I will always put the Scottish interest first and how dare they try and take my nation out of an EU we cherish against our national will. 
Fifty three million reasons why, if there is any justice, Boris Johnson will end his political career dividing his time between the Brexit public enquiry and the #GardenBridge public enquiry. 
“Nicola Sturgeon gave me Mouldy jam and that made me have the shits” #jam #theresaMay #brexit pic.twitter.com/ExsBZEnnYA 
 Britannia has seemingly transformed from ‘ruling the waves’ to not having enough ships to bring supplies in the even of a no deal Brexit.  
First Minister @NicolaSturgeon told @STVNews independence is a "longer-term alternative" to #Brexit which appeals "to more people with every day that passes".  
Shocking that yet again @rtenews at 6 wheel out Bertie Ahern and plonk him on their new sofa for his opinion on #BrexitThey really do take us for idiots. 
As the Brexit clock runs down, Brussels wonders whether Theresa May can deliver any deal  
Can someone who lives near each of the car plants stand outside with a placard saying, 'Why aren't you marching on Whitehall? Brexit is going to make you all unemployed ' 
The only “conviction” should be your own for your criminally reckless, grossly inept and wholly irresponsible handling of Brexit  
A second referendum  
2016: “I see no downside to Brexit, only a considerable upside”“Sunlit uplands”“£350m a week for the NHS!”2019: 
Take No Deal off the table are these Remoaners deluded or what. If we took No Deal off the table what leverage to bargain with would we have nothing. The truth is these Arseholes will do anything to scupper Brexit and think we are stupid enough to listen to their idiotic ideas. 
Bank of America is spending a staggering $300-$400m on Brexit preparations, I share this not to invite lachrymal outpourings of pity but to highlight the phenomenal disruption this is imposing on the business world  
Gina Miller: I was more worried about Corbyn than Brexit.I wonder why no one trusts #FBPE Centrists. It has ALWAYS been about persecuting Corbyn & the left. Sick of it.... 
Now the Raspberry Pi leaves Britain due to #Brexit :-((( It is painful to watch what is happening to our proud technology success stories. The shameful Quitlers are ruining this country.  
Why is is that, although we know an attempt to heal internal Tory division was the sole reason for holding the referendum that has pushed this country to the brink of catastrophe, it is the Labour party that now looks so riven with faction that it's on the verge of splitting?  
Donald Tusk issued this tweet after getting an update from Michel Barnier.Michel Barnier was updating Tusk after meeting Brexit secretary Stephen Barclay on Monday.This is where we are with 44 days to go.  
Taste of life after Brexit, courtesy of Liam Fox's testimony: “Some countries have said that they didn’t like, for example, the human rights elements that were incorporated by the EU & they would like us to drop those in order to roll the agreements over” 
Just when I was struggling to find the right word to describe the steaming pile of excrement that is Brexit and the Dutch PM comes to the rescue. Insurmountable. 
It's been over 30 months since the referendum.There are 44 days to go.We need to get this done and we need to be realistic - on @itn 
Car manufacturer Ford issues a fresh warning on the 'catastrophic' impact of a no-deal #Brexit  
FED'S HARKER: BREXIT, CHINA, GERMANY AMONG THE POTENTIAL NEGATIVE HEADWINDS FOR U.S. ECONOMYso blame Brexit, China, Germany for QE4, got it 
The BBC when inflation is rising: BREXIT, BREXIT, BREXIT! The BBC when inflation is falling: It’s down to the global economy. Not a single mention of Brexit. The blatant bias is comical. Btw journos - an observation isn’t ‘inciting violence’. 
No news is not always good news. EU27 still waiting for concrete, realistic proposals from London on how to break #Brexit impasse.  
So have we got this right, the Observer and the Guardian were named, you're a journalist at those titles, Oakeshott has had a well known run in with you over 'emails' but it wasn't clear who he was talking about? They'll be claiming the Question Time audiences are genuine next!! 
“Back the LIbDems” do what? They’ve no influence at Westminster. When they had power they used it to push through disability cuts, the bedroom tax & Royal Mail privatisation. Their sole raison d’être now is to defend the Union regardless of the damage #Brexit does to Scotland.  
When we Brexit, and if it’s a hard Brexit, and there is food shortages and riots on the streets. How quickly do you reckon before we have MP’s in prison for misconduct in a public office? 
Brexiters,If Brexit is all that, do you never ask yourselves...Why are businesses leaving rather than arriving?Why does May have to bribe and threaten rather than persuade?Why do you have to lie/be anti-facts to sustain it?Why all the blaming rather than taking credit? 
Today groups from across #Yorkshire came to Parliament to protest against #Brexit, and demand a #PeoplesVote with an option to remain.See why they think the decision should be handed back to the people. Share if you agree!  @PeoplesvoteSWY @peoplesvote_uk @campbellclaret 
The Dutch prime minister has said Britain is a “diminished” country after its vote for Brexit and warned that a no-deal exit from the bloc risked “insurmountable” consequences for the UK economy 
More than 1,000 jobs have become available at #Manchester Airport as it prepares for its busiest ever summer.Hold on, I thought #Brexit meant planes wouldn't fly, hundreds of thousands would be unemployed, borders would be closed...  
British government is "pretending to negotiate" and has not presented any new proposals to break Brexit deadlock. The EU view on the latest Lidington + Barclay visits. 
The EU will blink first if we hold our nerve on Brexit – here’s why, writes Bernard Ingham 
‘If left to the civil service, planning for a post-Brexit economy is only likely to exacerbate the UK economy’s structural weaknesses. There is only one option for Project After: a green new deal.’Me for the @NewStatesman 
The way the EU has acted throughout the Brexit negotiations is a disgrace. Let's Go WTO and save £39bn! Email your MP to stop the Brexit betrayal:  
Thank you @Claude_Moraes. The solution is simple - we need to ring-fence the #citizensrights agreement, no matter what Brexit we are ending up with. It's not cherry picking as we we are people not cherries. Real people with families to support, jobs & livelihoods to protect.  
Ford warns no-deal Brexit would be 'catastrophic'Ford were bought Years Ago by EU, being Paid to move Their Transit Factory from Southampton to Turkey!  
I am stockpiling tweets for Brexit.So far I have put aside:"I told you so""Hurts doesn't it?""How's the whole taking back control thing going for you?""No, I don't have any baked beans to trade for an hour with your mother" 
“Brexit is bad cos it will lead to more migrants” is  the shittiest of takes,& ppl who peddle it show the streak within Remain who still think Blair is God & that his govt’s oppressive & callous treatment of so many categories of migrants was unimportant cos, brown ppl, who cares  
You'd feel sorry for him, if it wasn't for the small matter of £625,000 that bought a rigged referendum. 
BREAKING: #Cyprus FM @Christodulides  announces that in case of no deal #Brexit & on the basis of reciprocity, the rights of British citizens residing in Cyprus will be safeguarded. See letter to #UK ForeignSec @Jeremy_Hunt @foreignoffice || cc: @DExEUgov 
Brexit must not be allowed to become about the normalisation of racism.  
Britain’s trade application has been rejected by the WTO — UK govt has failed to secure a deal on WTO terms in anticipation of a no-deal Brexit. In a matter of weeks, if UK leaves the EU, UK will have no trading agreements, not even with the WTO 
While the Tories put their own party and Brexit squabbling above safeguarding human rights,  SNP MPs hold them to account.  
Now Ford say they may move production abroad. It has 13k people employed directly in the UK with many more jobs at risk in supply chain. Too late for Government to try and bribe them like Nissan but not too late to stop #Brexit #peopleschoice 
Roses are redViolets are blueThis is all a mistakeCan we stay in the EU?#valentinesday#Brexit 
Wait, Brexit is actually happening? I thought it was still deadlocked in the "oh yeah totally happening" zone alone with flying cars and a space elevator. I have completely lost track of the actual state of things. 
Keep in touch with The Brexit Party. Twitter: @brexitparty_ukFacebook:  
Just a prediction: if - God forbid - we do leave, the same people who said we should do it to escape the EU's influence will blame every problem in Brexit Britain on the EU, and see no contradiction. 
Remainers have been warning Leavers about the consequences of #Brexit until we're blue in the face, and we've been ignored, mocked and insulted. Time for Leavers to accept the consequences of their actions. That is what 'taking back control' means. 
This Brexit is the first Brexit. We cannot learn anything from European prehistory that informs our current political impasse. Archaeologists must avoid prehistoric Brexit parallels – they encourage twisted readings of the past  via @ConversationUK 
Why @bbcnews? Instead of having @bbcr4today make a pointless trip to a university on the South Coast, go instead to the north of England and talk to people in the car manufacturing industry who have lost their jobs or are in danger of doing so. Give the victims of Brexit a voice.  
Sod Brexit, on William Brown's centenary, it's time to give Richmal Crompton a statue. Me for @thetimes online now.  (£) 
How about it @GerardBattenMEP and @Nigel_Farage?@AMDWaters has offered to talk about seat sharing to ensure the #Brexit vote is maximised in each seat.How about it Gerard and Nigel?  
Inflation down, wages up as Brexit approaches  
Hardline Brexit supporters the ERG group led by Jacob Rees Mogg, are threatening to inflict yet another Commons defeat on Theresa May. Because they fear the government is effectively ruling out leaving the EU with no deal.Do so with our blessing. We  the people want a NO deal. 
Brexit is already claiming a great many victims with widespread job losses and a lot more to come. Why is it, @BBCNews, we are not permitted to hear their voices? Is it deemed to be bad for the national morale to give air time to the victims? 
People’s Vote campaigners and FBPE extremists have repeatedly said that Brexit will erode workers’ rightsThe irony is they are now backing calls by Terry Christian for Brexit supporters to suffer discrimination in the workplace by being sacked for voting to leave the EU... 
My mum has started stockpiling food for Brexit too.Though I can't tell, as brown mums always stockpile a year's supply of daal, flour and rice anyway  
Yup, Barnier has been a class act in the Brexit negotiations, that we have not been able to match on the UK side  
#Ford production plants in the UK:Bridgend - Voted #LeaveDagenham - Voted LeaveHalewood - Voted LeaveWhat is it about #car workers? Can't they just leave their jobs if they don't like them, same as rest of us do? Why'd they have to drag whole country down with them? #Brexit 
Sat in the BBC Westminster studio waiting to be interviewed and listening to reporters talking about Brexit. Never mind Brexit, we've got OYXIT!  
The country is stockpiling beans and body bags – but they won’t save us from Brexit’s bad politics | Zoe Williams  
Boris Johnson's failed Garden Bridge cost £53.5 million, including £43 million of taxpayer money. Yes, that's over fifty million pounds vanished into thin air on a non-existent bridge. But hey, Brexit...  so out of the headlines and forgotten by tomorrow. 
that's you lot told.get out there and fix brexit!  
Anti Brexit types often imply that post imperial unease explains Eurosceptic attitudes.  Surely it’s the opposite? Post imperial inferiority complex took us in.  As we grow confident of ourselves as a successful country again, we’re less willing to be supplicants? 
Whatever you think about it, Brexit or something like it, is a moment that it was probably inevitable England would have. It isn't really about Europe at all. 
EU vessels will no longer be able to carry out electric #pulse fishing in UK waters after Brexit, Fisheries Minister George Eustice has announced today. Read more here:  
Based solely on my timeline, British people are way more concerned about saving rewinds than they are about the looming Brexit crisis. 
Dutch PM warns of ‘devastating’ no-deal Brexit  
More of @annaturley @bphillipsonMP @CatMcKinnell @angelasmithmp @Alison_McGovern @MaryCreaghMP @Debbie_abrahams @robertabwMP @JulieElliottMP on telly please. Northern Labour women MPs calling out Brexit for what it is. A disaster for Northern working class constituencies  
Was."Sunlit uplands."Then."There will be adequate food."Now."If you scrape off the mould you may still find some edible bits."#Brexit  
Why are so many Leavers angry? My thought is that they know the empire is gone, but they haven't emotionally accepted that they no longer belong to the imperial master race, and they are outraged that Germany has failed to stay beaten at the feet of the British lion.#Brexit 
And the awesome Steve Bray @snb19692 who's been here rain or shine letting MPs know we DO NOT WANT TO BREXIT! #PeoplesVote 
A British man who has retired to Spain says: "I wasn't even allowed to vote in the referendum. If we don't get that healthcare payment, lots of us will have to go home."  
Jackson Carlaw stated  the Scottish Gov have been destructive to the Brexit talks. Can I remind him the people of Scotland voted overwhelmingly to remain in Europe. @ScotGov represents the people of Scotland, his party obviously does not. 
Brexit risks rare diseases care for 100,000 British children. By leaving the European Reference Networks (ERNs) we cut ourselves from supply of expertise.Do this for these kids and patients and demand a #PeoplesVote 
Former Attorney General Dominic Grieve says "the penny is beginning to drop" among politicians, including some of his Conservative colleagues, that "there is no form of Brexit that is going to benefit our country."  
This is the kind of thing that LOSES support. It makes me, remoaner of the century, want to jump over to lexit just to get back at them. Don't hold *More and BROWNER immigration* as some kind of threatened consequence of Brexit over people. Just don't. Stop. Piss off. Thank you. 
Government admits there is no way to avoid severe food and medicines shortages after no deal.#Brexit 
Theresa May must not flinch and allow Remainers to force a Brexit delay that benefits only the EU, says @TheSun 
There is no point in pretending this isn't a straight up attempt to fight Brexit by throwing non-European migrants under the bus. It's really, really poor behaviour.Not to mention that report's been pulled even from MW website cos it's so full of shit.  
This is so sad, but what the future looks like folks unless we turn brexit around. This from Switzerland, (for no-Deal for now), but look at the language. Each state will do what is best for it. You, personally, face losing the rights you used to have.  
A Soft Brexit would make Labour’s 2017 manifesto impossible to implement. Britain cannot enact radical change while being a carbon copy of the Single Market. And the people will have not taken back control if we become a vassal state, says @BrendanChilton 
It's like the #brexit rhetoric strangles any kind of critical thinking. There is a mass-delusion that they have to honour the dishonourable referendum. Brainwashed. 
Really, really pissed off with @TheNewEuropean for this. The Migration Watch paper pulled some figures out of Lord Green's arse so as to whip up hatred against immigrants, and they're using it uncritically as a tool against Brexit.  
Notable that @NickBoles has still not apologised for misleading his constituency in 2017 when standing on the Conservative manifesto for election, which was to honour the result of the 2016 referendum.  
A comprehensive analysis of the "benefits" of #Brexit 
This note was kept by my grandfather who came here on the Kindertransport from Austria. In the context of #Brexit and #AntiSemitism it makes me want to weep “you have come to a country where you will find love and kindness extended  to you from all sides” I miss that country 
Important @TribuneMPs event on Healing the Divide - facing up to the deep divisions behind the Brexit vote. 25th Feb 7pm.  
#Brexit In 4 seconds.  
Theresa May has said more than 50 times that we're leaving on 29 March no matter what - so she needs to categorically rule out Olly Robbins' suggestion that if MPs vote down her deal there would be a long delay to Brexit.  
"There is no infrastructure in Dover...I'm running round the country at the moment having contingency Brexit meetings with lots of customers who are really starting to panic now"WATCH: Tony Shally, MD of a freight company, explains why he's calling for a #PeoplesVote#Biz4PV 
We just have to take a pause at certain points of Brexit to remind ourselves that this is not right, this is not a PM doing her best in a difficult job, and that even planning to hold such a major vote at a few days notice can never be acceptable /end 
Brexit: Government admits it has 'run out of time' to find ships to bring emergency supplies after no-deal  
Prepping for life post-hard Brexit, I see.  
You’ve had 965 days to deliver Brexit. You’ve got 44 days left. All you are doing is deliberately kicking the Brexit can towards the cliff edge. Meanwhile, because of the uncertainty created by you, businesses are relocating and jobs are being lost. You own this mess.  
Irish border technology 'could take 10 years' #brexit  
This is scary and scandalous. This is why we must have a full audit by the NAO and Govt must immediately publish all of the 320+ Brexit workstreams so we can see how prepared the UK is ready to leave the EU. By the looks of this no where near.  
I see Yvette Cooper has finished licking her wounds, and is  hogging the airwaves again, trying her level best to derail Brexit. I've never seen a woman like her. I could understand it, if 70% of her constituents had voted to stay, but they didn't. She's toast.....good 'n proper. 
I’m one of your ex-viewers because of this ‘beyond reproach’ attitude.Sky News is stridently anti-Brexit, it’s so obvious it’s embarrassing. For you. 
Brexit amendments: The MPs trying to change Theresa May's course  
Despite the FBPE extremists, Chuka Umunna, David Lammy and the rest of the anti-Brexit mob claiming there is huge support by Labour Party members for a second Brexit referendum, only a handful of people turned up a Remain event in Liverpool   
Got that Brexit sinking feeling? Watch this video right to the end then give it a retweet. @BorisJohnson would really hate that. 
Declan Rice is the only man moving his business to England before Brexit  
44 days to go until Brexit & MPs are in a holding pattern. Next crunch date Feb 27. Tory remainers gearing up to support Cooper 2.0 & take No Deal off the table (resignations if required). Brexiteers reckon EU27 will move on backstop but perhaps not until EUCO on March 21.  
Brexiters claim we can trade on WTO rules straight after Brexit. There’s a slight problem with this. The WTO rejected our trade application. So in 5 weeks time, we leave the EU single market – and with no trade agreements, not even with the WTO in place. 
We're a month from Brexit. Declan Rice must be the only person in the UK trying to get rid of his Irish passport. 
The true target of the People's Vote is Corbyn, not Brexit  
It’s remarkable how powerless the voters are at the moment. Brexit, Islamiphobia, anti Semitism, misinformation, mistruths, lies, nationalism & isolationism are rampant and there’s absolutely nothing we can do. We, the voters, are irrelevant. #JustMakeItStop 
Four MEPs join Farage's Brexit Party      Four MEPs join Farage's Brexit Party - Westmonster  
The UK public debate mostly failed to address the hard choices ("hard facts") of Brexit, though some Leave campaigners had pointed to downsides & PM stated in Mansion House that the UK would lose access to the EU market. A reality check of Brexit is not harsh, it is reality. 
#Ford Bloody hell! Every time I look at the news, there's another Brexit catastrophe. Now Ford - Ford - one might as well say the car industry - is planning to leave the UK. When will our useless leaders wake up? 
"A Labour “compromise” would be a huge disappointment for those with theoptimism to see Brexit as a rare opportunity...." I said "NO" in today's @CityAM Debate. 
20-year-old footballer more eloquent on Anglo-Irish relations than almost any politician I've heard in last 3 years covering Brexit: "Like so many people, I consider myself to be of mixed nationality. I am a proud Englishman. I am just as proud of my family's Irish heritage."  
The only thing I'd take exception to is if he continues to use his Irish passport to beat the queues post-Brexit. 
Want to know what rights UK nationals have in EU27 and EEA states in the event of a no deal Brexit? Here is a state by state guide from @FTIConsulting @MikeRArcher @georgewaringGW 
Summary1. I'm a civil servant.2. And we're an incompetent lot. 3. So we're nowhere near ready for no-deal Brexit.4. Plus, we've been far too busy trying to sabotage Brexit since June 2016 to make any preparations for it.5. Talk about Our Public Service!6. That's all, folks!  
You really can’t escape Brexit - anywhere!!  
Farage now declared he's sitting in EU parliament as an MEP for The Brexit party. His new boss has some deeply offensive opinions on genetics and poverty.  This can only end badly  
Former taoiseach Bertie Ahern was asked about how suggestions for resolving the Brexit impasse, including the Republic of Ireland ‘rejoining the United Kingdom’, have been received in Ireland |  
So, this recession -IT'S BECAUSE OF BREXIT! I TOLD YOU, I TOLD YOU!- in Germany -AHEM. AS YOU WERE 
"It is absurd and terrifying that the British state is considering putting soldiers on the streets as a result of their own bungled Brexit policy. A democratic society is not a militarised society." @JonathanPlaid 
DISGRACE: German government 'told by Blair to expect second referendum’. Says it all.  
VIDEO: Anti-Brexit campaigners from Yorkshire travelled down to Westminster today.They delivered letters to all 54 Yorkshire and North Lincolnshire MPs asking them to back a second referendum, with an option to Remain in the EU.The group included @Frederika_Rfrom Doncaster: 
Government admits it has 'run out of time' to find ships to bring emergency supplies after no-deal Brexit  
Did someone order some Brexit in the comments 
Our Chairman John Longworth responds to chief Brexit civil servant Oliver Robbins giving away our negotiating strategy: "It appears that Robbins has once again stepped well over the mark and one wonders where his interests lie."  
An entire country caught in the pincer movement between two political parties, terrified of fighting the next election with Brexit still pending. That’s the primary force driving all developments. Not the will of the people. Not the good of the country. But political expedience. 
Profoundly worrying conversation with an MP. Why are they treating Brexit like some sort of naturally occurring unstoppable phenomenon, which we must all simply survive as best we can? If they have been unable to deliver on their Brexit fantasy promises, they must REVOKE ART 50. 
Scotland is just not the sort of country that would let a party who exist to support the wealthiest in our society form a Government. Particularly when it is pursuing a Brexit that is against our national will and would make us economically and culturally poorer.  
Driving through #Brexit on the strength of a narrow advisory referendum victory procured by crime against the will of the majority would be such a grotesque abuse of democracy that it should be regarded as a crime or a coup.#StopBrexit 
In tomorrow's @ScotNational the lessons to be learned from the Brexit shambles: "It goes without saying and yet probably bears repeating: that the UK’s approach to exiting the EU is a case study in ‘how not to do it’. Pretty much for all and any ‘it’ you might care to think of" 
Darren Grimes is a criminal fraudster who now works for a right wing lobby organisation backed by US White supremacists.He’s now literally begging for money on the internet by lying about his electoral fraud. Could you get more #brexit than that? 
This is not semantics. It is an essential point. If politicians have been unable to engineer a position which improves things, the default SHOULD be the status quo, i.e. no change. You must stop treating Brexit like some sort of natural phenomenon, which we must somehow survive. 
Yeah well... You haven't apologised for misleading your leave voting constituency in 2017 when you said that you would respect the EU referendum result and not try to disrupt Brexit. If you had any honour about yourself you would call a by-election and stand on a Remain footing. 
In an effort to show why it is hard to explain what's happening #Brexit wise in UK at the moment, I made some slightly whimsical opening remarks to the @IIEA #CountdowntoBrexit event today. They are the ‘Illogical Truths’ of Brexit.(to be taken with a dash of salt )1/6 
MUST-WATCH: The Gov has repeatedly promised to carry over our current trade deals. Today is was revealed that only SEVEN will be ready for March 29th.The promises of Brexit are falling apart at the seams. The only way forward is a #PeoplesVote. Please RT: 
Britain's Number One Brexit Hater Preacher, James O'Brien, is the most closed minded, evil person I have come across lately.His blind prejudice against Brexit is peak obsession. Plot lost.Today's LBC attack on Digby Jones was hideous, based on lies and beyond human.  
Theresa May is refusing to rule out no-deal, because she's hamstrung by Tory Brexit extremists. She must stop playing games with jobs and livelihoods, and extend Article 50. #PMQs 
I don't know about EU but i'm still in the Single Market!Shout out to all my singletons still worried about this Brexit shitstorm.I hope you all find love better than @theresa_may finds securing a deal! #BrexitBae#FlushBrexshit#GalentinesDay#ValentinesDay pic.twitter.com/QapO31Vxxz 
Make no mistake, @angelasmithmp is being pushed to the edge at the thought of her dodgy water lobbying coming to an end when Corbyn gets in. Brexit is just a cover for this war mongering Blairite. #SplittersCoup 
We’ve just recorded tomorrow’s podcast with @GuitarMoog and @ottocrat of the great @CakeWatchCast — time for a Brexit-obliterating pint.  
turns out the naked anti-brexit campaigner penned a piece against welfare, calling for a return to victorian callousness, because the fear of their children's total immiseration makes poor parents work harder, which ???will??? make our economy stronger   
Tomorrow morning, join @labourlewis, @lloyd_rm, @RachaelMaskell and other left wing Labour MPs as they discuss Labour, socialism and Brexit. Book a ticket before they run out  
Can you imagine what our lives would be like if we all just gave our kids everything they demanded just so they didn't give us any grief? Because that's basically what the Gov is asking us to do with #Brexit whereas the truth is, that little bastard needs a good fucking slap.... 
Ford warns of “catastrophic” Brexit fears.The company, which employs 13,000 people, is now looking at moving work overseas.British workers voted to #Remain in the referendum.We are being dragged out of the EU against our will.#StopBrexit 
Speaking to @BBCgmu from London, Sinn Féin deputy leader @moneillsf said the backstop, as negotiated in the Withdrawal Agreement, must be adhered to. #Brexit  
17.4 million Brexit voters would not agree with the PM or Mr Robbins. We leave on WTO terms on 29th March wake up and get a grip!   
'I won't comment on a comment' - Michel Barnier stays silent after chief negotiator Olly Robbins was overheard in a bar suggesting Brexit could be delayed for 21 months if MPs don't accept Theresa May's deal  
Britain is due to leave the EU in 6 weeks but nobody knows how. All this Brexit uncertainty means the pound looks increasingly vulnerable  
Remain MPs tend to have no background in business. Soubry is a washed up TV presenter, Wollaston is a GP. Whereas Brexit MPs tend to have a proven track record in itSoubry wouldnt be able to pass a basic economics exam. JRM is a millionaireWho'd listen to Soubry about Brexit? 
Post-Brexit imperial fantasy: world painted pink, widening anglosphere, global free trade.Post-Brexit imperial reality:  
Order! Order! Pound traders brush up on parliament as #Brexit stakes mount  
BRILLIANT: Canary Islands 'could offer Brexit tax break for Brits'. “We want the Brits to continue to visit the Canaries and to continue to buy.” 
It is clear that the unionist parties will use the Brexit catastrophe as a foil to smear and lie on #IndyRef1  - Indy forcing Sco out of EU the main one - so that voters say ‘You’re all the same’. Huge online campaign nipping this in the bud very worthwhile Ian. 
BREXIIIIIIT: Reactions to Ford’s warning against a no-deal Brexit are mixed, but the overarching themes are:• Fake news• “I’m boycotting Ford”• Fuck off then. Don’t care. Ford cars are crap anyway. pic.twitter.com/UgOYP2uN20 
I remember this lady getting annoyed about me wearing a gym top in a video saying it was too revealing and undermined my point. Qwhite interesting she doesn’t have the same problem with the naked Brexit piece!  
Ireland and Norway lead the way ..  amazing what you can do when not stiffled by a government you don't vote for that imposes crazy politics like Brexit! :)  
So far just 7 MPs want to #RevokeArticle50 to end the Brexit shambles although I m sure others want to lend support - even a government minister today privately wished the ammendedment every success :) .. meantime thanks to @Stuart_McDonald who has added his name today. 
The pound will go where you are, Boris Johnson, into the gutter. You don't even really believe what you say. Brexit was always just a career opportunity. You thought it would lose. Now you are stuck with it & don't mind destroying Britain. You're a liar, a narcissist.  
Did Anna Soubry just say Corbyn must stand by the Labour Party Conference policy for a second referendum if MPs didn't vote for a deal?Anna, whose own Party Conference policy was to respect the result of the referendum & Leave the EU, the CU & SM? 
"The Prime Minister is hung strung by her own party" @theSNP's @IanBlackfordMP slams @theresa_may for 'playing fast and loose' over #Brexit at #PMQs. 
Astonishing admission in select committee on the #SeaborneFreight... Permanent secretary says that the DFT took Seaborne's word for it that it had secure backers before handing it a No Deal Brexit contract... No 
So, the Boris Johnson vanity project that was the Garden Bridge ended up being cancelled and costing a packet. The Boris Johnson vanity project that is Brexit is going to cost a lot more...and shows little sign of being sensibly cancelled... 
.@M_AndersonSF tells the European Parliament meeting in Strasbourg that "Whether it’s a crash Brexit or not - the north of Ireland will be hit hardest. A solution for all is the reunification of Ireland".  
Swiss prepared for No Deal Brexit.  
When Jacob Rees-Mogg uses the term "free trade" he is deliberately using an overly simplistic term. His power comes from framing the debate with misleading language in the certain knowledge his devotees will take what he says at face value. It's a con. #Brexit 
Constructive and fruitful exchange of all German ministries with Commission Deputy SG regarding #Brexit preparedness and contingency planning. Thank you for coming to Berlin, Céline Gauer!  
MUST-READ: Ford reveals its plans for move abroad over Brexit. (£)  
"I'm really impressed that the prime minister can keep a straight face while she said due diligence was carried out."  Jeremy Corbyn, on the Transport Secretary Chris Grayling's handling of the no-deal #Brexit ferry contracts#FailingGrayling #JC4PM2019 
Anne Marie responds to Katie Hopkins’ call for Brexit collaboration of Anne Marie - @GerardBattenMEP @Nigel_Farage.Read our policies  @ForBritainChair @ForBritainParty 
WAKE UP Britain. It's time to get angry and speak out before it's too late. Me in @BylineTimes #Ford #Brexit 
We understand James Dyson is absolutely ecstatic for some reason...... 
BBC, C4 and Sky News are balanced. For every anti Brexit story they show, the counter it with a pro EU report. 
EU regulations cost UK businesses £33.3bn. Let's Go WTO and open our economy to the rest of the world. Join the fastest growing Brexit movement @  
Extremely disappointing that @IslingtonBC feel the need to silence the views of young people. Yet another example of young people's views being *literally* removed from the Brexit conversation #FFS#PeoplesVote 
“I’ve been wondering,” Tusk mused, “what that #SpecialPlaceInHell looks like, for those who promoted Brexit without even a sketch of a plan how to carry it out safely.”Speaking of which...#Sodem #StopBrexit@eucopresident #WeAreAllDonaldTusk 
Brexit battlers, I've written a children's book about #Brexit but need help getting it into print. Pledges, retweets, likes and follows much appreciated! @Rowland72James @mikegalsworthy @remain_central @WalesBetterInEU @ByDonkeys @BrexitChaos @PolakPolly 
Today we heard from Bertie Ahern, former Irish Taoiseach. Here he talks about the disruptive effect of #Brexit on the island of Ireland  
Why do producers still book Lord Digby Jones when he's proved wrong so often, asks James O'Brien.@mrjamesob | #Brexit 
"We have to be honest that the Brexit that was promised cannot be delivered, & that, if we leave, that will be just the start of a process that will consume our country for a generation or more." Letter by 15 Labour MPs representing seats that voted leave 
It’s ok - they’re putting another JC blank-Brexit-tweet poster in its place... AND paying for it.   
Not only do they have less than 10% of the required number of permits, but after a no deal Brexit UK hauliers will have to complete a 38-point anti-terrorism certification to drive in the EU. A second massive blow to the industry. Entirely predictable.  
#quote"Britain cd lead the world into a new era of democracy + free trade, using the Brexit revolt AGAINST the establishment as a springboard to making the global order more cooperative"Somewhat surprising change of tack after three years of Project Fear. 
#Brexit is about a lying, cheating gang of rich bastards who will use any trick, make any threat, and cause any amount of suffering in order to slash their tax bills and tear up the health, safety, environmental and workplace regulations which eat into their profits. 
I raised a Point of Order for @Plaid_Cymru on the twelve Catalan leaders on trial simply for organising a democratic referendum on Catalan independence. These peaceful people are political prisoners held against their human rights for believing in self-determination #Catalonia 
Brexit is a never-ending surrealist geography lesson in which the homework has never been done  
Probably the worst thing about Corbyn's support for Brexit and his refusal to call for a #PeoplesVote is that it makes an A50 extension all the more unlikely. What would be the point of the EU extending, when neither of the main parties offers a real alternative? 
Hauliers warn they face going out of business ‘overnight’ over Brexit  
As UK and France negotiate no-deal Brexit terms, latest pictures emerge from Channel Tunnel:  
Nigerian football fans are calling Marcus Rashford 'Brexit Lil Kesh' after Manchester United's Champions League match with Paris Saint-Germain. 
Dear Brits,We really  you & still think it’s a pity that you want to leave the EU. But when it comes to the last 16 of #UCL we are for a quick triple #Brexit – #NoDeal and no #backstop XOXO,Ze Germans@SpursOfficial vs. @BVB@LFC vs. @FCBayern@s04 vs. @ManCity#TOTBVB 
Dark money is pushing for a no-deal Brexit. Who is behind it? | George Monbiot  @georgemonbiot 
It's not a "Tory Brexit".17.4 million people from all parts of the UK and all sides of politics voted Leave. FYI: The Tory PM campaigned against it.  
"I run a small florist's and Brexit is killing my business." Read why this florist believes a #PeoplesVote is the #OnlyWayForward for her business and small business owners like her: 
Spot on from @AllisonPearson: "The Tories will lose millions of votes to Nigel Farage’s insurgents if they persist in sticking with MPs who are Lib Dems in blue clothing. @NickBoles may be the first to be deselected over Brexit, but he shouldn’t be the last."  
Dear Kay Burley.  Sky News has lost  37% of its viewers since  2012, and the loss rate has increased with your anti-Brexit bias. 
Labour MPs in open letter: "We are confident that when every Brexit option has been exhausted, we will be able to move to the next stage of our conference policy by campaigning for a new public vote." 
People used to say you were going to deliver Brexit. Not anymore.  
How can you 'honour' a referendum result delivered by lies, crime, Russian intereference & an unjustly gerrymandered electorate, for a catch-all Leave option that gained support from people with bitterly conflicting views of #Brexit? Such an abuse of democracy is without honour. 
No-deal Brexit plans become ever sillier. The government’s frantic preparations are both farcical and frightening. 
NEW: Labour split erupt over Brexit as Keir Starmer suggests general election plan no longer 'credible' 
. @HenrySmithUK "Notwithstanding Brussels bar room chatter, will the PM rule out a delay of Brexit.. Will she also rule out a future customs union arrangement, which would prevent us doing those global trade deals, which the BoE Governor says is a potential golden age of trade?"  
Public prosecutor says that human walls were thrown against the Spanish police on the day of the Catalan referendum.  
Just googled Kawczynski and the first two things that come up are Brexit and lemons. 
the next referendum in Ireland should be to make it legal for boys and girls to be friends! just a thought :) 
“We want Brits to continue to visit the Canaries and to continue to buy.”Yet more evidence EU nations will still be desperate for the custom of British tourists post Brexit! support us at:  
Additional govt-mandated commitments for RN since 2015.• 2 x Littoral Strike Groups -  presence in Asia Pacific / West of Suez• Increased presence in Arctic• Additional patrols in GIUK gap & N.Atlantic with NATO/US 2nd Fleet• Migrant & post-Brexit UK waters patrols  
#BBCR4today said in introduction to #PMQs that Corbyn had not moved to negotiate with May on her defunct Brexit deal when in fact Corbyn has both talked and sent a letter to May with compromise position. May turned down both, she doesn't want debate. #runningclockdown #NoDeal 
8. So. No deal Brexit with WTO rules will mean - in order to avoid economic meltdown - that our working conditions and wages are reduced to 3rd world levels.9. Now can you see why the hard-right of the Tory party are so keen on a no-deal Brexit? 
Would you like to Stop Brexit? I can teach you how, with a unique combination of Mindfulness & Relaxed Breathing techniques I have developed over a period of almost 10 years. Follow me so I can DM you my PayPal details and we can get started ASAP. #TogetherWeCan #StopBrexit 
If you want to know what it has been like being an EU citizen since the referendum, read this cartoon commentary.  It’s spot on.   
Ford has said a no-deal Brexit would be catastrophic for the firm's manufacturing operations in the UK and that it would do "whatever is necessary" to protect its business 
Not just silence from any MP but not a word in the MSM. The whole of the establishment are now on the path of Globalism. With Brexit we fought to get our borders back but with this pact, they have handed them to the World. This country is on it's knees, this pact will finish us.  
Canary Islands moving forward with plan to give Brits a post-Brexit tax break.“We want the Brits to continue to visit the Canaries and to continue to buy.” 
As a gay man, I am disgusted that many of our so-called remainer 'allies' are now using us as a weapon in their war on Brexit.The UK has made itself the second most gay friendly nation in the world, not the EU.We are people, not tools to be used in your political games.  
I signed this letter to the Guardian with 14 Labour MPs.  Any Brexit leaves our cities poorer. In the end, ⁦@peoplesvote_uk⁩ will be the only way forward.Our constituencies voted to leave – based on an impossible promise  
Let's look in more detail into what the UK's failure to roll over existing trade deals for the UK's trade policy post-Brexit - because it significantly complicates plans for new deals 1/  
Saying "Most isolationists voted Leave so Brexit is isolationist" is like saying "Most libertarians voted Conservative so the government is libertarian". 
Dear every hard Brexiter who wants a hard Brexit with WTO rules,I'll write slowly so you can follow this.1. If we go to WTO rules we will need to apply tariffs to our exports and imports.2. If we apply tariffs, then British manufacturers exporting will be more expensive. 
Ford told May it could move business overseas because of Brexit  
"the Labour Party has now dumped its manifesto commitment on Brexit to respect the referendum result. It is now calling for Britain to stay in the EU’s customs union forever – which would effectively mean being locked into the EU forever" 
Why is Yvette Cooper on TV again trying to derail Brexit. Don’t forget 70% of your constituents Yvette voted leave the E.U. Flipped your homes 3 times in expenses scandal. Why Labour never get elected again.. Corbyn, Abbott, Lammy, Gardiner, Thornberry, Umunna, McDonnell.  
"The EU didn't stop austerity" was what a leaver said to me. Need I say more?#peoplesvote #FBPE #brexit 
Despite the endless Brexit media cackle, despite the vicious rubbish we have to suffer from trolls, the excellent Adrian Chiles finds that most real people are still pretty moderate in their opinions about it:   
Sharing again. I've tried to put in to words my feelings re Brexit and how it makes me feel as a foreigner. It resulted in this 10-part brain dump of a story.I'm aware there are many non-Brexit stories/issues out there but this is about me.#comics #brexit #the3million #danish 
Could you ask him about his extracurricular work. And his links to Banks. And how much he hopes to make if a no deal, hard Brexit. #specialplaceinhell 
How is it acceptable for an anonymous unelected figure in Jeremy’s office to treat our #Brexit spokesman, Keir Starmer, in this way? This undermining of him & our unanimously agreed Party policy must stop.  
Dark money is pushing for a no-deal Brexit. Who's behind it? I wrote similar article in Nov 2017 Strip away the layers and #Brexit becomes ever murky  
Germany's Brexit NIGHTMARE: Firms demand EU CAVES IN and ends UK no deal uncertainty - but don’t expect that to be reported by the BBC..  
I really do think Brexit is going to be great for British businesses. However in all honesty, I really do think there is one that deserves to fold. Ian’s.  
Low inflation,Good Inward Investments,£ is Up  and Stockmarket Rising!Sky News report through gritted teeth!This Brexit uncertainty is a terrible thing for Markets Mr Carney!How’s things going in Europe Mr Governor?Is that a Sun Tan of a Red Face you’ve got there? 
Global banks moving operations from Britain to the EU because of Brexit are poised to face fresh regulatory scrutiny on the value of their assets and capital  
British nationals who have retired to EU countries may no longer have their healthcare costs covered by the NHS in the event of a no-deal Brexit and many are considering returning home,  #StopBrexit #Brexit 
Farage was the leader of a political party that got more votes than the Lib Dems and SNP.His party also won the European Elections, so I think he has earned more than a say on Brexit.  
Liam Fox promised he would have 40 trade deals ready to be rolled over. He's only secured SEVEN. Just the latest sign of the Gov's abject failure to deliver on the Brexit promises. Please RT:  
“Nobody but nobody in my business seriously invests in Europe.”From a letter to the European Commission President Jean Claude Juncker from INEOS Chairman Sir Jim Ratcliffe. Extraordinary and a must-read #Brexit  
Brilliant comic about being an EU citizens in Brexit Britain by Peter Rasmussen.You don't have to be a ginger-male-Dane to relate! #InLimbo #immigration #BrexitBritain@ellywrightart @emmyzen @InfoGirl875 @CosiDoerfel @ElenaInLimbo @vdavidmartin 
Every single person who voted for Brexit is an intolerant, bigoted piece of shit. All of them. No exception. Absolute scum. Worse than dog shit. Filled with hatred. I despise them so much I could literally piss myself with rage. 
Nervous times as crisis grows. My latest Brexit Blog post on May's contradictory messages, the danger of normalising no deal, why remainers shouldn't lose hope - and what Bogart in The Maltese Falcon can tell us about Brexit brinkmanship. Just up, now:  
Brexit derangement syndrome claims another victim. This is what happens when people used to getting their own way are unable to overturn a decision they don't like. Celebrities & millionaires seem to struggle the most.  
Obviously we can't ignore the #Brexit concerns of businesses like #Ford, but we do have a right to challenge them... after all, the same company claimed in 2001 that it would quit the UK if we didn't adopt the euro:  
Just came accross this map we posted over 3 years ago. Our favourite comment at time: "There is no risk whatsoever to British trade from a Brexit" -  
 @TommySheppard takes a lead on standing up for human rights in Parliament, with his Human Rights Act debate today.Human rights are hugely important, and they must not be eroded by Brexit.  
Fungus is filamentous - the body of the jam is filled with fungus before you see any fruiting bodies on the surface. Perhaps the PM consuming hallucinogenic mycotoxins is to blame for Brexit?  
Belgium's Prime Minister says the withdrawal agreement is "a good deal" and the British parliament "is trying to take us toward a bad deal"He prefers No Deal to renegotiating the backstopBelgium has a veto on the dealA hopeful sign we may be moving to a No Deal/WTO Brexit 
This must be one of the so-called upsides to Brexit I’ve heard so much about 
Welcome to The Brexit Party (Official Twitter)Register your interest at #Brexit 
Brexit truly is the political equivalent of half the pub chanting “DOWN IN ONE” to a guy with a fatal egg allergy and a yard of Advocaat. 
The newly-formed Brexit Party has its first MEPs as @Nigel_Farage is joined by @Tim_Aker, @NathanGillMEP, @Coburn4Brexit and @julia_reid.  Support us at  
Come off it Kay .. there is no balance in any channels when it comes to Brexit. Whether it’s pro-EU activists masquerading as journalists, or @bbcquestiontime packing panels with remain voices, many of us have long ago lost faith in MSM to deliver unbiased news. 
Theresa May’s Brexit deal saw one of the largest defeats suffered by a government in the House of CommonsYet she is still in a state of denial telling MPs to vote for her deal or face a no deal BrexitThere is a third option, Jeremy Corbyn’s 5 point plan. And it works! #PMQs 
EVERYTIME the Sixers lose it’s a referendum on Embiid. The Sixers made an acquisition and that guy was 0-6 from 3 last night. If it’s 2-6 they win. Am I crazy? #SixersOutsiders 
When Rashford opens Twitter and finds his name trending as BREXIT lil Kesh   
Some Of Your Favourite Footballers Now Have Twitter Nick Names.Jorginho - Dreadless OrumaHiguain - Bearded Morata/white LukakuRashford - Brexit Lil keshAdd Any Other One You Know. 
The EDPB just published an information note on data transfers in the event of a no-deal Brexit. You can read the note here:  Additionally, an information note on BCRs was adopted:  
#BrexitAmendmentsA: Labour - substantive vote by end Feb.C: Clarke et al - indicative votes on all optionsD: SNP - revocation of Article 50E: Souby-Umunna et al - publish official no-deal assessment within 7 daysB: Godsiff - extension of Art 50 for ratification referendum 
Prosecutor: "There were violent situations on September 20, 2017, and during [the referendum on] October 1, 2017". Hilarious, because this kind of violence (if proven at all) does not threaten the state as such. The German court ruled out this non-argument 
#Brexit - it's not Scotland's place to overturn how England voted, any more than it is England's right to overrule how Scotland voted. Scotland's government's sole duty at this stage is to urgently & proactively protect how Scotland voted by declaring a date for #IndyRef2. 
LATEST: Four other MEPs have joined Farage’s new Brexit Party, according to the EU Parliament website. They are: @Tim_Aker, @NathanGillMEP, @Coburn4Brexit and @julia_reid. 
Classic Tory speak for “we did the work then ignored the evidence and did what we wanted in order to benefit our friends”Sounds exactly like what is happening with Brexit as a whole. 
Crikey.  If Olly Robbins is a 5th Columnist what does that make you?Meetings with a foreign state to try and use them to influence the Brexit vote, appearing repeatedly on Russian TV, meetings with Assange, an illegal campaign backed by colleagues meeting with the Russians.. 
Sky News is 'fair & balanced' - don't make me laugh   Every single debate has more Remainers than Leavers, even though Leave won the referendum. Kate's comments are not encouraging or condoning attacks on journalists in any shape or form.  You aren't immune from criticism.  
Slapdown for Keir Starmer. Jeremy Corbyn’s office insist a general election remains Labour’s “preferred option” as a way out of the Brexit mess. On radio this morning, Starmer said the only “credible options” were a compromise deal or a second referendum. Clear? 
Disappointing to see Caroline Spelman back a new amendment designed to delay and frustrate Brexit, given what she promised only two weeks ago. She should keep her promise and help deliver Brexit! 
This afternoon I'm leading a debate on #HumanRights in Westminster Hall. I'll be demanding that the UK gov makes it clear that they don't intend to repeal the #HRA after #Brexit.  
This deal is "a half way house, leaves us half in, half out, cedes our sovereignty and I don't believe that's what people voted for." @annaturley on why she won't support this #Brexit deal and wants a #PeoplesVote. Tell your MP you want a #PeoplesVote:  
What would a ‘no deal’ Brexit mean for our environment? @stephhilborne explains the effects it could have on the natural world. 
For context #Brexit fans...it would take a lot for many in Ireland to be on Bertie Ahern’s side in any argument. But that’s what happens when such a ridiculous proposition is uttered aloud.  
My little girl who’s 2 months old just said to me “Mummy I’m scared because Brexit will have an impact on the economy and I’m becoming increasingly pessimistic about how good a deal the UK will get.”**I don’t have a kid but I need to go viral so... 
A TSSA union poll shows @jeremycorbyn supporting May’s Deal would do more harm to the party then the Iraq war. Bit of a pickle when he wants #Brexit and May’s Deal is the only one the EU will agree to. This leaves Corbyn in a careful juggling act. (1) 
The Prime Minister has been rumbled by her own loosed lipped senior Brexit advisor, the only option now is to extend Artcile 50. She must stop putting party before all else. @theresa_may face down the extremists in your own party and finally do the right thing. 
Fox taking *interesting* approach to stats:He plays down significance of the 40 trade deals UK already has via EU - which he needs to replicate by March 29 if there's no-deal Brexit. He says 20 smallest account for under 0.8% of UK trade(But the other 20 account for 10%) 
I've no time for Leavers who yell "Just leave!" or "Leave means Leave!" They're betraying their country with their carelessness. They are the opposite of patriots. They talk about taking back control, but they are utterly irresponsible. They might as well be traitors. #Brexit 
Your daily @DealBook Briefing:• Trump may wait for 'real deal' with China. • Was Theresa May's Brexit endgame overheard in a bar?• T-Mobile and Sprint face off against Congress. 
 Prosecutor says "human barricades were thrown against Spain's police" on Catalan referendum day. Learn more   
Personally I thought the biggest facepalm moment in that tweet was the "tribal party politics" comment, when the *entire bloody referendum* was the *Tories* playing tribal party politics with a major national issue in an attempt to end their own civil war over Europe  
Labours Brexit policy has always been to leave with a good deal, or don’t leave at allLike it or not, that is the most common sense way to bridge the gap between Leavers and Remainers, neither of which Labour can afford to abandon. Save the fury for the architects of this mess 
According to The Times, Ford is preparing for alternative production sites outside of the UK because of Brexit. 
British citizens hoping to work in Switzerland will face immigration quotas if there's no Brexit deal  
It has taken Brexit to confirm to the people of the UK that Parliament isn’t there to serve or deliver to the people. But rather to give arrogant, self-serving MPs A career & a roof over their head. As Cromwell said “Ye are grown intolerably odious to the whole nation.” 
BREAKING: @Nigel_Farage now Brexit Party MEP.  
Jackson Carlaw stated  the Scottish Gov have been destructive to the Brexit talks Can I remind Carlaw he and his band of Scots Tories have supported the people of Scotland having NO voice in the negotiations by supporting his London bosses by refusing the SG into the talks 
The UK’s Brexit negotiator is talking about a long delay to Article 50. The establishment are betraying Brexit. I am now sitting as an MEP for The Brexit Party in the European Parliament. Sign up to  below! 
Swiss Allow 3,500 Work Permits for Britons in Case of No-Deal Brexit  
Brexit.Trump.Climate Change.And Pasha Leaving Strictly.Surely these truly are the end of days. 
James O'Brien on Lord Digby Jones: "He wanders into a room, tells himself he's clever and isn't clever enough to realise how dumb he actually is."@mrjamesob | #Brexit  
Strict laws my arse. The anti-Brexit, anti-Trump, left-wing gobshites on C4, Sky & BBC have dispensed their partisan drivel & selective reporting relentlessly.  
Speaking to @BBCNews from London ahead of meetings with Jeremy Corbyn, Sinn Féin leader @MaryLouMcDonald said a crash Brexit will be disastrous for Ireland and has accused the British PM of acting in bad faith #Brexit  
Incredibly we’re now at the point where journos who have been saying Corbyn should be talking about Brexit and nothing else are now saying he should be talking about something else. Actually, not that incredible at all. Just another entirely normal day for the British media #PMQs 
Good that the Prime Minister agrees to a request from my Labour colleague @peterkyle to a meeting to discuss passing her #Brexit deal subject to it being confirmed in a public vote. 
Leavers don't understand that modern trade means foreign interference. It means shared product and services standards, agreements about environmental standards, access to government contracts and market areas etc.Economic sovereignty is a myth and delusion. #PeoplesVote #Brexit 
Ford employs nearly 14,000 workers in the UK. That’s a huge amount of jobs that are now potentially at risk because of something that is so completely unnecessary.#Brexit 
Jeremy Corbyn's proposals would take a meaningful Brexit off the table.  
SNP's Ian Blackford: "Businesses are begging for certainty" on #Brexit Theresa May: "Give business certainty by voting for the deal"#PMQs  
A debate on the future of the Human Rights Act is taking place in Parliament today. @TommySheppard (SNP): "There's a lot of unfinished business, particularly as concerns what happens after Brexit."  
It's very clear now. Project Fear was not such thing. Britain is being dismantled by Brexit - jobs and livelihoods at risk. This is a self-inflicted national disaster. Time to WAKE UP #Ford 
The idea that “Brits in Spain”=Expats deserving special treatment, but “Spaniards in Britain”=migrants who deserve a hostile environment, is probably the single stupidest idea behind the Brexit vote and its hold can be laid at the feet of colonialist mindsets & ofc the Daily Fail 
A) There was a 600 page plan but hardly a leaflet for “Leave” in 2016B) This isn’t an answer to the fact that the Prime Minister is personally responsible for the #Brexit chaos causing huge insecurityC) The EU point was a lie then & is an embarrassment for all Unionists now.  
WATCH | May is once again asked two simple questions; will she rule out extending Article 50 and rule out remaining locked inside a customs union?She doesn't answer either.With six weeks to go, any attempt to frustrate Brexit will be met with an almighty backlash! #PMQs 
.@KirstySNP tells BBC #PoliticsLive that it's shocking that someone in a bar in a Brussels has been told more about the Prime Minister’s Brexit position than MPs or businesses.  
Heartening to know and be informed - that many employers and managers having to make those difficult and painful decisions to lay workers off because of slump caused by brexit are laying off known brexit voters first. - they voted for it after all and believe its short term pain 
Wowww !  Even Wikipedia now knows Rashford as Brexit Lil Kesh.  
I know of 3 employers and 2 actual managers at huge companies doing the good deed of laying off brexit voters first - sad but fair - after all they knew exactly what they were voting for and it's only short term pain for them - brexit cargo cultists just have to 'believe' more  
Ive raised this point repeatedly over the last month in @HouseofCommons & a @CommonsEUexit exchange with @chhcalling which went viral. Unfortunately Corbyn’s #PMQS were not focused enough to to skewer @theresa_may. #ferrygate #Seabornefreight #Brexit  
 Unlike Brexit, which was based on an empty slogan and false promises on the side of a bus, #indyref was based on a detailed White Paper. Theresa May should stop trying to rewrite history. 
I can't make Parliamentary Committee today & as emails are screened I thought I'd tweet the boss instead. So @jeremycorbyn here goes. Members leaving in their thousands over Brexit. Cllrs quitting. MPs will leave. Antisemitism continues in your name. Only you can change all this 
Chairman of Barclays, Sir Gerry Grimstone, tells European Financial Forum in Dublin the bank has embraced the opportunity of Brexit. Says it will have 200bn euro in assets here in Ireland once transfers have been completed. 
Henry Smith MP says Mark Carney described Brexit as a “golden age of trade”. But he didn’t. Why would you make such an obviously untrue claim at PMQs? 
I see Jacob Rees Mogg’s “We’ll see the benefit of Brexit in 50 years” has been gazumped by Digby Jones to 100. Hey ho. 
Ian Blackford (SNP) - "Will the Prime Minister now face down the extremists in her own party and extend Article 50." #PMQs #Brexit  
Brexit has caused our pathetic politicians to give into 50 snivelling little facists.In WW2, our politicians were strong enough to defeat 70 million of them. Nothing shows more how far Britain has sunk than Theresa May. 
No plan? No plan??? The @scotgov published an over 600 page plan!! #indyref #PMQs #Brexit  
Startlingly personal attack on Corbyn’s credibility by May: “People used to say he is a conviction politician. Not any more”. I hear this is Tories’ new attack line, developed from their internal polling that reveals sharp rise in distrust over his 2nd referendum flip flop #PMQs 
@IanBlackfordMP: "Businesses are begging for certainty. The economy is already suffering. You’ve come to the end of the road, PM, rumbled by your own loose-lipped senior Brexit advisor.Theresa May must face down the Tory Brexit extremists and extend Article 50. #PMQs 
Corbyn drills into Brexit ferry contract debacle. But far more uncomfortable for her would have been the Olly Robbins's remarks about extending A50 given her MPs furious. Or he could have gone on UC pushing people to food banks. Perfect Corbyn territory #PMQs 
Theresa May only just claimed nobody knows Corbyn’s Brexit policy. This is despite the 5 points being widely shared across multiple platforms, major EU endorsement and many in her own Party privately agreeing with it. #MayTellsLies #PMQs 
The #snp's @IanBlackfordMP asks a brief but pointed question on when the #meaningfulvote will come @theresa_may wont rule out delaying it until 2 weeks before #brexit 
I’m afraid Theresa May’s spluttering and stuttering over Corbyn’s“Due Dilligence” Quip during PMQs over Seaborne Ferries  just about sums what an absolute Shambles this Government has been in their management of Brexit!Just For Once!!I Agree With Jeremy !!! 
 @IanBlackfordMP: "This is the height of arrogance from a government set on running down the clock.Just 44 days from a no-deal Brexit scenario, the Prime Minister is hamstrung by her own party – and rejected by European leaders." #PMQs 
As a result of #brexit its becoming increasingly clear to me that Whitehall/Westminster is broken and its in Wales' best interest to take more responsibility for its future & so more control. The same also applies to many parts of England that have also been let down by London 
I just joined the Liberal Democrats as I feel I need to do something to fight against this arrogant and destructive government - join me here:  via @LibDems.  If all of us opposed to Brexit join, we can change politics in this country for the better. 
Slightly odd perhaps that @theresa_may is making a virtue of preparing to avoid medicine shortages in the event of a no-deal Brexit which she says she does not want and which her own Brexit negotiatior Olly Robbins appears to believe she can eliminate as a risk 
 The EU's PGI (Protected Geographical Indication) system is vital in protecting the likes of Scotch Whisky, Scotch Beef and Scotch Lamb from counterfeits.My @theSNP colleague @DeidreBrock and I are calling on the UK Government to retain PGIs post #Brexit.Learn more below.  
Ford told UK PM May it is preparing alternative production sites.The company employs 13,000 people. Because of Brexit, it is now looking at moving production overseas.Nobody voted for this shambles. MPs must take action to #RevokeA50.#PMQs 
2/3 it is clear that her strategy is to run down the clock with empty promises and then attempt to blackmail MPs. What’s not yet clear is if she’ll try to blackmail moderate MPs with threat of no deal or, as per Olly Robbins’ bar chat, Brexit zealots with threat of delay, or both 
Thread on #customs transit. Why it isn’t a #Brexit silver bullet and why proposals for NI border relying solely on transit would make it one of the most restrictive borders out there (even if we managed to get to no infrastructure). Might get long /1 
as much as it's fun to kick Seaborne in the teeth, it's worth setting the £800,000 spent on due diligence (on all three ferry contracts) against the total £4,000,000,000 (£4bn) being spent across Whitehall on Brexit preparations 
The PM tells us "proper due diligence" was carried out on Seaborne Containers ... Presumably not including having a ship though ! :) Crazy Brexit UK #pmqs 
Inflation Falls to Two-Year Low Despite Brexit - Guido Fawkes  
Will we get any clarity from the PM at #PMQs today on #Brexit especially given more news this week that businesses are planning to leave the U.K. #SeaborneFreight what a mess  this government couldn’t run a bath  
Say what you like about Jacob Rees-Mogg and the Brexit crew, but:They have not shown us their boobsThey have not told people they'll lose jobs for their political viewsAnd they have not rejoiced in the fact old people are dying All of which chief Remainers have done  
This Government’s handling of Brexit has been costly, shambolic and deliberately evasive. Nothing symbolises that more than the fiasco of Seaborne freight – a company with no ships and no trading history. - @jeremycorbyn #PMQs 
Live: May is taking PMQs in Parliament after urging the MPs to buy more time for a better #Brexit deal yesterday  
"What do we mean by 'Leave'?" by Brexit architect and Vote Leave founder (Daily Politics, Jan 2016). This is not some isolated example......  
Does nudity change your mind on Brexit? The naked Brexit academic on @gmb 
Tony Blair's Europhile pal Olly Robbins is bossing Britain's Brexit negotiations. He wields immense power, but appears to be answerable to nobody. By not sacking him, Theresa May has made a mockery of our parliamentary democracy. 
Reaction of former Taoiseach Bertie Ahern to being asked at UK parliamentary committee about how suggestions that Ireland should leave the EU and rejoin the UK as way of solving #Brexit border issue have gone down in Ireland - ‘Well, I’ll just be kind and say, not very well’  
The 27th looks like it’s going to be Brexit ‘high noon’. Take a day off school/work/uni and make sure your MP knows what way young people want them to vote! Join us to lobby your MP on the 27th Feb:  
Dear @guyverhofstadt & @MichelBarnier. If the UK gets an Article 50 extension we really want to be able to vote in the European Parliament elections so we can show our mostly wretched politicians that most of us want to stay in the EU.#Brexit #PeoplesVote 
imagine you woke up one day and no one talked about Brexit, anywhere 
This is why every Remainer should join a political party.There are millions of us. We’re the biggest political force in the country.Don’t let a handful of Brexiter party members get away with calling the shots every time an MP speaks out against Brexit.Join a party today.  
SNP Economy spokesperson @KirstySNP points out the UK government has not published an economic impact assessment of Theresa May's Brexit deal. MPs are being asked to vote for a deal without an assessment of the impact on jobs, living standards and the economy #PoliticsLive 
I am an economist and my views on Brexit are that it is an unmitigated disaster which in large part explains why the UK economy is slowing fast....  
 MUST WATCH: Tory MP and former minister admits there is "no clear assessment" of the Brexit deal. @KirstySNP is spot-on: Theresa May can't ask MPs to vote for her deal, if she's keeping everyone in the dark about how the economic impact. #politicslive 
"We asked the country if any Brexiteers have changed their minds about Brexit since seeing the naked Cambridge professor, here's how many said yes."  
"Crashing out without a deal is a disastrous option for this country... and so it must be stopped."Former Tory Attorney General Dominic Grieve explains why he is backing an attempt to block a no-deal Brexit.  
If, post #Brexit the Americans flood out markets with low grade, chemically polluted foodstuffs many of our farmers will face a choice - lower standards to compete or go bust. But if they lower standards their produce won’t be allowed into the #EU - their nearest, biggest market. 
POLL: Terry Christian has called for employers across Britain to sack employees ‘where possible’ for voting BrexitDo you agree with Terry Christian? Should millions of Brexit supporters be made unemployed? Please retweet after casting your vote. Thank youcc @terrychristian 
I think I've finally picked a stance re Brexit and it is that either we stay in or take a deal or we go full Lord of the Flies, none of that wet "mild food shortages" bollocks, if it's No Deal I want us all to go feral 
Not only did those who pushed for Brexit patently not have a plan, it is also clear they had no idea how the EU works, how the global trading system works or even how the British economy works. No amount of bluster and blame-shifting can hide their cluelessness.  
Delighted to discuss transparency and public dialogue in #Brexit negotiations w/ @EUombudsman Emily O’Reilly in Strasbourg.Transparency is essential to maintain unity of EU27 and the trust of our citizens.We will continue to be open and transparent about #Brexit.  
Brexit: May faces prospect of defeat in Brexit vote after ERG refuse to back government motion - Politics live  
It's not deal or no deal.It's deal, no deal, Rethink (RevokeA50, people's vote), and let's not forget NO BREXITWhat do you want RT to increase sample size please 
In the past 20 days on TL, •Gorimapa Chris Brown•Shomolu,  Ariana Grande •Brexit Lil Kesh Twitter,  which way? 
Joel in the newsroom fact-checks @IanBlackfordMP’s claim that there has been no Brexit impact assessment - and he agrees that the PM’s political declaration has not been assessed. #politicslive 
"Worst-ever Bank of England Governor, all of whose doom-laden predictions about Brexit have failed to come true, makes yet another doom-laden prediction about Brexit" shocker.  
Implications of expexcting a prime minister who won’t make minor changes to her own lifestyle to avoid a personal existential threat, trying to negotiate Brexit: nothing good. 
Certified moron Digby Jones say we will need 100 years to reap Brexit benefits 
Ford has become the latest carmaker to sound the alarm over Brexit, saying that it is stepping up preparations to move production out of Britain  
“It is hardly surprising that disdain for the EU as an institution and for its practitioners is growing across the continent... Brexit is the most powerful manifestation of the public’s contempt for the undemocratic nature of the EU.”#StandUp4Brexit 
Who the hell is this Olly Robbins, why is he having such a say on BrexitI don't remember being given a choice on electing him so why is he in such a position of power ‘They’ve thrown their hands up and walked out!’ EU to back Robbins' Brexit delay plan   
The idea that the UK can leave the EU is nonsense. We can give up our membership and our major influence in the EU, but the economic superpower will still be next door, having a huge impact on our economy & domestic policies.Take back control #StopBrexit!#Brexit 
Olly Robbin's blunder confirms government has no intention of delivering real Brexit"This confirms what I have suspected since 2016 - government has no intention of delivering a complete, unencumbered exit from the EU” - @GerardBattenMEP IN FULL:  
I will be supporting efforts to revoke Article 50 tomorrow. Will vote for anything that stalls or hinders their Tory Brexit but stopping this madness now is what is required. Scotland and my constituency voted to remain. That is my mandate. 
Inflation down, wages up as Brexit approaches  
Never forget how certain TV journalists colluded with Downing Street Remainers during the referendum to decide who spoke for Vote Leave in TV debates. Such pundits are not neutral by standers  
We are expected to believe Olly Robbins just happens to go to a famous Brussels bars where politicians & journalist meet, then quietly announces May's secret Brexit plot in front of an ITV journalist. Clearly a setup to force MPs to back May's awful deal..  
Tory government votes not to retain European human rights charter in UK law after Brexit | The Independent⁦@jeremycorbyn⁩ put forward a bill to retain the EC Fundamental Human Rights Charter, Tories voted against it.#ReasonsForAGeneralElection  
The best friend of #Brexit is the passivity of workers who are threatened by it. #Ford planning to up sticks & leave UK, but Ford workers aren't marching on Parliament. Similarly, #Nissan workers appear to be in denial. Denial rules. 
The shocking ineptitude of Theresa Mays incomprehensibly incompetent handling of Brexit laid bare  
The Ken Clarke amendment is innovative. Instead of a series of indicative votes, MPs would be given a ballot paper and asked to rank Brexit options in order of preference. An option must be backed by 50 MPs to get on the ballot. 
Vote Leave and Darren Grimes have lost a legal bid to have their appeal against the Electoral Commission's Brexit overspending case reheard in front of a judge. Instead it will take the form of a review, in which VL and DG raise grounds of appeal against the EC's 2018 findings. 
Remember Corbyn the day after the Referendum - what a ridiculous misjudgement  
‘Entire Brexit process is flawed, that’s why we can’t reach an agreement’Dominic Grieve is right.Brexiters built their referendum campaign on a pack of lies.The public now want to #Remain, by a 12-point lead and growing.MPs must vote to #StopBrexit 
Why do certain MPs think this is an appropriate charge to put to an independent, sovereign country that is their equal? The levels of ignorance exposed by this #Brexit process  
And the decision relies exclusively on the referendum. Which even she admits is “blemished”, and which is known to be the site of alarming corruption and malpractice.  
.@terrychristian alleges he knows of at last three employers who are sacking employees for voting Brexit - and he calls for all employers to do the same ‘where possible’Retweet if you agree that Terry Christian should name these employers instead of cowardly avoiding it  
Mark Carney drops Project Fear as he talks up free trade potential of Brexit 
Tory backbenchers’ cunning plan for a soft-Brexit deal by mid April  
Have you considered Ma'am that Brexit is just incredibly and irrevocably shit  
Have patience. Enough of us @Conservatives in and out of Parliament want to get this done, honour the Referendum result and create great opportunities for the future. The next months could be a bit bumpy but if we pull together, hold our nerve and execute we will get there. 
These elections are a referendum on Buhari's four year term in office.Okay, you saying he's "taking his time to transform Nigeria". "Transform Nigeria" based on what plan of action? The plagiarized "Next Level" document? 
In his efforts to sabotage Brexit, Olly Robbins is working harder than #CaitlynJenners photoshop 
Things we've learned about fbpe in the last day. Gina Miller isn't really that bothered about brexit, she's more concerned about removing Corbyn.Also, Terry Christian wants to discriminate against anyone who voted for brexit.Fbpe are extremists. 
Urgent question from @BarryGardiner after #PMQs about why only 6 of 40 existing trade deals are ready to be rolled over when we leave EU. @LiamFox promised they’d be signed “one second after midnight” the day we leave. More disastrous handling of Brexit by Tories. @labourwhips 
Choice between Brexit deal or delay is not government's position. It’s also out of the hands of MPs, which voted to leave the EU by 29th March, twice in fact, it is law. Only EU27 can delay Brexit, not the UK. We won’t get a better deal until we leave..  
2019 is the year of savagery. All our favourite celebrities now have twitter nick names. Banky W - Gorimakpa Chris brownBURNA boy - Discount Fela/Okirika Bob MarleyHiguain - Bearded Morata/white LukakuRashford - Brexit Lil keshAdd any other one you can remember.  
Brexit was always going to fail because it was completely undeliverable. And then you were always going to blame everyone else for your failures. So predictable, it is probably not even worth mentioning. But I will - brexit will fail. 
If, at this stage of the #Brexit proceedings, you don’t think that we’re totally fucked, you're either an idiot or you haven’t been paying attention. 
Now if you don't see why the Irish Border (or the English border as united-Irelanders would call it) is such a major issue in Brexit and why Olly Robbins basically ruled out No Deal today... WATCH! 
Theresa May: One should never let anything go to waste. For example, I always scrape the mould off the top of the jam and give it a job, such as Brexit secretary or foreign secretary. 
I don’t say this lightly but this Govt & the Tory Party it represents is more anti-worker than Thatcher’s. At this stage of the Brexit process they will promise anything & say anything, but the idea that they could be trusted on workers’ rights isn’t just naive, it’s preposterous  
Are you a failed comedian? Will you be just as much of an irrelevance post Brexit as you were pre Brexit? Your worries are over. Join the #FBPE circus, plenty of clown vacancies available now.  
England and Wales, that voted for Leave, could secede from the British Union and leave Scotland and NI as the successor state.That solves all the problems of Brexit in one go, says @Scotpol1314. 
The “business case for #Brexit” was driven by 4 business - virtually no one else from biz appeared on TV to argue for it:1. Dyson - buggered off to Singapore2. Weatherspoons - profit warnings, strange public ramblings3. Valerie Pattiserie - bankrupt4. Oh & this idiot  
British MP: "What are Irish people's view of Ireland "rejoining the UK"?Bertie Ahern: "I’ll just be kind and say ‘not very well’”Brexit select committee 
"There is a v. real risk that a lack of clear, actionable info from govt will leave firms, their people & their communities hung out to dry."UK firms say they urgently need clarity to limit chaos of a no-deal Brexit and demand PM answers 20 Qs on trade. 
Did austerity lead to Brexit? What role did globalisation have? How did things like where you live, immigration, and the job you have impact the EU Referendum result?Join us at 7pm on Monday 25th February to discuss:  
Man tries to burn EU flag that is non-flammable due to EU regulations. #brexit  
Bertie Ahern to Brexit select committee: Belfast is not he same as Finchley"The argument that the UK/ Northern Ireland is precisely the same as Finchley is incorrect, it’s  constitutionally incorrect as per the Good Friday Agreement and I think people need to understand that. " 
Sorry but I agree with Kate Hoey. Both Sky and BBC are truely biased against Brexit and also play down the huge marches in the EU despite the shocking violence against the marchers. 
The Euro-federalists’ aim is to create a United States of Europe without the consent of the EU’s 500million people. Britons are the first to say ‘enough is enough’:  #Brexit 
Olly Robbins, UK’s Brexit negotiator, has been rebuked by the Brexit Secretary, who has warned that the UK cannot extend Article 50 into the “darkness”.Brexit latest news: Ministers distance themselves from Olly Robbins over Article 50 extension  
<Jacob Rees-Mogg furiously crunching a glass jamjar, bleeding from the mouth, lips shredded> “I AM KING BREXIT” 
May: We need more timeEU: To do what?May:EU: Can Parliament approve any deal?May: No, cos they don't know which Brexit people want now, if any.The only way to avoid a No Deal Brexit which was NOT the majority wish in 2016, is a new referendum."Olly Robbins"#Brextension 
BIGGER PICTURE - Adam Boulton is married to Anji Hunter. Anji was a personal advisor to Tony Blair and he attended their wedding. Tony Blair is on a mission to reverse #Brexit  
Digby Jones is now the media’s go-to guy when they want a businessman who will defend Brexit, except he has NEVER been a businessman, he’s just a reanimated slice of gammon. Stop encouraging him! 
Depp. Depperter Depp... "When I voted to leave I didn't think it would change anything for my rights to live here."#Brexit healthcare worries for Brits in Spain  
Hey Mr Tusk. Those who pushed for Brexit did have a plan. It just required the EU27, the Commission, the Irish government, and the House of Commons to give them everything they demanded, no matter how selfish, unrealistic, or damaging to the integrity of the EU or Ireland it was  
#AdForumCo Someone called Man Utd's No 10, Rashford, Brexit Lil KeshWe have seen Gorimapa Chris Brown,  Shomolu Ariana Grande and now Brexit Lil Kesh... This app is indeed a dangerous place   
Interesting thread from @KirstyS_Hughes on implications of lengthy #Art50 extension pointing out it could assist smooth transition into #independence in #EU if #indyref2 held during the extended period #Brexit #ScotlandsPlaceInEurope 
Petition: Revoke Art.50 if there is no Brexit plan by the 25 of February  
"It is entirely irrational for the Prime Minister to treat the referendum result as binding which, had it been binding, would have been voided following the EC findings. Irrationality aside, it is unlawful." #StopBrexit  via @brexit_sham 
Brexit lil kesh! LolHopeless clapback from club fans who haven't gotten their shit together after the 6nil thrashingTry better!!! pic.twitter.com/fMx96AltWv 
US steel firms have urged Donald Trump to shut British companies out of American government contracts under a trade deal with the UK.This is what would face us post-Brexit as we negotiate from a weaker position. 
Careful Mitch, David Cameron promised a Brexit vote on the belief it could never pass, too.    
A Labour MP attempted to hand in a petition to the party's headquarters, calling for a second Brexit referendum, only for it to be turned away. Angela Smith's petition, which called on the party leader, Jeremy Corbyn, to back a People's Vote, has been signed by nearly 50,000 
Brussels will reportedly help the PM drag out the Brexit negotiations  
Kay do you need reminding that you're sussposedly meant to be impartial throughout the #Brexit debate, you're an embarrassment to your profession.@KayBurley openly arguing the Remain case. 
Scotland didn't vote for #BrexitJoin our anti-Brexit vigils in #Edinburgh every day this week!Wed 13th - Fri 15th at 17.00-18.30 Princes St, opp foot of North Bridge, by Wellington statue EH1 3YYAlso on Sat 16th Feb 14.30-16.30 #LoveEU@theSNP @scotgp @scotlibdems @ScotLab4EU 
Can you even imagine how moronic you have to be to vote for brexit and live in the EU and not expect it to affect your life? I mean why even vote. Absolutely painful  
Reason tomorrow's Govt Brexit motion is troublesome for the Eurosceptic Tories is that it reiterates "support for the approach to leaving the EU expressed by this House on 29 January" which included the Spelman amendment rejecting no deal.Could get ugly. 
"Let's make it mandatory, let's get every single person in this country to vote and let's see what happens."Member of the Labour front bench calls for a mandatory 'people's vote' on Brexit and claims this time there would be "a different result". 
We are your baristas, cooks, cleaners, childminders,doctors, nurses,teachers,business people.Our kids sit next to your kidsWe pay our taxes, contribute to societyAnd yet ...this is what we are going through RIGHT NOW! #brexit #stopbrexit #racism #fbpe #immigrationbill 
Thank you Rob for this excellent analysis & for your continued support. Thanks everyone else for sharing & donating. Please keep doing so! 
In spite of Brexit, UK inflation has fallen to a two-year low. #StandUp4Brexit 
Being promised "innovative jams" only to be told three years later that the "innovation" is just being forced to eat it after it's already mouldy is actually the perfect metaphor for Brexit in general though  
As we have been saying for the last 2 Years we need all #Brexit Parties to bury their bloody Egos!! Pull together for countries sake!! @UKIP @GerardBattenMEP @Nigel_Farage Stop splitting the Vote !! 
The #UKgov promised 40 current EU free trade deals with 70 countries would roll over under a #NoDeal #Brexit. This morning, revealed only 6 will be in place: Chile, Faroes, Israel, Palestine Authority, Southern and Eastern Africa and Switzerland. #gettingworse 
Mrs May’s 'shadowy' unelected Chief Brexit Adviser Olly Robbins has been caught warning that MPs’ choice is her horrendous deal, or a lengthy delay to Brexit. Is this the man betraying Britain? #WTOBrexitNOW #LetsGoWTO 
This is what Catherine Blaiklock (Brexit party leader) thinks of the NHS. Looks like she’s slyly leaning towards a more privatised version of the NHS. It’s a public service that the public pays for. #PeoplesVote 
wtf I love the naked brexit lady now  
Anyone else sick of being blackmailed over Brexit by May? 
The Post-Brexit Food Chain: ‘This Is Really, Really Scary’ - The New York Times.   
Digby Jones stands by his prediction that "not a single" job will be lost because of Brexit, even though thousands have already gone.@LBC @mrjamesob   
I imagine it won’t be long before a Brexiter pops up to say they know how to run Ford better than the managers do.A #PeoplesVote #FinalSay leading to an #ExitFromBrexit is the only way to save tens of thousands of jobs in the UK from the ravages of #Brexit  
It’s obvious that Theresa May is lying to the British people whilst her emissary Olly Robbins prepares to push through her Brexit in name only that will destroy Brexit.  
2016: Brexit will be easy2018: It won't be as bad as Mad Max2019: Scrape the mould off your jam and carry on2025: EAT UNWANTED ACQUAINTANCES FIRST THEN LEAST FAVOURITE RELATIVES BEFORE MOVING ONTO FRIENDS AND LOVED ONES 
Bertie Ahern former Irish PM is now concerned about welfare of UK and states that BREXIT would be a calamity for the UK! But Sky, as expected, fails to ask him would it not be even worse for the Republic. Ahern is more likely to know about the RoI or the UK! 
Keir Starmer has been royally shafted by Corbyn re referendum clause in May letter. More loss of nerve? If good men don’t fight we deserve No Deal. The price of moral cowardice. 
Brexit is the easy problem that shows exactly how we will fail at tackling the much harder problem of climate change. 
Day 2 in London. The Good Friday Agreement right to choose cannot be a casualty of #BrexitNI born Irish citizens being told until they renounce British citizenship they cannot rely on their Irish citizenship is unacceptableIt's our choice whether we are Irish, British or both  
A must-read about our case: "Is Wilson v the Prime Minister the silver bullet that will kill Brexit?"Please share widely!@Andrew_Adonis @PimlicoPlumbers @VesperUK @eyejosh @AdamWagner1 @JMPSimor @PEleftheriadis @CarolineLucas @sarahwollaston @DrPhillipLeeMP @BremainInSpain 
This BBC profile of concerned Brexit-voting Brits in Spain is a classic of the genre  
Has any remainer thought of telling Jeremy that ‘the hand of Israel’ is behind Brexit? 
WATCH | Brexit Secretary Stephen Barclay comes out strongly against a Brexit delay and confirms that No Deal is the "default option". We'll hold you to that! Maybe somebody should inform Olly Robbins...Read at Support us at  
This is what Tory brexit will look like.  Chlorinated chicken.  Caged pigs.  Fuck knows what in our sandwiches.  
Rees-Mogg says that failing to deliver #Brexit would upset the likes of Tommy Robinson.If that doesn’t tell us everything we need to know.#RevokeA50 
She should have included SkyNews in her tweet: it is so obviously anti Brexit.  Self evidently the laws are not strict enough, as both the BBC and Sky would have lost their licences years ago based on the criteria you set out. 
Please don't be childish in putting yourselves forward as candidates or activists for the brexit party giving false names to waste their time. X #brexitparty #fbpe 
WATCH | The odious Oliver Letwin boasts about his latest attempt to dilute and delay Brexit. His amendment would mandate the govt to extend Article 50 and allow Parliament to push through a fake Brexit.West Dorset voted to leave. @DWConservatives, are you proud of this traitor? 
Days to go until Brexit - 44Alternative Arrangements - 0Trade Agreements last week - 2 (Faroe Islands & Switzerland)Trade Agreements still needed - 78 (starting with EU 27) 
The BBC fair and balanced! Don't make me laugh!! BBC Radio Ulster runs daily sob stories every morning to endorse their Anti Brexit pro EU narrative. What sickens me as a leave voter and a license fee slave, I have to listen to it without no counter arguments. 
'We just assumed Brexit would affect other people, not us!' 
At last I have found a benefit of #Brexit Seeing the realisation of the Brits in Spain that they have fucked themselves.However it is telling as one said " I didn't think it would affect me"But it's okay to hurt others eh!#peoplesvote 
My political manifesto’ll be a trip:* Pro-choice (I support abortions)* Pro-LGBT (Na your nyansh?)* Pro-weed (FDI baby!)* Pro-welfare (social security,health)* Pro-capitalism* Pro-free speech* Pro-gender equality* Pro-Biafra (at least the referendum) 
Digby Jones, like the Wetherspoon chap, appears on air so often because there are so few people even vaguely linked to 'business' prepared to promote Brexit. His great strength is a pathological inability to understand how little he understands. 
Kay Burley should heed her own warning. Branding brexiteers as 'far right' leads to assaults on ordinary decent members of the public who just want the referendum result upheld so our own country can run its own affairs. 
Brexit is a huge opportunity for this country. Good to see Carney drop his incessant scaremongering and start to speak about the positives of life outside the EU!Join our campaign @  
just the PM advising others how to eat food waste ahead of a possible no-deal Brexit, nothing to worry about  
Remember, when you hear the Brexit Tories drone on about a non existent parking tax this is what they actually do when they have power. They even turn on schools crossing patrollers.  
Gina Miller: I was more worried about Corbyn than Brexit...Hah, said all along this women was ALL about preventing a Corbyn led  govt. Just like her mates in the PV campaign. They are trying to save the Govt from themselves. Pls don't back a 2nd ref!  
“We’re very pleased with the diversity of services and institutions that have chosen Ireland as the place to do business because of Brexit..." 
‘@stevebarclay: Brexit delay 'would send very odd message', No Deal is still ‘default option’. “It’s worth reminding ourselves that this was the biggest vote in our country’s history.” 
83% Conservative voters and 84% Leavers think that the EU has been harsh during the #Brexit negotiations, new survey finds @drsarahwolff @ProfTimBale @jsajuria @CER_QMUL 
Hi @UKLabour repeat after me: Every version of Brexit leaves us poorer. Every version of Brexit leaves us poorer. Every version of Brexit leaves us poorer. Every version of Brexit leaves us poorer. Every version of Brexit leaves us poorer. #DontBackToryBrexit 
the most powerful Brexit metaphor I've ever seen  
I'm now certain that most people's job on this app is to troll. Brexit Lil Kesh - i never expected it. 0-2 Arena.  
The bot/troll narrative on here is rapidly returning to utterly dishonest claims that economic damage was always expected and that Brexit was really about  'sovereignty'.(Spoiler alert: our Parliament was always sovereign.) 
In other news to make Steve Coogan wonder if all his jokes were in fact prophecies, Farage’s new Brexit party has its HQ in a poorly-reviewed Norfolk B&B  
I spoke last week with some Brexit supporters outside the Palace of Westminster. Among their thoughts on Ireland: “The atrocities helped clear the air” and - of course - Leo Varadkar isn’t “proper Irish”  
Somebody should ask Nigel exactly which flavour of brexit betrayal he supports  
We have seen Gorimapa Chris Brown,  Shomolu Ariana Grande and now someone called Man Utd's No 10 Brexit Lil KeshYou people are wicked on this app   
Sky dissing Churchill as a white supremacist, and Brexit as an 'Empire fantasy'.Stop the world I want to get off. 
It's #Corbyn strategy to lend just enough votes to see Brexit happen without getting his hands dirty.  
I’m going to use this in MANY sentences today. Brexit is (a?) flapdoodle. The plan to wait until we accept the deal makes Theresa May a flapdoodler.  
Here @MigrationWatch claim that total non-EU net migration will *double* after Brexit, while EU migration will *increase".How do they get these incredible numbers, you ask? Answer: through some basic errors in arithmetic, plus added scaremongering. 
These are the type of death threats we receive on a regular basis, because we sell EU mugs and give out flags at events. This is what we're all fighting. Brexit Britain... Support our stunts! @metpoliceuk @TheNewEuropean @LBC @mrjamesob @MikeStuchbery_ @ 
People across Ireland have an appetite for progress and should be given the opportunity to decide their own future through a unity referendum - @MaryLouMcDonald tells @BBCNews 
This #Brexit chaos is the fault of literally everyone other than the brexiters like Lord Digby "not a single job lost" Jones who promised Brexit would be easy....There was no plan, by design & as a matter of policy from Brexit leaders, in order to get the widest support  
49. Wilton, Wiltshire"In a 52-48 referendum this would be unfinished business by a long way." - @Nigel_Farage 
Muff post office, on the Donegal/Derry border, got 400 Irish passport application forms in 3 weeks ago and ran out in two days. They got 100 forms in last Thursday and they were gone by Friday. #Brexit 
Just published Comment and analysis on the Wilson case (@UKEUchallenge) which is due in the Royal Court of Justice on 21/2/19.Is Wilson v the Prime Minister the silver bullet that will kill Brexit?#RevokeArticle50 #PeoplesVote via @brexit_sham 
Tony Blair has apparently been telling the German government that there will be a second referendum. Another anti-Brexit Remainer actively seeking to undermine the UK’s hand in negotiations. Truly disgraceful.  
"thankfully i know at least 3 employers already ensuring brexit voters are laid off first"What a sad, sad, little man you are. 
Theresa May scrapes the mould off jam and Jeremy Corbyn eats own-brand baked beans straight from the tin - it seems we are blessed with leaders peculiarly well-equipped for no-deal Brexit food shortages.  
With Brexit Promises, Rumours and Threats from May,Carney,OllieRobins,Barclay going off the scale again yesterday can I give you one Fact from us the Public!We have now lost any faith we had in you and don’t believe a single word that you say!A Sad Day! 
Brexit lil kesh failed to perform at 0-2 arena..People are mad on this App 
Brexit was May’s Decision.   Not the people’s. Not parliaments. It was a unilateral executive act.  
Preparing for today’s special sessions of ⁦@scotgov⁩ Resilience Committee and Cabinet on Brexit contingency planning. The PM’s refusal to rule out a ‘no deal’ Brexit is reckless and negligent.  
I wonder how many folk insisting “no deal” being removed from table have ever actually successfully conducted a negotiationIt’s an absolute basic fact that in negotiation, you MUST have the ability to walk away (or at least make the other side think you would)#brexit #basic 
"Brexit is not an Irish idea... the British government has played a game of chicken with Irish interests" - Leader of Sinn Féin @MaryLouMcDonald says a physical border must be avoided#r4today | @mishalhusainbbc |  
Truly we have been blessed:Brexit Secretary 1: “Who needs to prepare or go to any meetings?!”Brexit Secretary 2: “What do you mean we’re an island?!”Brexit Secretary 3: “I don’t know the names of any foreigners” 
Meat washed in chlorine, stuffed with hormones and antibiotics - what delights are in store for Brexit Britain  
Absolutely pig sick of seeing Brexit stories about British immigrants in Spain & every damn time them focusing on pensioners. I work here, have a child at school here, have a 27 year old daughter with a business here. We're not all pensioners FFS! 
Car crash: The Brexit clear-out of UK manufacturing has already begun  
This shows just how out of touch NUS leadership and mainstream. media are. Brexit as the rallying cry for young people when universities are on the brink of collapse? Student activism “dead” when the most recent HE strikes saw a wave of well coordinated protests + occupations?  
A long Brexit delay would mean we'd have to send an absolute fortune to the EU - money that should be spent here on our priorities instead.  
Petition: Revoke Art.50 if there is no Brexit plan by the 25 of February  
If brexit was to go ahead it would be the greatest miscarriage of democracy there has ever been. Not only would it betray our country but it would betray 27 nations who put their trust in us.  #brexit is a coup by British traitors and international backers, the #AltReich 
"In Britain, we now know that the EU referendum was won with the help of widespread cheating. We still don’t know the origins of much of the money spent by the leave campaigns."   And now, "Dark money is pushing for a no-deal Brexit."  
provoking police violence by HOLDING A REFERENDUM! by voting! The nerve! 
You said, not one job will be threatened by Brexit.  
Our co-chairs @Anna_Soubry & @ChukaUmunna have tabled this important @eurelationsappg amendment to the PM’s Brexit motion to be debated tomorrow. It would force Ministers to publish the most recent Cabinet briefing on the affects of a ‘no deal’ Brexit on business and trade.  
Why is Brexit Lil Kesh trending? Who is Brexit Lil Kesh? 
Extraordinary interview with Sinn Fein leader Mary Lou McDonald on Today. "Brexit threatens to sunder the entire constitutional and political framework that accommodates the current stability and beds-down the peace process." 
E pain you Sha!!! Brexit Lil Kesh brother, Pele! Ma binu na.  
Brits in Spain who voted on the side of Brexit.....  
Important pointOf course the rest of us won’t get the opportunity to retire to Spain unless we have £30,000 per year income and can afford private healthcare. Neither will we get to live where we like and work in the EU. Brexit has robbed working class people of opportunity.  
If the Tories call a general election soon and if Labour sticks to its pro-Brexit stance we Remainers will have to organise tactical voting aiming at a hung Parliament with the maximum number of pro-EU MPs and the minimum number of Brexiters. #ABTV #Brexit #PeoplesVote 
Brexit latest as Theresa May runs down the clock:NOT IN ANYONE’S INTEREST Article 50 extension IN EVERYONE’S INTERESTNo deal featuring:Food shortagesLack of medicinePorts blocked Businesses collapsingJob lossesRun on the poundPig shit in streetsPossible martial law pic.twitter.com/8iNh5Rn55U 
Funny how, as a result of Brexit, we seem to now have Members of Parliament who would like us to think they are experts in car manufacturing, pharmaceutical's, aerospace & food production, but at the same time seem always to remind us that they are really sh*t at being an MP 
"tuition fees were too inward-looking an issue to inspire a genuine student and youth-driven political movement. Instead, a unifying cause has finally arrived: the battle to stop Brexit." This is utter nonsense. How was the 2010 student movement not "genuine" or "youth driven"? 
British chief Brexit negotiator Olly Robbins' real offence was to tell the truth. May's bluffing when the PM knows exiting 29 March with no deal would be catastrophic  
Labour is betraying its own members, its voters and our country by joining Theresa May in her can-kicking exercise to run down the clock towards a disastrous Brexit. Time for a #PeoplesVote 
Shadow Brexit secretary @Keir_Starmer: The prime minister's actions are "brinkmanship" and if the UK is headed for a no deal near the Brexit date, a "concerted effort" to get an extension would pass Parliament #r4today | @justinonweb |  
A border poll in N Ireland is inevitable, but please let us learn the lessons of Brexit and make sure we have a fully fleshed out, costed and agreed plan of what a New Ireland would look like beforehand. #R4Today 
Clearly a no brainer for #Ford or any other other business with integrated EU supply lines. Even if there’s a withdrawal deal the political uncertainty & instability will last for many years until the future relationship is agreed. Likely to be massive job losses in UK #Brexit  
Ford’s CEO *says* they are preparing to move production abroad because of Brexit, but I won’t make my mind up until I’ve heard what some backbench Brexit bellend with no knowledge of Ford or car manufacturing reckons. 
It’s easy to mock the “ex-pat” pensioners who voted Leave; however, I wish the BBC/media would do features on the younger people who live, work and raise families across the EU & what Brexit is destroying for them. 
Tiddies aside, I don’t like the politics of Naked Anti-Brexit Lady. She’s thinks people on welfare shouldn’t have children because Adam Smith made the West great, or something.  
This is the power behind the throne and the reason why you won’t get a second referendum from Labour. ‘A global alliance of anti American countries outside the EU’  
Finished the book by the Irish writer @fotoole "Heroic Failure' on Brexit. A blistering critique "of decades of camped-up mendacity about the tyranny of the EU, & sold in the referendum as a fantasy of national liberation. It simply could not survive contact with reality' Ouch.  
This proud nation was promised #Brexit instead what we have is the creation of the infrastructure of  betrayal, including not a long stop, but a “bridge”, to permanent ensnarement by an emerging #EU empire. A mendacious PM and partial civil servant have let us all down. 
Given foreign interference in the 2016 referendum and the amount of dirty money spent promoting Brexit, haven’t got the intelligence services catastrophically failed the British people?  #R4Today 
Brexit Secretary @SteveBarclay also tacitly acknowledged that discussions about extending Article 50 *have* taken place in Brussels -albeit in the context that neither side wants it @BBCr4today 
Diminished tax revenues due to Brexit means big defence cuts. #YouveBeenWarned 
Shadow Brexit story @Keir_Starmer confirms Labour will back latest @YvetteCooperMP bill: “The sense that this just can’t be allowed to go on is growing and it’s across the parties because it’s obvious what the PM is doing.” #BBCToday 
Keir Starmer now in position of barrister reading out a brief that his client is laughing at. Cannot deny leaders office removed 2nd referendum text in letter to May, & accepts whips did not punish front bench MPs for defying whip to delay Article 50. Look forward to his memoirs. 
Singaporean economist Linda Lim takes on the pro-#Brexit fantasy of making UK like Singapore. tl;dr “Nope.”  cc. @OwenJones84 @chakrabortty @sturdyAlex 
Is it any wonder the EU offered us such a bad deal, when Tony Blair has been telling EU leaders all along that Brexit would be stopped?  
I listened carefully to Brexit Secretary @SteveBarclay on @BBCr4today responding to @anguswalkertalk story about Olly Robbins. It fell well short of a full throated denial. 
Think @ProfBrianCox is great at explaining science but he is becoming so boring and actually making himself look silly now with all this Brexit stuff, I thought scientists worked with facts not speculation and that’s all we have as to what will happen after Brexit is speculation. 
I've tried to put in to words my feelings re Brexit and how it makes me feel as a foreigner. It has resulted in this 10-part brain dump of a story.I'm aware there are many non-Brexit stories/issues out there but this is about me.#comics #brexit #the3million #european #danish 
I like Keir Starmer - he’s the only sensible person in the Shadow Cabinet - but it would appear that he no longer has any authority in Labour’s Brexit policy. With Corbyn, Milne etc. undermining him, he seems unable to answer questions clearly and authoritatively.#r4today 
Let's remind #brexit politicians of this: The Remain majority is growing. Anger at an economically damaging Brexit & demographic change will cause that majority to grow relentlessly. In a few years there could be massive public pressure to jail the Brexit orchestrators.#FBPE 
While you're at it, could you also explain why you and other brexiters did not mention these very important but completely unfeasible requirements for brexit to be successful during the referendum campaign? 
“I spoke to him (Dyche) about getting points at Manchester. He said - ‘don’t play any of your fancy soft muck, just play Brexit football and get into ‘em’. I respect Mr. Dyche, I call him ‘Dieu gingembre’ (Ginger God)”Class this from Thomas Tuchel. #twitterclarets 
Brexiteer Mark Francois warns Brexit delay is MASSIVE breach of trust – 'GET US OUT!'  
The penny has dropped that Dominic Grieve & his Tory #Remoaner MP colleagues were elected on a manifesto to deliver #Brexit but are doing everything they can to stop #Brexit.All of them should be voted out at the next election.Their treachery should be punished.  
Brits in Spain who were on the side of Brexit are perfect illustrations of lingering colonialist entitlement. The assumption that Brexit would affect migrants in the UK but not you as you are 'ex pats' is cringeworthy 
[anchor dressed in bodybag for piece to camera] and now, in yet another exciting twist in the Brexit tale, we’ve started to stockpile bodybags !!!!!!! awesome !!!!! Back to you bodies in the studio !!!!!!  
Keir Starmer confirms Labour rebels who backed /abstained on PM's Brexit vote have not been disciplined. #r4today 
Oh Nicky.....@NickBoles this is why your so toast in your constituency- clearly supporting a STOP brexit #CooperBill @LeaveEUOfficial 
Con and Lab leaderships and most of their MPs campaigned for Remain at the Referendum. Both these parties then offered a fake pro-Leave manifesto at the last GE.Leave voters should stop voting for Remain parties if they wish to avoid further disappointment. 
Keir Starmer says the “only credible options” for Labour on Brexit are now a close relationship with the EU or a second referendum. So pushing for an early election now officially off the table. 
“But the referendum organizers are not accused of using or advocating violence.Rather, they are being tried on the basis that they should have foreseen the risk of intervention and the use of force by the police.”—International Commission of Jurists (@ICJ_ORG) 
Keir Starmer doesn’t deny that he wanted Jeremy Corbyn’s letter to PM to include the option of a second referendum but leader’s office took that line out 
Keir Starmer refuses to deny that Jeremy Corbyn’s office took out a reference to a second referendum in his letter to Theresa May on Brexit. “I’m not going to go into the ins and outs of the drafting of the letter”. 
No clear answer from @theresa_may to my question about access to essential #medical supplies post #Brexit. Vitally important for those on medication for serious health conditions yet PMs answer worryingly nebulous. I will continue to pursue.Watch here:  
Unelected civil servant Olly Robbins has been caught boasting in a bar about plans to delay Brexit if May can't get her deal through. 17.4m people voted Leave and nobody voted for this incompetent loudmouth. Sack him now!Support us at  
I'm sure there will be future PhDs titled something like "The Theatrics of Propaganda: The BBC's Role During Brexit", and I hope they look at shows like Newsnight (remember the actress posing as vicar?) and Question Time to study their role in shoving porkies down our throats. 
So alleged remarks from our Brexit Chief Negotiator - a choice of deal with tweaks or substantial delay - doesn’t reflect Government policy according to Brexit Secretary on @BBCr4today. So why was Robbins saying this? 
Obvious to me from listening to Brexit Secretary @SteveBarclay that - even now - he doesn’t understand difference between the European Parliament and the European Commission, how we work, how we are elected, how we interact, how we are accountable#BrexitShitshow #JustMakeItStop 
You're right the bias towards Brexit has been astounding with Brexiteer lies about WTO legal situations etc. never being challenged. 
Meanwhile Brexit is having major real-world consequences already... 
What we knew anyway is now confirmed after the ITV News articleThere's a conscious government policy to betray the referendum result using the backstop as a fraud to do soThis is turning into our greatest political scandal. It's our Watergate or Iran-ContraThe truth is out 
I don't know how exactly they will do it, but on March 29 we will either not leave, or get a totally fake Brexit.My offer stands, £500 to the charity of the PM's choice if we get genuine Brexit.  
One of the lessons of Brexit is how many people don't know the difference 
You can't vote to win the lottery. You can't vote for your favourite team to win the football. Cause and effect don't work like that. But it's just as absurd to suggest that you can vote for Brexit to be a success. The facts meant it was doomed no matter what. 
"It was as if this big bubble of illusion had been burst that we were living in such a wonderful, open society. But actually, we weren't."With the most common non-British nationality in the UK, what do Poles think about Brexit?  
Jeremy Corbyn is right to block a second referendum. But his Soft Brexit stance would still betray Brexit voters by keeping us in the EU in all but name. He should stand up for Labour’s great tradition of Euroscepticism, writes @BrendanChilton 
"We have to Brexit or the EDL will be sad" is the dumbest take of all. Thing is - many of those on the hard right like Mogg. 
Here's what the head of Farage's new Brexit Party thinks of the NHS (ht @carolinejmolloy) 
Remember that game where you ask 20 questions and have to guess who your opponent is pretending to be?Well, you'll need a lot more than 20 questions to find out what the hell Brexit is.Meanwhile, all the good jobs are leaving.  
Brexit latest news: Chief negotiator under fire after 'warning' of long delay to Brexit. He needs to be sacked! 
Dark money is pushing for a no-deal Brexit. Who is behind it? | George Monbiot @UKEUchallenge @Bremaininspain 
Those who pushed for Brexit and said it would be easy don’t have the first clue about how the EU works and how it always behaves.  
The PM appears to be proposing blackmailing Parliament to support her bad deal at the last minute because no deal would be even worse, as we see from the failures over trade deals. And so the sorry tale of Brexit negotiations rumbles on... 7/ end 
It's the week where it's all coming out. Hodge claims she reported 200 Labour social media accounts for AS - turns out it was 111 people, only 10 of whom were Labour.  Now uber-wealthy Gina admits her actions were more about stopping Corbyn than stopping Brexit. Astounding stuff.  
Steve Barclay shows solidarity with businesses by demonstrating that they are not alone in having no idea what is happening with Brexit.#r4today 
You say Brexit Lil Kesh.... How shallow you are when your club can't produce a striker as good enough as Brexit Lil kesh left leg. Chopping 6-0 n you still can't help yourself to desist from a show of shame. Oponu jati jati 
Thought @SteveBarclay did a good job of maintaining the standards set by previous #Brexit Secretaries on @BBCr4today this morning... 
Could debating naked really solve Britain's Brexit woes?No. But it would confirm the diagnosis you’ve all fucking lost it.  
Ford are preparing to move production out of the UK after Brexit. They told May yesterday they are preparing alternative sites.13,000 jobs plus supply chain plus community jobs that depend on them.Well done Brexiters.  
Wanna help me stop Brexit? 
In Britain, we now know that the EU referendum was won with the help of widespread cheating. We still don’t know the origins of much of the money spent by the leave campaigns, we don't know the origins of the money spent on new pro-Brexit campaigns. 
Counting down the Brexit clock  
Yvette Cooper is putting forward another amendment to hijack the Brexit process - is her agenda to scupper Brexit altogether?  
48. Wrexham“If Brexit is a disaster, I will go and live abroad. I’ll go and live somewhere else.” - @Nigel_Farage 
#Brexit is a disaster because people voted for a concept, not a plan.  There  wasn’t a plan.  And as Steve Barclay has just made clear there still isn’t.  Do we really have to carry out this collective act of self-harm?  #R4Today 
Businesses up and down the country, employing millions of people, have no idea what is happening with Brexit, and the Brexit Secretary, @SteveBarclay, sits in the studio talking complete gibberish, with less than 50 days to go before we leave the EU. It’s an absolute disgrace. 
Dark money is pushing for a no-deal Brexit. Who is behind it? | George Monbiot  
 I said this two years ago - brexit would mean the end of car and engine production in this country . It’s when you can relate your job to the urgent transportation of parts that keeps production lines open - it’s not nice being proved right 
This morning's episode of 'Negotiations are difficult' starts with another leak on the limited progress made on rolling over existing trade deals in the case of no-deal Brexit 1/  
Tony Blair seems to be the main "How to Stop Brexit" adviser to the EU now. Warmonger Blair also denied us a chance to vote down the Lisbon Treaty to help his EU buddies.He is a top EU stooge, a dangerously flawed character. He loves the EU. 
Away from Brexit, the long-running row between the party leadership and the PLP has exploded once more, resulting in an angry confrontation at Labour shadow cabinet. This via @KateEMcCann > 
The important legal case everyone should be aware of - The 2016 referendum result was procured by corrupt and illegal practices. Only when MPs finally accept this will parliament be able to move forward and find a resolution to this constitutional crisis. 
Anyone who runs a business will be tearing their hair out at the utter uselessness of Steve Barclay in the face of the unmitigated disaster of Brexit.How the hell have we reached this point? We're a laughing stock. #r4today 
Barclay unable to answer ANY questions on the details of Brexit for businesses. ‘We have to agree a deal’ on a loop but nothing else. NOTHING. FFS. This isn’t governance, this is BS.  Irresponsible, dishonest and endless. #r4today 
.@Theresa_May stands at the despatch box & says: “if you want to stop a ‘no deal’ Brexit, then you need to vote for my deal’. .@JeremyCorbyn should table another VONC & say: “if you want to stop a ‘no deal Brexit, & May’s bad deal, then you to need to bring the Gvnt. down”. 
Ford ramp up plans to leave UK due to brexit.Others told the PM:"The general message was that this isn’t about contingencies any more — we are taking steps already because of the uncertainty. It’s real"People did not vote for this.Be #remainernow 
If a post-Brexit U.K. wants to be Singapore, it's going to have to let in millions of immigrants and start running massive budget surpluses, says economist Linda Lim  via @bopinion 
Farage has thrown his lot in with a party that has no policies, a website apparently built by a 3 year old - and a leader who thinks poor people should eat a diet of potatoes. Welcome to Brexit Britain.  
Business claims that Brexit uncertainty  is stifling investment.  MPs agree.  So why are they trying to delay Brexit and create more uncertainty. Clearly a ploy to stop Brexit. Disgusting behaviour.  We should leave with no deal.  The public have no fears with no deal. 
Terry Christian calling for discrimination in the workplace.Terry claims to know of three businesses that are targeting Brexit voters for dismissal.I'd like to know who they are. I certainly would never use them again. And I voted Remain. Despicable attitude frankly.  
UK pensioners resident in Spain are rightly worried about their healthcare (and the current process actually saves the UK money, another Brexit dividend) .  
But Robbins has blown a big fat hole in that. He has essentially ‘advised’ the EU to do nothing, and we will remain, either by May’s fake brexit deal, or by extending A50.  The Tory party will now be finished in either scenario. WTO is best for the country and the Conservatives 
The surprising truth about Brexit Britain - we're a country full of moderates| Adrian Chiles  
“Leaving the EU has always been about change and being able to find new opportunities for our country. By exposing the shortcomings of our current political class, and emphasising the need for change, Brexit is in a way already working” @DouglasCarswell 
Britain could lead the world into a new era of democracy and free trade, using the Brexit revolt against the establishment as a springboard to making the global order more cooperative, accountable and prosperous.  
Almost unbelievably, the government has introduced no new laws in the wake of the #CambridgeAnalytica/Brexit scandal. So guess what? It's still going on. My column:  
Yesterday they Turned some people's Theatre of Dreams to beer parlour.Verratti came from hospital to bully one dabbing Fraud and went back to the hospital after.Brexit Lil kesh thought Mbappe was mate because he was scoring Brighton  
Seems to be a lot of threats being thrown around by the fascists if they don't get their way and we cancel brexit. We must always remember that this is really just a very small bunch of mummy's boys with issues, this includes Rees Muck. Stop brexit and it stops them. #FBPE 
Fact Check:@Telegraph headline states: “Mark Carney drops Project Fear.”Article then disappears behind paywall.This is a misleading headline.Mark Carney said: “we should not be under any illusions — no-deal Brexit would be a shock for this economy.” 
Happy with how #Brexit is going? No? Then don’t let them get away with it. Join the Valentine’s Day march in #Leeds tomorrow. Meet in City Square at 5.30pm Thursday with ⁦@natalieben⁩ ⁦@emmyzen⁩ ⁦@mdbuckley⁩ & many more. Please RT.  
Scotland's referendum and UK´s Brexit referendm are a terrible mistake... no lessons from UK 
.@MaryLouMcDonald tells @GMB the people of Ireland should be given their say on their in future through a unity referendum  
Does anyone believe the "overheard conversation in a bar" story? The chief Brexit negotiator casually revealing May's *real* strategy whilst standing right next to a journalist who's taking notes?Have I become totally cynical? I just don't swallow it. 
So now we know for sure that May’s EU policy is a lie. She arranged the backstop as a “bridge” to permanent customs union. Brexit betrayed. 
All trust has collapsed as we approach a Brexit finale that can only end in betrayalThere is no faith that the political system is actually democratic or can even deliver the democratic result. Parliament is useless.  
Having 'battled' with climate deniers in online discussions for years, I'm used to dealing with folks that have a tenuous grip on reality and suffer heavily from 'Dunning Kruger'.Brexit is the same...same people, in fact. 
‘I don’t think Milton had Theresa May in mind when he famously observed: “They also serve who only stand and wait.” Stubborn immobility is her only skill. But can she spin it out for six weeks & get her appalling Brexit through by default?’ My @TheNewEuropean column out tomorrow 
This is it, Mr Verhofstadt. May's Tories & Corbyn's Labour simply do not represent the UK. There is deep systemic failure in UK politics. NB: systemic failure.For one thing, they don't represent Scotland - a whole nation of 7m people. And there is NO majority for Brexit. None. 
Brexit Lil Kesh. Wow.   this is far worse than Gabonese Jamie Vardy  
So long as it is clearly understood that rescinding Article 50 or a second EU referendum or an Article 50 extension has no effect whatever on Scotland's need and right to #UseTheMandate and #DissolveTheUnion. 
Good morning to all football fans out there except Manchester United fans. They can go get their greetings from their Brexit Lil Kesh who failed to perform at the O - 2 Arena. 
Dark money is pushing for a no-deal Brexit. Who is behind it? | George Monbiot  
‘Companies are being hung out to dry by the government over Brexit’ (BBC News)Government response: ‘Ministers held 250 meetings with business in January.’250 recitals of  Boris Johnson’s injunction: ‘F**k business!’ 
BREAKING:Senior British MPs have published a report urging free movement and trade between #Canada, #Australia, #NewZealand & the #UK after #Brexit.#CANZUK #cdnpoli #auspol #nzpol #UKpolitics@IoWBobSeely @HJS_Org @BorisJohnson @IanAustinMP @james_rogers 
Tragic. If @UKLabour facilitate Brexit it’s the end of the party, they’ll lose any hope of winning a GE, millions of progressive voters will look for a new home.  
Where the farmers at? I heard someone call Rashford “Brexit lil Kesh”  that was just plain wrong  
#Brexit would lead to a talent shortage in many areas, in fact. And not just in high-powered careers, but also in absolutely vital jobs like agriculture and the care industry. 
I was at the JLR factory last Thursday. Each component spends less than 4 hours on site b4 being built into a car. 40% come from Europe. If a delay stops the line the supplier pays a penalty of £10,000 per minute. If that delay is due to Brexit they will come after the UK Gvmt  
Eastern European companies fear 'chaos' of no-deal Brexit  
this was a great panel about the @ObamaCBA! grateful that I got to moderate. if you live in the 20th or 5th wards, there may be a CBA referendum on your ballot (depending on your precinct)! it's a great way to get the aldergoons to listen.  
Archaeologists must avoid prehistoric Brexit parallels – they encourage twisted readings of the past  
Back in the day before he denied it Leave EU’s Andy Wigmore admitted using Russian bots for Brexit targeting. But HOW were they targeted? What happened to the UKIP data? Did any, like Manafort’s hand over, make it to Russia on the trip Wigmore boasted about in Feb 2016?  
The fact that Brexit is a source of chaos is no reason to postpone an evidence based consultation that food marketing negatively affects child health @EmmaBoyland @MimiTGolden. The UK has an obligation to uphold the rights of the child. @LivUni_LawNCD @Katharina_EJ 
A thread in which the @FT economics editor completely destroys the fake figures put forward by the BBC’s senior interviewer. How much longer can this go on without pro Brexit propaganda destroying the BBC’s credibility, Tony Hall?  
No surprise Brussels bureaucrats still refuse to offer any scraps of EU Brexit flexibility.  Now that UK may just leave w/no deal,German economic experts&industry panic as UK exit may impose unexpected damage to German economy at a really bad moment 
Corbyn could & should, have stopped Brexit a long way back, but his cynical attempt 2 secure an exit that he could blame on the Tory's has backfired. He has betrayed his members, he has betrayed the 30m that didn't vote Leave, he has betrayed the country & lost his chance at No10  
Isn't Spain attacking Venezuela for being a dictatorship? It's a wee bit ironic that Guaido is not in prison, but Catalan leaders are in prison despite a referendum don't you think? #Spain #CatalanTrial #Venezuela #cdnpoli 
Tory ex-minister Nick Boles faces deselection over Brexit stance - it’s called democracy..  
BREXITEER MEP Steven Woolfe praised the Italian Government’s resistance of EU powers such as French President Emmanuel Macron and German Chancellor Angela Merkel and instead its ability represent the ordinary “yellow vest” and Brexit-voting EU citizens..  
BREXITEER MP Mark Francois warned delaying Brexit would be a  “massive breach of trust” after British civil servant Olly Robbins was reportedly overheard saying the EU “will probably give us” an extension.  
At 44 days til Brexit, I hope more people will realise that they will be losing their EU citizenship (not me, as I’m a French national). Brexit is designed to make it look like it’s coming down hard on immigration but in truth, it’s 1st & foremost stripping rights away from Brits 
What does Jeremy Corbyn really think about Brexit?  
Petition: Revoke Art.50 if there is no Brexit plan by the 25 of February Pls sign & RT... 
TR @RosaMariaPaya The Cuban regime is already illegitimate The referendum of February 24 does not meet minimum guarantees, therefore it is a fraud #Cuba has no legitimate Constitution "Rosa M Payá asks the world to ignore the Cuban regime after the referendum"  
@Nigel_Farage Have you got your  boxing gloves on? Because,  courtesy of Oily Robbins and that @YvetteCooperMP woman, you've got one hell of a fight coming up! Make it a one rounder please, we're all pretty pissed off with pests trying to ruin our No Deal brexit!!!!!  
Ollie Robins: usual greasepole. Public schoolboy, degree PPE, treasury in '96 aged 21. Ten yrs later poached by Blair as PPS. Then he moved on to cabinet office under Gordon Brown. Then became Cameron's National Security Adviser, then HO under Theresa, then top Brexit Negotiator. 
So you've turned your back on a people's vote and the fact the majority of your party members and Scotland voted against Brexit?Hasn't even happened yet and look how quick you're to dismiss it. 
You see what works?The cuckservstives who attacked the Patriots at The Burkean at the weekend lost our 8th Amendment. Imagine if they had the energy and imagination to occupy google when they meddled in our referendum? We all know the pro life base had the energy to do it.  
WATCH: UK #Brexit minister: Both sides want an EU exit deal  
Amen. Are you an employer? Will Brexit hurt your profits? Find out who voted Leave and sack the cunts  
Wow only a £1000 ? Your party gave 1.5 BILLION to DUP for votes, put UK in 2 TRILLION of debt, offered 14 million to a ship-less company along with 800,000 assessment, 1000's of people to lose jobs due to Brexit etc etc etc #indyref2 
Brexit healthcare worries for Brits in Spain  
Chris Grayling's latest failing: presiding over "spectacularly bad lottery" via which the UK haulage industry has been granted less than 10% of the permits it needs to keep operating in the EU after Brexit Day. If EU mitigation fails, delivery armageddon!  
This is a bigger crisis than Brexit  
people living in squalor all over the country. May is putting as many people in harms way as she can. Food banks, millions living in poverty and the homeless dying on the streets. Meanwhile they're running round like headless chickens playing Brexit truth or dare. She has to go  
yeah you can't say anything about workers' rights as long as you support Brexit. you've lost that argument jez. 
Just quit you incompetant creature, admit it you couldn't organise a p*ss up in a brewery! There would be no beer, no brewery and would still cost us a fortune, you dick!Grayling urged to quit as spending on Brexit ferry deal consultants revealed  
Naked Brexit Professor Got Publicly Naked Long Before Brexit -  
Civil servant Olly Robbins, who is Britain's top Brexit negotiator, has been overheard telling colleagues that MPs will have to choose between Theresa May's departure deal and a delay to the process. Which one of the two would you prefer? 
a *deliberate* intent to deceive on the part of the Ministry or Government department in question. Since when has the UK being deliberately led like a lamb to the Brexit slaughter by those at the very highest levels been of so little consequence that it's not even discussed? 
A strange thing happens every time secret documents leak that show Brexit is going much worse than the Government's publicly stated position... The media fall over themselves to report the lurid tales of doom and gloom - while completely missing the fact that the leak *proves* 
I will not sign anything that resembles the budget gimmicks and band-aids that have failed us in the past. I will veto bills designed to cut out the public’s right of referendum, says @gretchenwhitmer #SOTS19 
UK's chief Brexit negotiator says: It's May's deal or extension - ITV  
Watch John Oliver talk about Trump and Brexit chaos on #LSSC  
Labour MP has new plan for parliament vote on no-deal Brexit  
Furious lorry driver SHUTS DOWN Labour supporter's plea for second Brexit referendum  
Petition: Revoke Art.50 if there is no Brexit plan by the 25 of February  
BREAKING: There's a big row brewing over Thursday’s Government motion endorsing opposition to a no-deal Brexit. It raises the prospect of another embarrassing Government defeat as ERG MPs say they cannot back it...  
"We’re now five-six weeks from the cliff edge, this is really, really scary." Food producers warn that Brexit could be catastrophic.  
100,000 jobs could be lost in Germany if a no deal Brexit!That's UK bargaining power, instead of going with a begging bowl to Brussels every 5 minutes. 
Good morning Mr HumphrysHave you signed up to Nigel Farage's new #Brexit Party yet?You'll find yourself in the admirable company of Adolf Hitler, Mussolini, the Genghis Khan & oh so many characters from history & fiction.Sign up here: #r4today 
Video: May triggers uproar and mockery with ridiculous Brexit claim  
Brexit could be the ‘springboard’ for a new global era of free trade, says Carney. Some sense from the man at very long last. 
The Westminster bubble still won’t accept Brits democratically voted Brexit. In previous referendums the public voted how the establishment wanted. Brexit is the 1st true test as to whether the UK is a democracy & the establishment are failing. Excuse after excuse, lie after lie  
German politician: Brexit is like puberty! You're acting like an immature child with a false sense of greatness! Not getting your way, you want to move out because the others are annoying "bloody foreigners". Still reliant on their full refrigerator, incapable of filling your own 
brexit... dang... now that's politics folks... can't argue with that 
Jeremy Corbyn leaves Labour MPs in stitches with joke about Chris Grayling’s Brexit planningLabour leader joked about the capabilities of the Tory Transport Secretary sparking laughs and cries of 'failing Grayling' from Labour benches  
Some Irish border dwellers say they have 'given up' trying to prepare for #Brexit  
'@theresa_may was a useless #HomeSecretary & an even worse PM. As Home Sec May failed to control immigration & failed to stand up to returning #jihadis & terrorism. Now as PM #TheresaMay has tried to destroy #Brexit &  make an appalling #Brexitdeal trapping us under EU supremacy! 
The Westminster bubble still won’t accept Brits democratically voted Brexit. In previous referendums the public voted how the establishment wanted. Brexit is the 1st true test as to whether the UK is a democracy & the establishment are failing. Excuse after excuse, lie after lie!  
You'd know all about fifth columns Nigel, @guyverhofstadt had the measure of you and your fifth columnist friends a long time ago! 
This is one of the best assessments I've seen of the current political situation in the UK. "This is the ideal ecosystem for demagogues." And many MPs have lost any sense of public duty. The crisis goes well beyond Brexit.  
The sad truth is, thickiteers, that if we knowingly allow any kind of Brexit, however soft, to go ahead on the basis of the fraudulently-conducted referendum, we simply can't maintain the pretence to the rest of the world that we're a nation deserving of any respect whatsoever. 
Petition: Revoke Article 50 if there is no Brexit plan by 25 February.We’ve had three years of this shambles. It’s time to #RevokeA50 and #StopBrexit.Please sign, share, RT and tag a friend. 
I have signed > Petition: Revoke Art.50 if there is no Brexit plan by the 25 of February  
It’s been Corbyn’s leadership which allowed MPs to take control of Brexit, he’s preventing a bad Tory Brexit deal and is trying to take no deal off the table.Theresa May should accept Corbyn’s plan, which EU leaders find promising, to break the impasse. 
Fascinating and kind of scary from @nicholaswatt on #newsnight, who says Berlin, and therefore Brussels, have based their Brexit negotiating strategy on the assumption we'll have a 2nd referendum, because that's what Tony Blair told them 
The old tendency of Farage et al to say “you can’t tak about immigration nowadays” while, er, doing exactly that is now rivalled by Remainers claiming “you can’t question Brexit” while doing so endlessly. FBPE becomes the pro-EU UKIP. 
Someone remind me. Is this the same Labour Party that accuses Remainers of not caring about austerity, whenever we say that stopping brexit has to come first, because any Brexit will make life harder for our most vulnerable people. Surely not. 
We strongly condemn the violent, cowardly acts of the Cuban regime against @JDanielFerrer and UNPACU activists.  #Cuba’s gov't quashes peaceful calls for democratic change, showing (again) that the Feb 24 constitutional referendum is not about reform but about remaining in power. 
The FT or the Brexit Gazette? Which is right?  
The closer we get to the Tory's disastrous Brexit the more Scots want out of this dysfunctional union. What'll you do then when as an English party you can't stand for election in Scotland. You'll all be unemployed..We'll have no more Tory politicians. Huzzah!  
The corruption in the 2016 referendum— which you ADMIT — is before the Court of Appeal in Wilson on21 Feb.  
This is quite mad. @FT says Carney issued strongest warning yet about risks of leaving EU without deal and @Telegraph says Bank Governor swaps fear for Brexit hope. Carney is in reality the least ambiguous and opaque governor ever, so one of these stories is just wrong  
Dominic Grieve is right. No Brexit will live up to what was promised. The best way out of this mess is to #StopBrexit. 
Donald Tusk’s comments were forgotten after 4 days. Brexit’s damage will be with us in 50 years. 
The editors of all the papers that resolutely support May and/or Brexit, reading these takes, screaming with laughter, unable to believe their luck.  
After all this chaos, time-wasting and lying, and with the certainty that Brexit will harm the economy, and the probability that it will harm us very badly in many other ways too, how are there still 44% in favour of Brexit?  How?  How is it even close? 
At about the same time today, two women said something about #Brexit.One in Westminster, one in #Cornwall.One of them has been retweeted more than a thousand times, one less than 300."Holding your nerve" to do something deeply damaging makes no sense at all.#PeoplesVote 
Watch @SkyNews ... that @adamboultonSKY was ridiculous this morning.You can see the Brexit anger when he talks to a leaver 
Most depressing thing on @BBCNewsnight tonight was hearing it said that Germany has (until now) been persuaded by Tony Blair that a 2nd referendum would reverse Brexit and that this has influenced their approach. There is no limit to the damage that man has done to his country. 
Daniel Lacalle is spot on here about the Eurozone Debt crisis right now. Its still a crisis. This is why the REAL truth about Brexit is that the UK can never go "Crashing" out the EU. The less the UK are tied to these Economies the better. The Truth? Clean Brexit can crash Europe  
The Army Chief of Staff has identified Russia as the primary security threat to the UK. But our government persists in trying to hand Putin the massive prize of #Brexit. Meanwhile it distracts us with Empire 2.0. We might as well be ruled by traitors.  
In Wales Labour's vote would fall from 49% to 27% with the Tories rising to 35% if Brexit goes ahead without Labour opposition  
Do you think @theresa_may places the interests of the @Conservatives above the interests of the country?#Brexit 
I am so sick of listening to Tory & Labour bickering over #Brexit.Only 3 things matter:The future of peopleThe future of businessThe future of the countryAll of these are protected only by remaining in the EUGive us a #PeoplesVote & let us save ourselves.#newsnight 
For the record: I'm relaying a conversation from the family dinner table. OF COURSE it's an over-generalisation. But the lack of trust in politics to give a damn about ordinary people is a common thread across most motivations behind Brexit, so I was just highlighting one strand. 
Raheem Rants Ep 23: The Treason of #Brexit Negotiator #OllyRobbins, #Corbyn and the #BBC: 
Deal or no deal, both Labour and the Tories will split over Brexit | Rafael Behr  
If I hear one more time some so-called expert say "every EU negotiation always goes down to the wire" I'll scream. The integrity of the Single Market and the Customs Union are not up for grabs no matter how close to 29 March it gets #Brexit #Newsnight 
If #Brexit happens on time then it is very likely that the Tories will call a general election and gain a crushing victory in terms of seats won as their core support stays loyal while Remainers quit Labour, but not in big enough numbers to radically boost the LibDems.#FBPE 
No one should be fooled by Theresa May's warm words on workers' rights. I hope Labour MPs see right through her disingenuous, meaningless 'commitment'. Employment rights are not safe under the Conservatives. There is no such thing as a Brexit that protects jobs and workers. /end 
Brexit is 1080 hours away. #brexit 
Is this an Ealing comedy? Nick Watt says the EU believed Blair when he told them there would definitely be a second referendum but now they say he has no credibility and think there will be no deal unless they cave in...is the BBC just making it all up now? #newsnight 
Disgraceful and duplicitous!  Back Theresa May's deal or prepare for a long delay to Brexit, PM's chief negotiator 'warns MPs'' | via @telegraph 
Why, then, did he stand on a manifesto which pledged to leave the Customs Union and the Single Market? Why did he vote to trigger Article 50? The form of Brexit that will benefit our country is the one which permits voters to sack those who make the laws by which we are governed.  
The BBC have lost a lot of respect and friends since the brexit vote, you expect impartial broadcasting but you're not getting it anymore, I think there needs to be an investigation and more power given to Ofcom as the BBC Trust won't do anything about complaints. 
This is the culinary equivalent of Brexit.  
Has someone had a word? : Mark Carney drops Project Fear as he talks up free trade potential of Brexit 
Excuse they dey am? Is it Uefa that stopped Brexit Lil kesh from scoring. 
So how many of those easy-as-pie-to-roll-over-before-Brexit EU trade deals will in fact be rolled over in time? This in ⁦@TheSun⁩ would be funny if in an episode of the Thick of It”. But it’s the way we live now. 
Brexit is, at it's core, chiefly about not wanting to integrate with foreigners. It is a bigot's project. Plain & simple. Brectums: I'm getting tired of all the increasingly bogus macroeconmic pseudo arguments. It's all bollocks. You don't want foreigners here. Simple. Own it. 
Now as the brexit saga continues we learn that May has now said "accept my terms or a very long delay to brexit. Who the hell does this woman think she is. I don't remember this wording in the referendum. This is treason. She should be prosecuted. This has gone far to far. 
1/ EU countries are ready to help May drag out the Brexit talks until March 21, when they will try to stitch together a last minute compromise on the backstop at a summit here in Brussels. Here's some of the latest thinking on how that might all pan out  
What Olly Robbins has just revealed about May’s Brexit plan. By Robert Peston:  
Spot on @theresa_may the best deal is the current deal we have the EU. Let’s put #Brexit to @peoplesvote_uk with Remain on the ballot paper 
Former Attorney General Dominic Grieve: ‘Entire Brexit process is flawed, that's why we can't reach an agreement’  
Seriously, you might as well not read a word in the British press about Brexit. Because it’s desperate, reality detached bollocks which appears to believe 1001 impossible things simultaneously before changing its mind about what’s true a nanosecond later. 
Brexit doubts leave firms 'hung out to dry'  
Them say Rashford be Brexit Lil Kesh. I want to fight for United fans 
There are TWO huge things going on politicallyOne is Brexit, of courseThe other is that Corbyn is the bookies' favourite to be next PM. The establishment are moving heaven & earth - and using dirty, dirty tricks - to stop the people choosing a genuine Socialist as PM. 
SACK OLLY ROBBINS: The British Government must remove this individual now as a liability to UK negotiations as his continued presence undermines Theresa May's Brexit negotiating stance prior to our legal March 29th EU Exit. Robbins is an avowed Remaniac, a traitor and an ugly c  
Oh cool, most of tomorrow’s Brexit headlines are based on the partially overheard conversation of a third party in a hotel bar being reported as the Prime Minister’s personal Brexit plan, despite the fact she wasn’t there and it’s contradicted by reality.Well done everyone. 
Can anyone explain how it serves the national interest for Theresa May to continue peddling her failed #Brexit deal when it has already been resoundingly rejected by the Commons and the EU has expressed a clear preference for Labour’s deal? 
Remember, large parts of Remain voting Scotland is represented by these Brexit Tories who are actively seeking to take Scotland out of an EU we value against our national will. They care nothing of your concerns about leaving the EU. Make sure there is an electoral consequence. 
With less than 45 days to go until March 29th, the @britishchambers publishes 20 questions that remain unanswered about conditions for business in the unwelcome event of a no deal #Brexit  
Mbappe is a world cup winner and you're still comparing him to Rashford the Brexit Skepta who is still singing It's Coming Home loooooool 
Lively meeting in #Kirkcaldy tonight discussing #Brexit and Scottish independence. Lots of really good questions too. Good to meet the youngest @theSNP supporter who attended her second branch meeting at the age of two months! #indyref2 
Former Attorney General Dominic Grieve: ‘Entire Brexit process is flawed, that's why we can't reach an agreement’  via @krishgm 
Latest polling/focus-group report from @LordAshcroft Polls rveals sheer size of Brexit chasm between Westminster politico-media bubble & the rest of the country.And the anger felt by the latter towards the former. 
The Prime Minister made much today of her plans to make 'legal commitments' to protect workers' rights after Brexit. Let me tell you what the Conservatives wanted to do when I was Minister for Employment Relations in the coalition government. (1/n)  
It's Rich British Tax Evaders who will benefit from a No Deal Brexit, & we will all pay for their pleasure.The British Ruling Elite, F**king the poor for a 1000 years.@Jacob_Rees_Mogg happy & rubbing hands together 
Why does the @BBCNews always put the most negative slant when reporting on Brexit. It is almost as if certain of their journalists really want us to Remain -surely not !!!!!!!! 
As much as he tries to deny it Jeremy Corbyn is in fact a Brexiteer he always was. He also knows that if Brexit is betrayed then his party will never win the next General Election.  
Hello @StefaanDeRynck.I am an anxious EU citizen in those lights of a no-deal #Brexit.Please, could you and your team push to ring-fence #citizensrights of #The5Million even in the case of leaving without a deal.It was done last week for EEA EFTA citizens, pls, we count too  
MP Mark Francois notes "the undue influence which Olly Robbins appears to wield in Downing Street"Robbins is avidly pro-EU and has been doing his utmost to subvert Brexit"When all this is over, he should be sent to the Tower" 
Great Brexit scoop from our colleagues at @itvnews tonight- but don’t miss tonight astonishing exclusive interview with my colleague @OrlaGuerin talking to Maduro, confronting him with reality of her important eyewitness reporting of last few days - do watch 
I dunno. I started tweeting at a time when people were routinely going on television to say WTO rules meant No-Deal Brexit couldn't POSSIBLY impact UK trade with the EU because... something about the TFA/TBT Agreeement.Feels like well shifted that needle a bit, if nothing else. 
The Prime Minister should understand that keeping this Civil Servant as lead negotiator is part of her problem. He got it wrong on the backstop advice and is clearly not trusted by the vast majority of Leavers to genuinely want to deliver Brexit  
Which Political Party would handle #Brexit best? #FBPE #StandUp4Brexit 
The Brexit Tories. Never mind if it's a deal that makes us poorer, if it means an end to a freedom of movement that will cripple our businesses or that the next generation of Scots will be deprived of the right to live and work across a continent. Their PM's fighting for it....  
Roll up - Get your Irish passport photos at the House of Commons .. clearly Brexit causing demand everywhere.. Only funnier if it cost £19.16 or £19.22 :)))  
Exclusive: Secret traffic light-coded progress report reveals just 6 of 40 EU trade deals are on course to be rolled over in time for Brexit Day on March 29th:  
Dear Britain,I get why you feel angry and disenfranchised. But if you think that Brexit will somehow improve your life, you are sadly mistaken. The chancers, liars and spivs are in charge now, and unlike them, you will pay an enormous price for this monumental act of self harm. 
David Cameron, regret calling that referendum yet?  
Thanks to @Keir_Starmer for speaking to members about #Brexit in #Southgate. Uplifting and inspiring with an inclusive message for all our members to get behind. 
Whilst we're all watching in horror at news unfolding from Venezuela. Just spare a thought, the UK is only a couple more ridiculous decisions away from being in a similar situation.#BrexitShambles#Brexit 
Daily Express: Secret Brexit plot exposed in hotel bar #tomorrowspaperstoday 
Wednesday’s Metro: Brexit: PM accused of blackmail #bbcpapers #tomorrowspaperstoday (via @BBCHelenaLee) 
UK possibly giving away our Brexit negotiating strategy in a bar is the banter ending we have inexorably been working towards, is it not 
Mbappe dragged Monaco to a league title and champions league semi final, balled for world cup winners and is tearing France apart only for you people to compare him to Brexit Lil Kesh. Lmfao behave 
"Brexit can lead to a new form of international cooperation and cross-border commerce built on a better balance of local and supranational authorities. In these respects, Brexit could affect both the short and long-term global outlooks." 
"In many respects, Brexit is the first test of a new global order and could prove the acid test of whether a way can be found to broaden the benefits of openness while enhancing democratic accountability." 
‘Anti-Brexit’ campaigner Gina Miller lets the cat out the bag and exposes the main purpose of the FBPE cult:‘I was more worried about Jeremy Corbyn than Brexit’The FBPE cult spends more time attacking Jeremy Corbyn than it does Theresa May and...  
First the #Brexit right whip up political hate. Then senior Tories including May threaten violence and disorder, thus inciting and legitimising thuggery. Then the thugs come out to add substance to the politicians' threats. This is fascist politics.#PeoplesVote #Brexit #FBPE 
Keep your eyes peeled for the next instalment by @RobertCPalmer13 coming soon."Is Wilson vs The Prime Minister the silver bullet that will kill Brexit?"@UKEUchallenge @BremainInSpain @wolchover @A50Challenge 
Seriously peeps. Read the Wikistrat link. Who the f*ck commissioned their 2013 gaming analysis of "What if Britain left the EU" ? Why did the NIC take an interest in Wikistrat? This is Jan 2014, 2 & a half yrs B4 Brexit@LouiseMensch@thespybrief@ericgarland@counterchekist 
What Olly Robbins has revealed about May’s Brexit plan | Coffee House  
Theresa May's #WithdrawalAgreement suffered the biggest defeat in Parliamentary history. The fact her advisors seek to bring it back at one minute to midnight and try and force it through OR NO Brexit shows just how toxic the May regime has become. Remain through and through, 
Jeremy Corbyn would rather talk about homeless than #BrexitBut this is what Labour do in power; they vote to punish the homeless.Saying one thing, doing another.Credit to @johnleechmcr &  @LibDems for fighting this nasty hypocritical authoritarian attack on the most vulnerable 
At last, some good Brexit news.  
Staggering!Carney realises Brexit Britain could lead the world into a new era of democracy and free tradeAnd the current system of global trade has key flaws including wealth and income inequality, a lack of democracy and trust via @telebusiness 
Forget toilet roll and rice. If Sainsbury's runs out of Prosciutto di Parma because of Brexit I'm going on the rampage. No mercy. Exeter's going to be like a Death Wish sequel with me as Charles Bronson. 
If this is how long it takes them to realise the harm of Brexit, they clearly are not suited for public office. 
Two hours of evidence on all things #Brexit #backstop before the ever-industrious  @LordsEUCom this afternoon, with @DavidHenigUK, @MissVHewson & @mariedemetriou6.  Available here for your delight:  
We are not a sovereign state while part of the EU. Nor is the EU a democratically accountable entity. These are two of the main reasons many, including me, want Brexit. There is no comparison between the EU and NATO.  
Registered for the Brexit Party, lads. Probably gonna be an MP by Friday.  
Over in Britain it seems the tactics of Theresa May is to run down the clock and give MP's a choice between her deal with some decorations and NO Deal.  #Brexit #Irexit 
In what way could you say she has acted with real honesty & integrity?In short this compulsive liar would get away with murderWhen accused of "running down the clock" in order to deliver a ruinous hard-right Brexit the PM responded with an extraordinary display of revisionism.  
Former Attorney General Dominic Grieve: ‘Entire Brexit process is flawed, that’s why we can’t reach an agreement’ 
More time has passed since the 2016 referendum, than between the last two general elections.If a new vote can be justified by Theresa May's political vanity, I would hope the permanent future of the country matters as much? 
The biggest scandal in British politics is not how the electorate were lied to about Brexit.It is about how they are lied to about Corbyn and Labour - when Britain is under the heel of a scurrilous and incompetent government that serves everything but the public interest.  
"They ain't seen nothing yet," says PIIE President @AdamPosen. As #Brexit looms and uncertainty continues, unless there is an "ultra-soft" Brexit, the UK will likely be facing a recession.  
Prediction: If Theresa May's deal somehow scrapes through Parliament and we leave on 29 March, she will quit very soon afterwards. Basically do a Cameron: cause a chaotic situation, then leave it to someone else to clean it up. Because the shape of Brexit will be utterly unclear. 
Bank of England governor Mark Carney says a no-deal #Brexit would create a shock to the economy.Get the latest political news here:  
Never expected that Jacob would ultimately become an appeaser of the far right. Brexit is driving almost everyone over the edge, apparently #RightToVote 
If Theresa May really believed in Brexit she’d have fired this arrogant and duplicitous Europhile months and months ago. You’d better deliver on 29th March @theresa_may or you, your party, and Parliament will all be toast. 
This is the harsh reality of a No Deal Brexit in NI - otherwise solid local businesses going to the wall and many people losing their livelihoods. It will be devastating to our local economy.  
Making sense of #Brexit: Meet the man who owns a garage that straddles the border between Northern Ireland and Ireland  
Theresa May's Brexit tactic: my way or a long delay  
Because it happens to be true, Nick. If MPs block or seriously delay Brexit, there will be the devil to pay and the rise of ultra populists will be devastating. 
Tory ex-minister Nick Boles MP faces deselection over his stance on #Brexit  
'Did NOT vote for deal!' Kate Hoey demands May to 'change wording' on no-deal Brexit  
Germany (Bavaria): Popular petition "Biodiversity and Save the Bees" initiated by ÖDP (G/EFA) surpasses 950,000 signatures. Parlament has to... a. turn text into lawb. hold referendum about textc. Constitutional Court can declare unconstitutional#VolksbegehrenArtenvielfalt 
The Parliament is stuck because they feel they have to deliver the Brexit the majority voted for, but the negotiations haven't produced the Brexit the majority voted for.So they don't know what people want them to do now with brexit.There is only ONE way to know: #PeoplesVote 
It’s taken a lot to finally get me off that fence, but fortunately I’ve found another one nearby. #Brexit 
Tory ex-minister Nick Boles faces deselection over Brexit stance.If any Tory ought to be deselected, it should be Christopher Chope! 
Just think about it. Your futures, and those of your children and grandchildren, to be forged for the foreseeable future by a fraudulent referendum result obtained by shysters, spivs, liars and charlatans. How does that suit you, sir? Make you proud to be British? 
So 70% of you think that  it would be in the best interests of the country for all of the politicians to go on a first class holiday on St Patrick’s Day instead of staying home and resolving Brexit, maybe you are right and they should leave ..not come back. 
Change Britain, don’t Brexit - why Brexit can & should be stopped  
Coming soon - 'The Brexit Files: Part II. Is Wilson v the Prime Minister the silver bullet that will kill Brexit?' The brilliant follow-up to 'The legal loophole that defies democracy in Britain' by @RobertCPalmer13 - melius est recurrere quam male currere 
‘Anti-Brexit’ campaigner Gina Miller lets the cat out the bag and exposes the main purpose of the FBPE cult:‘I was more worried about Jeremy Corbyn than Brexit’The FBPE cult spends more time attacking Jeremy Corbyn than it does Theresa May and Brexit  
Ian Blackford called #May a liar in Westminster today. He is correct she is a liar. #brexit  
Clean BrexitGreen BrexitMalthouse CompromiseGrey BrexitHard BrexitRed, White & Blue BrexitManaged No DealWTO DealWorld Trade DealChequers DealBespoke DealNo DealCanada +++Norway +Jobs-first BrexitLet’s just admit all Brexits are crap -and ditch the lot.#NoBrexit 
Brexit: Robbins gobbing off in a Brussels bar is interesting for one reason only; May's choice is a deal or a long extension to A50; *only consulting the British ppl again would allow A50 extension* 1/... so... 
Layla Moran tells Iain Dale there are enough votes in Parliament to hold a second referendum on Brexit.@IainDale | @LaylaMoran 
Business group looks into how bad a #WTOBrexit (i.e. a no-deal #Brexit) actually is:  via @bpolitics 
Theresa May will face maximum pressure from her own MPs over these reported comments from her Brexit negotiator Olly Robbins at #PMQs tomorrow. 
'Britain could lead the world into a new era of democracy and free trade, using the Brexit revolt against the establishment as a springboard to making the global order more cooperative, accountable and prosperous', say the Governor of the Bank of England. 
Brexit: PM could delay final vote on Brexit  
If Brexit is so bloody brilliant, why:-is the £ near its lowest ever levels?-are companies leaving in their hundreds?-aren't companies moving into the UK in their hundreds?-has complexity and risk increased?-has friction increased?-has our world reputation plummeted? 
I think some people think Brexit will be over on March 30th. It will never be over. It will go on & on & we will all be in Marat Sade. 
Loose tongues cost political lives.This is explosive as Robbins confirms that the EU and UK designed the backstop as the means to deliver #BRINO May’s own hand reveals that her Brexit never meant #Brexit .Her pretence is over. 
Fortunately Brexit will turn this all around.  
The establishment are terrified of a World Trade Brexit. Sorry Mr Blair but we voted to leave, not to give Brussels £39bn. Join the fastest growing Brexit movement @  
Patrick Blower on Theresa May urging MPs for support in final Brexit talks - political cartoon gallery in London  
Nothing has changed: Govt is delivering a Blindfold Brexit despite repeated promises that our EU future relationship would be settled. With no clarity and no closure, a Blindfold Brexit will break Britain. Demand a #PeoplesVote now:  
A no-deal Brexit spells trouble for Emmanuel Macron | Coffee House  
WATCH as Theresa May lets slip Commons could decide Brexit outcome *AFTER* next month's deadline: “The choice this House will face, and this choice will come at whatever point, er, but I believe it should come before the 29 March.”  
You Tories have led the UK towards a #Brexit catastrophe through a combination of in-fighting & incompetence e.g. Chris Grayling we have already had anarchy on the streets of London & you accuse @theSNP of "Divisiveness". You hypocrisy is truly breath taking! 
Where did all these fascists come from? What were they all doing before #Brexit allowed them to promote their hate so freely? 
Think about a no deal Brexit scenario carefully. Yes, the EU will suffer, but we will suffer much more... and the gap will widen every single day. Why? Because EU companies can replace trade with us with trade with the other 26 EU countries, with Japan, Canada, South Korea etc. 
WE DID NOT HAVE A PEOPLE’S VOTE, WE HAD A STUPID ‘IN OR OUT’ REFERENDUM WHICH DID NOT EXPLAIN THE EXTREME DIFFICULTIES THAT SUCH A DECISION WOULD IMPOSE UPON OUR COUNTRY AND ITS PEOPLE 
This morning, Henry Newman was asked to discuss Brexit with a Cambridge academic. She then stripped naked in the studio and on camera. His take:  
 It's been a historic day in Madrid, as the trial against the Catalan referendum organizers started this morning. Watch this to learn how Day 1 of #CatalanTrial unfolded in the Supreme Court  
This is what we got to look forward to, after Brexit. They will want us to tip our caps to them next. pic.twitter.com/aCjmTJPRYN 
If you were ever wondering why Remain lost the referendum, @terrychristian gives an accurate summary. 
Who came up with this idea that majority of Labour members want another referendum? I'm Labour and never been asked. Was it another dodgy Yougov or Opinium poll or something? Even if it turns out to be true, I keep being told it's constituents not members you need to represent.  
I think our Brexit Secretary (this week) may have been thinking about Jean Paul Sartre and ‘Being and Nothingness’ or maybe he still hasn’t got his head round who he is supposed to be negotiating with. Britain’s Got Talent. Or not.  
Unless you can honour the promises of the Leave campaign, you cannot honour the result of the referendum.Let’s see:  
BREXIT BRITAIN | Ireland. How on earth has this not been shown on @BBCNews, @itvnews or @Channel4News? Are we living in the USSR? @Sandino500 @davidschneider @Anna_Soubry @EricIdle #IgnoranceIsStrength #1984  
It is simply untrue to say that London gets ‘too much’ infrastructure or other public spending relative to the rest of the UK. Without London, the capital of Europe until Brexit, Britain would be a desperately poor country unable to maintain today’s public services  
Theresa May, it looks like you’ve been trying to deceive us. Bad move. Exclusive: UK chief Brexit negotiator Olly Robbins warns MPs the choice is May’s deal or extension - ITV News  
"This deal is atrocious. The negotiation of it has been worse than incompetent. Officials have intentionally tried to undermine the UK's exit from the European Union by destroying all the benefits of Brexit."Wow. Martin Howe doesn't pull any punches! pic.twitter.com/czrWFDVaKB 
British soldiers on the Scotland-England border! Apparently these are 'practise border checks.' Welcome to Brexit! 
So us Brexiteers are both stupid *and* deserving of punishment for casting a vote in a referendum. It’s the only way we’ll learn, I suppose...  
It’s seemingly heresy to question Brexit. There’s a fanatical religiosity attached to its meaning which suggests the wisdom of the policy can never be challenged. Brexit is positioned as an untainted, sacred expression of the ‘will of the people.’ 
A standard break clause on the guarantee of a peace deal? Are you for real? Intransigence from the EU side? Your go to clarion call throughout this #Brexit shambles. Westminster needs to assume its responsibilities. 
Sorry, thickos, but I certainly didn't promise to respect the result of the referendum, not even before we all found out that it was only achieved by Leave cheating. 
So many EU families function like this thanks to #FoMYou take this away & will hurt families at the core -  no Skype call can replace the hug of a child/grandchild, no facetime will replicate the apple-pie shared with laughter at the dinner table,  Brexit will not dry tears...  
People from all communities in NI increasingly see Britain as divided country in international retreat, happy to play Ireland as a pawn in the Brexit game. Instead, people are looking more to Dublin & the EU, where they see a future as equals   
No deal plans for the Channel Tunnel will allow trains to keep using it for 3 months under a proposed new EU law. This is another of the many unilateral measures the EU are very kindly putting forward to stop the UK going Mad Max on day 1 of Brexit. 
Robbins, May and their backstairs No. 10 coterie have been working against Brexit since 24th June 2016. This is why DExEU was consistently by-passed & its ministers either excluded or blatantly lied to.DUP should now pull the plug on may, & ERG-ers should now resign the Whip.  
I am angry at dishonest MPs.In the Referendum, we were told that most UK law was homegrown and the EU had only small influence. Many said 10%. It turns out the EU dominates Parliament- MPs NODDED THROUGH LAWS THEY WERE FORBIDDEN TO QUESTION FOR GENERATIONSThey knew all along 
.@theresa_may heckled as she denies 'running down the clock' on #Brexit  
“By claiming she wanted to get her Brexit proposals "sorted before Christmas" Theresa May is making the extraordinary assumption that the public are simply too thick to even remember that she's the one who cancelled the December Brexit vote at the last minute” @Angry_Voice 
"You did the best possible results at the referendum and u have a democratic mandate. I will always stand by you. Llibertat!" MP @LSRPlaid 
Mark Carney drops Project Fear and talks up free trade Brexit. He set out a strikingly positive vision of increased free trade of services - one of the UK's strengths. This could rebalance the system more fairly for economies with big services sectors.  
Everyone who came to see our #battlebus in Manchester thought Brexit was going badly. Young people want a #PeoplesVote now - it's time for politicians to listen.Next stops: Edge Hill, Altrincham tomorrow! 
EU Referendum Nowcast:Remain 53.6% (+5.5)Leave 46.4% (-5.5)Based on 9 polls conducted in 2019.Changes w/ 2016 referendum.  
Long suspected many of his Conservative colleagues might well know there is no form of Brexit that is going to benefit our country but remain committed, motivated at least in part by benefits for themselves. #TaxAvoidanceDirective 
Cooper wins wider Tory support for new plan to allow MPs to block no-deal Brexit - Politics live  
Stop lying. Your "negotiator" Olly Robbins has given the game away last night.Play for time. Then present your hated #WithdrawalAgreement AGAIN with a few tweaks to the Future Relationship document and say vote for this or I delay Brexit entirely.  You are a fraud.  
Ok Brazilians are now sending me Brexit pisstakes  
Poor Old Europhile Ken Clarke still calling the EU Referendum an Opinion Poll during a TV interview in Parliament tonight !This following his normal “Far RIght” ERG accusations !45 Days and counting Ken !Remember what Theresa told you!Hold Your Nerve! 
#Brexit uncertainty continues to do untold damage. North East biz leaders to rally for a better way on Friday in Middlesbrough. @Business4PV Come & hear Tees Bizwoman of the Year  @prestonmissc @Andrew_Adonis @MPphilwilson @PaulWilliamsMP @carryonkeith  
“Revoke Art.50 if there is no Brexit plan by the 25 of February”Seems like a reasonable request.You could then revoke it on Feb 28th - my birthday.   
Fuck all this deference to the fucking stupid referendum. It was a stupid vote, led by lies & charlatans & dirty foreign money, & it's about time we stood up for our country and said, "Enough! No more! Churchill didn't fight WW2 for us to disappear up our own arses. Fight, fight! 
In a nutshellThe EU referendum options were to either vote for PM David Cameron's negotiated deal to Remain or LEAVE.Not a customs union or a backstop Brexit or a half-in half-out Brexit. Leave meant leave in 2016 and leave means leave now.About time we took back control. 
I met a new student today in one of my classes. She's 18 and her parents are Polish. Born in Poland, but lived here since she was a small child. Essex accent, wondering if she might be kicked out of the country before she even properly starts her degree.  #brexit is simply wrong 
If the course of Brexit does now follow what Robbins has been overheard saying then expect UK politics to undergo enormous structural change 
This is VERY significant. A WTO Brexit is not an option for the PM, this suggests.  
The closer we get to the great May betrayal of Brexit the more the historical relevance of this resonates...  
Well my late period prank has made it onto Talk Radio. Please under no circumstances follow my example:'Hundreds' of people sign up to Brexit party under false names in internet prank | talkRADIO  via @talkRADIO 
"A No Deal Brexit will hit the European Union like an Atomic Bomb"-  Edward Scicluna: Maltese Finance Minister. 
Just saw the latest Carling lager TV advert. British this, British that. Jingoistic pish in other words. The product is pish too. I will stick to proper German beer thanks... assuming the Brexit galactofuck doesn't put it beyond my reach. What a pathetic place the UK has become. 
Deal or no deal, both Labour and the Tories will split over Brexit | Rafael Behr  
Speaking after a press conference with @FPALondon in London, Sinn Féin deputy leader @moneillsf said a crash out Brexit would be catastrophic for the island of Ireland and that the Good Friday Agreement must be protected in all its parts #Brexit  
Olly Robbins was a pro-EU activist who fought for a federal Europe during his days at Oxford University. Why is he our #Brexit negotiator? 
Please - just STOP. This is wrecking the country, there is no Brexit benefit for any scenario. #StopBrexitSaveBritain #RevokeA50  
So, Theresa May claims there are ongoing discussions with the EU. The EU says they don't know what she's talking about. Someone is lying. And I doubt if it's the EU. It's very clear, this PM is just winding down the clock to a no deal #Brexit - the Tory Party's preferred option. 
Hold our nerve? HOLD OUR NERVE??? You’ve got a bloody nerve, wrecking this country & putting hundreds of thousands of jobs at risk, using the result of a fraudulent, advisory referendum just to keep @Conservatives party together #STOPBREXIT#StopBrexitSaveBritain 
No wonder @Nigel_Farage is polishing his shoes ahead of a return to politics with the Brexit party. MPs will have to back her deal or accept a 'long' delay - ie one that takes the UK past the date of May's European Parliament elections  
BREAKING Brexiteer MPs will be furious with this report by @anguswalkertalk tonight. Theresa May's Brexit adviser says its her deal or a delay to Brexit:  
Simply put:The absence of a decent Brexit plan, can never be used as a reason not to let the People vote to reject it.Especially when Brexit voters themselves hate the Brexit the government is offering. 
It still impresses me how rarely in Commons debate MPs question the premise of whether Brexit itself is a good idea. I cannot think of a precedent for a country being so deep in the labyrinth of a political crisis that it doesn't even know what the crisis is anymore. 
It may seem comic - but it’s very deliberate war talk to put the nation in a “rally round the government” seige mentality as Brexit gets hostile.Psych ops on our own citizens.  
Olly Robbins never tried to get a Brexit deal in our national interest, because his nation is "Europe" and he was undermining us at every opportunity. Time for him to be sent off to spend more time with his European family, me thinks.... 
Ok I’m calling it now. The only way through Brexit is to put country before party. We need every #Remain MP to work in a cross party consensus to #StopBrexit.These are extraordinary times. Unprecedented. We now need extraordinary measures. We are at the cliff edge. Be counted 
Exclusive: UK chief Brexit negotiator Olly Robbins warns MPs the choice is May’s deal or extension  
A “clean Brexit” is the messiest thing this nation could possible do.Orwellian terminology doesn’t change that.  
Simon Williams, a UKIP member and retired bus driver from Lichfield says "I will happily see people starve on our streets before I admit Brexit was a bad idea.” via @newsthump 
Fully clothed academic commentators on Brexit are also available.  
Ian Blackford's barnstorming condemnation of Theresa May on multiple fronts over the farcical Brexit shambles she's created. 
David Jones MP, a former Brexit minister, says he was amazed that Mr Robbins had "confessed to it", adding: "He needs to answer some questions."He has no sensitivity to political sentiment and a lot of colleagues will be outraged that he has confessed to this. It is shocking." 
The UK foreign secretary...will leave the Warsaw summit early, pleading Brexit Commons business, while France is sending a civil servant and Germany its junior foreign minister.Federica Mogherini, the EU external affairs chief, will boycott the event...  
Lexiters who want leave the EU to implement a social democratic program & end austerity are missing 1 crucial detail: The. Tories. are. in. Govt. They are going to shape post Brexit Britain not Labour. It is going to be Tory austerity on rocket boosters. Lexiters are utter goits 
Brexit affects many aspects of Charlie's @turtle_inTARDIS life, but first and foremost is whether she'll still be able to get the meds she needs to stay alive. #BrexitIsPersonal   /1 
If you're wondering about how Big Data works and its links with Trump, Brexit and fake news, please take 52 minutes to watch this outstanding documentary by @J_amesp and share widely. We need knowledge if we're to defeat the enemies of democracy. 
This story making waves in Westminster tonight - suggests No10 will concede a delay to Brexit if it has to, and sees backstop customs union position as a 'bridge' to a similarly close long term relationship, rather similar to Labour's Brexit vision then  
Watch again as @theresa_may lets slip that she puts her Party before country by telling her MP's to hold their nerve over Brexit. She doesn't even acknowledge businesses having to stockpile food because of her stubbornness to remove No Deal.  #MayMustGo 
ITV's @anguswalkertalk gets a cracker from Olly Robbins sounding off in Paris. Intriguing line that he "gossiped about Brexit, the Cabinet and MPs."Wonder who he moaned about the most  
Jean...Who?Brexit Secretary @SteveBarclay says talks today in Brussels were "constructive", but fluffs the name of the President of the EU Commission @JunckerEU 
‘his’ deal.Amazing how one word can tell you so much. #Brexit #NoDeal 
.@anguswalkertalk last night overheard Olly Robbins, @theresa_may's Brexit negotiator, in a bar in Brussels saying MPs would in March be presented with a choice between her reworked deal or a potentially long delay to Brexit. Great scoop. More here  
This government was elected to deliver Brexit. May's deal is not BrExit. It has been rejected by LEAVE people. Olly Robbins was not elected to do anything and he has been working to prevent Brexit since day one.This is a coup. This is justification for mass civil unrest.  
On Tuesday, with just 45 days to go before Britain plans to leave the European Union, Prime Minister Theresa May delayed another Brexit decision, saying she needs more time to negotiate with the E.U.  
The EU Referendum was jut the beginning. Next we have to #TakeBackControl from the Lords, Parliament, Local Authorties, NGOs, Quangos, Parish Councils, Public Boards, the City, Corporate and Public sector bodies, think tanks. Properly Democratise the whole apparatus of the state. 
EU announces plans to keep Channel Tunnel rail link open after no-deal Brexit  
Oh dear. Theresa May's Brexit adviser Olly Robbin has been overheard in a bar in Paris saying MPs will be faced with a delay to Brexit or accepting his deal, ITV's @anguswalkertalk reports tonight. 
Whatever your allegiance over Brexit, it presents a massive opportunity to unite the island of Ireland after millions of Irish died or were displaced at the hands of British imperialism.Do you support a united Ireland? 
Exclusive: UK chief Brexit negotiator Olly Robbins warns MPs the choice is May’s deal or extension  
Breaking:ITV reports that Olly Robbins said in a hotel bar that MPs will be presented with a choice between the PM's deal or a lengthy delay to Brexit.Suggestion that it will focus minds.... 
And you wonder why your constituents want to get rid of you @NickBoles - this bill it about stopping Brexit - wake the F up and see it for what it is or you’re toast locally - support the referendum and the manifesto you were voted in on Nick @LeaveEUOfficial 
The care industry has 100,000 vacancies currently. 400,000 leave the industry each year. Historically many care workers are EU citizens. How will the industry fill the vacancies when replacement EU workers don't qualify for a work visa post #Brexit.#Leavers? 
fateful moment when he has to decide whether to drop his opposition to a referendum or @peoplesvote_uk 
Labour putting amendment to vote on Thursday to force ⁦@theresa_may⁩ to bring new deal to Commons for approval by 27 Feb or admit her Brexit flush is bust. ⁦@jeremycorbyn⁩ knows he will lose this vote, so presumably this is process that takes him nearer to the... 
This  is why May wants to avoid a Brexit delay. Brexit is not the will of the people.  
Standing up to the racist, hard Brexit yellow vests in Swindon.¡No Pasarán!  @hopenothate @Swindon4EU @terrychristian @spaceangel1964 @campbellclaret @mk1969 
@StewartMcDonald now goads the Prime Minister, asking if those who broke electoral law, using political sorcery and false promise to win the EU referendum will be found in Dante's 8th circle of hell - she answers a defiant NO - probably because they've now moved to the 9th! 3/3  
After calling Theresa May a 'LIAR' - which he withdrew 'in deference to the speaker' - @IanBlackfordMP persists with this contention that no impact assessment of May's deal has been published, prompting an answer from May which Sir Humphrey Appleby would have been proud of. 2/3 
FIREWORKS IN PARLIAMENT - JE SUIS @theSNP Leader of the opposition to Brexit @IanBlackfordMP tears into a brazen Theresa May, telling her she's lost in a Brexit fantasy and that she's rewriting history before accusing her of dishonesty over the impact of her fraudulent deal. 1/3  
There once was a naturist Prof,Whom all of the nation did scoff,She claimed it's cos of Brexit,That her clothes made an exit, In fact, she liked taking them off. 
Yvette Cooper on BBC News at 6:“There’s a real risk we will end up with a no-deal by accident”Translated:“There’s a real risk we will end up with the #Brexit voted for in the referendum by accident”  
Strange this. I’m sure I remember Mr Lamb promising his constituents in 2017GE that if re-elected he would not seek to frustrate Brexit...  
Hi Brexit followers. Do you think this lot will suffer a No Deal Brexit? Clue - the answer rhymes with "resolutely clucking hot"  
Since the Brexit referendum, far fewer Britons say they are concerned about immigration   
#Brexit:"The Prime Minister has just told members of this House to hold their nerve.Tell that to Nissan workers in Sunderland and the thousands more worried about their job security and the future of their communities."Jeremy Corbyn.#GTTO #JC4PM2019 
Key dates for efforts to stop no-deal Brexit:- 26th February: if PM doesn’t bring back a deal, Cooper-Boles will be tabled again.- 13th March: assuming C-B passes, PM has until this date to  table a motion asking MPs to endorse no-deal - or seek Article 50 extension.  
Myth #2: EU trade will collapse, destroying the economyReality: Most of the economy is domestic and will be entirely unaffected by BrexitListen to the spiked podcast here:  
Anna Soubry says parliament voted against a no deal so Gov should rule it out. Parliament also voted against having a second referendum, will she rule it out?Cc @Anna_Soubry 
South Korea has joined Japan in saying it won't roll over EU deals to the UK on the same terms because it can extract a better deal for them due to the UK's WEAKENED POSITION. Told you! The world isn't going to give the UK what it wants, it's going to pick the #brexit bones. 
"Things have come to such a pretty pass that the more hysterically anti-Brexit papers now cover, to their own surprise, reports that the world will not collapse in April in the event of a No Deal scenario." 
Does Theresa May deserve more time to negotiate Brexit? #FarageOnLBC 
BBC News - No deal Brexit: 'Food businesses facing extinction'  
“We can deliver for the people and the communities that voted for change two and half years ago – and whose voices for too long have not been heard. We can honour the result of the referendum. We now all need to hold our nerve.” – PM @Theresa_May 
The longer you drone on, the more ludicrous it sounds. No delivery. No Brexit yet. The People are fed up with waiting. We voted to Leave the EU, and Leave the EU we will! With you at the helm, or without. It truly is TIME for change. And you, Theresa, have not been delivering it.  
Outside interference through Twitter and FB has been the burning issue since Brexit referendum and Trump’s win, and our intellectuals term it too small to waste Parliament’s time  
Just who the hell do you think you are?  You were elected to represent people not bamboozle Parliament into doing what you what! This is not about you, it's about honouring a democratic vote. Doing the best for this country? NO. We'll take 'no deal' Brexit and cope with it. 
It's not the tangible impact of Brexit which I cannot accept, but it's what Brexit represents. Rejection of friends & alliesSelfishness, greed & vindictivenessThe sense of superiority & entitlementUnleashed xenophobia & discriminationAbuse of power, lies & fraud#StopBrexit 
Nexit means brexit.  #FD #Buitenland 
In a packed committee room 19 listening to business describe impacts of a #nodeal brexit. Standing room only but no members of ERG here.  #areERGputtinghandsoverearsanssinginglalala 
'Dave' an expat living in Spain voted 'leave' thinking it would not mean him ..... Ffspic.twitter.com/lNvnUSY81T#BrexitExPats #BritsAbroad #Brexit 
I love EU everyday even more. The way they negotiate, the standards, the way they protect EU citizens, true pros at every level. I knew very little about them before brexit, now im very much pro EU. 
Fuck Brexit and anyone who supports it 
Brexit has eaten people's brains  
Badges!Come to #Sodem.Protest against Brexit & buy badges.We have new designs.All profits go to buying more flags, placards and banners.Thank you very much @suehard @BarbaraWant @RemainingKind 
Theresa May has conveniently forgotten that Theresa May warned about the perils of #Brexit. Here's a little reminder of what she said...  
Congratulations to Jane Owen, UK’s ambassador to Berne, for the UK-Swiss continuity agreement signed yesterday. This continues our current trade relations after Brexit. Annually, UK-Swiss trade is worth £32bn  
For Ireland & the #EU27, the plight of the UK in our final weeks must be like being on other ships whilst observing the slow sinking of the Titanic.They can all hear the screaming & see people jumping overboard. They pick up survivors but otherwise just watch in horror. #Brexit  
EXCL: What Yvette Cooper and Remainer MPs are planning next on Brexit.  
Tonight on @tmbsfm @MkBlyth returns talking Brexit, Green New Deal & why Trump can't fake economic populism anymore 
Astounding revisionism from Theresa May. It's as if she expects us plebs to have simply forgotten how she was the one who delayed the Brexit vote in December for no reason other than the fact she knew she was going to lose it.  
Don’t you get it mate?The first thing you are doing with Brexit is removing the rights of 65 million uk citizens plus all those that have settled here, legally.Think about that one for today and then we will talk about all the other BAD STUFF .  
And another #Brexit poll, consistent with other recent ones, showing that U.K. voters now back #Remain over #Leave by a 10 point margin.We need to test what the ‘will of the people’ is with a #PeoplesVote #FinalSay referendum, so the public can decide to #ExitFromBrexit 
Preparations are being made for trains through Channel Tunnel if No Deal #Brexit. Commercial pragmatism and cooperation will surely prevail.  
Grayling urged to quit as spending on Brexit ferry deal consultants revealed  
Roses are redViolets are blueBrexit is crapLet’s stay in EU  
Everyone is asking how #Brexit will shake out. But can #blockchain help? Learn the answer in our upcoming #webinar with the World Customs Organization, Crowell and Moring, Cassels Brock & Blackwell, and the UN Food and Agriculture Org on Feb 26. Register -  
Just been asked a few questions by the @EveningStandard on my thoughts on Brexit, as an employee and operator, and now feel irrepressibly angry. Everything I've built, all the people I've built it with, and for, and the city I built it to celebrate, under threat of destruction. 
The #Brexit Secretary @SteveBarclay was in Strasbourg today. He told MEPs that the U.K. was seeking legally binding changes to the backstop. I asked a few times if that could be achieved without reopening the Withdrawal Agreement. 
May’s brinksmanship is totally irresponsible. Businesses need predictability/stability way beyond the next few weeks. @theresa_may is playing fast and loose with UK’s reputation as a safe and stable place to do business. Result will be many businesses leaving UK after #Brexit. 
#Brexit: No-deal plan for Channel Tunnel operations  
Can you please  tell me which article of the Spanish criminal Code says that holding a “consulta” is a crime? Because I read it carefully, and It seems that the crime of illegal referendum has been cancelled in Spain many years ago. 
Jeremy Corbyn said he didn't say "Article 50 has to be invoked now" on the morning of the EU referendum result.So here he is, not saying "Article 50 has to be invoked now" on the morning of the EU referendum result.   
Here's the deal:Grayling awarded a Brexit ferry contract to a company with no ships The company was found to have copied its T&Cs from a takeaway websiteEventually the contract is cancelledAfter claiming no money was lost, turns out all this has cost £800,000  
I have just put down an amendment calling for an extension of Article 50 AND a 2nd referendum with 3 choices: accept the final agreement between UK & EU once approved by Parliament, reject the agreement & leave without a deal, or reject the agreement & remain in the EU. 
#Brexit: No-deal plan for Channel Tunnel operations  
Good morning Britain! @GMB Yes! I am a regular around here. I´ve been outside parliament protesting against Brexit since Sept 2017.News presenters can retreat to their high media towers but not too high for my poles.WE ALREADY HAVE THE BEST DEAL.#StopBrexit !@BarbaraWant 
Well I’ll be damned. First Tusk admits the chance of reversing Brexit has passed, and then Carney talks up Britain.Are we about to finally move on?  
Don't buy into the myth that Brexit was a choice made only by men - it was a campaign led by men and women, including @GiselaStuart. 
Yet another #ProjectFear scare story peddled by the @Independent well and truly debunked as plans are announced to ensure the Channel Tunnel rail link remains open after a no-deal Brexit.  Support us at  
“Mark Carney drops Project Fear as he talks up free trade potential of Brexit”  
.@SNewtonUK, MP for #Truro & #Falmouth, claims that "overwhelmingly, local people want us to get on with #Brexit".In a few hours in central Truro today, hundreds of people signed a door with the message "Don't close the door on the EU", which we delivered to Ms Newton's office.  
. VAT is an EU tax, UK is the second largest contributor of VAT to the EU. Post Brexit we can either scrap VAT or reduce it to 16%. A major saving for the UK consumer. 
You are a Liar. Any Brexit makes people worse off, and no deal is a disaster. The left behind will still be left behind, there will be no money for public funding, less rights and less job opportunities for young people. Social inequality will increase !!  
It is worse that incompetence.It is blatant treachery.The PM never had any intention of delivering #Brexit.She has been lying through her teeth ever since she became PM.And Labour are no better.Vote against them at every opportunity.  
Isn’t the only way out of this to put the Withdrawal Agreement negotiated by the Prime Minister to the people in a referendum to give them the final say.   
We could be effected by Brexit but we won’t know till it happens. You can’t use brexit as an excuse to lay someone off. Unprofessional workmanship, behaviour, etc are valid reasons. Legally have to give them a reason and notify them, someone’s political vote isn’t valid 
‘Another piece of a managed no deal that Brexiteers were told was impossible…’ #Brexit #Croydon #LetsGoWTO 
If you’re wondering how hard a "hard Brexit" could be, here are some scenarios  
The 2016 EU referendum result was a vote for change. Today I urged @theresa_may to ensure Brexit Britain delivers a renaissance of the regions - including coastal communities like Dover and Deal.  
Are you tired of hearing that students will not be able to study abroad post-Brexit? If so, share the facts by RT our video! #Erasmus #SupportStudyAbroad #StudyAbroad #Brexit #GlobalFuture 
This targeted ad is going to some of my constituents- but it won't stop me from supporting a people's vote on Brexit. Vast majority of emails into my office have supported PV, and after yet another exercise in can kicking by the PM today, it's clear we need a #PeoplesVote. 
.@Theresa_May was not the only person making a #BrexitStatement today. Heres's a lady in Truro who voted Leave in 2016 telling us why she's changed her mind.We wish more Westminster politicians had the same courage & honesty as her.#PeoplesVote #RevokeArticle50 #Brexit  
The best way to deliver for the communities who voted Leave 2-1/2yrs ago is to #Stay & fix problems that led to the #Brexit protest vote in the 1st place.Brexit = downgrading UK trading arrangements. That'll impoverish us & make us less able to fix the problems that need fixing  
Will be talking to @LBC shortly about May running down the clock to a crash out #Brexit & what Parliament & Labour must do to stop her. #BrexitShambles #PeoplesVote 
Excellent report on the legislative horror story of hundreds of Brexit SIs being shoved through parliament by @adampayne26 
Remember when #ProjectFear said no-one wanted to visit #Brexit Britain?Well congrats to Buzzworks Holdings, Ayrshire’s largest hospitality group, which has been rewarded for multi million pound investment in Scotland with a 9% growth in turnover. Staff numbers are also up 6%. 
The referendum result was illegal, based on lies and law breaking. You're driving us off a cliff for your own personal gain. 
Dr Victoria Bateman turned up naked on live television to argue why Brexit is bad for Britain .... We are living in strange times ....   
Foreign secretary, @Jeremy_Hunt tells @KayBurley that he thinks "it is possible" to get a #Brexit deal by the 29th of March. Get the latest political news here:  
Announce a Hard Rangers BrEXIT from the SFA. 
A philosophical Mark Carney today: "Brexit is the first test of a new global order and could prove the acid test of whether a way can be found to broaden the benefits of openness while enhancing democratic accountability" 
'I think France sees itself as the guardian of the European project' - @Jeremy_Hunt says there is 'goodwill' from the French government to find a way forward on #Brexit. For all the political news, head here:  
Just had a meeting with Jaya Ratnam the Singapore Ambassador to the EU. Mr Ratnam confirms that their Prime Minister has said that their trade agreement can be carried over with the UK after Brexit, no problem.  Exactly what I have said about existing trade agreements all along.  
Financial Times: "Twelve Catalan separatist leaders go on trial in Madrid""The defendants have spent months — and in some cases more than a year — in pre-trial detention in connection with the 2017 secession referendum"#ThisIsTheRealSpain 
There has to be another reason for her to be still pushing this. Whose voices have not been heard? Honour what result? It cannot just be Party over country. #Brexit #Brexitmess 
If I wasn't so patriotic towards the UK, I'd probably support Brexit from a global perspective:A country making its people much poorer due to the idea that it's more powerful/important than 27 countries combined, is a great example to the world of how dangerous nationalism is. 
This is what bothers me most about what Brexit has done to this country. The disingenuousness. The flagrant lack of respect for facts. The casual rudeness. The shameless abuse. It’s so bloody depressing. 
DHL hires hundreds of customs staff to prepare for no-deal Brexit  
 45 days until Brexit, and Theresa May is still running down the clock. This is a Prime Minister lost in a Brexit fantasy, gambling with our economy without a plan.  
This the simple thing Brexiters don’t understand about trade deals. We’ll be in position of weakness after Brexit and have to accept concessions from other countries. There’s a reason the Swiss can’t sell their watches in China..  
Blair's AG Lord Goldsmith thinks it's no deal. “The government has done an absolutely terrible job of preparing for Brexit. [May] is driving the UK towards an abyss in the hope that the EU or Commons will blink. It’s a disgraceful way to conduct international affairs.” 
Please can we forget marching for a People's Vote and march to STOP BREXIT. And dwarf the numbers we achieved on 20 October. 
I agree with the Prime Minister - we need to hold our nerve and deliver Brexit on time.   
LISTEN: On the back of Ken Clarke's words today in parly.. Here's another one of his blistering #Brexit speeches /  
WATCH: @JustineGreening is absolutely right - it's time the British people had their say on the PM's miserable Brexit deal. It's time for a #PeoplesVote. Please RT: 
Why! Why! Why! is no one listening to the millions of people who didn't vote for Brexit. #REVOKEArticle50NOW #StopBrexit 
Despite meetings w/ UK reps, incl PM May, Lidington & Barclay I’m yet to hear of a proposal to break Brexit deadlock. I ask myself what are these negotiations at a "crucial state" raised in the HoC? The way forward is cross-party, not kicking the can towards a disastrous no deal. 
The Electoral Commission's appeal against the decision of the High Court that the Electoral Commission failed properly to apply electoral law during the EU Referendum will be heard on 4th July ... 
I see you, May. Hellbent on getting Brexit through so that the UK does not have to implement transparency rules on tax evading offshore accounts. This is all about the obscenely wealthy. The poor already have their names on their body bags. Evil. 2/2 
Are YOU a member of the Cabinet?Do you fear that the likely outcome of Theresa May’s actions is a calamitous No Deal Brexit?Does that appal you?If so, you can change history if you RESIGN NOWOr you can just live with the consequences of your pusillanimity forever 
Nina is demanding a #PeoplesVote because this #Brexit deal will harm the job opportunities of young people. Join her. Write to your MP to demand a #PeoplesVote on the #Brexit deal:  
Every MP must now make their role in public life count & stand up for the millions of citizens who are  leaderless.It’s way past time to tell the truth. Nobody will forgive silence or party loyalty when Brexit reality hits us all.Stand together & #JustMakeItStop.Please. 
This was the third time I asked for details on the post-Brexit replacement funding and for the third time I received no answer. The Highlands cannot rely on hypothetical funding. The PMs lack of clarity shows she is knows leaving the EU will make my constituency worse off  
I am afraid you are putting holding together the Conservative Party before the good of the UK. It was why your predecessor had the referendum in the first place. I am being polite in saying you are being disingenuous, this is a shambles of the highest order. 
Our government is relentlessly pursuing the implementation of a policy derived from an unlawful mandate, whilst, at the same time, chooses to ignore the corrupt and illegal practices that delegitimised that mandate in the first place. 
The Reality is ATIKU surely Will Win!BUHARI can only win By Rigging and that Won't Happen Because we are going to defend our votes.This Election is a Referendum Of Competence Vs Incompetence!Visions VsVisionless!Nepotic Vs Unifier!Security's Vs insecurity!#AtikuIsWinning 
There is not a single aspect of public life in Britain today that appears improved in any way - substantive or superficial - by the Brexit process. Shrunken in the eyes of the world, our democracy looking threadbare & our national gaze looking ever inwards, parochial & mean. 
May's choice is between a SHOT IN THE HEAD with a No Deal Brexit or a SHOT IN THE FOOT with her Deal. She needs a #PeoplesVote to get her deal through and to let the people decide between her Deal and the existing deal in the EU. 
Are you some kind of IDIOT? He tabled an amendment for a referendum in parliament it was voted down. Ffs man show you're education wasn't wasted and you can comprehend the littlest thing.  
We can deliver for the people and the communities that voted for change two and half years ago – and whose voices for too long have not been heard.We can honour the result of the referendum.We now all need to hold our nerve.  
Today we announced we are investing to ensure our students can continue to enjoy the #Erasmus exchange experience regardless of the outcome of #Brexit  
Guy behind the Times poll said Jeremy Corbyn has the lowest approval rating ever. Labour has no chance of winning the next election without coming out against brexit 
James is a lifelong Labour voter but he has become disillusioned with the Labour party because of their response to #Brexit. He is demanding that @RichardBurgon support a #PeoplesVote.Join him to demand a #PeoplesVote:  
Mark Carney drops Project Fear to focus on the benefits of Brexit  
“As Sabine Weyand recently told reporters, the WA hands the EU sufficient leverage to ensure the UK remains in permanent high alignment with it. “meaningful vote”...nobody who is sincere about supporting Brexit should have anything to do with (TM’s) plan.”  
WATCH: absolutely right of @YvetteCooperMP to call #Brexit EU settlement scheme a potential “Windrush on steroids” - the more we hear, the worse it gets. @ukhomeoffice not adequately prepared. @the3million 
"There is no Brexit that can guarantee workers' rights, and that is why we need a People's Vote."Agree with @joswinson? Add your name here >  
What would it take for Grayling to get the sack? Clearly making a £13.8 mill. deal with a ferry company with no ships wasn’t enough. He’s steering us to disaster and a no-deal #Brexit. Chaos at Dover will be on his head. We need a #PeoplesVote to get us out of this #Brexitmess. 
We are being held to ransom by a Prime Minister aggressively determined to have her way at any cost.We are being failed by the so-called Leader of the Opposition who wants to blink & ignore the cold wind of Brexit reality.Brave MPs must stand together & call to revoke #Art50. 
What a first class plonker.........   Brexit: Guy Verhofstadt suggests Leave campaigners could ‘end up on the guillotine’ | The Independent  
for sure! but I knew they were ignorant then too. my issue is more with the teacher supporting the notion that my humanity was up for referendum at any moment’s notice  
DP @WilliamsRuto has seen the writing on the wall.  The man sees far like a giraffe.  He knows he will lose the race for President in 2022.  That’s why he wants the constitution changed — by referendum — so that it can create the Official Leader of Opposition for him. 
Come the end of March 2019 what position do you think we will be in in respect of #Brexit ?**Please retweet after voting **#WTOBrexit #StandUp4Brexit #StandUp4Democracy #Conservative #Labour #LibDem #UKIP #SDP #ForBritain #Time #Soveriegn #Green 
So George Farmer - the Brexit loving Chairman of Turning Point UK - the grassroots pro-Trump Conservative movement was a member of the Bullingdon club. Here he is (number8) with Buller chums on a jolly to South Africa - where they shot grouse in the desert.  
This is the 10th time (!!!) #TheresaMay has reverted to deliberately wasting time, kicking the can down the road on #Brexit See list compiled by @InFactsOrg :. 
Today 12 Catalan leaders go on trial in Spain’s Supreme Court, facing the medieval-sounding charges of rebellion and sedition.Their supposed crime: organising a democratic referendum on Catalan independence in October 2017 
Brexit means Brexit  
Day 2: @OFOCBrexit are in Manchester today - we’ve spoken to hundreds of young people over the past few days who are VERY worried about how Brexit will affect their future. If you’re in the area, head to our website and find out how to join us on tour! #PeoplesVote 
Can Leavers point out why local councils, the NHS, universities, companies, former president of WTO are all against Brexit? If it's so wonderful why aren't more companies/countries praising it? Look forward to your evidence-based answers. 
There is huge opposition in Grantham & Stamford to Nick Boles carrying on as their MP after the next General Election. His constituents are up in arms over his Brexit betrayal and rightly so!Politicians must be accountable to those they claim to represent.  
Meanwhile Tory policies are killing our own citizens and we're heading for 50 years austerity courtesy of Brexit.  I think we all know who's letting Scotland down and it isn't Ian Blackford 
A wealthy white person upping sticks from London to Amsterdam is now a "Brexit refugee" but a Romanian surgeon is an "economic migrant" and a gay person from Uganda seeking asylum, unable to work, fighting deportation is a "scrounger".  AngloSaxon privilege at work once again. 
Message to #TheresaMay and the Tories.............. #BinTheDeal.You haven't a hope in hell of delivering #Brexit or pleasing the British people if you don't. 
Wait till next month when the riots start.Anything but a no deal brexit and these scum will be rioting.And no sensible government could ever let us crash out with no deal (I realise we don't have a sensible government tho). 
Jacob you are now sounding deranged. Tommy IS Brexit, he represents the very core of what Brexit is about. The only way to stop facism be it dressed in a suit or a yellow vest is to #stopbrexit and #remain  
Watch this if you want to understand the Brexit issue from an Irish POV. This is why the future of the border is so key.  
NHS Stockpiling Body Bags As 'No Deal' Brexit Odds Climb  
One major benefit of a WTO Brexit: it is perhaps the only thing that would force Brussels to approach trade talks in a realistic frame of mind. And having seen the collapse of their previous negotiating position, it could even teach them a little humility. 
Only by walking away completely in March can we take full advantage of the global opportunities that Brexit presents us with. #WTOBrexitNOW #LetsGoWTO 
45 days to Brexit. I am keeping my nerve like billyo. But…“So they go on in strange paradox; Decided only to be undecided; Resolved to be irresolute, adamant for drift, solid for fluidity, all powerful to be impotent” #WSCNov1936 
The Brexit that everyone seems sick fed-up with can be quickly ended by merely Revoking A50 which the UK has power to do before 29th March only.A5O Extension and even a second EuroRef, prolong the uncertainty for an unspecified time. Hence I will table #RevokeA50 in Commons. 
Jeremy Corbyn savages Theresa May for 'playing chicken' with workers' lives as she begs for more Brexit time 
WATCH: After the PM's statement today it is becoming increasingly clear that the she intends to take the country to the brink of a no deal Brexit before blackmailing Parliament into backing her unpopular deal. This brinkmanship with the livelihoods of my constituents cannot go on  
Transparency in the #Brexit negotiations is one of our priorities. @EUombudsman has commended our work including the publication of 100+ negotiating documents, making @MichelBarnier's calendar publicly available, and meeting only registered lobbyists. 
The ONLY person clutching at their pearls in faux outrage is you! Your PM is, like most in your ruinous and poisonous party, a damned liar! You are willing to throw Scotland under the #Brexit bus rather than stand with constituents who voted #Remain for shame!#DissolveTheUnion 
I called @mrjamesob today to talk to him on @LBC about some of the issues concerning musicians after Brexit, particularly with a tour to Spain due to take place on March 30th, a mere 6 weeks away. You can hear our conversation here from 02:10:00 or so.  
just did a Factiva search to see how often the following words were mentioned in articles by the entire global media in the last 2 years:climate change: 475,461Brexit: 681,093 Donald Trump: 1,645,943 
Soros has just shot off his own face by drawing the exact comparison the Brexit camp has been saying for years... the evil empire of the USSR that forced poverty upon its own people and into abject misery... Just like the EU. 
EXPOSED - Brexit Nude is a serial attention-seeking exhibitionist.   
A German grandmother who came to Britain in the final year of the Second World War says that being forced to “register” before Brexit feels like “what the Third Reich did with the Jews” 
Theresa May says she wanted #Brexit "sorted before Christmas". So why has she wasted SO MUCH TIME over the last 2 years? Here are 10 times the PM kicked the can. #PeoplesVote 
#Brexit: Mark Carney warns of no-deal 'economic shock'  
Aguardo manchetes "May Try Brexit in May"  
No, John, YOUR PM is letting down the whole of the UK and he called her out for it.  I am proud of him for telling the truth - she IS a liar - and for standing up for, not just Scotland but the whole UK - you can't even stand up for your constituents! #Brexit  
I begin to wonder if May is deranged.  She says this as though she actually believes it and yet she was the one that cancelled the vote on her crappy brexit deal before Christmas.#CertifiablyDangerous 
.@EU_Commission publishes legislation to keep services running through the Channel Tunnel for 3 months if there's no Brexit deal. It'll give the UK and France time to renegotiate the Canterbury Treaty which underpins the international rail service.  
UK to re-colonise India? “Brexit is a great moment in our history and has given us the chance to enhance our lethality and increase our mass”. He actually said that. And this idiot is the minister of defence, one of highest appointments in the country. Who elects these people??  
Transport Secretary Chris Grayling spent £800,000(!) on the failed Brexit ferry deal! The money was spent on external consultants who looked at three ferry contracts, including the one that went to Seaborne Freight, the company that has no ferries. 
May tried to avert a rebellion Thursday when Parliament votes again on Brexit by promising another series of votes two weeks later  
In 'King Lear', Edgar, disguised as Poor Tom, takes his blinded father, Gloucester, to what he believes is a cliff edge. It's not. Gloucester, distraught, jumps to his death but (surprise!) survives. A lesson is learned.That's not like Brexit though. It's actually a big cliff 
WHAT DO YOU EXPECT, WHEN WE THE BRITISH PEOPLE AND BRITAIN HAVE BEEN LIED TOO FOR THE LAST 50 YEARS...THE TRUST HAS PHYSICALLY BEEN DAMAGED AND DESTROYED!AND NOBODY WILL NEVER EVER FORGIVE THIS ESTABLISHMENT IF WE DON'T GET A NO DEAL BREXIT!!!  
More bad news for the far-right Brexit Britain. Those who die in the cheese famine can at least be assured of a quick burial. The only people getting rich in the post-EU UK will be the funeral directors. 
All trust has collapsed as we approach a Brexit finale that can only end in betrayal  via @Telegraph 
Naked Brexit Professor Got Publicly Naked Long Before Brexit  
Brexit Britain is at the cutting edge of the global economy with $3.3bn invested in FinTech last year - more than four times the amount invested in Germany  The Remoaner media are too busy peddling Project Fear lies to report that...Support us at  
“Does (the PM) agree that requiring legally binding changes to the backstop is essential to passing that deal through this House and while Brexit was the UK’s choice, if Brussels remains stubbornly intransigent, a departure on WTO terms would be the EU’s choice?” @DominicRaab 
“All the economic analysis shows [Brexit] will make us poorer.”“Having that democracy back is very, very important and it’s seen as a value to people.”Labour MPs John Mann and Angela Smith disagree over the best way forward for Brexit.  
We know how Trump spends 60% of his day, Jeff Bezos is taking on Mr. Pecker, @iamjohnoliver explains Brexit and @ygofficialblink makes their U.S. debut! #LSSC  
“Brexit has brought us to a.....great moment in our history....to enhance our lethality.”Nothing creepy or terrifying here at all....Imagine if this was said by any foreign military.  
The Court of Appeal granted the Electoral Commission permission to appeal the decision of the High Court that the Commission failed properly to apply electoral law during the EU Referendum. The hearing has been fixed for 4th July 2019. 1/2 
See John Oliver discuss the looming possibilities of both a second term for Trump and a “no deal” Brexit on #LSSC  
Theresa May hid these immigration reports as Home Secretary. She shut down the investigation into Arron Banks while Home Secretary. She has been scheming to get #Brexit for a long time. Her stance as a Remainer during the referendum campaign was a lie.  
Seriously, why can’t they put this vote back into the people’s hands? Now that they KNOW they were manipulated prior to first #Brexit vote ??!!  
Is this what you wanted Brexiters? For some who promote Brexit, including some MPs, I think it is. But this should be a wake up call for everyone, including leave voters, who don't want this approaching decent into disorder to be the real, lasting result of the 2016 ref. 6/6 
@Nigel_Farage @GerardBattenMEP This is absolutely superb from Katie Hopkins. She is dead right.The UK needs a new COHESIVE political force to take out the dead wood from Tories and Labour. It's not just Brexit - it is way beyond that into the future of this country. 
Sue Black is spot on  'To me Brexit... epitomises the worst of Britain and the British. People from privileged backgrounds seeking to manipulate others, to pit people against each other for their own personal gain. Selfish people creating a selfish atmosphere in selfish times.'  
UK, Kantar poll:CON-ECR: 40% (+5)LAB-S&D: 35% (-3)LDEM-ALDE 10% (+1)SNP-G/EFA: 4% GREENS-G/EFA: 4%PC-G/EFA: 1% UKIP-ENF: 3% (-3)+/- vs. 10/01/19 – 14/01/19 Field work: 7-11 Feburary 2019Sample size: 1,145➤ #Brexit #BrexitVote 
"The Government's plan to exclude their Brexit deal from the Constitutional Reform and Governance Act shows contempt for our democracy.“Labour will oppose this change, which would deny Parliament full scrutiny.” - @PaulBlomfieldMP 
Brexit is the catalyst and the carrier for all of this. It's verging on state-sanctioned. Continuing on this path will only embed it further. Stopping it will not stop this in itself, but it would at least present an opportunity to address it rather than actively encouraging. 5/ 
We had an anti #brexit rally in Winchester on Saturday. 2500 turned up. Totally peaceful and friendly. Whatever happens I know I am on the right side when the history is written.  
You could probably log out of Brexit now, come back on March 23, and you wouldn't miss anything tbh 
Plight of Irish citizens born in Northern Ireland now treated as 2nd class citizens highlighted by @emmadesouza #Brexit @BelfastAgmt @sinnfeinireland 
Brexit is about removing rights, human rights and workers' rights. Tory doctrine is about minimizing workers' rights in favour of profit. Next thing you'll be claiming how well Britain did to give women the vote. 
We can reach a Brexit deal parliament can support: UK PM May  
.@jeremycorbyn suggests the reason he got a copy of @theresa_may's #Brexit statement late is because she entrusted it to 'Failing Grayling'.What a week already for the Transport Secretary!   
Good to see our historic allies in Malta speaking the truth on the effect a no-deal Brexit would have on Brussels - it will hit them "like an atomic bomb!" Remember, Brussels needs US much more than we need THEM!  Support us at  
I watched this documentary last night about the aftermath of a no deal brexit and let me tell you I am horrified that it's even being considered.  
Don’t think that James. This Brexit catastrophe can still be stopped, if we keep at it 
Vince Cable “Now that the PM has reached out to the general Secretary of unite union and the leader of the opposition and his entourage, she is no doubt now better informed as to how Trotsky would have dealt with the Brexit crisis.”  
With May not taking Labour’s #Brexit plan seriously, Starmer says MPs should vote on it. If they say “no”, Labour can back a #PeoplesVote. @HugoDixon explains why here 
"I wanted to have this sorted before Christmas" says @theresa_may who seems to forget she cancelled the meaningful vote on her Brexit deal just before Christmas.   
TUC General Secretary: "The prime minister’s failure to rule out a no-deal Brexit is harming confidence in the economy and holding back growth." 
Theresa May hid these immigration reports as Home Secretary. She shut down the investigation into Arron Banks while Home Secretary. She has been scheming to get #Brexit for a long time. Her stance as a Remainer during the referendum campaign was a lie. #LeaveLies 
It's quite clear: the best deal for workers' rights is the deal we already have with the EU. We must give the people the final say on Brexit, with the opportunity to reject this broken deal and stay in the EU.  
The reason we're so close to Brexit day without any resolution is not because of Machiavellian political planning. It because of May's chronic indecisiveness, the bloody mindedness of Brexit ideologues on Right and Left, and the continuing cowardice of the political moderates. 
Unacceptable. With the country & business crying out for #Brexit certainty PM kicks the can yet again down the road refusing to face up to the reality - Parliament is in an impasse so let’s get this back to the people with @peoplesvote_uk 
Brexiters were conned - maybe it won't hit home until they get that P45 - thankfully i know at least 3 employers already ensuring brexit voters are laid off first , all employers should follow suit where possible  
"I thought however Brexit turned out it wouldn't be great and the Tories would be tarred with such a negative brush that there would be a possibility Labour could come in with Mr Corbyn. I was more worried about him than I was about Brexit." ~ Gina Miller  
"....A future for all of our children...if we leave without a deal we will destroy the NHS and I have friends who need cancer treatments and I cannot believe that we would jeopardise or risk their health to obtain a brexit...bought on the back of an advisory referendum"  
As it’s confirmed body bags are being stockpiled in case of no-deal Brexit, the government says it plans to recoup the cost by charging people 5p to use them. 
Brexit certainly won't right any wrongs house the homeless employ the jobless feed the hungry or remedy grievances. The reverse in fact 
Matt on Brexit has been on fire  
EU citizens! What nonsense. As I stepped off my lear jet this morning and handed @Juancker_EU his first glass of champagne, I thought, "There's no way we are out of touch." Just look at Tusk's poignant comments on Brexit and religion. Finger on the pulse. 
Why has no one of political influence or standing as an MP embraced the elephant in the room regards Brexit....GIVE ENGLAND INDEPENDENCEIt literally solves all of this! 
The Prime Minister’s statements on Brexit are a complete waste of time - the questions and answers are exactly the same now as they were at the beginning of December. Her deal is still a bad deal & she’s recklessly running down the clock. 
History will see the story of the last two and a half years as one of two main party leaders effectively conspiring to run down the clock to a blindfold Brexit that will do lasting damage to the U.K. 
As the UK careers towards the calamity of a crash out #Brexit, my message to the more responsible Ministers in Government & my own front bench in Commons today.  
A new joy of #Brexit: the Constitutional Reform and Governance Act. PM confirmed to Dominic Grieve that the provision in it to lay any new treaty in front of Commons for 21 days before it’s voted on will have to be ripped up to pass Brexit deal bill in time for March 29 (1) 
The ongoing handling of Brexit is the greatest act of self harm in my lifetime. Listening to the PM’s statement just now is astonishing. Over two years on and no deal. As the great Winnie Ewing famously said “Stop the world, Scotland wants to get on”. How right Winnie was. 
May has called on Van Rompuy to break Brexit deadlock. Note to PM: Van Rompuy is not the answer. Ever. To anything. 
To the end of my days, I'll never know how a government whose own analyses showed every form Brexit making a loss could talk about a 'Brexit dividend', and not be hounded out of office. We just can't put upwith lies like that. 
The PM understands that the only way to achieve a sustainable majority in the HOC for her Brexit legislation is with Conservative, DUP and Brexit supporting Labour MPs. To secure this majority, she must bring back a deal which respects the referendum & the integrity of the  
1,080 hours until BrexitCrystal clear the vast majority of people across our proud Island nation now just want to get on with Brexit & leave the EU on 29th March 2019.Sadly still a dwindling number of hard-core Rabid Remoaners who have never accepted the referendum result. 
#British #fishermen have to throw away loads of fish because of ridiculous #EUquotas! They can't wait to get out of the EU's #CommonFisheriesPolicy.  #StandUp4Brexit #LeaveMeansLeave #Brexit @ConHome @TheConWom @Conservatives @andreajenkyns @DCBMEP #Tory 
Those who can't fathom why I would slag the Beast. It's very simple: Brexit will hurt people. Industries will collapse. Factories will close. Prices will go up, wages will go down. Austerity will go on for yrs. Why Skinner would support that is the question you should be asking 
"While Brexit was the UK's choice, if Brussels remains stubbornly instransigent, a departure on WTO terms would be the EU's choice." | @DominicRaab 
France stands to forfeit €3bn of exports in 2019 and 50,000 jobs in the event of post #Brexit disruption, making it the 3rd worst affected #EU nation after Germany & Holland, according to a report by French-based credit insurer Euler Hermes. So please Mr Macron #NoDeal 
These neo-fascists are the ones who'll be looking to rule the streets near you after Brexit. It's about control, about ending diversity and freedom of speech. Violence is all they have, because it's the only language they can articulate. Brexit is only a means to an end.  
We don’t want May’s shit deal even without the backstop!! Her bloody deal isn’t Brexit is it!!  
After independence, we can, we must redistribute Scotland's wealth to Scots & never forgive Labour for delivering Brexit against their constituents votes. #RedTories ps where's your apology for fighting equal pay at GCC for 10 years costing Glagow £0.5 billion? #unforgivable 
A friend who is an employment law specialist at one of the big four accountancy firms is working 24/7 exclusively for clients who are responding to Brexit by exiting the UK entirely. Tens of thousands of jobs and billions of pounds in tax revenue at stake, she says. 
By my reckoning, Ian Blackford questioned Theresa May's honesty over Brexit four times  
The naked woman talking brexit has the backing of feminists even though she’s using her body for attention. Them same feminists hate certain women using their bodies for attention. Seems to me their problem lies with whether you’d want to masturbate over them or not. 
Had it not been for the protests and anger from patriot leavers and MP's, by now May would have arranged a brexit where we paid the EU twice what we paid before, had no voice and provided the military for Europe and caught their fish from our fishing grounds free of charge. 
So what's the point of this thread?We are a nation of blessed cheesemakers and the history of British cheese is MORE INTERESTING AND COMPLEX than you think.And yeah, to point out that anyone who thinks cheese ISN'T relevant to Brexit needs to think very Caerphilly about that. 
To resounding applause .... TM says she may have unwittingly misled the House:  there is of course another option to voting for her deal, or risking no deal - it´s to have no Brexit at all!    #RevokeRemainRebuild 
That's your UK Govt getting on with the day job right there...Scottish Cabinet will be meeting tmrw & no surprises but Brexit is a recurring item! Later in the day we will be having a further ScotGovt resilience meeting discussing our no-deal contingency planning.  
Sign the petition to say that you won't stand for a Brexit which opens up our NHS to privatisation As part of the EU, we have seen off threat of privatisation before. But alone, we would be more vulnerable.SIGN HERE 
Brexit: Corbyn accuses May of running down clock to 'blackmail' MPs - Politics live  
#Brexit is a Russian plot to turn us into the least competitive advanced economy on the planet. And it's working better than they could have ever imagined. 
The vote for Brexit was supposed to turn London's financial centre into a wasteland...  
"Who wouldn’t want to live in Amsterdam for a few years?” The UK's loss is Holland's gain as the Dutch welcome companies fleeing Brexit London. ⁦@petersgoodman⁩ 
Kate Hoey: “We didn’t vote for a deal.  We voted to leave.”This seems like an inadvertent argument for a second referendum on the terms of Brexit.   
If #Labour enables #Brexit on terms set out by Jeremy, it would mean #LabourAusterity.We would have to drop our pledge to cut tuition fees and keep all the Tory welfare cuts.Write to @johnmcdonnellMP to tell him you want a #PeoplesVote instead  
Labour leader Jeremy Corbyn says Theresa May is trying to "deliberately run down the clock and play chicken with people's livelihoods".But the Prime Minister says that if MPs vote against her Brexit deal, "the risk of no deal increases".  
Cabinet today discussed fly-tipping - but not A WORD about Brexit. This is a country without a government - so parliament must take over. 
The majority of the population are certainly now in favour of remaining in the EU. Frankly, it is the job of our elected representatives, Lords and so on to stop a no-deal Brexit. You are not paid to support or condone any party that would inflict grave harm on the people. 
 We need to hold our nerve and deliver Brexit on time. Retweet if you agree.  
Concerning. What else is the PM planning on rushing through the Commons as #emergency legislation? #Brexit is being used to drive a coach & horses through what passes for the British Constitution. #Scotland beware #indyref2 
We've been first for all your Brexit news. Now relive every aspect of Britain's runaway success in our dedicated Brexit section here: 
We’d still vote Brexit, say people who pay little or no attention to the news 
MPs erupt in fury as 'delusional' Theresa May blames Brexit crisis on them 
The prime minister is "lost in a #Brexit fantasy" - SNP's @IanBlackfordMP critical of Theresa May's handling of negotiationsLive updates:  
Confirmation to me that May plans her meaningful vote on Brexit in March just days before exit day. 
WATCH!Wonderful reception from all sides of the house for @lucianaberger as she rises to speak during today’s Brexit debate. @JewishChron @JewishNewsUK @GuidoFawkes @HarryYorke1 
Well, it's nice that Miller is being honest that she hates Corbyn more than Brexit.  
"Love Jez, h8 Brexit’: @ShakiraSweet1, the @nusuk President and FFS supporter, wrote: “You have let down the mandem” ... said she felt disappointed by Corbyn, whom she had supported in successive Labour leadership campaigns.#FFS#PeoplesVote 
At last some honesty.Gina Miller: I was more worried about Corbyn than Brexit  
So wherever you stand on Brexit, is it fair that Northern Ireland, Scotland and Gibraltar are being dragged out of the EU against their will?Because I don’t think it is. 
I rather think, if we ever have another referendum on anything in the future that the benchmark for passing shouldn’t just be a majority of votes, it should also be that a majority of our nation states vote for it. By my count 3 out of 5 territories voted to Remain. 
“Do you approve or disapprove of the way in which the Government is handling the Brexit negotiations?”Approve: 20%Disapprove: 80%Record low for % approval. via @ORB_Int, 01 - 03 Feb 
If you know there are 100s of 1000s of people in the UK who are resorting to food banks, and how desperately they need things to get better, but you're willing to let Brexit make the country poorer...Do us a favour and stop pretending you care about the people of this country. 
It's a tough call...But I'm still voting LEAVE!!#brexit  
Mark Carney explains why Brexit could be an "acid test" for how the world economy might fare under the new rules of trade  
it's quite astonishing how exercised tory MPs get when someone uses what is called 'unparliamentary language'  Pity they don't get so worked up about their own failings in Universal Credit, cuts to the disabled, disastrous husbandry of the economy & Brexit . #brexitstatement 
Ken Clarke holding the govt to account, something that useless Jeremy Corbyn fails to do.Labour's failure to oppose Brexit is the scandal of my lifetime. I will never forgive Labour & Jeremy Corbyn as long as I live.  
The level of unpreparedness for  #NoDealBrexit in the UK is astounding. UK will lose access to other markets, lose legal certainty and lose negotiating heft.  #Brexit should be treated as a crime against  #FreeTrade! 
.@theresa_may tells @YvetteCooperMP that delaying Brexit “is not something which solves the problem”. But leaving the EU on 29 March would, by the prime minister’s own admission, crystallise the problem 
"PM secretly sabotaged an offer made by the EU of a free trade deal exit from EU cos all they ever really wanted was Brexit In Name OnlyOf the many things I’ve heard about the Establishment’s outrageous scheming to scupper Brexit this is the most damning" 
Brexit bollocks from today's Times. Government mental health advisers fear a rise in suicides associated with Brexit. An increase in prescriptions for antidepressants since the referendum in 2016 is already being linked to what some doctors are calling Brexit Anxiety Disorder. 
WATCH AGAIN: Commotion in the Commons as SNP Westminster leader @IanBlackfordMP shouts 'not true' and then calls the PM a 'liar'.He later withdraws his comment at the request of Speaker Bercow.#Brexit  
The 2016 referendum excluded 3 of the most affected groups: 16-17 years, EU27 nationals & Britons abroad for 15+ years, even while giving Commonwealth nationals the vote. The Leave victory was the result of a deeply unjust politically motivated electoral franchise.#Brexit #FBPE 
There is no permutation of Brexit that will keep the U.K. intact.The Union is on borrowed time an Independent Scotland and a United Ireland are imminent .The usual House Jocks may deny and greet, yet all the evidence confirms this will happen 
There is no mandate for a People's Vote in ScotlandThere is a mandate for an Independence ReferendumThat's it#UseTheMandate 
The useless Vince Cable trying to be funny, suggesting Theresa May’s meeting with Len McCluskey on Brexit was all about “Trotsky”..The millions of union members’ jobs at risk, which Unite is fighting to protect, is of little concern to the Lib Dem Leader  
UKIP Leader @GerardBattenMEP warns Theresa May - “Tories will be wiped off the European electoral map if they fail to deliver Brexit.”IN FULL:  
Thing is if Theresa May isn't a liar she has to be a fool when it comes to her belief that her Brexit plan will improve the economy. 
Theresa May’s Brexit strategy:2016-2019.  
SNP is using Hansard to formally record repeated urgent objections to the Westminster Tory English Government ignoring Scotland about Brexit etc.  
They’ve done it again, Sky News cutting away as Ian Blackford lays into Theresa May and her Brexit procrastination... 
SNP's @IanBlackfordMP on furious form:'The Prime Minister's deal is a fraud'.#Brexit 
UK, Kantar poll:"If a new referendum was held on the UK's membership of the European Union, how would you vote in this referendum?"Remain: 55% (+3)Leave: 45% (-3)Field Work: 7-11 Feburary 2019Sample Size: 1,145#Brexit #BrexitVote 
Clear May has made no progress on Brexit - that’s why she’s postponed the vote again. The most irresponsible Government in history. 
@DavidCleevely is a giant of Cambridge entrepreneurship, creating many highly skilled jobs over ~25 years. This govt’s bungling of Brexit driving him to move those businesses & jobs overseas is a damning indictment of them & the liars who promised a Brexit that was undeliverable. 
Theresa May is still selling her brexit plan which is the equivalent to arguing that the Titanic should have fewer life boats than passengers and must ram the iceberg. #brexit 
“I wanted to have this sorted before Christmas” says @theresa_may. This Brexit mess, running down the clock, isn’t her fault, she says. What do you reckon? 
Irish PM Leo Varadkar: I am the European Union. Remind you of any one else? Join the fastest growing Brexit movement @  
"Its not me who's trying to run down the clock.." says the PM who pulled the Brexit vote before Xmas...only to see it defeated 4wks later 
Outrageous - "I wanted to have this sorted before Christmas", says Theresa May, who postponed the vote on her Brexit deal until 3 weeks after Christmas 
We don't have to take her shabby deal. We also have an absolute right to cancel Brexit. Please tell your MP that's what you want  
Jeremy Corbyn: Theresa May told MPs to "hold their nerve" on #Brexit, urges her to tell that to "thousands... worried about their job security and the future of their communities"Live updates:  
‘Ripping up rights is what Brexit is all about’ - @jeremycorbyn on the Tories. Which is why @UKLabour should not facilitate it. It is a project of the right for the right by the right. Her statement was a disgrace 
Remaining in a customs union would be the worst of all worlds. It would surrender any prospect Britain has of having an independent trade policy, one of the most important opportunities of Brexit. Our tariffs would be set by bullying Brussels – that's not leaving the EU! 
6 weeks left on #Brexit clock and all the PM has to offer is another meaningless vote in 2 weeks.This isn’t a strategy – it’s definition of insanity: doing the same thing over & over again and expecting a different result.Only way to resolve this crisis is with a #PeoplesVote 
Brexiteers want us to give up on a #PeoplesVote just as unionists want us to give up on #indyref2. There is a mandate in #Scotland for both & @theSNP will not give in to pessimists & naysayers. There’s still all to play for #Brexit  
At today's Brexit Immigration Bill Committee meeting, I challenged Lord Green of @MigrationWatch on the dog-whistle style comments he made about EU workers, desperate refugees, & victims of trafficking. This language has no place in a modern, inclusive society. #ImmigrationBill 
I was more worried about #Corbyn than #Brexit when I first brought my court case.  I was naive in thinking the Government / MPs would be competent in resolving #Brexit…@PortfAdviser@LeadNotLeaveUK 
If you missed the PM’s statement on #Brexit just now, I can provide a summary - ‘Nothing has changed’ 
Theresa May Brexit statement“hold your nerve”. She’s got some nerve. Playing politics with jobs & economy. 
Astonishingly complacent #brexit statement from May. Never has the enormity of what needs to be done been combined with a government so incapable of doing it. 
Prime Minister Theresa May says she will make a statement to Parliament on 26 February if a deal is not brought back to MPs before then and says "we need to hold our nerve" in a crucial stage of Brexit talks 
As expected, @theresa_may sets as 27 February the definitive date for MPs to endeavour to bind her Brexit hands and force her to take a no-deal Brexit off the table 
.@theresa_may rejects core request from @jeremycorbyn for Brexit entente, namely membership of Customs Union. So that would seem to kill those cross-party Brexit talks before they start 
“The UK has a proud record of leading the way on workers’ right” says @theresa_may - in trying to reassure that protections for employees would not be weakened after Brexit. Much harrumphing on opposition benches 
The Prime Minister is currently telling MPs that she continues to seek changes to her Brexit deal. Let's remember what she herself said about that a couple of months ago...#RunningDownTheClock 
#TeamJunckerEU today in #Strasbourg: Implementation of European #Defence Industrial Development Programme; a #Brexit contingency measure on railway safety and connectivity; a European Citizens' Initiative.  
I have a feeling brexit and it’s chaos is a consequence of years of lies from MPs, and it’s lack of care for the north of England, I imagine the whole world is looking at the uk and thinking, you are bang in trouble now 
jeremy corbyn has spent his life fighting wars, occupations, privatisations, and injustices that many of his labour contemporaries supported and i’m meant to stop supporting him because he ... wants to respect the result of a referendum? come off it 
Live: Theresa May makes a statement updating lawmakers on her progress in seeking changes to her #Brexit deal  
Theresa May updates MPs on her Brexit plans as she tries to renegotiate her deal  
UK PM Theresa May updates parliament on #Brexit negotiations  
Lady in #Truro: "I voted Out. I think if I'd had more information at the time I would have voted In. Thinking about the next generation, which is what it's all about, it's better to be in."We celebrate people who are brave enough to admit they've changed their minds.#Brexit  
Ah yes, that was what was missing in the spiral- brexit will be a golden age- brexit will mean a slight speed bump- there will be adequate calories- army is standing by- evac plans for the queen are in place- at least there’ll be enough body bags#justcancelplease 
This must get the prize for the best anti-Brexit story so far this week - and its only Tuesday.  We really should have an awards ceremony after the 29th to recognise the ingenuity & dedication displayed by the MSM - but competition will be keen.  
Good practice for when you meet all the people who will be pushed further into poverty when Brexit is ‘delivered’.  
No Brexit deal brings closure. Not May’s deal, not Corbyn’s plan.They rely on the Political Declaration setting out our future relationship with the EU. Nothing in it is legally binding.Politicians will spend years more arguing over #Brexit. We need a  #PeoplesVotes. 
WATCH LIVE: PM @Theresa_May updates the @HouseofCommons on Brexit  
This is why MPs must act to prevent no-deal Brexit on 29th March. If we don’t legislate to compel the PM to seek a short extension to Article 50, there is no guarantee that she will do it of her own accord.  
It must be obvious to any MP with an IQ above that of a pigeon's (and I have to say the the Brexit process has exposed the failings of many in that regard) that TM will get nothing more from the EU and is simply running the clock down. It's time to take a stand against her now. 
So, according to Andrea Leadsom, Theresa May just needs a "bit more time". The EU Ref 2016 was 32 months ago. She has had plenty of time to come up with a deal. Let's face it, THERE IS NO SUCH THING AS A GOOD BREXIT. There is only one way out of this mess. #RevokeArticle50 
One thing May has successfully achieved. Everyone was saying idea she'd back a No Deal Brexit was an empty bluff. Now everyone is running around saying she will back No Deal after all, and it is now the likeliest outcome. Important for her in negotiations with EU and Ireland. 
Why don’t they ever have Brexit supporters on chat shows?Why is it always a Remainer or a liberal who is clearly mentally ill?Why is every family in an advert a Black man and a White woman with mixed race kids?Why are white people always labelled ‘Far Right’ or ‘Racist’ ? 
Today begins the show trial of Catalan pro-independence leaders, with jail sentences of up to 25 years sought for supporting a referendum and holding demonstrations. A sham.  
Most blame for scaring people with prospect of no-deal Brexit lies with Labour MPs, who failed to vote for the deal they say they want 
 There ain't no Brexit like a No Deal Brexit. 
Chief Medical Officer Admits We May Not Be Able To Get Medicine After No-Deal BrexitIf people die, manslaughter prosecutions should follow. Why can companies be prosecuted, but not governments?  
The absolute state of this. Brexit has opened up a Pandora’s Box of hatred and division. 
Theresa May is the biggest risk-taker of British political history. If her strategy doesn't work (pushing m/vote to the last moment) then we have a no-deal Brexit, something (for much of her premiership) she privately believed to be a national catastrophe. It's breathtaking. 
Jeremy Corbyn targeted by anti-Brexit billboard over lack of leadership on Brexit  
This, by the way, is not a pop at folks just reminder that Groupthink must always be challenged. Rise of SNP, Ukip, Corbyn, Brexit and then 2017 GE outcome outflanked vast majority of observers and analysts, myself included. 
Theresa May's track record shows her to be a mendacious xenophobic authoritarian nationalist. There is every reason to believe she wants a no-deal #Brexit. 
Also: a warning today from the food and drinks industry that upwards of a quarter of food businesses face extinction within six weeks of a no deal Brexit. They say that's not project fear -- it's a very real and catastrophic outcome if the UK leaves the EU without a deal. 
17k signatures in less than 24 hours. I'd love it to hit 100k before the government even has time to cut & paste its standard response. Petition: Revoke Art.50 if there is no Brexit plan by the 25 of February  
I definitely would vote for the deselection of likes of Soubry, Wollaston, Grieve - each have consistently sought to overturn the referendum result  
FBPE & People's Vote: 'I despise Corbyn...he is enabling a Tory Brexit which will inflict misery...!!''To spite him, I am going to never vote Labour again...and enable a Tory government which will inflict misery...!!'Erm...? 
@ByDonkeys poster on side of Eagles Meadow Wrexham #Brexit #Farage @leaderlive @RoryWxmLeader 
the whole internet loves naked brexit lady, the naked lady who hates brexit! *5 seconds later* We regret to inform you the naked lady is a rabidly anti-welfare free-market right-winger 
With ⁦@sergimarcen⁩ UK representative of Catalonia & the appg. Discussed imprisoned Catalonian politicians who want the right to hold a referendum on regaining their sovereignty.  
We’re being led into Brexit by expensively educated patrician ideologues on BOTH sides:  
 First images of the 12 Catalan pro-independence officials in the dock accused of rebellion and misuse of funds for organizing a referendum #CatalanTrial  
Tory MP @DKShrewsbury: The British people want to leave on March 29th. Don't let remainer MPs overturn Brexit, join us today:  
Brexit is 45 days away. #brexit 
The Tories and Gavin Williamson say ‘Brexit will open up military opportunities for the UK’.They failed to mention that the Tories have:Cut the Army by 25%Cut the RAF by 25%Cut Defence spending by £9bn 
Alarming warnings about Brexit Settled Status scheme coming from policy experts giving evidence to Home Affairs committee.MPs are being told:1. EU citizens being targeted by fraudsters on Facebook attempting to charge £1000s to apply for settled status though it's free. 
“There simply is no Brexit that doesn't limit the life opportunities of the young - and this billboard shows Mr Corbyn that young people's support is not unconditional”. READ #FFS supporter (& @ByDonkeys fan) @kiramillana on our stunt today #peoplesvote 
Ahead of @theresa_may's #Brexit statement to @HouseofCommons today, latest #KantarPublic UK voting intention data shows: if a new referendum was held on the UK's membership of #EU 35% of public say that they would vote Leave, 43% say they would vote Remain  
Donald MacAskill, Chief Exec, Scottish Care, tells @CommonsScotAffs UK post-Brexit immigration plans will have profound effect.“We find the £30,000 salary setting absolutely bizarre, nobody in social care falls into that category. Average social care salary in Scot is £18,000" 
This is how people see the British people now. Brexit is unforgivable.  
This would be enormously regrettable. @NickBoles has made creative contributions to Conservative policy thinking over many years. He may not quite want the #Brexit I want but he has accepted the referendum result.  
Open and thoughtful discussions with @JY_LeDrian about Brexit, Iran & transatlantic partnership. Both sides want a Brexit deal that supports ongoing friendship between UK/EU/France so patience and goodwill on backstop now the critical ingredient  
Straw poll of 10 Westminster journalists this morning: average chance of no-deal Brexit 25% 
I wrote a piece for the @TrademarkBF and @RosaluxEuropa  blog about Brexit, internationalism and the Left - the nation state hasn’t gone away, and the left should never conflate the truncated cosmopolitanism of the EU with socialist internationalism:  
Looking forward to John's response to my letter.A Labour #Brexit will mean #LabourAusterity.We can't afford a £24bn hit to our economy. It's time for our party to back a #PeoplesVote and campaign to #Remain in the EU. 
We hear from @DrDMacaskill: In the last year we have seen a drop of over 90% in nursing intake into the UK and Scotland as a result of uncertainty over #Brexit. The Government's Immigration White Paper is likely to make this even worse.#ImmigrationScotland 
My train is stuck and awaiting rescue. I’m telling you now the Blitz spirit will ONE HUNDRED PERCENT NOT GET US THROUGH BREXIT. 
On the Seaborne Freight Brexit ferry fiasco, Chris Grayling told parliament "we haven’t spent any money on this contract" - he is casually omitting the £800k spent on consultants assessing the bid. Is #Failing Grayling in contempt of Parliament? Yes - will he go? no #ToryShambles 
So I took the chance on the train Paris today to thank @MichelBarnier for all of his efforts as the EU's chief #Brexit negotiator. Given my strong feelings on the topic, I felt I couldn't pass up the opportunity. He was very gracious – we talked for about three minutes. 1/ 
45 days left until exit day and the Cabinet this morning discussed fly-tipping but not #Brexit. Words fail me.  
Brexit has cost the average British household £1500. Who dreamed up this brilliant idea? Never was so much owed to so many by so few.  
OK i know it's quite dry but here's a top US meat lobbyist telling the Trump admin what the industry wants from a Brexit trade deal (end EU rules on hormones, chlorine, antibiotics etc)  
The Prime Minister will update Parliament on the status of Brexit talks today.But has time already run out for her fantasy negotiations?There's only one solution: extend Article 50 and give us a #PeoplesVote. 
Ultra Remain MP's are going crazy about the prospect of a No Deal Brexit. Are they planning on voting for the Withdrawal Agreement which will avoid this? No of course not, they don't care about the consequences of No Deal, they only care about their ideological EU fantasy. 
Thank you to Janet and James Sheerin of @NE4EU for coming all the way down to London to join us at #Sodem to protest against Brexit.#WeAreSodem from the North East.Westminster bubble. What Westminster bubble?#RevokeArticle50 #StopBrexit @RemainingKind 
Will be joining @Jo_Coburn and the team and making my debut on #PoliticsLive today at 12.15 @BBCTwo join us.#brexit #debate #politics 
The government is being sued for its decision to charter firms to run extra ferries, including one with no ships, in the event of a no-deal Brexit. 
Some politicians talk about the country being divided over Brexit, and yet most of the public are getting increasingly sick apnd tired of the EU and are uniting behind the idea of a #NoDealBrexit. Many people just want to get on with it and leave. #StandUp4Brexit 
John Oliver shared his thoughts on Brexit and we honestly don't know whether to laugh or cry  
If Brexit goes through this is what all of you will eat forever  
When we crash out of the EU.It is not the fault of the EUIt is not the fault of votersIt is entirely the fault of the Tories, the opposition and the media.#FBPE #peoplesvote #Brexit 
"The choice is clear: do we stand up for to an open, ambitious international future which Brexit will deliver?  Or do we choose to stand back and allow anti-democrats to overturn the 2016 referendum and keep us shackled to a failing political project?"  
In a report out today, @Remain_Labour says Corbyn's Brexit proposals to May would almost certainly result in £24 billion a year in lost income for any Government he runs - and could force it to impose “Labour Austerity”. 
Apparently a No-Deal Brexit is simultaneously "what everyone who voted Leave really wanted" and "the stupid EU's fault". 
The always insightful @bbaschuk has written on the potential horrors of a No-Deal Brexit.He even quoted a former negotiator who is rumoured to be as handsome as he is charming and humble.  via @bpolitics 
New:Cabinet has broken up and there was no discussion about Brexit AT ALLOne minister said it was 'utterly surreal', one of shortest meetings they can rememberThere were discussions on fly-tipping & child poverty targets (figures don't look good in March)But that was it. 
ATTENTION: LABOUR MEMBERS AND VOTERSLabour’s Brexit costs £24 billionWrite to John McDonnell and ask him to prevent #LabourAusterity - see link at end of thread 
How the economic cost of Brexit is being hidden from Leave voters  
We must 'hold our nerve' on Brexit, May to tell MPsNot so easy to do with the news that the NHS are stockpiling body bags  
This cannot be repreated enough. Brexit is not motivated by financial/economic reasons, but rather self-determination & democracy.This is the UK doing what Ireland did a century ago, when it was perceived as economic madness to leave the UK. Sometimes money isn't everything.  
Tory Minister hints PM will gamble UK’s future in all-or-nothing vote just 8 DAYS before Brexit date  
Why is it that people can't see Farage for what he really is, a crook and a conman. His new Brexit party is another scam.  
@Keir_Starmer It is probably the largest UK political scandal OF ALL TIME. Mrs May has used a parliamentary "majority" bought with a £ 1 billion bribe to effectively swindle the UK out of £ 100 Billion plus , making almost all 66 million UK citizens much poorer. Where is Labour ? 
So of course I'm interviewing naked Brexit protester Dr. Victoria Bateman later today. What do you want me to ask her?  
There is something seriously wrong with local government when we reach 1.8 million complaints over bin collections. Much is driven by EU rules & targets we can review post Brexit  
Soft Brexit not PM’s hard Brexit is what’s best.  She is making the choice her deal or no deal.  That is not the choice.  Commons will support soft Brexit.  But it has to be willing to force that view on a PM willing to take no deal to avoid Tory splits. 
Hey @michaelgove, have you had a moment to read the latest @IPPR report on the state of environmental breakdown? We’d love to come and talk to you about it. I know Brexit’s taking up a lot of time but #ThisIsACrisis 
'Un big mess' – how the rest of Europe views Brexit  
The latest of these Brexit statements put on billboards in the form of tweets is ....  
Ha! Gotta laugh at ppl saying this is ‘vandalism’. We bought the billboard, asked the billboard company if we could draw on it, got a ladder, then Labour members drew on it. Wanna see vandalism? Wait til you see what Brexit will do to workers rights and environmental protections.  
“The bit about the a second referendum got acccidently left off the letter to Mrs May”?!!!! For the life of me I don’t understand why Kier Starmer doesn’t resign.  Corbyn and Milne take the piss out of him virtually every single day. 
Mr @DavidJonesMP, 2 of your constituents from @Wrexhamforeu are going to London on Thurs 14 Feb to protest against your Brexit with Steve Bray.Brexit would ruin farming & Airbus so why are doing it?#WeAreSodem from NWales @Wrexhamforeu @WelshConserv#WeAreSodem @DenbighshireFP 
Labour's current #Brexit plan would cost £24 billion per year.  We have crunched the numbers and written an open letter to @johnmcdonnellMP today. We call on John to reject a plan that would lead to #LabourAusterity. We must back a #PeoplesVote instead. Thread 
I'm not refusing to vote Labour for my own benefit. I'm refusing to vote Labour because they're enabling a Tory Brexit that's going to disproportionately hurt poor, ill and disabled people.  
The letter, penned by the grassroots @Remain_Labour group, warns McDonnell that Labour's Brexit plan would result in the UK losing £24 billion a year over a decade, citing @KingsCollegeLon @LSEnews analysis"The outcome will be Labour austerity"  
Brexit WARNING: May's deal leaves UK with 'no control' over defence says ex-Royal Marine. Join the fastest growing Brexit movement @  
Philip Hammond sought to mislead MPs and the public into believing there was a 'deal dividend' from Brexit for the economy and the government was working towards balancing its books, according to a highly critical report from a cross-party group of MPs  
A trial on democracy begins today. 12 elected politicians and civil society leaders are in a Spanish courtroom for defending the voting rights of the people. The future of the people of #Catalonia should of course be decided through a democratic referendum – not by a few judges 
So @theresa_may has quietly called on the ‘influence’ of former @EUCouncil President Herman Van Rompuy to help break the #Brexit deadlock... A good time then to look what he said about #Brexit not all that long ago - his full article for @UKandEU here  
People believe this country will be welathier POST Brexit, Steve. You are living in June 22nd 2016.Then we voted to LEAVE and all your arguments turned to dust.Move on.  
And May still refuses a full independent investigation into Brexit - the biggest crisis to his us since 1939  
I said no, then the Brexit shambles was dropped on us! I've changed my mind! I want out! Also @ScotTories I note this petition has been bouncing round for months, how many signature does it have? you've been very quiet about that? 
I debated Brexit (sort of) on @GMB with @vnbatemanI resisted the temptation to strip off (it was only 7:30am) and tried to stay focused Still wondering if anyone, who wasn't already a hardcore remainer, sees a stunt like this, changes their mind, & thinks "Yes - Remain" pic.twitter.com/N4KrjPZNMI 
He gets £6,000 a month from a US fund speciallising in hedging gold against currency crashes. No surprise then that Mr K is rooting for a hard Brexit. 
Exclusive: John McDonnell today warned by Labour members nationwide that a Brexit based on Corbyn's 5 tests would torpedo his manifestoThe economic impact would force Labour to "ditch a wide range of anti-austerity policies," the letter to McDonnell says  
1. Pls understand this 1 simple FACT...Any party or politician not seeking a way to #RevokeA50 Stop #Brexit & #Remain in Control in the EU + our Best Ever Deal is backing this #BrexitShambles.#Remain may fail but trust me we're here to stay & you will not be forgiven next GE. 
Is anyone out there listening? Brexit uncertainty is sapping UK economic growth and hurting real people. Here’s @ChrisGiles_  explainer and the data  via @financialtimes 
If this is so I hope the Liberal Democrat’s campaign for immediate rejoining of the EU without a referendum and hopefully they can get an assurance that we can join on exactly same terms we have now. That should end Tories and Corbyn’s Labour.  
I have voted Conservative for the last 50 years, but if MPs try to scupper our Independence Day on March 29th, it will be UKIP or Farage's Brexit Party in future 
This is not an image from Saddam Hussein’s Iraq. Or Stalin’s Soviet Union. But it is a show trial. And one in today’s European Union. Spain puts its (already imprisoned) citizens on trial for organising a free vote; a referendum on Catalan independence.  
This is how @guyverhofstadt feels #brexit is progressing...   #nowords #belgianshrug 
the arbitration system for the UK’s post-Brexit permanent relationship with the EU. It says that in practice Switzerland and the UK would remain subjugated to the jurisdiction of the European Court of Justice, despite @theresa_may’s claims to the contrary. I attach extracts 
An important read about the threat Brexit imposes on the Highlands. Just been in one of the remotest parts on the North West this weekend..... 1/2  
There's no such thing as long-term No Deal Brexit.Even if you don't believe the economic warnings, the MPs do. So if No Deal happened, having already done 'Brexit', they would sign whatever sovereignty-trashing deal the EU (and/or the US) offered us, out of desperation, ASAP. 
Disgusting if true.The PM and those around her planning to drive us over the precipice will be held responsible for the economic cataclysm which will ensue. And @jeremycorbyn won't escape blame for his part in this #Brexit act of self-harm  
Leaving on WTO terms MUST be the fallback position if the UK doesn't get a better deal from the EU. Not delaying Brexit, not staying in, and not pushing the bad deal through regardless. 
What's the difference between Fyre festival and Brexit?  
‘Purging the Tories of Brexit rebels would end up poisoning the party.’Read my latest @Telegraph article 
The Brexit Party led by true Brexiteers and Leavers can be trusted to deliver.#TheBrexitParty0 
We voted to Leave the EU and the Government have said that will happen 29th March. That is the reality of the situation we face and you can embrace it or keep your eyes closed. From an economic point of view, a WTO based Brexit suits me best.  
With 40 something days to go, one thing that will guarantee brexit is apathy. Get down to @SODEMAction @snb19692 and support. 
This is the plan. Delay delay and delay. They will use the mounting sense of panic, political and economic, to push through the #WithdrawalAgreement - and use the threat of an imminent WTO exit to win enough Labour votes. May is strangling Brexit by the day.  
Labour are losing ground to the worst government in living memory and Remain has an eight-point lead in a second referendum. If only there was some kind of sign indicating what Corbyn should do next. pic.twitter.com/Q6dTAATZjI 
Please RT my tweet if you are not 'demanding' a 2nd referendum!  
Fed up with Brexit? Equine flu? Winter? Me too. To brighten the morning, here’s George with the first of the daffodils.  
UKIP. BREXIT Party. For Britain. What do those three things really tell us? The staggering inability of those on our bench to work as a team and play the ball not the man. Too many ego-driven star strikers. Too few defenders. And I don’t even like football. #Brexit 
Labour list survey..over 7000 respondents. The majority did not want a toxic 2nd referendum 
GDP contracted 0.4% in December with business investment dropping 3.7%. This is bad news for British jobs. A blindfold #Brexit will only make it worse, with uncertainty for years to come. The #OnlyWayForward now is a #PeoplesVote 
Daily Briefing- Twelve Catalan secessionist leaders go on trial in Spain's Supreme Court- UK PM Theresa May to tell MPs to "hold their nerve" on Brexit- Italian PM Conte to debate the future of the European Union at the European Parliament  
Our lives are on the edge of being destroyed and MPs are worried about Valentine's Day, please tell me this is not serious. The earlier vote would be welcome given the time to Brexit day but how on earth does Valentine's day come into any discussion at the moment?  
There is growing evidence Tories are opening a genuine lead over Labour, even though a minority think Brexit is going well (this from Kantar). And it is ⁦@jeremycorbyn⁩ who says “bring on a general election”. Careful what you wish for, in words of one of his colleagues 
Twelve Catalan politicians go on trial today for their role in Catalonia’s independence #Referendum. But, what is happening in the Spanish State? Why are pacific leaders put in trial after a more than a year in jail?Thread: 10 tweets to understand what's happening  
So after failing Grayling assures us no money was spent on the doomed Seaborne ferry contract it turns out he spent £800,000 assessing them! Corrupt, lying cheats these Tories!Grayling urged to quit as spending on Brexit ferry deal consultants revealed  
Unbowed & Unbroken 1st court picture of the Catalan elected politicians who rightly organised a peaceful & democratic referendum for independence. They now face a show trial on trumped-up charges #Resistance 
"Have the UK become part of the Republic Of Ireland to avoid a hard Brexit."  
Young Labour members are filling in the gaps, writing what they want the party’s Brexit policy to be. Party democracy in action and all that   
"It’s Friday, March 22, a week from Brexit, and Britain is hurtling toward the cliff edge. What does she do?" A study of a prime minister torn between duty to country and union — and a party which is more like family. My attempt to peer inside May's mind  
Andrea Leadsom suggests that the next meaningful Brexit vote will be March 21st - the week before Brexit! Is no-deal a fait accompli? One of the reasons for Brexit was the false notion of regaining parliamentary sovereignty. Parliament is sovereign,but the Tories are ignoring it!  
This morning. Immigration and Social Security Co-ordination (EU Withdrawal) Bill. In which we will debate at length whether a person's worth is determined by what they earn. #Brexit 
So many unanswered questions still about Cambridge Analytica, Trump & Brexit. We've barely scratched the surface. This @RonanFarrow piece in @NewYorker delves into another part of Mueller's investigation - the murky world of Israeli intel firms...a whole other piece of the puzzle 
New post: The economic cost of the Brexit decision that Leaver voters do not get to see  Would Leaver households really not change their mind if asked for nearly £2,000 as their annual contribution to Brexit? The evidence suggests many would. . 
An elected government judged for allowing citizens to vote in a referendum. Judged for allowing the right to self-determination.Judged for an act of democracy.Judged for their ideology.This is a political trial. Self-determination IS NOT A CRIME.#ShamTrial #ShowTrial 
"This is really really scary... one in four food exporters could go out of business within six weeks"Ian Wright, CEO of @Foodanddrinkfed, says a no deal Brexit is "the biggest threat businesses have faced since 1939" #r4today |  | @dominicoc 
At least the sweet release from the Brexit hell won’t impact the NHS too badly as they’ll have a bag for me  
Is Legatum being financed by money from Russia? Probably.Plus..."Legatum had forged close links with Michael Gove and Boris Johnson and were constantly in the news as their frequent policy meetings with the government." via @brexit_sham 
Bang on!! #brexit #shame #ourMPsareCrooksandIdiots 
Naked anti-Brexit campaigner challenges Rees-Mogg on live TV  
This is key point in an excellent thread. PM hopelessly weak but her strategy of forcing a choice between her deal & no deal will work unless cross-party soft Brexit forces can combine to force a change. So far, as I predicted in December, they aren’t: pull of party too strong  
Patsy is checking on all her friends pre #Brexit #BREXITSHAMBLES 
VIDEO#Spanish State & #Supremo Court have started their 9 #politicalprisoners' #trial#Catalonia's #1oct #Referendum honoured an ELECTORAL MANDATE:All of the 9 Catalan leaders say:"We are not defending ourselves""We accuse the #SpanishState" #JoAcusovia @ElJudici 
All of this because of a referendum that was won illegally.   
There is no #Brexit deal that will satisfy everyone. There is probably no #Brexit deal that will satisfy anyone. Parliament won't pass anything, unless they are forced to in order to avoid crashing out of the EU without a deal. There is only one solution. #RevokeArticle50 
If retired UK citizens cannot afford to live in Spain, how on earth would they be able to afford to live in the UK now, let alone if Brexit goes ahead?  
"Today 12 Catalan leaders go on trial, facing the medieval-sounding charges of rebellion & sedition. Their crime: organising a democratic referendum on Catalan independence" - @HywelPlaidCymru 
In this time of uncertainty, many people are keeping a Fife tardis on standby.#Brexit #TimeTravel 
Resistance unbroken - first pictures of the Catalan politicians who organised a peaceful referendum for independence, and now face a show trial on charges that could leave them in jail for decades. Political prisoners in the European Union.  
An award-winning NHS employee says: 'It seems to me Brexit will be the last nail in the coffin of the NHS.'  
The brexit dividend is a myth.  via @CityAM 
The negative effects of Brexit are stamped all over the latest UK economic data. It's clear now: economic growth is slowing  
That Brexit kid who got fined £20k for doing dodgy shit during the election is now doing video lectures on antisemitism which is a pretty perfect demonstration of just how thoroughly every cheap grifter is jumping on that bandwagon.  
Bridgen: Farage’s New Party a ‘Threat’ to Tories if Brexit Delayed  
I look with pride and respect on the anti-Brexit activists who take to the streets all over the country every week, peacefully and rationally putting the case for saving our country. What do Brexiters think of their activists, exemplified below?  
Lobbying for a Brexit crash-out that would be catastrophic for everyone except disaster capitalists while refusing to reveal whether they’re bankrolled by disaster capitalists. They’ll be back in studios today, though - pipers who resolutely refuse to reveal who calls their tune.  
The government is stockpiling body bags ahead of a potential no-deal Brexit... Let that sink in...body bags. Did anyone vote for this Brexit? #BodyBags 
May wasting more time today with yet another “Brexit statement”. She’s stuck, she’s know it, we know it and the EU know it.It doesn’t have to be this way. Labour’s plan is backed by businesses, unions and the EU like it. If the PM won’t change her mind, change the PM #GENow 
EU #Brexit negotiating team published 100+ documents, held 500+ stakeholder meetings and responded to 10,000 messages from the public during the negotiations, says @EUombudsman. (Number of inquiries from me: probably about 22,347.)  
All we are saying is that  we will not voting on the 16th of February 2019!!!A call for self-determination and Referendum  is not a call for war!!! SIT AT HOME ON 16TH OF FEBRUARY FEBRUARY 2019!!!@Amaka_Ekwo @MosesAgbo8 @MaziNnamdiKanu @nlitvin 
Without freedom of movement working abroad will be for the highly skilled, and retiring abroad will be for the well off.Freedom of movement allowed working class people that opportunity and Brexit will remove it. Shame on Labour for not defending it. 
In 2016, hundreds of thousands of Muslims voted for Brexit. However, I doubt this embarrassing toxic feminist will do her anti-Brexit naked rant outside a mosque in Birmingham.  
For all those out there who think NoDeal is carry on as we are, this is it as others see it.  Even with the MayDeal we will be scrambling about till the transition time runs out in 20 months.Stop Brexit with a @peoplesvote_uk 
This week in politics:- Brexit means Bodybags- Jury-rigged warships- Company with no ferries has ferry contract terminated- Someone feels inadequate, so sending aircraft carrier to China- It doesn’t really matter if the pound takes a dive- There’s only 45 days till Brexit 
And yes, the vote was 52-48. But much of the Remain vote was people who disliked the EU but were worried about Brexit consequences. Those who actually embraced the EU were tiny in number. 
Hang on, I thought we were going to use warships as ferries during no-deal Brexit, is every British boat now going to be disguised as a different sort of boat  
What an utter shambles! This Government is a disgrace & Brexit is a national embarrassment. The way out is a #PeoplesVote 
IF Brexit is "the war" then we need politicians and parties who also want to win "the peace" - building a post-Brexit Britain that we are all proud of. The SDP has a clear vision for the future  - as laid out in our New Declaration at Join us 
I know things have been crazy these last two years and many of us have been obsessed with stopping this horrible brexit for the good of everyone.  But make sure you stop every now and then and make time for those you love because you never know what life will throw at you . 
If she doesn't deliver 100% full fat Brexit, there won't be a Tory Party for her to stand down from! 
... and remember ... these are the voters who Labour and Tories are chasing and are putting in place BREXIT. If this isn't the Britain you want ... and then we need to change it by getting rid of the Labour / Tory / UKIP alliance. 
The thing which still strikes me even now is how little reflection there has been on the EU side about why exactly their second largest and arguably most dynamic major economy chose the uncertainties of Brexit over continued membership. Wasn’t all about immigrants and buses. 
Buying a couple of RoRos, putting a drone charging socket on them & calling them aircraft carriers sounds like JUST the ticket for the new post Brexit Global Britain “Lethality” upgrade.  
This“there is a growing fear among some MPs that May is now indeed preparing to do “something crazy”, & allow the UK to crash out of the European Union without a Brexit agreement ..May has more than ever bought into the Smith-Lewis argument that party unity has to come first”  
#EOpress: Ombudsman commends EU record on #Brexit #transparency  
The range of Brexit outcomes is so vast that literally any theoretical electoral outcome is perfectly plausible, which is one reason among several not to pay too much attention to voting intention right now. 
U.S. Congresswoman Alexandria Ocasio-Cortez on Monday gave a recipe for a "Hard Brexit" cocktail, which consists of a "straight shot of bathtub gin, with no imported botanicals."  
You will NOT sacrifice this country’s future on the altar of Tory party unityDid you forget you LOST your majority and your mandate to peruse a pointless hard Brexit?Stop pretending you have supreme authority or the divine right to interpret the will of the peopleYou don’t 
It’s not a matter of Spain kicking Brit immigrants out. However a drop in the pound will affect pensioners,plus increased costs as they have to pay for their healthcare. It will drive people back to the UK.After Brexit new arrivals will need to earn £30,000 as EU match UK rules 
Brexit costs Britain almost £2 billion ($2.6 billion) in lost investment  
British people think they're too valuable for Spain to pass on a no-deal Brexit?If only they knew their basic services in healthcare strongly rely on Spanish inmigrants working there...  
This from a sobering piece by @johnharris1969 - rightly denouncing the cavalier disregard of Northern Ireland as being the greatest Brexit folly of all  
How is Chris ‘Failing’ Grayling still Transport Secretary after this memo from National Audit Office which repeatedly warned against giving a Brexit contract to a ferry company without any ships?  
May says MPs must hold their nerve on #Brexit.She has a nerve.This is nothing less than irresponsible, reckless gambling with the lives and livelihoods of millions of people. End this madness now.#RevokeA50 Or#FinalSay@theresa_may 
Large poll shows Lab/Con on 73% of the vote in early General Election.Both Lab/Con have betrayed the 17.4m over #Brexit so why are most of the 17.4m STILL voting Lab/Con?If you keep voting for them they will keep on betraying you.Vo...  
Y’know what I can’t stand? The hypocrisy of our chattering classes. This anti-Brexit ‘naked professor’ is entirely acceptable, yet Page 3 girls are ‘objectified’ and need to cover up. I can’t stand ‘feminism’ when it’s only for middle class women. 
Let's check in to see how brexit's going... Oh...  
This is an excellent analysis of Britain, Brexit and empire: ‘How did “national liberation” become a rallying call in the home of the largest empire the world has known?’  
After Brexit, we can and must redistribute wealth and power.My column in today's Scotsman: 
For all the people saying Brexit will be fine because Blitz spirit, a quick refresher on what Blitz spirit entailed.  
Eurosceptic parties could paralyse Brussels, report warns, with big gains expected at May election. Extend A50 and see 50 UK Brexit minded MEPs returned to Brussels.   
Brexit will push up wages for the poor, writes @Steven_Woolfe: "If anybody thinks the money poured into anti-Brexit lobby groups by people like Pimlico Plumbers' Charlie Mullins has nothing to do with keeping his wage bill down, they need to have their heads examined!"  
Difficult night at the Dog and Duck in Upper Poshington last night. Regulars had welcomed the landlords decisions to replace the pop quiz with a Brexit one. But they all struggled massively to answer the first question “what is your Brexit plan?”  
"Why A No-Deal Brexit Is Now Theresa May's Fallback Plan To Save Her Party – And Herself"What I don't understand about this is that if TM is aware her deal means the @Conservatives & her own destruction why's she even pursuing it? Senseless 
Andrea Leadsom on #r4today either delusional or disingenuous as she talks about May's deal having "all of the advantages...but none of the disadvantages" of being in a Customs Union.At this grave time the country needs honesty about Brexit - but all we get is more untruths. 
If a No Deal #Brexit happens on March 29, remember this: 46 days before, with chaos looming, Theresa May's weekly Cabinet meeting on Tuesday 12 February did not even have Brexit on its agenda. 
Brexit: Theresa May says MPs must hold their nerveRather than worry about ur Mp's u would be well advised to deliver the real brexit we voted for or all he'll will break loose  
Delingpole: The EU Offered Free Trade Brexit; Mrs May Sabotaged It.  via @BreitbartNews 
Boris Johnson REJECTS Corbyn's 'TOXIC' soft Brexit demand - 'It's called being in the EU!'  
BREXIT SHOCK: Ireland now fears EU could ABANDON Dublin to save Brussels from no deal  
#brexit: Should we:A Leave customs union & single market, but badly damage our economy B Stay in customs union & single market, but have to follow the rules without any longer having a say on themC Stay in EU, avoid economic damage and keep our say 
The E U Owe us......How much more do they owe us? Divorce is not one sided! Make them pay..........   EU investment bank 'will owe Britain money for 35 years after Brexit' | The Independent  
Mishal Hussain: Do you have a plan to enact 600 pieces of Brexit legislation?Andrea Leadsom: No. But I do have confidence. #r4today 
If you support Brexit or believe facts maybe just Project Fear, exactly NOW is the time to reconsider that choice. CEO of Food and Drink Federation just said: a no Deal “Brexit is the biggest threat businesses have faced since 1939, many are threatened with extinction". #R4Today 
Amazing how many Brexiteers will tell you the immediate option of Brexit on the 29th March would be "disaster" and "damaging for the economy"When Brexit comes close to reality - truth is admitted. 
If you needed any more persuasion that standard Brexit politics with all its flailing delusions has swallowed the national interest all you had to do was to listen to Andrea Leadsom on @BBCr4today just now 
Andrea Leadsom reveals 411 of the 600 SIs needed for Brexit now laid, so still 189 to go in the 6 weeks left. I’m told this is the real reason why recess was scrapped next week. 
As someone who is currently touring Europe and talks the Audience in between songs I’d just thought I’d let you know that when we bring up #brexit The audience just laughs at us..#GodsavetheQuean #bluePassports #Gammons 
Our Prime Minister wants #Brexit. Our Opposition Leader wants Brexit. The media is pushing Brexit. The public are being tricked & blackmailed into wanting Brexit.But I still believe we will #Remain. Because it's the right thing to do.#PeoplesVote #RevokeA50 
Andrea Leadsom is lying on @BBCr4today when she says all necessary legislation for Brexit will be passed by end of March 
Andrea Leadsom admits next meaningful vote may not happen until after EU summit on March 21, just days before Brexit. Extraordinary. #r4today 
On @BBCr4today, it was just reported by @bbclaurak that Brexit is not even on the agenda for today’s Cabinet meeting. 46 days away. Not on the agenda. 
OUT: May 'contemplating' No Deal Brexit, chances increasing. UK must Leave on 29th March!  
BREXIT SNUB: Barnier warns Stephen Barclay that Brussels WILL NOT renegotiate May's deal. German Car Producers will shed 150,000 because of this Inflexible Barnier!  
Oh the irony when Hammond is one of the MPs responsible for creating the uncertainty around Brexit.Roll on #WTOBrexit 29/3/19.  via @MailOnline 
Claim: Corbyn disappeared on referendum night, got up late next morning and was seen laughing over breakfast with his team.Reality: Corbyn was on TV at 7.29am.  
“Bristol Port says the fact 65% of its imports already come from outside the EU - the majority under World Trade Organisation rules - means it does not expect any problems if there is a No Deal Brexit.”  
PM: Why do you want to go to Brussels Steve?Barclay: Well, you know, to discuss Brexit with the Commission and EU27.PM: What the hell have the EU got to do with Brexit?  
The Brexiter agenda only works if the EU collapses. The constant assertion across all milieus in the UK that "this time, yes this time the EU is dead" doesn't just utterly misread EU27 societies, it contributes to the paralysis and miscalculation at the heart of the Brexit fiasco 
The Prime Minister has hinted she will trigger a Tory leadership race to end at the party's annual conference in October.But she will announce it after Brexit, to give her time to “pick and prep a replacement”Let’s not forget the membership vote! 
Hey Mr Tusk. Those who pushed for Brexit did have a plan but it required your lot not to bully the UK, for Remoaners & the Establishment not to sabotage the wish of the majority & for Jezza’s mob not to play tribal party politics with a major National issue. 
If our own media reported the consequences of brexit with such clarity, we wouldn’t be in this mess. I’d bet that many people in the UK don’t know any of this.  
Latest from me: from four days on the Irish border, getting a sense of Brexit's casual breach of trust & how worried/angry people are. Really a trail for this week's 20-minute #AnywhereButWestminster film 
A more revealing shot of Dr Victoria we couldn't show on TV! She's written 'BREXIT LEAVES BRITAIN NAKED' on her chest.  
Currently we have free frictionless trade with the largest and richest trading bloc in the world, we benefit from dozens of world trade deals, our citizens have the absolute right to live and work in 27 European countries. Plus much more. Brexit doesn’t! 
#BREXIT: The @OFOCBrexit have been at Liverpool Hope Uni to campaign for a second referendum... “We know young people aren’t being represented at the moment” #CapitalReports 
I'm sure this is just a coincidence and Ken Macintosh didn't betray the Scottish people and parliament by referring our continuity bill to the 'Supreme Court' so Westminster's Brexit bill could undermine ours.No; Macintosh isn't another Labour sellout it's a just coincidence.  
For 4+ decades Brexiter MPs stood on Party Manifestos that promised Remain.They cheerfully ignored their own Party Manifestos and voted and campaigned for Leave.Now, after one election (2017) where both main Parties promised Brexit, Manifestos are the sacred.  
No Deal Brexit is "the biggest threat businesses have faced since 1939, many are threatened with extinction" the CEO of the Food and Drink Federation tells #R4Today.With 45 days to go, it is the Prime Minister's duty to rule this out this collasal act of self-harm. 
BBC insists on calling Puigdemont’s exile “self-imposed”.  But those who would otherwise be his co-defendants, for the crime of organising a referendum, have been imprisoned without trial for over a year in Spain, so the alternative for him is rather clear - he didn’t “impose” it 
“It’s a bit like the crew of the Titanic deciding, by majority vote, that the iceberg really must get out of the way.” Best quote on the Brexit debacle this month       'Un big mess' – how the rest of Europe views Brexit  
Ultimate impact of 2nd referendum campaign will have been to split Remain and help May run down the clock. Serial misjudgement of pro-Remain forces in UK is monumental. -  
"Brexit has brought us to a great moment in our history, when we must strengthen our global presence, enhance our lethality and increase our mass" - shooty shooty gun sticks, bang bang bang - Gavin Williamson is on a dangerously self deluded power trip. Give him his medication!  
Heading to Paris and then Warsaw to meet a number of my fellow European foreign ministers to talk about how we get #Brexit over the line  
Farage's Brexit Party is run by an oddball with seriously unpleasant views on race and poverty  - and that's before you even get to Nigel. My piece in Byline Times.#BrexitParty #R4Today 
May's Brexit deal is unacceptable and the EU refuses to budge. May always said No Deal is better than a bad deal, so it's great to see she now recognises that we can easily go WTO. Let's walk away from Brussels bullies and go global!Support us at  
I’d maybe have the smallest modicum of respect for Corbyn’s position if he was at least honest and said what he thinks about the EU to Labour voters, and that he thinks Brexit is the best thing. For someone who claims to be so decent and fair, he’s acting like a duplicitous arse. 
Brexit is a bit like the crew members of the Titanic deciding, by a vote of 52%-48%, that the iceberg must get out of the way. 
I think this, from @bbclaurak, probably captures the state of Government and Parliament confusion over Brexit as well as anything I've seen - but it needs a little fleshing out... quick thread 1/  
MPs voted for an EU referendum. They voted to trigger article 50. They voted for the EU withdrawal act. 80% of them stood on manifestos promising Brexit in GE17. Time to stop living in the past.  
“If we don’t do Brexit there’ll be blood on the streets”“If we don’t do Remain I’ll never buy a Dyson again”Sorry guys but this is why we will probably crash out 
2016: Glorious sunlit Brexit uplands 2019: We are stockpiling body bags  
The Prime Minister said that keeping Britain in a customs union after Brexit would be a "promise broken".Will she keep that promise?  
Jezza, this poster was put up more in sorrow than in anger. Time is running out. Brexit is a right-wing project delivered by right-wing ideologues. Please listen to your members and the young people who can put you in power, not Seamus Milne. 
The Brexit statements of our political leaders, turned into tweets then slapped up on massive billboards.No. 47: In his North Islington constituency, it’s @JeremyCorbyn. 
I agree, but there is also a concerted campaign by Corbyn to ensure Brexit happens no matter what the cost to the UK and its population, and no matter what Labour members and voters want, which makes him pretty hard to defend right now. 
I'm going to Sweden next week, so in advance.......Dear Sweden,  I am so very, very sorry for these people, the harassment of your citizen, and the whole vile Brexit business. I'm really excited to visit your country and hope we can be friends. 
If @theresa_may thinks appeasing a few dozen extremists in her party by enabling a no-deal Brexit would save the Tory Party from collapse then she doesn't understand the public or social media. It would be forever called #TheDerangedToryBrexit 
‘ We don’t have to think about the boring stuff, the EU does it for us’-hence Brexit is the most boring revolution in history. Fintan O’Toole: The UK is taking back not control but tedium  
Meet Dr Victoria Bateman: Cambridge academic and naked Brexit protester.She wants to 'expose' the truth about Brexit, arguing it's 'the emperor's new clothes'.  
What will it take for MPs to stand up to this Brexit nightmare?- removal of rights- threat to GFA- fraud and routine dishonesty- huge economic harm- businesses leaving- NHS staff going- rise of far right- stockpiling bodybagsJust what exactly? 
"NOT TRUE : 40 EU TRADE DEALS WITH 70 COUNTRIES”   Even the EU only claims deals with 36 countries are in force, and that's optimistic.  Great #Brexit summary is here: #GoWTO 
A no-deal Brexit would be like an "atomic bomb for everybody," Malta's finance minister says  
"I’m struggling not to let myself get paranoid but it has a darkness about it” A German grandmother who came to Britain in the final year of the Second World War has spoken out about what being forced to “register” before Brexit feels like  
So her plan is to deliver a worthless Brexit and then install another quisling as her successor. The Conservatives deserve electoral obliteration after the past few years of abject betrayal.  
The Chancellor's claim that there would be a Brexit deal "dividend" in full knowledge it would make the country poorer was cynical, Trumpian politics. The only people getting rich off Brexit are disaster capitalists and those shorting the pound. 
A disruptive no deal Brexit is "the biggest threat businesses have faced since 1939, many are threatened with extinction" says Ian Wright, CEO of the Food and Drink Federation. "I don't think people are taking this seriously"  
Ian Wright, CEO of the Food and Drink Federation says no amount of planning will get the UK ready for Brexit now, and that is "scary" #r4today 
May to ask MPs for further fortnight's grace in Brexit talks.More can kicking from May. We are heading for a no deal because of the Tories arrogance & incompetence. Well at least we have ordered in enough body bags....  
Do you remember that old joke"Doctor doctor, it hurts when I do this""Well stop doing it then"?#brexit 
We voted for Brexit, this deal business is just a game to thwart it.We simply move from 55% WTO trade , to 100%.130 other countries have no problem with it.THIS HAS NOTHING TO DO WITH TRADE BUT A DESIRE FOR A FEDERAL EUROPE.BE HONEST  
The sheer arrogance of Barnier and his fellow EU gangsters. It’s been nothing but UK concessions up to now from our useless, Remainer Govt & PM. No more  UK concessions. No more talks. The Govt must announce we are doing a WTO Brexit.  End of.   
FOSTER: "Bercow is a self-promoter. He thinks he is bigger than the office he has taken on. He is like a small dog guarding a large bone. Puffed up with his own self-importance he snaps at anyone who crosses his path." @1jamiefoster #csm #brexit  
Last night someone projected videos of Spanish police brutality during the Catalan referendum on the Spanish Supreme Court facade. Epic.  
Labour cannot ride the Brexit wave to socialism, it must fight the nationalist right>Written by longtime ⁦@PeoplesMomentum⁩ activist and adviser ⁦@jemgilbert⁩ 
My fellow #Brexiteers, when @UKParliament stitches us up with a Brexit in name only, how will you vote at the next GE? Please RT after voting. 
No, Brexit does not allow us to go global and do free trade. We enjoy oodles of global free trade already via the EU. Brexit allows us to throw it all away and, if we're very lucky, replace enough of it to get by. If this seems pointless, or even reckless, that's because it is. 
The scale of the incompetence of leading #brexit supporter Grayling imakes him a laughingstock in Commons - amusing yet alarming report by @JohnJCrace : 
LETS BE CLEAR - If brexit is such a good idea why aren't more producers, farmers, businesses, industries, factories, financial services, the NHS praising it ! 
Good morning Westminster!We don't do lie-ins at #Sodem.Up and at them to #StopBrexit.Come and join us!!Now or never to make a stand against Brexit. #CakeNotHate event on Thursday 14 ♡ @RemainingKind @ChrisHa33342711 
45 days to #StopBrexitNo Brexit dividendNo £350m for NHSNo better trade dealsNo way to stop Nissan and others fleeingNo unicorns, only liesThe best deal is clearly the one we’ve always had so get yr MP to back #PeoplesVote #OptionToRemain #LetUsDecide #RevokeA50 @LibDems 
Hague is wrong to stick up for Remainer Boles, who deserves to be deselected over lying about respecting the EU referendum result, threatening to resign the party whip over Brexit and alienating most of his local constituency association via @Telegraph 
A huge 9,000km trade route is being built right across Europe from Finland to Malta. It’s one of the biggest infrastructure projects ever constructed and will capitalise on the benefits of free trade in the EU single market. #EU #Brexit #TuesdayThoughts 
Reminder:'Soft Brexit' = Remain.Brexit = Leave.Don't be fooled.  
At the heart of the #BrexitCrisis is the extreme pressure on MPs to 'honour' the 2016 #EUref result & deliver Brexit. Criminality in the Leave campaigns has already been proven & is under ongoing investigation. If Brexit passes from that corrupted ballot, it will destroy the UK. 
If @theresa_may secures Brexit deal quitting later this year would make sense. She goes down in history as PM who took us out of EU 
"Brexit itself has already become history’s most boring revolution. Once, in the reverse alchemy of negotiation, you transmute its golden aspirations into the real world of international legal agreements, you end up with very leaden stuff" - @fotoole 
UK firms are offshoring production to EU27 because they expect Brexit to increase barriers to trade & migration, making the UK a less attractive place to do business, @CEP_LSE evidence of investment of £8.3bn that would otherwise have been in the UK @voxeu 
The current Labour Party Policy:..is to ensure a Tory #brexit happens - against the wishes & judgment of its MPs, Members & voters - on the wager that enough people’s lives will be devastated that Labour will gain a majority at next election.I will never vote labour again. 
A No-Deal Brexit is a tragedy of 3 acts for business Contingency planning Immediate disruption to ports and services Long-term damage to UK competitiveness @josh_hardie on @SkyNews 
VIDEO: Someone has projected images of the Spanish police’s violence from the 2017 referendum on the facade of the Supreme Court during the whole night.  
COMING UP: Dr Victoria Bateman is 'bearing all' as she joins the studios live to debate Brexit - completed naked! The college professor argues Brexit will leave the country 'exposed' and 'naked economically'...What are your thoughts?  
‘Brexit dividend’   
THE DEATH OF THE EU IS IMMINENT The only reason the EU still exists is the corrupt politicians belief in the United States of Europe . It seems the majority of people in the EU would vote to leave if given the chance . Which why the EU must destroy brexit just to survive . 
 Should the Welsh dragon be prioritised over the Union Jack on packaging after Brexit?  
'Un big mess' – how the rest of Europe views Brexit  
Have a wonderful Tuesday today all my followers. Bored Brexit bashing everyday. Play some music today from the 60s greatest era for music of all time. All best groups all come from 60s. Beatles, Hollies, Kinks, The Who, Small Faces, Rolling Stones. And many more The Glory Years.  
NHS stockpiling body bags ahead of potential no-deal Brexit  They are expecting the poor to die in their droves with UC & food shortages 
Theresa May confirms she will not allow Britain to be part of the Customs Union after Brexit  
"Brexit: Theresa May to update MPs on talks"This should be good, considering she's been doing absolutely nothingWhat's she going to tell them? How do you make achieving zero sound like progress?  
BoJo goes soft: will now back Theresa May's awful Withdrawal Agreement with a 'time-limited backstop'.What rubbish - The only true Brexit is a WTO Brexit! #NoDealNoProblem 
Chris Grayling facing calls to resign after auditors found his department spent £800,000 of public money on consultants assessing the bid of a company with no ships that was temporarily awarded a Brexit-related ferry contract. You just couldn’t make it up  
The EU Offered Free Trade Brexit; Mrs May Sabotaged It.  via @BreitbartNews 
FFS!Tories want Brexit to 'enhance our lethality'!So, the 'U'K will be able to kill more people from April onwards; presumably, because there'll be fewer legal hoops to jump through before 'U'K troops can start shooting people.When did they put that on the side of the bus?  
‘make it as tax- and regulation-lite as possible, Britain turns down the offer flat. Despite Brexit, Mrs May is absolutely set on keeping  Britain’s trading relationship with the world the same as it was while Britain was a member of the European Union’  
It is bonkers....but you do a great job. We are up and running....#NewsBriefing in 30 mins and we are talking #Brexit #FakeNews #WindPower #Trump 
Exactly what they have done and are still doing, no hyperbole people, look at how they formed the cults to support Trump, Brexit & so many orchestrated coups all over the World @maddow @HouseDemocrats @SenateDems 
'Something has to give,' EU's Barnier tells Brexit Britain  
Brexit: no-deal fears fuel Irish business anxiety  
British port operator ready to boost capacity after Brexit  
“I cannot wait until Saturday, when the referendum to chase out Bukola Saraki will be carried out" - Oshiomhole #2019Elections #KwaraMustBeFree 
Full house for Governor Philip Lane in #HongKong.  Many thanks to Charles Li, CEO of @HKEXGroup for warm words of welcome. Great discussion #Brexit #GlobalEconomy #SingleMarket #StockConnect #USChinaTrade @IrelandinHK @Paschald @simoncoveney @michaeldarcy @NBurgessDFAT 
Why are our Referendum Banners scarce. I want to facebook and Twit our Referendum banner 50times per day before 16th.@MaziNnamdiKanu 
No states outside the EU are going to grant a post-Brexit UK better trade terms for the simple reason that once outside the single EU market the UK offers prospective trade partners like Japan and the US far less market access than it currently does. 
Here we go again! Nothing has changed, Need more time, Will of the people, National interest, WTO, Waffle, waffle & waffle some more - meanwhile clock is ticking  May to ask MPs for further fortnight's grace in Brexit talks  
“Continuing uncertainty over Brexit process” is Brexit supporters ‘get out of jail free’ card. You know what causes the continuing uncertainty over the Brexit process? Brexit.  
EU, UK Brexit negotiators hold 'constructive' talks - diplomatic language for sod all achieved..  
Doctors are bracing for an influx of patients with breathing problems due to tonnes of dust stirred up from barren mine sites in the Hunter. Enough is enough! Vote now in the Peoples Referendum on Coal and Gas:  #lockthegate #time2choose 
Bougainville - an autonomous island within Papua New Guinea - is preparing for an independence referendum.  The Aussie company that claims the rights to its huge copper and gold deposits isn't happy. @BloombergNRG 
BBC Radio 4's news not biased against Brexit, says regulator - No, and the Pope’s not Catholic..  
I suspect the quiet majority make up their own minds. Interesting speaking to my children’s friends who voted both sides at the Referendum, almost all now wish to leave the EU but feel reluctant to express their views publicly due to anti Brexit social media pressure.. 
#indyliveradioAre you listening yet?#nowPlayingScotland, Brexit and the futureby Nicola SturgeonJoin 13 listeners on the  website or iOS/Android apps. 
FARAGE: 35,000 registrations for Brexit Party in 48 hours. Theresa May better stick to her promise of an EU exit on 29th March.. 
Given everything that has changed since 2014... Also taking into account the way Scotland voted in 2016, All while WM has shown itself to be useless...Do you believe the majority of Scots would Vote for Independence in a second Referendum? #IndyRef2 
To anyone who still has faith in 21st Centuary politics I would say:Theresa MayDavid CameronBoris JohnsonThe rest of the Tory PartyNigel FarageLibDemsBrexitJess PhilipsJohn MannThe SNPTrumpAusterityFoodbanks.We need a Corbyn government now.#GetTheToriesOut 
Hmm ... "Brexit Express has launched a nationwide billboard campaign urging the public and politicians to back #NoDealBrexit as the only way to get a good deal from the EU."So ... the only way to get a good deal is to not get a good deal?#LeaversAreLoonies 
Referendum votes are in. The @seuo_uosu won with 4205 to 1423 for the SFUO. Total number of votes: 5628. 
Unbelievable. 40,000+ Labour supporters sign a petition calling for a #PeoplesVote and they are turned away from party HQ.Corbyn’s Labour Party won’t even accept a petition from its own MPs and members.Just insulting. Millions of Remainers will never vote for Brexit Labour.  
'The UK has experienced the sharpest slowdown in income growth of any comparable economy.' 
...and I spent months researching how Cambridge Analytica worked with Israeli hackers who gained access to now-President's emails & used them to smear him. Also working on this campaign: AIQ, the data firm at the heart of Brexit 
Philip Hammond blames Brexit uncertainty for low economic growth. He doesn’t mention poor global growth, or the diesel fiasco. Nor does he admit that “uncertainty over Brexit” is largely down to MPs like him who are trying to torpedo Brexit. 
Tory Transport Secretary Chris Grayling urged to quit after blowing £800,000 of taxpayers’ cash on his botched Brexit ferry deal He previously told MPs no money went on £13.8m Seaborne Freight contract he awarded - despite the company having no ferries 
Well while sitting on your arse, watch and learn why the majority of us have wanted out of the mess called the EU for years, and why Labour would be finished if you got your way.#InsideEurope#Lexit#Brexit 
Brexit will go down in history as an absurdity. The UK is six weeks away from leaving the largest and most successful economic union the world has ever seen, for reasons that aren't entirely clear to anybody, and we're not sure how we're going to do it. We don't have a plan. 
Lord Forsyth pivots the debate away from Brexit to independence and sets up around 20 minutes of audience ranting including Billy Mitchell's time to shine.It's incredible that one of the architects of Motherwell's demise gets this reaction.  
Everybody who is still pro Brexit, I ask one thing of you, check your medication and where it comes from, then go and check your family's meds, your best friend's... 
Abia State Aba also shut down on 11th of February 2019 As #IPOB protest peacefully to spread the message of Nigeria’s presidential Election Boycott on the 16th of February 2019 across #Biafraland we must continue,no retreat no Surrender until our request for referendum is granted  
Occasional reminder that Anna Soubry, co-chair of the People's Vote campaign, voted against a parliamentary amendment proposing a referendum on EU withdrawal arrangements (the amendment was put forward by someone called 'Jeremy Corbyn'?)  
Brexit jitters dragged U.K. investments to their worst slump in a decade, leaving the economy with little momentum. Insights via @CMEGroup 
Turns oot half the planet conquered and enslaved arent banging on the door for trade deals efter brexit, the only one that is is America - and that should be a warning, no a fucking celebration.For that means shite food, death of farming, and privatised fucking health care. 
Dear Britain, check out how a referendum should actually be conducted. #Brexitshambles 
WATCH: UK Prime Minister Theresa May rejects pivot towards #Brexit customs union compromise  via @ReutersTV 
11th of February 2019, thousands of #IPOB Owerri Imo in #Biafraland on peaceful protest, demand #referendum for Biafra to decide where to belong as the amalgamation of Nigeria has expired or no presidential Election 16th of February 2019 across #Biafraland, 
Grayling urged to quit as spending on Brexit ferry deal consultants revealed  
Out now: EU Committee report on #Brexit: the #Erasmus and #Horizon programmes: 
'Something has to give,' EU's Barnier tells Brexit Britain  
Guardian front page, Tuesday 12 February 2019: Brexit dividend claim rejected as UK economy hits the buffers  
"this week exporters were told [by the govt] that they would have to put little stickers over any labels saying their produce was of eu origin".The devil is in the detail.#Brexit will consign Britain's exporters to M Tusk's #specialplaceinhell#r4today 
Hammond’s Brexit ‘dividend’ claim rejected as UK economy stalls  
Today @LisaLaFlammeCTV had a chance to sit down with @OfficialSting for a conversation about his life, his music, his musical “The Last Ship,” Brexit and Donald Trump. Don’t miss it! Tonight on @CTVNationalNews. 
I am no martyr or saint, but I effectively 'detonated' my 25 year IT/telecoms career by publicly backing Q. There's a context of #Brexit and other business stresses that makes it complicated, and a bit of a simplification. It's been painful and would make exactly the same choice.  
yes, of course, brexit means brexit etc etci prefer the new sloganRemainer means Traitor 
Why have you cut specific lines out of wider paragraphs? What it is saying is it is detailing specific items that will be stockpiled to prepare for a No Deal Brexit. 1640 people die in the UK every day. So why is it inappropriate to prepare equipment for those figures? 
In an almost perfect reversal of 40+ years ago, I came to the UK because my father’s company was relocated from the Netherlands to the UK. The UK has just entered the EEC. FDI and jobs were flowing here. Now #Brexit is causing companies to move in the opposite direction.  
Tory #Brexit rhetoric slides into the military bombast of Mussolini and Arab dictators. #PeoplesVote 
Brexit cancelled.Buffy being brought back.Half Life 3 confirmed.Hookshot added to breath of the wild.NHS staff 100% discount at Dominoes Pizza.Mila Jovovich admits her undying love for me.  
What these Eurocrats fail to realise is that a growing number of us Brits (myself included) would rather have a difficult exit (short term) than a disastrous reversal of Brexit that would mean the UK being inexorably sucked (permanently) into a United States of Europe.  
Nicola Sturgeon's 3-5 year timescale points to an independence referendum in the near future -  #ScotRef #indyref2 
Why A No-Deal Brexit Is Now Theresa May's Fallback Plan To Save Her Party – And Herself | HuffPost UK.                            This must not be allowed to happen. #NoToNoDeal #NTND 
"In a 'no deal' Brexit scenario you will need to put extra measures in place to legally transfer this data" from an EU Member State to the UK  
Ta to my shy good friend and comrade who tonight faced down a physically threatening fascist. The marra might win an unlikely Olympic angry staring competition but wha’s clear is Brexit’s inflamed Far Right extremists 
The Government, under the cover of NDAs, has been offering ports cheap loans to upgrade their infrastructure in preparation for a no deal Brexit. However, none of them chose to take up the offer.  
Let us Remainers make it clear that if a no-deal is inflicted on the British people we will regard every government minister and every MP who has connived in it as a criminal, and we will work tirelessly to put them all in jail. Growing public anger will be our ally.#Brexit  
Significant move (at last!) from Tory remain ministers to avert no deal Brexit. Her wiggle room just got smaller....  
How can you have a Break Clause.... on a BackStop?The BackStop is the guarantee against a Break Clause...no?#Brexit...it's not stopped getting crazy.This is why investors are backing away....#BrexitShambles 
Barnier says that the UK must “give ground” if the Brexit deadlock is to be resolved. But we’ve done nothing but give ground — and the EU has given nothing. We can’t & mustn’t give ground. So “no deal” becomes the only option (barring a last-minute change of heart by Brussels). 
Theresa May is now seriously contemplating a no-deal Brexit. I’ve been banging on about this for months. This is her end game. Throw the entire country under a bus with a no-deal Brexit and then blame everyone else. 
. @graceblakeley is 100% correct.Economic growth over the last four decades has benefited a privileged elite. The key issue facing Britain isn't #Brexit, it's getting a govt to commit to investing in the economy AND redistribution of income and wealth.  
Centrists' obsession with saying that they don't owe Labour their vote (and that they won't vote Lab because of Brexit) is interesting.It shows that they regard voting as a purely individual act. A party only gets their vote if satisfies THEIR demands & THEIR needs.(1/2) 
Theresa May is a nationalist extremist. She has been aiming for a no-deal #Brexit from the start. 
It's weird how each time #Bearcats lose, which isn't often, it becomes a fan referendum on Mick.They lost to No. 9 in country, on the road, as an underdog...to a team that's won 32 in a row at home. 
CBLive: Brexit could set us back into the dark days of The Troubles  
My own prediction:LAB are currently 2-3 points behind the Tories, but would gain that back in an election campaign if they can shift the conversation from Brexit, onto other issues.I think we'd end up with a very hung parliament (280ish seats each), and a LAB lead coalition. 
THAT nightmare scenario in fullMay runs down clockParliament messes upUK crashes outMay resignsGeneral Election calledTory leadership contestLabour backlash for facilitating BrexitGove or Boris is PMEverything is fucking awful foreverWe’re not doing this right? RIGHT? 
UK defence minister: Brexit enables UK to develop its military ‘hard power’ to confront Russia & China in their own back yardsNB Doesn’t say how EU prevented this, where money will come from, or how conflict with Russia & China would serve interests of UK 
Theresa May should not be given any more time by MPs to sort out Brexit. She wasted 5 weeks when she postponed the vote which was due on 11th December. The duplicitous creature is trying to run down the clock until the only choice is her deal or no deal.  
Brexit has so fucked up the UK:-leavers, who are the real traitors because they're damaging their own country-are busy calling remainers, who love their country, traitors 
Projection of police violence from the #1Oct referendum onto the facade of the Supreme Court on Madrid tonight. The trials of the Catalan political prisoners begin in the morning.  
Too angry with you to respond.  What the hell did you and your Brexiter mates expect?  Not the Brexit “process” but Brexit itself. 
Car production down in Italy, blame Brexit!Car production down in Germany, blame Brexit!Car production down in UK, blame Brexit!No, its nobody buying cars, especially diesels. 
Britain, Australia should forge post-Brexit free-movement pact: Boris Johnson  
Take it from the source: "Foreign politicians point at Russia "for meddling into elections and referendum around the globe. In reality, things are much more serious--Russia is interfering into their brains and they don't know what to do with their own changed mentality." Surkov.  
Here's how growth in the UK is slowing thanks to uncertainty around Brexit. Read more:  
Meaningless but menacing words today from Gavin Williamson , UK Defence Secretary mark a new low in @GovUk rhetoric  :”#Brexit has brought us to a great moment in our history. A moment when we must strengthen our global presence, enhance our lethality and increase our mass”. 
Brexit: Will there be a resolution to months of indecision?  
This is an absolute first, I’m being told: being interviewed by the NDR with someone from the ZDF holding the light and someone from Pro 7 / Sat 1 filming. Well, I went with it and told them exactly what I think about Brexit and the situation of EU citizens in the UK.  
Makes sense, she can go "having delivered Brexit for a grateful nation with her head held high" blah blah and her successor can sort out the final agreement. A good campaigner will crush Corbyn in a general election...  
"There’s a feeling out there that we’re just one Brexit-block or delay away from a societal explosion, where the democracy that this land so cherished is frittered away by our lawmakers in Westminster"Brilliant editorial by @CSquireMagazine 
Hi @Maitlis the UK's poor economic performance since the EU ref is due the Brexit catastrophe anyone telling you otherwise is lying to you. #Newsnight 
I asked the transport secretary how much the seaborne contract being cancelled had cost the taxpayer - after all its public money - as can be seen from this report he refused to reveal no-deal Brexit ferry contract cancellation fee  to me | Sky News  
So let me get this right.It’s 6 weeks to Brexit and yet Theresa May wants to use a fortnight of that pursuing the same strategy that hasn’t worked since mid-December and has been met with a flat refusal from  since then?This is insane. 
“It’s not just about what’s going on in the global economy it is that Brexit effect”- Matthew Whittaker says the UK’s slowing economic growth is related to Brexit #newsnight | @MattWhittakerRF | @resfoundation | @BenChu_ 
2016: "Brexit will improve your lives"2019: "There'll be enough bags for everyone"  
I see BBC #Panorama has once again managed to skip the serious stuff that is going on and opt for something that could have been left for better days. How about telling us how the EU manipulates the British media and politics to sink #Brexit ? Or is it not important enough? 
Sky News: “Brexit is all about trade and the economy”. We believe it’s primarily about independence, self-determination and democracy.  It also offers enormous economic benefits. 
A quick note for the Left. Every sneering remark. Every unicorn emoji. Every **facepalm** comment. Every bit of condescension. Every use of ‘gammon’ ... Our resolve gets stronger. We’re listening to every insult and every one just motivates us more to push for Brexit! 
My guess is upon achieving the default No Deal/WTO Brexit, Mrs May will call a General Election to consolidate both her position as well as that of her Party.   
2016: “I see no downside to Brexit, only a considerable upside.”“Sunlit uplands”2019:“At least there will be bodybags to see us through the food riots"  
Between this story about @jeremycorbyn, and @angelasmithmp being turned away at Labour HQ (her own party) with People's Vote petitions, that's me done with @UKLabour. Tory cuts (& Brexit) will hurt us all but this is no opposition. It's almost coalition. The future is not bright.  
Looking forward to talking to @ClaireByrneLive on @rte shortly on the self-inflicted disaster that is Brexit and the risks it poses to Ireland too. 
Patrick Blower on #Jeremy Corbyn #TheresaMay #Tories #Brexit #BrexitShambles - political cartoon gallery in London  
Why the rush is a great question, especially given how badly anti-gun activists messed up their background check referendum in Nevada back in 2016.  
The most likely outcome from our new MRP constituency model see the Tories gaining just four seats in a snap election: not nearly enough to solve May’s Brexit woesCon: 321 seats (+4 from GE2017)Lab: 250 (-12)SNP: 39 (+4)LD: 16 (+4)Other – 7 (+1) 
Well well, the apparent well intentioned flag waving Remainer nuisance outside Parliament over the last few months has been exposed as a paid up actor, even his name was false, Brexit keeps on giving, I wonder who the paymaster is!@gerardjasper @BrexitKnight 
"I call it 'Dunkirk 2.' Only this time, we’re following the Nazis out of Europe." Watch @EricIdle discuss #Brexit with @BillMaher on #RealTime: 
But Corbyn's team didn't forget to include Starmer's section on a second referendum, they removed it, doubtless on Corbyn's orders. And now they are lying about having forgotten to include it. Corbyn is showing his true nature as an abusive liar.#Brexit 
If there’s a #SpecialPlaceInHell for Brexiters without a plan, surely there’s also seats reserved for those who know #Brexit will be a disaster but who play along, waiting & facilitating...At this stage of the game, anything less than opposition is complicity#PeoplesVoteNow 
In 3 months to Dec 2016 we ran a £30bn+ balance of payments deficit in trade goods. In 3 months to Dec 2018 we a ran a £30bn+ deficit in trade goods. In no quarter in last two years has goods deficit been under £30bn.Quite hard to see benefit of post-Brexit ref. devaluation. 
Citizens...if #Brexit goes ahead..there will be no going back. Once out we're out & will have lost the Best of Both Best Ever Bargain Basement EU Deal.So if you want to Retain your EU Rights, Protect our Union & Future pull out all the stops NOW!Don't back Tories or Labour! 
Well l have heard plenty of scare stories about Brexit but this beats them allThe NHS is stockpiling body bags to cope with no deal Brexit  
Incredible this isn’t even number one on the news any more! #BrexitChaos Food industry warns Gove on Brexit 'crisis'.  
I get notifications like this every day now from London and surrounding areas. Stabbings, shootings, acid attacks, etc. But political journalists in the UK are more interested in pushing lies about Brexit, etc. Why is the country being knowingly destroyed like this?   
“She gets to save her party and potentially gets to live for another day. She will be the PM who delivered Brexit. She can blame Parliament and Tusk, Juncker and the EU [for no-deal] and say I managed it as best as anyone could. " 
Here we go... The never-ending stimulus.  More debt and more taxes...“Britain needs a blast of investment stimulus to fight the global slump - regardless of Brexit”  
And the really messed up thing is: If the Brexit Deal goes through, it will be Brexit-voters themselves screaming "We didn't vote for this", which is simply a less mathematical way of saying what I just said. 
I'll keep repeating this until it sinks in.Unless you can guarantee that the vast majority of Brexit voters (mathematically 92.7% {48.1%/51.9%}) would have voted for the version of "Leave" we end up with, there is no democratic mandate for it. 
You better deliver Brexit then. 
Catch me on @BBCNewsnight tonight discussing the UK’s disastrous growth figures.Brexit is a culprit, but low wages, low investment and low productivity all predate the vote.We need a new economic model. We need a green new deal now. 
Trial set to start 1st March Eurotunnel takes UK government to court over no-deal Brexit ferry contracts | talkRADIO  via @talkRADIO 
Dear UK,a reminder that you have only 45 days left to enjoy free roaming across 28 countries, Erasmus, a frictionless Irish border, the most advanced food, safety and environmental standards in the world, and being a key member of the largest single market in history.#Brexit 
The great thing about Brexit is that it has brought out into the open Europhiles like you.Biased Journo whose father Maurice was a Labour life peer.Why would someone with your Labour background be countenanced as the appropriate person to head a political show.  
The first, a teacher’s letter about Boris Johnson as a pupil (ht @LettersOfNote), the second, a teacher’s letter about Nigel Farage as a pupil. These are the men who made Brexit.  
Most people who voted Brexit did so expecting a good deal. Hence the constant: "The EU needs us more so they'll give us one."Right now, the only Brexits on the table are a bad deal and No Deal.Therefore the thing 52% wanted isn't possible, while the thing 48% wanted still is. 
Let's make this official. @UKLabour - if you do not stop Brexit I shall never, literally never, vote Labour again.Please RT if you agree. 
Whatever else you think about Nigel Farage, difficult not to conclude that he knows a committed Brexiter when he sees one.Time for Labour remainers to wake up to Corbyn’s determination to deliver #BrexitThey can deal with this by cutting him adrift by leaving Labour en-masse.  
#EUloudandStanding against pro brexit pro trump racists in #SwindonWe will not be intimidated. We will fight and we will #StopBrexitSaveBritain#euloudandproud #FBPE #facciamoeuropa #BrexitCrisis 
These 3 programmes  have shown up the EU for what it is a self serving bureaucratic club that changes hard and fast set in stone rules when it suits, I wish this had been screened before the referendum  the leave vote would  have increased dramatically. #InsideEurope 
So that’s it then...... we leave with No Deal....No 39 billion for you #sillyman.   Brexit news: Barnier warns UK that EU WILL NOT renegotiate | UK | News |  
We must just walk away...........    Brexit news: Barnier warns UK that EU WILL NOT renegotiate | UK | News |   
Senior Tories tell May to steer clear of Brexit negotiations with Labour 
Grayling urged to resign as it emerges he spent £800,000 of public money on Brexit ferry deal consultants, despite making a statement in the House of Commons on Monday, when he said: “We haven’t spent any money on this contract.”  
I'm not concerned anymore about the anti Brexit bias by the MS Media day after day, hour after hourWe have social media to counter the opinion, distortion & the deception.The media has lost the power that they once had & they are actually helping the Brexit cause by their bias. 
Is this a #Brexit  
Robert Peston: why I now think a no-deal Brexit is the most likely outcome  
In the same way Vote Leavers are accused of being spoon fed their opinions from The Mail, Remainers are just as guilty of gaining their evidence from a narrow outlets: a @jk_rowling thread or another @OwenJones84 op-ed.  #Brexit #InsideEurope 
Labour MP ⁦@angelasmithmp⁩ tells me she’s been pushed to the very edge by ⁦@jeremycorbyn⁩ on #Brexit - watch here:  
Having taking UK into his illegal war in Iraq, Tony Blair then made sure British people never got a say on the Lisbon Treaty.Already highly unpopular, he then spent the last two years working to reverse Brexit.The man is a menace to British society.  
Nigel Farage’s new Brexit party spells trouble for the Tories .....  
BREXIT SNUB: Barnier warns Stephen Barclay that Brussels WILL NOT renegotiate May's deal  
Dave Brown: this time with Switzerland spelt correctly... doh!.. doh! – #TheresaMay #Tories #Brexit #BrexitShambles - political cartoon gallery in London  
This is becoming ridiculous. None of the mooted Brexit deals would carry any implications for the GFA. None. None at all. I am beginning to believe that a number of those commenting on the issue on twitter and elsewhere may not actually have read the Agreement.  
As David Davis details in today's Times, the point of Brexit has always been vast corporate tax cuts and brutal deregulation. If you are a Lexiteer expecting a socialist utopia to emerge after leaving the EU, more fool you.  
Only 1 MP has ever tabled an amendment to hold a 2nd Referendum on Brexit. That MP was Jeremy Corbyn. Please do not take my word for this. See for yourself.  
Seumas Milne, Stalinist and loyal Kremlin stooge. What would be said if May or Cable had a Nazi or an ex-Nazi as their right-hand man? His promotion of apologists for a genocidal tyrant is the real Corbyn scandal. #Brexit #PeoplesVote 
If Brexit was a building it would be the Diamond Centre 
Tomorrow starts the trial for the people that helped catalans to vote the independence referendum.  @eucopresident asked for dialogue, where is it? #WeTrustedEU 
Sod @UKParliament I hope she does take us out on a No Deal and get this over with. For goodness sake we will be fine. I think the wider public are okay and would rather that than have to watch a bunch of conniving useless MP’s frustrate the referendum result. 
Transport sec Chris Grayling defends stripping ferry company with no ferries from 'no-deal' Brexit contract, insisting that "not a penny of taxpayers' money" was spent.To read the full story, head here:  
Italy explores OWN Brexit deal with UK as Italian rebels threaten to DESTABILISE EU   
Chris Grayling is asked whether he will resign, following the cancellation of a £14m Brexit ferry contract.Reports said the deal failed after a major shipping firm called Arklow Shipping withdrew its support for Seaborne Freight "without warning".  
When we voted for Brexit we expected our vote to be honoured as any previous vote was honoured, we did not give permission for it to be manipulated into a FAKE Brexit and we will NOT accept it if it is, its very important to remember 17.4 VERY ANGRY people are watching & waiting 
 ANOTHER BOMBSHELL CORBYN VIDEO Jezza caught on tape bragging about how he would destroy the European Union just a few years ago. What happened, Jez!??#EU #EuropeanUnion #Brexit  
Petition: Revoke Art.50 if there is no Brexit plan by the 25 of February  
UK Defence Secretary has said that Brexit has presented the opportune moment for UK armed forces to "increase their lethality" Offensive, politically tone deaf and an egregious & disgusting statement. "Increasing lethality"?The sentiment behind this makes me sick.  
This cunt is unreal. Apparently air pollution is killing us so let’s fuck over loads of easy target motorists. Meanwhile kids are dying daily on our streets due to knife crime while he ignores it and keeps waffling on about brexit. Fuck off @SadiqKhan 
The NHS is stockpiling body bags to cope with no deal Brexit 
Any chance you could ever support another public vote Nick? Now we know so much more about Brexit haven’t the British people the right to deliver their verdict? The polls would indicate they’re not happy with what’s happening. 
Sky News: “Brexit is all about trade and the economy”.  Wrong guys. It’s primarily about independence, self-determination and democracy.  But it also offers enormous economic benefits. 
Jeremy Corbyn might be doing badly in the polls in terms of his popularity, but when it comes to stopping a second referendum he’s doing an absolutely fantastic job.  
Around 50% of EU nationals in #Scotland are Polish. Welcome them to register to vote, indy activists! And urge @scotgov to make true on their promise from last year (!) to reextend voting rights to EU citizens in Scotland after Brexit! #UnitedInDiversity #NowIsTheTime 
250 companies are in talks to relocate to the Netherlands from Brexit Britain. These business partners explain why they're leaving  
Martin Rowson on Theresa May rejecting Corbyn’s Brexit compromise – #TheresaMay #Tories #Brexit #BrexitShambles - political cartoon gallery in London  
Britain was once a global trading power. After Brexit it can be again, says George Brandis 
For as long as Welsh AMs & MPs covertly support #Brexit by backing their party leaders, @theresa_may & @jeremycorbyn, there's no point in them tweeting their tormented thoughts. Until they leave their parties and start putting Wales first, their words are cheapPut up or shut up 
Self-professed Tory "patriots" have penned a letter to Theresa May demanding that she delays Brexit.There is nothing patriotic in attempting to deny democracy. We urge Conservative members to pen a letter to these Remainers' local associations demanding their deselection!  
Aaron Ramsey getting £400,000 a week at Juventus... his agent should do the Brexit deal ffs. 
Dominic Grieve: As Brexit disaster looms, we must have the courage to retrace our steps   
The legislation is already in place, and it's been discussed in some quarters in the context of Brexit... 
I wish I could say this piece was exaggerated or overblown. It is not. That is why responsible MPs of all parties will have to act before the month is out to prevent no-deal Brexit on 29 March.  
Tuesday’s FINANCIAL TIMES: “Slowest growth in a decade sets Brexit challenge for Hammond” #bbcpapers #tomorrowspaperstoday 
“Hello, I’m from the Brexit Party. Would you like to join?”“How racist are you?”“Pretty fucking racist tbf.”“Yeah, but HOW racist? I’m not joining unless you’re virulently racially intolerant.”“How does ‘a bit too racist for Nigel Farage’ sound?”“Sign me the fuck up.”  
If we get a no deal Brexit, I fully expect the Government to declare martial law. After a few months or years of doing exactly what it wants, with no Parliamentary oversight, and shredders running 24/7, nobody will be able to investigate anything. 
When Cardi B won that Grammy, Miki Minach's stock price dropped like the Pound when Sunderland's EU Referendum results were called out  
...and they say that the EU is about maintaining peace in Europe. Riots will hit streets after Brexit and UK will be ‘unstable’ for years, EU report warnsI'd normally say this leak is irresponsible. But it has all of feel of a deliberate instigation. 
"We really are in the emergency zone," business leader says as Theresa May's Brexit strategy terrifies companies  
The Lexit delusion: Labour cannot hope to form a progressive government if it accepts a Brexit mandate won by the extreme right, argues @jemgilbert. 
Hi UK idiots, is Brexit not making ur life horrible enough? How bout u add me to the mix!  
Lies, damned lies and Brexit!#RejectTheLies@RenewPartyTheresa May ‘suppressed’ up to 9 studies which found immigration does not harm UK workers 
Tony Blair’s anti-Brexit plotting has backfired, leaving the EU in disarray:  
"Something has to give," EU's Barnier tells Brexit Britain  
NZ-China relations sink to new low.NZ-Singapore relations at all time low.Aussie govt won’t trust Ardern.Ardern insults US.No agreements with EU or UK post Brexit.Pro-Venezuelan Dictator Maduro.Peters & Ardern have done all this foreign policy damage in just 1year! #nzpol 
Transport secretary Chris Grayling refuses to reveal cancellation fee for no-deal #Brexit ferry contract  
I’m not talking about the ones who think a no-deal Brexit would be fine - I mean the ones who realise what it entails but think they could get away with it to the extent that the incentive is for them to focus on party management instead of avoiding it 
Household incomes have taken a £1,500 hit since the EU referendum  
Some Tories reasonably believe they could literally cause a national catastrophe with a no-deal Brexit, and probably get away with it. Something has gone very wrong with accountability in this country 
Delingpole: The EU Offered Britain A Free Trade Deal But Theresa May Sabotaged It Because She Wants Brexit In Name Only 
If you are only just finding out what is going on with #HS2 on #Dispatches, here's a summary of how things went at the end of 2018Behind the #Brexit Firewall, HS2 has been Trundling on at Panic Stations with Increased Costs, Incompetence, Spin and Fraud.  
So Scotland is to be thrown off a #Brexit cliff edge simply save the Tory Party:  Nah I don't think so! 
BREXIT SHOCK: Europe panics as hundreds of THOUSANDS of jobs at risk from no deal EU exit  
"Negotiating Brexit is like making love to a beautiful woman..."  #SwissDavis 
'You hope there’s some..clever strategy...but there’s a fear that the public’s focus on getting Brexit...and..attachment to the unity of the Conservative party is..driving us to a no-deal' nice summary by @mrchriswilkins in this great piece by @paulwaugh  
Despite military Presence, IPOB Rally In South-East, South-south for Election Boycott“The boycott and the ‘sit at home’ will serve as a referendum for Biafra, international observers will be on ground to monitor the boycott,” IPOB said. 
If you're against #brexit in Scotland (and bare in mind I'm not a party member), you're only hope of denying May a majority to ram through brexit and shaft Scotland is to make sure NONE of the Scottish seats go to tories by voting for the SNP.  | #scotref #indyref2 
The next #Brexit Minister Failing Grayling HS2 #Dispatches #C4 #channel4 #FailingGrayling 
As I speak now Mazi Nnamdi Kanu is on BBC discussing how the UPCOMING Referendum will be done; while his DETRACTORS are on Facebook crying and gossiping. 
Already been through shock, denial, anger, and grief at Brexit. Now? Now I'm just finessing my rat-trapping skillz so I can roast them over open fires and survive, yo.  
A no-deal Brexit would be like an “atomic bomb for everybody,” Maltese finance minister says  
Brexit latest  
Off to do #skypapers tonight, ready to attack the idea of no-deal Brexit like  
UK in EU ChallengeVote Leave broke the Law and Brexit is being challenged by the UK in EU challenge.   
Heard from a few people today that it's looking more and more likely Tories will call a general election to try and restore their majority so they can ram through mays Brexit deal without DUP assistance. | Time to take back unionist seats to call #scotref #indyref2 | #indyref2 
If we're heading for a no-deal Brexit, why is the Government not acting now? says, @Telegraph 
"We don’t owe the EU any money as a Brexit divorce bill..."As it turns out the legal position is that the EU owes us €10 billion for the return of capital the UK has in the EIB." Martin Howe QC & @CharlieElphicke#StandUp4Brexit 
#president @KRLS: "The Spanish state has not accepted that sentence and has withdrawn the European Arrest Warrant, and insists that the referendum on October first was a violent rebellion. A rebellion with ballot boxes is a strange rebellion, isn’t it?" #CinemaForPeace 
Chris Grayling’s Brexit ferry fiasco has taken a further twist after the reported backer of the startup company with no ships that was awarded a £13.8m contract said it never had a stake in the venture.#bbcpm #c4news #newsnight 
Just watching #C4news, they had John Mann & Angela Smith on . They were talking about Brexit. At the start of their interview, I said to wifey "... at some point, they will mention antisemitism ..." and guess what?  I was right .... wifey was well impressed!!  
May to ask MPs for further fortnight's grace in Brexit talks  
Corbyn and May’s brexit strategies have been determined, ultimately, by desire to keep their parties together.For May that’s meant leaving CU, for Corbyn “keeping PV on the table”.In Norway+ offer, Corbyn has chosen country over party. With no-deal, May has done the opposite.  
This is what Cameron did over Brexit  
#president @KRLS: "Tomorrow will start, in Madrid, the trial against members of the former Government of Catalonia, social leaders and the former president of the Catalan parliament, to organize a referendum for the independence of our country" #CinemaForPeace 
Have you noticed how Mac the Knife is letting Jezza & others take all the heat on Brexit? Labour are cocking this up big time & he doesn’t want his prints anywhere near it; that’s the togetherness of Socialists & Marxists for you! 
This is the full video from @citizentommy talking about our path to Independence. Please share and let’s ask @NicolaSturgeon @theSNP @theSNPMedia to help Scotland send a strong message only days before Brexit is forced upon us. Will you join us, Nicola? Will your colleagues?  
Brand New Petition out TODAY !!!!! Come on folks you know what to do Petition Revoke Art.50 if there is no Brexit plan by the 25 of FebruaryWritten by @AjMillsey1SIGN and RT the heck out of it!!!#RevokeArticle50 #RevokeRemainRebuild 
Nigel Farage: “I feel like a Europhile compared to Corbyn. I mean wow, this is full on. Corbyn may be doing badly in the polls in terms of his own popularity, but in terms of preventing a 2nd referendum I have to say I think he is doing a rather good job.” 
It doesn't matter what Theresa May and/or Jeremy Corbyn decide to do. Any form of #Brexit will make the British people poorer and take away our FOM rights. And that's exactly what TM and JC want. It's now up to Parliament to save us from this potential disaster. #RevokeArticle50 
‘It might be too late for Britain to wake up from its Brexit nightmare. It’s not too late for Scotland. The independence campaign is the alarm clock ringing to wake Scotland up to reality’.  #IndyRef2 
Imagine living in a world where a Pakistani is telling an British person whether they are allowed into a new "Brexit Party" @RaheemKassam The absolute state of Britain. 
You told us we would have considerable upsides and no downsides during the referendum. You lied to us then I assume that you are lying to us now. Plan-less and clue-less.  
Remainers are complaining about the slowdown in the British economy. They should look at the recession in Italy and Germany and probably France. Given the uncertainty over Brexit we are doing comparatively well. 
John Mann says he thinks Brexit won't make his constituents poorer. He's either lying or deluded, but which?#c4news 
Forgetting, that the civil service has already calculated that Brexit leaves us worse off in all scenarios so any opportunities are simply to limit damage...For a Brexiter like yourself to suggest we follow a plan written by unelected civil servants... Irony just got cremated. 
We’re delighted to have been invited to Dublin this Friday by @campaignforleo & @simoncoveney to discuss Brexit. As children of the peace process, we’re standing up for young people across NI and this is another great opportunity to have our voices heard  
Those were the days...filled with hope not dread...truly for the many not the few..Please just #RevokeA50 Stop #Brexit & #Remain in Control in the EU with our Best Possible Deal.Don't ruin OUR FUTURE! 
No let's get it right May will give in to Corbyn's demands. May just like Corbyn is trying to deliver Brexit in name only.  
There is no coming struggle Paul. It is over, you lost. #Brexit is coming on 29th March, hopefully, a no deal brexit. I'm afraid you are just going to have to live with the fact, or move to a country within the EU. Might I suggest France. It's very peaceful over there. 
Hang on, I thought we were using warships as ferries for Brexit? Presumably we are using ferries as warships to make up for the fact that our warships are being used as ferries.  
ATTENTION PATRIOTSPLEASE GIVE A FOLLOW/RT FOR FELLOW CONSERVATIVE ACROSS THE POND @secretstranger9Help this Brexit PatriotREACH MILESTONE 15K  
A Trump adviser, Wilbur Ross, described Brexit is a ‘God-given opportunity’ to steal trade from UK. Here's how America intends to do it...and they'll succeed if people like Fox & Mogg get their way.The British people are being cheated.  #PeoplesVote 
Pathetic stunt.....a Labour MP (a LABOUR MP) Publicly petitions her own party against its Brexit policy that was determined at conference less than 5 months ago. 'Ordinary' members have been summarily expelled with no right of appeal for less. One rule for everybody please.  
#Brexit is a coup. A #NoDealBrexit will be by design - not by accident. We can #RevokeA50 at any time. May is demanding we pretend otherwise. 
Don’t remember anyone talking about “Deal” or “No Deal” when EU referendum was held.Options were Leave or Remain & Leave won!Had we left immediately after referendum, it would all be settled now.Mrs May should tell the #EU we voted to Leave & that’s what we are doing!#Brexit  
I voted Brexit because i wanted immigration control, borders closed, sovereignty, governed not by Brussels, our fishing waters back, and not pay anymore money to the EU. So stop telling me i didn't know what i voted for because otherwise you can't read, or your absolutely deluded 
Failing #Grayling Transport secretary refuses to reveal no-deal Brexit ferry contract cancellation fee that is funded by taxpayers!  
One paradoxical aspect of the Brexit riddle is that the higher the perceived No Deal risk becomes now, the less likely it may be: 1. Rising fear of No Deal produces majority for steps to avert it (e.g. Cooper amendment)2. Rising fear No Deal of it produces Lab votes for Deal  
No version of #Brexit will give us frictionless trade with the #EU. @Theresa_May’s Brexit doesn’t. Nor does @JeremyCorbyn’s. So what’s the difference between free trade and frictionless trade? @Jon_Danzig explains on the @Reasons2Remain Facebook page. Link  
Every MP should take half an hour to ponder this lovely picture. It’s her future, not yours. #Brexit 
David Davis has said that a 20% fall in the value of the pound in the event of a no-deal Brexit "might not be such a bad thing"! A fall in the value of the pound will cause big price increases - hitting household budegts the hardest... #BrexitShambles 
Why are Leave voters so permanently angry?  They’re getting their way aren’t they? It’s the rest of us who have the right to be angry. #Brexit 
At the tail-end of 2017, a Conservative minister was quoted as saying, “reverse #Brexit and we destroy the party; go ahead with it and we destroy the country”.May's priority is all too horribly apparent. 
Hahahahahahaha fucking hell, get Aaron Ramsey’s agent to negotiate brexit mate. We’d come away with fuckin France or somethin  
Government to miss Brexit trade deal target  
IPOB Volunteer squad today shutdown Anambra , Aba  and other parts of Biafraland on serious evangelism on IPOB proposed Sit at home / Biafra Referendum on  16th Feb 2019. We don’t need Nigeria anymore and we can...  
WE'RE HEADING BACK TO COURT!We have been granted a hearing on 21st February at the Royal CourtsThe PM’s decision - to use the referendum results as the basis for leaving the EU was irrational, given that result was procured by the illegal activities of the Leave campaign.  
Rebellion usually involves violence. But the people facing trial in Spain tomorrow only agitated for a referendum. 
Transport secretary refuses to reveal no-deal Brexit ferry contract cancellation fee  
And it demonstrates its commitment to democracy by reversing (or trying to reverse) every referendum result that goes against it.  
Keir’s a StarmerWaiting in the skyHe’d like to cancel Brexit But Jez won’t let him try.  
This woman will attempt to screw the brexit process again this week  
The negative effects of Brexit are stamped all over the latest UK economic data. It's clear now: economic growth is slowing  
When do you think Remainers will finally accept that they lost the 2016 referendum? 
After noting the astonishing similarities between the Fast Show's Swiss Toni & the Brexit Show's David Davis last week, I'm delighted to report that we will be introducing Swiss Davi to the nation on tomorrow's @LBC show. Massive thanks to @monstroso for making the introductions. 
It won't be. This is just another lie. But in quotes.This is why people don't trust the mainstream media and you end up getting Brexit and a fascist in the White House.  
Congrats Tim. She will. And she’ll be reporting on Brexit. 
Liam Fox’s trade department has secretly admitted to some of Britain’s biggest businesses that the 40 free trade deals the minister promised to have ready by Brexit day are “unlikely” to materialise.  
Labour MPs are increasingly wobbly on Brexit—24 of them abstained or voted against an amendment that would have prevented no deal  
People in this picture are the reason why brexit has been such a painful & laborious process, remainers take pleasure in brexit being a struggle, so they can criticise, in reality they are the reason the deal we get want be as good as it could have been  
deaf ears blinded eyes twisted words  dead soul of @UKLabour death throes of democracy..I pledge NEVER to vote @UKLabour again unless it makes a stand against #BrexitRT if you make that same pledge #RevokeA50#PeoplesVote#Stopbrexit#FBPE 
Do you really want to wait till summer when the cotton is high?People have cottoned on already - #Brexit is bad for the country.Call #Brexit off now.#RevokeA50 Or give the people the #FinalSay 
I can think of few better ways to get the middle classes to go "Sod it, we might as well give Corbyn a try" than actually letting the country go through a No Deal Brexit.  
Warning  Theres a Soft Brexit on the Horizon OR another Referendum ( latter more  unlikely) BUT... be aware that #TheresaMay is bracing herself  for a General Election this YEAR on the back of the Boris - ReesMogg plotting, who are currently eating Theresa ALIVE ! 
Post Brexit, we'll need new trading partners, Russia's obvious choice w. huge resources & market, but we can't have that can we! Following US' lead, Mr. WarmongerWilliamson, ramps up Russophobia following US Admiral Richardson's lead. @georgegalloway @afshinrattansi @marydejevsky 
Would the PM deliberately pursuing a no-deal Brexit qualify?  
I have the solution. We should divide the country in two. Half gets their bonkers No Deal Rule Britannia BrexitHalf gets to RemainWe’ll check in after a year and see how it’s going.I bags the Remain half. 
NEW: Just spotted Herman Van Rompuy arriving at the British Ambassador’s residence in Brussels. Intriguingly I’m told that he is here to meet @DLidington - sources say the meeting’s been set up at @theresa_may request to discuss changes to the #brexit backstop.  
Well, Anna, time is running out and we now need radical action. There’s no point talking the talk if no action is taken. It’s time to Stop Brexit using whatever means possible - there is no mandate for this. People voted to be better off and £350m extra a week for the NHS.  
After 50 years of voting for the Conservative Party, I will, unless Brexit is delivered fully, resign my membership & cast my vote in favour of his new Brexit Party…If only to keep any “heat” on European Council’s charming President, Donald Tusk!-Telegraph Letters#Brexit #EU 
Almost everybody I speak to would be delighted with that! After all isn’t a “No-Deal Brexit” actually just #Brexit.  
Ok. I want to talk about stockpiling because it's a really good example of why, every day politicians dither, our economy is bleeding more and more money.Stockpiling isn't the most common Brexit contingency action, but it's up there and it's caught the public's imagination (1/9)  
Once again it's all about the Conservative party, the rest of us don't count.....we never have. 
Explains why May has thrown in her lot with those in her Party who want a crash out #Brexit, her offer to Labour is a sham to waste more time & prevent Parliament stopping her & both Labour & sensible Tories need to wise up to this before it’s too late. @peoplesvote 
'Brexit Party will SWEEP country!' Kate Hoey warns Farage's new party will WIN elections  
Very good piece on May's Brexit thinking by @paulwaugh. HuffPo missing a trick by not partnering with some kind of tinned goods supplier:  
Per @peston, a UK health minister has helpfully confirmed that the Westminster government are stockpiling bodybags for a No-Deal Brexit.We're living through a shambles of historic proportions.  
Seems the second referendum movement is dying a death. If so this means that the UK will be the first country to defy the EU convention of always having a 2nd vote to correct the "mistake" of first. Onwards & upwards we go. UK leaves the EU at 23:00 on 29 March 2019. It's the law 
Brexit explained......  
Dominic Grieve on the UK being #remainernow "The evidence is that they [public] know well and by a growing margin that Brexit is an ill-fated venture and they want a say on the outcome. They are against no-deal because they know it is a risk-laden fantasy"  
Delingpole: PM May and Her ‘Snake-Like Civil Servants’ Deliberately Sabotaged Free Trade Brexit  
Massive issue for UK business is that EU trade deals will not be rolled over for Brexit day ...third countries will operate freely in the market and seek advantage from a UK weakened by Brexit. No surprise for us on @CommonsIntTrade Committee 
The truly alarming figure here is that 33% would back a #NoDealBrexit even if it damaged the UK. So 1/3rd of Britons are completely lost to the Brexit cult.Majority of voters want Theresa May to delay Brexit, exclusive Independent poll finds  
As a gesture of just how serious the problems we are facing with Brexit, Healtcare and housing crisis getting worse by the day Leo should cancel ALL of the St Patrick Day foreign junkets of the ministers to far flung places,which cost an absolute fortune. 
"The public are not fools. The evidence is that they know well and by a growing margin that Brexit is an ill-fated venture and they want a say on the outcome."Dominic Grieve says that insisting all will be well if Brexit goes through now is an abdication of an MPs responsibility  
Please tell me I just didn't hear on SkyNews that the Brexit Secretary @SteveBarclay is tonight making his "first" visit to Brussels since being appointed in November ?I mean it's not like there's been anything important to discuss since then, is it ?  
FUCK THE FUCKING PARTY, YOU ROBOTIC RATBAG. SAVE THE FUCKING COUNTRY. Why a no-deal Brexit is now May's fallback plan to save her party – and herself  
Grieve: an engaging article.“The public are not fools. The evidence is that they know well & by a growing margin that Brexit is an ill-fated venture & they want a say on the outcome. They are against no-deal because they know it is a risk-laden fantasy.   
- So it was all a dream:  Trump isn’t President and Brexit isn’t happening.- No dear, that was the dream.  You’re still in the nightmare. 
I'd be feeling worried about the possibility of book burnings after Brexit, if I didn't know that most of the population will not actually be able to identify what a book is. 
Not an easy week for those of our members who haven't obtained ECMT permits to operate within Europe post-Brexit. We've received many distressed & angry messages, for many their life's work is at stake. They'll now have to wait at least until end of feb for EU plans to be adopted 
. @ayocaesar on #TyskySour discussing the gratuitous cruelty of the 'settled status' scheme for EU nationals after Brexit.Full show here:  
BBC 6’oclock news - I was pleased that there was a modicum of admission that there are other factors apart from BREXIT that contributed to the drop in U.K. GDP! It was very reluctant but good to hear that countries in the EU were suffering in places more than the UK! 
I’ve only just seen Liam Fox accusing Jeremy Corbyn of peddling ‘dangerous delusions’ over Brexit. Mrs Kettle is going to be on the phone to Mr Pot all night long. 
"The chances of having a second referendum are as close to nil as I could imagine," says the man who described Brexit negotiations as the "easiest trade deal in history".  
Wow, just wow. Who still thinks Brexit is a good idea. And why should they be listened to? The fact that such a high percentage of the population support this absolute farce is surely a condemnation of the British education system. 
Brexit will deliver for the poor by pushing up their wages, @Steven_Woolfe writes 
Really interesting from @paulwaugh: if you’re wondering just what the fuck Theresa May is up to on Brexit, this article might yield some clues   
PIKE "Brexit will increase the UK's lethality"MAINWARING "You stupid boy!”  
Brexit was purchased. It is not a coup for 'the people', it is a right wing coup for the rich and powerful. It needs to be stopped now, before its cost is felt by millions of people. #PeoplesVote 
Why seeking an extension to Article 50 would be a terrible idea.By Martin Howe QC, Chairman of Lawyers for Britain#Brexit #Article50 
The Brexit betrayal is happening. RT if you want to leave on WTO rules saving £39bn! 
"Brexit feels eerily like Lehman 2.0, if in slightly slower motion and on the scale of a nation and continent." @Peston on why we could be crashing out without wanting to or meaning to 
A massive 82% of you have said that obstructing Brexit in any way should be ILLEGAL! Share this and let the political establishment know that the people will not tolerate this disgraceful act against the British national interest.  
'Brexit Party will SWEEP country!' Kate Hoey warns Farage's new party will WIN elections  
Michel Barnier today vowed that the EU will not make any more concessions on the Brexit deal, insisting the UK must give ground.Concessions what concessions ? The EU have given us nothing. They have devised the deal, and May has just agreed. This is Alice in Wonderland stuff. 
Brexiteer peer says Tusk is the reason LEAVE would WIN again in second Brexit referendum  
The Tory Government is Stockpiling Brexit bodybags.......  
Theresa May and her snake-like civil servants sabotaged free trade Brexit offer...  
Kenyan flowers exported to the Netherlands, sold at Dutch Flower Auctions and then exported to the UK as flowers from Holland?How much more of this?After Brexit, the UK must buy direct from the producers. Set our own tariffs. Cut out the EU middle men! 
#Brexit The time has come surely when we need to deliver 3 million brexiteers  on peaceful street demonstrations across the UK to signal our outrage at the political class who are trying to thwart our #Brexit 
Why a no-deal Brexit is likely - ITV News  
Very useful meeting with @Keir_Starmer @tony4rochdale @karinsmyth The #Brexit clock is ticking but the British govt has no plan. Ireland will not be the #Brexit casualty. 
We owe them nothing not even a brass farthing! Let them whistle for it.....Brexit news latest: Brussels warns ignoring £39bn divorce bill will have CONSEQUENCES | Politics | News |  
I’m in a spoons avin a pint of brexit. Simple as 
I disagree with with "recovered from the last financial crisis" Brexit is a result of Tory austerity from that crisis. Britain hasn't recovered, it's a country held together with band-aids & they're about to be ripped off.  
Anyone else sick of hearing Brexit public service announcements on the radio? 
Brexit news: Adonis fears May could hand Farage's Brexit Party 'GIFT' | UK | News |  
46 days to go till Brexit day.Cameron told us it was our decision & the People voted  leave.May promised to deliver Brexit.Promise, Promises. That's from two Tory PMs.If they break their promises Nigel Farage &  will punish them for their lies. 
The health minister Stephen Hammond has written to a Tory MP to provide assurance to one of the MP’s constituents that the NHS is stockpiling bodybags as insurance against a no-deal Brexit. This is not a joke. See attached exerts from letter.  
Good to see so many young people waking up to the need to deliver on Brexit..  
TLDR: If you're a Remainer, be afraid, be very afraid.If you're a 'clean Brexit' Leaver, you'll be delighted. The PM is being swayed by internal polls/focus groups showing she's more popular when she flags no-deal. 
This might be why he 'forgot' to include demands for a 2nd referendum in his letter to the PM  
Freedom of movement has not contributed to the depression of wages @GloriaDePiero. Every single piece of evidence shows us that. Neither is FoM “a free market in human beings”. It is a beautiful reciprocal right for all EU citizens; Brexit will strip British citizens of it. 1/  
New song from 'Brian the Lion'  #Brexit #DaveNotSteve  
2/ Brake: "If he wants to secure British jobs stopping Brexit through a People's Vote is the best way to do it." 
Theresa May is now seriously contemplating a no-deal Brexit. Here's the story of why: 
New:I'm told there's apparently NO discussion of Brexit on the agenda for Cabinet tomorrow.* Penny Mordaunt is talking about sustainable development* Michael Gove is talking about waste* Andrea Leadsom is giving an update on parliamentary business46 days to go... 
Blairite MP Angela Smith makes a complete fool of herself after being turned away from Labour Party HQ with a People's Vote petition calling for a second Brexit Referendum 
Now South Korea confirms that a post #Brexit Britain will have to negotiate a new trade deal on worse terms than the one it has via the EU. Well this wasn't totally predictable.#Leavers that's both Japan and South Korea that have stated the absolute bloody obvious.Comments? 
Nearly everyone I speak to young and old cannot stand Brexit or the current leaders in both main parties , they are seen as liars and cheats who are ruining our country on failed politics. No-one is happy. Brexiters are a minority. 
Peston now joining those of us (see also @Sime0nStylites) of calm disposition who have begun to get seriously worried about the trajectory of the UK Brexit situation. And for the right reasons - there is no obvious way out of the mess the PM has created.  
Tories urge May to pause Brexit.“This is not just about dotting Is or crossing Ts, this is about giving the nation time to consider what is a monumental decision for us all."What's wrong with that? How is it any different from May's constant delays?  
Gosh! Poor Guy.... this has really rattled your cage hasn’t it!  Well if @theresa_may and all of you EU leaders don’t ensure that Brexit is delivered in full by 29/3/19, there will be millions of us ready & happy to vote for @Nigel_Farage ‘s new #BrexitParty 
Brexit has exposed the shortcomings in how Britain is run  
Barnier says Britain must give ground to break Brexit impasse.He doesn't sound like someone who is going to cave at the 11th hour, does he?  
Good news hurriedly shoved down to the bottom of the BBC news feed. BBC News - UK signs post-Brexit trade deal with Switzerland 
At every level the UK establishment and its toxic media is seeking to derail Brexit. BBC, LBC and most of the dead tree press are in full cry. 
BREAKING: Brexit cancelled!  
Hilarious if it wasn’t so depressing Farage isn’t sure he can support his own new Brexit Party because of the anti-Muslim hatred of his co-Founder - 6 days in!Kate Hoey welcomes the party’s existenceDue Diligence is sorely lacking  
Whinging anti-democratic losers @peoplesvote_hq - we’ve had a people’s vote, REMAIN LOST - if you honestly believed in democracy then help implement the referendum of 2016 first @campbellclaret 
Major General Julian Thompson: WTO Brexit will be good for British defence. Join the fastest growing Brexit movement @  
This is going to be the biggest con in history.They have made Brexit all about the backstop so when it gets removed it will look like we've won and got a good deal.When the reality is the CONservatives have paid 39 billion for a shit deal. 
The fascists should be cleared off our streets. Those who undermine democracy by abusing its freedoms have no right to enjoy them. #PeoplesVote #Brexit  
Nigel Farage - the man who more than anyone enabled the Brexit fiasco then ran off to America when some real work was still to be done  - has now helped create a new political party and .... (this thread is worth reading)  
Out of thousands of guests from all over the world that I’ve met since the referendum, only a handful (four that I can recall) have suggested that Brexit was a good plan. The rest all think we’re bonkers.  
It's up to you to clarify what's happening with Brexit, Michel Barnier tells Britain  
Why Brexit reminds me eerily of the last days of Lehman, in slower motion but on a bigger scale  
Get signing folks!!Petition: Revoke Art.50 if there is no Brexit plan by the 25th of February  
“Britain hits the buffers” crows man who was right at the top of the government that agreed the Brexit referendum in the first place.  
I had a detailed #Brexit discussion with MPs @Keir_Starmer @karinsmyth @tony4rochdale. Irish @Labour is happy to cooperate with our @UKLabour friends in these uncertain times, while stressing the importance of no border on the island of #Ireland. 
Farage still apparently on board with The Brexit Party despite its leader having expressed some deeply uncomfortable views. Having gone in fairly deep today I get the impression he's so desperate for a platform that he hasn't checked her out. 
Stand by for UK Pieds Noirs as not-so-young Brits living in France, Spain will have to return home once medical cover goes after Brexit. They dare not apply in France for resident status as income too low - just like UK under @sajidjavid  proposals 
. @kurthomer @LeadNotLeaveUK - You're correct the #ECHR is separate from the EU but we're hearing about many worrying things being smuggled in through the #Brexit backdoor.  Theresa May to consider axeing Human Rights Act after Brexit, minister reveals  
Government to miss Brexit trade deal target  
Brexit plan or no Brexit plan, the EU has always been a bully, says @TheBluetrot 
Throughout history, working-class people have been shamefully derided by the elite as irrational fools. What is different today, post-Brexit, is that it is considered progressive to do so, writes Antigonos Sochos. 
On with @IvanYatesNT at 5.30pm to talking no confidence in Minister Simon Harris and no confidence in British govt Brexit 
Only 1 MP has ever tabled an amendment to hold a 2nd Referendum on Brexit. That MP was Jeremy Corbyn. Please do not take my word for this. See for yourself. Ponder, for just a moment, why the Umunnaites are determined that you will never know this.   
People who went to expensive private schools and never did a hard day's work in their lives, let alone ever gone hungry, like to claim that Britain 'will be fine' in whatever deranged hard Brexit these scammers drag us into. It will be real people paying the price 
Those that claim to be "Proud Scots" but insist that Scotland should be treated like a region, and should have not only unelected governments, but also suffer economic ruin from Brexit *really* need to do some thinking. Small time, north british regionalism isn't dignified. 
6/ More than 50,000 people have now signed a petition calling on the Labour leader to back a second referendum. Labour MP Angela Smith was turned away from Labour HQ when she attempted to hand in the petition this afternoon. 
 were you pissed when you backed her on the VONC .... you do remember that don’t you ... also May has ignored JC for 2 yrs . Also she wouldn’t even allow the brexit secs to do their job go cheer ya self up with another drink you lush .  
Barnier says Britain must give ground to break Brexit impasse  
My father in law has voted tory all his life.Says he will no longer give them his vote.Mainly because of brexit but also because of the cuts he's seen local services and of coarse our council going Bankrupt 
The Brexit effect has already cost Britain between 1.5 per cent and 2.5 per cent of GDP and real household incomes are lower by £1,500 on average. 
On a day @sinnfeinireland launches proposals for a 2Billion Brexit Stabilization Fund 2 invest in infrastructure the Government is planning to take axe to capital spend in Health, Transport and other Depts . And all because of the NCH overspend fiasco under @SimonHarrisTD watch! 
'Nightmare scenario'French firms start to panic about no deal Brexit.30,000 French companies export to UK.In 7 weeks they could have tariffs on their exports, making them uncompetitive.With WTO tariffs the UK will be £8,000,000,000 a year BETTER off. 
Talked about September family reunion with my dad "What will you talk about then, when brexit is over"Me: " I didn't know we stopped brexit, because the only way we stop talking about brexit is if we stop brexit. If we get a deal we're talking about it for the next 10 years" 
Gerard Batten's UKIP is now attacking Nigel Farage's Brexit Party for its anti-Islam views...  
Awkward..  UKIP is still THE Party for Brexit & for the UK. Membership is growing, activists are out and about talking to people and candidates are ready to fight elections. Brexiteers: Join UKIP, stand up for Brexit and Stand up #ForTheNation  
46 DAYS left to Brexit and thus to undo 45 years earnest joint endeavour which has given so much to our Country and to Europe.  
In which trade guru David Davis extols the virtues of Brexit in that it gives us a floating currency.David, we already have a floating currency.Our sovereign trade policy will be pointless unless it secures us superior trade deals.Which it won't.What a moron you are.  
Downer for the day: imagine all of the great stuff Britain could be doing right now if it wasn't doing Brexit. 
“I found Corbyn's letter interesting in tone and in content," Barnier said of the Labour leader's Brexit proposals, sent to May. Something has to give on the British side."... Really? We do not need a Withdrawal Agreement to leave the EU. No CU - WTO now.   
Families are £1,500 a year worse off because of Brexit - and that's before we even leave. 
fuck i just saw a Leave sticker and didn't have any anti-Brexit stickers on me so i panicked and peeled it off. poor effort, next time i'll deface it. 
The UK Defence Secretary says the armed forces should "enhance our lethality" after Brexit.Gavin Williamson also called on other European countries not to be "distracted by the notion of an EU army".#46DaystoBrexit 
UK establishment has pumped so much head-up-arse, God Save The Queen propaganda into the system over the years, and yet that same establishment are now shocked that people believe Brexit will work purely on the back of blind patriotism. They’ve manufactured a perfect pish storm. 
"If they could talk, I am certain they'd be against Brexit."Britain's pet owners are uncertain over travel rules, pet food and fear losing European vets due to Brexit  
Someone leaked me an initial dradt of the PM's statement for tomorrow.Strong & stable Brexit means Brexit success of it will of the people deliver deal good deal come together backstop doesn't mean backstop here have some more of my magic money tree fruit please send help 
Farage refusing to say whether he still supports his Brexit Party six days after it was founded is the most on-brand thing ever  
Theresa May is making clear she is fixed to her red lines and she’s trying to run down the clock in the hope of holding Parliament hostage with the threat of no deal. The time has come for the Brexit decision to be put back to the people.  
I know Brexit gets all the attention but this is an utterly extraordinary admission.A GOVT HAS ADMITTED ITS OWN POLICY MAY HAVE BEEN RESPONSIBLE FOR PEOPLE GOING HUNGRY. And it came out almost matter of factly in a Commons question time. 
She was in America promoting Scottish business interests to a market that we need to deal with more because of people like your Brexit-supporting boss. 
My isn’t this a perfect example of the enlightened Tories emboldened by Brexit. What a vile disgusting tweet.  
Brexit: Supermarket Boss Admits EU Migration Used to Keep Wages Down  
Food industry warns Gove on #Brexit 'crisis'  
Back to London... #Brexit #Gibraltar #ByeByeSunShine @visit_gibraltar #visitgibraltar 
I can’t find ANY British media covering this MAJOR news from yesterday! Brexit: Britain's trade application that the WTO rejected - TruePublica  
WATCH: Dave says if there's a #PeoplesVote he'd now vote to stay in the #EU.Demand a #PeoplesVote on the #Brexit deal:  
We're in Liverpool Hope University having some really great conversations about Brexit. (I know! I don't often get to use the word oxymoron!)Drinks at 6pm at the Students Union. Come along!  
Again with this evidence-free smear? This from an MP who is fine with no deal Brexit for others, while his investment outfit set up in Dublin specifically because of the economic risk and uncertainty of no deal Brexit.  
Joe from Corby changed his mind from backing a deal to supporting a #PeoplesVote so that we can clarify what leave and remain actually mean. Now that the terms of Brexit are clear to see, isn't it time we put it to the people?  
‘Though I voted to Remain in the EU at the referendum, I am now going to spout Lexiter gibberish.’  
"The founder of Nigel Farage’s new Brexit Party has a long history of making inflammatory comments about Muslims, BuzzFeed News can reveal." What a surprise... 
In 2016 at Seaford in Brexit debate a Leaver said "bring back the Empire". That was embarrassing. When you have defence secretary who wants to bring back gunboat "diplomacy", it is frightening.    
The most hopeless and hapless Transport Secretary ever, failing Grayling, blames everyone but himself for the Seaborne ferry #Brexit shambles.It is the Irish to blame for pulling the ships and his officials and Treasury for the legal adviceTime @theresa_may issued him his P45 
"She flunked the golden opportunity of Brexit. Flunked Indyref 2. Flunked the Education Bill. Flunked Named Persons, the 2017 election and now the Budget.  
Just heard on the news - ‘only 46 days to go’ It’s like the world’s shittest advent calendar #Brexit 
The media are very reluctant to tell you this but an increasing number of Local Labour Branches, 3 last week, are passing motions explicitly rejecting the Umunnaite People's Vote approach to Brexit and backing Jeremy Corbyn's Brexit Strategy. Doesn't suit the press narrative. 
Anyway before Brexit hits, if you wanna travel the world and make a ton of cool friends, join @BabasFlightClub - the travel club for high-flying millennials. We visited 4 continents last year, we'll be in the Philippines this month and Malta in April!  -  
It’s been 2 years, 7 months and 20 days since the referendum and it’s been fucking exhausting so far.And regardless of what happens in March, no deal, deal, extend article 50, revoke article 50, people’s vote or anything else. This is only just starting. 
So much of what @jeremycorbyn  makes sense. Common sense. It is scandalous what the tories are doing to our Society. They must pay at the next General Election for the disaster they have created, to the NHS, for brexit, what they created aided & abetted by their pals in the MSM.  
After Brexit, Ireland will be the only EU country to retain free movement with Britain   
Yes, happy birthday to Dennis Skinner, the 'Beast of Bolsover'.His continual votes for the tories are helping to get brexit over the line. And while this will hurt the poorest people in our society the most, the important thing is, he'll be just fine. 
"Off the Richter scale of incompetence" - Labour's Andy McDonald criticises Transport Secretary Chris Grayling over government's axed #Brexit ferry contract 
As Peston claims ‘revealed will’ of Labour members on Brexit, more CLPs reject “people’s vote” and back Corbyn  
Just to clarify: I said that I see no majority for a referendum in the HoC. I did not talk about polls or revocation. 
I've had a few people tell me that the lack of a 2nd referendum is Labours fault because Tory MPs would flock to support it if Lab proposed it.  Actually looks like 4 Tory MPs agree with 2nd ref.  Yes, 4.  So go back and think of another reason why this is all Labours fault.  
I won’t be supporting this Tory Brexit. We need a public vote on May’s Deal so Labour can campaign for UK to remain strong in the EU @RCorbettMEP 
"The chances of having a second referendum are as close to nil as I could imagine."International Trade Secretary Liam Fox believes Parliament has a duty to deliver the result of the referendum and says the ideas Labour has put forward 'aren’t workable'.  
Labour must stop the Tory Brexit dream  
This short clip is so important. In a few seconds @SteveBakerHW lays out that the 'ruling political class' do not want Brexit and thus we can see why we are now drowning in delay obfuscation and confusion. Same lies deceit to get us in 'Common Market' read  
"The parallels between Brexit and the maybe three historical events I have even the faintest inkling of are striking", say MPs  
Boris Johnson says the UK needs to assess its foreign aid situation, as post-Brexit it’s unclear exactly how much countries will have to send to us. 
British ‘lethality’? Gavin Williamson’s brain has gone absent without leave #r4today #WATO#Brexit 
I fucking hate Jeremy Corbyn.If Brexit happens with no Labour opposition, I will NEVER vote Labour again in my lifetime.  
Thoughts on how the EU's Eurozone difficulties interact with Germany's China shock and Brexit.   
We discussed important national issues  to the Muslim community - wearing of Hijab, The 2019 Census, referendum, working with Gvt agencies in the war against extremist ideas and radicalization of the youth and support H.E. @Kenyatta initiative to unite and reconcile the nation. 
Summary:1. I've just spent 2 hours stockpiling cat food for Brexit.2. I've also cancelled my long-term (since Dec 2018) standing order to the Far-Right Labour Party.3. And have decided to join Our Limp Dumbs instead.4. Talk about being a complete Moran!5. That's all, folks!  
Hard Brexit: a straight shot of bathtub gin, with no imported botanicals  
Labour has approx 530k members. We are the largest party in Europe However, 17.4 million people and 65% of constituencies voted leave. In addition, a recent survey shows Labour will lose 3m votes if it frustrates #Brexit.Are you intentionally trying to damage the Labour vote? 
250 companies are in talks to relocate to the Netherlands from Brexit Britain. These business partners explain why they're leaving  
En route to London to continue campaigning for the protection of the Good Friday Agreement right to choseThe UKG are insisting NI born Irish citizens are British Yet under the GFA we have the right to be Irish or British or both. A right currently being undermined #Brexit  
My new blog... 7 urgent Brexit travel need to knows. Will your passport still be valid? Buy currency now or wait? Will EHICs still work? and more...  
It's time that the PM listen to young people who are very concerned about the future UK health services, as they will be the ones bearing the brunt of brexit more than anyone else! Young people are demanding a #PeoplesVote 
Self government changing the way we’re governed:  the great Brexit wake up call  
Never forget this was the promise made to the people of the UK "Your decision. Not politicians. Not Parliament. Just you." We were told by the establishment to trust them and they would deliver on what the people decided #Brexit Sign up to #TheBrexitParty 
Scotland dreads Brexit. But is it enough to boost Scottish independence?  
The Brexit Party founder's history of inflammatory comments do not just extend to Muslims. She has written about "Mongoloid eyes" and "white girls mixed with demented older black men". Farage declining to say if he'll continue to support the party.  
Leaving the ERM was good. Voting for Brexit was good. The predicted economic Armageddon never arrived. A WTO Brexit will be good, with a positive economic outcome. We don’t believe the scare stories any longer. 
The closer we get to Brexit, the worse the impact is getting. There is still time, however, to avoid this chaos. Demand a People's Vote now >  
More from the founder of Farage's Brexit party: "There is also some truth in the statement that Muslim men were impregnating white British girls to create Muslim babies”. Remember Farage said he was quitting UKIP because it had become "obsessed" with Islam  
Founder of new Brexit party claimed pubs are being turned into mosques: “Just imagine if even a small proportion of these pubs get turned into Mosques. That is what seems to be happening in East Anglia.”  
I’ve resigned as SDLP Brexit Spokesperson , remaining a party member.  
It makes me both sad and angry that anti-Brexit activists like Gina Miller feel it appropriate to hijack a cause on which the UK has a proud progressive record to try and further their agenda of seeking to reverse the democratic will of the British people.  
Just seen @Femi_Sorry at uni with @OFOCBrexit standing up for young people who didn’t vote for Brexit and now supporting a people’s vote  #PeoplesVote 
How does Labour, in its Brexit demands, square being in a Customs Union with being able to do our own Trade Deals with the World (ones that help us & not French farmers & German car makers) & taking back control of our borders? 17.4m people (incl loads of Labour voters) wanted 
Same 'source' that gave you the fake membership figures you were touting last week?1. Labour policy does not include the words 'People's Vote' - it says 'public'2. Corbyn is not in a position to say 'there will be...' anything - only the government can call a referendumPitiful  
Civil servants at the Department of Health are being encouraged to "reframe" their thoughts during the Brexit process. For example, instead of thinking "there's no way this is going to work", they should think "at least I can try". 
BREXIT SOLVED. This is massive. Don't tell Germany or they'll want #GermanyPlus too. 
Corbyn once more takes the piss out of @Keir_Starmer by removing the second referendum paragraph from the letter to May. #PeoplesVote #Brexit  
Though I voted to Remain in the EU at the referendum I have long been concerned about wages being depressed at the lower end of the wage market. Is there anything socialist about a free market in human beings?  
Sent from a loving fan #Brexit  
Blame Blair for the mess EU has made of Brexit, says @oflynnmep 
Delighted the terrified school prefects at the BBC are bringing back Crackerjack (Crackerjack!), echoing the greatest single truth to ooze out of Brexit: that the 17.4 million who voted for it is 10 & A HALF MILLION FEWER PEOPLE THAN WATCHED THE MORECOMBE & WISE 1977 XMAS SPECIAL 
READ THE ROOM GAVIN.For the love of God, Read the Goddam room.Brexit and your government is threatening a hard won peace in a nation you once destroyed. And you feel it’s an appropriate time to champion Britain's military 'lethality'. Shame on you.  
"My duty as an MP is crystal clear in trying to make sure they get both another say on #Brexit and that no deal is prevented." If only all Remainer MPs had this man's wisdom and backbone!  
You really are not fooling many by calling the dirtiest possible Brexit a “clean” Brexit.You merely highlight that you are dirty too and care not for the hardship it will bring to this poor nation, and the poorest most of all.How have you invested your money? Shorted the £? 
“Corbyn’s proposal would keep us locked in the Customs Union, locked in much of the Single Market forever & therefore Brexit, the promise that was made to the British people of coming out of the EU institutions, would be broken” - @BorisJohnson is spot-on 
some Labour activists would still believe Corbyn wants a 2nd referendum even if he marched down Whitehall holding a burning EU flag 
Arretez le Brexit! French students stop by #SODEM. 
UK signs post-Brexit trade deal with Switzerland  
Happy birthday Dennis Skinner, the longest serving Labour MP in parliament. He did promise to retire a decade or so ago. Not sure we need to hold him to it. We may need every vote to get #Brexit.  
"Each drone will be equipped with a unique but universally unworkable Brexit proposal developed by ERG Think Tanks. The pointlessly dense legalese will overwhelm enemy analysts while the airtime inexplicably given to them by the media will clog enemy communications."  
Yves Rocher is closing down its UK business before Brexit strikes. They say "It is with great regret that ... we will cease trading in the UK ... Indeed, the economic context does not allow [us] to continue trading in the UK".Must they spell it out? 
@realDonaldTrump We also need to show support to our Brexit allies across the pond! They must have their country back The EU is against capitalism and  a United Europe its all about control they care less about people 
The #EU has trade agreements with around 70 partners - from large economies like Japan to smaller ones like Dominica. These agreements are expected to no longer apply to the UK at the end of the transition period, or in a 'no deal' #Brexit. Find out more  
Since the referendum, the EU has completed trade deals with Japan, Canada and Singapore. Liam Fox has managed to roll over our existing arrangements with Chile and the Faroe Islands, despite having an entire department dedicated to nothing else.  
This is where it is going. Enough Labour will support an even further diluted May “deal” and a toothless worthless Brexit will be delivered  
And I thought #Brexit had at least one advantage... that taxpayer's money would not have to be wasted on his salary anymore  
Delicate civil servants to receive counselling to cope with Brexit stress. Man-up you throbbers.  
Counting the cost of Brexit.New report out today reveals household incomes are £1,500 a year lower than they were almost 3 years ago before the referendum. 
A clean Brexit presents us with huge opportunities - the civil service's Project After rightly recognises this. We will have flexibility that the EU won't - a floating currency, sovereign trade policy and greater support for U.K. business. 
Eve is demanding a #PeoplesVote because this #Brexit deal will harm her future and the futures of many generations to come. Join her. Write to your MP to demand a #PeoplesVote on the #Brexit deal:  @FFSake_ 
Extending Article 50 makes us look like such laughing stocks. Two and a half years since the referendum and the progress has been so slow. It's a bit like not preparing for an exam and asking the teacher to change the date last minute. So ridiculous.There is a plan B though, WTO 
Boris Johnson Again Offers To Back May’s Brexit Plan If She Manages To Make Limited Changes To The Test Of The Deal Ever had the feeling we’ve all been played??Wtf are you doing? @BorisJohnson @DavidDavisMP @Jacob_Rees_Mogg 
.@jeremycorbyn  why not make #milne Brexit Secretary and at least then it's official?Poor old .@Keir_Starmer  was a useful doormat but has completely  lost the will to fight! 
Can you blame Labour for Brexit? @SKZcartoons weighs it up... 
The Department of Health has sent civil servants a 'resilience toolkit' to help them cope with the five stages of Brexit grief and get back in the "feel good zone". Seriously...  
2017: Brexit means taking back control of our food production!2018: Look, there's been a few problems, but there WILL be adequate food.2019: *sobbing* please, not the dogs and cats... we can fix this... just... just let them go... 
People are literally suffering the side effects of the botched Brexit negotiations. Theresa May running down the clock is acting grossly irresponsible with peoples lives. Prescription drugs are already unavailable for some people. It’s just not on.  
The deal with Switzerland is the biggest trade agreement signed since the Brexit vote in 2016, with trade between the two countries worth more than £32bn a year in 2017  
Brexit has already cost families £1,500 on average. It is only going to get more expensive. No one voted for this. 
"Labour cannot ride the Brexit wave to socialism." Whatever your stance, this long essay by @jemgilbert is important reading. 
oh yes, it'll be disastrous; what's more the Tories are popping the champagne thinking how Brexit will provide them cover for the economic crash that will come as a result of their own disastrous austerity policies 
There's another headache for Chris Grayling as Eurotunnel take him to court over his no-deal Brexit ferry contracts.  
Don't forget: Jeremy Corbyn wanted the UK to trigger Article 50 the *morning after* the referendum. To quote the wisest of Brexit correspondents, still freaks my nut out to this day. 
The companies that run the Channel tunnel are suing the British government over its award of ferry contracts to handle shipments in a no-deal Brexit  
The Department of Health has sent staff a "Toolkit" reassuring them that it's "natural" to be going through the 5 stages of grief over Brexit. Civil servants are encouraged to "Kill your Automated Negative Thoughts (ANTS)" and get back in the "feel good zone"...  
Crowdsourcing ideas for a Valentine's poem.  So far I have:Roses are RedViolets are BlueIt's Brexit votes for meA microwave meal for you... 
For over two months @ukhomeoffice and @sajidjavid have refused to answer my questions on the status of Zambrano carers. I have written yet again. With less than 50 days to until Brexit Zambrano carers are still left in limbo. They must be given settled status. Pls RT to support.  
Corbyn + Skinner = 83 years in Parliament 0 pieces of legislation.Stella Creasy = 8 Years in Parliament - 2 major pieces of legislation, payday loans and helping women in NI gain abortion rights.Stop worshipping hapless lazy old men who have achieved nothing but Tory Brexit. 
'These things happen'!!The words of Patrick Minford (the ERG economist) on losing the UK car industry after Brexit. Unbelievable.MPs are under a duty to act in the interests of the nation.This is happening by design and against the Code of Conduct 4 MPs#RevokeArticle50 
Quick legal tip: You should not kill and eat puppies, or kittens, irrespective of whether Brexit happens. It’s already generally frowned upon by the courts.  
At Liverpool Hope University. @Femi_Sorry had lunch with students from Liverpool, Stourbridge, Wigan and Northern Ireland. All of them were furious with what Brexit is doing to their country and are desperate to be heard in a People's Vote. #OFOCBattleBus 
'Brexit Party will SWEEP country!' Kate Hoey warns Farage's new party will WIN elections  
Cartoon from 2018...and 2019...and 2017...and 2016...@PrivateEyeNews #brexit  
A no-deal Brexit would jeopardise at least 100,000 jobs in Germany and up to 50,000 in France because of a slump in exports, according to a study  
Spotted @ByDonkeys in the wild! #LedByDonkeys is an excellent reality check on how dramatically all the promises and rhetoric around Brexit have changed in such a short time  
Ignorant, arrogant, grandstanding tosspot utters merde...again.David Davis: Pound plummeting under a no-deal Brexit 'might not be such a bad thing'  
If Tory ministers want to prevent a catastrophic No Deal Brexit, now is the sensible time to resign and vote accordingly, otherwise it will be too late. My column for the @Independent 
So Gavin 'Stupid Boy' Williamson has stuck his head above the parapet to let Chris Grayling off the hook as biggest Tory idiot. Theresa May's very own Private Pike has now declared that Brexit will boost the UK's military standing - after cutting it to the bone already?  
.@BorisJohnson: Let's embrace the Anglosphere - and the Five Eyes intelligence alliance - after Brexit. There's so much potential for a global Britain! Get involved @  
Elite Leavers are presented as self-interested con men. Working-class Leavers are presented as misguided fools. The anti-Brexit narrative has rehabilitated age-old class prejudices, writes Antigonos Sochos. 
Christian Adams on the Tory party and Brexit #TheresaMay #Brexit #Hell #FinalSay #PeoplesVote #PoliticalCartoon #Satire #BrexitShambles #BrexitChaos #BrexitDeal #Brexit  - political cartoon gallery in London  
The ‘backstop’ is not a tool constructed by those who genuinely care about the welfare of our citizens, it is a weapon contrived by nationalists who see Brexit as an opportunity to further their agenda of all-Ireland harmonisation. Let us call it for what it is. #Brexit 
These people are profoundly out of touch and ignorant about the UK electorate's decision to support Brexit. Their emotive outbursts and rhetorical spasms significantly bolster the Leave narrative but they seem not to care.  
Just 4 Tory MPs have signed letter to PM demanding Second Referendum.Anna 'worried about losing my seat' Soubry weirdly isn't one of them.  
Sabine Weyand, EU's deputy chief negotiator, speaking in Berlin earlier: "The chances for a reversal of Brexit are non-existent"  
British PM May to make Brexit statement on Tuesday:  spokesman  
Civil servants won’t be anonymous when required to give evidence to the public inquiry after the collapse of Brexit  
#Labour Brexit spokesperson @mtpennycook says they will back a #PeoplesVote if May doesn’t accept their #brexit demands, but @jeremycorbyn seems to have another agenda.  His leadership strategy seems to be ‘do what I want’ even if it creates enemies within his party membership. 
Norwegian backlash against their own open border arrangement: - Trade Union highlights concern over “social dumping and hiring of foreign labour”- Third most popular party are anti-EEA and want referendum - Plus around 70% against joining EU  
Spotted by @_Jimmy_Anders in Haworth, West Yorkshire.Worth remembering that @michaelgove recently revised his sunny Brexit prediction to: “Winter is coming.” Donkey.  
Exclusive: The British food industry has warned Michael Gove, the Environment Secretary, that it may refuse to co-operate with a swathe of reform proposals until Brexit uncertainty is resolved. Letter has been signed by bodies including the NFU and FDF.  
I’ve been saying for a while now: halting Brexit is still (just) possible, but don’t expect the EU to help, or even to sympathise. From an EU perspective, the goal is the UK’s orderly ejection. We Remainers have to do this alone.  
Remainer "Brexit is killing the automobile industry in the UK"Me "How do you explain declining sales of automobiles in most developed nations if it's caused by Brexit?"Remainer "racist" 
Sky News has seen a letter to Environment Sec Michael Gove from heads of more than 30 trade associations which says Britain's food industry is threatening to suspend co-operation with a series of Government consultations until "catastrophic impact of a no-deal Brexit" is resolved 
can't believe that @Keir_Starmer included a #PeoplesVote in Corbyn's letter to May (which he wrote for him) & then @jeremycorbyn's team took it out again. what is even going on @UKLabour? ignoring party Brexit policy AND the Brexit secretary?? NOT a wise strategy. 
Good.Corbyn knows that 80% of Conservative-held marginals (i.e. seats where Labour is less than 5% behind) voted Leave.If Labour supported a second referendum, we would lose in a landslide.  
Second Referendum ...RIP... 
'Brexit Party will SWEEP country!' Kate Hoey warns Farage's new party will WIN elections  
Here's the stats for 2018 GDP growth. I really wish we hadn't voted for Brexit, we'd be growing like Germany, France and Ita- what?! The UK was the fastest growing of the EU 'big 4' in 2018?! That can't be right... can it?  
ERG & DUP can’t agree with May.May can’t agree with Tory Remainers.Labour Remainers can’t agree with Corbyn.Corbyn can’t agree with May.SNP, Lib Dem, Greens etc. can’t agree with May or Corbyn.But, apparently, a new referendum would be too divisive.   
Today’s poll: Scottish voters were *assured* of EU membership if they rejected independence from the union. Should the people of Scotland have another say, now this has turned out to be untrue? Please vote and RT for a broad opinion. #IndyRef2 #Brexit 
How much more humiliation are second referendum campaigners going to accept from Corbyn and his team before they call it a day. 
Luxembourg PM Xavier Bettel: anyone who says a no-deal Brexit is the fault of the Europeans doesn't know their history. The UK chose Brexit and London (i.e. Westminister) needs to take responsibility. 
BREAKING NEWS!Second Referendum petition smashes through 62,000 signatures!Please help push it higherEvery signature moves it closer to 100KPlease SIGN & RT  #FBPE #PeoplesVote #ABTV #PeoplesVoteNow 
Liam Fox trumpets vague trade deal with Switzerland worth £30bn. Whilst current free trade with the EU he hates is worth £270bn. He has been as successful at striking post #Brexit trade plans as Grayling has been at spotting viable ferry firms. #Peoplesvote 
Remember. 29th March 2019 is the date written in LAW to leave the European Union. Therefore, anyone who is trying to obstruct Brexit is breaking the law and should be prosecuted accordingly! 
Opinion: Europeans must get rid of the failing EU one way or another: The polite Brexit way, or the rowdy yellow-vest way - MarketWatch  
Beeb man known to be strongly anti-Brexit mixes with anti-Brexit counterparts in other countries. Quelle surprise!  
.@BBCNews #BBC1pmNews pushing the corrupt UK police line that "Brexit will hurt UK security".... like all the stabbing, shootings, acid attacks, burglary, mugging, car crime, moped crimes the police can't be arsed to look into right now - NOTHING to do with #Brexit FFS, #BBCNews 
Labour MP @angelasmithmp is handing in a petition with more than 45,000 signatures to Labour Party HQ calling on @jeremycorbyn to back a @peoplesvote_uk. She says MPs shouldn’t be “bribed” with money for their constituencies because Brexit will cost more than the PM can offer.  
.@theresa_may has ruled out @UKLabour’s frictionless/tariff free trade #Brexit proposals which solve the NI border question.Her reason? She claims it would mean the Tory government would be incapable of negotiating trade deals.We already knew that.  
Dominic Grieve MP: "Insisting that all will somehow be well if Brexit goes through now is an abdication of responsibility..." 
Our second edition ⁦@EveningStandard⁩ as Chancellor says weak GDP numbers explained by Brexit uncertainty overshadowing economy  
Italy explores OWN Brexit deal with UK as Italian rebels threaten to DESTABILISE EU | World | News |  
EU not even pretending anymore that they think a second referendum is a goer.  
"This is a LOCAL podcast for LOCAL people…" Soundtrack your lunch hour with Britain's best anti-Brexit podcast. Our special guest this week: the great @Markgatiss. Listen and subscribe via @ApplePodcasts here:  
The political trial of 18 Catalan Politicians & Civic Leaders begins tomorrow  Democracy is being directly threatened with sentences for those holding a referendum on Catalonian Independence up to 25 years. Retweet to put pressure on UK Govt to condemn this action #CatalanTrial 
If you can find any way to come to Parliament #SODEM (even if it’s only for an hour) on Thursday PLEASE COME! We need to make this HUGE!!! Stop the Brexit madness! Don’t let the con artists win! #StopBrexit 
Time for Starmer & other Labour #Remainers to quit the Front Bench..he has the gravitas to lead the Parl revolt vs. Corbyn & #Brexit.ALL versionsRemove Rights w/o Consent & leave us Worse Off.No excuses now.#RevokeA50 #StopBrexit & #Remain in Control 
A mass exodus of criminals what a load of rubbish we should be so lucky. 'Real risk' criminals will escape in No Deal Brexit as cop checks take 66 DAYS , more details :  
Brexit gives us the opportunity to escape the EU's remit and redefine ourselves as a global power.Believe in Britain? Get involved:  
A furious Leave voter hung up on James O'Brien after being called out for saying the controversial no-deal ferry contract 'hasn't fallen apart' just two days after it was scrapped.@mrjamesob | #Brexit 
If you don’t believe people were deeply misled about what Brexit meant, watch this- it’s easy to sneer, but the reality is people were told ‘nothing will change’. Blame the liars who misled them, not those who were defrauded.  
WATCH: Senior Labour figures have said that if cross-party talks fail, Labour will back a People's Vote. Don't let the Government run the clock down on #Brexit. Labour can prevent this by backing a #PeoplesVote. Demand a #PeoplesVote now:  
Shadow #Brexit Secretary Sir Keir Starmer told the Sunday Times: "There needs to be a day when parliament says that's it, enough is enough." 
As we celebrate #WomenInScience watch the #HandsOff campaign video for @eucitizenschamp esp. at 0:17. Those scientists who came here from the EU to undertake groundbreaking research to save lives... they all have to apply if they want to stay. This is the reality of Brexit. 1/  
What a fantastic turnout this weekend in Winchester. Great to see so many people united to end this Brexit mess and fighting for a people's vote with the option to Exit from Brexit >  
Message from TM today is aimed squarely at Brexit MPsDon't vote for her BRINO & it'll be BRINO + customs unionMore & more levels of threat: support or Article 50 extension, support or customs union Whether it's brinkmanship or not - Brexit MPs must never vote for her deal 
Will not listen to @mrjamesob any more. Nothing to do with his political views- more to do with the horrific mental image he provided of Theresa May and Chris Grayling bathing together.   If a nation wasn't traumatised enough by Brexit that pushes us over the edge. 
As Theresa May responds to Jeremy Corbyn's Brexit proposals and Keir Starmer fumes on the sidelines, here's what the current Private Eye has to say about "the greatest single obstacle to attempts to shift Corbyn to a pro-Europe stance".  
Aw, this is absolute bollocks. How many times? We don’t want another fucking independence referendum. Can the subjugated Scottish press please give it a bloody rest?  
Today we've sent a letter to the PM, requesting a meeting to discuss the urgent need to pause and consider this #Brexit deal before we proceed. Signed by @DrPhillipLeeMP @SamGyimah @rosaltmann @GutoAberconwy, Dominic Grieve and David Willetts. Our case: 
The @UKEUchallenge has been granted a hearing in the Court of Appeal. They are applying to overturn a High Court decision which refused permission to judicially review the outcome of the Brexit Referendum and the decision to invoke Article 50. Learn more:  
UK Prime Minister is only an EU regional Leader who has to answer to her masters in Brussels.She's still busy doing just that.Brexit will change all that.The PM will answer to the people of the UK when we get our freedom back on the 29th March. 
Britain was once a global trading power. After Brexit it can be again  ' | via @telegraph 
The SNP want and will vote for a No Deal Brexit, despite telling us all that it will cost 80,000 jobs in Scotland.Independence transcends everything after all.  
“She is making a huge faff” Spectator’s @FraserNelson on the PM and #Brexit“I think Theresa May’s ego is a force here” #politicslive  
It seems the Labour leadership cannot even negotiate the contents of a letter, never mind Brexit....  
Downing Street moving to kill off any suggestion that the PM is warming to Jeremy Corbyn's calls for a permanent customs union after Brexit. Spokesman said: "We're absolutely clear on this - we're not considering Jeremy Corbyn's customs proposals." 
EU Will Demand More Money, Gibraltar Concessions for Brexit Delay, Lawyer Warns  
Labour MP Angela Smith handing in a petition to the party's HQ shortly calling on Jeremy Corbyn to back a second EU referendum.  It's been signed by nearly 50,000 people. 
Workers' Brexit? That begins with stripping workers of their rights to work in 34 other countries. The socialism of idiots.  
In response to misinformation going around about future EU plans, here are some of the favourite #LeaveMyths de-bunked. #Brexit #EU #ExitfromBrexit 
BREXIT LATEST: UK strikes major TRADE DEAL - Swiss agreement protects £32BN relationship | Politics | News |  
Would it be great if 700,000 anti-Brexit folks joined this party and democratically redirected it... 
Brexit could boost UK's military standing, says Defence Secretary 
Do you feel a change of opinion in your area?Renew believes that the interests of the UK, and those of our EU expat family, friends and neighbours are better served by being part of the EU than by leaving it.#RenewUK Brexit position -  
"My duty as an MP is crystal clear in trying to make sure [the people] get both another say on Brexit and that no deal is prevented." Yet he stood on the last Conservative Manifesto which pledged to leave the Customs Union and Single Market; and voted for the EU Withdrawal Bill.  
If the government can cause us to lose faith & confidence in democracy they can & will dispose of it for ever. Never mind about perhaps fighting for brexit - a better deal would be to definitely fight for our democracy which is being lost quicker than our right to speak freely. 
Brits aren't the only people who are sick of Brussels and their pathetic approach to Brexit. Italy is now looking at what they can do with a bilateral deal to keep trade running smoothly, without EU interference! Brussels won't like that... Support:  
The first idiot of idiots; Gavin Williamson Defence Sec has boasted that Brexit could “enhance the UK’s lethality". Yup; I agree...a Tory Brexit would indeed increase UK lethality:- Medication shortages- NHS cuts- Persecuted benefits claimants- Eroded health & safety regs 
Dominic- get up to date! GDP figures for Q4 out today show UK economy has slowed to a crawl. UK appears to be the slowest growing Western economy in 2018 apart from Italy. Business investment has been falling through 2018. #Brexit has reduced economic growth to a snail’s pace! 
How's brexit going? They're at the stage they have to ban eating dogs and cats.  
These countries will be hit the hardest by a hard Brexit: Ireland Slovakia  BelgiumThe Netherlands  
Weyand: cakeism is found on Remain side as well as Leave. The chances for a reversal of Brexit are non-existent. The only option is to enable a structured exit. 
Tony Benn, of all people, said that democracy was people's right to be able to change policy at the ballot box. That is precisely what we have been robbed of. What if the British people now wish to do away with this policy of Brexit? They can't - unless we have a #PeoplesVote. 
James O'Brien has found a Brexit policy that could get through parliament: Germany+.@mrjamesob | #Brexit  
"The opposition have put forward some ideas that are not workable" - International Trade Secretary Liam Fox says Jeremy Corbyn's demand for a customs union with the EU is a "dangerous delusion" #Brexit  
“Keep your elitist cheese photos to yourself” is my new favourite Brexit quote.  
Just when I think the Brexit debate has reached its Peak Absurdity, just when I tell myself “we have hit bottom”, some hellish trapdoor opens up beneath me and down I fall. If @Aiannucci had scripted this ten years ago, he’d have been criticised for stretching reality too far. 
Question: Brexit Reality check. Has your opinion on Brexit changed since December?Please Vote and RETWEET 
#Turkish government: We aren't against the #Kurds, we are against terrorism.Also Turkish government: 1. Against independence referendum in South/Iraqi Kurdistan. 2. Against Syrian Kurds. And now also Turkish government:  
ENOUGH: Majority of Brits think EU has been harsh and will be weaker post-Brexit. The bully boys in Brussels have behaved appallingly!  
Atiku wants to sell NNPC 4 efficiency, you're clapping 4 him with your brown teeth.What happened to Nitel & Ajaokuta he sold B4?US is on the verge of 2nd Govt shut down this year. UK is in confusion over Brexit. The same people want to OVER supervise us.SHIOOOR!!!! 
When the next referendum is called we will see something that didn't exist in the original indy ref. A mass of no voters campaigning with all their energy to make sure this time it's a Yes. I'll be out there every hour of the day and I know plenty who will be too. #Indyref2 
Here’s Dominic Grieve ⁦@EveningStandard⁩ today on how to get out of this dangerous Brexit mess   
'Brexit Party will SWEEP country!' Kate Hoey warns Farage's new party will WIN elections  
Dominic Grieve: As Brexit disaster looms, we must have the courage to retrace our steps:  #PeoplesVote 
We can’t wait for a people’s vote: make the case against Brexit right now | Jonathan Freedland      timely clarion call 
UK signs post-Brexit trade continuity deal with Switzerland 
Michael D Sent To Seduce The Queen In Bid To Avert Brexit  
Detailed explanation of why limited number of permits for UK road haulage in the event of no deal Brexit still matters, despite the EU proposal for unilateral measures on this issue.  
The companies that run the Channel tunnel are suing Britain's government over ferry contracts awarded to handle freight shipments after a no-deal Brexit  
'Let me be clear ; I intend to continue (useless) talks with the EC (ignoring her) and reach out to the opposition( who only want GE) to fulfill the wishes of the British people (well, some of Middle England) expressed in 2016 ( when they hadn't a clue what Brexit meant) 
I expect the dregs of the press to make up stories about Labour but it's disturbing to see how ITV News and Peston are now doing this. As the Tory Brexit shambles gets worse, what else will Peston and ITV do to distract from the Tory mess?  
If Corbyn agrees a #Brexit deal with May, would you vote Labour in the next General Election? 
Is there support for a PV. I don,t hear it where I live. Message is MPs just get on with it. We didn,t ask for a referendum , but having been asked the people said leave. To me that is the end of it. 
‘Given the damage that Farage’s party did to the Tories at elections in the run-up to the referendum, Mr S thinks the Tories and Theresa May have reason to worry if Brexit does get delayed…’  
Let's guess it'll be something like "Blah, Blah, Blah, Unity, Blah Brexit, Blah, Blah", Theresa May will forever be known as the Nothing has changed woman  
German Chancellor Angela Merkel wants Brexit to be as hostile as possible to encourage other member states to stay put. She seems to forget that her economy stands to lose £39bn if we just walk away! We suggest that she softens her tone.  
If true, huge shame the leadership's office is trying to sideline their astute and able shadow Brexit Sec @Keir_Starmer. Millions of young people will never forgive Labour if they're complicit in a Tory Brexit or any Brexit without further ref.  
Living under the EU is Slavery & Subjugation"BREXIT IS FREEDOM" 
Hands up who is surprised by this?Oh just Keir then....There’s a sucker born every minute. Barnum Brexit.  
Time after time, Labour members and supporters demand a #PeoplesVote.Yet time after time, this is thwarted from the top. #Brexit is a disaster - and we are being played for fools.  
The clock is ticking on a No-Deal Brexit . Business are looking to politicians to find out how they are going to compromise and work together to avoid no-deal. @NicoleSykes_ with @BBCMaryam on @BBCNews #BBCBizLive 
I keep asking and still don’t understand why an ILLEGAL referendum isn’t null & void. 
By far the most powerful thing Starmer could do to influence the leadership’s Brexit policy would be to threaten to resign very publicly  
Remoaner MPs looking to extend Art 50 are fools.   If there’s an extension there will have to be European Parliamentary elections & these will return a massive vote in favour of a no deal Brexit party - thus making it even harder for MPs to justify betraying the referendum result  
When Charlatans destroy your currency, what next?David Davis: Pound plummeting under a no-deal Brexit 'might not be such a bad thing'  
The Brexit party will not be of any help to the NHS. The only way democratic option is a #PeopleVote ! 
17.4 m leavers must be so proud: We’ve already spent approx £16 billion on Brexit ...and counting. #BrexitVote 
BREXIT: Corbyn’s team say he FORGOT to threaten a People’s Vote in letter to May  /#EU #Brexit #PeoplesVote 
When will these fame-chasing second division presenters learn that the majority of the British public had largely made up its mind on Brexit long before that bus! Merkel had already sealed the issue for many with her refugee orders from the Berlin bunker.  
Theresa May's spokesman says the prime minister is not committing to holding a meaningful vote before March, meaning the next vote on her Brexit deal may not take place until just a few weeks, or even days, before the UK is due to crash out of the EU. 
Luvvies used the BAFTAs to mock Brexit, like Geldof sticking two fingers up to fishermen. They don't get our push for self determination. I couldn't care less what spoilt, out of touch, vain, shallow, self-deluding and overpaid 'celeb' thinks about my vote. 
This is a joy to watch! "Gilles le Suisse" visits London to find out about #Brexit! He has a chat with some #Gammons, sees a #YellowVest protest, goes campaigning with #EUsupergirl and meets @PimlicoPlumbersBroadcast on @RTBF Belgian TV  
A positive move in our post-Brexit trading relationships as UK & Switzerland sign a trade continuity deal. Switzerland an important partner.  
As expected, the very stupid women @theresa_may has rejected @jeremycorbyn Brexit plain. She would rather see us crash out than take JC advice. She is scared to upset her party or the  DUP. Party before country. What did we do to deserve TM and DUP who live in the dark ages. 
South Korea has joined Japan in saying it won't roll over EU deals to the UK on the same terms because it can extract a better deal for them due to the UK's WEAKENED POSITION. Told you! The world isn't going to give the UK what it wants, it's going to pick the #brexit bones. 
Defence Secretary @GavinWilliamson "Britain has its greatest opportunity in 50 years to redefine our role... It is up to us to seize the opportunities that Brexit brings."  
Lord Hall sent out the instruction that effectively shut down BBC coverage of opposition to #brexit and silenced arguments that challenged the wisdom of proceeding with #brexit.  
Here’s where I think (hope!) we’re headed: We won’t leave the EU on March 29th..@Theresa_May will resign out of humiliation..@CONservatives will get a ‘Hard-Brexit’ leader.We’ll have a General Election. A50 extended. .@UKLabour form the Gvnt.We get a ‘soft Brexit’! 
This is James O'Brien's epic monologue on how media balance caused the "liars" and "dopes" to lead us to Brexit.@mrjamesob | #Brexit 
Group of Conservative MPs who support a second referendum - Right to Vote - have today written to Theresa May requesting an urgent meetingFull letter here: 
Counting the cost of Brexit: The Resolution Foundation has found that families have already lost £1,500 a year since the vote to leave, and we haven't even left the EU yet. We need a People's Vote.  
I haven’t met a single person ‘around the world’ who admires the Brexit vote. I doubt if Johnson has. The general tenor of what people around the world ask is ‘why has the UK decided to become so insular when it had so much influence?’  
EU SHOCK: Rebels Italy in threat to DESTROY Brussels unity with plan for OWN Brexit talks  
'Not sure sorry is enough': Baroness Warsi says Brexit vote was held to keep Tory party together -  
Why is Keir Starmer so upset that we're not having a rerun of the referendum? He couldn't have been clearer in ruling it out back in 2016.  
Yes please do sign up to Nigel's Brexit Party. It takes about 30 seconds to register as a potential candidate - which is why I have done it 15 times.  
With a heavy heart I have sent the first email laying the ground for moving manufacturing out of the UK because of Brexit and the tariff and certification problems it will cause. Real businesses. Real employment. Real taxes. Lost. 
Do you recognise the UK? An #ERG government run by self-seeking, hedge-funders making money out of #Brexit already… Propped up by a £1bn bribe to the #DUP while our country’s #NHS suffers… Democracy? #NotInMyName #Remain 
Why should artists be for Brexit?Here are our answers to some frequently asked questions.AFB's website is a nonpartisan, volunteer run, independent platform that allows arts workers to help support the Brexit process by having their voices heard on it 
Brexit whack-a-mole episode #476  
"The government insists it will continue to champion LGBT+ rights after [Brexit] ... the truth is the EU Charter of Fundamental Rights is the only treaty that expressly protects against discrimination on basis of sexual orientation." @thatginamiller 
Europe will blackmail Britain to hand over more money and give up Gibraltar if we try to delay Brexit, experts warn 
God, the Brexit reporting today is so confused it’s like reading a soup made in the back of a bin lorry.That’s what happens when you report everything as true all at once.Bravo everyone. 
Imagine the one thing you're most worried about on Brexit being that workers might still end up having their rights protected.  
Yet another Monday has rolled around with no more progress made on Brexit... want to change this?Join us in Parliament on the 27th to tell your MP why they should stand up for your future. Sign up here -  
.@CarolineLucas – Brexit being used as platform by radical right  
Definitely don't want to panic anyone, but as no deal Brexit looms, they're actually going to make it illegal to eat dogs and cats  
EU SHOCK: Rebels Italy in threat to DESTROY Brussels unity with plan for OWN Brexit talks  
of Corbyn and his aides is “seeing a Tory Brexit through so they can wash their hands of it”.   
reaction has not been one of unbridled joy. And even erstwhile Corbyn loyalists are becoming grumpy at what they see as his refusal to follow the revealed will of Labour members and supporters that their should be a referendum. One said: “the only interest”... 
I am told @Keir_Starmer is not the happiest member of the frontbench.  According to multiple sources, he had agreed that the final part of Corbyn’s letter to May would say “if you do not accept this [Brexit offer] there will be a People’s Vote”. One source... 
Brexit perceptions, charted:Businesses - aaagghh!!Households - wot's Brexit again?  
May and the Tories have spent nine years imposing austerity and shackling trade unions. A politically bankrupt PM's Brexit bribes are worthless  
Brexit could boost UK's military standing, says defence secretary  I know his nickname is Private Pike, but this is a new low 
A thread on the ineptitude of David Davis..."It is vital to set out how we leave", said the man-without-a-plan, in advance of the Brexit referendum...  
I’m registered.If Brexit doesn’t happen or respected how it should be , the @Conservatives membership card is getting cut up. 
NEARLY!Three yrs to come up with the worst BREXIT deal ever!Nearly three yrs ridiculing CORBYN! Who has the sense to sit around the table with experts!To get a deal the UK and the EU would agree on!Yet they say CORBYN is unelectable!REALLY! Who would you want in charge of BREXIT! 
Today Switzerland and the UK signed a trade agreement to continue their post-Brexit trade relations. Switzerland is the UK’s fifth largest export partner outside of the EU (after the US, China, Hong Kong and UAE). 
Ambrose Evans-Pritchard: Italy explores its own bilateral Brexit deal with the UK as its economic crisis nears danger level  
It's been a promise from day one: NO customs union. Customs union means NO Brexit - please sign up below: 
The Withdrawal Agreement is the result of 18 months of intense negotiations between the EU and #UK. It is a compromise that aims to ensure an orderly #Brexit. What is in it?   
David Davis: Pound plummeting under a no-deal Brexit 'might not be such a bad thing'  
Household incomes have taken a £1,500 hammering since the Brexit referendum.Resolution Foundation study reveals UK has experienced the sharpest slowdown in income growth of any comparable economy. 
Britain will see a recession in the next year, says Professor @MazzucatoM of University College London  
But we didn’t know what we were voting for... That special place in hell. #brexit  
Breaking news; May & Corbyn agree special #Brexit deal for Scotland.  Lol joke, only N.I. & Gibraltar get special treatment and Scotland can just shut up and do what we're told.#DissolveTheUnion  
The registered office for Nigel Farage's new political party, The Brexit Party, is a bed and breakfast in Norwich. Seriously.  
Could Brexit at least be a good opportunity to add on a debate about freedom of movement for people who cut their nails on public transport? 
Does anyone know of a decent tool that allows you to easily explore ALL someone else's historical tweets in chronological order, for a specific time period (eg 3 months around the 2016 referendum)? 
Brexit is taking its toll on UK economic growth. Among major western economies, only Italy grew more slowly than UK in 2018.  
EU SHOCK: Rebels Italy in threat to DESTROY Brussels unity with plan for OWN Brexit talks  
Gavin Williamson's stirring conclusion? "“Brexit has brought us to a great moment when we must enhance our lethality, and increase our mass.”okay.... 
52% voted to leave. Can you think of any other referendum in the world where the losing sides wishes are more important than the winning side? I'll wait. x 
Apparently there are only 17.4 million people in Britain. #Brexit 
Natalism is back back back. Gonna be interesting* to see what form it takes in post-Brexit Britain, when we've "taken back control" of immigration & don't have enough people to keep the economy ticking over. (* Terrifying)  
What is Brexit?It means leave means leave.That MEANS OUT of,Customs UnionSingle MarketCommon MarketCustoms alignmentNorway agreementParallel alignmentTM'S BackstopECJ jurisdictionCommon fisheries & farming policyFree movementEU laws & rulesEU armyAgree? 
‘A far cry from the recession that the Treasury, Bank of England and IMF were all predicting before the referendum….. If steady growth in the UK is all Brexit’s fault, what’s the EU’s excuse?’ 
The original version of Jeremy Corbyn's Brexit letter to Theresa May, authored by Keir Starmer, contained a reference to a possible referendum. However, this was removed by Corbyn's office before being sent, reports @Peston.  
Staying in a Customs Union would prevent a successful Brexit because the cost of access to the UK market would be set by unaccountable people in Belgium. 
.@iamjohnoliver nails it about Brexit - that's why a #PeoplesVote is the only way forward. Write to your MP now:  
Many remainers recognising overturning vote now lost cause turning attention to getting worst Brexit deal. Damaging high alignment, customs union Brexit just because to them represents some sort of "victory"They're so angry they're prepared to self-inflict wounds on our country 
.@Nigel_Farage wants an extension to #Article50 so he can campaign with his poxy #Brexit party in the #EUelections because without the EU he has no reason to existA man whose soul purpose in life is to destroy #specialplaceinhell How about #EUsupergirl starts a Europe Party? 
Appalling new monthly figures for the economy in December from @ONS: every single sector contracted. Growing Brexit stagnation as everyone sits on their money for what next... piles yet more pressure on No10 to get a deal.  
To-do list: Morning: write about the effects of radiation on humans.Afternoon: write about a totalitarian conspiracy & destruction of a family.Evening: illustrate a demon disemboweling somebody.Late evening: read Brexit/Trump tweets.Night: lie awake staring at the ceiling. 
Join the 35,000 patriotic Brits who have already registered support at  - we must make sure the Tories know there will be serious consequences to kicking the Brexit can down the road. 17.4m Brexiteers will NOT be ignored! 
The UK is preparing to sign trade deals with the United Arab Emirates and a number of members of the Gulf Cooperation Council (which includes Saudi Arabia, Kuwait and Bahrain) the UAE’s economy minister Sultan bin Saeed al-Mansouri has said.#Brexit #Globalbritain #WTOBrexit 
Post-Brexit Britain, the United Celtic Nations. #Brexit #Ireland #Scotland #Wales #Cornwall #IsleOfMan #Brittany 
Forget the noise. @theresa_may and @jeremycorbyn are strikingly closely aligned in their respective visions of a tolerable Brexit. But that does not mean they can deliver a deal  
#Brexit not going too well? UK becoming a laughing stock around the world?Let's bloviate about "hard power" and make threatening gestures towards China - that'll show'em! Trump will love it too!Gavin Williamson is a dangerous idiot. 
UK business investment has now fallen for a full year. If you need concrete proof of the damaging impact of Brexit uncertainty, this is it  
U.K. economy dragging Scotland down. U.K. growth slumps to 0.2 growth. Lowest since 2012. Tory economic mismanagement and Brexit shambles is costing us dear. #toryfail 
The Prime Minister could resolve all this in a single statement that ruled out a no deal.  The fact that she won’t makes her personally responsible for every bit of the damage  ; A third of Irish businesses cancel or postpone investments over Brexit  
The "common ground" between May and Corbyn is they both wish to ensure that any "Brexit" is rendered useless. The treachery is in full view. Quislings like Rory Stewart make me feel ill. 
"Throughout 2019, European officials will be deciding how to divvy up Horizon funding over the next nine years. With Brexit distracting us, and no-deal looming, the UK’s chance of a positive result slips further and further away." 
"For the first time in almost half a century, Britain can once again be the master of its own trading destiny." Read High Commissioner George Brandis' #Brexit op-ed for today's @Telegraph  
Apart from the hard-core Trumpists I know, I can honestly say I have never met anyone anywhere in all my travels who thinks brexit is anything other than a dangerous embarrassment for the UK. Along with all the other problems of brexit, it is ruining Britain’s brand globally 
Whatever your views on Brexit the fact is that UK economy still grew faster in second half of 2018, than Germany, France and Italy, but hey Brexit uncertainty blah.... 
FARAGE: 35,000 registrations for Brexit Party in 48 hours. Theresa May better stick to her promise of an EU exit on 29th March... 
Our latest #Brexit report found: Britain is now more divided as a result of the referendum 59% said they had very little or little confidence that May would secure a good deal. 39% of people are now in favour of Citizens' Assemblies 
Cambridge Economist Protests Brexit By Allowing Students To Sign Her Naked Body During Lecture  
Liz Truss hinted at resignation if May backs a Labour-style Brexit deal 
 BREAKING: @IanBlackfordMP wrote to every @scottishlabour MP, urging them to firmly reject Theresa May's Brexit deal, call for an extension of Article 50, and get behind @peoplesvote_uk. 
“if Corbyn enables Brexit”..@bbclaurak, @UKLabour ran on a manifesto pledge respecting the ref. result: to leave.JC would be enabling democracy BUT he’s made it very clear on what grounds.He was elected a 2nd time- overwhelmingly- & we got 40% at the GE. Both AFTER the ref. 
Yup. People rally to a standard, not a void. Meticulous indy preparation/research and solid encouragement from the top are not mutually exclusive strategies. Even amidst the terminal chaos of Brexit. Perhaps even more because of it.  
"Project Fear" - the response of senior unionists to the changing constitutional environment. Indicative of how they have ignored the growing discontentment since Brexit and the collapse of the institutions. Invoking English Brexiteer language wont make this go away lads 
This useful slideshow explains the Withdrawl Agreement in simpler terms. It includes a timeline of key events and how it was concluded and agreed by both EU & UK. #Brexit  
There really is nothing positive in this set of national accounts - as Brexit now clearly taking its toll on the economy and business spending  via @financialtimes 
Majority of Brits think EU has acted harshly during negotiations and that Brussels will be weaker post-Brexit.  
Brexit uncertainty cl;early hitting UK GDP and investment. GDP growth in 2018 1.4pc, weakest since the financial crisis. Business investment has contracted in past 4 quarters and now nearly 4pc down on a year ago. UK already counting the cost and we have not left the EU yet! 
An astonishing 35,000 people have registered as supporters of The Brexit Party in the first 48 hours, our politicians had better listen. Visit  to sign up. 
Good luck selling Corbyns Brexit policy on the doors lads  
Struck by a worrying eg of our short term preoccupations this morning: the ‘all insects wiped out within a century, causing catastrophic consequences for the survival of mankind’ story barely scraped the headlines, then bumped entirely because Boris said something about Brexit. 
Carolyn loves care work because "you get so attached". She's originally from Poland.  Thank you care workers everywhere  #brexit #MondayMotivation 
How can this be Brexit?5] The UK will still be bound by any future changes to EU law in which it will have no say, not to mention having to comply with current law. (Article 6(2)) 
The lunatic Anna Soubry says a referendum should be held with the choices being May's deal or remain. Firstly, both of those have already been rejected. Secondly, if we voted for May's deal, how can parliament implement a plan it rejected by the biggest margin in history? 
"The pound will go where it will." Ex-Foreign Sec @BorisJohnson downplays the possibility of the pound's value falling and prices increasing in the event of a no deal Brexit #r4today  
German media now reporting on job losses in their country if Angela Merkel oversees a No Deal Brexit. Domestic pressure across Europe is increasing.  
The 'Brexit dividend' is really a Brexit deficit - the vote to leave the EU has already hit household incomes by £1,500, and that's before we've even left.  
End of an epic thread on the pointless own goal that is Brexit.  
This is also my experience. India in particular was an eye-opener in the way in which Brexit was connected to ideas of Empire. When I mentioned in a speech that the Commonwealth has been mooted by some Brexiters as a vehicle for 'Global Britain', there was laughter.  
Helpful information slideshow for anyone with an interest in #Brexit and what has been agreed between U.K. and EU -  
Anyone listening to Catherine Blaiklock the leader of the newly formed British Pro Brexit Party on @BBCNolan?She said she had never read the Good Friday Agreement but has listened to the “author” David Trimble!“There is no border, no problem, no issue” Sweet Light of..... 
This Thursday, already known as the Valentine's Day Massacre, might not be the last chance MPs have to take back control of Brexit, with No 10 suggesting that can wait until February 27, which will inevitably become known as Peter Andre's Birthday Massacre. 
Nicola Sturgeon has reaffirmed her intention to call another referendum on Scottish independence once the final details of Brexit have been worked out.  
I’m back after a 7 day Twitter ban. Sinister forces at work. 1. For tweeting opposition to Verhofstadt’s anti Brexit pro EU views 2. For tweeting truth about migrants via my book, The Migrant Crime Wave, all EU facts  
Boris Johnson on #r4today says others are looking at Britain and saying "wow, they have made this incredible decision to go global."Hard to be more wrong. Support for the EU across Europe is at its highest in 35 years. The only leaders who like Brexit are Putin and Trump. 
Remember that the real Brexit heartland is the Tory heartland, the affluent home counties and English shires. There, xenophobia isn't misdirected economic concerns. It's the flipside of a nationalist-chauvinist backlash. "Make Britain Great [white] Again".  
Before the referendum, WTO Director-General Roberto Azevedo warned – “renegotiating Britain’s relationship with the rest of the WTO could take years or even decades” – and let’s be fair, he should know. 
Liam Fox came right out and said it himself – the entire language of Brexit was about lies, disinformation and propaganda. BUT LIED IN 2016  
Shetland starts tomorrow night at 9pm on BBC1.  Tune in. It’s the last good thing that’s going to happen to you before Brexit. #Shetland 
I’d introduce jail sentences for MPs who do the bidding of Brussels. Or anyone who colludes with a foreign-based bureaucracy to undermine the result of the referendum. That includes your brother. Did you read the manifesto you were elected on?  
The real #brexit challenge is getting our politicians to acknowledge that leaving the EU will inflict so much damage on the country that it justifies holding another referendum despite the damage this could inflict on our sense of democracy. 
Private Pike is deluded on a 'Trumponion' level.It's time his mum called him in for his tea and told him to stop playing his imaginary games with his imaginary mates!#ToryCutsKillBrexit could boost UK's military standing, says defence secretary  
Future improvements in EU workers' rights to be adopted by the UK...... IF parliament (a post-Brexit Tory/ERG parliament) approves them.What could go wrong? 
Many times I have spoken on privilege and Brexit and how the two are intractably linked. Here is another shinning example. Regarding a potential crash of the pound after Brexit, Boris Johnson said:“the pound will go where it will”. Who else can afford to even think like that? 
Cabinet meeting at No10May - I'm out of ideas on Brexit, any suggestions?Gav Williamson - Let's do a war. People like wars.May - Good distraction and if we lose, we'll at least I tried to Brexit 
Brexit: Dreamed-up by UKIP Adopted by the Tories Assisted by Labour Opposed by the @LibDems with a call for a #PeoplesVote on the deal. 
That is fair enough.  Scotland is a country in her own right, in a union with other countries.  We should not have to ask or beg for a referendum on Scotland leaving the union. We should just inform the rUK when we are having one, not ask for permission from another country!  
Boris Johnson on #r4today: “people around world are going wow - they have made this incredible decision to go global”.Delusional nonsense: Global trade deals that the UK currently gets access to via the EU = 760.Global trade deals the UK gets access to after Brexit = 0 
Brexit is a chance to boost Britain's military 'lethality' @GavinWilliamson - how dare you. We're swapping the peace of Europe through membership of the EU for global death & war and you're fucking bragging about it. #NotInMyName #StopBrexit 
While the political debate about Brexit goes in circles, families have already seen their incomes hit by £1,500 vs expectations since the 2016 referendum. New report: Counting the Cost from @JamesSmithRF is out today 
If you voted for Brexit, you can say this is about more than income and that you had nothing to lose.But if you’re a @UKLabour MP your duty is to recognise that your poorest constituents have already lost much and have much more to lose. Your job is to protect most vulnerable. 
My tweet was about health Dominic, but are you sure you want to brag about economics? Q4 2018 growth is estimated to have halved to 0.3%. In 2 years, investment in the car industry has also halved. Thousands of jobs have been lost. Brexit is a disaster & we haven't even left yet.  
So every family is, on average, £1,500 worse off ALREADY because of Brexit... Does this apply to the Rees Moggs, Johnsons, and Farages? Or just the rest of Britain..  
Kate Hoey MP: “A Brexit Party would sweep the country. People will be so angry if they’re sold down the river by the other parties.” If you could think of one reason to vote for Nigel Farage’s new Brexit Party, what would it be? @JuliaHB1 | @KateHoeyMP | @Nigel_Farage 
This is  from @EU_Commission. Politicians who talk through their hats on #Brexit should read it. What the backstop is (a safety net) and what it is not (a constitutional threat).    
With rumours that the BBC News At Ten could be cut by ten minutes will they drop the “Good Evening!”, the ‘Weather’ and the ‘Sport’ and steam straight in to to the ‘Anti Brexit Tosh!’Us ‘’Brexiteers” can’t get enough you know! 
Why hasn’t Theresa May leveraged our position being in control of our end of the Channel Tunnel for Brexit negotiations? Weak and chaotic - no wonder Brussels is walking all over us! 
39. And that, ladies and gentleman, is the trade benefit of Brexit. A meaningless slogan based on a misunderstood prediction which disguises the fact that we’re going to seriously weaken our businesses and that our future trade deals are just a damage limitation exercise./End 
650 MPs: "We don't have enough time left to pass all the legislation we need for #Brexit".17.4M UK Voters: "Tough, you spent 2½years bitching about it, instead of getting something done. Enjoy your late nights."Job done. Next... 
.@UKEUchallenge seeks to restore the democratic balance and undo the outcomes of the Leave campaign's illegal behaviour. In order to do so, they need your help.This may be our last chance to take direct action and prevent an undemocratic Brexit. Please contribute if you can  
Theresa May keen to meet Jeremy Corbyn again for further talks on forming an anti-Brexit political party called "The Establishment" I see. 
Very excited that we’re going to spice up Brexit by going to war with China...  
The 2016 referendum is riddled with corruptionMay knows this. Calls it “blemish” She refuses to look at thisShe refuses to investigateBut she knowsAnd she alone decide to do brexitAnd all she has is the tainted vote to justify her decision@fairvoteuk @UKEUchallenge 
Korea joins Japan in saying they won’t rollover EU trade agreements to UK post-Brexit as they believe better terms available from UK given its weak negotiating position.@DavidDavisMP answer: 20% in sterling. @BorisJohnson answer: ignore the facts.#BBCR4today 
Dear #r4today, instead of giving Boris Johnson airtime to discuss Brexit, may I suggest a 3-minute slot of Pingu's greatest hits? Makes as much sense and would be considerably more entertaining. 
Worst foreign secretary in living memory interviewed as though an expert on foreign policy. Biggest Brexit liar allowed to trot out latest litany about no deal with no challenge over the many told before. Banter on Tusk and Rees-Mogg. Dreadful @BBCr4today 
"Brexit worries? Come to Germany" a German hospital trust advertises in two Polish language newspaper in the UK.The continued uncertainty over #citizensrights damages the NHS. 
.@Theresa_May's #Brexit letter to Corbyn woos Labour MPs with Workers' Rights. Coalition worked hard to create a dynamic UK jobs market & we enjoy half the unemployment rate of France by being a more attractive place to hire people. No point winning Labour MPs, by losing Tories! 
Watching that clip on Chanel 4 of all the expats in Spain saying they wish that they could vote again on Brexit now that they realise it affects them! Wow! Selfish clowns should have researched the consequences of their vote. Deserve everything that’s coming their way. 
Boris Johnson on potential crash in the pound after Brexit: “the pound will go where it will”. Oh, c’est la vie. 
Share this widely and support @UKEUchallenge as much as you possibly can. Brexit is unconstitutional chicanery and it is founded in corruption.  
Back Britain not BrusselsTime to bring these negotiations to an end, start engaging with our commonwealth family and rejoin the world again. #GoWTO#Brexit  
This in the news we referred to yesterday. Fantastic stuff from our friends @UKEUchallenge !!Now the court of appeal will hear:1) that the PM made the decision alone (per us) 2) that the only basis for her doing so was a “blemished” aka alarmingly corrupt 2016 referendum  
Why on Earth is @BBCr4today interviewing backbencher Boris Johnson on Brexit anyway?I’m tired of the bullshitty fraudulent infotainment from this man. 
.@DavidDavisMP writes,“This is the pro-business, pro-trade, pro-environment Brexit we should be aiming to deliver. Government and business leaders need to focus on the possibilities Brexit presents rather than turning doom-laden talk into a fait accompli.”  
SNP has not deviated an inch since June16 ‘as soon as we know the terms of the Brexit we will make a statement on the constitutional question’That position still stands it is not SNP delaying matters it is the bungling British fuds that are the hold up. 
Boris Johnson is right to say on #r4today that people around the world looking at Britain’s Brexit decision ‘to go global’ and wondering what’s happening. He forgot to say they are shaking their heads with bafflement at our self-defeating foolishness and duplicity of Brexiteers 
Police Chief; No-deal Brexit would make Britain less safe, loss of EU database, Arrest Warrant, Europol will “impact on frontline,” criminals will exploit gaps. Damning evidence from police in charge of No Deal prep. Appalling that PM is still risking this  
MUST-READ - respected thinktank @resfoundation reveals that families already have £1,500 LESS to spend since 2016 referendum. This is why we need a #PeoplesVote: 
No-deal Brexit would make Britain less safe 
Remarkably, Roger Stone once insisted to me that it hadn’t rained at Trump’s inauguration. The whole Trump/Brexit axis hinges on the fact that most media isn’t equipped to process such utterly bare-faced liars.  
As expected @theresa_may has rejected @jeremycorbyn’s Brexit plan, already approved by the EU.Seems like we’re headed off a cliff edge and going to be left on this small island with the Tories in charge and no human rights act to protect us.That’s why we need a #GENow  
2. OK so in terms of trade, Brexit gives the UK the ability to do its own trade deals with the countries “where 90% of the growth will come from”. The 90% figure comes from the EU’s official statistics for the next 10-20 years.  
No-deal Brexit would make Britain less safe, says police chief  
1. Some people in the US have said they don’t understand the trade benefit of Brexit, so I thought I’d explain it. (Thread) 
#Brexit is 7 weeks away.Why haven't the Government informed us what tariffs will be placed on imported good after 29/3?#NoDeal is the default and most likely option. 
Call a second referendum what it really is... #PeoplesJoke  
Britain and Switzerland reach a Brexit trade deal  
Environmental protection will be weaker if Brexit happens. Draft Environment Act shows:- Full regulatory alignment only until exit day- then worseNo ability to fine govt for breachesWatchdog appointed by government ministers, not parliament  
This is truly bizarre. Brexit, apparently, allows us to do a load of stuff we could have done anyway, though quite possibly with slightly less money to do it with. I can’t see anything here that will be easier because of Brexit.   
100,000 German jobs at risk from no-deal Brexit. This is not UK’s Fault, but Inflexible Bullies Tusk, Barnier & the Drunk! 
Your leader has done everything possible to shut out everyone else from the brexit process, so how can any fault be placed with the Opposition? 
UK to sign Swiss trade deal which will guarantee future trading terms between the two countries after #Brexit  
Italy explores its own bilateral Brexit deal with Britain as its economic crisis nears danger level - The Telegraph  
The EU #Brexit negotiators have published the MOTHER OF ALL SLIDESHOWS explaining the Withdrawal Agreement.  
“Government and business leaders need to focus on the possibilities Brexit presents rather than turning doom-laden talk into a fait accompli. Let’s hold our heads high and deliver the Brexit record numbers of our fellow citizens voted for”#StandUp4Brexit 
The country I walked through deserves better than Brexit | Mike Carter  
The 2019 election isn’t a close race. It’s a referendum on Poverty vs Prosperity, Competence Vs Incompetence, Freedom vs Dictatorship, Light Vs Darkness. As such, it’s a landslide to one end. Welcome @Atiku! 
Households £1,500 worse off since Brexit vote  
Rory Stewart, asked if he'd resign over no-deal Brexit: "I'm currently focused on trying to resign over prisons" 
Labour MPs swallowing May's promises are gullible when even a Brexit Minister admits her pledges can be broken  
"He sees Brexit as the result of delusions about Britain’s global heft, and decades of using the EU as a scapegoat. The same mistakes, he warns, would be even more expensive for Poland..." 
There is absolutely nothing in this over excited little boy’s wet dream of a plan that UK could not already do as a member of the EU.In fact, Brexit would make it harder to increase spending on this or anything else as it reduces Govt revenue.  
Some thoughts on last night's #BAFTA film awards, where presenters called Brexit a historical error of judgement in between giving awards to Bohemian Rhapsody over A Star is Born and First Man:  
MPs are drawing  comparisons between Brexit & the French Revolution. Roles have been assigned: Gove as Brissot; Boris as Danton; Rees-Mogg as Robespierre, the arch radical pursuing a “Republic of Virtue.” Lurking off stage, unknown & unassigned: Napoleon  
Still, not as many as the 17.4m people that voted to leave the EU.The only people who want a second referendum are the ones that lost the first referendum.  
#Brexit Can we have a day without the  REMOANER  BORES talking bollocks trying to derail Brexit. Chuka Umunna , Anna Soubry, David Lammy, Dominic Grieve, Tony Blair, John Major, Sarah Wollaston, Femi Oluwole and his stupid T Shirt. DOOFUS Steve Bray outside Parliament.  
Every morning we wake up to the relentless scare care campaignToday, 'police won't be able to arrest criminals post brexit'.This is the biggest MSM campaign in the nation's history.The establishment v the people.I wonder which will triumph? 
Britain has reached an agreement to continue trade with Switzerland at no additional tariffs after it leaves the EU 
May claims Brexit will make the UK a better place to do business, but new numbers from the Centre for Economic Performance show that the opposite is happening. UK firms are voting with their money and offshoring new investments to the rest of the EU.  
Labour must stop the Tory Brexit dream>For the left its a simple question: What’s worse? A destructive, deregulating Tory Brexit or the EU, worts n’ all? With May’s rejection of ⁦⁦@jeremycorbyn⁩ ‘five demands’, the choices before us are now stark 
#EU talks with the UK about managed #nodeal #BREXITSECRET talks have begun between the UK and EU to prepare the way for a managed no-deal Brexit, sources in Brussels have claimed.  
Let’s play Spot the Difference!Privacy Notice of Farage’s Brexit Party This kids’ soft play in Catherine Blaiklock’s local areaNow see the ICO register. Have they paid fees to hold data?#BrexitChaos #MondayMotivation 
The Malthouse Compromise delivers for both the U.K. and the EU, and creates the conditions for an excellent free trade agreement after #Brexit.  
It's now clear that May & her Kamikazi Brexit plans are based on what's best for the Tories not ordinary people's jobs & living standards  
Rather startling new finding from ⁦@UKandEU⁩ and ⁦@CEP_LSE⁩ ‘Brexit vote has led to a 12% increase in new foreign direct investment (FDI) projects by UK firms in EU countries’   
Our new report – Counting the cost – finds that UK households have taken a £1,500 income hit vs expectations since the EU referendum  
It is not credible to say to Leave MPs Brexit will be cancelled if the Withdrawal Agreement is rejected again. The Govt wld have to propose rescinding the Article 50 letter & embark on the repeal of the EU Withdrawal Act. Many MPs realise this would destroy the trust of electors. 
The Sun reaching new levels of desperation: "Back Brexit or this adorable puppy gets eaten by migrants."  
I’m a petty bitch but it’s hard to pick my favourite bit of this:A) not realizing Brexit would end their freedom to live in SpainB) their confidence the Spanish people would realise the benefits to their economy of letting them stay, orC) the reference to “real Europeans”  
1,104 hours until Brexit 43 years of deeply irresponsible Europhile politicians delegating the responsibility of running our proud Island nation to unelected undemocratic EU megalomaniacs.         29th March 2019     Independence Day  
The harder Brexit comes, the harder Britain falls.  
Out yesterday in #Addiscombe leafleting the area and @LabourSJ to make sure she votes for us to Leave. Honouring her manifesto commitments, her leave voting constituents, and 17.4 million Brits. @LeaveMnsLeave @Leavers_Britain @JohnBroadfoot @VoteLeaveCroy #Croydon #Brexit  
And discussing May’s worthless Brexit promises to Labour MPs on @GMB in a mo. Even @toryboypierce knows she wouldn’t keep them 
Brilliant! We need MPs like you who respect the referendum and democracy. Thank you! Too many MPs are going against their manifesto pledge to honour democracy and the referendum.  
Brexit and EU sanctions threaten to push Cambodia into economic crisis 
This headline is wrong, Tom Watson is right.May has rejected Corbyn's proposal, the choice for Labour now is:1. Support May’s Brexit2. Ratify vs Remain referendum3. Revoke Art50#PeoplesVote#FinalSayForAll 
Tory Brexit Minister privately admits why May’s bribes to Labour MPs are worthless  
Post-Brexit UK should be ready to use 'hard power' - defence minister  
A defence alliance between #Canada, #Australia, #NewZealand & the #UK would create a military stronghold that only the #USA could rival.#Brexit would be the beginning of this alliance.#CANZUK #cdnpoli #auspol #nzpol #ukpolitics 
“Even the Brexit jokes are falling flat. Shall we just call it a night? #BAFTAs2019 #Bafta”  #BBCBias 
UK–ITALY TRADE: Italy explores its own bilateral Brexit deal with Britain.  
"Less safe"? You mean we could get stabbed, shot, acid thrown at us, robbed, mugged, beaten up, our daughters groomed our houses/cars broken into... plus some other new stuff?No-deal Brexit would make Britain less safe, says police chief  
International Trade Secretary Liam Fox put pen to paper on the deal in the Swiss capital Bern yesterday, saying the agreement provides a “solid foundation” for a post-Brexit trading relationship.  #Croydon #Brexit 
NeonNazis: We approve of BrexitDaesh: We approve of Brexit.NeonNazis: Voting is not allowed.Daesh: Voting is not allowed.NeonNazis: Violence is the answer.Daesh: Violence is the answer.NeonNazis: Do as we say or else.Daesh: Do as we say or else. 
UK and Switzerland to sign post-Brexit trade agreement  
Brexit referendum spurs British companies into investing in EU: research  
Maybe after you've cancelled Brexit in the name of democracy you can just rename the country Jo Coxland and be done with it.  
Important article. Long overdue to do the same in England. This is the big political reform needed to make people’s lives better - not Brexit, which will make them worse. Will Hutton & I set out a plan for radical change in England’s governance in our book ‘Saving Britain’  
Can anyone point me to the tweets where Juncker, Tusk & Verhofstadt condemn the state sponsored brutality against the Gilets Jaunes?Or the one from Macron saying he will allow a Frexit Referendum after all? I don't seem to be able to find them. 
The UK has signed an agreement with Switzerland ensuring the trading relationship between the two nations will continue after Brexit  
2/12: $AMD inv conf, $TWLO $QLYS $AKAM2/13: $VIX exp, $CSCO2/14: Brexit vote, US/China trade mtg, $NVDA $AMAT $CGC $CYBR $ANET2/15: Mo Opex, US/China trade mtg, US govt shutdown extension ends 
Smart described the situation at his old research facility as "chaotic," as other researchers have left for Norway, Germany and other greener pastures-British cryptologist @SmartCryptology explains brain drain resulting from Brexit - The Mainichi  
I've also saved a copy.Looks like there needs to be an independent inquiry into the dodgy dealings of the @ElectoralCommUK! 
Also you have to love that @SophyRidgeSky picked literally the least trusted voice on #Brexit to fawn over. Also proves just how well connected she is with the British public. We see you, Soph. 
2019 Baftas: Joanna's jokes, Brexit jibes and the best speeches - video highlights  
UK's May rejects pivot towards #Brexit customs union compromise  
I wasn’t aware that anyone ate dogs in the UK, or cats for that matter. It sounds like another disgusting habit that’s migrated here from the EU, which needs to be made illegal as we Brexit..  
We're no longer capable of acting in the national interest because our elites have forgotten who they serve. #Brexit 
Brexit could boost UK's military standing, says defence secretary. Brexit represents an opportunity for Britain to boost its global military standing in response to the threats posed by Russia and China..  
The many British people living in Spain who voted "leave" in the Brexit referendum because they didn't want any more immigrants from elsewhere in Europe are slowly beginning to realize that they are, in fact, immigrants from elsewhere in Europe  
Brexit referendum spurs British companies into investing in EU: research  
Remember? Perhaps the worst part of Brexit is his choosing to resign before he got to do this tweet. 
Brexit BOMBSHELL: EU exit delay could see UK lose BILLIONS and hand Gibraltar to Spain  
To be fair it is not easy to tell parody from reality... I mean there's a woman getting her tits and fanny out to protest Brexit and she's dead serious about it, so truth is definitely stranger than fiction on Twitter. 
I think we should put forward an amendment to negotiate a customs union as a next step, rather than call for a potentiallly toxic 2nd referendum. May's turned down a CU, but her MPs haven't and it might reveal Tory splits & isolate May & the ERG to boot.Pls RT if you agree 
UK and Switzerland to sign post-Brexit trade agreement  
Climate change bigger than Brexit, says Green PartyClimate change is a bigger issue than the Brexit deadlock and governments must start to prepare for it, the Green Party NI's Clare Bailey has said. 
There is a majority in the House for a Customs union, & if you take  remainers & leave voters who don't want a hard 'no deal' Brexit, there is likely a majority in the country too. But May won't go for it because it risks splitting her party. National interest can go hang!  
Agreed.  This is a mad, mad, mad period in politics.The nuclear threat made us fear harm from other countries.Brexit makes us fear harm from our own country / government.It makes it even more sinister somehow.  
#Lexit = #Brexit = Tory Brexit over time.You know this Keir.There's no viable #BrexitShambles outcome.The only way to protect Rights & prevent further haemorrhage of precious time & treasure is to #RevokeA50 #StopBrexit & #Remain in Control in the EU+ current deal. Back it! 
Sky’s news coverage on Brexit features Tony Blair & the CBI. Both predicting disaster for a WTO Brexit. No alternative opinion. Outrageous. 
If you STILL believe in Brexit and DON'T believe we were all being lied to, you REALLY need to watch this.WARNING: You won't like it.  
I really, really, really love Boris Johnson, Nigel Farage, Julia Hartley-Brewer and Brexit is gonna be amazing!  
Of course May has rejected Labour's Customs Union offer. She wants us to call a 2nd referendum to 1.kill all our support in key marginals and 2. Save her party from a split. Win, win. 
I cannot take any more. I despair of what the Lib/Lab/Con have done to my beloved country. They have made us a laughing stock to the rest of the world due to #brexit. I am therefore standing as a candidate for @ForBritainParty in the forthcoming elections. It is our only hope. 
Ian Dunt makes a very important point here - one not made often enough.Brexiters point at polls & mock Remain because the shift has been slight & slow (though gaining momentum now). Isn't the question rather, "given Govt and press backing for Brexit, why isn't it more popular?"  
U.K. signs post-Brexit trade continuity deal with Switzerland  
Newspaper headlines: 'Soft Brexit talks' and a Bafta queen  
Personally, I think it's ridiculous that the Celtics seem to be the only team in the league that needs a referendum after every loss. 
Brexit BOOST: Liam Fox signs deal ensuring smooth trade with Switzerland after Brexit Day  
Corbyn’s Brexit (CU ++++ ) IS NOT A SOFT BREXIT.  It is simply less hard that NO deal and marginally less hard than and FTA.It is NOT NORWAY.  And you cannot reap the benefits of the SM without being in it with the 4 freedoms.  
Hey @NicolaSturgeon  I have been a member of @theSNP for 40+ years Scotland is about to plunge over a Tory suicide #Brexit cliff. I look to you to now make a statement on how our nation can avoid an English Tory inspired catastrophe! 
@LordRennard   It is very obviously corruption - and those responsible for "brexit" are now known to have procured the 2016 EU leave vote using multiple crimes , with the leave campaigns paid for  - criminally - from the USA and Russia, among other countries hostile to the EU 
While the repentance of any sinner is a matter of joy, the question to be asked of anyone breaking with Corbyn over Brexit is this: what took you so long? 
Former Minister, Sam Gyimah  says that the Prime Minister is relying on irreconcilable factions to get her Brexit deal over the line.  
I am curious; why do all people who have a Rangers affiliation seem to be so aggressively against independence?Why does supporting a football have such an effect on people?I have also noticed that those who support Hard Brexit also seem to be Rangers "fans".Why? 
Nobody, who is well, can have as their "life's mission" the nature of the UK's relationship with the EU.I'd describe myself as a committed Leaver of over two decades but Brexit has never been any higher in my list of life objectives than about 84th!These guys have lost it!  
Brexiters aren't the ones who fucked it. We're just the ones who came to terms with it being fucked already. For everyone else it was a rude awakening.  #Brexit 
Olivia Colman's heart's in the right place on #Brexit too.#BAFTA #StopBrexit #RevokeArticle50 #PeoplesVote 
Right, @UKLabour.The no confidence vote failed, so an election’s off the table.May has rejected your soft-Brexit ‘compromise’, so that’s off the table.Three options remain on the table:- Support May’s Brexit- Ratify vs Remain referendum.- Revoke Art50Your call.  
Huffington Post has an interesting report on the 130+ demands US business is making for a deal with post-Brexit UK.  They include changing how NHS chiefs buy drugs in order to suit US pharma companies, and scrapping our safety-first approach to food standards. 
Why is a Labour donor, with a self-interest in getting Brexit to boost his business, with a few others - inc one who declared in 2015 that Labour must chase UKIP voters - dictating for all @UKLabour (and using their branding etc) when only 37% voted Leave?  pic.twitter.com/LTpa89SEkH 
Japan will not allow U.K. to adopt the EU’s FTA terms once Brexit happens without concessions, bc U.K. is small enough for Japan to seek better terms. Other big economies will follow. May’s “own deals better” approach is patently nonsense. (Tho so is Labour’s approach really).  
It is not the EU who imposed ridiculous unicorn red lines - that was May! The EU is protecting the Good Friday agreement, peace, Ireland and NI. U don't have a solution and yet u stomp ur feet cause u can't get ur cake and eat it. Such juvenile behaviour. #brexit MPs   
No going back to the horrors ...A blog post about blustering British politicians and their ignorance about the Irish border#Brexit 
European commission to crack down on offshore tax avoidance | Business | The Guardian - Let’s remind ourselves why a hard brexit is so appealing to millionaire tories like Johnson, Mogg et al.  
New post 2019 Preview: Brexit, Bullion and Bitcoin | Alasdair Macleod has been published on SGT Report -  
We'll pull out of the EU because of greed and hateand the shortages, unrest and martial law will come laterOur kingdom a laughing stock and poverty everywherebecause we were trapped in this dumb f*cking Brexit nightmare 
they'll whistle for a cab, and ignore all our fearsdriving past the homeless - how can they look themselves in the mirror ?It's beyond all reason as the disaster becomes clearNever forget elite tax dodgers trapped us in this Brexit nightmare 
There DOES seem to be an inordinate number of bots and trolls, signal-boosting the conservative politicians. Hope there isn't any foreign $$ investing in this, on their behalf. We don't want same type of cyber interference from outside, as produced Brexit & Trump 
BBC- Brexit: May responds to Corbyn's letter  "fundamental negotiating challenge here EU's position that completely frictionless trade only possible if UK stays in single market." EU position: UK must deliver commitment to frictionless border not unicorns 
The cross-party idea of accepting May’s deal on condition of holding a Remain/Deal referendum is the only viable way out of this mess. And if the people vote leave a second time, no-one will be able to argue with it. 
GFA was designed to make it work for time being until ‘will of the people changed’. It was always a temporary solution. Failure of Unionism to live up to its end of the deal regards equal rights etc and general arrogance, scandals and Brexit has changed ‘the will of the people’ 
People are coming to their senses at last, 18% lead for a 2nd referendum! I'd be interested to see the actual question though. Usually the term '2nd referendum' produces lower support than 'public vote' 
A great defence had he not pushed through Brexit referendum bills *using private member bills* to avoid awkward debates. 
Were leavers jealous of US style immigration queues? They've turned it into an endurance event.You could have had that without #Brexit, you just had to say... 
Quitting the real world for a fantasy one: Brexit is an insightful tweet.  
46 days until Article 50 deadline #Article50 #Brexit ⣿⣿⣿⣿⣿⣿⣿⣿⣿⣿⣿⣿⣿⣿⣿⣿⣿⣿⣿⣿⣿⣿⣿⣿⣿⣿⣿⣿⣿⣿⣿⣿⣿⣿⣿⣿⣿⣆⣀⣀ 
Brexit is 1127 hours away. #brexit 
Prime Minister #TheresaMay can reach a deal with the #EuropeanUnion to alter parts of the #Brexit agreement relating to the Northern Irish border, Treasury minister Liz Truss told Sky News on Sunday.#MNA_English#MNA 
No we’re not worried. European countries trade with us for our quality products. Not the low tariff trade deals. I predict our new ‘EU Free’ customs union will sell more British products than our previous free trade agreement..... 
“The no deal is the deal we didn’t want -and I don’t blink” #mundell #brexit #janeygodleyvoiceover 
The will of the misdirected people... 
Should Farage serve time in an American Prison (they use ankle chains) or a British Prison? 
'We are the laughing stock of the rest of the world'This audience member criticises the handling of Brexit. #bbcdn 
We must honour the referendum result and leave the European Union. The upcoming choice isn't between an imperfect deal and No Deal: it's between an imperfect deal and No Brexit. #brexit  
The time to be a bystander is over. One month ago, I became a British citizen. Back then, I vowed to be an an active voice speaking up for the future I want do see for my chosen home, the UK. Today, I joined the @LibDems to join the fight against #Brexit. What will you do?  
.@johnmcdonnellmp confirms he would vote "Remain" in a second referendum  
Spain prosecutors against Catalan political prisoners, blatantly failing to provide any single evidence of 'rebellion' (violent uprising) during #Catalonia's independence referendum, are accusing them of having received e-mails or of 'throwing a tweet'. Rotten #SpanishInquisition 
After tonight's votes in parliament, we'll continue to push for a close economic relationship based on our credible alternative plan or a General Election.We'll also back a public vote in order to prevent a damaging Tory Brexit or disastrous No Deal.  
Wow! This is very good. Finally someone is saying it - Brexit is a profoundly evil project. We have a moral duty to kill it off by any means possible.  
Owen Smith - #Brexit is a racist, xenophobic, right wing reactionary project & we in the Labour Party should be fighting against it with every sinew of our being... there is an opportunity to march against it on March the 23rd.. #PeoplesVote #PMQs #FinalSay @OwenSmith_MP 
In 2017 Theresa May was told by intelligence officers that the #Brexit referendum had been so corrupted by Russia that it was not free and fair.May's QC told a court last week that she was "well aware" of the "notorious facts" but decided to carry on anyway.Why would that be? 
All of us Brexiteers voting for separate parties will get us nowhere. We need to come together and fight as a coalition (like the Australian Liberal Coalition). Once Brexit is delivered and secured, we may then pursue our own individual ideological projects and goals. 
Tonight we did it. Through the solidarity of BritishinEurope and @the3million working together, we persuaded the UK Parliament to make the UK govt push for our rights to be ring fenced whatever the outcome of Brexit  
A stirring piece of oratory on the disaster that would be a crash out, no deal #Brexit - those who push this appalling notion care not for the UK or for good neighbourly relations  
A public enquiry? For respecting the outcome of the referendum? What the heck are you on Wollaston?!  
Incredible shots from our #ParliamentTakeover on @Channel4News - we will not stay silent about the devastating impact of Brexit on our future.  
Caroline Flint seems determined to wreck the jobs and lives of her constituents based upon the results of an advisory referendum won by lying cheating and electoral fraud.  
WATCH | Fantastic speech by @Lee4NED who lays into MPs refusing to accept the referendum result: "The people out there are watching and they are tired and bewildered by the games that are being played in here. We have to leave on March 29th!" Hear, hear!   
 graphic on A Second Referendum possible votes in Parliament@peoplesvote_uk 
'Is there any politician who can hold their head up through this process? You have let us all down and we're going to have to pay for it'@SirTomhunter on Brexit. #bbcdn 
Oh this is just a masterclass from Dominic Grieve.Clinical, controlled but taking precisely zero sh*t from the 'host'.If you get any brexit BS about no-deal WTO brexit - post this clip.#StopBrexit #FBPE 
The Commons, by a hefty majority, commits Britain to postponing #Brexit if there’s no deal  ... and @BBCNews fails even to mention it until well into second half of the #bbcnews at 22h00. Why are they conniving with government in downplaying it? . 
Bougainville referendum chairman Bertie Ahearn says the vote on independence will not happen on 15 June, the #PNG government not providing the money it committed. This continues its bad habit of failing to honour promised funding to the autonomous province. 
Referendum votes by gender as published my MORI. Women voted 51% to 49% in favour of Remain. Men voted to Leave (55% to 45%). Or put another way - if the blokes hadn’t been so damned daft we wouldn’t be in this ridiculous Brexit mess. 
I think you're desperately clinging on to a narrative that's expired.People now realise they've been lied to. They now know that Vote Leave cheated. They know, beyond a shadow of a doubt, that Brexit will harm the UK.As you can clearly see here: they've changed their minds.  
Quite a remarkable day...As part of @OFOCBrexit’s #ParliamentTakeover, my 12 yr old arranged to meet our MP @AlunCairns (Sec of State for Wales) in Parliament.We asked questions & challenged govt’s #Brexit strategy.We appreciated the opportunity to meet up, thank you Alun.  
Why did @RepGolden vote against universal background checks? Simple - Maine had a referendum on this issue in 2016, and #ME02 voted against background checks by a resounding 25-point margin. #mepolitics 
What you have to understand about this man is that he is not a natural rebel; a highly esteemed conservative lawyer of integrity - someone whose advice you would seek and take Dominic Grieve:  Listen to this: | talkRADIO  via @talkRADIO 
Apparently Tom Watson has got a slot on Good Morning Britain tomorrow morning. An excellent opportunity for him to talk about the rough sleeping crisis, the Tories Brexit crisis, the A&E crisis, the Illegal deportations crisis, the Foodbank crisis and the cuts to your services  
You defied democracy when you criminally cheated in the EU ref. #PieceOfShit pic.twitter.com/Ee5sSEwg91 
WATCH: Scottish Secretary @DavidMundellDCT explains why he didn't back an amendment from @thesnp tonight which would have completely ruled out a no-deal #Brexit.  
Labour is breaking their promise to honour the result of the referendum and leave the European Union.  
OK then #Brexit folk, explain/excuse/wriggle out of this one?We've ALL - remain & leave voters - been let down by broken promises from those who peddled Brexit. They missold it. It's not true. This is ALL THEIR FAULT.Given that what they advertised doesn't exist, #StopBrexit! 
A day of #PiesNotLies and #ShareFair at @SODEMAction followed by an evening light vigil outside Parliament in #Westminster today. Pics at Rex Features #Brexit #PeoplesVote #StopBrexit 
#YorkshireforEurope Ilkley Moor bar tat: this Brexit Deal is crap  We’ve come from Yorkshire just to say... Chorus of ⁦⁦@EuropeanYorks⁩ 
Why is Isabel Oakeshott constantly on TV, pedalling her Brexit Bullshit? I am fed up of all this airtime being given to propagandists intent on selling Britain's ruin as some kind of renewal. 
In the final part of a series on how #Brexit is viewed from Brussels, this week’s edition of the @AlexSalmondShow features Europe’s most experienced parliamentarian @ElmarBrok_MEP discussing how Brexit is transforming the perceptions of #Scotland’s place in #Europe RT & Online 
Carles Puigdemont (@KRLS): "The number of Catalans in favour of independence, considering the whole register of voters, is higher than the number of British people who supported Brexit".  
Labour's alternative #Brexit was tonight defeated in the Commons. So, as promised on Monday, @JeremyCorbyn confirmed that @UKLabour will back another #EU referendum. Read our report and join the discussion on our Facebook page #FinalSay #PeoplesVote Link:  
Why do people who voted Leave never care about the cheating?Because Brexit is a moral vacuum. Millions of lives are being turned upside down, even ruined. But they don't care. They just want their precious 'victory'. They do not give one single fuck about the damage it does. 
Do you support a second public vote on #Brexit ? 
“My personal view is that extending doesn’t take us any further forward and all it does is to increase the uncertainty that people are already beset with. So I think in the end, it may be the case that we would have to leave with No Deal” @andrealeadsom#StandUp4Brexit 
So, we know- the Leave campaigns lied & broke the law- the only reason the dodgy Brexit referendum result wasn't annulled was because it was only advisory.- we can cancel Brexit at any time up until 29th March.- Brexit will harm our NHS not help us.Now we know, let's not go  
Disappointed, not surprised that @UKLabour’s alternative to the Brexit cliff edge that Govt are driving us towards was rejected in the Commons tonight. We’ll continue to try to break the impasse by tabling amendments that would protect jobs, workers’ rights & unite the country. 
While many headlines were about Brexit yesterday, all eyes and ears were focused and attuned to Chair Powell’s testimony wherein he reiterated the Fed’s view that our slow-growth-not-no-growth economy remains on solid rails.  
Why is @BBCPolitics retweeting such extreme & offensive views? I have been a great defender of the BBC, but its behaviour over Brexit is making me conclude radical reform is now needed  
I'm in a minority of one who thinks that what Labour think or do on Brexit really doesn't matter.  The Referendum handed power to the inner executive of government and it's their hot potato. I'm sick and tired of the whole thing. Austerity reigns supreme all the while.  
New post Brexit map pic.twitter.com/Dwvin7myMa 
MPs tonight voted to lessen the immediate threat of a no-deal Brexit which would have devastating effects on London. We now need to take it off the table for good by withdrawing Article 50 and giving the public the final say on Brexit. 
The stadium has emptied. A single caretaker shoulders his worn down brush and sighs. As he goes to switch off the last light the caretaker notices his wee dog’s ears prick up. There below, entering the stadium, puffing, staggering, exhausted, jogs Brexit, starting its final lap 
Disappointed the Government has rejected Labour’s alternative Brexit deal. We must do all we can to protect jobs and the economy.That’s why Labour will put forward or support an amendment in favour of a public vote to prevent a damaging Tory Brexit.  
Brexit negotiations latest....#Brexit  
Part 2 of @Lee4NED’s superb contribution:“The people out there are watching and they are tired and bewildered of the games that are being played in here. We have to leave on the 29th March and I hope people will wise up in the next few days and weeks to make sure that happens” 
 Tonight Scottish Tory MPs had the chance to vote in Scotland's interests and rule out a no-deal Brexit. Instead, once again, they marched through the lobbies with hard-right Brexiteers in order to continue this #Brexit madness.  
.@AlbertoCostaMP looking very happy after the  #CostaAmendment has been adopted as Govt policy. We are now one step closer to truly protect #citizensrights of EU citizens in the UK & @BritishInEurope even in case of no-deal Brexit.  
Watch out it's team Brexit 
WHY won't you respect the referendum??-They cheated-Judges would declare it void if it weren't advisory-It's advisory-It makes us all poorer-It's the greatest theft of rights the country has ever seen-No cunt can explain how it benefits meI'll never respect the referendum 
“I hate to break it to you all, but it is not about you. You outsourced this decision in ‘16 to the people and you’re now trying to insource erroneously the implementation & it isn't working. You don't understand the democratic deficit which is coming” @Lee4NED#DelayMeansRemain 
BREAKING: @johnmcdonnellMP tells @peston that @UKLabour will put down an amendment calling for a second referendum as soon as the meaningful vote comes back, which could be next week. Full interview 11.10pm @ITV  
He'll go down well 
Here is why arguing over whether the working class voted for Brexit is a red herring. The class (occupation) differences (reading across the bars) are small compared to the education differences (differences between dark and light bars) within each occupational group.  
The leavers still don’t have a fucking planIt’s whatntjey voted for#brexit pic.twitter.com/zLMHYzJZvE 
We are proposing what you yourself proposed in 2011 - a second referendum now we know ‘the deal’  
 Theresa May’s Brexit madness continues as all 13 Scottish Tory MPs vote against an SNP amendment that would have ruled out a no-deal Brexit. Here are 6 important takeaways about what this means for Scotland.  
Why would Govt want Tory MPs to vote with @UKLabour to delay #Brexit ..?  
I am delighted that the Government has accepted the @AlbertoCostaMP amendment in the House of Commons today, securing the rights of EU and UK citizens post Brexit. 
13 Tory MP's Elected in #Scotland just voted FOR a NO DEAL #BrexitThey just voted for a CATASTROPHE in #ScotlandThe just VOTED against their Electorates who voted REMAIN.For poverty, unemployment, homeless consequences. 
I appear to be in the worst bar in the world #Lithuania #brexit  
Seriously could you not find anyone under the age of 70?We’re all bored shitless with the same lazy old film from a leave constituency with predominantly old people demanding the most damaging form of brexitThere’s no law against interviewing young & educated people too 
Hey Caroline, your official party stance is now to support a second referendum.  
In that case ... a second referendum!#NoBrexit#StopBrexit#FBPE#2ndReferendum 
Breaking: The Tories just voted AGAINST an end to the Brexit deadlock.  
Labour's Brexit plan comprehensively thrown out by MPs. Which means @jeremycorbyn is now formally committed to start campaigning with gusto for a referendum. That'll be interesting 
Shame on the ERG for what they are doing to this country. Shame on the Prime Minister for failing to say “No.” And shame on anyone who will vote to make this country poorer. My full speech on why we must take No Deal #Brexit off the table.  
Snapple out here ruffling feathers ahead of Brexit.  
When we’re all about to get massively fucked by brexit pic.twitter.com/PkSr6G62W7 
Merci, Macron. Please block any extension. The faster we get out the better - least that way we’ll endure less of your sanctimonious drivel. 
these pokemon Brexit memes are great  
Labour issues official Corbyn statement on vote - quite a moment:“We will back a public vote in order to prevent a damaging Tory Brexit or a disastrous no deal outcome”.  
The policy of the Labour Party is now to support - and to support all moves towards - a public vote on the deal.In 2016, a proposition to leave won. People have the right to decide whether the Brexit Deal meets that proposition, or whether we should remain a member of the EU 
When they talk about a referendum, are you in agreement? ~ Jeff Rev. Njoya: I’m not in agreement whatsoever. This is for creating more positions for thieves; excluded thieves wanting to be included. There is not a single person who has talked for the ordinary Kenyan #JKLive 
There is no such thing as a jobs first Brexit. Repeat after me. There is no such thing as a jobs first Brexit. 
There has been a lot of discussion about pallets, pallets as they mostly relate to BREXIT. Like many subjects, scratch the surface and it is very complex, there is even a standard for the bending resistance of pallet nails.A thread…1/  
What are these pro #Brexit ads doing in #Cardiff?!Come out for our march on Saturday to remind everyone that we're a remain city and #Wales is now a remain nation! #CardiffMarch4EU@WalesForEurope 
. @Lee4NED "...it is not about you - you outsourced this decision in 2016 to the people and you are now trying to insource erroneously the implementation, and it isn't working..." 
With Michael Cohen predictably singing like a canary over Stone, WikiLeaks, Hacking and Russia, at least Congress is addressing their corruption & foreign interference problems, whilst at Westminster the PM, government, opposition and judiciary ignore the elephant in the chamber. 
'If you just get behind Brexit, we might get a good deal!'THERE IS NO GOOD DEAL. ANYONE WITH A BRAIN CAN SEE THAT. WE WILL NOT GET BEHIND BREXIT BECAUSE BREXIT WILL NOT GET BEHIND US. BREXIT FUCKS US! BOLLOCKS TO BREXIT 
Labour's alternative plan for Brexit safeguards jobs and industry, and ensures businesses in Britain continue to have access to vital European markets. #OurAlternative 
Anna Soubry - The only way through this mess & crisis is to take it back to the people.. now we know what #brexit looks like, we did not.. any of us! any of us!.. know what we meant when we put to the Great British people the option of leave.#PeoplesVote #FinalSay @Anna_Soubry 
“May’s lawyer admits the EU referendum was unlawful” Well. That’s seriously embarrassing. Do please RT.We need to expose the PM.  
. @OwenSmith_MP "Brexit is exacerbating underlying problems in our society; it is a racist, xenophobic, right-wing reactionary project..."  
“This whole push for a 2nd referendum would seek to deny the British Public the rights and freedoms they voted for. Also when it comes to voting for delay without specifying reasons for the delay, is not the right approach at all” @patel4witham#DelayMeansRemain #StandUp4Brexit 
Disgraceful divisive speech from @DavidLammy re #Brexit. Leave voters from all walks of life castigated for daring to hold a view he disagrees with. Time to respect voters, not denigrate them. We will leave EU on 29th March with or without a deal. 
It's been nearly 72 hours, and my elation over Olivia Colman's Oscar win is still powering me through an otherwise drab week. How long can it last? Does it have enough mileage to see me through Brexit? 
"The referendum of October 1st is the greatest act of civil disobedience that has ever taken place in Europe." @jcuixart #DemocracyOnTrial #theyellows_cat 
France will veto extension to Article 50 unless 2nd referendum is on the table...  
Five stabbings in the last 24hours in London and yet the London #Mayor Khan refused to adopt out budget amendment which would put an extra 1378 Police Officers on London streets! He would rather concentrate on #brexit - he is responsible for the Met - not Brexit 
Message to Jacob Rees- Smog 
UK: Watch me trash international reputation with a series of ridiculous political happeningsUSA: Hold my beerUK: Hold MY beerUSA: Hold MY beerUK: Hold MY beerUSA: Hold MY beerUK: Hold MY beerUSA: Hold MY beerUK: Hold MY beer...#Brexit #Cohen 
Agree. MPs must do their job and cancel Brexit. There is no better deal for UK national interest then to stay in EU!#RevokeA50 
"People have been thoroughly misled, over a long period of time, by a form of propaganda that believes the EU is evil" Conservative MP Dominic Grieve says many people calling for a "catastrophic" no-deal #Brexit have been led to believe "mad fantasies" 
Is your business #BrexitReady? See  to learn more 
The Government has published a further range of practical advice to help businesses and citizens around the country get #BrexitReady. Go to  for more information. 
How could #blockchain solve one of #Brexit 's biggest issues? Read our full article:   
I’m convinced the people behind the Leave planned this:- Use false promises to get lots of normal people vote Leave.- Use those Moderate Leave votes to justify whatever kind of Hard Brexit they want, however different it is from what was promised.My Leave vote was hijacked. 
Richard Drax MP: "The instructions to everyone in this House was to leave the EU; not half in, half out, a bit here, a bit there, the instructions were clear - to leave the EU." 
If you exclude the working class people who voted Brexit, then literally no working class people voted Brexit. 
Nah mate, the only way that 52% lose their Brexit is if they are no longer >50% any more.Democracy isn't an event it is a continuum, Brexit referendum dogmatism would stick the knife into the throat of British democracy.  
In days we changed the course of Brexit. In years we will change the course of Britain. @TheIndGroup #ChangePolitics 
Whilst May in her parallel universe continues to stall towards brexit, back in reality we must always remember that brexit is a coup, it is a genuine criminal conspiracy set up to weaken and take over our country. It was not a referendum, it was a very organised crime. #FBPE 
"The stark truth is this: not one word of the Withdrawal Agreement or the Political Declaration has changed since it was signed off on 25th November last year."Labour's Sir Keir Starmer says Theresa May is wrong to believe that her Brexit deal with the EU is going to be changed  
Brexit IS right-wing extremism.Democracy is legally binding fair referendum with clear real options & fair vote for all that are affected including 3.5m EU and 1.5m UK abroad, not  unicorns of advisory gerrymandered poll based on criminal fraud funded  by dark Russian money.  
Rubbish 
May knew the referendum was unsafe in 2017. MI6 told MayAs reported by @LouiseMensch 
When Jeremy Corbyn and I recently met with European Union negotiators, they were clear that Labour's alternative plan for Brexit is credible and could be negotiated with the EU. #OurAlternative 
Day 1: extraordinarily, highly successful. We met Steve ‘Stop Brexit’ Bray and have thus got straight to the top of the anti-brexit campain. #stopbrexit #30daystostopbrexit #joinus 
Honoured  to meet students from @LeaveMnsLeave who are campaigning to ensure #Brexit is delivered on time & in way that safeguards what we all voted for; sovereignty, independence  ensuring British taxpayers money £200 million a week currently going to EU redirected to Britain.  
"I went to Swe/Nor border. It's a hard stop, with infrastructure, with security and paperwork"... (not according to ERG it isn't ) #Brexit  
More nails in the Branch Office coffin!!!LEONARD CONFIRMS LABOUR PREFER BREXIT TO REMAINRichard Leonard has confirmed that Scottish Labour would prefer Brexit to go ahead than to trigger a second EU referendum. 
.@heidiallen75 tells #PoliticsLive the Prime Minister isn’t making any headway on #Brexit - it’s time to ask the British people. @BBCPolitics #ChangePolitics 
“The EU will only give an extension if they thought there was a reasonableness behind the request. What would be the rationale that we would give to ask for this very short extension? I can’t think what would happen in those couple of months that would be helpful.” Ann Main 
I reacted so strongly to this nonsense from #DUP because everyone knows there was a hard Irish border for many years before the #GFA. My family lived beside it & it hugely disrupted their lives. To suggest otherwise is dishonest @BorderIrish #Brexit   
This is shameless monkey balancingDid Hindu radicalism break the country and take away huge territories like Punjab and Bengal?Are Hindu radicals waging war against the state and killing soldiers everyday?Are Hindu radicals asking for freedom, Hindu nation or referendum?  
WATCH: Sara Cox, BBC Radio 2 host, wants to put Brexit back to the public in a #PeoplesVote. March with us on 23.03.19 to demand MPs put Brexit back to the people:  
“May’s lawyer admits the EU referendum was unlawful” Well. That’s fucking awkward. Do please RT.  
Wednesday Morning Briefing:- Trump meets Kim Jong Un in Vietnam for second summit- Trump's former lawyer Michael Cohen to testifies to Congress- A look ahead to the UK parliament's #Brexit vote 
Members of BMA Council have today written to @theresa_may to express our concerns about Brexit and to call for the public to have a #FinalSay  
A quick poetic look at what's going on in this masterpiece from @Coldwar_Steve#Brexit #simples 
IMO if we have a 2nd referendum it shd be made clear 1st referendum was advisory-if it had been mandatory wd have been annulled due to illegality.  2nd referendum shd be mandatory and policed accordingly so no lies on either side. then we will truly know “ the will of the people” 
Incompetence across the board!People: ref was illegall give us a fair vote. Gov: it was advisory, so dosnt matter. People: OK go back to the people. Gov: no the people have spokenPeople: but it was illegal...around we go.Can't wait for a Mueller style #brexit hearing.  
Can’t believe the plot of the next pokemon game is stopping brexit 
Prof. Sir John Curtis - the ultimate King of Polling - says 'remain' now clearly 'the will of the people' (but we'd *all* have to get out and vote!) 
I can't wait to see the all-new British-inspired Pokemon like Fishhenchips, Cuppatee (evolves from Teebag with the 'raised pinky' item), and Aegislash's new Brexit Forme. 
Our Brexit special is here! We interview @carolecadwalla about how Brexit and Trump are the same crime:  
Can't wait to play Pokemon Brexit later this year #PokemonDirect 
Have you lost faith in our Parliamentary process given the failure by some MP's to ignore their electorate?  #BREXIT Please RETWEET after voting.Please FOLLOW for updates. 
Brexit as a marriage in crisis.We can relate to this. 
So it turns out the NHS Brexit scare report was written by a bunch of Remainiac professors, former EU employees and the nutty Scientists4EU guy. Who'd have thought!  
does this game take place in UK pre or post brexit 
Belinda De Lucy, mum of four, explains why she voted for Brexit. The EU has taken away power from the people. RT if you think our children's votes should matter!  
IF the UK takes part in the European Elections on 23rd May UKIP will field candidates in all 12 Regions. Every UKIP candidate will run on the basis of unilateral & unconditional withdrawal. Every vote for UKIP will be a vote to VOTE to LEAVE the EU! 
I have been contacted by senior Unite representatives who take serious issue with this @unitetheunion press release - which says that at a meeting of factory representatives there was “no mood” for an EU referendum. According to sources, more than half of those at the...  
“The reality is that it’s the numbers in the House of Commons that cause the difficulty. And just to look at that for one second, the fact is that the people in the House of Commons who are not only Remainers, but Reversers“ @BillCashMP#DelayMeansRemain #StandUp4Brexit 
I somehow deleted the first tweet on this thread!  Sorry!The thread is an attempt to explain why I will die if I am unable to access my Meds after a no deal Brexit.This #BMJ article also explains it.#RevokeA50#StopBrexit#Cancer 
New @GaslitNation is out and it's a Brexit Special! @AndreaChalupa  interviews journalist @carolecadwalla on how Brexit and Trump are the same crime and discuss what's next for the UK 
She knew that because, as I reported, MI6 told her this in 2017. I now expect this fact to come out before the end of the year, and after Brexit is delayed.  
Maybot repeats often that she respects the result of the 2016 “referendum”. Our PM openly admits she respects criminality through fraud, lies, illegal funding & interference as per her QC in Wilson Case. 
WATCH: Rebecca here voted leave (as did her family) but now she has seen #brexitshambles unfold she has changed her mind. She is a #remainernow and wants a #FinalSay #PeoplesVote on #brexit.She is far from alone. It's ok to change your mind.  
“Can I ask that the Prime Minister reiterates our manifesto commitment to leave with a deal or to leave with no deal and that is our commitment” Anne Main#PMQs 
Remember when KFC ran out of chicken?Well don't worry.It's not like the same company are responsible for medical supplies in case of a no-deal Brexit #PMQs #PeoplesVoteNOW 
"If we had to have another referendum now, I'd never vote for anything ever again."We ask voters in Tom Watson's Leave-majority constituency what they think of Labour supporting a second referendum on Brexit.  
If politicians can't sort out this Brexit mess, it has to go back to the people - that's why we're here for our #ParliamentTakeover! 
Brexit Update: Home Secretary says Government will support Alberto Costa’s amendment to protect the rights of EU citizens in the UK. Government then fires Alberto Costa for tabling his amendment. #CostaAmendment 
Adding more stickers to my Daniel Hannan Is Wrong Abut Everything sticker book. #Brexit #BrexitShambles #BrexitFood #BrexitConcerns 
Under No Deal #Brexit vital medical imports will be handled by company that was incapable of delivering chicken to KFC.PM's stubbornness is putting lives at risk.What guarantee can she give to patients that they'll get vital medicines in event of No Deal? My question at #PMQs 
Thank you @ByDonkeys for highlighting - many lies told by Leave politicians and the official Vote Leave campaign on #citizensrights of the 3.6m EU citizens in the UK & @BritishInEurope during the referendum campaign.  
The Tories’ shambolic handling of Brexit plus years of austerity is the perfect storm:Poverty is upFood bank usage is upThe economy is slowingBut the richest get richerOnly Labour will deliver for the many. #PMQs 
'17.4m expect us to leave on the 29th March'a) One Million Leave voters have died b) Three Million Leave voters have changed their minds about Brexitc) God knows how many more Brexit supporter don't want a no deal Brexit 
The Tories’ shambolic handling of Brexit plus years of austerity is the perfect storm:Poverty is upFood bank usage is upThe economy is slowingBut the richest get richerOnly @UKLabour will deliver for the many. #PMQs 
"Where did you hear that? From who?""The prime minister""Did you? Right, OK" Home Secretary Sajid Javid says ministers will back an amendment protecting EU citizens' rights after #Brexit 
Liberals: Bozza or Trump bonfires? Hahaha - it's just a joke, crybabies!Also Liberals: Shamima Begum target practice? Hate crime! Islamophobia! Rise of the Far Right! Brexit!   
The so called "Party of Wales" clearly don't represent the people of Wales. Along with the rest of the UK, Wales voted to leave the EU. The largest democratic exercise this country has ever seen. Only @UKIP is standing up for a true Brexit #BrexitMeansExit 
If I had to choose between May’s Deal and Remain, I’d vote Remain - 100%.May’s “red lines” speech was the moment I realised I’d been used. The votes of Moderate Leavers have been totally hijacked by Hard Brexit ideologues.Perhaps I should have seen that coming, but I didn’t. 
NEWS:We're excited to announce that our campaign will now be known as NHS for a People's Vote!We were set up to campaign for the NHS in the Brexit referendum, and we believe that a People's Vote is the best and only way forward. 
Extraordinary comment. This is that good ol' cuddly EU at its finest. An aggressive, expansionist little empire that has very low tolerance for democracy or dissent. This is what the Remain rearguard are trashing our own democracy to keep us in. Just appalling. #brexit  
A rise of extremism would be the consequence of defying democracy. 
The people of Northern Ireland have a unique right to be Irish or British or both - a right being actively undermined & questioned through the courts by the UKG. This choice & equality under the #GFA will be voided by #BrexitA paramount breach that I'll be raising in Brussels pic.twitter.com/78r3bipTsU 
#Brexit fast approaches. So far, all the Govt. has done is vote against acknowledging animal pain. Not very promising. I’m also worried that cheaper imports will undermine animal welfare standards.I’m joining 36 animal protection groups in calling for a #BetterDealForAnimals. 
I've deep reservations about 2nd ref - divides communities, corrodes parliamentary sovereignty, forces UK to take part in EU elections. Much better to unite behind #CommonMarket2.0, a bridge-building Brexit which can command majority support. Time MPs sorted out this Brexit mess!  
“At the moment, we’ve got a bunch of my colleagues running around saying ‘we can’t leave with ‘no deal’, we have to force the Govt to delay.’ What for?“The truth is that they don’t really want a 2 month delay, they actually want a year to 2 years delay” IDS#DelayMeansRemain 
.@EstherMcVey1: "She needs their support, not for them to bottle on her" 
The problem with #Brexit, is that people at the very top have over simplified and tried to white wash the intricacies of what it entails. No one knows how to confront the thousands of problems associated with this bollocks plan to Leave the EU, and the economy can’t ignore it.  
Getting nowhere... but full marks for effort!#blackball #8ball #pool#theresamay #brexit  
“We’ve promised for a long time that we’d leave on the 29th March. The Prime Minister has promised that, that’s what my constituents expect, they voted 71% to Leave - one of the highest in the country. I don’t think we can take that off the table” @bbradleymp#StandUp4Brexit 
Now we know that the referendum was unlawful why are we continuing to implement the fraudulent result? 
“As long as the backstop is there, this deal will not get the support of the bulk of Eurosceptics. What is quite interesting about this delay, if it were to happen, is that we would still face the same position at the end of June” @Jacob_Rees_Mogg#StandUp4Brexit 
Which flavour of antisemitism? Open or trope or dogwhistle?I addressed one sort yesterday. Feel free to repost anywhere relevant. 
The idea that vital medical supplies will be handled by a company incapable of delivering chicken to KFC is truly frightening.Ministers must urgently explain why they’re gambling with people’s lives by striking bargain bucket #Brexit supply deals.  
Over a billion "dark ads" delivered to people's Facebook pages by AIQ  in the last days of the referendum campaign. Used Facebook users' personal data to identify people with anti-immigrant views who would be particularly susceptible to lies. #stopbrexit #revokearticle50 #fbpe 
While the British Parliament is busy dithering on Brexit, the Dutch are building all-electric container barges and calling them 'Tesla ships' - and with a subsidy from the European Union! #ClimateAction 
Germany promises ‘better pay, weather and food’ to tempt NHS nurses to leave UK after Brexit Well done Germany. So, if you're wondering why Germany is a powerhouse in Europe, now you know why; diversity!! :) 
30 days remain till Brexit. From this morning @cd_loveless and I will be at Westminster for an hour every day. Perhaps one person can’t make a difference, but there are two of us. #stopbrexit #30daystostopbrexit 
If the Government delay Brexit without holding European elections we will sue.  
Gillian Keegan (Tory MP) - "There's been 120 opinion polls in last year, over a hundred have shown 'Remain' to be ahead. #Brexit #FinalSay 
Fears of No Deal are certainly exaggerated. We must hold our nerve and deliver the Brexit the British people clearly voted for.  
Since the vote for Brexit, Remoaners have been pushing the idea that Britain is full of xenophobes. They see Brexit voters as stupid and prejudiced. It is this elitist demonisation of Britain and its citizens that has really stirred up social tension.Brendan O’Neill on Sky  
Got a .eu domain name? If you’re a UK resident or organisation, you’ll be ineligible to use it after Brexit. Read on to find out how this affects you. 
Version 12 of my #Brexit diagram, now with accumulative probabilitiesNo Deal: 26%May's Deal: 20%General Election (inc. Art 50 extend): 19%3 months extra spiral of tedium: 14%#PeoplesVote (inc. Art 50 extend): 12%EU offers 21 month extension, UK accepts: 8% 
1/ A common conception in the UK that fundamentally misunderstands both what the backstop is and what the EU's priorities are on Brexit. In truth, the backstop gives the EU almost nothing of what it wants from a future relationship with the UK.  
Great #commercial advice from @MuckleLLP solicitor Luke. Simple steps to prepare your business for #brexit at our event with @CD_EMN this morning. 
Please Do Something!  Even if you have use the Library to readthis:  A second Brexit referendum is now essential 23 March 2019: #PutItToThePeople London March - find a way to be there!  #StopBrexitSaveDemocracy #FBPE #FPHD 
Hurrah I've been blocked by Caroline Flint for suggesting she might be wrong in not supporting @UKLabour party policy and what was agreed at conference...The poorest and most vulnerable of her constituents will be hit hardest by #Brexit. It was her job to tell them the truth. 
FACT CHECK:Yesterday, in response to the #CostaAmendment, Theresa May claimed that the EU has not got the legal authority to separate the #citizensrights from the Brexit negotiations. We got our legal experts on it and the clear verdict is: INCORRECT  
Bollocks to Brexit  
Millions of us who voted Leave genuinely thought our country would be better off.There are some fanatical “we just need to get out” Leavers, but there aren’t 17.4m people who hate the EU so much that they want to Leave at all cost.The alternative to a good Brexit is Remain. 
And we’ve only just begun..... 
'My suspicion is that any delay to Brexit is a plot to stop Brexit. This would be the most grievous error that politicians could commit' - @Jacob_Rees_Mogg@Stop_The_EU | #MoggMentum 
DUP referendum spending included a £435,000 donation from "unknown individuals" given via "the constitutional research council" run by Richard Cook a former vice chair of Scottish Conservatives. £280k of that was spent on these ads in the Metro. A paper not even distributed in NI  
“Taking back control has come down to a choice between suicide & vassalage”. Brilliant from the ⁦@FT⁩’s Martin Wolf on why the only way out of the #Brexit disaster is a #finalsay #PeoplesVote 
I will do my duty to represent the UK's best interests, not act as an unthinking delegate.I will tell the truth about what caused gross inequality in this country, not scapegoat Brussels. I will reject Brexit because our best future is inside the EU. 
The “no deal papers” I secured yesterday explain why #NoDealBrexit would be “ruinous” for our economy. Unbelievable Conservative Govt refuses to take this nightmare off table. UK business are right never to forgive the Conservative Party @TheIndGroup 
The result of decades of failure to promote the many benefits of learning other languages. Not to mention the dud mentality of ‘everyone speaks English’. Post-Brexit these skills even more vital.  
12 amendments today. Cooper-Letwin have new binding amendment to force indicative votes on Britain’s future with EU. It would force gov to give parly time to a motion on indicative votes by Hilary Benn on March 19 just 10 days before curren Brexit Day. 
Article 50 Extension 
In just a week, @TheIndGroup has already had a decisive impact on the #Brexit policies of the main parties.By working together, and reaching out across party lines, we can #ChangePolitics and our country for the better. 
Remember that Leavers’ campaign that Brexit would be great for the NHS. Attached is the view from inside the NHS, in the @TheLancet 
After the horlicks you’ve made of Brexit , only an idiot would crow about it. Shut up & deliver Brexit !  
Julia: "Telling people their votes do not matter will do far more damage than anything that will come about because of Brexit." @JuliaHB1 |  
Betting odds of an on-time #Brexit drop to an all-time low of 14% (9 month chart)  
I don’t know about you but I have had enough of May and her endless deceits over Brexit. She should do her duty and resign. Unfit to lead this great country.   
“MPs and Ministers...should remember it is not the politicians but the people who have made this country work...Unlike their rulers, they believe in themselves. But more important, they believe in their country.” 
New York Times captures it as it is... "a referendum on honesty"  
I will support a 2nd Ref but I shouldnt need to. Government, having seen all the impact studies should cancel Brexit as it will cause immeasurable harm to those they govern. Its time for the Goverment to act like one. 
The Government’s own lawyer has now conceded in court that the Leave Campaign was so Illegal that had the Referendum been binding rather than advisory it would have been declared void by the court. WHY DOES NOBODY SEEM TO CARE ABOUT THIS?!!! 
Am I the only one who resents commentators calling a #Peoplesvote a "second referendum" - implying it's a re-run until people give right answer? It's not. It's opportunity to ask the utterly reasonable question: "Are you happy with the negotiated deal? Is it what you voted for?" 
Our cross party @TheIndGroup amendment to the PM’s Brexit motion which we have tabled and hope to put to a vote in the @HouseofCommons today - with numerous signatories from 4 different parties #ChangePolitics 
Petition: Undertake an independent enquiry into the role of Russia in Brexit.  
Er...I think you'll find in the referendum most women voted to remain, Esther. Therefore you are sticking two fingers up to the majority of women in the country. 
Morning Children/Fellow MPs. Any chance we can make some bloody decisions soon? The Brexit elephant is bigger than Eric Pickles now. 
He's lying, can we trust his British associates? Birds of a feather...... 
I must say I am loving this threat from Leavers of never voting again if Brexit is cancelled, no downside, just considerable upsides, one might say! 
If England decides that Scotland is used up, finished, bled dry and really is a financial burden, then it wouldn’t require an English Referendum or Scotland’s consent, it would just ditch us!What makes you think we need their permission or a referendum to do likewise? 
Post-Brexit survival kit at Heathrow.  
Muhammadu Buhari has won a second term as Nigeria’s president, in an election that was in many ways a referendum on honesty  
The Court of Appeal last week acknowledged that the last referendum was deeply flawed and if it weren’t for a legal loophole would otherwise have been voided. We need a #PEOPLESVOTE but we need it to be sound. #votesshouldbefair@UKEUchallenge 
Says the woman who's been referred to the NCA for possible criminal charges in relation to the referendum campaign.  
There are many others diseases in a similar position to me, diabetes & access to insulin for example, but I can speak only for me. WE MUST not have a no deal Brexit.  People will die.  I will die.  Totally unnecessarily.  It is simply not an option.#RevokeA50 
Therefore, currently, in the event of a no deal Brexit, after March 29th, I will have little to no chance of accessing my medication or research into my treatment - and this MATTERS when you have a very rare diseaseMy death would be a likely outcome of all of this.#RevokeA50 
19/ So the Conservatives voted to pursue something they knew was nonsense rather than try and close the deal that would honour the referendum* 
The next time you feel like telling an Englishman, Irishman and Scotsman joke, remember that had we been Irish, we'd have held the second referendum, voted to remain and moved on from all this shit sixteen months ago. We're the butt of the joke now. 
Wrong. If you see below you will see a double jeopardy of no-deal.  Then do you think we will have something by June? And then what at June ?We need to also see what happensin June. #secondReferendum is our only way out. 
6/ In Para 1 we highlight how no deal does not honour the result of the referendum.In other words we have no mandate for no deal  
2/ Now we had a referendum about the EU. You know the advisory NON- BINDING one riddled with breaches of electoral law and foreign interference. Well... 
Peter Brookes on #brexitcrisis #planB #finalsay #peoplesvote #beherenow #FinalSay #PeoplesVote #BrexitShambles #BrexitChaos #TheresaMay #BrexitDeal #kickthecan #Brexit - political cartoon gallery in London  
Or is he off making another nice mess to get us into?  #WheresBoris #BlameBoris 
Where is Boris? Has he been arrested yet?#WheresBoris #BlameBoris 
Dear Brexitons,Remainlings do not actually want a second referendum. What they want is for article 50 to be revoked and Brexit to be cancelled.However, out of courtesy to you, and out of concern for democracy, they are consenting to take a risk and allow a fresh vote. 
Powerful speech on #brexit by @simoncoveney. “I am proud of the EU .. I want my three daughters to have the freedom to travel in Europe, to perhaps study or work in another EU country & speak European languages. They will be no less Irish for doing so”.  
Patrick Blower on #brexitcrisis #planB #finalsay #peoplesvote #beherenow #FinalSay #PeoplesVote #BrexitShambles #BrexitChaos #TheresaMay #BrexitDeal #kickthecan #Brexit - political cartoon gallery in London  
Throwback to the World Cup with these geezers, fucking coming home lads  pic.twitter.com/8GEgSBlqk5 
Has there ever been a time in British history when the political and media class around Westminster has been more out of touch with ordinary voters? 
We had a referendum in 1975 when the Eurosceptics wanted oneWe had a referendum in 2016 when the Eurosceptics wanted oneThe "you can't keep asking for referendums until you get the answer you want" argument ignores the fact we never asked for the referendums in the first place 
See how the #WithdrawalAgreement fares alongside No Deal or Remain. Compare The Brexit at   via @comparebrexit 
One way or another, we are leaving the EU#Brexit  
Ministers promised to give @Anna_Soubry the private papers which show the impact ‘no deal’ would have - but we’ve only had a summary. The Government must give us the whole picture of what a no deal #Brexit would mean.  
I am so pleased climate change has agreed to stop happening until they sort out Brexit. 
BREXIT latest:DOWNSIDEEconomy screwedNissan, Sony, Airbus, Jaguar etc off/cutting jobsFood/medicine shortagesManufacturing collapseNI peace in dangerNHS/social care meltdownKent = car parkRiotsActual shit everywhereUPSIDEBlue passportBrexit 50pCONCLUSIONWorth it pic.twitter.com/paVoJ8vpgO 
The idea that “Leave voters knew what they were voting for” can be empirically dismissed as it’s now over two and a half years later and one month left until Brexit Day and we literally STILL DON’T KNOW what the result of their vote will be. To claim otherwise is absurd. 
Can't wait for 2019s @OfficialRandL 
The "official " line now is that we know law broken numerous times but as the referendum was not legally binding, we can't do anything... REALLY??? Had it been a legally binding referendum we'd have it nulified then?So, like every in Wastemonster, it's the system that's fucked? 
OK. I've asked this question many times over the last 3 years, but still no answer, other than slogans or nebulous expectations, but here goes again:Is there any actual tangible benefit that brexit will bring? Any at all?#brexit 
I keep hearing that Meghan Markle being mixed race has nothing to do with people hating her. I suppose it's just pure coincidence that most of her haters are older, white MAGA and Brexit supporters. Fascinating.  #MeghanMarkle 
2016 ref expectations were single market 
"Catalonia's failed 2017 independence referendum."  Define "failed".  There was a Yes vote.  #TheNine 
What 'preserving trust in politics' by forcing though the opaque result of a crooked and dishonest referendum actually looks like.  
IMPORTANT: The Government's formerly secret Cabinet no deal Brexit briefing debunks once and for all the GATT Article XXIV nonsense that Brexiters like JRM keep spouting to falsely claim we can have 10 years of tariff-free trade... 
Words are very important. But for Donald Trump, words are very confusing. Here he is discussing Brexit. He’s like one of those battery operated toy dolls that can talk to you with a set of pre programmed random messages that tumble out in any order. 
A number of constituents have asked how I expect to vote in the coming weeks on Brexit. I would vote for the PM’s deal, which takes us out of the EU on time. If it falls, I will vote against an extension to Article 50 and for a WTO exit on March 29th. 
The entire UK when the Government announce another referendum  
When you spend 2.5 years talking about trade deals, supply chains and tariffs, and then realise that your whole economy actually depends on services.#Brexit  
Yvette ~ my husband has Type 2 diabetes ...has been told there is a shortage of his drugs as a result of #Brexit uncertainty.I am a #cancer sufferer (In remission)...I won't get treated after we drop out of #EuratomWas this on any bus?Our deaths?#revokearticle50 #stopbrexit 
"What kind of message would that send to the more than 17 million people who voted to leave the EU nearly three years ago now?" the prime minister asked MPs, as she provided an update on Brexit progress."Perhaps the same message given by Mrs 'Windrush's' stalling since December  
The Blair Bitch Project.#Brexit pic.twitter.com/D2LQlyIZKk 
Labour stalwart @KateHoeyMP: "I will not vote for another referendum and many other principled Labour colleagues will join me." Thank you for respecting democracy, Kate.  Support us at  
Formerly secret no-deal Brexit Cabinet briefing has just been released. Shows UK GDP will be 9% lower in a no-deal scenario, and details a wide range of negative effects.  
Is The UK After Brexit A Freelance Economy?  #tax #contractor # #Findaccountant #mtd 
My bet — Theresa May’s plan is the same that it was: To present her deal as the only available option just before the final date of the art. 50 extension, taking Britain hostage to blackmail the Parliament: her Brexit deal or no-deal Brexit.  
OMG.Fags I approve of!!!#Brexit cigarettes courtesy of @WankersOTW 
Let's not forget the graphic evidence of the 2016 fix shown by the Economist's regular survey: 
“The PM has said that Parliament can have a vote on whether it would like to delay, rather than just leaving, but she was talking about quite a short delay, and I can’t see the point.” @johnredwood#StandUp4Brexit #DelayMeansRemain 
Business owner Rebecca (voted Leave), Doesn't want no-deal Brexit. Would like another vote, and would this time vote to remain. #EU #Brexit  
The UK is hugely divided following the EU referendum. A second referendum would divide us further. Our priority must be to honour the referendum result and move forward as a united nation, respecting the public mandate in the biggest democratic exercise in our country's history. 
The govt's chaotic approach to Brexit has shredded our international credibility.  With or without Brexit, we must repair our international standing in the world & build alliances. The Defence Secretary must stop his foolish rhetoric & embarrassing us around the world.  
NOW That's what I call FUNNY  #Brexit #funny @NOWThatsMusic 
I support leaving the EU.I don't like what Labour is doing.But sorry, I won't take lectures from Tories. You took us into the EU. Called a referendum. Backed remain. Had the entire establishment behind you. Lost & spent 2 years negotiating the worst deal in history.Shutup. 
Contact your MP to make them honour their promiseDemand that Brexit is deliveredClick on the link below to lobby your Member of Parliament to make sure that we fully leave the EU on time as promised 
What would a no-deal Brexit do to the UK? We succeeded in getting the Government to publish details. The impact would be disastrous, says @ChukaUmunna 
Chester MP Gives Referendum Both Barrels! - 'The more I hear about what went wrong in that 2016 referendum, the less I actually respect the result, if the referendum was a sporting event the Leave campaigns would have been disqualified months ago.' 
DARK MONEY: Questions remain over Tory links to the Constitutional Research Council & its part in a dodgy £425K donation to the DUP’s Brexit campaign. Tomorrow I will lead a debate in parliament calling for answers on the role of unincorporated associations in electoral funding.  
Brexit votes12th MarchVote on whether to fuck the economy & become ruletaker for ever13thVote on whether to catastrofuck the economy & create food/medicine shortages leading to actual deaths 14thVote on kicking can down road for 3 monthsThe best deal is what we have now 
Today we have seen the true nature of the political class. These people have no intention of making Brexit happen. They lied to us. They promised to enact our vote yet now they are thwarting our vote. The political establishment is not fit for purpose.Brendan O’Neill on Sky  
The British public spoke, we Brexiteers Parliamentarians will keep fighting to ensure that you are heard and we get Brexit. In every challenge there is an opportunity, the British Bulldog spirit will ensure we win in the end. 
"I feel so enraged with the complete and utter lack of bravery to do the right thing for our country."Labour's Jess Phillips asks the Prime Minister if she will "do once what is best for the country, not what is best for any of us" and vote against a no-deal Brexit herself.  
A #PeoplesVote in a fair campaign, devoid of the cheating in the #Brexit referendum, is the best way of uniting the country either around the PM’s deal or staying in the #EU. The public deserve a #FinalSay now the facts are clear. 
The Question has finally been asked in the HoCAnd it went totally unanswered by .@theresa_may Another chunk of Hansard that will be useful for the #Brexit debacle #PublicEnquiry 
WATCH how the Leave campaigns were out of control as they lied, cheated and broke electoral LAWS to procure their wrongful referendum result. Actions which we now know are being embraced by May's government and our acquiescent parliament whilst the judiciary turns a blind eye.  
. @KateHoeyMP "What I'm very much against is Parliament taking over control... people voted to Leave and the reality is Parliament is full of, the vast majority, of Remain MPs who campaigned to Remain, so in a way they're not overall, speaking for the people on this issue." 
Two tweets that demonstrate exactly how this Tory Westminster government is recklessly gambling away the future of the people of Scotland.A paper from the Westminster government’s own Brexit department is indicating Scotland’s economy faces a disproportionately high hit. pic.twitter.com/O5mYL4m3Pi 
Breaking news: petition for second referendum goes over 74,200 signatures!!!!!!! Please sign and RT #PeoplesVoteNow #PutItToThePeople #FBPE  
“A small extension of the misery; what’s it going to achieve? It’s an extension of the misery. I’m really worried though that Theresa has been undermined by what I would call open mutiny by some of her Cabinet and ministers trying to force her hand” @nigelmp#DelayMeansRemain 
Has everyone recovered from the excitement of Labour's Brexit policy being the same as it was in September? 
A pair of Picohs discuss politics in the UK. #Brexit #Remain #politics #robot #picoh 
If a second referendum was between a WTO Brexit and Remain then Leave would win 60-40, Leave Means Leave founder Richard Tice claims@EddieMair | @TiceRichard | #Brexit  
Brexit Could Be Delayed Until 2021  #WhatDoYouThink? 
there IS an effective and affordable form of male birth control it’s called being a 21 pilots fan 
....The @observeruk's leader from Sunday. Very important. Very ignored. Very true also of the (still mystical) second referendum...  
Good to see moves towards an orchestrated boycott.  Any attempt to hold a second referendum would have no legitimacy. Neither would a state that foist it on us   
#Brexit: What happens next? These are the key dates next month [tap to expand]  
83. Speke Hall Rd, Liverpool"Brexit gives us the opportunity to... finish the job that Margaret Thatcher started." - @vote_leave Chairman Nigel Lawson 
This has been Labour's position since September 2018 #Parliament #Brexit  
How many times has Theresa May delayed Brexit? We’ve lost count.But she’s not dithering: this is a deliberate plan to run down the clock because she has no Plan B.  
ERG twit @bernardjenkin advocates new Brexit model of staying in the Single Market like Switzerland and for lorry drivers to get their goods across borders by finding roads where there are no customs checks  
We’re hearing from so many frustrated grassroots activists, dismayed at the Prime Minister’s announcement todayDon’t give upEmail your MP: Email your Association ChairmanIf you have local elections in May, remind them#DelayMeansRemain 
Yesterday Jeremy Corbyn backed a second referendum. Today Theresa May has paved the way to delay Brexit and block No Deal. Who is left to stand up for Brexiteers and stop the betrayal?  
“It’s frustrating the PM is talking about a delay when so many times she’s strongly advocated exit on 29th March. But whether there’s a short delay or there isn’t, it doesn’t change the fundamental problems with the draft Withdrawal Agreement” Theresa Villiers#DelayMeansRemain 
Can this be our second referendum instead?  
Respecting the referendum result is like saying you respect the result of a doped up athlete winning a race. There’s no morally justifiable way to go about it. 
Govt tells me they'll introduce law to protect animals after #Brexit "as soon as Parl time permits”But from Sept-Dec MPs spent just 55.5 hours scrutinising legislationThis stalling is unacceptable. Ask your MP to sign my #BetterDealForAnimals EDM now  
Labour: We'll respect the referendum resultAlso Labour: We will now campaign to stay in the EUWatch til the end   
A record poll total of over 17.4 million UK electors voted for Brexit - almost three years on it must now be delivered, without delay - #Simples! 
My suspicion is that any delay to Brexit is a plot to stop Brexit. This would be the most grievous error that politicians could commit.  
So, in a nutshell:May took no deal off the table. Kind of.Corbyn supports a second referendum. Kind of.5 million EU citizens & British in the EU remain in limbo. Definitely. Brexit is as Brexit does. Always. 
Stewart McDonald(SNP) - Why hasn't the PM setup a judge lead public enquiry to determine if she is proceeding on the basis of a fraudulent campaign & a fraudulent referendum result?#PeoplesVote #FinalSay #simples @StewartMcDonald 
"It's about time we put an end to all this mess" WATCH: Tom Davies explains the effect of #Brexit on his #business and why he thinks we need a #PeoplesVote#PutItToThePeople #Biz4PV 
Theresa May's day so far:- Back from EU- Nothing meaningful agreed- Aerospace trade body releases documents showing Brexit has turned into a "full-blown economic crisis"- An climbdown extension announced to MPs- If May were smart, she'd cancel Brexit.Its still only 3pm. 
But the “concession” is not legally binding & sadly based on the evidence the PM cannot be trusted to deliver. Stay strong vote for Cooper/Letwin & let Parliament take control of #Brexit  
WATCH | @PeterBoneUK: "She has said 108 times that we will leave the European Union on the 29th March. If that's not possible, does she think the country will regard that as a betrayal?"Short answer? Yes.  Help us save Brexit at  
WATCH: Dominic Grieve: It is perfectly democratic to put this to the people.Join the #PutItToThePeople March on 23 March where we will be demanding they put this Brexit deal to the people in a #PeoplesVote:  
WTF ?!!!Theresa May: "I believe, if we have to, we will ultimately make a success of a #NoDealBrexit."Here's the plan  
WATCH: @scottishlabour leader @LabourRichard tells us he'd rather have #Brexit under a Labour deal than a second referendum, but would "almost certainly" campaign for remain if there was another vote.  
VICA believe that this year's referendum on #emvote rights for citizens abroad will be won just like other recent referendums -- through compassionate conversation.So every day this week we're doing fact-finding and myth-busting to help those conversations. Enjoy! 
By leaving the EU with a deal, we can move our country forward. And in doing so, we send a clear message: that this House is resolved to honour the result of the referendum and leave the European Union with a deal.  
Cuban constitutional referendum results:Citizens allowed to vote: 9.29mTotal voters: 7.84m (84.4%)Voted yes: 6.81m (86.85%)Voted no: 706,400 (9%)Blank ballot: 198,674 (2.54%)Annulled votes: 127,100 (1.68%)  
Ignoring the melodrama from elsewhere, Nicky is absolutely right that there is a clear way to honour the referendum result which would gain parliamentary support: the Malthouse compromise.  Perhaps  MPs better focus on this rather than trying to limit our negotiating options  
My fellow Leave voters: we must stand firm.We were given a clear choice: Remain or Leave. Leave won. No to the Withdrawal Agreement, which is Brexit in name only.No to any delay.No to a second referendum.No ifs, no buts. We want our vote implemented as we were promised.  
“The Prime Minister has said 108 times that we will leave the EU on 29th March. If that is not possible, does she not think that the Country would regard that as a betrayal?” @PeterBoneUK#StandUp4Brexit #DelayMeansRemain 
On February 24, the Cuban communist regime held what it called a “national referendum” on revisions to its constitution. No one should be fooled by this exercise, which achieves little beyond perpetuating the pretext for regime’s one-party dictatorship.  
Labour can scupper Tory Brexit with a new referendum – then change the country for good | @labourlewis 
This is yet more trickery from the PM - she’s still refusing to take no deal off the table legally or otherwise no matter what Commons says or does. If she was serious she would just accept the Cooper-Letwin bill. It’s all just “her way or the highway”. #Brexit 
The Tories are now going to have to think about someone to replace Theresa May - not to carry on Brexit, but to abandon it and clear up the mess. 
.@theresa_may confirms to her Tory colleague Dominic Grieve that no-deal Brexit remains an option, even if now very unlikely to happen on 29 March 
Former UK ambassador: UK increasingly isolated after rejecting UN on Assange, ICJ on Chagos and Brexit  
DUP's Nigel Dodds suggests "the machinations of some of [Theresa May's] ministers", and her plans for new votes on no-deal or delaying #Brexit, will make the EU "sit back and wait" - rather than negotiate a better deal 
Surprising silence from the ERG in response to PM’s potential Brexit delay so far. @SteveBakerHW, @Jacob_Rees_Mogg and others just left the chamber together, presumably to confer on their options. 
@theresa_may & @Conservatives #Remain MPs in the cabinet have just declared war on the UK electorate!With the aid of @UKLabour #Remain MPs they seek to betray #Brexit.They will surely find themselves totally outnumbered on the battlefield of the next General Election! 
And another thing........ dragging this uncertainty out any longer is causing more damage to the economy than getting on with the WTO exit. No decision making happening until position known. Get on with BREXIT! 
Theresa May used the word "simples" while talking about #Brexit. 
It feels utterly #Brexit that on 13 March MPs will vote on whether to Brexit with no-deal 2 years *to the day* since they voted that they shouldn't have such a vote. Lords am. 2 to EU (Notification of Withdrawal) Bill, overturned in Commons on 13/3/17 by 331 to 286  
.@anna_soubry says the government's approach to Brexit constitutes "a failure to put the country and the nation’s interests first".  
“By leaving the EU with a deal, we can move our country forward. And in doing so, we send a clear message: that this House is resolved to honour the result of the referendum and leave the European Union with a deal.” – PM @Theresa_May in @HouseOfCommons 
She wants to leave.He wants to stay.She likes tea.He likes coffee.It’s anarchy in our house. It’s Brexit anarchy in the UK.  
The Prime Minister should halt the Brexit process and set up a judge-led inquiry to investigate  disinformation and allegations of dodgy funding in the Leave campaign - it’s what both Leave and Remain voters deserve.  
I never thought to live to see the day of hearing a British Prime Minister saying “Simples” at the House of Commons.Never ever.Brexit has utterly destroyed Britishness. 
There we have it. May tells Parliament she will call off a March 29 Brexit. She has lied and lied and lied to the British people.  
No mention at PMQs of the Civil Court case last week when the PMs QC confirmed the Referendum was Advisory & had it not been would have been voided because of the illegality. 
"The cliff edge has merely been moved back."@Jacob_Rees_Mogg reacts to @theresa_may's announcement of a vote on no-deal #Brexit and a delay to the UK's exit. Follow reaction to the PM's statement here:  
Today’s developments are the final straw for me and sadly I am resigning from the Conservative Party with immediate effect. This Brexit Betrayal is not being done in my name, and in future I will vote for a party that understands that #LeaveMeansLeave 
Bank of England likely to help economy after no-deal Brexit: Carney  
Nothing May says about her Brexit policy can be trusted.In the words of Gordon Brown to Tony Blair:“There is nothing that you could say to me now that I could ever believe”.So say we all...#Brexit #EU 
All the Brexit greatest hits coming out today, now we're going back to the 'split EU Member States' one because that's worked so well in the past.  
Yep. It would be good to see MPs picking up on this and making a big deal of it @CarolineFlintMP @jessphillips @karinsmyth @ThangamMP @KerryMP @darrenpjones 
Scotland's name for quality is recognised around the world. #FoodandDrink, #Farming #Textiles #Science #TourismScotland IS the brand.Now our standards are under threat with #Brexit deals.Come along to find out more  #Aberfeldy #Pitlochry #keepScotlandtheBrand 
⁦@Theresa_may⁩ ⁦@Conservatives⁩ ⁦@UKLabour⁩ ! Let’s have a look at the real problem! Oh yes MPs #Brexit  
50 times @theresa_may said we're leaving the #EU on 29 March 2019. She must not allow #Brexit to get delayed! If she does delay, the 17,410,742 will destroy the @Conservatives.... NO THREAT but a Promise!  #TheresaMay @ConHome @CCHQPress #ConservativeParty 
Somebody's not a 'Happy Chappy' .. #EU #Brexit #PeoplesVote 
It is generally regarded as the greatest ahead of its time pro-Brexit speech ever made. Just watch this barnstorming speech from former Labour MP, Peter Shore, when addressing the Oxford Union just prior to the 1975 European referendum. 
17.4m people grabbed at a nostalgic last straw in 2016.They've ended up with a paralysed government and no indication that any form of Brexit will solve the problems they hoped it would.I don't blame them for their vote, but I really don't have to respect it. 
The fun part is how second votes work in #EU. First treaties get rejected, but later are miraculously backed during a second vote. EU is a powerful propaganda machine, they know how to manipulate people. #Brexit must not be stopped, it must not be delayed. #StandUp4Brexit 
Sad to see @theresa_may, just a few minutes ago,  completely dismissing extensive law-breaking by the Leave campaigns in the EU Referendum.But she doesn't really have any choice because she triggered Art50 with full knowledge of widespread breaches of the rules.#PeoplesVote 
"I feel so enraged with the complete and utter lack of bravery to do the right thing for our country."Labour's Jess Phillips asks the Prime Minister if she will "do once what is best for the country, not what if best for any of us" and vote against a no-deal Brexit herself.  
WATCH: Mark Carney, Governor of the Bank of England, warns that the PM's Brexit deal risks our 'financial stability'.This is why we need a #PeoplesVote on the Brexit deal. #PutItToThePeople & sign up for the March here:  
Plan B#HIGNFY #Brexit  
I wish an MP would challenge this dreadful PM with her repeated demands to respect the referendum. Anyone respecting this frauderendum is condoning electoral fraud and foreign interference. 
If her deal gets the votes to pass without Labour support, how would Labour them secure a referendum? What am I missing here?  
Theresa May again refuses to take #NoDeal #Brexit off the table. Instead she continues kicking the can down the road and pushing our country to the brink of a #NoDeal disaster.#StopBrexitSaveBritain - join our campaign for a #PeoplesVote NOW: 
Vote leave cheated. If the referendum was binding, the vote would have been annulled. 
More importantly can the people trust your local constituency association to deselect you? Let’s hope so. #brexit #nickboles 
This is worrying: Lisa Nandy wants 'no deal' on any referendum ballot in the interests of 'democracy'. Isn't it her job to persuade those 'voters who want to leave without a deal at all' that it's a disastrous thing to wish for?  
The EU has made no secret that it thinks Theresa May should delay Brexit day. The question is, for how long  
Opinion: Corbyn and May's Brexit stand-off is like a tedious football match nobody wants to win  
I am fully behind Corbyn's statement yesterday, it's the same as he has always been committed to, which was voted by conference.  What worries me is the comment @EmilyThornberry made on twitter.  = A Referendum with 2 options = May's deal or 'Remain'.  That would destroy the LP 
listen can she not, mx are having their world tour soon and I don’t want the europes at the London show,,,,,brexit is brexit!!!!!!  
you so don't get to accuse anyone else of pursuing a divisive referendum lol 
come on Caroline, you know that's only because it was an advisory referendum, but now the result is being implemented as though it were binding! by all rights it should've been overturned and you know that, it's a legal loophole which has damaged our democracy. you support that?? 
It’s 17 Degrees outside in February BREXIT may not happen and Leeds could top again tonight again what a time to be alive #lufc 
Is there no promise she can keep? The most mendacious PM is living memory - and that includes Blair.The only domestic agenda after #Brexit betrayal is maintaining law and order after half the population no longer recognise the legitimacy of the MPs in parliament  
If her deal was a decent deal I’d agree but everyone in the House hates it. Reckon it’s designed that way so as to scupper Brexit. 
We’re gonna need a bigger bus. New analysis in Lancet on how Brexit will impact the NHS - workforce, funding, drugs, data. Grim.  
omg this is an image 
no no thank *you* 
May‘s Brexit strategy  
Based on his JaegarBomb negotiations,  we should send @Markhodgkinson6 to Brussels to sort Brexit“8 for £20”“No it’s £24”“Go on £20”“Sorry Sir, it’s £24”“Can we do a deal”“No Sir that’s the price”“OK 8 for £24 then please”Departs for a smoke, leaves someone else to pay 
British PM Theresa May says if MPs again reject her Brexit deal, then they’ll get two mores votes: one on leaving the EU without a deal and another on delaying Brexit. “Let me be clear, I do not want to see Article 50 extended.”Pathway to Brexit delay now wide open.  
SNP's @alisonthewliss says that "cutting immigration by EU nationals by 80% will be the ruination of many cities and towns across our country" #Brexit 
The EU has made no secret that it thinks Theresa May should delay Brexit day. The question is, for how long  
@ZacGoldsmith speaking in support of a #BetterDealForAnimals Find out how you can help give animals the protection they deserve and need after Brexit  
Well that was horrific, can’t believe Theresa May said “Simples” during the brexit speech.For those not in the UK, look up compare the market commercials from about 2006.THAT is how out of touch this government is. 
if they extend the brexit deadline they deffo need to have another vote coz half the people who voted leave will be dead 
UPDATED: U.K. Parliament gets to decide between no deal and delaying Brexit  
From 2016:#Brexit: Theresa May wants early deal on Britons in EU.And we're still in funking limbo two years down the line. 
Message for all non-UK EU @AberEnglishDept and @AberECWS students:There's a #Brexit advice session next week. See picture for details.  
May has made it patently clear this is not her preference and even suggested it would be a mistake, potentially causing a sharper cliff-edge later. She's sticking to her plan to get the deal through, and probably hopes that talk of a delay + second referendum improves its chances  
So Caroline you believe that lying and cheating is the right way to win a referendum?  Seriously!  
Brexit: Theresa May confirms plan to DELAY leaving date until end of June  
do you think that the UK Parliament should dissolve for a snap election with a manifesto from either side on how to get through Brexit it and with that snap election being the "second vote" #brexit #PMQS #PMQ #TorySplit #Laboursplit #ChangePolitics #UK #snapUKelection 
John Mann:A 2nd referendum is dishonest politics. This is Corbyn's Nick Clegg Moment  via 
But before you get too excited 1) all this assumes that MPs will act rationally and not contradict themselves 2) extension is in the EU’s gift3) A short extension will probably not suffice to solve this4) So you may relax about 29 March but you may not relax about #Brexit 
#May's sell-out MUST be voted down.  If there is #NoBrexit as a consequence of refusing to accept #BRINO - it will be MPs' fault - not #Brexiteers. Do MPs want to defy the #willofthepeople?#Brexit MUST be delivered - in full - no #SM, no #CU, no #ECJ. Nothing less will do. 
No coincidence that you and Tommy Robinson get deleted on the same day.... is it as Brexit is being betrayed also.... 
So this is where we are with #Brexit debate on Twitter. I point out to a leaver that the referendum wasn't binding, quoting a Supreme Court ruling, and I get this response below, no evidence, no facts but I was immediately blocked for presenting a fact he didn't like. Tiring  
“The history of the EU shows that during disputes, agreement is obtained with an hour to go. Will the PM therefore stick to her deadline & impress on the EU that there’s a majority in this house for her agreement if the necessary changes to the backstop are made” @JWhittingdale pic.twitter.com/lXLwo7MgGo 
Childrens’ rights are getting barely a mention in the Brexit debate – but they're now threatened by everything from privacy-busting surveillance to poverty-inducing cuts, writes @TheABB for @openDemocracy 
Finally I am done. I am a Brit now! Shall we talk about #Brexit now  
FM #Soini and FM of #Croatia Marija Pejcinovic met today in Helsinki. Discussions about European and regional issues including the forthcoming #EU Presidencies of both countries. #MFF, #Brexit, #migration and rule of law few important issues that will keep both busy. 
Members and activists will not select as candidates, then go out and campaign for, charlatan MPs who thwart Brexit. If Tory MPs back dropping "no deal" most can kiss goodbye to their political career. 
Brexit failure: Snake oil salesman @Nigel_Farage threatens to boycott second Brexit referendum after Corbyn backs new poll. 
So Corbyn is only offering a referendum on the May deal which will defeated anyway. So, in effect, no offer of a referendum. Why am I not surprised. 
We voted to Leave, ergo WTO/No Deal an option.  You voted to Respect the Referendum and then approved A50 so you need to wear this 
"We’ve got to get on with #government recognising animal sentience in law" - thank you @zacgoldsmith for speaking at the @ukparliament event today calling for a #BetterDealForAnimals - #Brexit #animalwelfare 
A former Swedish Prime Minister says Theresa May should delay Brexit if her deal is voted down to give her time to “prepare for something that is not a hard Brexit” @IainDale | #Brexit  
Or stop Brexit. If this was a business  would have been called off long ago. 
#Brexit has major implications for health and social care in England. Here, ⁦@TheKingsFund⁩ look at some of the latest developments that could impact the #NHS. 
This may be inherent in a ratification referendum, but if MPs reject May deal, and there is deadlock, Corbyn does not regard a referendum as the solution. He says referendum only required if a deal is passed by MPs.  
We must vote, we must vote to put a populist Brexit party in. It is the only way we can change our future, put the Tories and Labour in the swamp . 
@AndrewBloch Hey Andrew, did you see/hear this? I believe Frank PR were the creatives behind Aleksandr the Meerkat! #Brexit #Simples 
Look at this man. When you called for no election ,no referendum. The IGBOs rejected it that they want to be Nigerians and that they must vote. Which made you started supporting PDP again. Now that you have lost,you want to start IPOB. 
Did we mention #FolksyHour is about Brexit and the EU tonight? Help! We'll be the ones cowering in the corner at 8pm. Please come and bring gin.A brief guide to Brexit by @FrancescasWords  (disclaimer: this may be more technical than it gets tonight) 
GE now inevitable. As is no deal brexit. 
Thankfully will still have some MPs who aren't fooled by sleight of hand employment statistics and are passionate about burning injustices; with 14 million people in poverty & 4 million forced to use food banks, a sincere @jessphillips speaks out and of course May doesn't answer. 
I see the Government is to appoint a new #Brexit Minister...#simples 
FUCK CORBYN'S CORRUPT UNIONSFUCK CORBYN'S CORRUPT UNIONSFUCK McCluskeyFUCK LABOUR BREXITFUCK LABOUR IMMIGRATION POLIICYFUCK MAY'S CORRUPT REFERENDUMFUCK MAY'S NO DEAL BREXITFUCK REES MOGGFUCK UKIPFUCK FARAGEFUCK JOHNSONFUCK GOVEFUCK RAABFUCK FOX FUCK PATEL 
Check out @brexit_sham’s Tweet: 
The Real Brexit Logo! :D #Brexit @AmazonUK  Uk shop:  
Quarrel with @jeremycorbyn by all means. But please don’t use the disingenuous “will of the British people” argument. We all know that voters  were almost equally divided over #Brexit. Truth-telling is important here. @GuyOpperman 
This is STILL #BlackmailBrexitERG will take any Brexit, get rid of May, renege on every promise,screw the country over. We need no deal off the table TODAY.The can has been kicked to bits. The cliff edge looms. DO NOT TRUST TREEZA. She is a proven liar.#PeoplesVote #StopBrexit 
I neither respect or accept the vile referendum result. Never have, never will. 
Petition for a second referendum on brexit that comes with a basic IQ test 
If that is supposed to be an argument against another Referendum you might want to rephrase it?  
Theresa May repeats any extension to Brexit should be "as short as possible". 
This treachery will never be forgotten and will not go without serious consequences. Every traitor MP should have their passports withdrawn for when the day or reckoning comes they cannot flee the country before they are tried for treason! #Brexit #WTOBrexitNOW 
On the news that brexit could be delayed the pound hit a 21 month high. Imagine how much more it would improve if we cancelled this idiotic process altogether. 
May has just taken away all incentive for the EU to make a compromise. Her deal is a surrender to the EU. Brexit Betrayed. 
Theresa May will reportedly rule out no-deal Brexit  
Tories who support brexit are not far right. Hypocritical nonsense 
Deluded.Your manifesto was rejected by the people - you lost. The manifesto of a losing campaign has no legitimacy. The referendum was fraudulent and the result should be rejected. If you don't, you are complicit. 
UK faces chaotic Brexit or extension of article 50, says Donald Tusk 
Your comment about Brexit being for the DUP about proving their biological Britishness is spot on. It's just the type of Britishness that's so utterly depressing and repellent. I've loathed the DUP's regressiveness for 15 years (having previously been a party member)... 
The Brexit debate was excellently interpreted into #BSL by @deepedges on the @BBCNews at 1pm. The value of interpreting @10DowningStreet PMQs (as in Scotland FMQs @NicolaSturgeon) was shown. The BBCNews (in #BSL) is normally avail after 3pm on iPlayer.  … 
When Labour are working out how to approach the second referendum, I suggest they keep it simple.Vote Leave weaponised our NHS to get people to vote for Brexit, because it's the one unifying piece of British socialism that we can all agree we are proud of. #StopBrexitSaveourNHS 
Jess Phillips' plea for Theresa May to vote against no-deal Brexit is very powerful.@jessphillips | #Brexit  
Brexit is a corrupted bulb planted in the bed of British politics and has grown, like knotweed, into the atrocity it is now. 
“Does the PM think the machinations of some of her ministers and the proposals that she announced today, will have the effect in Brussels and on European leaders of making them more likely to concede what’s necessary or perhaps that they’ll just sit back and wait” @NigelDoddsDUP 
Great news: @jeremycorbyn confirms that @UKLabour will back the Costa Amendment, which will force the Prime Minister to seek ring-fencing of #citizensrights with the EU for EU citizens in the UK & @BritishInEurope under Article 50 to protect us from the fallout of no-deal Brexit.  
"In reality, their proposal is to have a second referendum... by definition, they are dishonouring the result of the first," says @nickherbertmp 
"Simples"...."SIMPLES"!!!!Well now youve spoken like a fucking cartoon meerkat, hand me the pen and Ill vote your deal through ya mad haunted scarecrow! If she only had a fucking brain eh?#Brexit #ToriesOut 
#simples country paralysed by #Brexit uncertainty and divisions and the PM quotes a meerkat. This is our leader folks  
#DUP have ditched their #std slogan and reverted to the old mantra. #nope #Brexit  
More I think about it, the more insane Labour’s new position is. Can you imagine if, after all this, voters were to wake up to find the Commons had finally approved May’s deal. Only to then be told by Labour “this will not stand. You all have to vote again in a new referendum“. 
UK construction set for positive growth amid Brexit uncertainty  
State of the Brexit process: The prime minister quoting an insurance comparison advert pic.twitter.com/QpM7zlNYXK#TheresaMay #Brexit #BrexitDeal #TIG #SecondReferendum #JC4PM2019 #GTTO 
Brexiter MPs annoy the hell out of me, but I reserve a special kind of anger for those Remain MPs that respect the "result of the referendum".Even had it not been rife with illegal activity, lies & misinformation, we know more than we knew then!We can change our minds! 
. @PeterBoneUK "...she [the Prime Minister] has said 108 times that we will leave the European Union on the 29th March. If that's not possible, does she think the country will regard that as a betrayal?" 
A WTO Brexit is Britain's best bet - The Commentator @GetBritainOut 
Pleasure to welcome Scottish Association of Young Farmers (@SAYFC) to @UKGovScotland HQ, to talk farming, food, #Brexit, trade, funding, PGIs and all points in between. @NFUStweets 
May's promise to protect workers rights is completely worthless for any low paid workers who claim #UniversalCredit now or in the future. Workers who lose their job because of brexit will be subject to an arbitrarily punitive system that removes their rights. 
“You are going to have to come to terms with this in the next few weeks” Labour’s @JennyChapman tells Conservative Theresa Villiers are they talk international borders and #Brexit on #politicslive 
Getting a bit p*ssed off with May implying there are three options leave with deal, leave with no deal or no Brexit. No Brexit is not one of the options available 
EU could offer a "no-deal extension" - delaying Brexit but ruling out possibility of any changes, additions or reassurances relating to the withdrawal. To stop May endlessly trying to renegotiate.  
An overwhelmingly positive forecast given for our region at the @NEEChamber Annual Review & AGM. An exciting year ahead for #localbusiness and local #transport links - #Brexit will not get the better of the #NorthEast 
I was the first to call for a boycott of a Second Referendum months back. It it profoundly undemocratic & worthy of a banana republic! It will carry no legitimacy if Leave side simply & seriously boycotted it  
Pound leaps on Brexit hopes, shares take breather  
Berlin set to hold referendum on banning big landlords and nationalising private rented housingCity's residents respond to affordability crisis with sweeping plan to socialise housing stock.#not1home 
Vauxhall says it won't shy away from the 'dark side' in no-deal Brexit | Business | The Guardian  
Hear Hear! Register your interest in The Brexit Party at  #Brexit #BrexitParty 
Spent the day in Parliament Square interviewing protestors about Brexit. #brexit #journalism #journalist 
All Hail our new Overlord @LordBuckethead! His hyper-quantum computer cluster correctly modeled where the Brexit negotiation would turn to: . What's your take on South America on the brink of yet another US intervention? Will we become South 'Murica? pic.twitter.com/vkBwGAEKNI 
More Brexit memes. #Brexit #Unitedkingdom #Memes 
Of the series #Brexit means Brexit .... (postponed)  
Shall we look at what people in the UK National attitudes did think was the most important thing facing Britain in May 2015 when the referendum was announced? Oh look! The NHS.The thing Leave promised Brexit would help.But they were lying to us #StopBrexitSaveOurNHS#EUref2 
But beware: reports are emerging that staff in Corbyn’s office are laughing & saying ‘another referendum will never happen’ - gamesmanship & more trickery here?  
“Can the PM please make it clear that a deal, which can command the majority of this House is imminently possible if there can be agreement on changes to the backstop and putting in place alternative arrangements” @NickyMorgan01#StandUp4Brexit #DelayMeansRemain 
Brexit"The real-life consequences of the PMs cynical tactics are being felt across the countryFactories relocating abroad, jobs being lost, investment being cancelled.. workers at sites across Britain's towns & cities.. fearing the worst."Jeremy Corbyn pic.twitter.com/Nsl3WNqzsW 
@ChukaUmunna @votelea I guess you forgot about what you said that night!? #Eureferendum #brexit  
Putin is the one fucking bastard celebrating the idiocy of miopic, anachronic european populists who, in the global era, favour Brexit, Frexit, Italexit, etc. POPULISM & NATIONALISM ARE THE WORLD CANCER TO BATTLE!#BrexitShambles#Brexit#BrexitFiasco#BrexitDisaster pic.twitter.com/5KD9nvXYgW 
Are you Brexit-Ready? Download our Guide to Transport & Customs Clearance here >  #Brexit #logistics #Ireland #Irish 
Nearly one month until the UK is due to leave the EU and we're still yet to agree a #brexit deal. Regardless of what happens, Plastribution are commited to helping our  customers reduce disruption to polymer supply - read more:  
Is #Brexit keeping first-time buyers out of the market?....opinions from top @GuildProperty colleagues @SawyerCo1 @MansonsProperty @holroydmiller @urbanandrural @WebbersLive @TPPUK  
If all the people crying about Brexit had actually cared enough about the poor beforehand then maybe Brexit wouldn't have happened. 
Every time someone says the government won't let a no deal Brexit happen I think of the Fyre Festival doc and all those rich pricks very clearly heading towards total disaster thinking that somehow disaster wouldn't happen cus their parents told them they're smart or something. 
"Theresa May's shambolic handling of #Brexit is having real-life consequences, for factories relocating abroad, jobs being lost, investment being cancelled." #JC4PM2019pic.twitter.com/d3uJxAgs3b 
What's the point of a new referendum on the UK staying in the EU, when the only referendum we want is Scotland leaving the UK. 
WATCH | @Jacob_Rees_Mogg to his Remain colleagues: "If [our EU exit date] is being delayed as a plot to stop Brexit altogether, I think that would be the most grievous error politicians could commit. It would be overthrowing a referendum result and would undermine our democracy."  
Theresa May says to @IanBlackfordMP he should vote for a #Brexit deal which is contrary to Scotland's best interests & contrary to Scotland's vote. This whole situation is a perfect analogue to the entire history of post union Anglo-Scots relations. "Do as you're told" #Simples 
Given the number of times May has broken her word and caved into the ERG, no-one should trust her to stop a crash-out no-deal Brexit. My question to May today.  
Brexit. Schmexit. Anyone recall life before 23 June 2016? 
"This is shameful, nothing has changed" says Independent Group MP Anna Soubry, accusing her former party leader Theresa May of "can-kicking at the same time that fudge is being created" on #Brexit 
Real livelihoods, real jobs on the line - yet @theresa_may and @jeremycorbyn prolong the #Brexit impasse further, always putting party political interests first. Only way to break this maddening gridlock is a #PeoplesVoteNow 
What about the bulk of 17.4 million of us who voted to actually LEAVE the EU, not some botched deal?Remain lost 2.5 years ago. The people have already decided.If there is a referendum, it should be between deal or no deal.#KeirStarmer 
Save the date! Our PTA Parent Teacher Association are organising another fundraising event. Thanks to our sponsors @DanielsNeasden @RoyaloakNW10 @tesco #harlesden @IcelandFoods #harlesden #dramaqueenhairdressers Come and join us for Brexit Bingo on March 29th. @CchaplainNc 
Mrs May can't deliver on the unknown wishes of 17 million who, nearly 3 years ago, voted for an unspecified Brexit - but she can deliver on the needs of 66 million who are at immediate risk of no-deal on these shores. Then she can call a #PeoplesVote to find out what we DO want. 
“All of those people who are wanting to extend Article 50, wanting to delay Brexit and stop Brexit, are all Remainers who’ve never come to the terms of the fact that the country voted to Leave. So what the PM needs now is them to hold their nerve” @EstherMcVey1#StandUp4Brexit 
Amazing that @theresa_may refuses to tell Tory MP @vickyford whether her ministers would be whipped to vote for or against no deal Brexit if the promised vote takes place!!! 
Some businesses have already made plans to bypass the port of Dover in case a hard Brexit brings it to a standstill  
Fed up of hearing the HoC keep saying 'respect the result of the referendum' when it is not beyond any doubt ir was fraudulant. A fact confirmed recently in court, and even acknowedged by the PM. 
EU Official: If Britain Requests Brexit Delay, EU Would Consider It Favourably -Brexit Delay Of A Couple Of Months Would Be Relatively Straight Forward 
My interview in @CounselMagazine with the barrister at the centre of the Brexit debate. @JolyonMaugham is happy to piss anybody off, if it's for a good cause (plus - his view on whether #VoteLeaveBrokeTheLaw) #BrexitVote #Brexit  
We're a big step closer to victory.Thanks to the efforts of thousands of activists, Labour is now backing a public vote on Brexit.Our next steps:Getting a referendumWinning itTransforming EuropeIf you haven't joined us yet, now is the time:  
@maeve_mcconnon of SVP, Intl #FinServ at @IDAIRELAND gives the #FintechMunster attendees at @FirstData a great presentation talking about attracting  international finserv to Munster. Maeve has bravely offered to address #Brexit. @BrexitDublin @CplJobs @oakeslaw @P_OHalloran 
Moby Dick catching up to Brexit.  
so parliament get to have three votes about Brexit, but we can't have two? 
I just get the image of people discussing brexit as the be all and end all as they walk over people living on the streets. It upsets me that the reason the Labour party need to be in Govt is not Brexit. It is because peoples lives actually depend on it happening. 
MPs offered vote on no-deal Brexit and possible delay  
I’ve got a terrible feeling in my stomach that today is the end of Brexit. I hope I’m wrong. 
Want to stay up to speed with the #Brexit debate? We've got you covered:The Cooper Bill Extension of Article 50 European Parliament Elections Second Referendum  
LATEST... @BethRigby - She's turned the debate from "Its my deal, or no deal.. To "It's my deal or delay". #EU #Brexit  
What impact will #Brexit have on #tech investment? @TechLondonAdv is hosting the largest tech event of 2019 dedicated to the biggest questions facing tech investors, entrepreneurs and tech businesses at #HereEast on 2 May:   
Both @jeremycorbyn and @theresa_may both proving they cannot be trusted. So Labour now saying they would only support a 2nd referendum if May’s deal goes through, so how exactly does that work? They know May’s deal won’t go through and if it does there will not be support for it 
May did warn the hardliners they risked No Brexit at all...  
Our second edition ⁦@EveningStandard⁩ as PM quotes a meerkat in defence of her Brexit u-turn  
It really is #Simples. The way to stop a  No Deal Brexit is vote for the PM’s Deal in the #MeaningfulVote 
You wont need to worry pal, Mr Blackford and Co wont be gracing those hallowed halls for too much longer.This Unequal and damaging Union is in tatters.Time we just up and left.Let Labour and Tory just dance the Hokey Cokey swapping seats and parties till the Brexit cliffedge. 
Open and brazen, we are being manipulated into a corner where there is no Brexit. All as May and Robbins planned. Both major parties will pay a heavy price for allowing this to happen. 
Listening to the same old tired clichés in Parliamentary debate..."Parliament is grid locked.."Maybe, if we used the same method the Catholic Church uses to choose a new Pope..Lock the doors. No mobile etc allowed. Sustenance supplied.Open doors when Brexit sorted. 
I bloody hope so. #Brexit #StupidDeaths 
"Sterling is trading at levels not seen against the euro since May 2017 as investors react to the latest political developments."Pound surges as market fears of no-deal Brexit ease  
EU workers pay in £78,000 to the UK more than they take out in public services and benefits over their lifetime. Oxford Economics. #FBPE #Brexit #PeoplesVote #Labour 
Inspirational tweet:- forget Brexit - impeach Trump- eat more fibre 
 Wet stamp klaxon  (MPs believe backstop means documents would have to be stamped with ink in order to meet Brexit terms, so it needs changing and is already out of date. Others say wet stamp already taken out ) 
Huge significance of the May statement: Brexit on “no deal” terms  on March 29 is dead; and we might not even leave at all on March 29. 
Love the irony of MPs who are directly campaigning to reverse their own manifesto commitments on respecting the referendum result saying to May "how can we trust anything she's saying?" 
Current state of BrexitOverheard 2 Tory MP’s saying they’d no idea what was happening so asked what PM actually said? Tory - She was very clear, said if her deal failed she’d.....(long pause)Me - She’d what?Tory - I don’t actually know, need to read it again?  
Corbyn has offered Schrödinger's referendum: it is simultaneously alive and dead (dependent on May's Brexit deal passing). 
MPs will vote to delay Brexit.They will refuse to leave without a deal so basically we are going to be tied to the EU forever on the EUs terms.Time for a general election.The CONservatives have failed to deliver on the manifesto. They have conned anyone that voted Tory. 
Theresa May is using our jobs, industries and communities as gambling chipsIt’s time to end her games by ruling out a No Deal Brexit disaster.Agree? SHARE  
Brexit"I've lost count the number of times the PM has come to this House to explain a further delayThey say history repeats itself, first time is tragedy, second time is farce. By the umpteenth time, it can only be described as grotesquely reckless." JC  
Theresa May has conveniently forgotten that Theresa May warned about the perils of #Brexit. Here's a little reminder of what she said...  
I choose to be cautiously optimistic. I really sense that the wind has gone out of the Brexit sails. It's fallen apart and yes there are masses of hurdles to cross but Remain would do better if it were a bit more sunny, bullish and confident. #Brexit 
Really interesting survey, ‘22% of those who say they voted Leave in 2016 say they now want to Remain, while 2% of those who voted Remain in 2016 say they now want to Leave.’ Seven out of 10 Mumsnet users want a vote on the Brexit deal  
PM @theresa_may has confirmed that the next #MeaningfulVote on the Government's #Brexit deal will take place by 12 March.If it is rejected MPs will vote on:13 March - leaving the EU without a deal14 March - extending the Article 50 period.Watch:  
The PM has not taken a No Deal Brexit ‘off the table’ today. She has instead offered MPs a vote to postpone the possibility by a few weeks. So pressure to get a deal remains but No Deal “cliff edge” may have moved. 
#EU officials are plotting to delay the UK’s exit from the EU in a bid to make Britain stay until at least 2021. The delay would allow the Govt enough time to plan a second referendum and even cancel #Brexit altogether.#BrexitBetrayal #TuesdayThoughts 
Quite on top of all the other ways this is bad, Aleksandr the Meerkat is an immigrant from the EU and will likely leave after Brexit.  
.@YvetteCooperMP asks @theresa_may "can we trust you to deliver your promise that MPs will decide on whether there is a no-deal Brexit?" (I paraphrase). May says what she announced is a Cabinet pledge, not just pledge from her. Will that satisfy Cooper? 
Because we don't trust you one bit to deliver Brexit.  
May really is beyond the pale. With this vote on No Deal she has stuck the knife into the back of every leave voter in the countryThe ultimate political betrayal, destroying Brexit and destroying democracyWe've nothing left now other than revenge at the next General Election 
Cooper up. "Promised votes have been called before, Commons motions have been ignored before." When Commons voted against no-deal, Brexit secretary said we'd still leave with no-deal. So what assurances do they have? 
“Simples”, argues PM in Commons during Brexit A50 vote statement channelling a puppet meerkat used to advertise insurance.  
"Vote for the deal - simples" Theresa May channels Aleksandr the Meerkat as she responds to a #Brexit question from SNP's Ian Blackford 
Tory Brexiteers minded to vote against the May Deal on March 12 will do so in the knowledge that they will lose any “no deal” vote on March 13. Which in turn will lead to the extension of Article 50 on March 14, with Brexit then an indeterminate date. 
Unbelievable! @10DowningStreet is retreating behind the @EU_Commission to justify not protecting the #citizensrights of @the3million & @BritishInEurope in case of no-deal Brexit. I am calling all MPs to support @AlbertoCostaMP's amendment 1/2 
Theresa May said that Parliament should have a chance to delay Brexit if it rejects her plan. Her hand was forced by party rebels.  
I was disgusted. It was patronising and belittles the grave anxiety people are feeling about Brexit. A glimpse into her soul for a minute, that. 
We now go live to Theresa May’s Brexit strategy.  
Everyone is losing their fucking minds! Theresa May just concluded her Brexit announcement by quoting a meerkat called Alexander - "simples".#Cringe #Brexit #NoDeal #Simples@comparethemkt 
Yes, @theresa_may did just respond “Simples” in the #Brexit statement. Theresa Meerkat is now in charge. God help us. 
There’s no way any #brexit deal will get voted through the house.May is hopeless and Corbyn is as bad.Scrap it, scrap those two, let’s have a piss-up and move on. 
German Social Democrats are very happy about Labour's decision to potentially back a second referendum. MEP @woelken explains that people should get a second chance because their first decision was based on "many lies".#PeoplesVote #Corbyn 
Tory Government have had nearly THREE YEARS to get ready for #Brexit.But now they want yet more time.This is incompetence on an industrial scale.The Government should hang their heads in shame and resign. 
Northern Irish comedian Patrick Kielty has called for a second referendum on Brexit - claiming that the Tories do not care about his country.  
SNP's @IanBlackfordMP says the party is organising candidates for the UK holding European elections. #brexit @AlynSmith @hudghtonmepSNP 
Genuinely significant news on Brexit after Theresa May gives MPs a vote on whether to extend Article 50 or leave with no deal if she can’t get her plan through. Essentially this means we’re *extremely* unlikely to leave with no deal on March 29th 
Ken Clarke has hit the nail on the head for the many MPs who hate no deal - which is that she is countenancing only a short Brexit delay. So the cliff edge of no deal could simply move from 29 March to late May or early June. And @theresa_may tells a grumpy Clarke she would... 
Just In: Prime Minister Theresa May has shifted her position on Brexit, saying for the first time she would consider delaying Britain leaving the European Union on March 29th. 
 @IanBlackfordMP responding to Theresa May's Brexit statement:"Businesses and citizens are worried about no deal, worried about the supply of medicines and food.It is the height of irresponsibility for any government to threaten its citizens with these consequences." 
Government has wasted 2.5 years trying to deliver a Brexit that turns out to be unattainable because it was based on lies and false promises. No need for more arguments, no need for a second Referendum. Simply #RevokeArticle50 and get back to sorting out the real problems 
Parliament should not agree to Mrs May’s ‘short limited extension’ - UNLESS IT IS FOR A REFERENDUM OR WITH A CATEGORIC POLICY OF RULING OUT NO DEAL IN FUTURE, WHICH SHE SPECIFICALLY REFUSED TO DO 
Well there we are folks, MPs won’t back May’s deal or no-deal, which means Brexit will be pushed back so they can ensure we don’t take back control, or, worse still, to force a second vote.This is a betrayal of both the Labour and Tory 2017 manifestos.  
“I know what poverty is … and Rees-Mogg in his nice house, he’s not going to be hit.”Sara Cox says the majority of poorer people who voted for Brexit are going to be hit the hardest when it happens.@sarajcox | @martindaubney | @TheJeremyVine | #jeremyvine 
In a nutshell, Brexit's been reduced to either:-1. May's crappy WA/BRINO2. Delay to A50 followed by another variation of May's crappy WA/BRINO.Both to be followed by another delay aka 'transition period', then back to square one.Brexit's been sabotaged. 
However, it is still a major concession. Labour is now officially backing a second referendum in certain circumstances. It can be shifted further. 
May wants voters to punish Labour for breaking their promises on Brexit, so she tells them that...she will break hers too.  
This way you don't back May's deal, so it doesn't pass, so there's no second referendum, but you can say you've given it a good go. 
Far better to adopt the existing Kyle amendment plan - Backing deal on the basis of a referendum. 
The Prime Minister was told months ago she would have to delay #Brexit.  She refused to listen and all of us have paid a horrendous price . Now she is proposing a delay. Her intransigence and arrogance should not be forgotten-  nor forgiven. 
The @ScotNational is going to be essential reading tomorrow. The story of the #McCronereport is a salutary lesson in these #Brexit times on what British Governments think they can do to #Scotland & get away with #IndyRef2 
tl;dr Businesses will not know until March 13th whether the UK crashes out of the EU with no deal just two weeks later, whether Brexit is delayed until some yet to be agreed date, or whether the UK exits with a deal on 29 March. 
Corbyn’s Labour have ripped up their promise to respect the referendum result and are now pursuing a divisive second referendum that would take us back to square one.We respect the result and we will deliver on that vote.  
Theresa May has absolutely lost control of Brexit. Her last minute scramble is embarrassing for the country.End the chaos now - join our campaign for a People's Vote now >  
Labour's Jeremy Corbyn accuses Theresa May of "stringing people along" with promises of new votes on #Brexit, accusing her of "running down the clock" and "grotesque recklessness" 
Essentially the Prime Minister has admitted she needs more time, but only to have yet another go at passing her Brexit proposals. She continues to undermine the British economy in order to play political Russian roulette: my deal or no deal. Shameful. #BrexitShambles 
.@jeremycorbyn: "We believe there must be a confirmatory public vote" if any Brexit deal is passed by parliament. The official moment Labour's leader capitulated to the months of pressure from @Keir_Starmer and a majority of Labour members and supporters. 
There’s no majority in Parliament for a 2nd Referendum.There’s no majority in Parliament for ‘no deal’.There’s no majority in Parliament for @Theresa_May’s bad, botched deal..@JeremyCorbyn’s proposals, welcomed by the EU, could command a majority in Parliament. Game on. 
BREAKING: British Prime Minister Theresa May bows to political pressure, says Brexit delay is possible if Parliament rejects her deal to leave the EU.  
Is it possible for @PhilipDaviesUK to continuously talk in parliament for the 31 days to run down the clock so we can leave with a no deal Brexit via filibustering. 
1. Seumas Milne is not Labour’s only spokesperson, and certainly not Labour’s only “source”2. The conspiracy theory peddled by liberal blue tick so-called “journos” that he‘s somehow going over Corbyn’s head attempting to enact Brexit on behalf of the Kremlin is utterly mad  
Quite why Corbyn doesn’t stand up and just ask May why she sees fit to ram through the referendum result that a court has deemed illegal, I simply do not know. 
We'll live with this briefly & wait. The 2nd extension (which will happen) will be The End. May's chosen her path - cancelling Brexit & the end of the Conservative Party. We now have three months to prepare for what follows when she cancels.  
Theresa May just said a new referendum stops us simply Brexitting and getting on with national concerns.We have an exit deal. Not a trade deal. So ANY Brexit would mean we spend the next 5+years negotiating with the EU. NOBODY wants Brexit debates to keep going till 2024!#PMQs 
PM says those who voted Labour, because they promised to deliver #Brexit, will be appalled.She has some brass neck.The Tories #BrexitBetrayal will keep us in the EU prison for evermore,with no exit door.Both #Lab/Con have betrayed the 17.4m.The 17.4m will vote them #OUT. 
Theresa May has just taken away the short term threat of a no deal Brexit. So there is absolutely no reason for any Labour MP to vote for her awful Brexit deal.  
One giant stitch up.These fucking MPs never had any intention of leaving Democracy is dead in this country  we live under a fucking dictatorship Theresa May to offer MPs no-deal Brexit vote  
Prime Minister Theresa May says if her Brexit deal is rejected then MPs will be offered two separate votes by 13 March on whether the UK leaves with no deal or delays Brexit beyond 29 March 
Rebel ministers tell me @theresa_may has moved enough to effectively rule out no-deal Brexit on 29 March. So I don't expect resignations. Extraordinary brinkmanship seems to have worked for them. But yet another blow to PM's authority 
UK PM Theresa May says for the first time that #Brexit could be delayed, giving MPs a vote on "a short, limited extension to Article 50" if both her deal, and leaving the EU without a deal, are rejected 
Is the PM serious? Make a success of a No Deal? The Tories have been a complete and utter disaster so far on Brexit, their ministers have been completely useless from ferry procurement flops to non existent trade deals and a new Brexit secretary every other month! #Brexit  
This really is a big shift. May has finally played her cards and sided with the Europhile wing of her partyVote for her deal (March 12)Vote for no-deal (March 13)Vote for delay (March 14)Only yesterday she refused to even acknowledge there might have to be a delay to Brexit. 
May wants MPs to vote for her deal, so she tells those who want to delay then prevent Brexit that if they vote against her deal she will...give them what they want.  
However, Commons now has clear opportunity to (a) vote down PM’s bad deal (b) vote down no deal and (c) vote for extension long enough to allow new referendum. Will it take it? 
Yes, it feels like 30 years ago but it was on this day THREE years ago that David Cameron launched the government’s Remain campaign... on a farm in County Antrim. #Brexit  
May says Labour voters will be have been betrayed by Corbyn backing a second referendum.  Mrs May, you have betrayed Tory voters who voted Leave.  Your deal is NOT Brexit. #BrexitStatement 
Is today the day that #Brexit died?   Discuss 
May now playing the populist violin hard on Corbyn and second referendum. "The very credibility of our democracy is at stake." 
Let’s be honest #Brexit is an utter shambles ..... Can we take a Mulligan ? 
No wonder the EU is more popular in Scotland than the UK when you listen to the confused contorted drivel from the UK Prime Minister. #Brexit 
In typical fashion, Theresa May caves to Remoaners in her Cabinet and gives Parliament the chance to block Brexit on March 29. A complete and utter betrayal of everything she has said since Parliament voted to invoke Article 50.Help us fight for Brexit:  
.@theresa_may promises, as expected, that if her deal does not pass on 12 March, she will seek permission of parliament for no deal Brexit on 13 March. And then if MPs reject no deal, they will be able to vote on postponing Brexit for a short period. Big u-turn. My piece... 
Can we promise ourselves that if Gerrrad leaves us for Liverpool we’ll wave him off with our best wishes? Some of the stuff I’m seeing re  #BRexit is horrific. 
May finally forced to do the right thing: MPs reject her bad deal 12 March and a catastrophic no deal 13 March then on 14 March they could delay Brexit until end of June 
Serious unrest in Commons as they realise Mrs May is attempting the impossible - to rule out no deal, but only for a ‘short limited extension.’ She says ‘there is no alternative’ but MPs know there is an alternative: A SECOND REFERENDUM 
So, parliament will decide on Brexit.Why did we go through the charade of voting at all?  
Sir Keir Starmer is asked if Jeremy Corbyn will be seen "championing another referendum" if Labour's alternative Brexit plan is rejected by MPs - and says it's "not right" to say his leader "hates this policy".  
Big moment this. MPs will get the chance to stop no deal and delay Brexit if they vote down reworked deal 
#Brexit preparedness: agreement reached w/ @Europarl_EN & @EUCouncil on contingency measures for #road transport for passengers & goods. This will mitigate the most severe disruptions under a no-deal Brexit and maintain public order. The measure has a limited scope and duration.  
Here we go 1) We will hold Brexit vote by March 22) If rejected, motion to be voted on asking HoC if it wants to leave with No dea3) If MPs rejects No Deal, HoC will have option to vote for a short extensions 
The government didn’t even know a uk pallet isn’t compatible wit the EU post Brexit !!!!!!!!!! What hope is there #noclue 
Theresa May says the UK can make a success of no deal Brexit. There must be a new definition of success that I haven’t seen yet. 
First time PM has genuinely entertained delaying Brexit 
"All forms of Brexit, however, involve negative consequences for the UK's leadership and governance of health, in both Europe and globally..."Our paper in the Lancet out today, evaluating what different forms & steps of Brexit mean for the NHS:  
We’re at Parliament today to launch our #BetterDealForAnimals campaign. Animals need protection in law after #Brexit! Thanks Sir Mike Penning, @andreajenkyns @NicDakinMP @DavidEDrew for your support!  
The same line she issued about Brexit when she became PM. And how has that gone. 
Indyref: "Oil won't save you, Scotland. You're stupid to depend on oil!"Brexit: "Only Scotland's oil can save us"  
It is stupefying that @sajidjavid has proscribed #Hezbollah’s political wing as a terrorist org. Blatantly clear that such a move is mainly to appease #Israel, the main villain in the region, to align within #US orbit post #Brexit & score political points against #JeremeyCorbyn.+ 
Totnes has joined Led By Donkeys @ByDonkeys in the campaign to expose the hypocrisy of the politicians that have led us into Brexit chaos.  
Wait! What? Farage now in favour of a threshold????? Well Well..... 
Theresa May’s opening words ludicrous - ‘I am working to secure a Brexit Agreement that can command the support of the House of Commons’ 
LIVE: UK Prime Minister Theresa May gives statement to parliament on the progress of #Brexit talks. Feeling a little lost about what's going on with Brexit? Keep up to date here:  
Theresa May is updating MPs on Brexit progress as pressure mounts over delaying the UK's exit  
Meanwhile in The UK, May floundering trying to negotiate the BRExit separation. Contrast that to Trump & Paris Accords. The big difference of course is that May does not seem to want BRExit to actually happen.   
Theresa May brexit parliamentary plan as reported by @bbclaurak in decision tree form. It helped me get my head round it, so thought worth sharing! 
UK PM Theresa May to propose Commons votes on no-deal Brexit and Brexit delay, if MPs reject her plan next month  
Welcome to a new Twitter account. One Brexiter. One Remainer. Putting both sides of the argument across on Brexit. 
No-deal Brexit could put vulnerable people at risk, officials warn  
Salary thresholds proposed for the #UK’s post-#Brexit visa system would lock out skilled laboratory technicians. ‘Without them the #science we do here would be impossible,’ says Paul Nurse, director of Crick Institute (@TheCrick) in London. #NoDealBrexit 
Nigel Farage has come up with the best reason yet to hold a second referendum.  
What do you want to happen on #Brexit? 
There are still some Labour leftists who think that quitting the EU and plunging the UK into the jungle capitalism of global capitalism will help build socialism. How fucking stupid can you get!#PeoplesVote #brexit 
WATCH LIVE: PM @Theresa_May updates @HouseofCommons on Brexit  
"The deal protects citizens' rights".Remarkable that @DavidMundellDCT wrote this to @IanBlackfordMP when his own aide @AlbertoCostaMP is trying to bring an amendment to strengthen the deal's protections on citizens' rights.Mundell hasn't even convinced his own aide...#Brexit  
I'm told there was a general but very grumpy acceptance at Cabinet that Remainer ministers had snookered PM, and she had to offer a Commons vote to delay Brexit on March 12 to stop them voting for Cooper-Letwin (1) 
Someone’s got to say it, so I will, Theresa May is now totally delusional on Brexit. She’s divorced from reality, deaf to any reason and blind to any facts. Tory ministers and MPs need to step up and stop #MaysBonkersBrexit 
Parliament is about to betray the #Brexit vote. 17.4 million people ignored by their representatives. The tail is officially wagging the dog.Remember this at the next General Election. Every traitor in HoP should be voted out.#BrexitShambles #FBPE #BrexitBetrayal #BrexitVote 
So... PM will give Commons the chance to slam brakes on Brexit, if her deal is rejected - but she is still clear that she doesn't want a delay herself - in a sense she is giving into Cooper-letwin before it has a change to be approved 
Principled liar McVey lectures cabinet colleagues on how to support May while sharing a platform with Farage/Leave Means Leave and releasing dodgy videos about a no-deal Brexit.If hypocrisy came in human form, she would be it.  
“What a shoddy, shameful situation for the Labour Party to put itself in. How many times did we hear Corbyn, the Labour Manifesto, all these politicians over and over tell voters, inc millions of Labour Leave voters, that they’d honour the outcome of this referendum” @wallaceme 
The reason the Conservatives have got #Brexit so wrong is that the #ERG have never understood how the EU works, have never had a plan and will never accept that leaving CU and SM is the most damaging thing we can do to our prosperity 
Brexit: Companies leaving the UK, downsizing or cutting jobs ahead of Britain's EU departure  
So, is Theresa May about to tell us that #Brexit won't now happen on March 29th as she promised? I certainly hope so! She has been doing a very difficult job - very badly. 
This is one of the best graphics I've ever seen!  If you think Brexit is the cause of division in Britain, you need to have a long, hard think about what this chart is telling you. Brexit is largely a product of a brutally unequal country and a fatally dysfunctional voting system  
Labour must follow through on a second referendum or young people won’t forgive them, says @lara_spirit of @OFOCBrexit  
As part of an in-depth series on the #IrishinBritain as #Brexit approaches, we are looking to gather the stories of Irish people living across the UK. Moved there two years ago or 50? We’d like to hear from you:  
You mean kick over the referendum result obviously ...  
I think the best reason for delaying Brexit is that we'll get to watch 75% of right wing commentators soil themselves for attention is the most demeaning way imaginable. 
If Nick is really mystified, what’s he doing in politics?Brexiters’ greatest fear is that they are really a minority - who swung their one big vote using a smokescreen of what Brexit would actually be like.  
I’ll be hosting a #StDavidsDay reception in Brussels later & will be in Paris tomorrow to open officially our new office. Important to demonstrate our commitment to maintaining strong relations with Europe, whatever the outcome of #Brexit negotiations. 
Now that Labour are backing a public vote, it's time to make sure every single MP knows you want a say on Brexit. Spot on @Femi_Sorry  
the worst people on Twitter today are left-wingers insisting Labour was *always* going to back a second referendum, despite Corbyn's aides telling the press only last month there was still "no hierarchy" of options ranging from Norway to permanent customs union to 2nd ref 
Where do I start? I explained why "leave mean leave" is meaningless by citing the dictionary definition & explain why it can mean less sovereignty. You respond with a piece of false Propaganda. Sorry, but More people voted in the 1992 General Election than in the 2016 referendum. 
1. We do not reasonably believe u will achieve in 90 days anything that u couldn’t do in 21 months. 2. We don’t trust u. 3. We know u would block Brexit if u could. 4. We know the EU has allowed u MPs to dodge responsibilities long enough & offered unaccountable future prospects. 
Westminster Voting Intention:CON: 41% (=)LAB: 30% (-3)LDM: 10% (=)UKIP: 5% (+1)GRN: 4% (=)TBP: 2% (New)Via @YouGov, 22-23 Feb.Changes w/ 18-19 Feb.TBP = The Brexit Party 
Another good thread - how to tell if the other side might blink in the last stages of a negotiation.Reinforces that the chances of the EU blinking late in Brexit negotiation are very low indeed.  
Nothing justifies the Brexit vote so much as the government's response to it. 
.@omnium defends the right to self-determination. 80% of #Catalonia's citizens are in favour of such a referendum. #WeStandWithCuixart #DemocracyOnTrial 
If we’re heading for a hard Brexit then we’re heading for a united Ireland | Patrick Kielty  
Ahead of the Prime Minister addressing the House of Commons on Brexit, FSB Chairman @MikeCherryFSB gives his view on what she should deliver. 
This is true: 29 March isn't the Feast Day of St Brexit. The fear, however (which isn't entirely unreasonable), is that a three-month delay becomes six (with MEPs simply re-appointed, so avoiding Euro elections), and six becomes 12, and the people are snared in Brexit purgatory.  
cause some people are making lots of money out of Brexit, if it's cancelled, they will lose money, plus, they will have to comply with the EU tax laws 
You want evidence that Brexit is a very bad idea? Think what the economy would do if Brexit stopped altogether.“Pound surges as market fears of no-deal Brexit ease” - Sky News  
Our @SkyData poll found that Britain is deeply divided. But is #Brexit to blame? @LovattMo and @eleanorkpenny say the UK's exit from the EU has "amplified" issues that were already there. More on the state of the nation here:  
No @DanielJHannan, forcing through #brexit against the will of the majority will be catastrophic for democracy. People will not forget the lies, hate, gerrymandering, crime, foreign interference & bullying. Anger will build to boiling point. #brexit #FBPE 
I was lukewarm about a second referendum but this has sold it to me.  
There was only one catch and that was Catch-22: you can only support a 2nd referendum when there's no chance of there ever being a 2nd referendum. Jeremy whistled at the absolute simplicity of it."That's some catch, that Catch-22." "It's the best there is," John agreed. 
Remain could definitely win a 2nd referendum, just as Labour could definitely win a general election. But both outcomes depend upon the policies proposed, the message and who leads the campaign.But Remain campaign has no policies, no message except "stop" and unpopular leaders. 
Brexit, or more accurately, the lack of it, has really highlighted the duplicity & corruption of our politicians. Their contempt for democracy is quite staggering. Much change required. 
I’m constantly being followed by remainers now - this is a coordinated to bring down this Brexit supporting account - IT WILL NEVER WORK! FBPE / STOP BREXIT / REMAINERSARE NOT WELCOME HERE! Have I now made that clear!? Leave voters please follow me so these idiots go away 
Quite astonishing that you misrepresent that ALL of these people have been campaigning for a GE for 'wks & months' & failing that, are now ALL following Labour Brexit policy to the letter, tabling Labour Brexit deal & then calling for a PV on whichever deal passed in HoC  
EU students in Scotland can be reassured that in the event of a ‘No Deal’ Brexit, our commitment to support students commencing courses in Scotland in academic year 2019-2020 will remain. Please visit  for more information. 
Delaying Brexit with an extension to Article 50 means Remaining in the EUREAD MORE:  
The DUP would like to comment on Labour's new Brexit stance and will do so as soon as Jacob has told us what to say. In the meantime here's a photo of what Sammy's face will look like.  
Hmm, so u don't accept the electorates vote on EUReferendum in 2016?The Referendum Bill passed by Parliament by 544 votes to 53?Article 50 Bill, which includes #NoDeal, passed by Parliament 498 votes to 118?In short u don't accept democracy .. what are u doing in politics? 
Tim is spot on. A referendum on May’s deal or no deal is the only legitimate one now. Anyone suggesting otherwise simply wants to stop Brexit.  
Brexit is 31 days away. #brexit 
If Brexit passes without a public vote on the deal, it will be Britain's bungled hour. Brexit 3 shows alarming facts about the English identity and Trump's nationalism, the hidden threat to nearly 50% of jobs, and how to have smarter, taller children:  
Labour Brexiteer: Leave Voters Will ‘Punish’ Corbyn at the Polls, Will Not Accept Second Referendum  
If no extension is agreed before EU leaders 21 March Summit andthey're faced with reality of no-deal #Brexit -EU diplomats saythey're not sure what leaders might decide. I've been told a farenough in the future fixed end date to backstop (eg 2025) mightmaterialise. Or not./12 
"If they're going to go, then go"Former Work and Pensions Secretary Esther McVey accuses ministers who have threatened to quit over no-deal #Brexit of "bottling" on Theresa May 
The digital minister, Margot James, has urged the prime minister to rule out the “catastrophe” of a no-deal Brexit, warning that she and other ministers are ready to resign if the prime minister refuses. 
Groan, frustration!  The public who voted to leave are set-up once again. This along with Labour wanting to remain in CU and wanting a second referendum is certainly damaging trust in politicians. MPs arrogantly think they know better that the people who elected them.  
Theory remains in EU that the PM is running down the clock whileattempting a high stakes game of 3-way #Brexit blackmail: pressuringERG with threat of no Brexit and using threat of no dealto pressure both Labour for support and the EU for bigger backstopconcessions. /10 
Corbyn is not supporting the second referendum. He is killing it.   
"Household names from Japanese electronics giant Sony to television channel operator Discovery are among a long list of firms that are relocating or opening subsidiaries in Amsterdam, due to the uncertainty over trade terms that Brexit represents." 
If #NoDeal were to become official Tory policy, which I doubt, then they would win the next general election hands down .. most remainers (not remoaners) understand the dangerous threat to our democracy in not delivering the democratic decision of the EU Referendum 
Hi @CarolineFlintMP It would be very helpful if you did read the article.It clarifies where we are.A number of MPs and MEPs have already read itThis one accompanies it. 
Thing is, we've already voted leave. So how could a 2nd referendum- a bad idea- possibly be May's deal vs Remain? Surely it would need to be May's deal vs No Deal. (That's if this referendum was actually designed to break the deadlock, instead of gerrymander us back into the EU.) 
So Theresa May is going to *promise* that if Meaningful Vote on her Deal fails on 12 March, Commons will get to vote on No Deal and on requesting extending Art 50.But she’s postponed votes before...Surely MPs better force her hand with Cooper-Letwin Amendment? #brexit 
Now Labour backs a second Brexit referendum, will it happen?  
So it appears May is going to 3-line whip MPs to accept that we have to have another Parliamentary vote to agree to leave with no deal, otherwise Brexit is cancelled. Unacceptable. Leaver MPs should defy that whip.  
British businesses don't want a no-deal Brexit. But they don't want more delay either  
I have to agree with @GerardBattenMEP This has been a stitch up from day 1. They've never intended on delivering the referendum result, the whole shocking affair has been a pantomime of pretence by them all imho even @Jacob_Rees_Mogg has faltered #BREXIT 
 The independence referendum "was an exercise of civil disobedience, which is not punishable with 500 days of pre-trial jail or a 17-year prison sentence," says Jordi Cuixart. "Civil disobedience is a tool for societies to move forward socially."  
Imo it's a bit weird that a lot of the same people who never gave up hope when Labour were polling about 20% going into the 2017 general election are now claiming that Leave is a totally set attitude it's going to be impossible to shift in a second referendum campaign. 
And just to reinforce this Caroline, here are the words of the Prime Minister's counsel and the judge's response - "The courts are not in the business of saying Parliament has legislated in ignorance, what you're saying is, that notwithstanding the past, parliament is proceeding" 
No-deal Brexit could put vulnerable people at risk, officials warn  
Wondering why @margot_james_mp @Tobias_Ellwood @claireperrymp @Richard4Watford @AmberRuddHR @GregClarkMP @DavidMundellDCT & @DavidGauke all want to stop #Brexit. They’re all globalists with their snouts in the trough.  
Fintan O'Toole: Ireland has successfully shifted Brexit odds in its favour  via @IrishTimesOpEd 
Sorry to hear that so many good local radio presenters, producers, etc, will lose their jobs after the Global Radio announcement this morning. Any newbie wanting in to radio now has more chance of curing the common cold and solving Brexit before tea time. Shame. 
For Labour MPs like Caroline Flint who are thinking of voting for Tory #Brexit28/11/2018:  In a new referendum 55 of the 89 most marginal constituencies would support EU membership, up from just 25 which backed Remain in 2016.  #PeoplesVote 
In the Metro @Femi_Sorry discusses Labour's support of a #PeoplesVote and the work being done by young people to secure a public vote on the #Brexit deal:  
What kind of govt sacks someone for protecting migrants who've built their lives here & UK citizens in Europe?This has PM's fingerprints all over it.I'm proud to have signed @AlbertoCostaMP's cross-party amendment to uphold people's rights regardless of how #Brexit unravels.  
May to rule out no-deal Brexit to stave off rebellion: media reports  
James O'Brien predicts what happens next with Brexit - and it doesn't end with a second referendum.@mrjamesob | #Brexit  
So I think that we do know what the effects of a long/indefinite delay to Brexit, or taking it off the table altogether, will be. Either we will see a return to apathy & ever-rising levels of distrust which will erode our democracy and the social contract from below, or ... 
Looks like the threats are truly revealed. Vote for my deal or I will allow Remainers to stop Brexit. I would still vote to stop her WA. She really is the lowest of the low, no allegiance to her voters at all.  
All forms of #Brexit involve negative consequences for UK's leadership & governance of #health, in both Europe & globally, with questions about the ability of parliament & other stakeholders to scrutinise and oversee government actions - new Health Policy  
Farage threatens to boycott second Brexit referendum, saying he would 'rather go on holiday' /#EU #Brexit #FinalSay 
As ⁦@ForcadellCarme⁩ prepares to give evidence at the show trial today here is my favourite photo taken before the Referendum. ⁦@SandraWhiteSNP⁩ and I send to her our best wishes, support, love and respect. #catalonia 
Brexit Protest - For WTO - What about - IF WE ALL DESCEND ON LONDON IN OUR CARS & BRING IT TO A STANDSTILL BY RUNNING OUT OF PETROL - What could they do 
Every day our Maltese Terrier sits at the window and barks wildly at anything she doesn't like the sight of. Other dogs, bin bags, people in hi-vis jackets, builders, postmen. But when they see her and wave she changes her mind. She voted Brexit but now wants a People's Vote. 
Labour's @Keir_Starmer says a new #Brexit vote should be a choice between "a credible leave option" and Remain No Deal would be off the table  
This is partly why the first referendum was so important, where we saw surprisingly high rates of turnout in blue-collar seats. Because for the first time in years many of these voters felt that they could, finally, bring about change. 
.@DHSCgovuk has updated hospitals and patients on its no-deal #Brexit contingency plans for medicine supplies. The RCR and @BNMSnews met with officials last week to specifically address no-deal radioisotope supplies. Find out what we learned here:  
"It would be very hard to deny a 2nd referendum in Scotland, if we had a 2nd referendum on membership of the European Union"- Jacob Rees Mogg.(May agreed with him.)#DissolveTheUnion#indyref2 
When independence is mentioned the establishment tell us oil is worthless. When brexit is mentioned it can save UK.If it can save 60 million people in UK imagine what it can do for 5 million in independent Scotland  
Theresa May is using jobs, industries and communities as gambling chips.It’s time to end her games by ruling out a No Deal Brexit disaster.Agree with me and the @GMB_Union? Retweet this. 
We have evidence. (1) Professor Lauren McLaren has already shown that even before the first referendum people who wanted to reform the existing settlement but who felt politicians were unresponsive became significantly more distrustful of the entire political system 
Establishment speak: “Take no-deal off the table.”In English: “Take Brexit off the table.”Theresa May knows that her deal is doomed to failure, which is why she is agreeing to this.It will stop Brexit and allow her to blame Parliament. 
I've just heard from my best friend that as a direct result of Brexit, his partner is unable to get the medicine that prevents her from having a stroke.#RevokeA50#PeoplesVote 
I do not think that it is hard to imagine what could happen if Brexit is delayed, taken off the shelf altogether or evolves into a second referendum that offers Remain vs May's deal, which Leavers would view as an illegitimate 'democratic' exercise 
Is Brexit the Sicilian expedition? Or is it the Athenians preferring the perils of self-determination to the riches & security offered them by Mardonius' embassy?That's the joy of ancient history - there's always an analogy to suit one's politics! 
In the three years since this whole Brexit carry on really got started, I don’t think I’ve ready anything better on what is really happening and at stake.The ‘solution’ is now within our grasp if MPs & then electors have the good faith and good sense to take it #PeoplesVote 
If there is to be a second referendum (still mathematically unlikely), at least 90% who will back, run & fund any campaigns will be those who have spent the last 2.5 years becoming the most toxic figures in public consciousness.Expect an utter shitshow. 
"If you don't shut up about a second referendum back there, I'll turn this car around and there'll be no racism for ANYONE."  
Thank you for responding Caroline. We respectfully point you at this article by @RobertCPalmer13 in which is explained the legal loophole regarding the advisory nature of the Referendum - and how and why it lacks the requisite legal status to be voidable. 
Have you heard the one about Putin having a "man on the inside"of the Labour party directing JC on Brexit? I've just had the pleasure. FBPE might be bats**t, but they're certainly creative. #FBPEFables 
Because it turns out Brexit was won on criminality and will be bad for the country. 
.This is what the Vote Leave said during the referendum “taking back control is a careful change, not a sudden stop – we will negotiate the terms of a new deal before we start any legal process to leave.” So no deal wasn’t what people were asked to vote for in 2016, was it? 
One critical point about vote for #Brexit is that it marked the first moment when a majority of British people formally asked for something that a majority of their elected representatives did not want to give. It was always destined to lead us here /thread #TuesdayThoughts 
We had a referendum, we backed it up in a general election. We then had 498 #MPs vote for #Article50. It was very explicit what they voted for we leave in 2 years, with or without a deal. Now we have #politicians breaking their promise to the electorate! 
Let's cancel Brexit and give £350m a week to the NHS instead.  
Starting off a busy day here in Omagh with an interview with two journalist students from Cristian Brothers’ School in Omagh. The impact Brexit will have on our young people is unimaginable. The solution = Irish Unity!!  
An insightful article in the lancet by leading health professionals saying ALL forms of #brexit will be bad for the #NHS Recruitment/funding being the main issuesSome of the best nurses and docs I’ve worked with have been from EuropeVery worried 
Pound surges as market fears of no-deal Brexit ease  
For those so called Labour members or supporters who are using remain or brexit as your reason for leaving or stopping support. I simply say this...you were never truly Labour ppl in the first place. 
Nigel has gone awfully quiet about The Brexit party hasn't he. You know the one that Seymour Butts, Ivor Lorra-Ballocks and the rest of the gang joined 
As ever, Labour “remains” better on the NHS, better on education, better on social care & better on solving the bubbling Brexit toilet designed by Cameron & being swam in by May. 
Labour: Those defecting scab MPs stood on our manifesto!! That manifesto increased their majorities!Also Labour: We're having a second referendum so that manifesto thing.....well it wasn't really that important so.... 
“A general election and the fall of this government is becoming increasingly likely, she’s lost complete control over her cabinet” - LBC's Iain Dale gives us his predictions for Brexit @IainDale | @maitlis | #newsnight 
'Absolute deadline' for Brexit deal in 23 days, say EU sources  
I’ve often said that in unlikely event of a “no-deal” Brexit, the UK could cope for only a few days or couple weeks & then would have to ask EU for quick bilateral deal. Some friends like @anandMenon1 thought it could be somewhat longer. I’m now thinking a few days at most 1/2 
Comment if you are concerned about the supply of the your drugs/medicine in the case of a no deal brexit  
The Europhiles have captured the Labour Party. Labour will now back a second referendum- while the hubris of metropolitan Labour will be comfortably satisfied having totally reneged on a solid manifesto pledge, the country will suffer decades of Tory government. Well done. 
Your vote doesn't matter. Your voice doesn't matter. You don't matter. That's what thwarting Brexit, or a second referendum, says to almost 17.5 million voters.  
Were there a second Brexit referendum, broadcasters and internet giants would have to do better than in 2016, says @alanjrenwick of @ConUnit_UCL #OpenFuture 
Simply on the basis it was not a GE but a Non-Binding/Advisory Referendum...Had it been an election it would have been...Legal loopholes do not provide legitimacy..#Brexit  
How they schnide....Most Tories want a delay to Brexit or May's deal, which means we remain. Labour/  Liberals want to stay in the EU or a second referendum. None of them are listening one jot to the people who voted Leave. Remember, without democracy you WILL  have anarchy ! 
I don’t that yet. But I know the next election will be fought on Brexit v Betrayers. I know that 65% of Labour held constituencies voted Leave. I know that most of the marginal seats Labour has to win voted Leave. Ergo I know the result of the next election. 
Always find it strange that some people pronounce brexit - ‘breggsit’?!!   
Does anyone have a clue what the hell is going on today in matters #Brexit?Even by the standards of never ending Brexit bullshit, today is particularly foggy. 
Corbyn (2018): "A referendum took place. It was a single question referendum. A result was delivered. I campaigned for a different result. We didn't get it. You have to respect the result of that referendum...it was a challenge to politicians...you've now got to now deliver"  
Even in Northern leave seats, most Labour voters voted remain and most workers voted remain. Even the majority of leave voters, the brexity conservatory-owners of Surrey and Hampshire, are having second thoughts as their adult children lose their livelihoods to brexit.  
Understand at least one shadow minister is considering resigning over Jeremy Corbyn's backing of a second referendum. Labour source says "there will be resignations, unless he allows a free vote". 
.@Nigel_Farage: MPs are ignoring the Referendum result, the General Election result, and the vote they took themselves to trigger Article 50. This is a betrayal of democracy! Sign up here:  
A General Election should be called for the middle of April.The electorate can then have their say on the outcome of Brexit and MPs will know they will be held to account for what they are about to decide.Their jobs should be on the line over Brexit  
Even though I represent London, he has a point - London Labour MPs include the Leader of the Opposition, Shadow Chancellor, Shadow Foreign Secretary, Shadow Home Secretary, Shadow Brexit Secretary, Shadow Trade Secretary....  
Nigel Farage threatens to boycott second Brexit referendum, saying he would 'rather go on holiday'  
Shadow Brexit Secretary @Keir_Starmer "I think that we do need to heal divisions... it [a second referendum] has a better chance than any other option... I think many people want to move on, they want closure..."  
If Brexit was the petri dish for electing Trump, lets make ending Brexit the petri dish for ending the Trump administration 
GREAT to see all sides agree on the new Referendum question:"WTF was all that about?" No idea but cancel it and say sorry No idea but cancel it and pretend it never happened 
Labour have handed a huge epochal electoral bonanza to the Tories and to #Farage Its worse than a crime it’s a blunder #Brexit #Labour #Corbyn 
3. But....if PM is more explicit and says she would actively choose delaying Brexit, then we are in different territory - and expect eurosceptics to go tonto 
So it was ruled by a judge that if the referendum had been binding rather than just advisory, the #Leave campaign broke so many rules, the referendum wouldn’t be legally democratic and we’d have to do it again!!!How is this not front page news every day? #Brexit @TheIndGroup 
Former Ulster Unionist leader says he knows some people from a unionist background who are pondering the question of Irish unity. He also says Brexit may be biggest own goal by unionists in 100 years & urges nationalists to learn lessons from EU referendum 
The Prime Minister is ready to betray her country. With #NoDealBrexit taken off the table we have literally no leverage. #BrexitBetrayal #WTOBrexitNOWMay set to RULE OUT No Deal Brexit after 15 ministers threaten to quit  via @MailOnline 
Labour has betrayed the working classes. Its support for a second referendum is a smack in the face to its traditional voter base. It is now a party of the urban elites. 
Jeremy Corbyn (November 2016): "We respect the result of the referendum. There was a referendum. There was a campaign fought and the people as a whole voted that we should leave the European Union."  
When May moved to take "No Deal" off the table today, as has been suggested, then that sound you hear is the death knell of Brexit.  Without this option the choices become shades of Remain. Brexit will have been betrayed - which has been the plan all along. 
How odd. It's almost as if being in the EU was good for Britain. 
Brexit to harm UK's cherished health service, experts say  
.@Theresa_May’s, no doubt, going to attack Corbyn over this 2nd ref. business.He needs to say this:There’s a simple way for the Prime Minister to avoid a 2nd Ref. & that’s by implementing Labour’s sensible Brexit plan, welcomed by the EU, & putting it to a vote in Parliament. 
After almost 3 years, still no one knows what Brexit means. And that’s because the problem with Brexit is Brexit. 
“Some people will dismiss our analysis as “Project Fear”. But with just over a month to go to Brexit, we need to move beyond slogans."LSHTM's @martinmckee discusses the new @TheLancet review assessing the impact of #Brexit on the #NHS  
"That is why I am backing a public vote to put the PM’s deal to the people with an option to remain."Fantastic to see @LukePollard supporting a #PeoplesVote on the #Brexit deal.  
The proposal in the Cooper-Letwin would stop no-deal Brexit on 29 March. We do not claim it would take no-deal Brexit off the table altogether. Its key purpose is to give MPs time and space to take decisions about a cross party Brexit compromise.  
Ok lets have a #PeoplesVote Since the Leave / Remain question has been answered already, the two options should beLeave with Mays DealLeave with WTO (No deal)So come on then , get the voting booths ready and lets settle this once an for all.#Brexit 
So there will be a second referendum if just 25 Tory or Labour MPs change their mind and go over. People's Vote sorts are downbeat this morning about persuading them for now if May takes No Deal off the table for March 29.  
The same energy as Cameron’s ‘chaos’ tweet. May predicting that voting SNP could be “greatest constitutional crisis since the abdication”. This was less than 4 years ago. Time flies. Oh, we’re 31 days out from Brexit btw...  
Brexiteers don't care about illegality in the referendum because they got the result they wanted. That is how Brits do business and why UK is the most corrupt country on earth. h/t @TONE1923 
Here @lucianaberger before you stick the knife into JC being an Anti Semite. There might be some in the LP. But it’s not endemic!! That’s an exaggeration from you! As for Brexit! That’s Theresa May who you should be slagging off! #ThisMorning 
John Stuart Mill makes the case for women's equality in 1869. Uncanny how closely this tracks with discussing Brexit in 2019.  
Just because Labour have now said they back a 2nd Referendum does NOT mean there will be oneWe have to campaign to get oneMay is hell bent on getting her deal and prepared to crash us off a cliffIf you want a #FinalSayForAll SIGN this petition   
I legitimately wonder whether all the people who told me in the last six months that leaving the Labour Party is cowardly, and won't lead to anything, have yet realised quitters are to thank for the change in Brexit policy today 
"He's a waste of space."Sara Cox says it's "too little too late" from Corbyn as the Labour leader prepares for the eventuality of backing a second EU referendum.@sarajcox | @TheJeremyVine | #jeremyvine 
John Mann on @SkyNews was going on about Brexit-supporting northern Labour constituencies. His constituency isn't even in the north - it's in the east midlands!Manchester, where I am, is in the north - REMAIN.So are Liverpool, Leeds and Newcastle - ALL REMAIN.Get real! 
The total collapse of the Labour Party leaves True Leavers free to leave the Conservative Party, if May cancels Brexit, without fearing that could lead to a Corbyn govt (or at least a Corbyn majority govt). Decision day is nigh for the Party. Does it want us to stay? 
With only 31 days to #StopBrexit our brand new Twitter account @newforesteurope already has 50 followers!Help us reach 100 followers to bring them local and national #Brexit news  
Brexit doesn't end when we leave the EU. That's just the end of the preliminary discussions.We then enter vastly more complicated discussions with the rest of the world, expected to last between 10 and 25 years. It will be your life.If you're sick of Brexit, vote to Remain. 
Theresa May is recklessly running down the clock. It's time to block a No Deal Brexit disaster once and for all.Agree? SHARE @GMB_Union 
You really don't get it do you? Respect the result of an illegitimate, flawed, corrupt referendum? PLEASE!You know damn well that if the referendum hadn't been advisory it would have been deemed illegal and would have to have been re-run! Get real, Caroline, FFS! 
A referendum extending Uhuru's reign as a prime minister MUST be defeated even if one our own has been "Promised" a ceremonial presidency.@WilliamsRuto@KBonimtetezi@kipmurkomen 
Are there Labour MPs who are willing to swallow their concerns about antisemitism, and cancel their resignation plans, in return for a second referendum pledge? Evidently @JeremyCorbyn believes so. An utterly grim calculation. 
Lots of emails from constituents asking me about how I'll vote this week on Brexit amendments.  1.) Will support Kyle-Wilson amendment in favour of #PeoplesVote 2.) Will support Costa amendment to protect EU/UK citizens abroad.3.) Will support Cooper-Letwin to block no-deal 
Inclined to bet my house (I don't have one) that People's Vote advocates are going to find out what we've known all along... Corbyn/Labour cannot make a 2nd Referendum happen even if they wanted to. They've been harassing the wrong people... but maybe they knew that. 
NIGEL: I wouldn't vote in Remain vs. Brino referendum. What a farce. Remainer MPs have lost the plot!  
Theresa May is set to rule out No-Deal Brexit after 15 ministers threaten to quit in extraordinary mass revolt at secret meeting 
A court had said the referendum would be voided due to illegality if it had been “legally binding”What’s it doing to our reputation to carry on regardless?I’ll wait. 
UKIP Leader @GerardBattenMEP speaks to Julia Hartley-Brewer about the prospect of a second Brexit referendum. 
You are fucking joking. "No-deal Brexit panic after ministers realise the UK doesn't have the right pallets for exporting to the EU". PALLETS. We are living in a Newsthump country.   
No Deal Brexit. When you’re absolutely fine about risking people’s lives for a blue passport and the Brexit 50p.  
Listening today to the absolute whining from leavers that we may have another vote.Brexit has proved completely undeliverable with out significant harm to the UK.People on the whole did not vote for significant harm.There will be a few extremists who claim they did of course! 
Labour MPs have just voted against the ending of free movement. It's wrong to create any more uncertainty when the Government have no viable plan for #Brexit  
LOL, in 12 hours, the line has gone from "stop kidding yourself, Labour wants Brexit as much as the tories do" to "Labour is a totalitarian EU-loving genius-hub that wants to strip you of your Leave-dignity"  
Fiona Onasanya is out!With £6k+ in her pocket she could be sitting there in Parliament today, maybe with the TIG, maybe trashing our Brexit?She's served 28 days. A monstrous corruption of our justice system.Everyone should be furious that we have a jailbird in Parliament.  
By keeping a No Deal Brexit on the table, Theresa May is using UK jobs, industries and communities as gambling chips.Did you vote for politicians to keep playing games with your  family's welfare?  
Just remember every Tory #Remain MP....A Leopard doesn't change it's leopard print heels!#CooperLetwin must pass...Parliament Take Back Control#RevokeA50 Stop #Brexit & #Remain in control in the EU with our Best Possible Deal..vetoes, opt outs & rebate.. 
UK Politics are broken, here’s some suggested changes to help fix things;1. Introduce PR2. If MPs defect, a by-election is called3. If an MP goes to prison for lying, they lose their seat4. Parties held to account for manifesto promises#politics #trust #brexit #parliament 
The one thing is certain if a 2nd referendum occurs and remain wins this time but doesn't fight for massive EU social reform as well as demand humane treatment for refugees, history will condemn us with the same vehemence that it will damn Farage. #Brexit 
The people voted to Leave the EU stop making excuses it's not about the 15 MPs who are threatening you! May set to RULE OUT No Deal Brexit after 15 ministers threaten to quit  via @MailOnline 
IRONY ALERT Tory shill @adamboultonSKY tells John Mann that all eight MPs left Labour because of antisemitism...Mann tells the truth and says most left because of brexit...Boulton nearly falls off his chair with shock @skynews 
Note. Labour is now talking about stoping a "damaging Tory Brexit". Labour is not talking about stopping Brexit. 
LEAKED: Labour's second referendum ballot paper revealed...  
Brexit delayed is Brexit betrayed. It's time for Westminster to wake up, show some leadership & deliver the #WTO Brexit that delivers on the votes of 17.4m British people. #BrexitMeansExit 
This is the reality of how much of an appalling mess a No Deal Brexit would be. If ever there was a symbol for our broken politics, the Government keeping this on the table is it. #ChangePolitics 
First photos are leaked of the special place in hell reserved for those who promoted Brexit without even a sketch of a plan of how to carry it out safely. Hell, 2019.  
Since the Brexit vote the UK has attracted substantial new investment and jobs, with net employment well up and unemployment down. How different it proved to be compared to the false forecasts of the Treasury, Bank and IMF.  
So the #brexit debate is still fogged by confused and wishful thinking.Here's what I think I know, after chats with both sides. 1/Thread 
Brexiteers starting to think 2nd Referendum likely - but will Zac Goldsmith’s overwhelmingly remain-voting constituents share his anger?  
Former UKIP leader @Nigel_Farage says he would refuse to vote and campaign if a second referendum gives the options of the PM's deal or remaining in the EU. He says instead he'll go "on holiday". Latest on #Brexit here:  pic.twitter.com/kxscUkJgDt 
Don't be taken in by Labours referendum call.  IT will not have REMAIN option unless we keep pressuring the party. Corbyn is pushing his deal which is not the best deal which we have now, it is still leaving the EU as we know it 
The formation of the Independent Group is another Brexit complication. It could foreshadows a shake up of Britain's two-party system   
These cele feminists are busy talking about dating rich men when we are about to fall of an economic cliff via Brexit! How will this affect the poorest women and trans folx in our communities? Where’s their take on conversation on the revoking of citizenship beyond a retweet? 
Pound climbs to the highest level against the Euro since May 2017 as UK PM May is said to consider delay to #Brexit.  
New post: We need a political party that is tough on the causes of Brexit  "Brexit was not an aberration in an otherwise well functioning UK democracy, any more than Trump was in the US. They are symptoms of a deeper malaise." 
So @jeremycorbyn woke up & decided that a 2nd referendum isn't a danger to democracy AND the EU is no longer an imperialist plot of bankers & arms dealers. 
Back in September, I reported how Scottish Tories want to use the replacement for EU structural funds to 'put a Union flag' on investment projectsToday a party source confirms they want to "cut out the middleman" - the Scottish Government #Brexit  
I'm sorry but Parliament is colluding as a whole to scupper Brexit. This has been their plan from the moment the referendum result was known.The only way for Brexiteers now is to dump all those remain MPs at the next election, sooner rather than later. 
With regards to Brexit, our MPs need to ask themselves what is actually best for the country and what is genuinely in the national interest, rather than what is in the best interests for themselves or their party. It’s time to show courage and integrity rather than selfishness. 
I wonder if we aren't approaching a 1994-97 moment, when your Dad established the Referendum Party with the sole aim of delivering a referendum and then dissolving to permit politics to continue as usual. We didn't stand against any MP who agreed with our objective. Brexit Party? 
If we end up with a crash out brexit time to make  pensioners who voted leave should be taxed more to pay for the Benefits payments of all the Leave workers who have lost their jobs. QThey can genuinely then be 'pulling together'. 
Now that Labour backs a second referendum, @TheIndGroup have achieved more in a week than the Lib Dems have done in three years. 
Tomorrow Parliament will vote on the wrecking amendment that is Cooper-Letwin. It's sole aim is to block Brexit. The amendment must not succeed as it would leave a poisonous constitutional legacy. Article attached by my colleague @SuellaBraverman and myself @ConHome 
Guys you're going to want to sit down for this one, but it's almost as if whatever we do to soften or reverse Brexit is good for people's livelihoods.  
Enough kicking the can down the road.  Now is the time for leadership on Brexit - no more prevarication, no more 'constructive ambiguity'.  'No deal' has to be ruled out by May & Corbyn must make clear that Labour is totally committed to a #PeoplesVote on May's deal. 
Can you show me where the Leave campaign argued for a no deal Brexit? 
Report: May Tells Merkel She Will NOT Delay Brexit Beyond March 29th  
There is a rebellion taking place across party lines in Parliament against Britain and it's democracy.  There's a long tradition in this country of resistance to tyranny, and these people are going to find that tradition still alive. #referendum 
Scotland as "bargaining chip" to save UK post #Brexit-We didn't vote for Tory Gov OR #BrexitThe ignore us & treat us with contempt at every turnThey squander our assets but tell us we are subsidisedThey "manage"our media to keep us in dark Wake Up Scotland!#DissolveTheUnion 
"We're not going to dignify this farce with participation". Daniel Hannan MEP warns that if Leave is not an option on a second referendum ballot the only choice would be to boycott the vote.@JuliaHB1 | @DanielJHannan |  
SHAMEFUL: Labour MPs hit out against Corbyn's Brexit betrayal. “This decision will stop you being Prime Minister.” 
Labour backbencher Kate Hoey criticises the Shadow Foreign Secretary for revealing she'd support Remain in a second referendum, because it goes against the party's manifesto.@NickFerrariLBC | #Brexit 
I really hope Labour officially mean it: a referendum on the facts, properly run, with Remain as one of the two options. This is essential: to test what the country, now that it is informed, really wants, and to put an end to the divisiveness. - 
Zac preferred a referendum on Remain vs a fantasy form of Brexit that we now know does not exist.  
Whatever happens with Brexit, I will vote Labour at the next General Election.  As long as we still have Corbyn or a strong socialist as Labour Leader.#GeneralElectionNow#JC4PM 
Neither do I. A. Court. Has. Said. The. 2016. Referendum. Would. Be. Voided. If. It. Had. Been. Legally. Binding.Parliament is treating it as if it was legally binding.So it should be voided.  
But that does not mean it is some kind of trick. it simply means Starmer currently has the upper hand, alongside McDonnell, with Corbyn loyalist anti-Brexit figures like Lammy or Lewis behind them, due to the defections last week. 
Brexit is breathing its last breath! 
A Scottish Independence Referendum is a device used by England to frustrate the journey to freedom.A referendum is NOT required.The precedent was set by England, the Act of Union was an Agreement reached between two Parliaments. All it takes is any Parliament to withdraw! 
UKIP Leader Gerard Batten: "Two years and eight months later we're not much closer to leaving than we were... This betrayal has been engineered from the day after the referendum."@JuliaHB1 | @GerardBattenMEP |  
Second referendum could divide Britain, say f**kwits  
Loyal Conservative Associations could back Brexit and the manifesto in the same motion. 
For pity's sake are we goign to tear ourselves apart over what is essentially a deal with a trading block! If you are BREXIT extremist on either side please unfollow me, I'm sick of the lot of you! FPTP election system remember? We URGENTLY need a Lab gov for society & the planet 
Jacob Rees-Mogg is so committed to the UK that his firm shifted its domicile to Ireland to avoid Brexit uncertainties. 
It’s times like this when I long for a Brexiter with principles. The referendum was not free or fair. A court has said so. 
A lot of the confusion over Labour referendum move stems from still instinctively seeing them as a coherent, unified political organisation. 
Labour's @hilarybennmp says it's a "sensible step" for @jeremycorbyn to announce backing a second referendum on #Brexit. He says he recognises that if all "other options" have been exhausted, a second vote may be the only way forward. Latest here:  
Hands up who laughed at the Irish when they had to vote again and again until the EU got the answer they wanted? The same thing is happening in the UK. YOU CANN'T LEAVE A MAFIA! #brexit  
Now, this was noticed just in time, but what about the hundreds of things that have slipped through the cracks because Brexit is such an intractable monster of a problem. Imagine stuff as fundamental as this getting missed, despite the 10,000+ civil servants working on Brexit! 
Here’s a strategy Call the Referendum, hold the referendum, win the referendum.  
One things for sure. The referendum & subsequent Tory Brexit debacle has split our nation for decades to come.All to appease Tory Europhobes and UKIP.This disaster is 100% down to the Tories.Their referendum. Their disastrous negotiations.We must NEVER let them forget. 
The brexit betrayal, the assault on democracy by people not fit to shovel sh*t and who rip off millions from us is almost complete. We have watched the theft of our country, democracy and the only opportunity we are ever likely to have to be something again and we did nothing ! 
Had the #referendum been binding, the court would have overturned it. The judge could not do so because it was *advisory* . Nobody denies that it was tainted. Read the judgement. #PeoplesVote #saboteurLabourMPs @CarolineFlintMP 
#TuesdayThoughts #BrexitBetrayalIf Parliament delays Brexit who would you be more likely to vote for in a general election? 
If the @peterkyle amendment is passed, the subsequent referendum will be the FINAL word on Brexit. It will be legally binding, we either leave or we #Remain. No further delays or votes in the Commons. Closure! It’s what the country needs. 
Daily Briefing:- Major shifts in the #Brexit debate, Labour will back call for second referendum- German economy narrowly skirts recession, latest survey says consumers remain upbeat- Federal Reserve Chair Jerome Powell gives Senate testimony 
Unbelievable!! Farage - "The less we share intelligence with European countries, the better. #EU #Brexit #alloutpolitics 
 omg  Twitter community: do your thing...No-deal Brexit panic after ministers realise the UK doesn’t have the right pallets for exporting to the EU.#brexit #UK #EU #export #trade #economy 
Former Ulster Unionist leader suggests Brexit is biggest own goal by unionists since creation of Northern Ireland 
Your last caller was absolutely right that had the referendum been binding & not advisory, it’s be void now for illegality @NickFerrariLBC. Pls read case by @A50Challenge & @JMPSimor. Why indeed isn’t it covered widely by the press? Ask yourself that question with an open mind. 
This morning on BBC Radio 4, Keir Starmer, Shadow Brexit Secretary, speaks about what a Labour second referendum would look like. He openly notes, that the vote would be between "a credible leave option and remain.” He adds he would personally vote Remain. 
@EmilyThornberry Many hundreds of thousands of us researched in great detail before the EU referendum & decided that LEAVING was best for the UK & we voted accordingly & WON. You now have the AUDACITY to:a) demand we vote AGAIN!&b) want REMAIN as an option!YOU DISGUST ME.  
Trust in politicians and the mainstream media has plummeted as a result of Brexit - and this was BEFORE yesterday's betrayal!Imagine what another referendum would do for people's faith in the Establishment... Support us at  
My message to Theresa May is to get this Brexit through and on time. There is such a build up of anger in the country she will have Anarchy on the streets, with the yellow vests like this country has never seen before. We the people are done with you and your useless Goverment. 
“Leaving the EU hurts NHS staffing numbers, finances, UK pharma, and public health policy...That reality is very different from the infamous red bus promises, and that’s why we need a People’s Vote on the Brexit deal.”  
Did you lot engineer this entire Brexit thing just so it would implode today on my 50th birthday? You guys   
"Led By Donkeys" claimed that they were putting up "real" Brexit  quotes on billboards, but when it came to Corbyn (& Corbyn alone)  they did a completely fake one, suggesting Corbyn "said nothing" on Brexit - obviously false then and now.  
DUP spokesman denies all knowledge of missing pallets.#Brexit  
DAMNING: Majority of public trust government and mainstream media less as a result of Brexit. Wake-up call for those in the Remainer bubble. 
I’ve an inkling the Brexit fightback will have its epicentre not in Westminster but in Warrington. And it will be a real people’s movement. 
If, *IF* there is a new Brexit referendum, then *all* UK nations *must* have a veto so our votes won’t be ignored again and the result dictated to us by what England wants. 
So Scots are to believe the same oil that could support a Brexit UK couldn’t support an independent Scotland?  
Shadow Brexit secretary @Keir_Starmer says Labour's people's vote would be between "a credible leave option and remain" and he would personally vote for remain @BBCnickrobinson | #r4Today |  
"Your manifesto said 'Labour accepts the referendum result'. Why should my listeners ever trust a word you and your colleagues say again?"@NickFerrariLBC | #Brexit 
Daniel Hannan: Second referendum would be 'catastrophic' for democracy  
Our Fiona, the people's criminal, is released from hard-right Tory jail in time to vote against the far-right Brexit. All hail socialism. 
“Make no mistake, the sole intention of the Cooper-Letwin amendment is to block Brexit. It mustn’t succeed. It’d leave a poisonous constitutional legacy & break the solemn commitments made in the ‘17 Conservative manifesto” @SuellaBraverman @ShaileshVara 
How crooked is our establishment? Crooked enough to allow @FionaOnasanyaMP out of jail in time for a crucial anti-Brexit vote? 
Labour: does exactly what they set out at conference months ago.Media: !!!!#Brexit #SecondReferendum 
WATCH | @Nigel_Farage: "We had a referendum, we backed it up in a general election. We then had 498 MPs vote for Article 50. It was very explicit what they voted for - we leave in 2 years, with or without a deal. Now we have politicians breaking their promise to the electorate."  
This may read like April 1, but it's very very real: Defra just realised the UK doesn't have nearly enough pallets for transporting goods after a no-deal Brexit. (Because pallet standard changes due to Brexit, natch!) Cue emergency meetings.  
Away from Brexit… statement smuggled out last night shows that PM misled Parliament with wrong rough sleeping stats. The only figure she needs to know: rough sleeping has more than DOUBLED since 2010, after falling under Labour.  
Really just A+ politics from Labour. Tories own Brexit mess wholesale, May trapped in a trash compactor she built herself & what Labour/Corbyn said/published/sang *MONTHS AGO AT CONFERENCE & CONSTANTLY SINCE* re: new referendum is finally being acknowledged. GE now. 
Election results have been overturned in the courts before. This referendum has not been overturned.  
The dam has burst. There is now no way to stop official Labour support for a second referendum with Labour campaigning to RemainNow we need to assemble a House of Commons majority for a referendum. Not far off 
Brexit isn’t the most important thing going on right nowAs temperatures soar, let’s be honest: #ThisIsACrisisWe live in the age of environmental breakdown - and our leaders are failing usRead about it in a new @ippr report:  
We will mount legal action against the UK Govt to ensure that European Elections will be held in the UK on May 23rd 2019 IF Art50 is extended. The idea of a Brexit delay is foul but we must be prepared: keeping the UK a member of the EU without representation is unacceptable.  
Labour MPs in Stoke and Doncaster have confirmed strong public support for a No Deal Brexit. Now politicians telling the public they can't have what they want. Democracy?  
Maybe they could have a meta-referendum on whether to have a second referendum. To be sure, that would pose the further question whether a second meta-referendum is necessary. Perhaps a referendum on that?  
The thing about #Brexit chaos is that it’s genuinely chaotic. Anyone who pretends to know the outcome is fooling themselves. The future is up for grabs. Don’t surrender to subservient fatalism 
If you think the immense harm #Brexit has already done might make ppl reflect & vote differently in a #2ndreferendum...Brexit voter: It's not about trade or Europe or anything like that...It's to stop the Muslims coming into this country. Simple as that. 
We are hours away from the final betrayal of Brexit. This Prime Minister is unfit to serve us.   
Theresa May is set for her biggest U-turn yet, one that could mean Brexit is postponed or even scuppered  
STARMER: WTO Brexit wouldn't be option in second referendum. Disgusting establishment stitch-up.  
I love it when rabid Brexshitters says there's a conspiracy to stop Brexit, having failed to grasp the conspiracy involving a lot of dodgy people to push Brexit on us. If they want to talk conspiracies they should look into the various things Mercer and Bannon are involved it  
Brexit negotiations were doomed to failure the moment the Conservative Party appointed a Remainer leader of the party. Nothing more needs to be said apart from the fact that this will likely cost the Conservative Party heavily in the future. 
One question.The courts have concluded that, had the referendum been binding, it would have been declared voidSo why must you respect the result?Take your time... 
John McDonnell says if there is a 2nd Referendum a NO DEAL Wouldn’t be an option.I think McDonnell doesn’t seem to realise that.1/ There won’t be a 2nd Ref( I hope)2/ Any options on a ballot will not be decided by the Labour Party.This is going to be a crucial week. 
By tabling an amendment to support a public vote if Labour's alternative deal is voted down, @jeremycorbyn has put Chuka's TIG up shit creek without a #Brexit paddle. If TIG vote against Labour's deal, and parliament rejects a public vote, what will be the point of TIG? 
If true then the PM shows she has NO negotiation skills whatsoever and is a Remainer who is a prisoner of the Remainers!  May set to RULE OUT No Deal Brexit after 15 ministers threaten to quit  via @MailOnline 
Interesting.  ‘Many MPs...are still...debating Brexit as a matter of principle rather than pragmatism. There must be major doubts about their ability to wrestle with the...challenges and decisions required to reshape Britain for the...world outside the EU’  
Giving the people a #FinalSay is the only democratic way to complete the #Brexit process. If not, they'll feel betrayed when Brexit doesn't deliver what they thought they voted for.Pursuing any type of Brexit without #InformedConsent would damage trust in the political system. 
Local government is where austerity gets visceral and mortal in its consequences (Giles Fraser failed to note). If there is any causal link between austerity and Brexit, it’s routed via local government. 
Barry Gardiner made a strong case against holding a second referendum last summer. There is no reason for him to have performed such a sharp U-turn.  
Labour's Lying TRAITORS Prepare to unleash blood curdling fury as Brexit and democracy are BETRAYEDThese grotesquely arrogant treacherous bastards masquerading as politicians need removing. 
It looks like we may well have to vote again, as they predicted. But to be absolutely sure we’ll deliver the right answer this time, the question will be brazenly rigged — Remain Vs an appalling form of Brexit they already know has no support. /2 
When Brexit has been stopped, the first act by Parliament must be to stop the Prime Minister and any other politician being able to lie. 
There was a Twitter debate about this a year or so ago. My years as a civil servant taught me that details like this often are what knocks a hole in a policy. Add the Brexit groupthink plus "Don't listen to experts" and that's why there things slip through. Bound to be others. 
Support for a second referendum in British politics:ALL VOTERSSupport 43%, Oppose 45%REMAINERSSupport 66%, Oppose 27%LEAVERSSupport 24%, Oppose 72%LABOUR Support 60%, Oppose 35%CONSERVATIVESSupport 31%, Oppose 62%Deltapoll Feb 23, don't knows excluded. 
It was never going to pass because there’s a Tory-DUP majority, almost none of whom back a second referendum, and because a big chunk of Labour MPs - almost none on the party’s left - will never ever vote for one. None of these facts have gone away! 
How much do you care about democracy if you have no concern for its integrity. A vote is only democratic if it is lawful. That referendum was cheated by the biggest electoral irregularities since the 19th century. 
The media & Labour’s referendum statementBefore: why aren’t Labour offering a referendum, disaster for ‘em *only interviews Labour MPs who want a referendum*After: why are Labour offering a referendum, disaster for ‘em *only interviews Labour MPs who don’t want a referendum*  
I’ve long heard it said that if there ever was a second referendum “leave” wouldn’t be on the ballot paper, that our political overlords wouldn’t allow it. This seemed to me incredulous, but it’s precisely what the repugnant Emily Thornbury now suggests. Does she want civil war?  
What a brilliant piece of writing.‘Whisper it quietly, but the best outcome for the DUP is actually a people’s vote.’                 If we’re heading for a hard Brexit then we’re heading for a united Ireland | Patrick Kielty | Opinion | The Guardian  
The pound rallies to the highest in 4 weeks as the U.K. government and the opposition give signs of changing strategy on Brexit  
Those saying Labour are only backing a possible second referendum because of defections seem to be erasing from history an amendment they tabled last month offering it as an option. MPs voted it down, including three by the name of Anna Soubry, Heidi Allen and Sarah Wollaston. 
Impact of #Brexit on health: "UK politics is peering over the precipice into an abyss of deep uncertainty. Brexit options are, no doubt, a Hobson's choice, but for the #NHS and health, almost Any-Deal must be better than a No-Deal." - new Editorial 
Distrust in the media and government is already extremely high. Are they sure they want to persist with a 2nd referendum? Do they think people will become less furious/sceptical of the political process?  
#brexit Sir Keir Starmer doing the rounds FFS. Been on Sky News, Radio 4, LBC already talking bollocks. Labour want People’s Vote millions Labour voters voted leave EU you IDIOT. Sir Keir Starmer the only person can speak for hours and say nothing. Shut up   
The 2016 Referendum was corrupted by foreign money and electoral fraud. Banks, Farage, Johnson & Gove were figureheads while media barons and foreign interests laid the groundwork. Brexit is not the will of the people, it is the will of those people! #StopBrexit #SecondReferendum 
Hadn’t seen this before - a fascinating insight into a world of #Brexit bravado, British entitlement and establishment asset theft  which manages to avoid using the word “Scotland” once.  
Confirmation if ever you needed it that the Labour Party are selling you out: You don’t understand, you see? You don’t understand what the Guardian-reading, educated classes understand! Brexit will be bad for you! So the option must be BRINO or Remain – it’s for your own good!  
Would you vote for Labour now that they've backed a second referendum to overturn Brexit and take the decision out of the hands of the misled masses?  
A referendum result that would be nullified in law but for the technicality that this was an advisory ballot. On what logical or moral footing can @CarolineFlintMP - or anyone else at Westminster - justify carrying out the 2016 result without at the very least a #FinalSayForAll ? 
Funny how MPs are blind to facts like the referendum criminality, lies, foreign interference, lost postal votes, disinformation and dark money, when those facts interfere with their personal agenda. Another fact is that a large majority of Labour voters wish to #Remain. 
Delaying #Brexit with an extension to Article 50 means Remaining in the EU  
BREXIT VOTE- 12th March:If Parliament fails to support - then the ‘no deal’ default must be removed to avoid us crashing out and an extension to Article 50 requested. We cannot let the clock run down. Contingency plans must now be put in place.  
Dear millions of Labour/ Leave voters, here’s Labour Party chair @IanLaveryMP promising to honour the result of the referendum, and declaring that Labour will never back calls for a second referendum. These people blow with the wind, they’re full of shit. pic.twitter.com/Gejehr1Ios 
Any day now#Brexit  
Keir Starmer tells LBC the question on a second Brexit referendum should be between a “credible Leave option and Remain”. He says he’d campaign for Remain. 
Labour’s proposed Brexit will be rejected on Wednesday night and then then party position should be that it is against May’s proposed Deal and No Deal and in favour of Remaining in the EU via either a legally binding confirmatory public vote or second advisory referendum 
Great to see Labour signalling last night that they will accept the principle of giving the public a final say on the #Brexit deal. Join us on March 23rd as we march for a #PeoplesVote:  
No, Julia, Brexit means even worse doctor & nurse rota gaps, delayed treatments for cancer patients,major disruption of the medicines supply chain, & stockpiled NHS body bags. I’m simply astonished that your response to these real threats for patients is crass sneering.  
New Health Policy analysis: #Brexit will cause significant harm to the #NHS, but No-Deal Brexit presents by far the worst option  
Brexit chaos latest: Ministers have only just realised that the UK doesn't have the right sort of pallets to continue exporting to the EU if it leaves the EU without a deal.  
Leave Means Leave will mount legal action against the Government and push for European elections if Article 50 is extended.Politicians must face the electoral consequences that will be unleashed by betraying the Referendum result. 
No-deal Brexit panic after ministers realise the UK doesn't have the right pallets for exporting to the EU.I promise you, it isn't April 1st!@Bremaininspain via @BIEspana 
You are simply an undemocratic traitor who does not respect the position he holds. You stood on a manifesto to respect the referendum result. You lied to every single person that voted for you. Maybe they should get a second vote on you?  
Imagine if we had a second referendum and Leave won again. What do you think politicians would do next? Drug us? 
Check out our new website for EU citizens in the UK. Information about #Brexit, #SettledStatus, organisations helping EU citizens and events with immigration lawyers across the UK. Thanks EU27 embassies, @LawCentres @theSeraphus for working with us to set up this info hub. 
The populism genie is out of the lamp. Three years of saying "the people voted for this" has reinforced the notion that the British public understood what they were voting for and that very dangerous lie is my biggest concern. Especially in the context of a second referendum. 
They put forward an amendment offering the option of a second referendum weeks before the defections? It was voted down, partly because Anna Soubry et al voted against. 
The only people who want a "no deal option" on the ballot are the hard Brexiters who have calculated correctly that millions don't even understand what No Brexit means. Quite a lot of voters think it means remain. 
Exclusive: DEFRA to hold emergency talks with business leaders today after realising the UK doesn't have enough pallets for exporting to the EU in a no-deal BrexitThe government's 11th hour realisation left affected groups stunned  
The country and British business is in the thrall of individual groups of self serving MPs/advisors playing their own #Brexit power games. Remain and Leave MPs back this compromise. Now ditch the backstop  
It would be very sad if @Number10gov decides that upholding the promise of prioritising #citizensrights of the 1m  @BritishInEurope & 3m EU citizens in the UK even in case of no-deal Brexit is now a sackable offence.  
“Brexiteers were conned!” they cry.Yeah mate, by you! You said you’d:• Respect our vote• Oppose a second referendum• Leave the single market and customs unionNow you’re all calling for a second – playing football with Britain’s biggest act of democracy!Charlatans! 
First class interview with @Keir_Starmer on @BBCr4today - and the clearest commitment that @UKLabour & @jeremycorbyn would put any Brexit deal that passes Parliament back to the people for ratification. 
Why the sainted fuck would you want to respect a referendum result obtained by lies and illegality, when to do so would ruin your country? 
Well done @Keir_Starmer on @BBCr4today saying Labour supporting a second referendum & he would vote Remain. He was challenged that Emily Thornberry said the same, then a Labour ‘spokesman’ undermined her.Let’s get this shadowy ‘spokesman’ out there.Is it you, Seumas Milne? 
Seumus Milne, Karie Murphy, Nick Timothy, Fiona Hill- it’s remarkable the unelected ‘close advisors’ who are driving hard Brexit. What was that about unelected bureaucrats, again? 
Brilliant interview with @Keir_Starmer  on @BBCr4today. Reflecting what was said by @jeremycorbyn last night and the unity of purpose across the vast majority of the PLP. *Everyone* deserves a say on our Brexit future. It’s now up to MPs to give everyone a say. 
It would be a travesty if Govt really forced @AlbertoCostaMP to resign for tabling an amendment which does nothing more than asking for the best protection possible for the @BritishInEurope in case of no-deal Brexit. Govt said #citizensrights were its number 1 priority. Maybe not 
Labour’s leadership know the public are fed up with their fence-sitting on pending #Brexit disaster.Let’s hope they will back #PeoplesVote this week. But why is this still being lawyered every inch of the way? 
Emily Thornberry wants a second referendum but without a clean break Brexit on the ballot.Brino or Remain.This is how far the labour hierarchy are removed from their grass roots voters.She will get away with this as MSM are part of the conspiracy. 
If a second referendum is more likely, we need to talk about Facebook... 
Starmer essentially having to argue that elected politicians not Corbyn advisers (‘sources close to’) should be believed on Brexit policy. Extraordinary to have to say this. 
Keir Starmer confirms Labour wants a referendum if Theresa May’s Brexit deal is passed: “If her deal gets through, it is subject to the lock of a public vote.”That echoes what Emily Thornberry said last night, but not what a source close to Jeremy Corbyn told journalists. 
It may finally dawn on the ERG this week that Theresa May’s deal is the hardest Brexit they’re going to get. So will they compromise and accept we’re exiting on slightly softer terms? Or kick over the whole cart to protect the sanctity of their vision? 
With Mrs May in charge, the Remain minority have been able to call the shots over the Leave majority. We need a tougher PM now, one with the ability to implement the decision of the majority. Mrs May held all the Brexit cards but she has played a terrible game of political poker. 
Labour SHOULD overturn that promise, following the admission - in court - by May's council James Eadie that the referendum was fraudulent. Why don't you join UKIP? You have utterly deserted Labour values and you are betraying your constituency, where my family live. Just GO! 
Exc: Final details of Britain's regime for import taxes in a no deal Brexit, including big duties on EU cheese and meat. Don't remember "higher food prices" featuring on the side of the red bus. @PhilipHammondUK furious 
Even if you don't think its wrong on principle, there are good practical arguments against a #SecondReferendum: a #peoplesvote would delay #Brexit, prolong uncertainty and remove any incentive for the EU to offer a better deal. And it *still* probably wouldn't be decisive... 
Keir Starmer categoric on Today that Remain will be an option in a referendum 
Yes Caroline, ignoring millions of law abiding voters is a travesty of your making - high time to come clean, inform them their vote, made in good faith, was based on an unlawful process, producing an illegally procured result, and therefore it cannot possibly be respected. 
Labour must follow through on a second referendum or young people won’t forgive them 
Yet again #Brexit confirms what you all already knew - Labour has no credibility, no principles and no belief in democracy. Shame on them.  
Why are the Brexiteers so set against a vote on the deal?  They’re so convinced Brexit is good, why not trust their argument and confirm it with a PV?  Or are they scared we’ve seen thru their lies? 
Fresh Brexit vote should include Remain but not no-deal - Labour  
We need to respect the rule of law, not an illegal referendum result that was set up with minimum safeguards on grounds that it was only advisory, then interpreted as binding when right-wing Tories narrowly squeaked the result they wanted. One big con. #PeoplesVote #StopBrexit 
That’s just not true. There has never been a majority in parliament for a second referendum, and given you’re involved in setting up a new party, maybe declare your interest? 
A #PeoplesVote brings closure, clarity and a decisive mandate on what next. Either leaving on the terms the government negotiated, or remaining.Without a vote the country gets a form of Brexit that pleases no one, years more of negotiations abroad and bitterness at home.  
Labour's Sir Keir Starmer says second EU referendum should be Leave vs Remain - Sky News  
The Globalists are inching closer to a second referendum. All of those in parliament are enemies of the people.  
WEAK: May 'ready to rule out No Deal Brexit on 29th March'. This will destroy the UK’s hand in negotiations.  
Would you favour the Queen in her role as constitutional monarch, using her powers of royal assent, to ensure that Parliament respects the will of the people & enforces Brexit? 
Is a second referendum a betrayal of #Brexit votes? "We have to face the situation we're actually in" @Keir_Starmer says.As Labour backs a second vote, get the latest here:  
There’s no majority in Parliament for a 2nd Referendum.There’s no majority in Parliament for ‘no deal’.There’s no majority in Parliament for @Theresa_May’s bad, botched deal..@JeremyCorbyn’s Plan, welcomed by the EU27, could command a majority in Parliament. Game on. 
In case you didn't hear, @jeremycorbyn has GONE BACK on his word (once again), and said he may now support a second referendum. Clearly democracy doesn't matter to him as he knows he'll never be democratically elected... #StandUp4Democracy 
So we are now expected to believe that Jeremy Corbyn - a lifelong Brexiteer who called for Article 50 to be triggered *the day after the referendum* - will campaign with vigour for Remain in a future vote. I he will be more ‘present but not involved’ - a bit like the last time. 
This is why the political class is not trusted. Classic. @Keir_Starmer wants to get his own way and wreck #Brexit pushing for a second #Referendum but refuses to include #NoDeal as an option. The arrogance is extraordinary. 
Just 28 days into a three-month stretch for perverting the course of justice, shamed Labour MP Fiona Onasanya waltzes back to her £77k job - and can vote in tomorrow’s Brexit vote. More of this on @JeremyVineOn5 
The Conservative Party's most senior activists overwhelmingly back a Clean Brexit on 29th March | BrexitCentral  
Barry cutting through the noise as per usual, as he eloquently, and concisely, reminds the BBC that this is simply a continuation of the #Labour #Brexit policy laid out at conference.The hysteria & misdirection from the MSM, FBPE, TIG, & other assorted acronyms is laughable  
“It’s terrible that Luciana Berger was forced out of the party by antisemitism but now that Labour’s backing a second referendum she’s a busted flush.” 
Reason why no-deal Brexit is still on the table is that UK political system is preoccupied with taking it off the table, rather than solve the actual problem.  -  
“Remaining in the EU is better overall for the NHS than any form of Brexit” - paper published today @TheLancet More apparent than ever before that the choice is #NHS or #Brexit - we can’t have both. @peoplesvote_hq @campbellclaret @DrRosena @SamGyimah 
Disaster! Mrs May is giving the majority Remainer MPs in Parliament every incentive to hold out until she finally agrees to Brexit in name only with Brussels – who will, in turn, have no incentive to make compromises. She needs to be replaced now. 
This is why Labour members need to INCREASE their campaigning to stop Brexit. A sensible referendum isn’t yet remotely a done deal!  
For some Tories, John Mann, Kate Hoey and Kippers this womans life is an acceptable price to pay for #Brexit 
Labour's Sir Keir Starmer says second EU referendum should be Leave vs Remain  
“I’ve always thought if there was a war or an earthquake I could die, but I never thought it would be our government that would be creating that uncertainty over supplies. For this to be a political decision is beyond insane.”#Brexit @NHSvBrexit 
The former Greek Finance Minister warned May 2 years ago exactly what would happen if she negotiated with the EU. She didn’t listen.The result has been a disaster. She’s squandered Brexit. She & her wretched bunch of Remain-supporting ministers must go.  
We had a referendum. The Prime Minister said, “This is your decision. The Government will implement what you decide.” But the Government hasn’t. So, if we have a second referendum who will believe a word anyone says? 
Fiona Onasanya MP, released from prison after just 28 days of a 3 month sentence and in time for the Brexit vote in the house. Our Gov't and judicial system, beyond broken. 
"The basic choice needs to be between a credible Leave option and Remain"Shadow #Brexit secretary  @Keir_Starmer says no deal would not be on the table in a Labour-backed second referendum. More here:  
I’m deeply concerned that “remain & reform [the EU]” is going to dominate any new referendum debate and we’ll be faced with continued British #cakeism and exceptionalism. Very bad for the UK & for the EU. Cameron’s “deal” was rejected in 2016 & is off the table. 
Berliners are holding a referendum on whether to take back around 200,000 homes from massive landlords as anti-gentrification measure.Imagine if that happened in UK or its cities?In Berlin, this is a rational debate.In UK, this would be "hard left"! 
May- 'I'm clear that I am going to deliver Brexit, I'm going to deliver it on time, that's what I'm going to do for the British public'. Not true! She wants to deliver Brino (Brexit in Name Only) to keep UK under full EU control. 
Labour's plan is not how it's being portrayed. The party 100% maintain a soft #Brexit as preferable, & will push for that 1stMay wants to leave us with a choice between her dud deal, & no deal. In that case, & only then, Labour feel there's no choice but to back a vote & remain 
“Nobody in the Dutch capital is happy the UK is leaving the EU; the economic downside will be sizable. But... the city has done more than any other to find upsides... Half of the jobs that will be created over the next 3 years are directly due to Brexit” 
Why is it the majority have to bow down to the minority all the time, i'm so sick of it! Whether it be brexit, religion, transgender lessons in schools, enough!! 
More important now than ever that all who want to stop this Brexit catastrophe join the ‘Put It To The People March’ on 23 MarchBring your 5 closest friends and relations! We can change the course of history for the better - if we act together! 
This poll explains why @jeremycorbyn has shifted on the #PeoplesVoteAnd demonstrates clearly that @UKLabour has far more to lose from facilitating Brexit than from giving us all a choice to change our minds#JustMakeItStop 
Keir Starmer confirms no Deal would not be an option in their second referendum, ie stay in the EU or stay in the EU. Sort of North Korea vote... 
Vital Labour party members email their Labour MPs & leadership expressing support for a second referendum WITH REMAIN ON THE BALLOTJeremy said last night ‘it’s still not decided’ if there would be an option to stay in the EU. But that’s the whole point of the referendum! 
One thing Brexit has really made clear - the fact that many senior reporters don't have in-depth knowledge or the ability to do hard hitting research - instead many basically just say "Minister X said this, backbencher X said that" for £200,000 p.a. 
Why can't you ignore millions of voters? You've been managing it up till now. I think you'll also find that the majority of Labour voters voted Remain.What on earth is a Labour MP doing supporting a Tory extreme Brexit? How will that help your supporters?  
It’s going to be a *big* day at Westminster with Theresa May facing resignation threats from ministers if she doesn’t take No Deal Brexit off the table. Cabinet & Commons statement crucial. “I’d go for a big breakfast,” one No 10 insider says. “It’s going to be quite a day”. 
State of play: May is being forced to close off no deal and Corbyn has made a move towards a referendum. But neither policy is remotely secure, & until Parliament has voted for them both it is vital that our campaigning intensifies. NO COMPLACENCY! 
In the unlikely event that Brexit is stopped, don't worry. Recreate the fun of no-deal at home.Colour your passport blue.Eat spam and beans.Watch repeats of Dad's Army.Report anyone foreign looking or with a funny accent to the Home Office.Stop taking critical medicines. 
Theresa May is marching us towards a cliff edge Brexit.Time to block the road to ruin by ruling out a No Deal disaster.Agree? SHARE  
When the Brexit vote was concluded, the pro-EU side dedicated time to finding a way to change the decision, almost always looking back over their shoulders even while marching.The pro-Brexit side took the campaign machine they’d assembled and began working on future elections. 
As one of the MPs who left the Labour Party I would like to point out in all the TV and radio studios you are kindly inviting me into that I have magical powers. The moment I left, Corbyn turned round and read out what it said on conference policy about a second referendum. 
John Mann represents a  constituency with many people struggling to get a decent standard of life sadly they will be hard hit indeed by Brexit @BBCr4today 
‘Beyond insane’: why one woman fears no-deal Brexit could kill her  
Corbyn was asked 23 times if in a future referendum he would want Remain to be an option on the ballot paper. Corbyn declined to answer. However, a briefing note has since been circulated among Labour MPs suggesting Remain would be on the ballot paper  
TIME TO GET REAL, AND ACT. Tomorrow Remainer MPs will take #Brexit away from the people.  Fight back now.  Here's how: #GoWTO 
I once had a fist fight with my older brother over who got to sit on the chair next to the fire when my parents were out. He won, then refused to sit on the chair and stopped me from sitting on the chair. This is how TIG/LibDems/FBPE treat Labour. It’s about power, not Brexit. 
Of course John Mann is invited on to #r4today to slate Corbyn's "absurd" decision to back a second referendum, even though it was party policy and majority of members, MPs and voters support it. 
Absolutely brilliant piece on #Brexit and #NorthernIreland  by @PatricKielty who predicts that if we’re heading for a hard #Brexit we’re heading for a united Ireland   
Regardless of your opinion on Brexit, this is a very good explanation if the single market and the implications of a no deal exit  
Remainers:'The uncertainty over Brexit is killing our businesses.So we propose to extend the uncertainty even further by pointlessly extending Article 50.Say thank you, businesses!'Go figure.... 
We may have inadvertently given the impression that a 2nd referendum was supported only by metropolitan elite BASTARDS wanting to stop Corbyn, however we now accept that supporting a 2nd referendum is a political masterstroke worthy of Cicero, apologies for any confusion. 
Rotterdam, Netherlands, has the largest port in Europe. The city is hoping for the best and preparing for the worst when it comes to Brexit.  
Good thread from @OwenJones84 Sums 2nd referendum up well. There will be no majority for it in Parliament. LAB will have met it's conference obligation.   
I’m torn. My heart tells me to rip up my Conservative membership, my head says I might do more good for the Brexit cause staying as a member. Either way I feel very let down by the Conservative Party. Just do as the people voted for. 
Labour MP and Leave supporter Kate Hoey tells LBC the public will feel "absolutely betrayed" by Jeremy Corbyn's shift towards supporting a second referendum. 
Theresa May is marching us towards a cliff edge Brexit.Time to block the road to ruin by ruling out a No Deal disaster.Agree? SHARE   
The shifting sands as May returns from Sharm. Moving from ‘My Deal to No Deal’ to ‘My Deal or Delay’ an excruciating & risky climbdown for a PM so publicly set her face against any delay to Brexit & risks explosive backlash. But walls closing in for May >  
All forms of Brexit are bad for health, but some are worse than others. No-deal Brexit will kill. Crucial paper from @Nickf72 @TamaraHervey @scottlgreer @h_jarman @davidstuckler @mikegalsworthy @martinmckee Free to those who register and pasted below.  
Convicts usually only serve half their sentence. This one does less than one third. How fortunate for her - & she will get to vote on betraying Brexit in the Commons.   
“Jeremy, can you be more useless, comical & deceitful?”“Yes, John. I could abandon my life-long EU scepticism & betray millions of working class @UKLabour voters by backing a 2nd referendum in a desperate attempt to keep my Marxist, Jew hating party together”“That’s perfect”  
The people of Scotland were lied to before the 2014 independence referendum and again at the 2016 Brexit referendumTomorrow’s @ScotNational will show how the British state lied and cheated Scotland long before that 
Delaying Brexit with an extension to Article 50 means Remaining in the EU, writes @Steven_Woolfe 
Betrayal of the 2016 Referendum! 
There goes Brexit then. And the Tories with it. Where do I sign up for Nige's new party?  
A good example of perfect Brexit storm and the divisive and politically cynical mess this sorry period of British history has unleashed on the country.  
Message to certain cabinet Ministers: No delays. No second referendum. Deal or no deal and OUT by the end of March.  
I think what gets to me more about the referendum result and the death of democracy (or what little we had) is the lying. Not just lies, white ones even, bleeding whoppers! The whole rotten to the core political class have lied to self serve them and to cheat the public! 
Brexit has only confirmed what most people knew about too many of our duplicitous  politicians. Arrogant Hardline Remainer MP's in both the @Conservatives and @uklabour have blatantly lied in their manifestos to deceive voters.We MUST overthrow these DISGRACEFUL TRAITORS. 
A delay to Brexit would just create even more uncertainty which is exactly what businesses say they don't want.  
THE LANCET - All forms of Brexit will harm the NHS declares Lancet review led by three UK health policy specialists. 
Damning stuff in today’s Lancet. *Every* Brexit scenario will be worse for our health:depleting NHS workforcejeopardising drug suppliesrisking our vaccines & devicesSo just stop playing games that risk lives, @theresa_may. It’s disgusting. 
1. After a bad week, the Labour front Bench used the dead duck of their alternative Brexit proposal to whip you all into a frenzy by reiterating they would, possibly, at some point in the future, support a second referendum. It was cynical but expected and you reacted on cue. 
The PM should let them resign, replace them with Brexiteers & prepare hard for a WTO Brexit. The UK will survive, thrive and prosper. No deal, no money, no problem.   
Jeremy agreeing to a second referendum  
What would be on the ballot paper if we had a second referendum?‘It would be the Brexit on offer. Do you want the real Brexit? Not the unicorn and the moon that was sold to you three years ago’ says @Kevin_Maguire! 
3 yrs after a tarred referendum riddled with fraud and lies - it is only right that now, with all that has been learnt about the horrible impact all forms of Brexit will have on the UK, the public are asked if we really want to jump off that cliff... #StopBrexit #SecondReferendum 
Dear @Skynews @bbcnews management, How on earth is this public interest story hidden from the public?Single mum 'told to leave daughter, 8, at home alone by #UniversalCredit staff' @NickFerrariLBC @LBC #PoliticsLive #r4today @GMB #Brexit @Bbc5live 
It's not the start of the unravelling of #Brexit, it's the end. My faith in @UKLabour has been criticised by many, but there have only ever been 2 parties who could stop Brexit and it was never going to be the Tories. #StopBrexit 
Atlee was an "Honorary Pall Bearer" at Churchill's funeral. Both were patriots, wanting to be friends to Europe but not ruled by it. Now we have Corbyn and May, two of the worst leaders in British history distinguished only by their mediocrity, as they fracture U.K. over #Brexit  
Good morning! Please join me for my #NoNonsense @talkRADIO breakfast show from 6.30am to 10am. We’ll be talking about Corbyn’s U-turn on a 2nd referendum, Cabinet resignation threats over No Deal, warmest February, obesity & the stress of long working hours (for women)  
Discussing on @GMB in a mo May opposing a no deal Brexit and Corbyn backing a referendum. Everything has changed. Usual chaos and crisis 
Yet another ruinous Brexit delay leaves more than 100,000 companies in the lurch  via @bopinion 
#brexit Parliament is finished forever if we don’t Leave the EU. All MPs starting pissing off 17.4 million that voted leave EU. Your all doing everything to derail Brexit all MPs all Parties. Be all your lots fault when riots anarchy in  you’ve been  warned by 17.4 million OK. pic.twitter.com/g0VdzCE6n0 
If we’re heading for a hard Brexit then we’re heading for a united Ireland | Patrick Kielty  
EXCLUSIVE: After dismissing accusations of betrayal over Brexit, the Labour Party unveils their new manifesto.  
Since some Brexitons can apparently comprehend things only if they are explained in terms of the sport you call "football", we have taken the liberty of preparing some Brexit football metaphors. A so-called "thread", or sequence of connected tweets. /1#BrexitFootballMetaphors 
The people of the Nort East know very vividly the horrors of the past. For them, elections is a choice between what is and what was. The votes were a referendum on the government past and present. The answer is loud enough. 
"Brexit Referendum Was Corruptly Won, But Result Stands Thanks To Loophole" - LBC @LBC #PeopleVote #VoteLeaveBrokeTheLaw 
#CANZUK is now officially the most popular international agreement after #Brexit.Support our campaign for free movement and trade between #Canada, #Australia, #NewZealand & the #UK at #cdnpoli #auspol #nzpol #ukpolitics 
Yanis Varoufakis: Britain needs to stop playing the EU's game and take a harder line on Brexit  
There is NOTHING to respect:1/ conduct of the ref was crooked2/ ref was sold on a false prospectus3/ no Brexit promise can be delivered4/ ref was 3.75 years ago5/ UK is entitled to a rethinkWhy are you incapable of absorbing this simple message? Just why?  
How will Brexit affect health services in the UK? An updated evaluation - The LancetRead it and weep.  
Would @jeremycorbyn have agreed to 2nd referendum if he hadn’t lost 9 MPs in one week? Isn’t this about party management? 
What question willLabour put on 2nd referendum ballot paper? Will brexiteer @jeremycorbyn really campaign to Remain 
Talking @GMB @piersmorgan @susannareid100 aboutLabour breaking manifesto pledge to back Brexit by opting for 2nd referendum 
UK: YouGov poll says that The Independent Group (TIG) rises to 18% new record high. #BREXIT 
Sterling up on report May to delay Brexit date, yen firms  
Maybe it’s because many of the leading Brexit advocates (including you) have far right tendencies.  
UK party 2-dimensional chess,  pre- and post- #Brexit. May moves Tories up to squeeze UKIP vote. Corbyn shifts Labour left. Competition polarises: moderate middle fades. Compromise becomes unworkable in a majoritarian Westminster system.  
BBC FINALLY seeks to address ‘Brexit bias’ with new plan to reflect how UK ‘really feels'  
"There is no good news for the NHS or for health. In all scenarios, depletion of the NHS workforce is inevitable, care for UK nationals living in the EU is uncertain, and access to medicines, vaccines, and devices hangs in the balance"#Brexit 
European Council President Donald Tusk: "For me it's absolutely clear that there's no majority in the House of Commons to approve a deal and will face an alternative -- a chaotic Brexit or extension."  
Brexit to harm UK's cherished health service, experts say  
Brexit: Theresa May 'facing revolt' ahead of cabinet meeting  
Hesd-spinning day of international news:—Trump and Kim in Hanoi—Corbyn finally calling for second referendum—Zarif quits—Maduro briefly detains @jorgeramosnews—India bombs Pakistan 
I'm Dutch so I don't understand brexit completely. Can anyone explain me why the leavers are so afraid for a 2nd referendum? They can  (better informed) vote again for leave. So what's the problem? #peoplesvote #Brexit 
Just over half of Okinawa’s 1.15 million registered voters turned out Sunday to deliver a resounding “no” vote in a referendum on the plan to relocate Marine Corps Air Station Futenma.  
May considers delaying Brexit deadline: Bloomberg  
It hacks me off and infuriates me that w FIFTY THREE THOUSAND followers my tweets supporting Brexit and President Trump only get retweets and likes in the single figures despite possibly 95% of those followers being sympathetic to my views. Twitter is a rigged game #StopTheBias 
Corbyn: U.K.’s Labour Party to Back Second Brexit Referendum  via @thedailybeast 
Born and lived here all my life;  would like  my European cousins to also have a vote in the next referendum.  #StopBrexitSaveBritain @Devon4Europe 
Theresa May heading for Brexit climbdown as ministers threaten to walk over no deal  
From Africa,  with some fascination, we have monitored the development of your aged democracy. In 2016, your citizens demanded brexit. 3 years later Nothing to show for it.We will NOT tolerate this attack on democracy and strongly condemn the failure of your leaders to deliver.  
I am afraid this referendum will need independent outside observers to scrutinise both the fairness as well as the legality. Like the elections in any banana Republic. 
2 years of May looking so weak has emboldened Remainers to try every trick in the book to stop Brexit. "Every Which Way but Leave"It truly is, now, The People vs Parliament. Have MPs the moral fibre to deliver on the decision THEY voted to hand over to The People, on 23 June 16? 
For over two years Parliament has faffed around searching for a way of ‘leaving’ the EU while remaining inside all EU institutions. The reason MPs fear No Deal Brexit is because No Deal Brexit is actually Leaving the EU. This was not supposed to happen & they are livid. 
Yes!!!! Corbyn has regained his senses! So now there is unified Labour AND Theresa May was Remain to begin with, so do the 2nd already! Jeremy Corbyn says Labour would back a second Brexit referendum  
No No No! No 2nd referendum - We voted out, live with it, we are OUT even with no deal that we don't need anyway as a free independent trading country, like we were before we even joined the fiasco of the corrupt EU 
#MAGA #Brexit #TrumpKimSummitThe story of to leaders, one leads the world the other follows!I don’t think @realDonaldTrump said to @theresa_may what’s mentioned in this meme, but I’m pretty sure it was something like that. 
It's worth recalling that violence WAS ordered to be carried out on the day of the Catalan referendum: by the Spanish Government, which had sent 6,000 police from other areas of Spain to stop the vote.THAT is the trial that should be taking place. 
5.- They acted "in full knowledge that the State would not accept" a referendum.- The took "into consideration the use of all the means necessary to achieve their objective... including the violence necessary to ensure the intended criminal outcome".  
4.There was, supposedly, a widely recognized "very high probability that violent acts would take place" if they carried out a referendum.  
Labour's shoddy, shameful u-turn on a second referendum is an insult to the millions of voters they lied to about honouring the first vote. #SkyPapers 
Unholy Alliance: Both British Remainers AND Brussels want to delay Brexit.  That’s because they see delay as the best way to deny Brexit completely.  It’s the standard EU play-book. The “wrong” result from a referendum?  Then vote again until you get it right! 
A second Brexit referendum would restore neither confidence nor competence in Britain, says @NickyMorgan01 #OpenFuture 
You can point to 700k 'no' votes for Cuban referendum. But can you even begin to find 700k people in the US who directly contributed to writing of their own constitution? Or am I doing a whataboutism... 
Theresa May is considering a plan to delay Brexit and stop the U.K. leaving the European Union with no deal next month  
UK's Labour says it will back call for second Brexit referendum  
-Hong Kong and Australia shares fall; little changed in Japan and China-Oil holds losses after tumbling the most in 4 weeks-Pound climbs on news of possible plan to delay Brexit-S&P 500 Index futures dip 
We need to reopen Traitor's Gate, and put all those Politicians trying to betray #Brexit in The Tower. They deserve nothing but contempt from the electorate. #SecondReferendum@Conservatives @UKLabour @duponline@jeremycorbyn @TheIndGroup @theresa_may 
This is mendacious, Nick.  Your ONLY reason for demanding a delay is to stop Brexit altogether.  
Not going to happen Allyson because the next referendum will only be open to people between the ages of 8 and 25 and those who live in London And Scotland will all get to vote twice. 
"#Brexit.....extend Article 50"?@wallaceme asks what the point of this (undoubtedly brief delay) would actually be, or are they simply dodging their responsibilities again?.Top stuff tonight, Mr Wallace.#SkyPapers 
The referendum result was won by fraud and deception by the Leave campaign, it was decided in court that had it been official instead of advisory the result would have been declared void. If you persist in demands to respect the result then you make yourself complicit in fraud. 
Brexiters go on about honouring democracy so much I'd have thought they'd have loved the chance to win a referendum without criminally cheating by £10m?  
Labour leader Jeremy Corbyn said the party is committed to “putting forward or supporting an amendment in favor of a public vote to prevent a damaging Tory Brexit being forced on the country.”  
Brexit BOMBSHELL: Theresa May risks Brexiteers FURY with plan to rule out no-deal exit  
Data, data, data. And dark money. All you need to know about #Trump #Russia #Brexit  
"Wrexit: Corbyn betrays Leave voters".@wallaceme calls this right, "shoddy & shameful".Firstly that Labour would betray so many of their voters over #Brexit, but that so many MPs can be bought over Antisemitism.#SkyPapers 
“What are you afraid of?” Has to be the most vacuous PV argument there is.No outcome of a 2nd referendum is conducive to anything positive. It can’t be anything but divisive. 
What is the difference now between TIG, Labour, the Lib Dems and half the Tory Party? They all want to betray Brexit. They are all happy to betray the people. But they must all be defeated, however nasty or long the campaign. This parliamentary swamp must definitely be drained. 
“I want Bannon’s Brits here right away”- Trump said when hiring #CambridgeAnalytica Trump wanted to hire CA but NOT be associated directly with the co or the Mercers.CA was also the co directly involved with data manipulation around the #Brexit vote. 
Worth remembering what the German court which refused Puigdemont's extradition said about "violence".-Neither "high treason"-Nor even "rioting"-He "was only aiming at holding the referendum; he was no 'intellectual leader' of acts of violence" 
overwhelming majority votes are landslide anywhere, they don't suddenly become something else in Cuba, where many Evangelical groups and churches did in fact, despite what this guy says, campaign against the referendum 
Dogs to demonstrate in ‘Brexit is a Dog’s Dinner’ march to parliament  via @LondonEconomic 
omg green book was the No Deal Brexit of movies  
One Lanour MP says that as many as 25 Labour MPs would vote against a second referendum. Is that all? It has become the party of suburban socialism and is now as unelectable as the Lib Dems. 
It is mathematically impossible to devise a second Brexit referendum that pleases everyone, explains L. Alan Winters #OpenFuture 
Can you imagine the response of 17K+ people if you put remain on the ballot?!!!The situation will be even worse than it is now.It was a one man one vote referendum, not a party politics issue. 
UK's Labour calls for second Brexit referendum if alternative plan rejected  
Britain’s dysfunctional democracy is horrifying as we hurtle towards Brexit | Letters  
Polls show Brexit regret is so strong that #Remain would win a new referendum by 9 points.The more familiar British people become with the details of Brexit, the less they like it, according to one of the UK's leading pollsters.#StopBrexit 
What happens to Chuka's TIG if/when parliament votes against Labour's proposal of a public vote? They will go from having one policy to no policies. And they won't be able to blame Jeremy Corbyn for #Brexit. Their political careers are toast. Corbyn's played another blinder. 
Any 'news' about Labour and Brexit would be the moment (if it were to happen) they broke with their timetable they produced at the Labour `party conference. In fact, this 'new' news (huge excitement in media-land) is old news. But hey, why am I bothering to say it? 
A new referendum would harm our international reputation? Is he taking the piss?Brexit has turned us into the laughing stock of the world. Every country I’ve been to since June 2016 - which is quite a few - the reaction has been the same: WTF has the UK done?!  
I hate politics sometimes. I used to think my mam was mad to warn of Westminster conspiracy theories.But the movement against Brexit and against democracy says to Leavers: your voice means nothing, your vote means nothing, you have nothing, you are nothing. I can’t accept that. 
We didn't hold the 2016 euref to decide if we'd leave the EU. We held it because it was already inevitable we'd leave & we needed a referendum to decide *when*. 
To be fair, you and other principled Leavers like @chrisinsilico have been fighting for a first referendum, without criminality, data misuse, dark money and cheating  
Delaying Brexit won't make May's deal pass. Cancelling Brexit won't stop us leaving in the end. The Remainers simply cannot win. We aren't leaving because of the euref result so refusing to respect it will not affect whether we leave in the end. You've already lost. It is written 
Serious question to my British followers. Before the brexit referendum were you guys aware that you lived in a state which has a land border with another state. Do they even teach that in English geography classes? 
If we have a second referendum (we’ll assume it’s conducted legally and without outside influence) and vote leave again the we will leave.And frankly we’ll deserve everything we get. Because if we vote leave after the last 2.5 years,  we’re a country of fucking imbeciles. 
You silly fucker, giving people more democracy isn’t disrespecting the 2016 referendum result, you’re not ignoring millions of Labour Leave voters, you’re still letting them vote. Are you pissed or something?  
Blacks are "picanninies"Gays are "tank top bum boys"Muslims are "bank robbers" and "letter boxes." Yeah, must be Brexit.  
Once again the GOP is not thinking about the long game. Remember when we saw record turnout by Democrats for the midterm election because they viewed it as a "referendum on Trump"? Well, 2020 is a true referendum on Trump and I don't think the Dems will be divided this time. 
New in the Lancet: “How will Brexit affect health services in the UK? An updated evaluation” Very short version: all the Brexit options are bad, some are extremely bad.   
Personally I’ve always lost more sleep over a Corbyn govt than whatever the Brexit outcome is. In his shameless manouevring for power I think he’s just put a noose round his neck. #KeepCorbynOut 
May is determined to betray Brexit it seems.  RIP Conservative Party.  
The Tories 11 point lead in tonight’s poll has nothing to do with Jeremy Corbyn’s frantic attempts to recast his Brexit stance. He’s a man of principle, remember... 
What has Corbyn put on the line with his flip flop to Remain? How many seats has he jeopardized?Labour seats in 2016 Referendum56% voted Leave36% voted Remain(8% designated "uncertain") 
If there is a second referendum it will be just as corrupt as the first one, probably more so. Britain is incapable of integrity. Article 50 should be revoked. 
SNP throwing its lot in with Corbyn's second referendum would be "hoping for the best" rather than "getting Independence going".  
Wow, welcome to the party - the Scottish National Party that is. We have been Remain, Single Market, Customs Union, No Deal off the table & 2nd referendum while Labour have ponced about abstaining & moaning about everything else but. Left it a bit late haven't you ?  
Brexiters love to compare the EU with Nazi Germany and to invoke the Blitz spirit. Here's what one lady who remembers the war has to say about that:"It's so naive isn't it? They have absolutely no idea. I feel like weeping."#Brexit #RevokeArticle50 #SecondReferendum #2ndRef 
I don’t get it. If you are going to make a big Brexit policy announcement wouldn’t you want people to be immediately clear what it was you were actually proposing? 
just imagine if the Tories had an actual Brexit leader and weren't infested with Rudds and Clarks and Hammonds. They'd be looking at a 40 seat majority by reaching out to betrayed Labour heartlands now 
UK citizens will receive a referendum on what remaining in the EU will be called. If you've got a problem with this #brexit betrayal then we'll shoot you.   
#UPDATE The European Union has opened the door to Britain postponing its exit from the bloc beyond the March 29 deadline, as the main opposition Labour Party said it could eventually support a second referendum 
For my entire life, I've left absolutely everything until the last minute. So, if nothing else, Brexit is giving me a real insight into what a monumental pain in the balls I must be for almost everyone in my life. 
So, @UKLabour are set to support a #Brexit involving staying in a Customs Union. Well, I have news for them... That is not Brexit. They might also ask the Turks what being in a customs union with the EU has meant for their ability to conclude bi-lateral trade deals. They can't. 
Labour’s Peter Kyle: ‘We can say to people there will be a definitive end to the Brexit nightmare’  via @krishgm 
Siri, show me the least subtle Brexit metaphor  
Tonight’s business headlines:- US-China trade hopes lift stocks- Microsoft CEO: We take a long-term view on China, Brexit- GE sells off biopharma business- Bank of America drops “Merrill Lynch” name 
I will vote against any proposals for another #Brexit referendum. This would not only do great damage to our social cohesion as a nation but also harm our international reputation. Would set back eurosceptic movement shared by hundreds of millions across Europe by a generation 
EXC: Government planning to pay billions to Brussels - even in event of no-deal Brexit. Cabinet ‘no deal’ preparedness Cmme agrees to table Statutory Instrument to allow payments to Brussels in a ‘no deal’My latest.   
That had quite a bit to do with the campaign that won the referendum, which was predicated on a deal that gave us pretty much what we have now  
To which I would add that a #PeoplesVote amendment is meaningless if it is just for a Labour Brexit unicorn (that is not on the table or negotiated) vs remain  
It shouldn’t take a one week old party getting within 5 points of us to force a panicked u-turn in favour of stopping the damage of brexit. But I’ll take it. Just imagine where we could have been if we’d actually made a principled argument for the last year. 
I will be on @LBC tomorrow morning at just after 7.05am to explain why I think the Labour Party has made a serious electoral miscalculation in backing an effort to overturn the Brexit vote. 
Jeremy Corbyn and Yanis Varoufakis convinced me to vote to remain in the EU insisting that social progress was possible and TTIP less likely to hit Britain. But that side understandably lost. In a 2nd referendum it can't be "loser stays on" - remain cannot be an option. 
It’s got nothing to do with disrespecting the referendum, it’s simply checking with the people that they are happy with the results of the negotiations they instructed Govt to carry out. 2016 was about a very general outcome, this is about a real deal... 
George Galloway - like many other Lexiters and Brexiters - seems slightly confused by democracy. If ‘the people’ still want Brexit, they’ll vote for it. If they don’t, they won’t. There’s no betrayal. Democracy cannot betray democracy.  
Quick Brexit jargon reminder:Brexiteers reminding May of promises she has made thousands of times = threatening extremistsRemainers literally threatening her that she will be "dead" if she doesn't break those promises = sensible moderates  
Countries that Succumb to Political Correctness get thisThank God we have Trump#Multiculturalism #PoliticalCorrectness kills #FreeSpeech Good Luck UK #TuesdayThoughts #WednesdayWisdom #FlashbackFriday #SaturdayMorning #Brexit  
You're making one huge assumption there, though: the amendment for a second referendum might not get through Parliament. And then what? 
Labour's Brexit BETRAYAL: Corbyn to SUPPORT second EU referendum and back REMAIN. If these tossers in parliament really try hard enough they should be able to create a war in Britain and destroy the whole bloody country. Then what for democracy ?  
The antisemitic rot at the top of the Labour Party is far more serious than your second referendum ...  
Everyone complains that @David_Cameron called a referendum for party management purposesIsn't that just what @jeremycorbyn just announced today? #justsaying 
Brexit breakthrough? British Labour Party shifts course, wants a new national vote  
It is not a meaningless accusation. It is an accusation that you intend to render the referendum result invalid, to destroy its validity, to render it of no force or effect, to deprive it of constitutional efficacy, to make it null and void.You do not get to do that to my vote!  
Sorry to rain on everybody's parade but:Reuters: "Labour spokesman says referendum giving choice between May's deal and Remain would not be acceptable." 
What Rebecca's saying is perceptive and important. Any referendum should be about what kind of country we want Britain to be. A Remain-backing Labour would need to reach out and say to the let down and left behind "we hear you, we get it, we're gonna fix it. Join us and we will".  
A second referendum on Brexit could be better run, with full manifestos and detailed proposals from each side, says @JustineGreening #OpenFuture 
This sums up the SNP deceit about Brexit beautifully.  
Labour is scrambling an already incoherent issue and if anything causes a no deal #Brexit, it'll be that. And they won't even understand why. 
To only analyse Brexit from the perspective of what particular British voters want is to provide a deeply distorted discussion of likely outcomes. What Remainer as well as Brexiter voters can get is highly constrained by the aims of a much more powerful neighbour 
Suzanne Evans said she was in Scotland last week and had been meeting remainers who had now changed their minds to LEAVE???Where was she!!?? @ScotlandTonight #Brexit 
F*CK a so called “People’s Referendum”! F*ck Jeremy Corbyn! F*ck Theresa May! F*ck Tusk, Barnier, Juncker, Verhofstadt and the rest of the banker-funded corrupt elitists and globalists! F*CK the EU! LET MY PEOPLE GO!!!!  
“No one has ever managed to get Jeremy Corbyn to say something that he doesn’t want to say” The New Statesman’s Stephen Bush says Labour’s decision to back a new referendum is due to the need to “recalibrate” after the defection of nine MPs to The Independent Group #newsnight 
Do we need to ask why Labour has announced it will back a #PeoplesVote? We have to thank @TheIndGroup for showing the Labour leadership the cost of backing #Brexit.  
The ULTIMATE betrayal has begun....NO BREXIT is now a real threat!  These treacherously corrupt MPs have put two fingers upto democracy.  Should we react ‘strongly’ and remove this whole Government , or just ignore this betrayal? Do you think we should... please retweet. 
Just imagined a second referendum and the CAMPAIGNING and dread settled in my stomach like a bag of last-minute corner shop ice and honestly, just strip me of my citizenship, I've had enough 
ok so now that Labour is backing a second ref, here's the thing.Yes, I'm in favour of it, because I think Remain would win. but no, it's not going to 'solve' the problems brexit has brought up. 
Very well: UKIP is polling so low it’s beneath the Lib Dems, not that Nigel’s a member anymore. The Brexit Party has yet to appear in a single poll. The Farage Factor is of interest to LBC and no fucker else.  
Theresa May will propose to Cabinet that she formally rules out a 'no deal' Brexit on March 29, opening the door to a delay in a speech tomorrow. @TomSwarbrick1 asks: how do you feel about a potential delay to Brexit?  
On the face of it, @TheIndGroup  has forced May to rule out no deal and Corbyn to back second referendum. It’s polling 18% and growing fast. GOOD WORK. @Anna_Soubry @heidiallen75 @ChukaUmunna et al. 
The Guardian front page, Tuesday 26 February 2019 | Corbyn: we’ll back a public vote to stop Tory Brexit  
Lab and Con MPs who tell their constituents they back Brexit have some big decisions to make as their parties rat on Brexit promises.Who will have the guts to walk? 
"What lunch with the PM taught me: her dullness disguises a dangerous power mania"Theresa May, a mendacious xenophobic authoritarian nationalist, a dangerous threat to democracy.#PeoplesVote #Brexit 
IF there is a second Brexit ref and Scotland votes to Remain AGAIN, where do we stand?Surely any 2nd ref MUST have a provision that ALL four parts of the UK must agree, to avoid England dominating the rest of us!After all, we’re constantly told we’re a Union of equals! 
Our year long campaign at last bearing fruit - Parliament is moving to delay Brexit, then a second referendum. But keep campaigning. We aren’t there yet! 
No thanks. So far little has changed. I'll celebrate it when and if it happens. Not before. There's still so much time for Leavers to sabotage it.The truth is, Corbyn wants Brexit. He's been forced into finally accepting the conference decision because of the TIG defections. 
So it seems Labour’s ‘leadership’ is at 6s&7s over the referendum-not-quite-referendum yes-no it-is-it-isn’t...this is dreadful. Brexit is poison, disaster impends, & there seems neither the sense nor the capacity to steer the ship away from the rocks. #PeoplesVote is essential. 
Maybe it’s not about Brexit, maybe it’s about the Labour Party being led by a man totally unfit for high office and unable to support his MPs and members when they’re being racially abused and bullied by his goons.  
UK (GB), YouGov poll:Scenario: The Independent Group (TIG-*)CON-ECR: 36% (-2)LAB-S&D: 23% (-3)TIG-*: 18% (+4)LDEM-ALDE: 6% (-1)+/- 18-19 Feb '19Field work: unrevealedSample size: unrevealed➤ #Brexit #BrexitVote 
Sure @JeremyCliffe "@TheIndGroup can't achieve anything."Because Corbyn is just following the decision to back a second referendum in the face of no deal, which was made last September at the party conference, well before the #tingers even existed.You're welcome.Regards.Tom 
If it *were* abt only one group of voters, Labour could ill afford to ignore the many million more of its remain and ex-leaver voters.But it’s not. It’s about all voters. It’s about the future of the country; and there is nothing democratic in denying ppl a final say on Brexit. 
"She’s just playing down the clock, what she [Ms May] wants to do is just get herself into a position whereby she says it's my deal or no deal… we think both of those are disastrous” - Emily Thornberry MP says that “we need the people to break the Brexit log jam.”#newsnight 
#Newsnight Surely @SKinnock & @BarryGardiner must realise that what would be divisive is proceeding with a costly, job-destroying #Brexit bearing no resemblance to what was promised, while saying to the people “you had a say 3years ago, now you must shutup and accept a bad deal” 
Labour leaver here. I as a Labour member wouldn't feel betrayed. What's important is a Labour government. Tired of hearing about brexit now don't really care what happens with it I just want Labour in No10 #JC4PM2019 
have just two weeks to build a majority in Parliament for a vote to hold a referendum likely to be an amendment to the March 12 meaningful vote on the PM’s Brexit deal. Building a coalition to turn the new Labour policy into a national reality will not be easy 
Quite astonishing how @Keir_Starmer and @johnmcdonnellMP over weeks and months pushed @jeremycorbyn inch by inch (with Murphy, Milne, McLuskey and Murray all pulling in opposite direction) to finally accept that a Brexit deal should be ratified in a referendum. And now they... 
May set to RULE OUT No Deal Brexit after 15 ministers threaten to quit  via @MailOnline This Is a total & complete Betrayal! 
It is great to see so many MPs from both sides of the Brexit debate support the #CostaAmendment. I again call on all MPs to do that. Let’s work for the ring-fencing of rights for #The5Million and take them out of the limbo they’re in with ongoing no-deal threats and negotiations. 
Not convinced parliamentary arithmetic is there to force a referendum, but if it happens, encouraging young people to register and vote is a good, positive tactic: crowing about how many Leave voters have died since 2016 is a very bad one. 
In seeking a second referendum, Labour has stopped pretending it represents the British working class. It has completely turned its back on its old core vote. We need real change now, and it’s here. Join us  
In another referendum, could I respectfully advise Remainers against crowdfunding the campaign efforts of anyone without a clear plan for actually changing some minds?Cheerleaders are great for getting the home crowd going, but no one's ever switched jerseys because of them. 
Lab and Con in a Brexit betrayal arms race tonight. Lab go full Remain, May taking no deal off the table.Voters liable to be less than impressed with either of them.  
A good day today.The UK finally looks more likely to get a second referendum.Alan Partridge finally gets a second series. 
#Brexit is falling apart under the weight of its own contradictions. It's always been fuelled by hot air, rhetoric and fantasy, and these are proving no match for real-world gravity: failing businesses, lost jobs, a crumbling economy.Time to end this farce.#Newsnight 
Asking the Remoaner parliament to support Brexit is like telling a football fan he needs to support his rivals for a million pound.He might take the money and say he supports them but he will never have the passion for the rival team and deep down he will always support his team 
The 2020 election will be a referendum on oligarchy:  
So, if there is a 2nd referendum with May’s Deal or Remain on the ballot paper, which way would @ScotTories MPs campaign? 
Another shocking @michaelgove video.  Before the referendum he thought we could unilaterally opt out of all EU law without it affecting our ability to trade freely with Europe in any way.  
Now elections are over can we go back to;Referendum.Fulani herdsmen.Bokoharam/ISWAP.Kaduna/Abuja kidnappings. We know those files will be dusted and revisited. 
PM set to offer MPs guarantee of binding vote on whether to take no-deal Brexit off table for 29 March - ITV News  
Labour in danger of overturning an election promise to respect the 2016 Referendum result. We can’t ignore millions of Labour Leave voters. There are Labour MPs like me who will not support a second ref. @jeremycorbyn give us a free vote so Labour MPs can keep their promises 
Now that Labour have backed a 2nd referendum to keep others from defecting to @TheIndGroup, it would be hilarious if another breakaway party formed by Kate Hoey et al for Labour MP’s who oppose a 2nd referendum, Corbyn, & TIG occurred. 
A credible theory is that Labour have found a way to kill off a second referendum while appearing to have backed it. 
BREAKING.. Three new Tory minsters have handed PM an ultimatum tonight.. Take no-deal off the table, or they'll resign. #EU #Brexit  
Dear Ireland,I know we've acted like twats. We've been boorish,bullying and disrespectful. Turns out we might have another referendum. As a favour, though Christ knows we don't deserve it, can you show us how to run one properly??YoursThe neighbour from hell 
Another referendum would be a carnivalesque car crash. What could be more British in the early 21st century? 
Dear potential #Reman Tory & Labour rebels...please don't fall for your leaders' BS...don't trust promises & delay revolts unless sealed in blood! You can't trust either of them re allowing a Stop #Brexit option. ACT NOW! 
Caught red-handed: Cuba's communist regime literally stuffing ballots in yesterday's fake-phony-fraud referendum on a new constitution.Why is this enemy of democracy sitting on the UN Human Rights Council?Will @UN_HRC chief @MBachelet speak out for Cubans' democratic rights? 
There is absolutely no way I will vote for a second referendum. The manifesto was clear and I will not support this new Labour position.  Nor will millions of Labour supporters @labourleave 
If as reported she is going to delay Brexit she has failed monumentally. Brexit is the reason she held a snap election. She has misjudged the country, she has misjudged her party and she has misjudged the negotiations. She has failed. 
Centrists: 'We want another EU referendum so we'll ignore the hard-right pro-austerity positioning of our marvellous new party.'Labour: 'We'll support another EU referendum to stop May's Brexit madness.'Centrists: 'Actually, fuck you, we just want the austerity to be honest.' 
The game is up. May offers a largely Remain minded Parliament a chance to remove the only viable form of Brexit in exchange for it endorsing her fake Brexit #WithdrawalAgreement They will grasp this and so betray the biggest vote in British history. HUGE 
I hear some Brexit news is happening and I am interested but do not understand a word of it — me, every day for the last two years. 
U.K. Prime Minister reportedly considering plan to delay Brexit  
Only legislation will give the country a guarantee that a no deal Brexit can be avoided.  
I don't know any more than anyone else but having watched Brexit closely for 2.5 years my sense is this - the wind has not only gone out of the Brexit sails but there's not a cloud on the horizon or a ripple on the sea. It's dead. I'm probably wrong but that's my take. 
The way through this logjam is to put May's deal to the British people versus the option to Remain. Whichever way the public vote, we get a decisive mandate to move forward and an opportunity bring this sorry saga to an end. #PeoplesVote #Brexit  
How will we persuade those who have insisted it is treason not to accept the result of a referendum to accept the result if there's a referendum? 
Welcomed news that Theresa May is considering delaying the UK's withdrawal from the EU. I hope there is a full, independent investigation into foreign support for the Leave campaign followed by a second referendum on any final plan before implementation. 
Labour Voters:Whether you voted to Leave, or Remain, you must ask yourselves:"Now that Jeremy Corbyn has decided to ignore a democratic referendum result, can I trust him to honour any of his future promises?"#LabourBrexitBetrayal#SecondReferendum 
At the next election I will vote Labour This is because I know a Corbyn-led Labour govt will reduce homelessness, rough sleeping & poverty, end austerity, fully fund NHS, emergency services & schools.I don't care where we're up to on Brexit. Labour is still the best choice. 
A fortnight ago was told by a Labour source “hell would freeze over” before the party moved to back a second referendum. Can’t think what has changed since then. 
Brexiteers need to unite and get organised. Tory Brexiteers, Labour Brexiteers, and pro-Brexit parties need to form a Brexit Coalition. If we don't and compete against each other, there'll be no Brexit. Differences and egos need to be put aside. 
Sterling spikes vs. U.S. dollar, hitting four-week high, following reports that UK's May considers delay to Brexit date. More #Brexit coverage:  
Ministers pushing to delay Brexit and Labour want a second referendum. Politicians are ignoring what 17.4 million people voted for. This is not healthy. 
Looks like Jeremy may have gone beyond what he was allowed to say by Seamus on #brexit & a #PeoplesVote I can’t help but feel that Labour would cope better if Corbyn sacked Milne.#SackMilne 
65% of Labour voters voted Remain at the EU referendum.  Remain is the will of their own voters.  
Perhaps before we have another referendum there should be a enquire into the skulduggery of the first. The lies need to be exposed and placed at the feet of the liars. With a massive spotlight shone on them. 
NEW YouGov/Times poll finds TIG up to 18% TIG+Lib Dem > Lab But will Corbyn move on second referendum kill TIG momentum?  
Brexit will obviously be the biggest act of political destruction on David Cameron’s historicalchargesheet, along with austerity, but the Fixed Term Parliament Act is also such an act of wanton undemocratic horror. 
To those who say that leave would win a second referendum and by a bigger margin, I say, 'So what?' It doesn't make Brexit any worse and at least it would show that it really is what people want, even without all the unicorns. At the moment, we have no idea what people want. 
"No deal Brexit" is the #Brexit the public voted for. Your father would be ashamed of you.  
"Brexit uncertainty is damaging. I know, let's have a second referendum!" Sheesh, guys, can you hear yourselves? 
Man who said a 52-48 result in the referendum would be unfinished business furious that a 52-48 result in the referendum is unfinished business.  
Following today’s announcement @UKLabour support a final say referendum, it’s important to credit my near neighbour @peterkyle for the work he has done on this amendment. His plan might just save our country but it’s not a done deal, we need to convince Labour Leavers & Tories. 
BBC's @bbclaurak tonight referring to "controversial Irish backstop". It protects peace & commerce, & is desired by a majority of parties & business groups in NI. In its current form, it was requested by UK govt.It's the opposition to the backstop that is controversial. #Brexit 
Britain to scrap many EU tariffs on unfairly traded goods post-Brexit  
Some Corbyn sceptics (cynics?) think his 2nd ref move is designed to deliberately spook more Lab MPs in Leave areas into blocking/abstaining Cooper + backing May's deal. JC gets to say he has tried to implement party policy, but Brexit still happens. 
Labour simply don't get it.It's not a "Tory Brexit"It's the People's BrexitAnd it's only the Conservative party which is committed to deliver it. The Prime minister is crystal clear. We Brexit on 29/03/2019  
There  are  plenty of  places  in  the  north  that  voted  to  remain  and  in  the  southeast  lots  of  places  voted  for  Brexit   
Breathtaking hypocrisy on human rights as EU leaders cosy up to murderous dictators at the summit in Egypt:  #Brexit 
Remainers will not forgive Corbyn if this a cynical ploy:“The Labour leadership believes there does not seem to be enough support in the Commons for another referendum, meaning it might be a ‘free hit’ they never have to deliver on.”#StopBrexit 
Well done @BBCNews for finding Stephen Kinnock to say a referendum would be bad. Shame there weren’t any senior significant Labour Party member’s around to speak to. And when you say some labour members support it - that’s about 80% don’t want #brexit. 
What do MP's mean when they talk about a brexit disaster? The average MP could not piss and hit the floor - what do they base their crippled opinions on? They come up with the crap but can't say why and when they try they makes arses of themselves. Cromwell, come on down ! 
Brexit is not a Tory Brexit ... like Labour the Tories are numerically against #Brexit but the British electorate voted by a majority for BrexitDeliver #Brexit on March 29 or suffer the consequences at the polling booths  
It was Labour who hid the McCrone report so that Scotland's wealth was stolen; it was Labour who put in the 40% rule that undermined the 1st devolution referendum & over-ruled Scotland's democratic vote. Labour has ALWAYS served Westminster, not Scotland.  
So BBC news tonight saying that Corbyn is abandoning his "carefully crafted Brexit policy" to move towards a 2nd referendum. Really couldn't make it up. The same people who've been saying for a year that Labour has been unclear on Brexit. 
Here’s what should be on the Ratification Referendum.Which option would you like:1) Remain in EU2) Not leave the EU3) Revoke A50The choice with the highest number of votes will be implemented. But please note, this is an advisory referendum. 
Strange times indeed. Emily Thornberry told me only last week that she’d rather DIE than back a second referendum. U turn if you want to...this old git is NOT for turning. 
This is a cynical & desperate move by Corbyn. He has been a Leaver all his political life. He is willing to betray the Referendum result in a forlorn effort to hold together a party of Europhile MPs on one side & Marxist anti-Semites on the other.   
Stephen Kinnock rrally needs to go f^ck himself.  a "Second Referendum would be very divisive and have a corrosive impact on the role and sovereignty of parliament"? Yeah, because the Russian funded Facebook dispersed lies and gangsterism of the last two years have really helped 
Dear @UKLabour & @jeremycorbyn ALL YOU HAVE TO DO IS SAY:"BREXIT IS GOING BADLY - THE PEOPLE SHOULD HAVE ANOTHER VOTE."Why are you making such a slimey, shambolic, non-comital, pigs-ear of what is really, a very easy task.JUST GIVE US A #PEOPLESVOTE NOW!!! 
Whisper it quietly but as many Brits want to leave the EU with No Deal as want a 2nd referendum ..."If the Commons cannot agree on a deal should we leave with ‘no deal’ or delay Article 50 and hold a public vote on what to do next?"  
This is the only sensible thing to do ... which would be the first time anything like that has happened with Brexit  
Thornberry saying they would back Remain in a #SecondReferendum only makes sense if the other choice was May’s Deal which they are ruling out.If it was their Brexit Deal on the ballot they would obviously back that and not Remain.Remainers so desperate they believe anything. 
Brexit voter: I don’t mind the people from Europe. It’s the ones from Africa, Syria, Iraq and everywhere else I don’t like! And this idiot’s vote is worth the same as yours and mine.  
If stories about an alarming lack of no-deal Brexit preparation are your thing then I’ve got a little present for you tomorrow morning 
*U.K.'S MAY IS SAID TO CONSIDER PLAN TO POSTPONE BREXIT 
A referendum between 2 crap versions of Brexit Vs. A general election between 2 crap parties who propose their crap versions of Brexit.Excuse me if I don't celebrate. 
BREAKING: Theresa May is considering a plan to delay Brexit and stop the U.K. leaving the European Union with no deal next month, according to people familiar with the situation  
I thought Brexit was like almost 3 years ago? 
BREAKING: May is considering plan to delay Brexit. Cabinet meeting on Tuesday set to be the big showdown.  
.@theresa_may is set to guarantee MPs a binding vote on whether to take no-deal Brexit off table if her own reworked Brexit deal isn’t approved by 12 March. This is huge shift by PM. It makes Brexit delay much more likely  
The owner of Primark and Twinings tea has stepped up its warnings over a no-deal Brexit, saying it is “unbelievable” that the UK is considering the move despite the “terrible consequences” that would ensue  
UK's Labour says it will back call for second Brexit referendum  
Best line today, from a Labour MP who was at the meeting where Corbyn read the announcement (wrote by Kier Starmer) committing to a second referendum:"Corbyn looked like an hostage being filmed reading the ransom note...." 
Brexit: a visual metaphor.  
Wait so Labour, a party lead by a lifelong Brexiteer in Jeremy Corbyn, is maybe being utterly cynical in supporting a 2nd referendum?! Surely not! #Brexit #BrexitBetrayal #PeoplesVote 
Jeremy Corbyn: we’ll back a second referendum to stop Tory no-deal BrexitIt feels like the chances of a no deal Brexit have just got considerably smaller.  
If there is a second referendum I will *not* support Remaining in the EU. The last few years have revealed that the EU is a completely reactionary institution, that is by necessity only able to advance the interests of capitalism against the working class. It can’t be reformed. 
I have to say I didn’t enter the world of twitter until Brexit . I wouldn’t know what it was like before the B word 
“Brexit was always a project driven by the right to enrich the right” Spot on ⁦@chakrabortty⁩ onward to ⁦@peoplesvote_uk⁩ ⁦@LabPeoplesVote⁩ ⁦@Another_Europe⁩ 
I’m told the new question will be: “Do you really, really, REALLY want to leave the EU, cross your heart and hope to die, no take-backsies?” #brexit #Studio10 
The front page of tomorrow's Daily Telegraph 'Corbyn comes out for second referendum' #tomorrowspaperstoday 
I think Remain would lose a second referendum There I said it 
Excellent to see another shadow minister, who represents both one of the areas set to be hit hardest by any form of Brexit & a large student population, backing a #PeoplesVote.Well done @LukePollard @FFSake_ 
If a second referendum happens & the choice is between REMAIN or BRINO; we must organise a mass, co-ordinated ballot-paper spoiling, so at least history can record our protest at being cheated and betrayed by corrupt politicians. 
I worry about @Labour still talking about a "Tory Brexit". Brexit is Brexit. Same disaster. Whichever colour you paint it.I just don't trust them. 
Into the valley of death, rode the 17.4 millionRemainers to right of themRemainers to left of themRemainers in front of themTheir vitriol  thunderedStormed with snowflake facesBoldly they rode and wellInto the jaws of BrexitInto the mouth of hellRode the 17.4 million 
Question : if brexit didn’t exist would your twitter feed be empty and if not what would be on it ? 
One option, if it came to it with a bill cancelling Brexit reaching her, wld be for the Queen to refuse Assent, dismiss Parliament with a post-Brexit General Election date & recommend to any parties favouring rejoining the EU that they put that in their manifestos. 
Great to see my Labour front bench colleague & Plymouth MP, @LukePollard come out for a public #FinalSay vote on May’s botched #Brexit deal!  
Tuesday's FT: "Labour reshapes #Brexit debate by backing second referendum" (via @MsHelicat) #tomorrowspaperstoday 
If there's a new referendum and the former and current leaders of the Remain campaign run it, it's doomed. A new campaign would have to appeal to millions of people understandably furious with an unjust, broken social order rigged in favour of the elite. Maybe that'd win. 
My own view is Leave would be odds on-favourites to win a new referendum. Their slogan 'Tell Them Again' would be enormously powerful. If a new referendum happens, this is what I suggested Labour must do a couple of months back >  
'Jugs, you can mock away as you so often do, but given you can’t understand why Brexit happened, or why Trump happened, or why almost anything happens, do you think there’s a tiny scintilla of possibility that you might not be the best judge of popular opinion?- Piers to Lineker 
WATCH | Just gonna leave this here... @HackneyAbbott three days after the referendum: "This vote was a roar of anger against Westminster elites. It's the most important political vote of my lifetime.I DON'T think we should re-run it - we HAVE to respect the result."  
The Cant & the hypocrisy are manifest ... Labour have been lying to us since the 2016 EU referendum result ... they have misled the British electorate ... they will surely be eviscerated at the next General Election?  
The betrayal and delay of Brexit will come because of a remain parliament and a traitor remainer Prime Minister who never wanted us to leave the EU in the first place.  
Nope! And we will be LEAST outraged if Brexit gets cancelled altogether! #Poll 
This is unequivocal. Labour's shadow foreign secretary supports second referendum between PM's deal and staying in the EU. Spread the good news!  
Jeremy Corbyn: we’ll back a second referendum to stop Tory no-deal Brexit  
Is this the week that Brexit died? 
Labour turning their back on leave? No, there's a 3-line whip on Wednesday to support JC's long held Brexit position. This is about stopping this reckless govt using 'No Deal' as a political game. 
Love how Labour has simultaneously convinced itself that1. It doesn't matter that they're behind in the polls because last time they almost closed a 20 point gap2. Remain will definitely win a second referendum 
UK politics dividing more neatly on Brexit lines, which Corbyn has long sought to avoid.Lab now the main remain party, but split six ways with TIG, Lib Dem, SNP, Green and Plaid. The Tories are the Brexit party. Their base is split only with UKIP.Don’t discount an election. 
Comparing the #Brexit negotiations to ww2, & the EU to Nazi Germany, is not just offensive to Germans. Think of the countries which suffered under Nazi occupation & later chose to embrace European integration to safeguard peace &their freedom. My conversation with @fatimamanji . 
Labour’s policy on Brexit, as ever, is to be so confusing that it will be difficult for anybody to blame them confidently after Brexit goes badly. 
Labour has announced it will back a second referendum on #Brexit  
News tonight - Labour’s new policy is for 2nd #EUReferendum. What part of a democratic vote is not being understood? I will oppose any attempt for a 2nd referendum seeking to drag us back into the EU. The people of #SouthThanet voted to leave by 2:1. We now need to get on with it 
This new twist in the brexit story -the possibility of a 2nd vote being backed  by labour - is exactly why the SNP won’t call indyref2 till brexit actually happens. And NO. Brexit is not certain until it happens. It’s looking more like it could be stopped or massively softened 
"According to Owen Smith, Corbyn was asked 23 times if in a future referendum he would want Remain to be an option on the ballot paper. Corbyn declined to answer." Short version, it's a con. See @katyballs 
The year 2036. The ramifications of Brexit have decimated the UK. A piglet, once full of hope, now stockpiles weapons & supplies in order to overthrow the brutal authoritarian government. Her name... is Prepper Pig. 
Brexit Blitz spirit: how war is mentioned by Leavers and Remainers 
Corbyn has finally done it. He's put 2 fingers up to 80% of his electorate by backing a 2nd referendum. Democracy, he wouldn't recognise it if it slapped him in the face. 
Long Brexit subcommittee meeting of shadow Cabinet today settled the shift to referendum: “we got there in the end” said one longstanding supporter of eventually backing a referendum, but only after exhausting other options. Of some concerned Lab MPs “we can’t please everybody”. 
Labour have just told the 60%+ of people in #Peterborough that voted for #brexit that their votes don’t count. A #2ndreferendum would take us back to square one. Good luck defending that on the doorstep. 
I can see why people in England are excited by British Labour's statement on a 2nd referendum but I'm from a place that voted firmly to Remain, we were & continue to be ignored (even though we will incur the worst impact).Again a reminder that Westminster is a foreign entity. 
Remember: Cancelling plans is OK. Treating yourself to a drink is OK. Taking time off social media is OK. Resigning from the Prime Ministership is OK. Calling a second referendum is OK. Resurfacing in a foreign country with a new name 10 years later is OK. It’s called self care. 
Cuba has a new constitution! Results are in on Cuba's constitutional referendum: 7,848,343 people voted (84.4% of the electorate) and of them: 6,816,169 voted YES (86.85%) and 706,400 voted NO (9.0%)  
This will be lost amidst the Labour referendum stuff, but the JLM are claiming that Jeremy Corbyn lied to the PLP tonight about contacting them.  
Caution.Get no deal gone. ThenPlan 1.  To get Labour Brexit through (that wasn’t Party Policy as it doesn’t meet the 6 tests)Plan 2.  Only if it fails then May’s deal v Remain (& then will the LP be backing the horse both ways again.  Corbyn sounded like he was a hostage. 
Cut up my party membership card tonight- disappointed that the party could attempt to reverse the once-in-a-lifetime democratic decision taken in 2016.#Brexit #LabourParty #SecondReferendum 
Labour’s Peter Kyle: ‘We can say to people there will be a definitive end to the Brexit nightmare’ 
.@NeilFindlay_MSP not sounding too comfortable on the new @BBCScotNine as he's asked how Labour could back a 2nd EU referendum but refuse a new referendum on independence. A "legitimate question to ask", he admits. #TheNine 
So Labour want to implement Brexit but they’ll also campaign for Remain if they don’t get the chance to? That doesn’t sound at all insincere and like they are trying to con Leave voters and Remain voters at the same time. Not at all. 
I (of course) recommend @bbclaurak 's entire thread but let me highlight this point. Party spokespeople wouldn't say tonight that the shift to support a referendum amendment  makes a referendum more likely - only that its uncertain what will happen and they want to avoid no deal  
Yet another ruinous Brexit delay leaves more than 100,000 companies in the lurch (via @bopinion) 
Labour move to back a second EU referendum 
It's NOT different.If we can have a second vote on Brexit, we can have a second vote on Independence.But Will that reality scupper the prospect? 
Britain's Labour Party has announced it will support a #SecondReferendum on Brexit. How would another People's Vote work?  
Today’s announcement of a potential 2nd referendum doesn’t change much. As many as 70/80 Labour MPs would vote against. Shad cabinet resignations. Still doesn’t have numbers. That said, a national lexit tour w/ @graceblakeley & @C_Lapavitsas would be something to behold! 
Theresa May part of a Govt that blew up Libya and walked away, watched people drowning in the sea walked away, then her Daily Mail Media Militia used those poor peoples struggle for life as a tool for power for Brexit, now this when will journalists hold Theresa May to account?  
We said it all along, we would get to part in policy for a final say if we could not get a good deal (which I believe no one could). We will push for that referendum and it must as the front bench confirmed tonight between May’s bad deal or a good deal called remain. 
“Well, you’ve gone and backed yourself right into a fucking corner now, Tez. The creepy, Luxembourgish little cunt isn’t budging, and now that beardy fucking sandaltwat has decided to piss in my porridge with another referendum. Christ, I feel like I’m gonna fucking shit meself.” pic.twitter.com/gMRzbeRlIV 
Our view: Labour amendment will be voted down on Weds. Key amendment is Wilson-Kyle on day of next MV - deal conditional on confirmatory referendum. Tory pro-EU MPs won’t support a Labour frontbench amendment but will back a backbench one. Wilson-Kyle holds the key. Below new %  
 @BrandonLewis: "Instead of working to thwart Brexit at this critical stage, Jeremy Corbyn should put the country’s interest before his party’s - by backing a deal that respects and delivers on the result of the referendum." 
But a Labour source says it would no be "reasonable" for any second referendum to be a choice between May's deal and Remain.The source and Emily Thornberry can't both be right.  
THE DUSTBIN PARTYFor years Labour have lied to us by telling us they would respect the Referendum Result.They lied. Now they should be dumped  as the most dishonest, untrustworthy political party since Blair's band of lying Labour scumbags. 
A timely reminder that LeaveEU misled and betrayed Leave voters, was fined £70,000 for breaking electoral law and £60,000 for data law breaches, and that it is being audited by the Information Commissioner’s Office and investigated by the National Crime Agency.#Brexit  
Labour's David Lammy says the "the vast majority of Labour Party opinion" is behind a new "public vote" on #Brexit #SecondReferendum 
Hundreds of dogs and their two-legged companions, together with MPs and celebrities, will hold the world’s biggest ‘dog’s dinner’ to demand that the government pull the country back from the brink of a no-deal Brexit disaster.  
Now that Labour are supporting another referendum in order to avert a ruinous Tory Brexit meltdown, isn't it now obvious that the #FBPE mob should probably have spent some of the last 32 months trying to persuade some Tory MPs instead of relentlessly attacking Corbyn and Labour? 
Didn't the idea of a second referendum die 2-3 weeks ago....according to some commentators? 
A second Brexit referendum is back on the table  
People ask why #animal advocates fight #Brexit?We live on a pathetically small & vulnerable planet. What's the chance we will reverse our man-made 6th mass extinction if we can't even unite to fight the causes?No chance!Life on earth is dying & we are causing it.Go #Vegan 
TONIGHT: Labour has said it is prepared to back another EU referendum, but is this a game changing moment or just another piece of the Brexit jigsaw?Last week, Chuka Umunna left Labour to pursue a 'People's Vote' - what does he think now?22:30 @BBCTwo | #newsnight | @maitlis 
At last, Jeremy. Now Labour’s mission must be to prevent any Brexit | Polly Toynbee | Opinion | The Guardian  
Brexit is stupid, but allowing Rees-Mogg and Farage the win by default on March 29th simply because you hate Jeremy Corbyn so much you want to divide the opposition to "no deal" is infinitely more stupid. 
Dave Rolt is finishing up on stage now, with another emotional speech. Once Widnes is sorted, he’s off to sort Brexit out. #WidnesRL 
Labour lied to us all AGAIN.Labour's 2017 Election Manifesto Promise on Brexit said:"Labour accepts the referendum result."They lied to get votes, dishonestly.They lied to get YOUR vote, dishonestly.#MoreLabourLies 
Apparently the UK Govt is going to claim The International Court of Justice’s judgment against the UK - declaring that Chagos was wrongfully detached from Mauritius - is only advisory.Wasn’t the EU Referendum only advisory? 
Shadow Foreign Secretary Emily Thornberry says Labour’s second referendum bid should be a choice between Theresa May’s Brexit deal or staying in the EU - and she’d campaign for Remain @IainDale | #SecondReferendum 
Most Labour MPs ducking the question, would they support a Labour Brexit or remain in their proposed referendum . Keir Starmer will want to be first to make this crystal clear. 
Labour - moving against the vote of the #people :BBC News - Labour prepared to back new Brexit referendum 
If there is a second referendum I wouldn’t put it past that stupid country to vote for Brexit once again. 
Brexit vote: Theresa May privately setting out plans for Article 50 to be extended by two months  
I’m not afraid of it. It’s Labour who need to be afraid of it. You can’t have a second referendum asking the same question that has already been answered. Unless you are content to betray democracy and pay the price for so doing #Brexit 
Latest Labour strategy on #Brexit A second vote on Brexit with the choice of: Theresa May’s Deal (with Labour amendments) OR RemainWhat’s funny is even THEY know this can’t fly. Brits would have every right to riot if this is the contempt in which they are held. 
The Lisbon Treaty becomes Law in 2020 This means Britain can Never Leave if we are still members after 2019 This is why those Remoaners MPs Are trying to delay Brexit So to stop us from Leaving 
From what I gather, any second referendum amendment can be ignored by the Tories.Its advisory.lol.Corbyn burned his party for nothing. 
Cuba's Constitutional Referendum expressed as percentages -YES vote: 86.85% (of total votes received)NO vote: 9% (of total votes received)Valid votes: 95.85%Blank votes: 2.53%Spoiled votes: 1.62%  
Brexit...if only...  
Brexit is a mess. Parliament is deadlocked and the PM is intent of running down the clock to force her deal or take us over the edge with no deal. That is why I am backing a public vote to put the PM’s deal to the people with an option to remain. Read why here pic.twitter.com/6GdqiBfVJm 
So many leave voters want a #PeoplesVote now they see reality of brexit.You can see their stories by following @RemainerNow 
This is the question Remainers are suggesting we have on the ballot paper of a second referendum: May's deal vs Remain.So, where's the Brexit option?  #RemainOrRemain Support us at  
BREAKING: Corbyn to back second referendum, on grounds that he passionately believes in not losing any more MPs. 
3. As things stand tho Labour leadership knows there doesn’t seem enough support in commons for another referendum - remember there are labour MPs who’ll never back it - so it might be a free hit they never have to deliver on, while showing party membership they have tried but... 
Channel 4 appeared very disappointed, this evening, when interviewing Emily Thornberry.  She had to restate that A 2nd Referendum is in our Manifesto.  It was refreshing to also hear her to state that JC had been subjected to, the most appalling bullying and harassment.   
BREXIT ULTIMATUM: 'Hold firm' and Brexit will NOT be stopped - Theresa May WARNED  
During this AGM season, every Conservative Association should pass a motion calling on Brexit to be delivered ON TIME and IN FULL.A mass of local Associations backing up the National Convention would send a powerful signal to the Prime Minister. 
Timing is everything.You can be too early when every numpty says you should have another referendum BEFORE May has clearly failed, lost her party and Parliament.Or you can go at just right time snooker May, the quitters and Watson’s latest coup attempt.That’s leadership #JC4PM 
Cuba’s Constitutional Reform ReferendumYes vote 6,816,169 = 73.31% of total electors or 86.85% of total votes received. No vote 706,400 = 7.6% of total electors or 9% of total votes received. 
. @BrandonLewis  says "Labour have ripped up their promise to respect the referendum result and are now pursuing a divisive second referendum". No, Brandon, you are arrogantly denying the British people a vote on something they could not have known in 2016.#PeoplesVote #Brexit 
1. Just landed to what is big news for those in Labour who have been pushing for another referendum 
"We would ask for the public to be able to have a vote... Do you want this, or do you want to Remain"Labour's Emily Thornberry says the party will back a Deal or Remain referendum on Brexit if its alternative plan is rejected.  
I've heard this before. I'll believe #brexit is dead when it's buried at a crossroads with a stake through its heart. 
Parliament will rightly reject a Labour Brexit - as it, too, would destroy jobs and opportunities. But that will clear the way for Labour to support the best route forward for Britain: a public vote on the deal, and a campaign to Remain.  
With no Brexit compromise then on March 29 the Brextremists get the "no deal" they want Yet #FBPE still desperately try to divide the opposition to "no deal" with vitriolic anti-Corbyn rantsSo blinded by hate that they're willing to give Farage & Rees-Mogg the win by default! 
PM’s plane just landed to news of Labour backing a second referendum. Smart politics, Corbyn must do what he can to avoid a big split. This a necessary first step  
Latest @guardian cartoon...#MeaningfulVote #TheresaMay #Brexit  
So here is the latest version of my #Brexit diagram, adding Corbyn possibly backing a #PeoplesVoteProblem though: I don't think such an amendment (yet?) commands a majority in the Commons, even if whipped by Labour 
Well, that's clear.If (when) the Labour Brexit amendment fails on Wednesday, @UKLabour will be campaigning for public vote on any deal (or no-deal) Versus Remain.And we will campaign to Remain.Lots of hurdles, many to convince, but there's hope  
This is the point, Labour MPs in the North, Midlands and Wales would be kissing goodbye to their seats if they backed a 2nd referendum.  
At last, Jeremy. Now Labour’s mission must be to prevent any Brexit | Polly Toynbee | Opinion | The Guardian  
Keep an eye out for the Lancet around midnight tonight. Analysis reveals horrifying health implications of no-deal Brexit. Journos, will be worth waiting up for. 
This is a significant and welcome announcement from @Keir_Starmer @jeremycorbyn this evening - it’s clear the PM’s #Brexit shambles cannot continue - it’s time this issue went back to the people for #FinalSay 
How about one competently run referendum instead of one fraught with corruption and lies, with things like possible models for leave before the vote and an all important threshold to avoid dividing a nation on a divisive and inconclusive result?  
I'm looking forward to @jeremycorbyn answering the "how will you campaign in your second referendum" question as candidly as @EmilyThornberry and @johnmcdonnellMP - both of whom said they would back Remain. I can almost hear the creaking verbal contortions... 
The Labour manifesto in 2017 clearly stated that we accepted the referendum result.I will be sticking to the promise that I made to my constituents and voting against any attempt to force a second referendum. 
Some of Corbyn's best lies:•The train is ram-packed•I'll deal with student debt•I didn't lay wreath for Munich terrorists•I haven't appeared on Iran Press TV since 2009•I voted Remain•I'm not anti-semitic•I'll respect the result of the referendum#SecondReferendum 
  Starting to feel like Brexit is dead 
They don't back a second referendum.They back their own vision for BrexitThey back taking no deal off the table. If all else fails THEN they back a referendum of May's deal vs remain as a last resort.In short their conference position since last year.Buck up Andrew. 
Brexit getting you down? Bad news all over the media? Trump getting on your thrupenny bits? Well then to take your mind of it all, here is Emily Hitting a ball.  
And now, in less than three hours, it begins to unravel.. Reuters: "Labour spokesman says referendum giving choice between May's deal and Remain would not be acceptable." 
Patrick Blower on Theresa May and Brexit delays #FinalSay #PeoplesVote - political cartoon gallery in London  
#BreakingNews | Preliminary Results of the referendum in #Cuba The new Constitution of the Republic of Cuba has been ratified with 86, 85% of the voters. 
MPs trying to delay and stop a “clean break Brexit” are in breach of the Theft Act 1968 and should be taken to court, this Leave supporter claimed @IainDale | #SecondReferendum 
There is going to be another referendum. This time we will not fail to take the fight to the liars.The lying, cheating politicians and oligarchs. We've had our Dunkirk. Soon we will take their beaches, and not stop until Europe is rid of their kind. 
A #PeoplesVote is definitely on the cards now. So it's time to let your MP know how much you want that vote and how much you want an option to Remain. If you can still vote and haven't registered, get on it! It's time to stop #Brexit, and we need every single one of you. 
Typical of many messages tonight. Remain would lose a second referendum and big. Labour have just lost a lot of votes and rightly so.  
Emily Thornberry says Labour's position would be to campaign for Remain if there were to be a second referendum. Is this the correct position? #Brexit #PeoplesVote #BrexitMeansBrexit 
Now that Labour has done a 180 on its 2017 manifesto pledge to implement the result of the EU referendum, does that mean @OwenJones84, @AaronBastani, @mattzarb, et al think every Labour MP should stand again in a by-election? (H/t @Jamin2g) 
If the Brits are going to have another referendum then the rest of Europe should have a simultaneous referendum on whether we kick them out anyway for being an unbelievable pain in the arse for the last 2 years 
"Jeremy, the party is falling apart. The CLPs will put up with a lot, but hating the EU and hating Jews at the same time is just too much for them""So you're saying""Yes. You have to pick one""OK. Got you. Second Referendum with an option to Remain it is" 
I am baffled that supposedly serious politicians cannot see what a terrible, dangerous, appalling idea a 2nd referendum is or the catastrophes holding one would invite. Do they just not care if there are daily street battles for months? Does that not seem like a big deal to them? 
Says a man who says Asian women look like letter boxes and, with us mate @Jacob_Rees_Mogg hangs out with the repellent Steve Bannon. Boris — you are NOT the victim here. And brexit is adored by the hard right  
I'm saddened to see how many people seem to prioritise Brexit over anti-Semitism when it comes to the Labour leadership. 
Ever since Arron Banks made the largest political donation in British history, he's been dogged by questions about where he got the money 
How is having a second referendum betraying anyone!  If people still want to Leave the vote will be the same.  
Britain's Labour Party moved Tuesday toward supporting a second referendum on Brexit amid fears the U.K. could crash out of the European Union without a deal next month.  
A Kangaroo Vote / "2nd referendum" is a ghastly idea that cld lead to months of daily violence that wld scar our politics for generations. For the love of all that is decent, orderly & honourable, if you must cancel Brexit just do it! Don't pretend. #NoKangarooVote 
Labour are now backing a second EU referendum. Pledge your support to The Brexit Party now. 
Brexit: Labour will back amendment for second referendum, says Corbyn – Politics live  
I hate the weasel words on Brexit. There were arguments on both sides of the debate. BUT, we voted leave. In a democracy that must be acted upon. Failure to act is tyranny & don't get me onto the so called 'People's Vote' Dr Goebbels could not do better. We had the people's vote. 
For those of you slagging me off for not toeing the party line, I've never supported a 2nd referendum and never will. I am not a shadow cabinet MP, bound by collective responsibility. I'm just a woman with an opinion.  
A 2nd referendum would be great, not just for protecting jobs, securing our children’s futures & generally not destroying this country but just imagine the amount of money cunts like Jacob Rees-Mogg are gonna lose.Their arses must be twitching like a rabbit’s nose. 
Ben Jennings on Theresa May and Brexit delays – cartoon  
Labour seems to have betrayed their Brexit-supporting working class voters, so the Conservative Party should step up and offer these voters an alternative by getting us a clean Brexit.But "can it?" is the question. With May as leader pushing the WA I highly doubt it's able to. 
New march for a People's Vote on Brexit receives £250,000 in matter of days  
David Vance livestream. 1. Tommy Robinson #Panodrama 2. Brexit betrayal and 3. Immigration scam  
This is an interesting exploration of the issue of Royal Consent (sic), arguing that the govt has explicitly to seek Royal Consent for the Cooper Bill to pass, hence Brexit can only be delayed with the government's agreement & collaboration.  
You are making labour a joke, how is this brexit???? You should be doing all you can to deliver what the people voted for and if that means no deal, then so be it. I can’t vote labour again whilst you are in charge. 
Tusk says delaying Brexit would be the ‘rational solution’.Simon Coveney would accept 21 month delay to Brexit.If there remained any doubt that delaying Brexit was a bad idea, this confirms it for me.  
NEW Labour MP Lucy Powell says as many as 25 Labour colleagues could vote against a second referendum #Brexit 
@UKLabour support for a 2nd referendum is about stopping more defections to save the  Corbyn/Momentum project. It is a deeply cynical move and gives party members false hope. Corbyn remains a Eurosceptic and knows Tories+DUP+ Labour MPs who are opposed means it will be defeated. 
All on the basis Labour’s own Brexit plan is voted down by Parliament, which it is expected to be. 
While the Brexit result happened before Trump's win, both the campaigns were ran simultaneously... "Cambridge Analytica was a UK company at the time.." "Trump wanted the Cambridge Analytica Brits here now.." "Bannon called Keiser.." "Bannon played the central role.."Here's how:  
2. Len was apparently going to double down on a speech on Brexit today but it got canned as leadership shift became apparent 
.@jeremycorbyn will tell a meeting of Labour MPs that the party will support a second #Brexit referendum  
If it is indeed now the position of the Labour Party to back a 2nd Brexit referendum with the option of remaining in the European Union on the ballot, this is a major, seismic development in British politics.  
Ive never marched or protested in my life, but by God I will for #Brexit  
Labour’s great sell-out on Brexit has begun all because @jeremycorbyn fears more MPs will quit his party un press he agrees to a 2nd referendum 
In my humble opinion there is only one way to break the #Brexit deadlock, hold another referendum with 3 unmistakeable options - how would you vote? 
If we do have another referendum it should take the form of a 5000 word essay so that everyone can explain exactly what they want. 
It is excellent that Labour is backing a #PeoplesVote. The risk is that too many Labour MPs like @CarolineFlint will vote against it. We need them to understand that if they help Tory #Brexit pass, millions of Labour Remain voters will see little point in voting for Labour. 
#SecondReferendumWell it now looks like Labour are the enemy of anyone that voted for Brexit.Labour only care about their London vote.But don't worry "THE NORTH REMEMBERS"  
2,700+ people took part in the Tooting Brexit Poll:90% want a People’s Vote.7% support Theresa May’s deal.It’s why I’ve been campaigning for a People’s Vote. I’m proud to be Tooting’s representative in Parliament - very pleased to see Labour following our conference motion.  
Q. How do you ‘solve’ the current Labour anti-Semitism crisis?A. Announce you’ll back a second referendum & ignore it.Party over country, anti-Semites over Jews. The gospel of St Jezza, chapter 1, verse 1. 
The only short term impact this will have is destroying the IG (good).The only long term impact is that Labour will go into the next election as the party that tried to stop Brexit (good if you’re a Tory). But I suspect those who got us here will be long gone by then. 
Brandon Lewis has irony bypass. “Instead of working to thwart Brexit at this critical stage, Jeremy Corbyn should put the country’s interest before his party’s - by backing a deal that respects and delivers on the result of the referendum.” 
Shadow Foreign Secretary @EmilyThornberry tells @krishgm that Labour will back a Deal or Remain referendum and will campaign to Remain in the EU if it’s alternative Brexit plan is rejected. #c4news 
The Home Sec @sajidjavid is full of fine words about protecting the rights of #EU citizens in UK & UK citizens in #EU but he won’t commit to what’s necessary to defend them in the event of #NoDeal #Brexit. @the3million @BritishInEurope 
At last, Jeremy. Now Labour’s mission must be to prevent any Brexit | Polly Toynbee  
I honestly don’t see why everyone is getting so excited.Obviously remain would lose a second referendum, but more importantly, a 2nd referendum is no more likely today than yesterday.The only thing that has a parliamentary majority is a soft Brexit - that hasn’t changed. 
“The villains of this piece are Boris Johnson, David Davis and Liam Fox… They completely screwed it up,” says former deputy PM Lord Heseltine. “When it comes to leaving the EU we're on our own."More on #Brexit here:  
In the short term the greatest benefit of Brexit will be the recalibrating of our indolent, useless Parliament. It's already started, but the shit hasn't even begun to hit the fan. The next couple of years will see the Labour/Tory shitfest decimated. Politics abhors a vacuum. 
Labour Party is wrong to back calls for another #Brexit referendum. We took the decision to leave. Let’s respect that decision. Every time people of any EU country have voted against EU they have been forced to vote again till they get right result. Let’s not follow that course 
There’s no time to have a second referendum. Do you have any idea how long those Russian micro-targeted Facebook campaigns take to setup? #SecondReferendum 
Sitting today on the train to Brussels overhearing prominent MEP Brexit campaigner proclaiming “it’s all a mess!”It’s your bloody mess, mate. 
Will they, won’t they?Labour have said that they respect the referendum. Now they say that they will have a second referendum. They are lying to a lot of people. Question is, which half of the country are they lying to?  
Thornberry confirms on @Channel4News, Labour will amend for a straight choice between Tory Brexit and Remain. #ItsOn #PutItToThePeople 
This is unequivocal.Labour’s Emily Thornberry tells @itvnews there should be a second referendum. It should be Remain versus Theresa May’s deal on the ballot paper. She would vote for Remain. She would campaign for Remain. Jeremy Corbyn would campaign for Remain. 
People often suggest Theresa May only acts on Brexit to preserve her party. We must now wonder if the same can be said of Jeremy Corbyn. Facing breakaway and fury from Remainers he has moved position. But could it prompt breakaway and fury from the Lexiters? 
I don’t know why so many Brexiters are losing their shit right now over the prospect of a #secondreferendum. If Brexit really is the will of the people, then surely Brexiters must be supremely confident that the people will once again vote to leave the EU?  
Firstly, if you think it’s coincidental that a week after a group of MPs finally leave Labour the party is SUDDENLY offering some form of Brexit vote, I have a bridge to sell you.It’s pretty obviously a half-hearted attempt to try & stem the flow of others expected to leave. 
Can you remember the absolute stridency with which almost every Labour front bencher has condemned the very idea of a 2nd referendum?It’s a cliche but honestly - why should anyone believe anything their politicians tell them? Ever? 
English translation:Jeremy Corbyn's Labour want to betray the will of the British people & ignore the biggest democratic vote in our nation’s history.Labour have ripped up their promise and are now pursuing a divisive 2nd referendum that would take us back to square one.  
At last, Jeremy. Now Labour’s mission must be to prevent any Brexit | Polly Toynbee  
Just spoken in House of Commons about Govt’s chaotic approach to chemical regulation post Brexit. Minister has just told us the chemical database may not be ready.... 
Would Labour back Remain in a second referendum? Emily Thornberry tells @krishgm: "If it's a choice between that and a disastrous Tory Brexit, we will be campaigning to remain, because that's all we can do." #c4news 
Chester MP Chris Matheson: if the referendum were a sporting event it would have been disqualified. Why @ChrisM4Chester has our support @Liverpool4EU @RemainerNow @chesterforeu @StopBrexitMarch #revokeA50 
I will never get behind it. I will never agree to the betrayal of 17.4 million voters #Brexit 
‘Project fear’ has turned into #ProjectReality. Snowballing disinvestment & an unprecedented number of companies leaving Britain, this is the reality of #Brexit- a less competitive & poorer Britain.Jobs are at risk. People’s lives are being affected. #StopBrexit 
BREAKING : Shadow Foreign Secretary @EmilyThornberry confirms Labour will back a Deal or Remain referendum and will campaign to Remain in the EU if it’s alternative Brexit plan is rejected. 
Listening to #EmilyThornberry, seems that if Parl votes for Corbyn's #Lexit rather than May's #Brexit deal there may not be a #PeoplesVote.If that's so then be in No Doubt YOU'LL STILL LOSE the next GE as we will be opposing you.The Ppl must have a #FinalSay + #Remain option 
At PLP, John Mann tells Jeremy Corbyn the second referendum announcement will infuriate voters in the Midlands and the north of England: “This decision will stop you being Prime Minister.” 
"If we can't get through what we think is entirely reasonable, then anything else would be a disastrous Tory Brexit - and we would ask for the public to be able to have a vote on that." Emily Thornberry, the Shadow Foreign Secretary, to @krishgm. #c4news 
Reminders:1) Jeremy Corbyn could have stopped Nissan, Honda and 10,000s of other highly skilled jobs leaving by doing this 2 years ago 2) we still want to stop Brexit so Remain must be on the ballot paper 
Labour have reiterated their stance that they oppose "no deal" & May's farcical hard-right fudge of a deal, & would back another referendum in order to stop this Tory chaos.The waves of hate from both poles of the Brexit debate prove Labour is on the pragmatic centre ground. 
That's the announcement we were waiting for: @jeremycorbyn's plan or second referendum. @UKLabour on the offensive.#Brexit 
“He has caved in to save his own leadership”Jeremy Corbyn has betrayed the North over his second referendum backing, one furious Labour supporter told Nigel Farage @Nigel_Farage | #SecondReferendum 
Labour's Emily Thornberry  is on Ch 4 News stating that, if the Labour doesn't get it's Customs Union Brexit through, they'll back a second referendum with an option to remain. Both she and Corbyn would back remain. 
#channel4news@EmilyThornberry saying Labour will try to get its own version of #brexit, and if that fails Labour will ask for a public vote. She is clear that there will be a Remain option. And she says she and Corbyn would definitely vote to Remain.#PeoplesVote 
Emily Thornberry just confirmed on @Channel4News that if their version of Brexit fails to get passed by parliament, Labour will support a 2nd referendum with a vote between May's deal & Remain, & she would campaign strongly with Corbyn to Remain!@BremainInSpain 
"If Labour is embracing the idea of a final say referendum, I think we would be delighted. It changes the landscape here at Westminster entirely." Former Labour MP Angela Smith, who is now sits in the new Independent Group of MPs. 
Stephen Kinnock leaves meeting telling us "I still have deep reservations about having a referendum. I think it is going to be deeply divisive. I think it would have a corrosive impact on the role and sovereignty of Parliament and it is not clear to me what the question will be." 
Emily Thornbury on @Channel4News has just said clearly that she would campaign for remain in any 2nd referendum. Wow. That is really surprising. 
By getting @jeremycorbyn to support a second referendum the pro-EU Blairites in the party caught two birds with one stone: derail #Brexit and, as a result, kill off most chances of @jeremycorbyn actually getting elected. Nice move, I'll give them that. 
Britain's Labour Party backs a second referendum on Brexit, reversing longstanding resistance  
In light of the fact Labour have just announced they will push for a second referendum on #Brexit, please answer the poll below and RT for a wider audience! Who will you vote for at the next election? #LabourBrexitBetrayal #Labour #Brexit #StandUp4Brexit @TimePartyUK 
A #SecondReferendum should either be to leave with a deal or to leave without a deal .... to remain in the EU would be a betrayal of trust to the millions who voted in the referendum. 
"Is Labour now backing a 2nd Referendum?" asks @krishgm "It is" replies @peterkyle#c4news 
Before anyone jumps in to tell me voting is only for UK citizens: non-UK EU citizens could vote in Scottish referendum and non-UK Commonwealth citizens could vote in the EU referendum. A #SecondReferendum should include all UK citizens and all non-UK residents directly affected. 
Michael Gove, a minister in the first UK government ever to have been found in contempt of Parliament, says a second referendum “would do real damage to our politics”. 
Now that Labour backs a people’s vote on Brexit, what do the Independent Group actually stand for? Serious question, funny answers only please! 
The day a political party refuses to honour democracy, is the day it is no longer fit to contribute to our democracy. #Brexit #SecondReferendum 
Hmm “growing calls for PM to delay Brexit” my arse. Increasing fear-mongering howling from BBC, Sky & Remain Parliament to thwart Brexit more like. They are playing with fire trying to make overturning democracy “ok” because otherwise...well they are never asked “why?” Maddening 
Labour backs a second referendum: It's not quite time to break out a bottle of bubbly, but you could certainly justify a glass or two  
My view is that a referendum between Remain and May's deal - which is Brexit shorn of all the fantasy land nonsense of the first campaign - is eminently winnable. 
So if Labour now backs a second referendum what will be their position — Leave or Remain? 
A good news day @Remain_Labour @LabPeoplesVote @BestForBritain @peoplesvote #Brexit  
Never forget that Corbyn, personally, and his top team have always been pro-Brexit. Their motivation is obfuscate, dilly dally, and blame the Tories until they come apart, win a General Election and start work on their Revolution.Not to prevent Brexit. 
Yes, about 330 days before Brexit, as opposed to the 30 days left now.  
People Vote campaigner @SDoughtyMP absolutely beaming after PLP meeting - backing the plan for a push for Labour’s plan this week and then backing a referendum amendment on meaningful vote...  
You know what is really disappointing - how all Corbyn has to do is dangle a morsel about Brexit and it’s as if to lots of people his racism and bullying doesn’t matter. I am as Remain as they come, but come on folks 
Does a leopard change its spots?I’m reading this as a rather cynical move by Corbyn who has no intention of having a 2nd referendum to:- Shore up Parliamentary party.- Appease pro-EU grassroots.- Hammer nail into 2nd Ref coffin as motion is unlikely to pass.  
Bait and Switch! Labour pledged in 2017 to leave the EU, Single Market & Customs Union - now it wants to overturn Brexit with a second referendum. Corbyn has betrayed millions of people outside his London bubble who voted for him in order to leave the EU.  
Impassioned speech from @CarolineFlintMP warning that if Lab backs a 2nd referendum "there will never be unity" in the party. 
At least they've finally admitted they never had any intention of respecting the result of the #referendum. 71% of #Mansfield voters voted #leave - I doubt they'll forget this in a hurry #Brexit #Betrayal 
Should have know a night out, a game of pool and a big breakfast would see @theresa_may right on Brexit. Only language the British understand.    
.@DavidLammy now tacks back to Brexit to say Remain must be on the 2nd referendum ballot paper. Applauded. 
Why has World War Two been so evoked in the Brexit debate ? We’ve heard Leavers and Remainers talking Dunkirk and claiming Churchill for themselves. We’re taking a look on #c4news tonight 
All the people behind delaying Article 50 want to remain in the EU - delaying Article 50 is a tactic & the start of the slippery slope to defying the will of the people & the referendum result #get2knowwto#StandUp4Brexit#LeaveMeansLeave#Brexit  
The @DavidGauke @AmberRuddHR @GregClarkMP trio have certainly had an effect.  First they’ve ensured May got zip on the backstop from the EU. Then they’ve given encouragement to 2nd referendum campaigners. 
Corbyn finally backing a second referendum is like somebody watching their house burning down for weeks and only deciding to call the fire brigade when there’s just the door left. 
Finally some good sense in Britain: Labour Party Leader, Under Pressure, Backs a New Brexit Referendum  British leaders shouldn't lead their country over a cliff because of one flawed referendum based on misinformation and disinformation. 
Theresa May can no longer be allowed to continue in her dangerous, reckless tunnel-vision. #Brexit 
Stop fannying around with People's voteThe union of 1707 had its last chance when it ignored Scotland over Brexit and gave Northern Ireland a special deal  
British friends (and the people who love them), does this mean there's a chance Brexit won't happen? Or is it still time to start stockpiling cat food? 
NEW: Our Chairman, John Longworth on Labour's call for a second referendum:"A cowardly decision from a man who should never be trusted with the Premiership of this country. Jeremy Corbyn."  
Answers beginning to come re Labour & referendum. Corbyn will back vote on a Brexit deal & Remain but not just yet. Here’s ⁦@UKLabour⁩ briefing for Labour MPs. Reads like result of long & still ongoing internal wrangling 
POLL: If Britain had a second referendum, how would you vote? Please RT!! #Europe #SecondReferendum 
A very important step. Given that #Labour doesn’t want a catastrophic no-deal, doesn’t want TheresaMay’s disastrous deal, and as it becomes clearer that she won’t go for any alternative deal, then the only option left is stopping #Brexit via a public vote: 
One by-product of my Brexit journey is to have become sceptical of Climate Change Scepticism. Didn't really have a view before but CCS is backed by (for me what is now) a roll call of the ignorant, the unreliable and the unhinged. 
If there is to be a #secondreferendum, we will commit the unspeakable, anti-democratic crime of asking the British people: "now that you know exactly what Brexit means, do you still want us to do it? The choice is yours." 
final straw for me. I will be demanding my union do not donate my membership fee share to Labour.  Labour has a leader I have no faith in or much in common with. now you want to ignore the referendum vote and disregard your election promises and manifesto. 
You just can’t trust @uklabour. A couple of weeks ago Emily Thornbury was on #bbcqt saying that they would respect the outcome of the referendum, she was obviously lying. 
Diane Abbott got it right on the second referendum... remainers should be careful what they wish for. Against a second referendum? Join Leave Means Leave today:  
“I’m delighted that Jeremy Corbyn now agrees we should put Brexit back to the People. Although it’s outrageous that he sacked me 12 months ago for suggesting the same policy.”  
Does anyone know if Corbyn’s sudden leaning towards the potential promise of a second referendum is written on the same parchment as his promises to deal with antisemitism? 
Labour must be clear that Remain will be on the ballot paper in a second EU referendum. Scotland did not vote for Brexit and we must not be dragged out of the EU against our will. Remaining is by far the best deal of all - and the only way to protect jobs and living standards.  
Did Jeremy Corbyn agree to back a second referendum vote in Parliament 
On #Brexit blackmail and the EU « budging » . My latest thoughts from Brussels   
Breaking News: The British opposition Labour Party said it would support a new Brexit referendum, offering new hope to opponents of withdrawal from the E.U.  
Ok, I’ll bite, what’s a referendum? 
BACK OF THE NET! Alan Partridge returns *and* Labour to back a second Brexit Referendum  
Nigel would like nothing more than for Brexit to be stopped. That way he can continue to play the victim and get paid for it by being an MEP. It’s a perfect scenario for him.  
Time for a "BREXIT ALLIANCE" of all the Brexit Parties. An electoral pact can work. An alliance can wipe the liblabcon out in the locals.Brexiteers need it. The Country desperately need it.Agree? 
“DEMOCRACY IS A SHAM” Big Bro Breaksdown Brexit! Subscribe to my YouTube channel for the full up coming episodes. #theblackopinion @ADDOINK #bigbro #saragarvey #marcusloveless 
Angela Rayner in January: “Let me be clear - I think that if we end up in a second referendum then us as politicians have failed the public. We have failed to be able to do our job." 
UK’s opposition Labour party will support a second referendum on Brexit in a crucial vote in Parliament later this week  
There never should have been a “Tory Brexit”, or a “Labour Brexit”.This topic supersedes party politics and should have been worked on cross party from day one... The fact that it has been used to push party/personality politics is shameful.#ToryBrexit #Brexit  
Liberal Democrats have led the fight for a People's Vote for two and a half years. If Corbyn has truly shifted position & now backs a People's Vote on the Brexit deal with the option to stay in the EU we welcome him to the fight. Demand a People's Vote >  
NEW: This is the PLP brief Labour MPs have just been sent. It’s pretty clear Remain would be on the ballot paper in a second vote, and a no deal Brexit would not be option.  
URGENT: Ignore what the press is saying Labour has NOT tabled an amendment for a second Brexit referendum 
An EU negotiator about Brexit : “it is like a divorce where one of the two partners has packed his bags and is sitting on them in the hallway because he cannot find the door.”  
Dear @jeremycorbyn, if you agree to a #PeoplesVote, will you open the franchise to the 16-18 years old and the 5 million EU citizens living in the UK and UK citizens living in the EU?Cc @the3million @BritishInEurope @eucitizenschamp(#The5Million #Brexit #bargainingchip #labour) 
Strong message from the Conservative grassroots .... The motion backing Brexit that every Conservative Association should pass during this AGM season   
Brexit Party, SDP, Time, For Britain, UKIP, Tories, Sovereign will all benefit from Corbyn's cowardice.  
All this nonsense on this thread, this is following precisely what was agreed at Conference. Try for a GE (failed thanks to cowards from the Tory side), now trying to put forward a sane soft BREXIT that the EU actually likes & the House might have a majority for, if not a PV. 
The most important thing to do now if you hate Jeremy Corbyn is to come up with scenarios about how whatever he says or does to do with Brexit, he's not doing what he really wants to do. And he's lying. Or both. 
Can I get a refund on my international driving licences as it looks like brexit won’t happen now . 
Labour had no choice but to support a #SecondReferendum.1000s of Jobs in Labour heartlands like Sunderland depend on having zero barriers to European Trade. But that would mean a Brexit where we simply follow EU rules but no longer shape them.. 
This is in the PLP brief that has just gone out to all Labour MPs, makes it pretty clear that remain would be on the ballot for any second referendum  
Politicians more often than not forced to adopt positions, hopefully because of public pressure rather than private lobbying. Having despaired of Corbyn's position on Brexit wrongdoing, I commend his stance on a proper referendum on the real choices facing us with Leaves/Remain 
“Another referendum, a delay beyond the European elections, taking ‘no deal’ off the table or not leaving at all would betray the 2016 People’s Vote & damage democracy & our party for a generation.”  
The Prime Minister is acting reckless and we cannot sit by and allow that to happen. I don’t want to be in this position but the PM just won’t listen to reason. She’s running down the clock & it has to stop  #Brexit #PeoplesVote 
We're organising a strong #Brexit message for Remainer MPs overnight, backed by several other Brexit organisations.  When it's ready, will you help us to get this message endorsed by millioins on social media?#GoWTO #NoSurrender 
Instead of saying "I'm a Remainer but we'll lose a new referendum," start thinking about what you'll do to make sure that's not the case.Instead of saying "I'd rather remain but most of the campaign is awful" (agreed), think about what you'll do to make it less shit. 
The ERG group of Tory Brexiteers is suddenly staring down the barrels of a double barrelled shotgun : MPs rallying around both Delay and Second Referendum. Tonight could be the biggest boost to Theresa May's chances of getting her deal through. Will they buckle? 
Labour apparently now backs a second referendum although won’t say what the question would be. Its decision aligns it with the Liberal Democrats, TIG and against the wishes of the British people. It ignores the will of the greatest democratic majority in British history. Pathetic 
The truth is that @theresa_may is mentally unbalanced. Her obsession with Brexit & her determination to force it on us has quite literally driven an already cracked person mad.She is a danger to Britain & the British people. In many other countries, she'd have been removed.  
With Labour now supporting a referendum on the final Brexit deal - we can, as a country, work towards putting Brexit into the dustbin of history, as a bad idea that was never going to work. Demorcracy in action. Less electoral fraud this time around, please! #SecondReferendum 
Any pretence that Corbyn’s Labour backs Brexit is obliterated by this decision.Tonight there will be many Labour MPs representing Leave-supporting constituencies in the North of England and elsewhere worried for their political futures.UKIP is ready. 
Imagine being a Labour MP and voting against a new referendum, which might stop a disaster capitalist, workers' rights-removing, jobs destroying, right-wing Brexit, based on lies, cheating & false promises.Paraphrasing Tusk: There's a special place in hell for those Labour MPs.  
You said in May 2016: "In a 52-48 referendum this would be unfinished business by a long way"  
It seems to me that the following is now likely.1) There will be a long delay to Article 50.2) The Commons will vote for a new referendum; Theresa May's deal vs Remain.3) We are likely to vote to Remain.Only one thing can stop this; MPs voting for her deal on March 12th. 
This. Is. Not. A. New. Announcement. And yet there are just 23 working days to go until #Brexit. 
It's simple.We rejected our current relationship with the other EU countries in 2016.We spent 3 years seeking a new relationship.Those who voted Brexit hate it as it leaves us less sovereign than EU members.So a referendum on the Brexit deal is only logical.#SecondReferendum 
Govt ministers openly calling for Brexit “delay” (code for Remain) and Labour backing second referendum. The betrayal is here.  The people will not tolerate it.... 
It may be unfair, but my involuntary response to Labour saying they'll back a second referendum is to wonder which bit of the pending small print will clarify that they actually won't. 
If we have a second referendum on Brexit, I think that UK (including Scotland) will back Leave with a bigger percentage than before. 
Labour have been very clear if the PM won’t back our amendment for #Brexit this week, that can get support across the house then the time has come to stop a no deal scenario including a public vote #PeoplesVote 
Looks like second referendum courtesy of anti democratic Corbyn, what did we expect ? Time to shut down Parliament now Mrs May until March 30th. A Brexit by default is really our only hope. 
Corbyn's decision to back a Second Referendum, aside from its blatant disregard for the democracy he clearly only pretends to respect, represents the final abandonment by Labour of its traditional working-class electorate in its Midlands & Northern heartlands.Total betrayal. 
Sadly, my sister-in-laws nephew,18, was stabbed to death today in BirminghamWith Brexit: is anyone paying attention to double figure murders in Bham this yrLondon is much safer proportionatelyWhere’s the outrage?Why do our children have to die? 
Extremely welcome statement from our MP @ChrisM4Chester MP Chris Matheson on why he is losing respect for 2016 referendum  
Note to those of us who have backed the Labour leadership's attempts to steer a more adult course through the national schism of Brexit: ignore the inevitable credit that will be given to TINGE. They are irrelevant outside of the commentariat & a small shouty  Twitter bubble 
If Labours alternative Brexit plan is voted down, and they back a 'People's Vote', there will be 294 MPs that support this position.For it to pass, they need to persuade 26 MPs to also back it, which could come from the 35 who currently back a soft, Norway style Brexit.  
I’m afraid trust is gone.Does it include and Option to Remain or will it be more Tory v Labour Brexit.V unwise if so. That will just damage LP reputation further.  More disollusiomed members.Shame isn’t it?  All that hope and trust frittered away. 
What did you vote for the first brexit referendum and what will you vote if we have a second vote?Please retweet and see if we can get a big sample size. 
The Labour Party may now back a second referendum on Brexit. In January, we outlined why the best path out of Britain's muddle is through another vote  
If Brexit is delayed or a second Referendum is agreed prepare for trouble .Once you deny Democracy you allow anarchists to spread their Gospel.What might start as peaceful protest may well become a riot and how quickly can tensions spread.Paris will feel like a tea party. 
Urgent: ignore MSM – Labour has NOT tabled a referendum amendment  
Theresa May is playing chicken with people's livelihoods, running down the clock so the only options are her deal and no deal.Neither is acceptable and both would be bad for Scotland.Labour will do everything we can to prevent a damaging Tory Brexit being imposed. 
After meeting @UKLabour's Jeremy Corbyn and his team over the weekend @PES_PSE, I'm pleased that Jeremy Corbyn will back a new public vote on the #Brexit deal. But there are many hurdles to be crossed, and this week's Commons votes will be important.  
A huge step in the right direction. But we still need clarity on what will be on the second referendum ballot paper.I think it should be a two stage referendum:-Stage 1: No deal v May’s deal v RemainStage 2 (a week later): The top two choices from the Stage 1 vote.  
IF BREXIT IS BAD HOW COULD LEAVING A 300 OLD FAR MORE INTEGRATED UNION BE GREAT? JUST NOT LOGICAL!  
Labour Party chairman Ian Lavery promised Labour would not back a second vote Labour have betrayed millions of Brexit voters in the north who put many of their MPs in the seats they occupy. The electorate will not forget.  
Out of touch. The majority of both Conservative and Labour seats back leave. They are pandering to the Islington elite of the Labour Party and not their core blue collar working class voters who will feel betrayed by a second referendum.  
May's plans have few fans to defend 'emAnd if Labour cannot amend 'emNow Corbyn decreesThat Labour MPsShould vote for a new referendum. #Brexit#PeoplesVote#Corbyn 
Been concerned on this for a while. If any EU Referendum does not include a remain on current terms option then Mr Corbyn will have only added bitterly cruel deception to Mrs May’s already toxic fudge. 
If Labour helped bring about a second referendum, it would be a grotesque betrayal of its traditional working-class voters. It would confirm that Labour is now a party of the upper middle classes, not working people. 
But of course they are. #Brexit  
BREAKING: Jeremy Corbyn is announcing at PLP meeting tonight that #Labour will back an amendment calling for a new referendum on #Brexit 
It will soon become clear that @JeremyCorbyn does not have the power to deliver a second referendum. Today’s announcement is a good move because it will expose certain members of our party for the trouble makers that they are. 
Or it could be more flannel designed to deflect pressure for a second referendum, rather than ensure one happens. 
Good luck to Labour MPs in the many, many Brexit-backing constituencies outside the M25.@JeremyCorbyn has tossed aside his principles to appease the Blairites. The party will not be forgiven in its Northern heartlands! Support us at  
‘some form of referendum’ - ??  
Corbyn has delivered the final stab in the back to millions of his traditional voters and is now backing Remain. All to appease his own MPs and Remainers hell bent on keeping our borders open and making us poorer in the EU.Watch the Tories and Farage's Brexit party bloom.  
The cleverness of the Kyle-Wilson amendment is that it in theory allows Labour MPs to tell Leave voters to say "I voted for the deal", and to tell Remain voters they voted for a referendum. Has some purchase among the 29 Labour MPs to vote against whip for a harder Brexit. 
Labour leader Jeremy Corbyn will tell MPs that the party will back a second Brexit referendum "to prevent a damaging Tory Brexit"  
Labour comes out against the wishes of millions of Labour voters who chose LEAVE!  With May working on an indefinite delay to Brexit or else her #FakeBrexit truly our politicians are in revolt against OUR wishes. 
Jeremy Corbyn has been proved right time and time again and we shouldn't doubt him now. With May's despicable brinkmanship taking us within a whisper of a no-deal brexit, Labour had to make a move. #JC4PM2019 
We now have Theresa May running down the Brexit clock, The Ind. Group running down their time as MP's to avoid by-elections and the Tory gov. running down the country, like a bulldozer on steroids. Only Labour wants to lift up the country with their manifesto. #GeneralElectionNow 
Is @jeremycorbyn now backing another EU referendum ? Not yet but we’re told he will if MPs don’t vote to back Labour approach to Brexit. What sort of referendum ? We don’t know cos Labour aren’t saying. Will it include the option to Remain? We don’t know cos Labour aren’t saying 
We're about to be bamboozled out of the Referendum result by BBC bias & the collective forces of an elite socialised, bureaucratic & authoritarian Europe. We mustn't let this happen. It'll be an end to individual freedom &democracy as we know it (of which there's none in the EU). 
Corbyn backing a 2nd Referendum. 
Q: How can Corbyn convince everyone he's backing a 2nd referendum without actually backing a 2nd referendum at crunch time?A: By crafting an amendment calling for a referendum which Remain leaning Tories can't or won't support. Meaning it is doomed to fail.  
UK: Leader of the Opposition Jeremy Corbyn (LAB-S&D) calls for a second Brexit referendum. #Brexit 
I just had to tell a very excited Matthew Paris that the Labour motion on a second referendum is yet more meaningless guff - which perfectly sums up their ‘position’ on Brexit. 
Labour to back moves for second Brexit referendum  
Labour: The Conservatives are putting party ahead of country.Also Labour: We know 7/10 of our constituencies voted to Leave but we now back a 2nd referendum as we’re worried of more defections happening.  
It is estimated that up to 70 Labour MPs will righty refuse to back a Second Referendum meaning a big loss. The story is yet more Labour turmoil  
Just in: Nigeria is deeply concerned about the Brexit crisis. the govt is ready to send observers to monitor second Brexit referendum  
Berlin set to hold referendum on banning big landlords and nationalising private rented housing  
25-02-2019 The Day the @UKLabour Party Died!! they have souled #Labour Soul to the devil, they have sold their own heartlands out in the North & Midlands, This will never be forgiven #SecondReferendum #Brexit  
Went to school in a Leave area, and have honestly not seen a single person on Facebook change their mind since voting. A second referendum could easily deliver a bigger majority for Leave. 
UK opposition leader Jeremy Corbyn to back call for #SecondReferendum on Brexit  
Declaring my stance right now: I dont give a f**k about a second referendum, I dont give a f**k about brexit, I give a f**k about getting the Tories OUT, getting a JC lead Labour government IN and tackling the damage done to our communities, services and environment. 
What are you so afraid of @Nigel_farage if the people still want Brexit as you say they do - they can vote for it again. Or do you only trust the *people* when you think they're on your side? Hmmm let me ponder that #FarageonLbc @lbc 
The choice should not and must not be between a "damaging Tory Brexit" and an equally damaging imaginary Labour one. #PutItToThePeople 
It's the magical Labour referendum rerun pledge! (examines small-print). A referendum on a magical Labour renegotiation for a new type of magical CU. All designed mainly so that after Brexit Labour leadership can say to Remain activists that they did offer a referendum, sort of. 
My latest op-ed in @thehill: Brexit is a short-sighted disaster that will weaken Britain, the EU, and the entire Western alliance. Here's what the United States needs to do protect our national security interests.  
Labour folks: JUST WAITI’m seeing a lot of spin and mischief from the media from just a couple of lines about a referendum in an otherwise  long Labour announcement on Brexit. Do what we’ve done for the past 5 years, keep faith in Jeremy and wait for what HE says himself on it.  
BBC: “Labour are not yet making clear what their proposed referendum would be on”. Remind me who’s running down the clock again... 
Very welcome. Very late; no doubt very unwillingly on the leadership’s part; but Labour members & voters, & the country, want it: so, very welcome: “Labour announce backing for a second Brexit referendum” - Sky News  
- You start your journey as a British child- Pokéballs and potions now cost 40% more- Surf is only available if you pay an annual fee- Most Pokémon Centers have closed due to lack of staff- You head to the first Gym, only to find it's been moved overseasPokémon: Brexit 
Just a reminder that @Keir_Starmer told #LabConf18 that there should be an #OptionToRemain in a #PeoplesVote #EUref referendum.#Brexit #FBPE #FinalSayForAll #PeoplesVoteMarch #OFOC #PutItToThePeopleMarch #FFS 
Mon ta fuck. As much as we love watching the Brits drag dog shit in on their carpet, I’d love to see them get a proper shot at an informed referendum. pic.twitter.com/7E5wqlZqkE 
Reminder that a second referendum would be much less of a gamble if Labour had spent the last 2.5 years making the case for migration. Committing to end freedom of movement was tactically stupid as well as morally bankrupt. 
Also, remember that Alex Salmond tabled an amendment for a quadruple lock to the EU Referendum Bill, meaning a leave win would have been dependent on all four nations voting for it. The amendment was rejected because "the referendum is advisory.” 
So @jeremycorbyn is going to say Labour will back a 2nd referendum (of some kind) on Brexit. Yeah, good luck with that, Jez. You’ve just told 17.4 million people - many of them lifelong Labour supporters - that their votes in 2016 didn’t matter. I’m sure they won’t mind at all... 
R.I.P. Labour in the northern heartlands! : Labour prepared to back new Brexit referendum  
If the @TheIndGroup can force Labour towards a new Brexit vote with 8 defections, imagine what 8 more might achieve... 
I suspect what Corbyn has just done will be enough to ensure Brexit voters believe he is anti-Brexit and Remain voters believe he is anti-Remain. 
Labour says it is prepared to back a second EU referendum. Get my live reaction only on @LBC. 
This is a big step towards uniting our party and most importantly our country. No Brexit deal meets the fantasy promised in 2016. So the only way any specific form of Brexit can be made legitimate is through ratification in a #PeopleVote which includes the option to remain. 
Labour leader Jeremy Corbyn has come out in favor of a "public vote" on Brexit  
It’s been a long, hard struggle to make the principled case for putting Brexit back to voters but today is a significant milestone.What once seemed fancible is fast becoming common sense.Well done to everyone who helped get us here.Let’s make sure it happens now!  
TIG effect being felt in both big parties...Big move towards second referendum from Leader of the Opposition.Expectations of a move towards A50 delay this week from in Government. 
If Brexit is delayed or fudged, there will be millions of us joining you.  
Labour's announcement does NOT mean it is backing all efforts for a 2nd referendum, or a 'People's Vote' on the deal, or an in/out 2nd referendumIt likely means it will probably end up backing Kyle/Wilson (GFA style vote post facto a deal) IFThere is no deal by March 12 
Did say this. None of what we’re seeing from the Labour leadership is about protecting the Jewish community from anti-Semitism. Or the nation from Brexit. All about protecting themselves from TIG. 
Labour to back second referendum. What an insult to 17.4 million Brexit voters. Many working class Labour voters will be totally disgusted. Politics is realigning.  
Very good news that @UKLabour frontbench backing principle of @peoplesvote_uk - as the reality of Brexit becomes clearer day by day so the demands for a route out of the madness grow 
An utter betrayal.61% of Labour constituencies voted to #Leave.  This is a slap in the face everyone who trusted the main parties to deliver on their instruction.This follows a proud #EU tradition. We don't like the result so vote again you idiots.#Brexit #PeoplesVote 
Never, ever forget. More than 17,400,000 of us Brits voted to Leave the EU. Leave won that Referendum. The parliamentarians have been given a clear instruction. 
ERG strong and united. There aren't the votes in Parliament for Cooper-Boles or a Second Referendum or an extention of A50 beyond EU elections. PM should be given the chance to get a better deal. Nothing has changed. 
A government committed to postponing Brexit and an opposition now disgracefully backing yet another vote.17.4 million Brexiteers are politically homeless. The people have been ignored, the betrayal is almost complete. Help us fight to save Brexit at  
Just finishing a 2,000-word think piece on whether the creation of the Independent Group makes it more likely that Labour backs a second referendum 
My message to all of the Lexit people unhappy about Labour backing a fresh public vote on Brexit is simple: Stop attacking the leadership and trust Jeremy, you Blairites. 
Labour says it is prepared to back another EU referendum to prevent a "damaging Tory #Brexit"  
Labour leader Jeremy Corbyn is to tell the Parliamentary Labour Party that the party will support or put forward an amendment in favour of a "public vote" on Brexit.  
Would be interesting to see Labour try to get away with publicly backing another referendum and then adding "Oh by the way you can't have Remain on the paper." And by interesting we of course mean "utterly enraging". 
BUT what it does mean is if that amendment is rejected (spoiler alert, it will be) then Labour will back or table an amendment for a public vote if the only other option left on the now very sparse table is a "tory brexit deal." in practice, that could mean Kyle-Wilson. 
I still have intense reservations about a second referendum without it being a manifesto commitment. However, the fact that Labour are announcing they'll support one in parliament this week is really going to boil some Tingependent Group piss.And that I can back wholeheartedly. 
Jeremy Corbyn is moving towards a second referendum. But many a slip twixt cup & lip 
Here's what Labour is proposing:1. An amendment to make our credible plan the Government’s negotiating objectives2. To support an amendment in favour of a public vote to prevent a damaging Tory Brexit3. To oppose no deal in all circumstances 
A Labour spokesman says the party will back a second referendum on Brexit and "one way or another, we will do everything in our power to prevent no-deal" 
BREAKING: Britain's main opposition Labour Party is backing a second referendum on Brexit, the party has announced. 
The Government has failed in its Brexit negotiations. We face a bad deal or no deal - both would cause huge damage. People from every corner of our country have been calling for a final say. Good to see @jeremycorbyn plans to support an amendment in favour of a public vote. 
Told around 70 Labour MPs would vote to stop a second ReferendumIMHO Corbyn hoping here that he gets the plaudits but never has to actually go through with it 
I don't want to leave the EU, but I as resident of Scotland I don't see much of a point in voting in a second EU referendum. Our votes don't matter. Once again this will be decided in England. That's just a fact. 
#RIP Samir Flores Soberanes. Environmental Activist in #Mexico was gunned down two days before a pipeline referendum. He was leading the campaign to stop it. RT to shine a light on all activists who give everything to save everything.  
Will a second referendum amendment make it past parliament? My guess is a tentative no. But if the left *does* find itself having to make the case for staying in the EU vs bad deal or no deal, here are my thoughts on how it can avoid the errors of 2016. 
A second referendum?Labour is spitting in the face of thise who voted leave: 61% of its constituencies,  the North, the Midlands, South Wales... the working class.The Blairites of the Independent Group have won.The working class have lost.Hugely disappointing. 
Labour tried a compromise but Theresa May refused to listen. We cannot give Liam Fox a blank cheque to write trade deals that will undermine equality and public services further. Therefore the option left is fighting for a second referendum. This move makes total sense! #Brexit  
BETRAYAL: Corbyn's Labour to back second referendum. What a disgusting insult to the 17.4 million Brits who voted for Brexit.  
Telling that the “we need action on anti-Semitism or MPs will leave” narrative has suddenly been replaced with the “if we get action on a second referendum MPs will stay narrative”. Telling and shameful. 
Remain  would  lose  a  second  referendum 
Brexit: Labour agrees to back amendment for new EU referendum in major policy shift>Brilliant   
.@DavidLammy - Welcome that Labour now signalling it will support giving public final say on Brexit 
No idea why journalists are lying about Labour’s latest Brexit Amendment. Check out the exact wording here yourself. #BrokenMedia 
Labour’s move on second EU referendum seems, on face of it, v positive. But instinct says we should wait for detail. A referendum with no remain option would be ludicrous - so hopefully that’s not the proposal.  
This is a disastrous error of judgement. Taken to appease people who actively work for his political destruction. @jeremycorbyn @SeumasMilne #Brexit  
Jeremy Corbyn promised that the EU referendum decision was a one off choice between staying in the EU and leaving completely. Is he going to break that promise?  
If this is confirmed, and I expect there will be more strings attached than is clear at first glance, then it's fair to say that @TheIndGroup has achieved rather more on Brexit in a week than other opposition parties have in 2.5 years  
And if there is another EU referendum how do those that campaigned for Remain in Scotland but then supported the PM in her attempts to Leave, campaign with any credibility & without admitting they were wrong? [I’m looking at you @DavidMundellDCT & @RuthDavidsonMSP ] 
Labour to back second referendum on Brexit, party announces 
Our case and @ukeuchallenge have established the following points:1) because the referendum was not binding, it cannot be switched off, even though it was so corrupt it would have been if it were;2) becuse it was *advisory* we have to do it.  
Labour finally betray the working classes they once professed to represent, as they back a #LosersVote Notice how, not once, did Corbyn announce his Brexit position   
“My concern re. postponing Art50 and extending the deadline, is that these are procedural devices which are clearly motivated to try to stop the implementation of the referendum result. That would be regrettable for democracy” Theresa Villiers#StandUpForBrexit #DelayMeansRemain 
All the conspiracy theorists with newspaper columns who’ve spent the past few months thrusting their “expert analysis” onto the public - consisting of such hot takes as “Corbyn wants a no deal Brexit because he’s a disaster socialist” - have all of a sudden gone very quiet  
That’s why, in line with our conference policy, we are committed to also putting forward or supporting an amendment in favour of a public vote to prevent a damaging Tory Brexit being forced on the country.” 2/3 
Jeremy Corbyn tonight: “We will also be backing the Cooper-Letwin amendment to rule out a No Deal outcome. One way or another, we will do everything in our power to prevent No Deal and oppose a damaging Tory Brexit based on Theresa May’s overwhelmingly rejected deal” - 1/3 
Already seeing scores of qualified journalists lying about Labour’s new Brexit Amendment. Here is the exact wording so you can see it for yourself. Journalism is broken in this country.  
BREAKING: It's just been announced that Labour will back a public vote on Brexit. It's absolutely right that the people have a say on any final deal, including an option to remain. Thanks to everyone who has kept up the pressure.  
About bloody time too! >> Brexit: Labour will back amendment for second vote, says Corbyn  
Labour agrees to back amendment for new Brexit referendum  
Labour back second Brexit referendum  
The Labour Party have now completed their betrayal of their Leave vote in a desperate attempt to win back support from the Independent Group by endorsing a second referendum. Considering how many Leave constituencies hold Labour MPs, this is an absolute disgrace! 
Labour announce backing for a second Brexit referendum  
A spokesman for Labour says the party will back a second referendum on Brexit and will do everything it can to prevent the UK leaving the European Union without a deal. 
Labour to support a second Brexit referendum. Complete betrayal of all those who voted leave and then for the Labour party, which promised to respect the result. Corbyn lied. 
I've looked at the numbers on this before and I estimated that *even if* Labour backed a second referendum, the numbers to get one through aren't there. See visual below - which suggests an anti-referendum majority of 49.  
Brexit might just possibly, after a period of negotiation, prevarication, false denouements, smoke and mirrors that wouldn’t fool a toddler, your uncle’s drunk magic tricks, Farcey McFarcefacery, and a sprinkling of fingers-crossed lies, mean Brexit. But then again it might not 
It's all hands on deck to prevent a No Deal Brexit.That meansLabour's putting Brexit deal w/ permanent customs union to ParliamentLabour's putting a second referendum amendment to Parliament Labour's whipping to get MPs to vote for Cooper & Letwin amendments  
Labour's frontbench will also put forward their own version of a Brexit deal with the five demands put forward to Theresa May. And will whip to support Cooper-Letwin efforts to stop no deal. 
BREAKING: Jeremy Corbyn to table amendment on Labour's Brexit plans and if defeated (which it will be) will "put forward or support an amendment in favour of a public vote". 
NEW - Labour announces it will put forward or support a second referendum amendment this week.Likely to cause with some MPs this week 
Another great insight from #TheresaMay !After“#Brexit means Brexit”we now have “Delay means delay”which she says she opposes, despite having herself delayed the vote on her #BrexitDeal again and again! Deluded means deluded... 
BREAKING: "Corbyn will tell a meeting of Labour’s PLP this evening that party will back the Cooper-Letwin amendment to take ‘No Deal’ off the table and announce that Labour will also put forward or support an amendment in favour of a public vote to prevent a damaging Tory Brexit"  
Prediction: If Corbyn does commit to a 2nd ref (most likely, it would be a choice between a Lab Deal & Remain after GE win), the Blairites will continue to abandon Labour.Nothing Corbyn can say, except "I resign", will stop them leaving. It's not Brexit they hate ~ it's Corbyn.  
The EU27 are far less prepared for no-deal Brexit than you’d think  All of which points to the self-harming madness of EU obstinacy on the backstop. It's no good the EU's saying the backstop was our idea. Parliament has rejected it crushingly. 
 Second referendum klaxon: Multiple Labour sources telling us that Jeremy Corbyn planning to indicate to MPs tonight that party moving towards People's Vote BUT it will be nuanced and not happening yet... 
One Lab source thinks the new plan is to back the Kyle-Wilson amendment - with a twist.Instead of approving the PM's deal, it would be to approve Labour's version of a Brexit deal, but followed by referendum.  
Extending Brexit beyond deadline 'rational solution', says EU president Tusk  
Labour source says big Brexit announcement coming before tonight's meeting of MPs - likely to kick defections off the agenda. Sounds like it's something to please the second referendum campaigners... 
growing drumbeat of rumour that Labour will back Kyle/Wilson amendment supporting May deal in return for putting it to a 2nd referendum....shadow cabinet Brexit sub-committee meeting this afternoon....but I'm being steered away from a definitive announcement today 
Brexit in one profile picture   
Berlin set to hold referendum on banning big landlords and nationalising their private rented housing  
Read this clutching your head, in case it explodes! TL/DR: wrongdoing during the referendum doesn't invalidate it because it was only advisory. Had it not been advisory...  
Liam Fox announcing that only 43 of 109 EU Trade Remedies will be transited for post Brexit UK- from ironing boards to foil. Not WTO-compliant to transition where no UK production says 34% import tariff on solar glass from china removed/ 10% tariff reduction on Thai sweetcorn. 
Looks like one of Japan's major trading companies, Marubeni, is making Brexit preparations to move its European HQ from UK to Germany. It set up a branch in the UK of Marubeni International Europe GmbH 8 Feb 2019 = what Sony + Panasonic did before shifting HQs out of UK. 1/ 
If you side with #Remain then watch the very clear statement from the outsetIf you side with #Leave then watch the very clear statement from the outset#Brexit 
If MPs fail to support the #CostaAmendment it would be a tragedy. There is no excuse at all not to support it. Many MPs from all parties, and both sides of the Brexit fence, have already done so. Party politics play no role here: get united behind what is right. It’s that simple.  
I'm afraid ERG and other Brexit extremists either don't understand Borders and International Trade or are being deliberately dishonest. Why do they still get to pronounce on matters they clearly don't have the knowledge to do so  
The only people who want a delay are the people who don't want Brexit. We must leave on 29th March, deal or no deal. 
Top E.U. official calls for extension of Brexit deadline  
No-deal Brexit will mean only three flavours of crisps 
For Michael Gove and Boris Johnson, Brexit was never meant to be about leaving the EU.Thread.  (1/x) 
Wow the Simpsons predicted the only solution to Brexit  
So which brexit did you vote for then? Soft-BrexitHard-BrexitNo-deal BrexitChequers BrexitNorway+ BrexitCanada++ BrexitWTO BrexitManaged BrexitCustoms 'Partnership' BrexitMalthouse Compromise Brexit 
32 days to Brexit. Incomprehensible and shameful that we should be where we are. “So they go on in strange paradox, decided only to be undecided, resolved to be irresolute, adamant for drift, solid for fluidity, all powerful to be impotent” (WSC, Nov 1936). 
Revoke. And round up the various MPs & others who lied their way to buy the referendum result and throw them in jail. Then launch a public enquiry. And maybe a truth & reconciliation council along South African lines. 
But why.  What for.  Brexit was won by cheats and removes rights and protections from every single ordinary person in the UK.  It will leave us poorer, smaller, diminished. WHY do you want this nonsense to go ahead.  
In the year to October 2018, Honda made just 130,000 cars in Europe. In Japan, it made 723,000. In China, it made 1.2million. Even ardent Remainers have to admit that Brexit has little to do with Honda pulling out of Swindon, writes @jameswoudhuysen 
Conservative minister tells Sky News that if Prime Minister Theresa May does not have a deal by 13 March ministers will force her to extend Article 50 or avoid a 'no-deal' Brexit 
That’s a good combination of clips.Of course Bannon’s message to Leavers is also a message to us.THEY hope they will wear us down.  THEY have always hoped we would give up.Nope. 
The elites making a big s%&t on poor people Here's the evidence; money is just nothing more than crap!! A huge sum of money was confiscated before completely destroyed#Facts #refugees #Europe #EuropeanUnion #Brexit #EUelections2019 #France 
Your high temps ARE NOT from Global Warming Stop brain washing   readers to justify green tax grab schemes It's from Methane Release from Theresa May & spineless leadership in Parliament failing to Follow will of majority of citizens on full Brexit  
The far-right Brexit Britain is oppressing the, er.. *checks notes* ...Chagos Islands. I know you've never heard of them before, but this is terribly important and just goes to show the damage Brexit is doing. Or something. 
Determined to throw UK business & industry, the economy, our public services and the rights of citizens off the cliff-edge in pursuit of her #Brexit delusion.The woman is simply, a reckless maniac.A betrayal of the British people & her own party @Conservatives#StopBrexit 
Well this is a bit embarrassing. I know we keep on about Russia meddling in Brexit and the US. Those Russians seem to get everywhere, don't they? Oh well, never mind. Oh look, a squirrel... 
.@eucopresident talks of an extension to Article 50 whereas months ago the EU said that was impossible. He doesn't mention any changes to the Withdrawal Agreement/Political Declaration. Therefore a delay only serves factious fools, to think up new ways to stop #Brexit#LetsGoWTO 
Scotland & the Brexit Crisis – join me, @KirstyS_Hughes & @KirstyEHaigh on Sunday 17th March to discuss the current situation & its implications. Book a free ticket here -  #Brexit 
The U.S.  & UK  continue to work closely together to prepare for Brexit. #SpecialRelationship 
There is no such thing as a manageable no deal Brexit.@cbicarolyn  
Canadian wood panel manufacturer, Norbord, is ploughing £35 million into the second phase of development of its Inverness factory in Scotland This takes its overall investment in the past two years to £145 million. #DespiteBrexit #Brexit #NoDeal 
This great victory for the Chagos Islanders is part of our long and ignominious history of decolonisiationWe now need to decolonise British society and culture - starting with eliminating the fanciful idea of Global Britain after Brexit  
MPs missed their half-term break, costing taxpayers £400,000, yet failed to move Brexit forward one iota because no Brexit business was brought to the HOC. Farce piled on farce, but not in a good way!  
This. More & more people are saying this. Just rip up article 50 & get on with life. Brexit is a failed experiment. Anyone who still wants it can come back another time with an actual plan.  
YouGov poll: Brexit regret is at its highest ever  
In their botched Brexit negotiations, the Tories are trying to slip through new legislation that could lead to an increase in animal testing. Don’t let them get away with it – sign our petition  
"Brexit Referendum Was Corruptly Won, But Result Stands Thanks To Loophole"Listen to this. It will outrage you if you believe in democracy and rule-of-law.Brexit is a crime scene. Brexit is littered with the dead bodies of logic, democracy and truth.  
This is simply astonishing. Hardship funds for those hurt most by Brexit, protection for areas most hit by food shortages.... no one voted for this. No one still wants this. #PeoplesVote #Brexitcrisis 
Precisely why Brexiteers fear a #FinalSay second Referendum  
If you’re against Brexit occurring at all, of course you want to extend Art50. You need more time to gain momentum for a second vote.But don’t pretend that you’re extending Art50 to make a deal more likely. What makes a deal most likely is the pressure of time. 
Politicians need to follow through with their commitments to deliver Brexit. Any attempt to delay Brexit will just be seen as a move towards stopping Brexit altogether.  
Wonder what the ratio is of media coverage of implications for democracy of not Brexiting compared to implications for economy of "no deal" Brexit? Am estimatinging approx 1:100. What say you @RobBurl ? 
Polls show Brexit regret is so strong that 'Remain' would win a second referendum by 9 points  via @businessinsider 
The options:Accept we need more time to decide on the future of the UK (and Europe), so get an extension to Article 50 (RT)Stop Brexit / have a #PeoplesVote (RT)OrLet a shadowy mob of multimillionaire scammers throw us off a cliff (RANT) 
Don't think the Father Dougal of Brexit has blocked us, though. Hi, Dom!  
Remember @theresa_may telling that Nurse there was no magical money tree for a modest pay rise for #NHS staff.JUST LOOK AT WHAT SHE'S SINCE SQUANDERED ON FUNKING BREXITSorry for shouting and being sweary 
Leaders in the EU have internet connections. They know that the UK parliament will block no-deal. They know it will soon demand a delay to Brexit. They know May is on borrowed time.So they know as well as we do that there is no need to make any further concessions. 
What does Blair have to gain from urging voters to 'rise up' against Brexit?It would open up the most protracted and bitter conflict in British politics, doing great damage to our democracy and country!Imagine their response if someone on the right urged voters to 'rise up'? 
With the #Brexit clock ticking we need you to get your marching boots on.Take a stand and march once again for a #PeoplesVote on Brexit and demand that parliament #PutItToThePeople.Bring your friends, invite your family and tell your colleagues.   
Brexit risks rare diseases care for 100,000 British children by leaving the European Reference Networks (ERNs) we cut ourselves from supply of expertise. 
Nice to see Sainsbury's in Chippenham are already gearing up for a post Brexit Britain @WHS_Carpet 
"Chaotic Brexit or extension."European Council President Donald Tusk says the UK must choose between a no-deal Brexit or extending Article 50 if there is no agreement.  
Today an exhausted Tusk repeats an equally exhausted message: “Its absolutely clear there is no majority in House of Commons to approve a deal. We will face an alternative: a chaotic Brexit or extension. An extension would be a rational solution.”  
"Brexit dilemmas cannot be solved"  PM translated - She who promised No Borders while promising to leave Single Market & Customs Union ...very simple dilemma PM created!!   
After years of intending to, finally got rid of coal bunker in cellar so we have room to install freezer, giving us more room in kitchen.  Delivery guy asks if it’s a Brexit freezer. Seems sales are going through roof as folk buy to stockpile food.  
The Conservative Party’s most senior activists overwhelmingly back a Clean Brexit on 29th March 
PollIf Brexit is delayed after two years of somehow being arranged, how much time do you think Britain needs to get ready?Vote  
Best hotel room ever. So much potential. Makes me almost feel sorry about #Brexit  
NEWS! No-deal Brexit won’t be our fault says man who insisted it would be easiest deal in history  
Mrs May is the biggest beneficiary of Brexit. It made her PM. She knows the result is fraudulent. She doesn’t care. She pursues Brexit on the lie that there is a mandate for leaving the EU when we know that the leave result is invalid. Fraud unravels everything.Impeach Mrs May.  
8 in 10 new voters want a say on Brexit. 84% of young people don’t want Brexit with 73% support a People’s Vote. We must not alienate the people who Brexit will effect the most and for the longest.  
Lots of talk about an extension to Article 50, but differing views on how long it should be.How about for as long as it takes for the Tory party to agree with itself? That should give us time for all sorts of stop-Brexit strategies!@BremainInSpain 
Good old stoic British cabbies taken over parliament square over discrimination by @TfL#WhereBusesGoTaxisGoTotal scilence by @BBC A Sign of things to come if establishment don't listen to the people #Brexit?Demos like this would be everywhere grinding Britain to a halt.  
No-Deal Brexit: Out of the Customs Union Out of the Single Market Out of ECJ jurisdiction Out of Common Agricultural Policy Out of Common Fisheries Policy Control of our borders An independent trade policyFree trade option too by using Art 24 of GATT #GoWTO 
Theresa May is running out of Brexit options  
Theresa May to consider axeing Human Rights Act after Brexit, minister reveals  
A huge piece of financial good news Project Fear will not want you to see!A deal has been signed between the UK and US to protect a crucial market post-Brexit. Support us at  
Opinion: As the process of Brexit unfolds, we are discovering how many pleasant aspects of modern life in Britain are closely linked to EU membership. A good relationship between Britain and Ireland should be added to that list – Gideon Rachman  
Meet the author who lied on behalf of the EU  #brexit 
Imitation is the sincerest form of flattery, so I  welcome the news that Tory Ministers are looking at setting up a hardship fund for those affected by #Brexit, as advocated by the #LibDemsBut what a sad indictment that this is necessaryWe can stop this lunacy: #PeoplesVote 
Footnote to history. While their own party wrestled on the cliff edge of Brexit with 100,000 jobs at risk, Scottish Tories shouted: Potholes!  
If you take a step back & assess the Tory's record in key areas, you find:The Economy? Healthcare? Living standards? Crime? Education? Elderly care? Brexit? They are unfit to govern. Time for real change. #JC4PM2019 
David Mundell,declined to join a rebel cabinet group demanding that Theresa May rule out a no-deal Brexit to avoid giving the SNP an “easy win”he has stated. Proof if you ever needed it @DavidMundellDCT wil never put Scotland first. 
Afraid both May & your leader would've found themselves in the dock for gross negligence in any other walk of life for having forced A50 invocation with neither a plan nor a clue.They deserve each other but we deserve neither!#RevokeA50 Stop #Brexit #Remain in Control in the EU 
The EU wants to delay Brexit for 2 years... but how long do you think we should delay Brexit for? 
I’ve been saying for months. Follow the money. All the way from Trump to Putin, via Cambridge Analytica and Robert Mercer. Add Brexit into this and you have two of the biggest denocracies being ripped apart and Putin is laughing. Follow the money. 
Preparing for a trip to London I have just re-read a speech I made before Brexit became a word.  Proud to have warned against the referendum; If anything, I underestimated its consequences.  
Unity Referendum? Hell Yeah! #Time4Unity 
Polls show Brexit regret is so strong that 'Remain' would win a second referendum by 9 points. 
"Brexit Referendum Was Corruptly Won, But Result Stands Thanks To Loophole" - LBC @LBC 
Court selected our case for live video feed thereby recognising it as being of significant legal importance. Our battle continues to ensure that we never see a repeat of the illegal activities attached to the referendum. We look forward to the day when this comes to a head!6/6 
Spare Rib is only one digitised resource that may have to be taken down in a no deal Brexit. We will lose the Orphan Works scheme. Such a loss for scholarship and a waste of all the work those libraries and archives have done to open up collections  
UK cannot examine Facebook until it has clarity on Brexit timing - CMA  
Next stop - launch of new Brexit Workshop by the LEOs @Loc_Enterprise in Cootehill with @ReginaDo and @Paschald. I’m encouraging all businesses to contact their local LEO office to avail of this service 
Dutch PM Rutte about delaying Brexit date:“It's up to UK. If UK ask for delay, the EU will ask what do you want with it? We don't want to go round in circles for the next couple of months. What will be achieved by it?”#BrexitMeansLaughingStockBritain 
What a No Deal Brexit could mean for Scotland...  
Exactly. And as we know, uncertainty, is what the Remain extremists keep banging on about as being unreasonable about #Brexit. It is also of course just what they want.  
Labour is moving closer to backing a second referendum on Brexit. 
Mmm, if you'd asked me 3 years ago who was the worst PM in my lifetime, I would have said without hesitation Margaret Thatcher. She's now number 3, behind David Cameron (the bumbling idiot who gave us #Brexit) and Theresa May (the architect of our country's impending demise).  
Not content with trying to screw up Brexit, the appalling Gauke wants to unleash thousands of career criminals into our streets by sparing them prison. Have the tories gone totally mad?  
This article by @J_amesp is a depressing but important read. And no amount of tambourine-bashing or waving posters that contain witty comments about Rich Tea biscuits on the 23rd March will mitigate this brewing storm. "The Brexit Death Spiral"  
Tusk said: “For me, it’s absolutely clear that there is no majority in the House of Commons to approve a deal. We will face an alternative: a chaotic Brexit or extension..But Prime Minister May still believes that she is able to avoid this scenario.”You heard: Brexit is fixed. 
Brexit: Fear, Uncertainty Dominate UK Video Games Industry  
Bit of momentum behind @AlbertoCostaMP's Brexit amendment at Home Office questions - Raised by @NickyMorgan01 and @joannaccherry It calls for the citizens' rights part of the Brexit deal to be ring-fenced regardless of outcome of negotiations.  
Ministers thinking of quitting to support Cooper/Letwin or Hart plans to delay Brexit initially unimpressed by suggestion @theresa_may will try to buy them off by promising another opportunity to vote for this in a fortnight. I‘d expect the tally of ministerial... 
What is the point in delaying Brexit for: a) 8 weeks.  b) 12 weeks. What will MPs know then they don’t know now. What will it actually achieve other than an extension of the period of uncertainty. 
Brexit's biggest financial backer is Arron Banks and the source of his fortune is hard to track. We tried to untangle it  
You know what? I call people like you sanctimoniously insisting that the 3/4 of the population of this country who did not vote for Brexit in the #Frauderendum, in which #VoteLeaveBrokeTheLaw, an affront to democracy. So just get over yourself.We are going NOWHERE. 
#Brexit: Theresa May 'focused' on leaving on time, despite calls for delay  
- RFE/RL exclusive: the daughter of #Putin's spokesman is an intern for French MEP @a_chauprade, who observed the staged #Crimea referendum- She has unhindered access to various #EU documents and she can attend all committees and other meetings 
Is Theresa May actually unwell mentally? Genuine question. #Brexit is beginning to look like the Waco Siege. #cult 
2081 - Theresa May has scheduled another meaningful vote on Brexit for March 26th 
Your weekly #FullyChargedShow podcast has just been delivered. @bobbyllew & @Carpervert chat about Amazon's investment in Rivian and whether Brexit has affected Honda's decision to leave the UK. Find the FC podcast on iTunes, Spotify, Google Play, etc etc  
"If the referendum had been legally binding, then the findings of the Electoral Commission would have rendered it invalid. But because it wasn't binding, we can be held to something that was corruptly delivered."@mrjamesob | #Brexit 
Wouldn’t it be wonderful if accidentally - in spite of the best efforts of May, MPs and the establishment - we managed to escape the EU with a no deal Brexit on 29 March?  Just like when the UK was forced out of the ERM we would be forever thankful.   
The Independent Group to bring contempt proceedings if the govt fails to publish no-deal Brexit papers within 48 hours. The papers are expected to show a huge economic hit from a no-deal #Brexit. Another case of the government subverting democracy. #FBPE 
Britain’s post-Brexit trade conundrum. A short story.I had a meeting this morning with a Japanese diplomat who said Japan doesn’t want to simply replicate the same terms of its EU FTA with the UK (as reported by the FT here: ). 
This brexiter is very unhappy his #Brexit poll has been hijacked by remainers. So my fellow remainers please don't participate in it or retweet it    
If they want to delay Brexit we must have an emergency General Election and vote in those who are competent.  Liblabcon  are finished.  
The Economist has built a model to calculate an individual’s probable attitude to the three possible Brexit options: no deal, May’s deal or remaining in the EU. Try it out here:  
It's looking more & more likely she's going to delay #Brexit! I can't wait for a General Election & give these useless politicians a bloody nose! We need all the #Brexit parties to get together so we can kick these lot out.  
Brexit breaking point - my latest article in @Eastern Eye via 
WHOAJust like the Rosneft spinout in #TrumpRussia, Putin is bankrolling #Italy’s far-right candidate via a “business” deal.Add #Russia’sinterference in #Brexit and financial support of other far-right candidates (#France’s Le Pen)attacks on democracy.cc @thespybrief 
Thank you to everyone who voted in the Referendum and who signed the White House petition! This is been a victory for Okinawa! Now the results will be delivered all over the world to make sure this base at Henoko is stopped and that the rights of Okinawans are protected! 
The only people who want a delay are the people who don't want Brexit. We must leave on 29th March, deal or no deal. 
Maggie thatcher would have Tusk polishing her shoes, and Junker fetching her tea. Maggie would treat them with the contempt they deserve. Even the Donald would bow in her presence.  Moreover, we would have the best / cleanest Brexit deal we could hope for...Oh, for Maggie now. 
So let’s ensure that the human cost of Brexit does not continue to rise. The amendment already has a lot of cross-party support - and from both sides of the Brexit debate. Please do the right, the only human, thing now and  support @AlbertoCostaMP to get this on the way. 
Tiggers already showing lazy tribal politicians how to hold the Government to account - Independent Group to bring contempt proceedings if government fails to publish no-deal Brexit papers within 48 hours  
UK Govt ring-fencing #citizensrights with Switzerland in case of no-deal Brexit but unwilling to do so with the EU. MPs must support the @AlbertoCostaMP amendment this week to ensure that the Prime Minister agrees the same with the EU under Article 50, no matter what Brexit  
Excellent Article DEMOLISHING #ProjectFearMinisters promoting #Brexit doom instead of trying to fulfil govt policy should be sacked for #FakeNews & incompetenceTheir outbursts aren't concern of genuine problems but scare stories to Thwart Brexit 
'Centrists have nothing to sell but opposition to Brexit. We need policies to tackle climate breakdown & give UK a clear programme for increasing the voice of everyday people in our democratic system' - @faizashaheen in @guardian (writing as a PPC). 
Michael Gove says a second referendum “would do real damage to our politics” - unlike the first one, which didn’t do that. 
Theresa May is not a moderate. Her record marks her out as a mendacious xenophobic authoritarian nationalist who holds human rights, parliamentary democracy, the rule of law & the right to oppose in contempt. She is a threat to democracy. #PeoplesVote #brexit #FBPE 
Apparently some people on skiing holidays in Switzerland have solved #Brexit Here is your reminder of what freight entering Switzerland actually looks like#projectfact ⛟ 
Brexit could be delayed until 2021, EU sources reveal | Politics | The Guardian  
"I'm a young person and I support leaving the #EU" @dominiquetaegon A clean #Brexit will allow us to invest billions into #education and #housing. Good news for the younger generation! Sign up here:  pic.twitter.com/GzTWINsMLw #StandUp4Brexit @DCBMEP 
Revealed: Cancelling Commons' recess cost £400,000...yet there were no Brexit votes  
Is Mrs May really going to let the EU have their way and bully us into an extension, during which time they will campaign to reverse Brexit?Regardless of who I voted for, I have always supported Mrs My as far as possible. out of loyalty to Britain.An extension would end that. 
Steve Coogan on Alan Partridge: “Alan would have voted Brexit for sure. Hard Brexit, given the choice. He’s a Brexiteer because the Daily Mail told him to be.”  
Corrupt SKY working overtime alongside Tusk to get a lengthy extension to Brexit. I strongly advise anyone with a SKY deal, not to extend their contracts with these shysters. SKY are sickeningly going against what the people voted for, alongside the BBC. 
I think she's insane. Like Stalin, she has cut herself off from all criticism, surrounds herself with lickspittles and has no independent view of her policies and actions. She's also deliberately seeking to harm her own nation. She needs to be removed by Parliament. 
DONE: UK and US seal post-Brexit deal to protect multi-trillion market. “The action we have taken today with our partners in the US will ensure that markets can continue to thrive without disruption.”  
"This is #Brexit Britain lecturing EU Germany on their foreign policy to Saudis" says @georgegalloway after UK officials are dismayed with German halt of arms sales to Saudi Arabia. 
Britain, 2034.Brexit has been delayed for the 78th time.Tories only convene parliament to say "Brexit, but not like that" and then go home again to their estates.There are fourteen Independent Groups, each somehow more buffoonishly racist than the last. 
How often do you need to be told it is NOT A TORY BREXIT!!!!!!17.4 million UK citizens voted for it, including 1m Scots - 1/3 of which were your voters!   Why don't you learn to respect that?You didn't care about the EU in 2014 
FCT Results:APC, 152,224. PDP 259,997 is a resounding referendum by tenanats of Buhari in Abuja despite all the attempts to rig massively.  Of course they succeeded in some places - they disrupted voting & intimidated the people. Thank you FCT#ElectionDay 
Now there’s a woman from Cornwall jabbering on about houses being given to foreign people and how we’re giving money away.Brexit is like Groundhog Day, with ignorant, ill-informed Brexiters being given a platform to spread gibberish to other ignorant, ill-informed Brexiters. 
After abandoning their pledge to take back control of our borders it now looks like the Labour Party is abandoning their pledge to respect the referendum result altogether.  
Our second edition ⁦@EveningStandard⁩ as PM plans to announce tomorrow that MPs will get a vote on delaying Brexit - in a desperate bid to avoid being defeated by her rebels  
Assume Parliament voted to cancel Brexit & the Queen granted Royal Assent. Could we reasonably say that was the definitive moment the UK ceased to be a constitutional monarchy &  became a ritual monarchy? What is the content of constitutional monarchy if not to deny Assent here? 
UK insurers say no-deal Brexit would be 'act of economic self-harm'  
One reason #Brexit has turned into a total catastrophuck is because every fucker in charge of it is the kind of arsehole that gets a fucking chap in to do shit. We've left the most complex negotiations of our lifetimes to people who don't even know how to change a fucking plug. 
Brexit is 777 hours away. #brexit 
brexit is final fantasy 7 remake. square enix ass political cycle. united kingdom hearts pic.twitter.com/amfCbWi1Tn 
The Association of British Insurers has issued its strongest warning yet about the impact of a No Deal #Brexit saying it would be an “unforgivable act of economic and social self-harm.” 
We must take the opportunity of Brexit to return to the great British tradition of civil liberties  #brexit 
UK and US have agreed a post-Brexit deal to protect the multi-trillion dollar derivatives market. “London is, and will remain, a global centre for derivatives trading and clearing.” 
I was delighted to attend the official signing ceremony of the UK-Swiss citizens’ rights agreement. The agreement provides both citizens the certainty that their rights are protected in both a deal and no deal #Brexit scenario  
84% of young voters oppose #Brexit and 73% want a People’s Vote, survey finds@OFOC ⁦@peoplesvote_uk⁩ @TheTimes 
Unionist Tactics.They are running scared...actually terrified.Here are the two most common tactics Ive seen deployed:1. Scotland leaving harder than Brexit.2. SNP voters/Yes activists hate the English.If this is all they have, then they are finished. Pathetic drivel. 
Brexit delay is 'rational' solution, EU president Tusk says  
PM confirms it is possible MPs cd be asked to back her Brexit deal before it is agreed by EU 
A rare occasion where I agree with @guyverhofstadt in that it is pointless to kick the #Brexit can down the road any further. A #WTOBrexit, like it or not, gives everyone certainty. The only way is to leave on 29th March 2019 and #GoWTO. #LeaveMeansLeave #LetsGoWTO 
The EU opens door to delaying Brexit as a 'rational solution' to prevent no-deal  
So, first we had "Brexit means Brexit". Now we've got "Delay means Delay". I can't wait for the next one, "Revoke means Revoke". #RevokeArticle50 
Gaslit Nation is a must-listen for anyone who wants the truth on Trump, Brexit, and the rule by oligarchs. Thank you ⁦@sarahkendzior⁩ 
I’m no Tory but this guy is head and shoulders above any body else when it comes to the truth about Brexit. 
Today we will have our first formal inaugural meeting of @TheIndGroup ahead of key votes this week on Brexit, and we stand ready to bring contempt proceedings against government if they don't publish briefing papers on the impact of a No Deal.  
PM appears to want Article 50 to be extended, but without being blamed for it. Meanwhile the Leader of the Opposition wants Brexit to be delivered, but without being blamed for it. 
Bookmakers still put the chances of a no-deal Brexit at close to 40% (via @bopinion) 
"Any delay is a delay, it doesn't address the issue" - dismissing the prospect of extending Article 50, PM says she is focused on addressing backstop 'concerns' and getting her #Brexit deal through parliament. Get live updates from the #EU summit:  
Some of them particularly the rich Brexiteers don't seem to care about Brexit damage to UK economy claiming it's a price worth paying. Truth is it's tragic and pointless 'taking back control' in an interconnected world!  
All these ills were blamed on #CFP but #Brexit won’t solve them!  
Today marks the start of early voting for the Gwinnett County transit referendum. Find out more about this historic opportunity at. 
To understand the ‘why’ of the campaign for a delay to Brexit, all you have to do is look at the ‘who’. Latest wheeze of ardent anti-Brexit brigade. Brexit delayed is Brexit denied. 
The referendum was not democratic.  It was anything but respectful being interlaced with lies and cheating.That’s the problem ...respect is then thin on the ground, unless one admires liars and cheats.  I don’t. 
MPs moving to extend Article 50 are moving to extend the uncertainty and will kill jobs by doing so.#Brexit 
Not in powerNo credible plan for LexitNo impact assessments for LexitNo offer to negotiate from EULabour polls #PeoplesVote #RemainConference policy NOW demands #PeoplesVoteOh and Brexit a lawbreaking, corrupt, far-right project prized by extremists for the few not the many 
TUSK: Brexit delay would be 'rational'. 17.4 million Leave voters would beg to differ @eucopresident. We’ve waited years and want out on 29th March! 
No-deal Brexit risks 'full-blown economic crisis'  
An extraordinary proposition from Theresa May to achieve Brexit on time - says she could try to pass a Withdrawal Agreement Bill through the Commons BEFORE the EU27 even formally sign off a new deal on March 22: “It is possible to do it either way”. 
Journo - "Why are you so resistant to the idea of delaying UK's exit?PM - "A Delay in this process doesn't deliver". #EU #Brexit  
May running with the "The only alternative to my deal is cancelling Brexit" gambit. That form of blackmail was comprehensively rejected long ago. If you're going to cancel, go ahead & cancel - & reap the whirlwind that follows.  
The General Sisi fawningly praised by Theresa May led a military coup to overthrow Egypt's democratically elected President while torturing and executing opponents. She doesn't give a Brexit trade deal for human rights 
1. We don't have it in our grasp as there's no change in positions2. The clear majority now want to stay3. It's been confirmed there was fraud in an advisory Ref4. All Govt reports clearly indicate any Brexit damages the UK5. The PM doesn't have a mandate of parliament or ppl 
Can't get over the sheer bloody cheek of May stating that extending A50 solves nothing & merely delays the decision!FFS that has been her effing tactics since #Brexit Ref!!!Get rid of her..Get rid of her Govt..Get rid of the whole damn lot of #Brexiters/#Lexiters & #RevokeA50 
Theresa May promises vote on Brexit deal by March 12  via @ReutersTV More on #Brexit:  
Helen at what point did Brexit become about skin colour for you? Genuinely interested 
As usual @theresa_may refuses to say whether she would rather have Brexit delay or no-deal Brexit if in the end she cannot get her deal approved 
Brexit delay is 'rational solution', EU president Tusk says  
Theresa May once again rejects the idea of delaying #Brexit, saying "any extension of Article 50 isn't addressing the issues" 
A top EU official urges British Prime Minister Theresa May to request a Brexit extension, saying pushing back the March 29 deadline would be a "rational solution."  
She once said 'Brexit means Brexit'. Now Theresa May says 'any delay is a delay'.May-ism.  It is what it is. 
.@theresa_may “we have it within our grasp” - she is referring to a Brexit deal that gets the UK out of the EU on 29 March. What do you think? 
PM repeats her view that delaying Brexit doesnt solve any of the dilemmas 
“The villains of this piece are Boris Johnson, David Davis and Liam Fox… They completely screwed it up,” says former deputy PM Lord Heseltine. “When it comes to leaving the EU we're on our own."More on #Brexit here:  
Boris Johnson was wrong. Not all Brexiters are racists - far from it - but every single racist voted Brexit 
A no deal Brexit will mean that Britain’s only crisp flavours will be ready salted, salt ’n’ vinegar and cheese ’n’ onion, manufacturers have confirmed.Plans are in place to introduce beef crisps within two years and prawn cocktail by 2025. 
Another Brexit delay ?  if you want to hang on to your sovereignty you're going to have to get on the streets like the French #YellowVests  @ElContador2000 @Smileygirl19681 @Lin46222208 @ultimateOne @lorraineSW1 @SuzieSzabo2 @SueWhitaker11 @Kalimeralynn 
Swedish minister: I can’t forgive the UK for Brexit  
Anglo-Irish relations are a casualty of Brexit  
European Council President Donald Tusk says after talks with Prime Minister Theresa May that extending Article 50 and delaying Brexit would be a "rational solution" to end the deadlock 
.@BBCNews leads on Theresa May being ‘under pressure to delay Brexit.’ How come they never lead on the growing pressure she must be aware of across the country to now go for a no Deal Brexit? #BrexitBias 
There’s a quote kicking around from BoJo where he says ppl should have to pay for healthcare on moral grounds. We couldn’t find the source till we bought his book (for 1p) & yeah, he said it. He sold Brexit on saving the NHS when *actually* he wants to introduce pricing. Donkey.  
Leave voters are losing patience with politicians' approach to Brexit. Now is the time to deliver, not delay.  
Your daily @DealBook Briefing:• How to really tax the rich• Deadline extension doesn't end the trade war• Theresa May delayed a crucial Brexit vote 
Dear Helen, the 'white indigenous British race' has done very well for itself for thousands of years. It'll be fine. BTW, Brexit would mean more migrants from Commonwealth countries. Some of them have quite the tan. Just saying.  
It is scarcely news, but further confirmation that #EU now fully aware that rationality no longer a factor in working out what the UK side of the #Brexit process will do next.  
A delay addresses literally none of the reasons why May has failed to get a deal through. There is nothing "rational" about it unless your "solution" is ultimately just to stop Brexit altogether.  
Okinawa: 72% of voters oppose the construction of a new U.S. base to replace the one at Futenma. Japan's PM Shinzo Abe says the government takes the referendum result seriously, therefore plans to build the new U.S. base will continue regardless 
No-deal Brexit will lead to 'severe disruption' and food shortages, warns Twinings and Primark owner  
As the UK approaches Brexit it has (like the US) designate the Lebanese Shiite political party Hezbollah as a terrorist organization. Previously only the military wing of Hezbollah was designated. The political wing forms a substantial part of the Lebanese parliament. 
EU now openly describing a Brexit delay as ‘rational’. Rational for who? We’re getting on for three years since the vote, public want result implemented. This dithering is pathetic. May must deliver on 29th March as she has consistently promised to do.  
"An extension would be a rational solution" to avoid a "chaotic" no-deal #Brexit, says @eucopresident Donald Tusk, after talks with Theresa May 
'No majority' for any Brexit route and an extension of Article 50 would be 'rational' says @donaldtusk 
I feel like Brexit is now a modern-day Dunkirk - it would be heroic and British to retreat from the whole thing, and admit it's not working. 
I'm doing a crossword and the clue was "Word with hard or soft" and my first thought was Brexit so I hate politics now 
So now there’s talk of extending Article 50 and delaying Brexit. Do you think @theresa_may should do this? Retweet for a bigger sampleand tag @Conservatives @NickBoles and @AmberRuddHR. Let them know what you think. 
#BREAKING EU's Tusk says Brexit deadline extension would be 'rational solution'  
My Brexit History: 1.Reluctant Remainer, as Brexit win would enable racism + far right.2. ‘You have to respect vote’.3. Angry many Remainers didn’t seem to care of causes in working class communities.4. This shitshow unsolvable without people’s vote. 
Theresa May and Jean-Claude Juncker have promised to conclude EU-UK negotiations on the country’s Brexit deal before the bloc’s leaders summit in Brussels on March 21 – and eight days before Britain is scheduled to leave the EU  
The SNP are to hold an emergency 1 day party meeting to discus Health, the economy and BrexitI’ve seen the timetable. Here it is 9am: Independence 11am: Independence 12am: Independence Lunch2pm: Independence 3pm: Independence 4pm: Independence 5pm: Sturgeon talks Indy 
His donations were equivalent to about a quarter of his known assets 
‘EU ‘cannot compromise on Brexit.’ Then No-Deal it is..  
Sterling rallies on talk UK government considering Brexit delay  
Delay Brexit?“Dozens and dozens of Tory backbenchers who might be willing to cause big, big trouble if she (PM) were to go there” @bbclaurak, who hears EU leaders “talking about it openly” #politicslive  
I have no words. Apparently Brexit is necessary to save the white race.  
Grans across the country would probably tell you to pack in your nonsense, carry out Brexit as your party and the Tories promised in 2017 manifestos, and then get on with running the country democratically again outside EU, where your powers as an MP would be hugely increased.  
'@theresa_may and the @Conservatives promised that the #UK would leave the #EU with #nodeal if a bad deal was the only alternative. She must keep that promise or the #ConservativeParty needs to be vanquished for their LIES!  #StandUp4Brexit #Brexit #Tory 
Johnson was head of the Labour remain campaign, never seen any anger directed to him from MSM or the usual suspects at #FBPE or #PeoplesVote .He sloped off into the shadows, he should have stayed there or at least took some responsibility for brexit.Shameful.  
MPs must this week rule out a damaging Brexit and then urgently bring this mess to an end with a #PeoplesVote, including the option to stay in the EU. 
.@theresa_may is fast climbing the league table of the most irresponsible politicians our country has ever had.Kicking the #Brexit can down the road will only heighten fears and anxiety of businesses and people right across the UK. 
At an informal lunchtime meeting between NGOs from the UK and the UN CEDAW Committee. #CEDAW72 Key issues: VAWG - Istanbul Convention finding services, austerity; access to justice; quotas; Brexit; incorporation of CEDAW; and abortion in N. Ireland.  
Not everyone that sticks up for Brexit is Far Right, but everyone who is Far Right sticks up for Brexit.  
"Teach #politicalliteracy in schools to avoid the ignorance of 2016" - My latest article for @timesredbox... please ignore the picture... not my doing I promise you  #Brexit #BrexitShambles  
Independent Group to bring contempt proceedings if government fails to publish no-deal Brexit papers within 48 hours  
Brexit is not happening because of the referendum result, because if it were happening because of the referendum result it would not be happening because the referendum is officially accepted as being corrupt. Which means that invoking the result as a "mandate" is tosh. 
"May embraces the worst form of mean-spirited insularity. Her vision of Brexit Britain is more depressing than that of more exuberant colleagues like Johnson and Liam Fox."  
UK lawmakers who are staying with their parties for now may use the threat of more defections as leverage against their own leaders to get concessions on Brexit. | @janemerrick23 for @CNNopinon 
Brexit will not be on March 29, unless Britain crashes out of the EU without a dealBoth Theresa May’s Plan A (victory) and Plan B (disaster) scenarios now involve a delay 
Brexit: UK and EU 'sleepwalking' towards no deal, Dutch PM warns - Politics live  
Aerospace and Defence industry comment on Brexit vote delay. "The continued delay is turning the UK’s political failure into a full-blown economic crisis." 
It is high time that some MPs stopped beating around the bush and stated clearly that they want to stop a destructive #brexit built on hard-right hate, lies, electoral crime, cover-ups, bullying, hiding of information & foreign interference.#PeoplesVote #Brexit #FBPE 
Theresa May, says she wants to stay on after Brexit to see through her domestic agenda. Well Mrs May that's fine, if we get a NO deal. Your deal or any other fudged deal that means we remain in the EU. Then there will be no Tory party to lead, as you will have no voters. 
.@JeremyCorbyn's meetings in Brussels and Madrid made clear that @UKLabour's alternative plan for #Brexit is credible and could be negotiated with the EU  
Today's @BBCTalkback is asking whether we are ready for a poll on ending partition. Should it not ask whether we are ready to set a date for a poll? That is a crucial distinction. In Scotland, setting a referendum date utterly transformed the issue and publishing about it. 
All the Brexit pain will be worth it for “our beloved feet and inches”Personally I find using base ten far easier than imperial measurements.  What next £sd?  
While #DespicableMay carries on taking us all to the brink of Tory brexit armageddon and the blairites carry on with their slimy scheming, we're so very grateful for you Mr Corbyn.  Thank you #TheRealPrimeMinister 
This is the official German position for British residents after #NoDealBrexit. Some regions are actively sending out application forms for post Brexit residency, while others are waiting. But you'll have till 29 June to reapply, and until you get a decision, nothing changes.  
BREAKING: PM to delay decision on whether to delay decision on whether to delay Brexit. 
Theresa May's Brexit gambles are becoming more dangerous, and there's a risk they could seal her fate  
Talking #Brexit with Prime Minister @theresa_may at the end of the #EULASSummit. It’s evident to me that no one wants the UK to crash out of the EU without a deal. That’s a lose lose. Focus remains on ratifying the withdrawal agreement. 
"I'm a young person and I support leaving the EU" @dominiquetaegonA clean Brexit will allow us to invest billions into education and housing. Good news for the younger generation! Sign up here:  pic.twitter.com/Gj1oF83xKN 
WATCH | Dominic Grieve tells Nick Ferrari what we already knew, Remainers pushing for a Brexit delay want to use the time to call a second referendum, with the options being May's deal or Remain - no Leave option!!Don't let them get away it!Deselect   
Brexit is 32 days away. #brexit 
#JacobReesMogg hits back at #Remainers trying to delay #Brexit: "Everybody in the #ConservativeParty stood on a #manifesto saying we would leave the  #EuropeanUnion. [#Brexitblockers] are not abiding by what they said to their voters."  @ConHome @DCBMEP 
Yes, bring on the Brexit before all our descendants start spontaneously changing colour  
Too-big-to-fail bank lobbyist nominated to as head of the European Banking Authority While trying to persuade people to oppose Brexit, they shoot themselves in the foot. Again.@BRAVENEWEUROPE1 
Please let Alan Partridge cover #Brexit tonight.What could be more Brexity than Alan Partridge? It's a match made in heaven!#AlanPartridge #ThisTime #ThisTimeWithAlanPartridge 
No, my friend.If Brexit happens because the Labour Leadership's pursuit of a narrow version of socialism prevents the whole party from opposing it even though the members & voters are desperate to, the resentment against that ideology & those behind it will politically end them. 
Well, mate, trying to impose an ideology with a minority government on the back of a referendum calling itself the will of the people.What the fuck do you think the far right looks like?  
While Theresa May pursues a reckless Brexit strategy, Jeremy has been meeting with European leaders to seek a deal with Europe to protect jobs and security. And meeting leading socialists to plan how, as internationalists, we can build a more just world.  
Theresa May has shown contempt for human rights, individual freedom, the rule of law, Parliamentary democracy and the right to oppose. She is a proto-fascist extremist who would undoubtedly regard a no-deal #brexit as a great achievement. 
Extending the Brexit deadline 2 mths wld be tolerable if we'd agreed almost everything abt a deal & we were buying a little time to dot 'i's & cross 't's. But as it is this is clearly a 1st step to cancelling Brexit, a threat to try to railroad May's deal: 
LETS BE CLEAR - 'American fund manager that employs Theresa May’s husband says it intends to use Brexit as a “buying opportunity”.'Never underestimate the amount of money that can be made out of chaos, misery and economic collapse. 
But it is high time that MPs like @YvetteCooperMP stopped beating around the bush and stated clearly that they want to stop a destructive #brexit built on right-wing hate, lies, electoral crime, cover-ups, bullying, hiding of information & foreign interference. 
WATCH: Lord Heseltine: I want to see this put back to the people. Join the #PutItToThePeople march to demand a #PeoplesVote on the #Brexit deal:  
Peter Kyle the Lab MP obviously thinks that his fellow MP’s and the U.K electorate are stupid.His idea to vote through the Appeasers WA and then have a referendum whereby the 2 choices would be 1/ WA2/ Remain in the EU.Its a non starter, no Leaver would agree to this. 
David Mundell said he won't stand up to Theresa May over no-deal Brexit because it would be an "easy win" for the SNP - then turned around and told the SNP to stop putting party before country...  
Hopefully when your granddaughters  get to your age they’ll be happy in relationships with partners of their choosing, giving thanks that the idiocy of Brexit was stopped. I also hope they’ll be able to laugh about what a monstrous old bigot their granny was. 
The government preparing a hardship fund for people who fall on hard times from a No Deal Brexit, that they themselves are making more likely by running down the clock, is a perfect symbol for our broken, dysfunctional politics. We need a People's Vote. @Anna_Soubry 
Exciting news from the #PutItToThePeople march - £250,000 raised in a matter of days! #PeoplesVote #Brexit 
"We've reached the point where there is no good conclusion to Brexit and Britain faces a choice: take one for the team or be willing participants in the fall of Europe. And no, you are not going to like this." - @J_amesp #Brexit #NoDealBrexit 
Have to agree, particularly after hearing media reports this morning. Theresa "Death Star" May is being more than reckless with all our futures, and particularly the young. Going to the wire with nothing positive to offer. #Brexit  
Delivering Brexit is about democracy & standing up for our democratic freedoms.   
My Swedish friend who's always thought Brexit was a bad idea overall, but wasn't vehemently anti-Brexit because he subscribes to the Lexit philosophy, just sent me this: "I might have to change my mind about Lexit"  
Why racist and dishonest friend of Steve Bannon, Boris Johnson, should never be prime minister (and should be ignored in Brexit)   
Isn’t it odd that the “pressure to delay” #Brexit appears to come exclusively from Remainers, including the BBC and much of the print media?This despite every single part of #ProtectFear having been proved wrong.We are being lied to and manipulated. 
#Brexit Danger Zone1. May continues delay2. Parl fails to control 3. Feeble Extension4. ERG threaten to bring Govt down5. Corbyn takes hope GE looming refuses to budge6. TIG/LD/G/#Remain Labour fail to get act together in time.7. Avoid Best Option #RevokeA50 
So it’s ‘honourable’ to lie to ones constituents, desert your party, reject the views of the majority of the British electorate and to call for another referendum while denying your own constituents another vote on yourself. @Anna_Soubry is without doubt the most duplicitous MP.. 
At this rate, if the Brexit process went on any longer, this would probably be Liam Fox's campaign promise:  
Deborah, I find the continuous canvassing for Remain (post-referendum result) completely disrespectful to the democracy we all used to hold in such high regard.The comments you’re replying to, however, certainly weren’t aimed at you.  
And I look at my little four-month old granddaughter and worry what sort of future she'll have if Brexit is delivered. If your tweet is anything to go by we're heading for a massive increase in intolerance and xenophobia. In 2/3 years we seem to have regressed to the dark ages. 
It's hard to imagine being charged for everything we currently receive for free on the NHS, but it's possible if our trading relationship with the EU is no longer a good one in the case of Brexit, we'll be left trading with nations such as the US. #PutItToThePeople #PeoplesVote 
The "Brexiters are poised to define the present, rewrite the past and then shape the future. It would be folly for Labour to aid them." @chakrabortty explains why Labour must not aid this #Brexit:  
This need to see Brexit as a form of political evil continues to puzzle me. Brexit is just leaving the EU. It’s in the treaties. 170 countries are not EU members. Id it really unthinkable? Makes me wonder about the reaction to the real shocks coming  
Does the Market realize that a Brexit delay means delay in ECB stimulus? Meaning longer & deeper deflationary period in Eurozone & a bigger stimulus program required later. They need it but cant due to political Brexit process. Global derailment risk due to EU Prisoners Dilemma  
Watch the curious referendum web untangle. A deception involving two referendum campaigns, their strategies and overspend - prosecuted by overseas companies outside UK jurisdiction - has a common thread involving two right-wing ideologists. The UK needs a public inquiry.  
I agree with Dutch PM Rutte, NOTHING will be achieved by extending Article 50, our MPs have to decide, they either vote through May's compromise deal, or we leave without one. They can't warn of Brexit uncertainty and then seek to exacerbate said uncertainty through extensions.  
Labour can only push something (whatever that may be) AFTER Mays Brexit deal fails, otherwise LABOUR not the Tories, will be forever scapegoated as the party that 'ignored the will of the people'.It's that simple. 
This Tory leaflet makes particularly interesting reading with current Brexit events in mind.  
Liberal Democrats are ready to work with The Independent Group to bring about real change. For too long the traditional two-party politics of the past has failed to deliver for British people.Our first task must be to win a People's Vote on Brexit.  
5. On delaying Brexit date? Rutte said  'It's up to UK. If UK ask for delay, the EU will ask what do you want with it? We don't want to go round in circles for the next couple of months. What will be achieved by it?' 
So you think it would be fine to ignore the biggest democratic vote ever, that decided to Leave? Not forgetting the GE where 83% of MPs were elected on a manifesto that promised us #Brexit  
“The important thing about the 2016 referendum is the intervention of the almighty...”  Typically forthright stuff from Heseltine to @adamboultonSKY 
Corbyn utterly useless again, negotiating a Brexit to unite Britain. 
Lord Heseltine - I want to see a resolution of this uncertainty, which is doing unconquerable damage economically to our country. #Brexit  
If Buhari should win this election (God forbid)If Canada doesnt accept me..I will just join our Igbo brothers and be shouting Biafra referendum..or go and start teaching Mathematics in Ghana. 
Insurer Hiscox have tripled profit, London market ‘standout performer’. “Our business is ready for Brexit, even if British politicians are not.”  
Businesses are having to factor in the disruption a no-deal Brexit would bring. It's happening now.  That means reducing investment & stockpiling. Business needs no-deal to be taken off the table urgently. It's damaging the UK economy now. @josh_hardie on @SkyNews 
This is F**king outrageous! The British ppl voted to leave, not for a DEAL. Do this and the Tories are finished.Brexit latest news: Theresa May discusses delaying Brexit with Angela Merkel over breakfast in the desert    via @Telegraph 
'Brexit a project by the right to enrich the right ... Labour should support a second referendum' -- If Labour aids a Tory Brexit it will be destroyed by what follows | Aditya Chakrabortty  
Open rebellion against Brexit from this Fake Conservative   
Brexit is too important to be rushed. Let’s calm down and press ‘pause’ | Simon Jenkins  
I've finally found a concept/invention that is more pointless than #BrexitCan anybody better this for pointlessness?#pmht 
This country is suffering from a slow motion attack on our democracy by the Executive, with the Prime Minister attempting to impose her, and the ERG's, profoundly flawed version of #Brexit as a fait accompli. 
After meetings in Brussels and Madrid, it’s clear that Labour's alternative plan for Brexit is credible and could be negotiated with the EU.  
Is there a bigger wazzock in the entire United Kingdom than Patrick Minford of Economists for Brexit?(billboard location: Chorley, Lancashire)  
Colman on Brexit... pic.twitter.com/y1whKdky4U 
In solidarity with Kashmiris people.@UN should act on behalf of the Kashmir people.Unless political solvency, this situation can't change.This is disputed land & needs a referendum by Kashmir.!!@MuneebJanjuaT#ShamefulSilenceOnKashmir pic.twitter.com/x8VJ2HMgv7 
.@mrjamesob: "Where does Jeremy Corbyn stand on Brexit?"Corbyn supporter, Sean: "He campaigned for Remain"JOB: "Where does he stand today?"Sean: *word salad*JOB: "So, is he against Brexit?"Sean: *more word salad*JOB: "Sooner or later, the blinkers will have to come off." 
#brexit This is what 17.4 million people voted Leave EU think of you 3 muppets. All hopeless all 3 couldn’t organise a piss up in a brewery any of them.  
Peter Kyle promised that if we vote to leave, then we leave. No small print about a "confirmatory vote" (aka second referendum).If his amendment making Remain an option again passes then he and MPs backing it would be breaking promises and showing contempt to the electorate.  
Soon Labour will be able to add "enabled a right-wing Tory Brexit that lowered living standards for the many" to their list of achievements.  
Is there a correlation between people who think Brexit will be good for Britain and those that don't care that the referendum was fraudulent? 
If Cooper Letwin passes Weds, this becomes big historic week in parliament. Because their bill to delay Brexit would probably be debated in Commons Thurs. In Lords next week. With aim of becoming law by 13 March, before EU summit on 20 March (so PM can ask for delay). Timings TBC 
£45 trillion trade protected as UK & US strike deal, whatever the #Brexit outcome:"The UK is now covered by new memoranda of understanding that will allow contracts to operate the moment Brexit happens." 
#BREAKING: Ahead of a meeting with Theresa May in Egypt, Taoiseach Leo Varadkar is the most upbeat he’s been in while: “On the 29th of March, we’ll either have a deal or an extension.” #Brexit  
Some tabloid newspapers promised their readers who owned property that Brexit would make the market soar. It hasn't quite worked out like that.  
A no-deal Brexit is now unlikely to blow up the derivatives markets after a deal struck by US and UK regulators"London is, and will remain, a global centre for derivatives trading and clearing," said Christopher Giancarlo, chair of the US CFTC  
Much as being punched in the face isn't boxing, setting fire to your neighbour's house out of spite isn't British.This is the Brexit death spiral and we need to consider taking no deal on the chin to prevent it.There’s more to read here: 
In the end, there would be nothing left to remain in.Brexit is a disease and Britain is a contagion risk which could unpick the fabric of the whole of Europe and leave millions more people facing much worse than even no deal. 
If Britain did get an extension of 21 months, with full membership to continue until exit day, the Brexit Party would storm to seats in the EU Parliament at the spring elections and spend nearly two years working with a Putin-backed right to dismantle the project from the inside. 
‘Ideologically, I’m against Brexit because the world is getting bigger and pharmaceutical companies are getting bigger. The idea that we can take all this on as a standalone nation is risible.'  
The lunacy of trying to turn remain into the winners of the referendum must now be more than apparent. At the moment, the only loser is democracy but eventually everyone will lose if we allow our voting system to be trashed by globalists seeking a new world order. 
Pound to euro exchange rate: GBP rises as we get ever closer to Brexit. The world’s our oyster providing we actually leave..  
Lord Heseltine - #Brexit is doing incomparable damage politically & economically to our country... I want to see this whole sad, sorry, daminging story put back to the people.#peoplesvote #FinalSay #PoliticsLive #ALLOUTPOLITICS 
The Labour split seems a bit like Brexit. I reckon the TIG feel a bit of euphoria about choosing to Leave Labour but the steady realisation will come that life in the political wilderness isn’t all it was cracked up to be 
Japan to push ahead with U.S. base relocation despite Okinawa referendum result  
Truthfully this is my preferred location for Brexit reporting. I do not really see why I should move from here. Do you?  
Yet another quisling determined to wholly undermine the democratic wishes of the people. Brexit must mean a complete exit. Anything less is betrayal.  #WTOBrexitNOW 
Brexit Backer Arron Banks. How Much Is He Worth? - Bloomberg  
Brexit is like a group of friends who have great evening in a fantastic pub and then some of them decide to find another pub. Everyone squabbles about which pub to go to and they end up with no pub and no taxi to take them home. Meanwhile, the original pub is having a lock in. 
Guy Verhofstadt criticises Theresa May's 'reckless' decision to postpone meaningful vote on Brexit deal.Outrage from European Parliament over May's latest tactic. Heard any from UK Parliament? No, I didn't think so. 
He is unwatchable I had to turn off. RT @72holes: @adamboultonSKY @gerardjasper Adam “really I’m not biased” Boulton.. showing how deluded he is , the passion he attacks Brexit with is there for all to see . 
If Banks didn’t use his own money to fund Brexit it would break federal law in England. Banks and Trump met in December 2016 just as Banks was cozying up to the Russian ambassador 
‘Two weeks before it happens, we won’t know what Brexit means’ spot on from @mrjamesob 
Michael Heseltine informs Sky News that young people "have been betrayed by an older generation" over Brexit. Has this doddery Federast coprolite looked in the mirror recently?  
This is what truly great investigative journalism looks like. Bloomberg finds that Arron Banks £8M Brexit donation was approximately 1/4 of Banks’ entire portfolio of assets.  
EU backs down. Air safety certs will continue post-Brexit, without deal.The UK : Over 25% of all air passenger arrivals & departures in EU. Over 1/3rd of all intra-EU air traffic.Busiest airport in EU.5 out of top 10 air traffic routes in EU.Read:  
I am sick of people telling me when i voted Brexit poor old me didn't know what i voted for like. Closing the bloody borders, no more money to Brussels, governed by Westminster, getting our Sovereignty back, getting our fishing waters back. No customs union or single market OK. 
Of course most people who support Brexit are perfectly decent people and should not be insultedHowever, ALL those with far right tendencies are likely to support BrexitAnd YOU @BorisJohnson clearly have such tendencies as exhibited by your gleeful racism & empire-hankering 
.@YvetteCooperMP stole our money during the expenses scandal.She said she’d house refugees & didn’t.Now she’s trying to steal our #Brexit vote.She’s a hypocrite a liar & a thief. @NickBoles , the other sponsor of the Brexit blocking Cooper/Boles amendment is no better!  
Still incensed by @theresa_may’s decision to delay a second meaningful vote on her deal until 17 days before exit day. This has to be the week that we take the necessary steps to prevent a disastrous 'no deal' #Brexit and decisively shape what happens next. 
'Decent men and women, of all backgrounds and political affiliations and no matter how they voted in the referendum, have a breaking point, too.' An impassioned plea for sanity from @thatginamiller. 
A summary what's happening in Britain after brexit vote  
Bannon. Boris. Brexit.Brexit is a far right, law breaking projectLabour must stop it.#StopBrexit #PeoplesVote 
Tim Roache, General Secretary of the @GMB_union, calling for a #PeoplesVote on the Brexit deal READ his excellent argument for a public vote here & please RT:  
So called "no-deal" Brexit is in fact a misnomer. Leaving the EU on WTO terms is by far the best way for Britain to re-emerge as a power house in international trade. 
Along with the @TheFCA & @CFTC we are ensuring continuity in the UK and US derivatives markets – no matter the outcome of Brexit.  
WELL SAID BY @BorisJohnson "Delivering Brexit is about democracy. Under this Withdrawal Agreement... We leave the EU, but remain run by the EU."BREXIT IS ABOUT DEMOCRACYABOUT TAKING BACK CONTROLBADGER YOUR MP TO DO SO & NOT BLOW DEMOCRACY TO BITS 
I'd like to thank Hilary Pollock for organising a well attended public meeting in my constituency to review progress on Brexit. We talked for a couple of hours & covered the main topics incl. trade, the border, democracy, the Withdrawal Agmt & the current Parliamentary situation. 
Even by the standards of articles at Brexit Central this one defending the Department for International Trade is a horror show of snide remarks and basic errors 1/  
May 'considering two month Brexit delay', EU's Tusk 'would prefer two years'. For goodness sake, we can’t negotiate bilateral free trade deals until we depart and uncertainty will continue! Stand up to the EU, offer Art 24 of GATT and just leave 29 March..  
Brexit will significantly hamstring the ability of UK museums and libraries to digitize orphan works, leading to the closure of online archives that were created under EU copyright rules.     
Working on script of @BBCRadio4 programme I'm presenting on whether citizens' assemblies could break the Brexit deadlock. 4 March 8.30pm. Featuring @stellacreasy @bernardjenkin @alanjrenwick @JaneSuit @Boswell_JC & others. Feels timely  
We've reached the point where there is no good conclusion to Brexit. Britain faces a choice: take one for the team or be willing participants in the fall of Europe. You are not going to like this.The Brexit Death Spiral by me via ⁦@Byline_Media⁩ 
“It would be disastrous if we had a delay, What faith is left in our politics would evaporate. What we shouldn’t do now is take no deal off the table, which is what a whole lot of people who want to stop Brexit are going to try and do this week” @bernardjenkin#StandUp4Brexit 
Even a former World Trade Organisation boss thinks Brexit on WTO rules would make ‘no sense’  
The EU27 are far less prepared for no-deal Brexit than you’d think, says Pieter Cleppe  
BREAKING Theresa May and Angela Merkel just discussed delaying Brexit 
On Saturday at the Conservative National Convention – a meeting of the most senior members of the Voluntary Party - a motion backing a CLEAN Brexit delivered ON TIME was passed by an overwhelming ratio of 5:1.Well done @WorldofDinah  
A heartfelt plea to the media: *please* stop referring to a Brexit Article 50 extension as "taking no deal off the table" when it does nothing of the sort, but merely delays what's still the default outcome. Thank you. 
They accused us of 'Project Fear', but the real Project Fear was the decade-long campaign by the political right to whip up fear and hate against the EU, migrants, refugees and Muslims - designed to make frightened people seek the safety of a strong nation.#PeoplesVote #Brexit  
New Flash - May to be Sectioned under the Brexit Insanity Act.  
Nothing the 'Brexit Campaign’s Biggest Backer' says is clear, claims @DamianCollins MP. The UK cannot afford to wait for a trial verdict on Arron Banks. Brexit is just over a month away. EC already found criminality to legal standard. A50 must be revoked  
Construction experts from the CITB are predicting an extra 168,500 new construction jobs will be created over the next five years #DespiteBrexit.Construction employment is expected to reach 2.79m in 2023 – just 2% lower than its peak in 2008.#Brexit #NoDeal 
Only a handful of EU FTAs are so far agreed to be rolled over, with barely a month before Brexit day. Japan and Turkey definitely will not be. This is not a serious piece.  
No-deal Brexit would bring "severe disruption and terrible consequences" and a "real possibility" of shortages, Associated British Foods says  
Brexit's fiercest opponents are doing all they can to paint Leave supporters as 'hard right extremists'. But Brexit has support across the entire political spectrum. The picture they're painting could not be further from the truth. 
23 celebrities are urging @theresa_may to commit to a #BetterDealForAnimals, recognising that animals are sentient beings in law & protecting their welfare post #Brexit  @JoannaLumleyUK @sueperkins @Twiggy @MelanieCmusic @ChrisGPackham @RealMattLucas 
Dear Boris,Please don't get sick by people saying that you have far right tendencies. These views are unfounded. You are really a self-seeking, ambitious, yellow-vested buffoon who will do anything to get power and you couldn't care less whether Brexit wrecks our economy or not 
If, as looks increasingly likely, either the PM or parliament request a 2-3 month Brexit delay, MPs will congratulate themselves on their maturity and action.Don't be fooled. It would make it all worse.I hope that the EU would turn it down unless it came with A Plan. 
Such a shame that Brexit will make it much, much, much more difficult for artists to arrange gigs and work in one of the biggest parts of that global stage, eh, Trezzie? Money where mouth is, please.  
Maybe Brexit will be like Avatar 2, no one wants it but instead of admitting it they will just keep working on it forever 
I know this is stereotypical to the point of parody, but I have a Brexit-related observation about the Colman Oscar speech. 
Not everyone who sticks up for Brexit has far right tendencies, but almost everyone with far right tendencies sticks up for Brexit.  
Jilly Cooper and Joanna Lumley demand stronger animal rights after Brexit  via @telegraphnews 
This is Steve Bannon.. Steve Bannon influenced Trump's election,Steve Bannon influenced Brexit,Steve Bannon wants to influence a world war to make money,Steve Bannon was involved with Cambridge Analytica,Steve Bannon is a far right facist who wants to influence UK politics.  
What about Brexit Jackson? What about the fact that this levy doesn't actually exist as yet? What about the paintings Jackson? The paintings.....you're not really an honest man, are you?  
“Lexitism resembles gap-year self-indulgence – a flight of fantasy tried out by people secure in the knowledge they’ll never have to suffer the worst consequences.”Powerful from @chakrabortty on why Brexit is by the right, for the right. #PeoplesVote 
So Colm Eastwood, representing the SDLP says he really believes in a United Ireland BUT There’s a ‘special place in Hell’ for people who are calling for a referendum to actually achieve a United Ireland.  (According to Colm the Guru) 
The NCA is now investigating the source of Arrun Bank's financing for Brexit. But did it try to in spring 2016, during the campaign, but was stopped by May? The PM refuses to answer. Brexit is corrupt, not free & fair. It must be stopped & a full investigation held.#RevokeA50 
I do find it astonishing that so many don't realise that Brexit is the beginning of what they intend to do to us, not the end. Brexit just frees them from treaties that restrained them from following their worst impulses and ideology. 
I didn't go skiing last week so I have not, alas, solved Brexit. 
MPs voted for the referendum, promised to respect the result, voted to trigger Article 50 and stood on Brexit manifestos, now want to turn around to the British people and tell them Brexit is too difficult, that they should either vote again or accept two more years of stalemate. 
Sensible and successful businesses are ready for #NoDeal. Like insurers Hiscox, for example, who have just reported a huge profit for the year that beat market expectations.“Our business is ready for Brexit, even if British politicians are not” 
If you think Brexit negotiations are a mess, be amusingly reassured that this idiot isn’t involved. Then shudder as you remember that he’s leading the trade negotiations between the two most powerful nations on earth.  
Brexit is the worst of all things  
Former Environment Secretary Owen Paterson: "To have another two years of Brexit dribbling on would be incredibly damaging to our economy. Everyone is fed up with it."@JuliaHB1 | @OwenPaterson |  
If Labour aids a Tory Brexit it will be destroyed by what follows | Aditya Chakrabortty | Opinion | The GuardianExactly this. And there are some choice words for ‘gap-year Lexiters’ too (I loved that description! )  
Now the political class are trying to do the same with Brexit.#BBCQT 
The Prime Minister & our Wesrminster Parliament must be made aware of your view, at this moment in time. Thus a simple poll... "DO YOU SUPPORT BREXIT?"  (After voting, please re-tweet to reach the widest audience.) 
How nice to switch on the news this morning and hear a positive, happy top story for a change? Well done, Olivia Colman. Funny lady. Yours, Bored of Brexit. 
So May has a choice. Remain MPs resign if she doesn't delay Brexit, or carry out the democratic wishes of the people. That shouldn't even be a consideration in a civilised country. 
Morten Morland on #Brexit #TheresaMay #BrexitExtension - political cartoon gallery in London  
BREAKING: #Brexit could be delayed by up to two years as May postpones vote on deal.Oh, how brilliant!Two.More.Long.Years.Of.Talking.About.Brexit. 
Interestingly only 5% of people here in Ireland were personally opposed to abortion in all circumstances, and that was back in February 2016. Didn’t stop the issue being endlessly portrayed as deeply divisive here either. And then we won the referendum on the 8th by a landslide.  
We love Olivia Colman!(And not just for her brilliant acting) #Brexit #StopBrexit #RevokeArticle50 #PutItToThePeople #OliviaColman 
Putin has been waging war on the West for years. Hybrid war is war. US knows it. Now Italy does too, thx to investigative journos in L'Espresso who uncover evidence Putin is financing the fascist party for EU elections.Did the Kremlin buy Brexit? Is Russia behind Bank's money? 
Got to hand it to @theresa_may, she’s got some brass neck. Apparently, you can preside over a calamitous Brexit negotiation, multiple Govt defeats, an economy that’s tanking, the Windrush scandal & still expect to carry on regardless. Absolutely batshit.  
91% of MPs voted for the EU Referendum to take place. 78% of MPs voted to trigger Article 50. At General Election 90% of MPs were elected on manifestos committed to leaving the EU, including the Single Market and Custom Union.#BBCQT 
Okinawa: Tokyo to overrule referendum on US base  
The year is 2039. The biennial two-year Brexit delay has been performed for the tenth consecutive time. Former prime minister Theresa May is brought on stage for a ceremonial photograph.  
At UNISON we have joined forces with @the3million and @BritishInEurope for the past 2 years to ring fence citizens’ rights from the rest of the Brexit negotiations. This is our chance and we need everyone to contact their MP to support the Costa amendement!  
Jacob, we know you're not the brightest, but try to understand, THERE IS NO NEGOTIATION, THE NEGOTIATION FINISHED LAST YEAR. 
The FM has said she will set out the #indyref2 timetable within weeks even if #brexit is delayed  
No-deal Brexit will mean only three flavours of crisps  
If Labour aids a Tory Brexit it will be destroyed by what follows | Aditya Chakrabortty | Opinion | The Guardian  
Why doesn't anyone ever mention....................Alan Johnson was in charge of Labour's EU referendum campaign. While Corbyn was travelling all over the UK, giving speeches in favour of remain, what was Johnson doing?  
Remember the PM extolling the virtues of keeping "no deal" on the table?  Well...if ever there was a symbol of our broken politics this is it: Ministers are planning a “hardship fund” for Britons impoverished by a no-deal Brexit. We need to #ChangePolitics 
EU is reportedly considering a 21-month delay to Brexit to allow time to agree a future deal But it was the EU which refused to let the UK discuss trade during Article 50What's changed?They are gambling on UK politics shifting & support for 2nd referendum returning  
What are the three kinds of Brexit delay that EU leaders are considering and for which they are preparing?  
The labour market is broken.1 in 3 workers struggle to keep up with the basic cost of living Over half find their job increasingly stressful Only 3 in 10 think the economy works well for them Read our new report  #LabourMarketRealities #Brexit 
What is the point of delaying Brexit only kicking the can down the road! #WTOBrexitnow Brexit will be delayed by two months under plans being considered by Theresa May' | via @telegraph 
Under a no-deal Brexit, at least 145,000 traders would need to make customs declarations for the first time  
Brexit pool 
What Brexit really means Welfare cut due to ideological obsession with austerity now to be reversed Plans to make sure hospitals don’t run out of food Regions far from the south east ports where food imports arrive also at risk of shortages#JustMakeItStop 
Yet another ruinous Brexit delay leaves more than 100,000 companies in the lurch  via @bopinion 
MPs cannot stand by as Theresa May drags us towards a disastrous No Deal #Brexit.Her delaying tactics hold our constituents' rights, jobs and futures hostage.Parliament must wrest control from this reckless PM. I'll back @YvetteCooperMP's amendment to extend Article 50. 
Every day the referendum losers are trying to block Brexit using techniques such as hyped polling. Any further delay will lead to them saying the 2016 mandate is out of date.As Michael Portillo put it, there is an establishment conspiracy against Brexit.  
The whole point of Brexit was to "take back control of our borders" which we had control of all along. If @juliahb1 wants us to join Schengen well  I'm all for it. 
CRAZY: May 'considering two month Brexit delay', EU's Tusk 'would prefer two years'. UK must Leave on 29th March, as promised!  
An overview of how the EU27 aren't well prepared for no-deal #Brexit. Me for @SpecCoffeeHouse: 
PM says she now wants to stay on after Brexit to pursue domestic agenda. Hasn't she done enough damage already? She must really hate us all 
Mundell in Strangers Bar (where else? ) talking about Scottish people wanting an orderly Brexit. No! Scotland rejected Brexit.  
Excellent must read article!I’m sick of the BBC. From its one-sided...utterly dishonest reporting on climate change to its endless politicking against BrexitIf I could do one thing to improve the political health of Britain it would be to abolish the BBC  
Donald Tusk is refusing to hold another special #Brexit summit before the next ordinary #EUCO summit due 21-22 March, not least because  negotiations with UK ended last November and there is nothing new to agree. #r4today #eulassummit 
People in the USSR & eastern bloc were complicit - unwillingly, some even willingly- in the grand lie that their system & quality of life were superior. I always wondered how, but we see it happening in Brexit UK. Part of it is about developing a victim complex & external enemies 
The Conservative Party’s most senior activists overwhelmingly back a Clean Brexit on 29th March  via @BrexitCentral 
The motion backing Brexit that every Conservative Association should pass during this AGM season  
Brexit phrases I'm a bit bored with:Westminster bubbleBroad churchJust get on with itMalthouse compromiseOut means out 
That’s a new one. @DamianHinds says on @BBCr4today that the (record breaking) defeat of the Brexit deal wasn’t a defeat of the whole deal.  
Outrageous attack on Brexiteers, by govt minister @Tobias_Ellwood forgets 17.4 m voted Brexit, not just ERG, & Commons rejected PMs terrible deal by a record 230. He forgets he & Commons voted for no deal twice: Art 50 & 2018 EU Withdrawal Act. Another Democracy denier. 
Any MP going into work today and not doing all they can to wrestle control of brexit from her autocratic hands is complicit.It may well cost you your job, but you no longer have a choice, the good need to stand up and be counted #Brexit #StopBrexit#PeoplesVote 
The National Convention - the supreme body of the Tory’s voluntary wing - has voted overwhelmingly for ‘no-deal’ to be left on the table and Brexit to be delivered on time. Great write up from @WorldofDinah, who brought the motion that united the party! 
“Theresa May under pressure to delay Brexit,” the BBC tells us. What are you talking about? She’s delayed it for almost three years already 
People must not be used as a negotiating #BargainingChip. EU citizens in the UK & @BritishInEurope must not become collateral damage of an accidental no-deal Brexit. Please tell your MP to support the Costa Amendment this week.  
This articulates some of my problems with Lexit. It's not that it couldn't happen, it's that the Brexit that is happening is a right-wing project through and through, and yet some leftists seem happy to enable it without fully thinking through the implications.  
Hard to think of anything more insulting than arrogant MPs thinking they have a veto over #Brexit.MPs passed the decision to the voters. The voters decided.Most MPs don't like what has been decided.#ToughWe don't give a monkeys what a majority of MPs want.It is IRRELEVENT. 
"Why would the British left so blithely enable a Tory project that seeks to cripple it all over again?" Read @chakrabortty on why Labour should now back a 2nd referendum 
I am getting sick of the constant suggestion that anyone who tries to stop the out-and-out disaster that is Brexit must be an unpatriotic traitor, a saboteur, and an enemy of the people. Think on that rhetoric a while, and perhaps you'll find the truth behind your own complaint. 
"We urgently need a judge-led inquiry into foreign interference in our politics, in particular during the Brexit and Scottish independence referendums, and the 2017 general election." This needs to be said often and loudly.  
Certainly not.  I’m outraged that Brexit has survived at all.  It’s ruinous for most of us - the people were conned 
You are the most deceitful person to have held office of PM. You know the referendum was illegal you know it was corrupted by lies deceit and Russian money. You know it is definitely not the will of the people. Only Putin’s will. You will not be forgiven.  
Let us try to disentangle the various Brexit news threads of the last 12 hours or so - starting with this one from Politico - EU want the PM to prove she has Parliament's backing for anything they do. This is not new... 1/  
The EU27 are far less prepared for no-deal Brexit than you’d think, writes Pieter Cleppe 
Brexit moves towards its complete betrayal. Most likely outcome? May accepts no guarantees on Backstop & the Customs Union. ‘Not Really Leaving Deal’ accepted by Parl. May says we’ve ‘left’. An MSM propaganda campaign follows saying we must rejoin.  Hope I’m proved wrong. 
Church Of England Calls For 'Five Days Of Prayer' To Stop 'No Deal' Brexit  
Join us tomorrow with @DavidLammy @AlexSobel @JoStevensLabour @mdbuckley @mikegalsworthy @RupaHuq @TomMillerUK to talk about how to make a public vote on Brexit @UKLabour policy.As the Brexit clock ticks down it's time to act. Sign up here: 
My piece for Brexit Central explaining why I presented the motion to National Convention saying clean Brexit has to be delivered on the 29th March 19 @StandUp4Brexit 
Transforming Britain After BrexitCome and hear The Left Case Against The EU - events in Manchester, Liverpool, Durham, and LondonTickets free but booking essentialSupported by @labourleave @ExittheEU @politybooks @EReNSEP_Network#LeftBrexitTour 
Had voters known the truth that EU freedom of movement has resulted in innocent Brits being murdered and raped, the result of the referendum would have been:LEAVE     90%REMAIN    10%Over 700 East European killers found to be living in the UK  
We have so many things to be grateful to Olivia Colman for, but allowing everyone not to splash on Brexit for a day is a big one. 
Remainers get a bit giddy seeing me a British Indian immigrant - not only a proud Conservative but also a Brexiteer.Standing up for Brexit does not make me far-RightIt makes me stand right beside the majority of people backing  to take back control. 
News that Theresa May is bad at pool comes to no surprise to anyone who notices she’s SCREWED negotiations and is SNOOKERED unless on CUE she POCKETS a better deal to CUSHION Brexit before taking a REST I’m running out of puns here 
OMG, just read May wants to stay on after #Brexit to sort out the mess. God help the UK. 
TM is setting things up so that when her deal is voted down, she'll get the Letwin amendment passed meaning she can pretend it was Parliament that stopped Brexit, not her She destroyed Brexit, blame will land squarely at the door of the @ConservativesNo one will forget 
If Labour aids a Tory Brexit it will be destroyed by what follows. My column  
How the hell did the PM take us to a month from #Brexit day and nobody in the world knows what the UKs position will be the day it leaves.This is insanity. How are businesses supposed to prepare?#A50 must be extended to allow for clarity and decisions to be made. 
Boris Johnson: [No deal] "...is closest to what people actually voted for." Michael Gove: "During the referendum campaign, we were always arguing for a deal."The two leaders of Vote Leave don't agree.Brexit means whatever you want to save face & keep foreigners out  
One of the world’s largest economies deliberately plans for poverty. The Government has gone mad. This week the Commons can inject some sanity by ruling out no- deal. A referendum comes next. #PeoplesVoteNo-deal hardship fund planned for jobless 
‘You’re trying to stop Brexit’ not a sane response from @BBCr4today to @YvetteCooperMP in her valiant bid to save us from mad no deal exit. 
Scotland can either choose to remain with a Brexit UK, and be one of the poorest countries in Europe, or become independent, and become amongst its richest. It’s up to you, the choice is that stark - Dr. Paul Monaghan 
“Delivering Brexit is about democracy...There is nothing extremist, or zealous, or Right-wing, in sticking up for the democratic freedoms of this country”  
Apparently Theresa May is seriously considering a 2 month extension to our Brexit leaving date. I’m already picturing a raging Mark Francois giving himself a hernia live on the Parliament channel. Surely on this alone it’s worth doing. 
Well, I am going to state the blindingly obvious.The Brexit thing is not going away from UK politics in the next twenty years. Whatever happens its always going to rumble on.Depressing thought for a 60+ year old. But the fight goes on for my yet unborn grandchildren! 
Law in Action returns tomorrow with a visit to @UKSupremeCourt. We talk to staff, officials and the court’s most senior justices. Why do they allow some appeals and refuse even to hear others? How activist are they? What effect did the Brexit case have?   
The Conservative Party’s most senior activists overwhelmingly back a Clean Brexit on 29th March, writes @WorldofDinah 
Brexit is a hard-right project that was conceived and delivered by hard-right ideologues. Seriously, would you look at the absolute state of @DominicRaab's quote here.(billboard location: Wellington St, Stockport) 
#brexit Theresa May one hopeless  Prime Minister. Hasn’t got a clue how to get a good Brexit deal got worst deal in history. Theresa May loves waving white flag  to EU. Sitting on the fence & DITHERING. Never wanted us to leave EU. Still doesn’t grow a backbone FFS.  
•Corbyn Customs Union unite country save economy •Corbyn 2nd referendum amendment •Corbyn anti austerity free education no more war tax the rich and stop privatisation •The TIG prop up May more neoliberalism more poverty more austerity and more wars 
Why is this not THE top news story? While they are all running around messing up Brexit, too little attention is being given to this. 
Brexit delayed is Brexit betrayed.It is coming down to the wire. Most MPs don’t want to leave and May wants her Withdrawal Agreement. Neither want a real WTO Brexit.UKIP is ready to rub the Tories off the European electoral map if we are betrayed.  
All of these risks of No Deal Brexit are known by the Govt & yet the PM is actively preparing to inflict this avoidable chaos & pain. A future public inquiry will not spare the bystanders & ministers need to take a stand against this immediately 
Brexit - the most damage any peacetime government has done to the UK. All in the Conservative Party interest.32 days to go and Brexit is still indefined, unplanned, uncertain...Industries are leaving, businesses collapsing #ShameOnYouTories #GroundhogDay #BrexitShambles 
As with every period of peak Brexit activity, the British media and social media environments will be loaded with disinformation, so apply the rules of dealing with information properly.Also, when you hear things which you see as "good", please think beyond your own interests. 
According to Google Trends, most people already believe Brexit has been delayed until 2021.This isn't true.In order for any extension to take place Britain has to ask (nothing has been done here yet in Parliament), the EU27 have to agree (unlikely).Beware unicorns. 
PM has arrived at summit already and is having the first meeting of the day with Merkel - if you want to catch up on what's going on, have a read - this might be a big week for Brexit  
If Labour aids a Tory Brexit it will be destroyed by what follows | Aditya Chakrabortty  
Nobody can keep @theresa_may out of party as we are EU member, but suggestion there are opportunities to debate Brexit are disingenuousThere are no meaningful negotiations with Brussels, deal is closed, there is no justification for delaying meaningful vote#StopTheChickenGame 
Beyond sick of the ’constant suggestion’ by lying brexiters that there are any benefits to any brexit other than to tax avoiders, deregulating money-grubbers & Putin.Criminal misconduct in public office. Bring on the brexit enquiry. #RevokeA50 
PM receives hug from Bulgarian leader whose country is most corrupt in EU: Proximity to authoritarian Hungarian leader Orbán also of concernWe are distanced from mainstream EU leadership and Brexit is not on the agenda at Sharm-el-Sheik #EULAS 
Mrs May has gone to the desert to plan for BrexitThe whole country will join her if she succeeds 
How NY sees Brexit: "understood by few, opposed by the young, abetted by a dissembling anti-American Labour leader, driven by little-England Tory right-wingers holding the country for ransom, and, according to polls, no longer wanted by the majority."  
Nice to see @foeeurope have steamed into the Brexit political ads on Facebook with a solid message against no deal and running 390 of the 760 live ads, directly up against Britain's Future who are running 220 in favour of no deal.  
Great that Tom Watson will be on the Stop Brexit march on 23 March. Leadership 
EU want Brexit delayed until 2021 for more negotiations. Nothing to stop negotiations post Brexit and they can then take place in London with us producing the agenda. 
Brexit anxiety alert: For the first time since the financial crisis, U.K. business investment has fallen four quarters in a row  via @bopinion 
Confirmed by her QC in court that she knew the referendum was poisoned and corrupted.  
Former Foreign and Commonwealth Secretary, @BorisJohnson MP, has renewed his call for a Trans-Tasman style free-movement area between the #UK and #Australia after #Brexit.#CANZUK #cdnpoli #auspol #nzpol #ukpolitics 
The court of appeal confirmed last week that the illegalities in the 2016 vote were enough that had it been binding it would have been quashed.MPs not fighting Brexit with everything they have are supporting electoral fraud. The UK will be torn apart if this is not stopped 
‘The Cabinet is at war, May is running down the clock and the public just want Brexit delivered whether that is with or without a deal’  
Okinawans say resounding "No" to U.S. military base relocation plan in referendum  
800 hours until Brexit & Mrs May hasn’t a clue what to do - except to try and stop the people trying to stop her catastrophe 
NHK, the public broadcaster, seems to be leading the effort to report deceptively about the results of the Okinawa referendum by taking all eligible voters as the 100% instead of those who actually voted. Honestly, we suspect direct involvement from the Abe government. (MP)  
Remember only 8% of UK businesses trade with the EU. 92% don’t.  All businesses worth their salt factored AWTO Brexit in long ago. Over 90% of World Trade is on WTO terms, it’s hardly a cliff edge. Lets go & then negotiate our free trade deal with the EU at a distance.  
Brexit: Theresa May under pressure to consider Brexit delay  
What about the democratic "52%" for Brexit? The people of the United Kingdom voted to leave the European Union with the support of only 37.4% of eligible voters. It was a referendum, just like in Okinawa. But we don't talk about the pro-Brexit 37.4%, do we? (MP) #Henoko 
Irony alert - GCHQ needs, in extremis, to be able to use cyber tools to disrupt, deny or degrade threats from overseas though such actions must be governed by appropriate international and domestic laws. - which we'll then ignore if it suits our goal. 
OLIVIA COLMAN’S SPEECH JUST FIXED BREXIT.  
Japan to push ahead with U.S. base relocation despite Okinawa referendum result  
Meanwhile, the Yomiuri Shinbun, Japan's largest circulation newspaper and known to be very close to the government, raises eyebrows by being the only newspaper that didn't report Okinawa's referendum as headline news. Utterly shameful. (MP) #Henoko 
An interesting look at how Japanese newspapers covered (or didn't cover) the #okinawa referendum in their front pages today  
Theresa May signals she is keen to stay after Brexit 'to deliver domestic agenda'  
Brexit: running to the wire - not any of us could have guessed that our political establishment could so mishandle the Brexit process that we could be in such a position. The adults have taken a holiday and left the children in charge...   #Brexit.  
Corbyn's Labour seemed cool until they voted to renew Trident, backed hard Brexit and prioritised hurting the SNP over fighting Tories. 
#Cuba: Voters take part in referendum on new constitution that expands recognition of private property. New constitution, replacing 1976 version, recognises limited role for free market, private investment. 
UK PM May considers plan to delay Brexit by two months: The Telegraph  
Did I just watch a film about menstruation beat a film about migrants to win an Oscar? Yes. Yes I did.Gee.. Wonder why Trump / Brexit? 
The Brexit process totally mishandled by UK govt, EU Commission& EU leaders. When Art 50 invoked 2 years ago I recall saying the process would likely go beyond the Lisbon Treaty timetable b/c breaching deadlines is how the EU always handles difficult decisions  
This is another of the most ridiculous articles.  What about the 2018 election which was a referendum on trump and the gop, and the margin was dems 69% to 29% gop... among latinos.  Lordy Moses. 
Enrol to vote!Have your say!Don't complain, make a differenceThe election is a few weeks away. We have seen the impact of low enrolment & low turnouts with Trump (WTF!) & Brexit (WTF squared)Don't let that happen in hereHere's the link - enrol now   
Brexit favours 1% of the populationWithin that 1% are the owners of newspapers who don't pay UK tax but influence the ppl who do pay taxBut hey, blame the immigrant, blame the EU, blame the unemployed, blame the disabledBrexit = Blame yourselves for not doing enough to stop it 
@BenKTallmadge is correct....a lot of operations are coming from Ireland. Isn't that where there is an Anti-Brexit issue going on? 
Clear of Brexit's teething troubles, 2020 could be a boom year for the UK - just as long as we fully leave the EU..  
#Brexit regret is at its highest everNo idea which part of hell #Brexiter MPs will end up in...but one thing's  for sure I hope it's not the same one they have put #Remainers through for nearly 3 yrs as I won't be responsible for my actions if we meet. 
Mail reporting an ERG member has warned "If May said she’d extend Article 50, there’d be 20-plus MPs who would just take their bat and ball home: No domestic legislation, no Brexit legislation, they just wouldn’t be showing up any more. It would effectively end the government" 
The very next day Okinawan people said "NO" in the prefectural referendum, the construction continues as if nothing happened.Is this what a democratic country should do?#Okinawa#Henoko 
"Abe: Govt. sincerely accepts referendum result"To Abe, "sincerely accepts" apparently means "contemptuously ignores".  
BTW Angus what's 'hard' Brexit to do with it? Scotland voted decisively for NO Brexit. ANY Brexit is irreconcilable with promised continued EU membership on which 2014 NO vote was predicated. Add WM power grab on devolution under cover of Brexit & #IndyRef2 NOW is imperative. 
So yoons are going to argue that Scotland leaving the UK is harder than Brexit, how?  Scotland has a defined border and just like every other independent country will control and tax what happens within that border, it’s just England will struggle with the loss! #DissolveTheUnion 
A delay of a few weeks to Article 50 plays into Theresa May's hands, because it bumps us up against the hard deadline of the European elections. All she has to do is kick the Brexit can for a few more weeks, and we'll be stuck, unable to extend A50 again. @YvetteCooperMP 
It has to be strike action to have impact. This is the next two in the fight against brexit. If every remainer left their metaphorical desk and took to the street we could bring this country to a stand still. See how she likes to be held hostage by us. 
PM Abe says Okinawa base move to go ahead despite referendum outcome  
Hence the over representation of wealthy billionaires in the media and multi millionaires behind the scenes that want this project to succeed so badly.It's all about wealth, Brexit voters were just useful idiots, desperate to believe the false promises & lies of a promised land 
The EU, including Martin Selmayr, are reportedly considering a 21-month Brexit delay I've warned about this beforeIt would be VERY difficult for MPs both Leave & Remain to back thisIt would mean more uncertaintyThe public would rightly conclude Brexit itself was at risk  
Follow the money & it leads to very wealthy far-right/alt right protagonists. Simple logic, fact finding, leads us to the truth. Brexit was *always* a far-right project. It would only favour the laissez-faire capitalists, those that want a bonfire of regulations & tax rules. 
I used to visit my friends in England all the time and was greeted as a friend. Now I disguise my Scottish accent with it's highland lilt at times.Labour not opposing Brexit Caused that I'm afraid. (See how stupid that sounds?) Tsk! Oh and they dinna like ma Scottish Tenners 
The source of this information is @VickerySec, the director of cybersecurity at Upguard, who has testified to Parliament about Brexit and Cambridge Analytica/SCL and who also has discovered at least 3 massive voter data leaks since 2015.  1/ 
There is "criminal". A criminal PM exploiting a criminally corrupted referendum acting like a Mafia gangster threatening to push the country off the no-deal cliff if her demands are not met, or even worse deliberately seeking to push the nation off the no-deal cliff. 
Nowhere near as sick of we are of you pretending that a hard Brexit would be a stroll in the park.  Own your nonsense and be honest with the UK for once. Help call Brexit off before you do irreparable damage. 
Brexit could be delayed until 2021 on EU Initiative, EU sources reveal. I consider this news believable b/c Martin Selmayr, the real power in EU Commission, is promoter  
Electoral colleges just closed in #CUBA for the Constitutional Referendum and we have already some US beaurocrats denying the meaning of this exercise. Why they don’t try to do something better at home. Good luck!!  
Exclusive: Ministers plan a “hardship fund” for no-deal Brexit 
May failed to secure a breakthrough “deal in the desert” during talks with European leaders in Egypt. Now she proposes the EU to delay Brexit by two months extending article 50, to try to avoid resignations by ministers who are against no-deal Brexit 
Today, through its forced constitutional referendum, the Communist Party renewed the legal pretext to deny the people of #Cuba the change they desire. The people of Cuba deserve to be able to exercise their fundamental freedoms and build a future they freely choose. 
Rohrabacher - considered by many to be a Russian asset - must have played a considerable role in #Brexit. @Nigel_Farage went fishing with him soon after, and he’s mates with Arron Banks’ family 
That the Government, without consulting Parliament has decided to defer until 2023After BrexitAfter transition.And against the advice of the security servicesTo give the crooks and cheats plenty of time to moveThe 4th page is the key bit from the @CommonsForeign report. 
.@IanDunt's latest piece for the @washingtonpost contains a precise definition of #Brexit: Just my opinion.@MarieAnnUK@OFOCBrexit@brexit_sham 
I’m getting sick of the constant rhetoric that brexit is the ‘will of the people’, because it damn well isn’t. It’s a pack of lies people were sold to benefit the wealthy few!!! As for the far right, yes this is their monstrosity . You should be ASHAMED of yourself!! 
The mysterious finances of the Brexit campaign’s biggest backer  
#Brexit looks set to become the yardstick by which all political disasters are measured. Rather like the Titanic is the yardstick for maritime disasters.A byword for dishonesty, incompetence & chaos."OK, it's pretty bad," people will say. "But it's not exactly Brexit, is it?" 
cod makes up 5% of British catch; haddock 7%. Biggest catch is herring of which 90% is exported; mostly to the Netherlands and Scandinavia; with hard Brexit, there will be heavy tariffs so that market will be hurt.  
No chance in my house. And more fool you. They’ve failed completely to inform or educate on the impact of Brexit for three years. Nostalgia, repeats & arrogance over their anti Scotland agenda won’t cut it. I hope it dies a quick death. 
"yes Fiona, let's not forget it's Corbyn's inability to deal with AS due to his Marxist, entryist, Trotskyist, Stalinist, Communist, IRA tendancies and the fact he caused the 2008 crash that lead to Brexit in the first place". *Audience claps like SeaWorld seals* 
"Piccaninnies". "Watermelon smiles". "Letterboxes". Not everyone that sticks up for Brexit has far right tendancies. But you sure do. 
Newspaper headlines: Brexit delay talk as PM sets vote deadline  
The politicians have had nearly 3 years to deliver the Brexit people voted for; this has all the hallmarks of an unforgivable betrayal: 'Exclusive: Brexit will be delayed by two months under plans being considered by Theresa May'  via @Telegraph 
I think this is great. If May can't deliver Brexit by 29th March she should force a GE. She should sack the ministers and say the people are way more important than any minister or MP. She will romp home.  
Okinawa referendum rejects new US military base but Abe likely to press on #Okinwa #Henoko  
This has just been tweeted by piers Morgan and I think it sums @theresa_may up to a T those who believe anything she as said are mad. She is goi g to use blackmail to get this deal through which is NOT BREXIT it's a surrender of the UK TWO is the only true brexit  
Theresa May signals she wants to stay in power post-Brexit 
Read foreign newspapers about Brexit. You will immediately see how skewed and mendacious  the local English discourse about Brexit is. Especially on the BBC. 
People really need to get over this idea that holding a 2nd referendum wld provide some sort of legitimacy to cancelling Brexit. It wldn't, & it wld be extra enraging precisely because of its *pretence* at legitimacy. If you must abandon democracy, have the decency not to pretend 
“Let me put a wee bit of chalk on yer nib hen” #brexit #TheresaMay #janeygodleyvoiceover #arlenefoster 
Marquette University Professor Jeffrey Coleman explains how he himself experienced a catalanophobic incident while walking the streets of Madrid on the day before the referendum.  
Not all who 'stick up for Brexit' have far right tendencies - but all with far right tendencies do.....Anyway, how'd the meetings go with white supremacist, and unofficial hard right Tory aide Steve Bannon? And Alexander Nix? He's had it tough lately: 
my one night stand didn't even vote for brexit wtf 
Nor should anyone who scrutinises Brexit of any form be labelled a saboteur, traitor or muntineer. Inflammatory name-calling helps no one, and debases the quality of this critical debate  
Brexit is broken.#StopBrexit 
The longer-term benefits of a clean Brexit will be well worth any short-term costs.  
All Hail the #FBPE Why won't my Doctor stop me eating fry ups?Why won't my wife stop me putting the milk in the cupboard?Why won't my cat stop me stubbing my toe on the kitchen door frame?Why won't Jeremy stop Brexit? 
The Court of Appeal heard the case of Wilson & others v The Prime Minister on the 21st February 2019.James Eadie QC, representing the Prime Minister, conceded the EU Referendum met the criteria for illegality. Theresa May is well aware of it & is carrying on regardless. 
A second referendum would be absolute folly. If leave won again, why would remainers accept that anymore than the first. If remainers won, it definitely would not be accepted by leavers. Would there be a third to break the tie? This is Labour Policy. Crazy isn’t it 
Brexit Delivery GroupHere is the wording of the proposed amendment by Andrew Percy and Simon Hart that seeks to secure an extension without Cooper/Boles constitutional implications (All subject to EU saying yes, amid signs they could insist on 21 month extension)  
So it now looks as if the Labour Party is finally admitting it will demand another Referedum on Brexit. But if the majority vote Leave, as before, what then? Will Mr Corbyn and his Marx Brothers sit on the fence for another three years like they have done? 
At roughly £5,000 per column that's £714 for each of the Brexit far Right zealot's seven words on the front page. Or chicken feed as the serial liar called it  
I’ve voted for Labour on many occasions. But, with deep regret, I cannot vote for the Labour Party in its current function and form. There’s a distinct lack of leadership on Brexit and also antisemitism. We need strong opposition more than ever right now and we aren’t getting it. 
Perhaps that's it. Perhaps the entire Brexit negotiations have been an elaborate hustle. The prime minster's going to come back next week and reveal that she's got everything she asked for, plus Angela Merkel's BMW. And Calais.  
African friend who hoped we'd vote Remain in euref can't believe we're now considering cancelling Brexit. Says every 3rd world dictator will use this as an excuse & example every time they overturn a vote they don't like. Says UK election observers won't be welcome in future. 
Before Johnson embarrassed us as Foreign Secretary, he championed the Garden Bridge as MayorLike Brexit, we're still dealing with his mess and we deserve answersThat's why we support @CarolinePidgeon's demand that the Charity Commission investigates 
Theresa May sets up choice between her Deal and the risk of deferring Article 50 & a public vote. MPs should vote to let the public decide whether to remain strong in the EU or to Brexit into poverty, division & isolation.  
Philip Hammond also pushing hard for a Brexit delay behind the scenes - he delivered the Rudd/Gauke/Clark article to PM’s Chief of Staff Gavin Barwell before it was published last week. 
Report which flags - "UK is in an ironic position: the government is determined to exit the EU and Theresa May refuses to countenance letting the public revisit the question, even though the public is increasingly against Brexit."Yes UK is #Remainernow 
What’s your policy on Brexit then Chris?  What we heard from your Tory colleagues this week sounded exactly like Labour policy. When you’re done playing political games maybe you’ll let us know..  
Latest: Remain Cabinet ministers want May to spell out a timetable this week for a Brexit delay under No Deal to stop their rebellion 
I know!!! How infuriating when it’s just as likely they are supporting Brexit as they benefit from off shore tax avoidance practices.  
Still manipulating who can forget the Lisbon Treaty signed by GB how easily you gave so much power away without the permission of the people #shameful Gordon Brown calls for MPs to delay Brexit for up to 12 months  
Given that everyone knows that elements of the Hard Left also support Brexit, and that Brexit voters spanned all political parties, you are clearly just looking to fuel the narrative that remainers think all Brexiteers are nazis. Your gutter politics must make you so very proud. 
@BBCPolitics boss of Electoral Commission says an EU referendum would take 10 weeks  
TIMES: May delays crucial vote until 17 days before Brexit #tomorrowspaperstoday 
Yes this will be the first step in trying to stop Brexit.Be prepared for a lot of deceit to come our way.Remember her promise never to delay Brexit .We would be leaving on the 29/3/2019.Pure pretence.  
The Washington Post has done what no one else has managed to do. They’ve worked out what Brexit means.  
I am getting sick of the constant suggestion that anyone who sticks up for Brexit must have far right tendencies  
Leaving no deal on the table for so long has torpedoed our businesses and family life, we'd be happy to swap and torpedo Brexit instead.  
The charlatans, if there are any, are @theresa_may and her cabinet. As @vote_leave said, this is what SHOULD have happened. They rejected this advice. I still cannot make up my mind whether May is deliberately scuppering Brexit or whether she’s just incompetent.  
UK Parliament must #RevokeA50 stop Brexit!Also we need public enquiry into all Brexit fraud crimes. Including @theresa_may's cover up of Banks crimes! 
You wanna see something spooky? Here's an excerpt from a post I wrote 5 days after #Indyref. | #brexit #scotref #indyref2 
.@theresa_mayYou know very well that the referendum result was gained by criminal acts.By continuing to force it through, you demonstrate that you do not care at all about the duties of your office. #RevokeArticle50 now! 
You've heard of the Suffragettes: these are the Suffrapets.Bring your pooch to the biggest dogs dinner ever held. A candle-lit dinner on linen tablecloths outside the Houses of Parliament. #Brexit #BrexitDogsDinner #StopBrexit 
“Taking no deal off the table could torpedo Brexit completely” - these are incredibly wise words from Conservative Northern Ireland Minister John Penrose MP, who campaigned for Remain  
Theresa May dismisses pressure to step down as PM after Brexit  
The PM will be dragged kicking and screaming to disavow No Deal. The Labour leader will be dragged kicking and screaming to a People’s Vote. Probably. #brexit 
Until the referendum he called , Cameron to me was largely just background noise.  May overtook him in awfulness a long ago with her xenophobic policies, her blind, obsessive desire to “deliver Brexit” and sheer contempt for Parliament. 
The only person who can solve #Brexit now is John Virgo  
#Exclusive: #Brexit will be delayed by two months under plans being considered by Theresa May 
Guardian front page, Monday 25 February 2019: EU chiefs discuss plans to postpone Brexit until 2021  
The Irish take on Brexit has been amazing for me. It's been truthful, informed and even kind.God knows we don't deserve it  
But brexit was her decision  
Schrödinger's Brexit: "Our relationship with the EU must change." "Why must our relationship with the EU change?"  
It's been over two years since May promised certainty and a smooth, orderly Brexit that would make us stronger, fairer, more united and more outward-looking than ever before.It has been a catastrophic failure on all counts.It's time for a #PeoplesVote 
33 days to a possible hard Brexit ...What would be the best plan for Scotland in that eventuality? 
McCluskey had one job, protect his members jobsInstead he wanted to protect Corbyn & #Brexit, now his members are paying the priceThe leader of Unite should only have one message "Brexit or no Brexit, I won't support anything that threatens my members jobs"  
Give the public the #FinalSay on #Brexit says @GMB_union 
Brexit tonight was settled by unconventional means  
Still amazes me that many cannot comprehend that reasonable people can value things beyond money and what they can buy when it comes to making life-defining choices. This applies both to the decision to study philosophy or to vote for Brexit.   
The front page of tomorrow's Daily Telegraph: 'May draws up plans to delay Brexit by 2 months' #tomorrowspaperstoday 
The Economist has built a model that calculates an individual's attitude to Brexit  
Politicians will blame the EU for their failures (which is historically what got us here)They failed to inform the public in a referendum they called, failed to take control of a clearly disastrous Brexit. Now their only way out is to blame the EU for resorting to a referendum. 
I just witnessed something I never thought possible - which is @theresa_may playing pool against the Italian premier Giuseppe Conte. The PM has definitely shed inhibitions in pursuit of a backstop change, though I pray to god she didn’t wager our Brexit future on the game... 
Brexit is in 6 weeks. An entire country is still waiting for politicians to decide what this actually means for ordinary people & their lives.Brexit means Brexit is Gaslighting.We should sue the lot of them for crimes against our collective mental health. 
It's ironic that the only political party in Westminster which supports revoking Article 50 are @theSNP. They're the only party which genuinely want to save the UK from the devastation of Brexit. 
WARNING:Parliament knows an Article 50 extension is needed.The EU won't grant one just so we can keep faffing around.The only way to guarantee that we'll have a final answer on the deal is a ratification referendum.This will be painted as "the EU making us vote again". 
Ben Jennings on efforts to get Jeremy Corbyn to support a second referendum –  #Brexit #TheresaMay #BrexitExtension - political cartoon gallery in London  
.@BorisJohnson: "There is nothing extreme about standing by democracy" Sign up to Leave Means Leave & campaign for a proper Brexit @ 
“Taking no-deal off the table would remove the strongest card we have in our negotiation with the EU and would fundamentally weaken our position.“The risk of failing to deliver on Brexit itself is too great to be contemplated" @LiamFox#StandUp4Brexit 
 Brexit delay latest Brexit Delivery Group is proposing an amendment to delay exit until May 23rd. Senior Tories believe this amendment could get the tacit nod from No.10 to avoid "constitutional upheaval” of Cooper-Letwin.  via @financialtimes 
Global Britain logic for Brexit calls to leave the largest political and economic union on Earth, over which UK held huge sway, to somehow become a bigger player on the world stage. Onwards, then, onwards, May and Corbyn, to a muddled and muddied future. 
Exclusive:Brexit will be delayed for up to two months under plans being considered by Theresa May to extend Article 50No 10 officials have drawn up a series of options for PM ahead of crunch votes this week. Extending A50 is among them 
The Tories have embraced Brexit as a mythic nativist destiny towards which we must all march loyally. Labour, meanwhile, is in thrall to the old left determinism; all core debates have long since been settled, devotion to the leadership must be absolute 
“I can’t understand why people claim that anyone who wants to get out of the EU – and follow the instructions of the British people – is an extremist. If we get Brexit right, we’ll have the chance to be more compassionate than ever before” @BorisJohnson 
Please pause for a moment to consider that every constituency in Scotland Voted to RemainScotland Voted 62% Remain Yet the First Minister of  Scotland,The Scottish Government & Scottish SNP MPs at Westminster have all been BLOCKED from all Brexit negotiations by this MADWOMAN 
Mmm, that's a great reason to take a no deal #Brexit off the table!  
Brexit could be delayed until 2021 under plans being explored by the EU’s most senior officials, at a time of growing exasperation over Theresa May’s handling of the talks. - Bring on the Inquiry. 
Absolutely, Bill cc @aliasvaughn @ushadrons this is beyond a priority and one reason I argued this weekend to delay Brexit. We must not allow @mfa_russia to get any kind of a grip on EU affairs. @EmmanuelMacron I hope agrees @GCHQ @Geurtie 
Theresa May seems hell bent (correct term), to deliver a brexit that was the will the people  (who were allowed to vote), a product of electoral fraud, over 2 1/2 years ago, and now would be opposed by a 10pt margin in most opinion polls.It's a form of madness. 
She hasn’t asked for the Withdrawal Agreement to be reopened. You know it & so do we - Brussels made it clear she hasn’t so May can no longer hide behind their skirts while trying to pull-the-wool at home. The Tory party is  going to block Brexit & then all hell will break lose. 
Look around the Western world. If you want dysfunctionality, there are only two places to go: London and Washington (via @bopinion) 
Horrified.Just had lovely dinner with dear friends on central London. One of them works in solicitor's offices thought that "no deal" meant no brexit. Shocked!! Truth, I promise. Seen others say the same on Twitter... 
The other 27 nations of the EU are:1. our political partners2. our customers3. our suppliersso far as 'leaving' goes, we can only change the first relationship, and by doing so inevitably damage the other two. There is no "Brexit" from 2 and 3: it's a myth. 
Clue: the British Govt has no intention of passing the Withdrawal  Agreement. Their intention is to postpone Brexit, with the ultimate aim of stopping it ever actually happening.  
Particularly if those same MPs argue for a 2nd Referendum on the basis that “the conditions have changed”It’s naked hypocrisy, so cynical, how do they get away with it?AND they claim to represent #ChangePolitics!#SplittersCoup 
.       Note to sub editor..Egypt is famed for its DesertsIdaho is famed for its Desserts             #JustSayin#Brexit  
Liam Fox slaps down Cabinet colleagues over plan to halt no-deal Brexit 
#Brexit could be delayed until 2021, #EU sources reveal -- EU reportedly determined to avoid uncertainty of 3-month extension requests May delays meaningful vote on final Brexit deal, promises to hold vote by 12 March  /via @guardian 
Fantastic news, thank you @LabourStudents  Young people across the country are overwhelmingly opposed to #Brexit. We can't let their futures be stolen from them.The #Labour leadership must follow your lead. They must back a #PeoplesVote and campaign to #Remain in the EU. 
Wollaston uses the analogy on Brexit that you wouldn’t agree to surgery without being advised  of the outcomeWell Sarah your constituents voted for you because you were a Tory MP standing to uphold Article 50 and confirm Brexit and not for you to become an Independence MP 
No Conservatives will support a Labour Brexit @jeremycorbyn, just like none supported your counter-EEA amendment in June 2018.It is literally futile. A waste of precious time. A stupid can kicking exercise. A political game.Campaign for a public vote. Respect the members. 
Glad to have signed this letter, along with many other health professionals & patient groups, warning of the significant avoidable harm that would happen in the case of a No Deal Brexit. It really would be an act of monumental recklessness and stupidity.  
We're taking the historic Brexit pronouncements of our political leaders, turning them into tweets and slapping them up on massive billboards across the nation. See thread for scores of pictures of the project so far (we're 100% crowdfunded - see url link) 
21/ This is VERY significant. What roll did Rohrabacher play to aid the Kremlin in the U.S. on BREXIT? 
Time to delay Brexit, not just the meaningful vote. 
“A lengthy extension of the negotiating period is gaining traction as the EU’s default position should the Commons continue to reject May’s deal, and a request emerge.”Brexit could be delayed until 2021, EU sources reveal  
Agree. Absolutely loved this from @NicolaSturgeon I may disagree with her on many things but her leadership on Brexit & standing up for immigrants has been excellent & refreshing  
Remind me again, how many Labour voters voted to Leave? Around 8 million? How does a 2nd (or 3rd) referendum square that circle. It doesn’t, does it? You only have financial backing, Leave has the nation.  
Your regular reminder that the charlatans at @vote_leave specifically ruled out No Deal before the referendum.(billboard location: Hagley Rd, Birmingham)  
BBC News - Ministers spend £100m on Brexit consultant contracts  One day we can reflect on how we wasted so much money on Brexit. Politics needs to be reformed and this government accountable. #reformpolitics with @renewparty #brexitshambles 
Tom Watson 'likely' to be at PV rally 23/3 unless May moves to Labour's deal..Labour needs to back a people's vote now not 6 days before brexit  
75. Oxford St, Bilston"If Brexit is a disaster I will go and live abroad, I'll go and live somewhere else." - @Nigel_Farage 
On the right mom & son on a day out, Labour do not care about loyal voters, they only care about obstructing brexit.  
Hard to think of anything more insulting than arrogant MPs thinking they had a veto over #Brexit.MPs passed the decision to the voters. The voters decided.Most MPs don't like what has been decided.#ToughWe don't give a monkeys what a majority of MPs want.It is IRRELEVENT. 
Japan/U.K.now:-The Conservative party and its leaders cannot be trusted. They ignore warnings, break their word and do not understand business – personified by Old Etonians Boris Johnson and Jacob Rees-Mogg. Brexit is a first-order disaster,  
Does anyone still believe ultra remain campaigners and MP's want an extension to find solutions? If we leave the EU with No Deal much of the blame will lie with those who refused to accept the referendum result and have complicated the process from day 1.  
Is Brexit actually a good thing? #LeaveMeansLeave #FBPE 
EU won't reopen agreement so what's the point in extending Article 50 - just a wheeze to stop brexit 
The only upside of #Brexit is that it has revealed how weak our constitutional arrangements are, and how it relied on norms of behaviour that could easily be defied by cheating, illegality and a venal political class.  
The crux of @UKEUchallenge was that it was unreasonable in the legal sense (a decision no reasonable person acting reasonably could take) for PM not to respond to the illegalities in the referendum which, as a matter of law, render it 'undemocratic'. Parris exposes her 'reality'.  
The EU is on the ropes yet still our negotiators fail to land a single blow. Conditions for Brexit negotiations are now extremely bad for the EU & great for the UK, if only May and her fearful appeasers would pick up their swords and start to fight for us.  
The mysterious finances of the Brexit campaign’s biggest backer  
To understand why #Brexit is a really bad idea you simply need to think about a) European history in the twentieth century and b) the international economic system and shifting geopolitics of the twenty-first century. Not that difficult... 
You’re not alone. The world is also laughing at Brexit self-harming Britain & British voters; though some are just stunned in disbelief that half the population  of both the USA & UK are dumb enough to vote against their own & their children’s interests.#StopBrexit #UKPolitics 
UK Labour Party says May's Brexit vote delay is reckless  
Hedge fund manager and Brexiteer Crispin Odey made $284 million in one day by shorting the pound in 2016. Now he's at it again 
EU officials are concocting a plan to postpone Brexit until 2021 with the likes of Donald Tusk and Martin Selmayr in favour of the delay.If Theresa May agrees to such betrayal, the Conservative party is FINISHED. You've been warned!  
TM is a threat to the country, her handling of #Brexit has put the uk in very real danger of shortages of food, medicine and chemicals used to treat drinking water. If a foreign power had done this the uk would act, yet parliament stands Idly by. Why is Parliament not acting 
Here's Boris Johnson's "Brexit will be a titanic success" comment, to the tune of "My Heart Will Go On".  Thanks to @ByDonkeys and @spink_jonathan ! 
I will be discussing Brexit next steps on @BBCr4today at 6.50 tomorrow morning. 
Righto, Theresa May has kicked the Brexit can down the road once again. But there won’t be any can-kicking on my @talkRADIO #NoNonsense breakfast show tomorrow morning from 6.30am. Do join me! 
British Chambers of Commerce tonight in response to PM’s decision to postpone the #Brexit  “meaningful vote” yet again : “It is unbelievable to businesses that political tactics are still being put before economic considerations” 
Beautiful thing, this freedom of movement. Absolutely no need to change it.#Brexit  
Remind me: what deal did the SNP have when they took us into their independence referendum? What deal do they have now? Can they even tell us what currency an independent Scotland would have?Blackford is not an honest broker. He does give a damn about brexit, just indy. 
Worst. Prime. Minister. In. History. Yet still miles ahead of Corbyn. The two of them together are like a demolition duo decimating the UK. We need to stop them. #brexit #PutitToThePeople #RevokeArticle50 
Why has Brexit been so much harder than it should have been?406 constituencies voted to Leave but only 248 MPs back Leaving = -158242 constituencies voted to Remain but 400 MPs back Remaining = +158THIS IS CALLED "A MASSIVE DEMOCRATIC DEFICIT". 
Beaconsfield Conservative members will propose a motion of No Confidence in Tory MP Dominic Grieve at their Conservative Association Annual General Meeting on 29 March, reports the Brexit campaigning organisation .What an auspicious date! 
We salute the brother nation of #Cuba who today is voting for a referendum for the approval of a new constitutional text. We hope this day to be a democratic party that reaffirms the revolutionary principles of the Cuban people.  
This week parliament has a choice ether it delivers on the will of the British People and secures Brexit or it sides with the EU and Democracy here in the UK dies.  
Another spoofer and liar in @HMcEntee .  Non EU countries like Iceland , Switzerland , Serbia and even Turkey take part in Erasmus.  You don't have to be an EU member . #brexit #Irexit 
Brexitons,Remainlings are not opposing Brexit because it is against their interests. Remainlings are opposing Brexit because it is against the interests of everyone – bar Vladimir Putin and a handful of cheating, wrecking billionaires. 
Domestic political chaos & dangerous incompetence... Unprecedented international embarrassment… Remind me again what huge problem brexit was supposed to solve? What's so bad about EU membership that makes all this worthwhile? As a UK citizen, what do I get besides shame? 
Because of Britain's quest for commercial opportunities in the face of Brexit, its promotion of human rights has weakened in places such as Myanmar (because of China) and Yemen (because of Saudi Arabia).  
I was trying to exit vi but I’ve accidentally organised Brexit instead. 
Trade, Brexit, Trump, Kim, Cohen, the Fed. Get ready for a wild week  
18. They could have put freedom of movement up for a referendum. They could've put Lisbon to a referendum. They didn't. They didn't because they knew we would say no. They do as they please. Only now that it's something they don't want do they make the case for a public vote. 
Twitter has made me an angry person again bc I see so much raging injustice, esp around Brexit, matters of gender, sexuality and racial inequality, environmental deregs, austerity etc . I’m going to try to stick to a rule from now on: don’t tweet what you wouldn’t say in person. 
Brexit: Theresa May confirms MPs may not get final vote until March 12  WE the voters had a FINAL VOTE in 2016. Seems Parliament thinks our vote was worthless. May's WHOLE deal keeps UK tied to the EU so is not BREXIT. 
Sinn Fein policy now confirms -No to your rights to education No to your rights to a stronger economyNo to your rights to better healthcareNo to delivering reconciliationNo to a voice & a vote on Brexit No to Government & No to developing & delivering a plan for new Ireland 
Mr #Juncker, don’t you feel bad meeting so many dictators?Answer: Yes, I do. But if I’d only talk to crystal clear democrats, my weeks were over by Tuesday. #EUArabSummit #EUArabLeagueSummit #LASEUsummit #brexit #Sharmelsheikh 
The new EU Commission won’t start work until autumn and Brexit will be a low priority. They won’t start talking to us until 2020 and they’ll run the talks to the cliff-edge. This is the reality of an Art50 extension: more uncertainty, more self-abasement, more mistrust of MPs.  
If individual Labour MPs or the Labour Party officially moves to back a 2nd referendum a week or two before Brexit it could be a tad late to try to persuade people in parliament and outside who don’t want one that they should. Changing minds usually takes a little time. 
On the contrary .. #Brexit will bring about the greatest change in the fortunes of the UK for generations .. our opportunities will be immense and we have the people to capitalise on our good fortune  
Does the PM delaying the big Brexit vote until 12 March and EU sources predicting Britain’s exit will be 2021 mean we’ll still be in after 29 March? Euro elections end of May would be exciting... 
Brexit a bit like bereavement - you distract yourself for a few hours with something nice and then it smacks you in the chops, and you can't quite believe it all over again. TM's latest is literally unbelievable. Honda, Nissan etc will be nodding, yup, we did the right thing. 
But worst of all, I have absolutely no clue why we were ever put in this position in the first place. Did I miss all those marches and petitions calling for an EU Referendum? 
9 point gap favouring Remain in a straight Remain v Leave vote.The UK is in an ironic position.The Gov is determined to exit the EU & May refuses to countenance letting the public revisit the question, even tho’ the public is increasingly against Brexit 
This Economist build-a-Brexit-voter interactive is great fun. This was the result for my personal settings...  
If we want to deliver this country from the shambles of the #Brexit negotiations then we must deliver a #NoDeal .. it is the only sensible solution now 
Who should be criminally prosecuted after the Brexit fog has lifted and we all see the damage done? 
There is now a force to disrupt Brexit. MPs, it’s time to act | Matthew d’Ancona - the guardian  
Polls show Brexit regret so is so strong that 'Remain' would win a second referendum by 9 points - Business Insider. #BrexitShambles #PeoplesVote #Brexgret 
Even the Brexit Broadcadting Corporation using the words ‘cynical’ and ‘reckless’ - understatement! “Brexit: What does 12 March 'meaningful vote' date tell us?”  
There are just 33 days left until we face a calamitous no-deal Brexit. If Theresa May can't find it within herself to sign up to Labour's red lines of close economic ties to the EU, then I am likely to be at the rally for a People's Vote on March 23rd.  
This is a most welcome development regardless of how you feel about #Brexit. Whether you want a Canada+ deal, a Norway+ arrangement or to give the people #FinalSay with an #OptionToRemain, we must acknowledge that they all need more time. 
If it's not safe to fly the plane, the flight gets cancelled, even though literally everyone aboard bought a ticket. It seems, though, that @TheresaMay is determined for #Brexit to take off on schedule, when only 26% of those aboard want to be and safety is not guaranteed. 
I see some of the WM Bubble Media are already saying Brexit to be postponed till 2021 . This is in spite of the reality that 27 EU countries can only decide on an extension. Again this is UK lot thinking because they like an idea Johnny Foreigner will agree. 
What impact could Brexit have on UK citizens’ access to heath services here and abroad? Our updated long read examines the latest developments and the questions still to be answered.  
Spot on description of our Prime Minister and the havoc she has wreaked ... a natural leader of principle could have led us to a proud brexit  
The ball is now very much in Parliament's court. MPs must vote for any amendments aimed at taking a no deal #Brexit off the table, all amendments calling for a #PeoplesVote and definitely any amendment to #RevokeArticle50. #Brexit must die and now is the time to kill it!  
Kepa and Sarri helpfully demonstrating to the British people what the UK’s Brexit debate looks like to the rest of the world 
World-class contortions on show here. Bravo! — This is right up there. There’s only one way out of this Brexit nightmare – revoke Article 50 | The Spectator  
Unless we get a Remainer government a #PeoplesVote will be corrupted by criminality & manipulation of social media by Russia and others. They know that #Brexit would occur before the very limited sanctions available could be imposed. We will have to work within a corrupt system. 
Washing chicken with chlorine mask low animal welfare, low hygiene, poor quality and over-reliance on antibiotics. It's vital that the UK Government don't lower food safety standards after Brexit.  
Gary Lineker backs new mass march calling for second Brexit vote   
people don't want brexit Jeremy therefore people don't want your version of it either. Its obvious you don't want to give us a peoples vote, well guess what its obvious you will NEVER get our votes either. We are remain and will stay remain before any other thing. @UKLabour 
Many people who voted leave in 2016 have changed their minds as they see that #brexit reality is so different from what was promised in  #euref. They are #remainernowThis morning on #MarrShow there was a good example of how people like @michaelgove sold many voters a 'pup'. 
The Guardian view on Mrs May’s deal: delay Brexit, not just the MPs’ vote | Editorial  
Mail reporting an ERG member has warned "If May said she’d extend Article 50, there’d be 20-plus MPs who would just take their bat and ball home: No domestic legislation, no Brexit legislation, they just wouldn’t be showing up any more. It would effectively end the government" 
In 2017, Conservatives were elected on a manifesto that promised to implement the referendum result, and that declared that no deal was preferable to a bad deal. How is sticking to that manifesto "disloyal"?  
Would you be outraged if a rushed, ill thought through #Brexit caused shortages of life saving drugs.RT for large poll size 
Far from proceeding with Brexit because of the result of the referendum, Mrs May proceeded with Brexit on the basis that the referendum result was irrelevant. This bizarre paradox has now been established in the courts. 
No, no, you monsters! Is nothing sacred? Will no institution be spared the horrors of Brexit? Hang your heads in shame, bigots.  
If you’ve children or grandchildren & want the best future for them, think about this: Brexit will make them poorer, with fewer jobs, lack of opportunity to work, travel & study abroad.  A better future is possible: Scotland can be a prosperous independent state in a mkt of 500m 
I suspect that very few of the people who voted Remain at the EU Referendum know that in 2017 alone the UK sold £95bn LESS worth of goods to the other 27 EU countries than they sold to us.It's almost entirely possible that these people think that trade with the EU is balanced. 
The EU is exploring plans to delay Brexit until 2021They want a 21-month extension as it would cover their budget periodThat would mean us paying them even more billionsIt would be political suicide for the Tories or Labour to go along with this plot 
So far in 105 minutes of football: one shot on target (to City). Sarri has contrived a situation whereby nothing at all has happened here. If it doesn't work out for him at Chelsea, there's always a job for him negotiating Brexit. 
We voted to LEAVE the UK on June 23 2016.We didn't vote for a "Deal" or a "codicil giving reassurance"Just LEAVEOnly a WTO Brexit can deliver that (disparagingly referred to as a "No Deal" by our pro EU pro Remain media)Westminster plots to REMOVE that option by Mid March. 
Long interview on Sky with Dominic Grieve.  He repeatedly says that a no-deal Brexit would be a catastrophe.  Not challenged once on that point.  Clearly Sky agrees with him. 
This Carabao Cup final is like watching Brexit. We're all going to die before it's over. 
Brexit: What does 12 March 'meaningful vote' date tell us?  
Brexit could be delayed until 2021, EU sources reveal | Politics | The Guardian  
“There was just one tiny flaw in May’s plan to run the clock down until everyone was so sick of Brexit they’d vote any old shite through...”pic.twitter.com/tv1o12OaLk 
Hostage taker May is pressing the gun against the heads of not just Brexit MPs but every leave voter in the country with this March 12th vote Telling us it's her Brexit In Name Only or no Brexit at allWe must hold the line. Dare her to pull the triggerNo surrender 
Why isn’t this a Brexit meme already? Must I do everything? 
KINDLY ONLY VOTE IN THIS POLL IF YOU VOTED LEAVE AT THE EU REFERENDUM IN 2016.If you voted Leave at the EU Referendum, did you vote for an exit deal with Brussels, or for the United Kingdom to just leave the European Union? 
Cubans go to the polls in high-stakes constitutional referendum  
I cannot wait until Theresa May is not Prime Minister. She is so painfully evasive, robotic, dislikeable and subject to the whims of idiots. She has deceived, insulted, misjudged and dithered. She has made Brexit far worse than it needed to be. History will not be kind to her. 
God, this is desperate. Nobody during the referendum, at any point, was promised any concrete date when thinking about or voting for Brexit. This obscene fetishisation of a random date concocted in Downing Street embodies the Tory party’s convulsive and hysterical breakdown  
Only a month left until Brexit date. Wavering MPs who still feel constrained should look at 11 MPs who decided to act & ask themselves whether the claims of public interest, common sense & future generations might just trump all else  
Lost faith in the UK more like! ... If this was Scotland they would say we cannot be independent - but it is the UK incapable of governing itself .. #Brexit makes case for #indyref2  .. 
This would mean a lot of Brexit secretaries  
Those of us with/in remission from #cancer etc face the terrible uncertainty of losing our access to medical isotopes via #Euratom.No arrangements have been made, nor licenses grantedSo we are going to die.It's THAT simple.#makeitstop #meaningfulvote #theresamay #brexit  
Brexit just got even better  
Against the backdrop of mounting pressure from the US, Cubans are voting in a referendum on a new constitution which enshrines "socialism" and which President Miguel Diaz-Canel sees also as a vote "for Venezuela" 
There IS no “reworked Brexit deal”. .@Theresa_May is taking people for a ride. It is time, now, for another vote of no confidence in this Government. .@UKLabour are committed to stopping ‘no deal’; let’s see who else is. Table it, @JeremyCorbyn! We might need a couple. 
Sinn Fein confirmed policy is now:NO to Stormont.NO to Brexit (post-2014).NOT SURE to supporting the police.SOMETIMES to supporting the GFA.IF WE HAVE TIME to marriage equality.YOU'LL BE LUCKY to abortion. ABSOLUTELY to decisions being taken by unelected civil servants.  
British Prime Minister Theresa May delays this week's parliamentary vote on her Brexit deal  
EU officials are concocting a plan to postpone Brexit until 2021 with the likes of Donald Tusk and Martin Selmayr in favour of the delay.If Theresa May agrees to such betrayal, the Conservative party is FINISHED. You've been warned! Support us at  
Lib Dem Leader @vincecable reacts to Theresa May’s latest Brexit vote delay. “This dangerous game of chicken has just got to stop.” End the mess with a People’s Vote now >   
Philip May is linked to the tax-hating kleptocracy while Theresa May's track record shows her up as a mendacious xenophobic authoritarian nationalist. The two sides of the kleptonationalist assault on democracy combined in one couple.#PeoplesVote #Brexit 
A bit of extrapolation of the truth. Your tweets have just over 1000 likes with most around the hundreds. Minuscule numbers compared to the majority who voted to Leave the EU and fully #Brexit. #LetsGoWTO 
Schrödinger's Brexit: We can't know for certain until we open the box... (Judging by the smell though, I don't think we should get our hopes up.) 
You are delaying a Palriamentary vote to 13 working days before a Brexit Day you chose 2 years ago. You are knowingly causing widespread confuson, distress & panic across our country. Your first duty is to protect us all. It is utterly shameful & it disgraces the office you hold  
PM May seeks more time - promises Brexit deal vote by March 12  
Brexit is about a lying, cheating gang of rich bastards who will use any trick and cause any amount of suffering in order to slash their tax bills and tear up the health, safety, environmental and workplace regulations which eat into their profits#PeoplesVote #Brexit #FBPE 
What would a no-deal Brexit mean for retailing and distribution?  
A question which absolutely needs an answer. Let us suppose that on March 12 May's deal is defeated and Parliament instructs the government to seek an Article 50 extension. What happens if May sits on her hands and fails to comply? #PeoplesVote #Brexit #FBPE 
30 minute documentary on Bulgaria's leading TV on Skripals.Reporting only from Moscow. Interviews with cousin Viktoria & RU spies. Theses: - Sergey is long dead, Brits are hiding his death- There was never poisoning, it's all Brexit.- Bulgarian poisoned by bad ruccolaShame. 
It is quite something that this new loose coalition of MPs who aren't sure what they stand for apart from stopping #Brexit, are about to ensure we head for a hard Brexit by propping up a right wing Tory government. Let that sink in. 
Dear @theresa_may, have you actually read your own WA and the Pol Dec? They are Remain. They are NOT Brexit. How can you insist they are? Are you so dim and deluded? They will NEVER be accepted by the 17.4m. Do you not get this? We are not stupid. Your time is up. 
2 years ago if you had any thoughts about Brexit that didn't align entirely with Theresa May's you were branded a traitorous remoaner. Which is just one of the reasons we're in this position. 
Trade, Brexit, Trump, Kim, Cohen, the Fed. Get ready for a wild week  
Brexit Explained  
Britain faces harsh truths about post-Brexit trade  
Be very clear. Meaningful negotiations have ended. The purpose of a delay is not for talks but solely to stop #Brexit. Let MPs take ownership of a decision to go down this route and all that surely follows.#StandFirm 
Whether you thought we were headed for hard Brexit, no deal Brexit, soft Brexit or no Brexit, try to get your head around how outrageous it would have seemed two years ago that we wouldn't actually know which it was going to be with only weeks to go. 
As far as #Brexit goes, Let The UK Go, They already have an independant economy, therefore no real representations. Let them go. They don't want to be controlled by foreign interests. We The United States Fully Support Freedom and Independence! #MEGA #MAGA 
If you haven't already done so, please get a copy of the book #InLimbo and also #InLimboToo. Read the testimonies of EU citizens in Brexit Britain & those of UK citizens in the EU27.Only 33 days away from Exit day and we're still in limbo.More info:  
Exclusive: Brexit could be delayed until 2021, EU sources reveal                                Plus: Exasperation grows in Brussels over May’s handling with no deal now out at “more than 50%Plus: And Ireland will still be  pawn if EU gives on backstop   
Of course, we must remember that sights like this have absolutely nothing to do with immigration, Brexit or any other political argument some may attach to it.This is just typical ‘council estate tribalism’ (please criticise if you wish) which wastes so much police time.  
The mass resignations from Britain's main parties underline how far Brexit now trumps party loyalty   
Brexit could be delayed until 2021, EU sources reveal.Now that's a new one on me!@bremaininspain 
If we didn't have @theresa_may the meaingless Prime Minister and her meaningless Tory Govt we could have had a #meaningfulvote and a workable Brexit deal by now  #GeneralElectionNow 
The #Brexit saboteur @AmberRuddHR is trying to #BLACKMAIL @theresa_may in order to demand an extension to #Article50 to have a #SecondReferendum to allow her brother @RolandRudd the EU quisling head of the #TonyBlair funded #PeoplesVote to STOP #BREXIT! #StandUp4Brexit #AmberRudd 
Herein lies the problem.The PM feels the need to "stand up to the ERG."Yet the ERG is the only group in Parliament that actually represents the majority who voted for Brexit.ERGO, (excuse me for that), it is the parliamentary Remainers that are the problem, not the ERG.  
Not all young people are remainers."A WTO Brexit will be great for my generation!" - @StevenEdgintonSign up to join Leave Means Leave and campaign for a proper Brexit:  
Theresa May delays vote on Brexit  
Why Theresa May says  12 March as the latest possible date for a “meaningful vote” on her Brexit deal? From ⁦@politico⁩. Brexiteers must stand firm and refuse to be blackmailed. 
Today #24Feb, the Cuban people, in full exercise of its sovereignty, decides on one of the key issues to #Cuba: the adoption of the new #Constitution in popular referendum. #YoVotoSí 
Tell him from me I shall gladly give up buying fish if we Brexit.Why?  Because the likes of him have proved over and over they care not a whit for the rest of us. 
I don't see how wanting to deliver on the referendum result make's Jacob Rees-Mogg and the ERG group extreme...  
Help Get Rid of the Tories!!! They are leading this country to the abyss, the gifts of austerity and Brexit, poverty wages and Windrush, a homelessness epidemic while giving  tax cuts fir the richest.. Theresa Mayhem’s Media Militia v citizen journalists  
MPs voted to approve the triggering of A50 before they had any knowledge of the multiple illegalities which have now been proved (to a criminal standard) to have vitiated the referendum. Would they have vote the same if they had know of those illegalities? 
So, by 12th March MPs will be given the opportunity to betray #Brexit by: Forcing through a second referendum;Pushing through a disastrous Withdrawal Agreement; or, as they’d mostly prefer,Stopping us leaving altogether.What we want is to leave  
.@theresa_may stop kicking the can down the road. You can’t pass your deal - it’s time to back a people’s vote and stop a hard Brexit, before it’s too late. 
The EU considers telling Theresa May that if she can’t get her Brexit deal through Parliament and wants to delay the departure date, the country will have to stay in the bloc until 2021  
Lib Dem Leader @vincecable on working with the Independent Group to stop Theresa May's Brexit mess and securing a People's Vote.Demand a People's Vote now >  
Just as St Patrick used the shamrock to teach the concept of the Trinity, so a future English saint will use Brexit to explain purgatory.  
every day in Brexit news  
UN-F*CKING-BELIEVABLE!!!!!!'Tommy Robinson could win elections if Brexit is stopped' - Rees-Mogg  
Brexit could be delayed until 2021, EU sources reveal  
Theresas Angst vor Monstern... #Brexit  
#EU MAGGOT #PeterMandelson with @AmberRuddHR's brother @RolandRudd also known as #ROLANDRAT the EU quisling head of the #TonyBlair funded #PeoplesVote, Peter is the Godfather to Roland's Child they are good friends, #AmberRudd is working in the @cabinetofficeuk to STOP #BREXIT!  
This too - 21 month Brexit delay - was part of Olly Robbins’s bar talk overheard by ⁦@anguswalkertalk⁩. At the time an EU source told he thought it was an ⁦@eucopresident⁩ idea/plan, but said unlikely EU leaders would embrace  
Whatever your opinion on Brexit, we can all agree on one thing. It’s fucking stupid 
I tell ye, it’s as well there’s no rush with this Brexit thing 
Are millennials killing brexit yet 
“Brexit could be delayed until 2021, EU sources reveal”. .... I’d welcome this. But #The5Million cannot be delayed. We cannot continue to live in limbo for another two years. ⁦@eucopresident⁩ please take citizens’ rights out and ring-fence them now. 
Hard Brexit Michael Owen.Elite Sean Dyche mentality. 
#AmberRudd wants extension to #Article50 to have a #SecondReferendum & is plotting with @DavidGauke @PhilipHammondUK @Tobias_Ellwood @GregClarkMP in the @cabinetofficeuk to STOP #BREXIT altogether! @AmberRuddHR's brother @RolandRudd is head of the #TonyBlair funded #PeoplesVote! 
The EU is considering telling Theresa May that if she can’t get her Brexit deal through Parliament and wants to delay the departure date, the country will have to stay in the bloc until 2021  
genuine conversation i had with a guy in a bar in shoreditch last night about brexit:him: yeah but a referendum is not a vote!me: it is a vote, that's literally what it is.him: nah you just believe what they're telling you man! 
Excuse my sexism, but I hate to think what it must be like to be Philip May waiting for Theresa to get ready for a night out #Brexit 
Genuinely unbelievable, the French take to the streets if their petrol prices go up, our entire country is being blackmailed by a gang of psychopaths and we start a few petitions #Brexit #PeoplesVote #meaningfulvote #BrexitChaos #TheresaMay 
AGAIN !!!Theresa May has just cancelled this week's Brexit vote and put it back to March 12. So it's now officially "accept my deal or get #NoDealBrexit".If MPs let her do this, we're no longer a democracy, but have become an unelected dictatorship. 
My @guardian column: by forming in the midst of the #Brexit crisis,  ⁦@TheIndGroup⁩ has acted as a solvent upon dreary ideological certainties,  and expanded the range of possibility - if only MPs seize the moment. 
Jeremy Corbyn: "I do think the majority of people in Britain, however they voted in the referendum, didn't vote to see their rights torn up, didn't vote to see jobs lost and didn't vote for disruption on the day we leave the European Union." #JC4PM2019 
Theresa May delays vote on Brexit deal by two weeksCan someone please stop this deluded woman? ⁦@theresa_may⁩ just go now please so we can have our country back and what we voted for! Agree? 
From the funny tinges to Brexit’s hinges, the elite march on, nobody whinges.At the foodbank queue are tears, we’re selling missiles too, health and fears. Nobody hears.Murdoch has us in his vice, Theresa rolls the dice, the poor told that pain must suffice.#meaningfulvote 
To support the people of Venezuela,  suffering  food and medicine shortages and human rights abuses from Maduro, lift crippling US sanctions, oppose Bolton Abrams Trump regime change,  and accept Mexico and Uruguay negotiations leading to referendum.  
.@UKLabour have pledged to reject ‘no deal’ in ALL circumstances. .@Theresa_May doesn’t give a shit. If a 2nd referendum will stop ‘no deal’, which will be catastrophic for so many, then I support a 2nd referendum. In the first instance, @JeremyCorbyn should bring a VONC! 
#AmberRudd has used and abused her position in @cabinetofficeuk to undermine #Brexit at every turn, she has with Lies & Deception tried to STOP BREXIT! Has @AmberRuddHR been passing information to her brother @RolandRudd head of the #TonyBlair funded #PeoplesVote.? #EURat! 
European Youth Orchestra not accepting applications from UK young musicians on similar basis. Oh ~ and Erasmus will withdraw grants already allocated if a #nodealbrexit occurs.No, nobody cares! #theresamay #meaningfulvote #youngpeople #brexit  
Foreseeable.  Yet what has Labour done?  Held her hand at critical stages.It had better BE wrong that Gardiner has said that Labour will back a Labour Brexit otherwise you all deserve to get mass desertions.And Thornberry’s ill judged bullying on the podium?  
Theresa May postpones another vote.We get to use our Kicking the Brexit Can cartoon yet again.  
Cuba’s constitutional referendum today is another ploy of the Cuban regime to cover up its repression and tyranny. The United States supports the Cuban people’s calls for freedom and democracy. 
Brexit may well preserve my woman's right.... to actually be a woman!When we get sovereignty back, we can actually vote for some sane politicians, that don't make me share public toilets with men. 
Austria's Kurz says best to delay Brexit if UK MPs don't back it by start of March  
Grassroots Conservatives are clear about what they expect from their elected officials. No delay, deliver Brexit on March 29th - deal or no deal!  Support us at  
I've been on the fence about the Independent Group, and have decided the crucial test is whether they're prepared to vote No Confidence in the government to prevent a hard Brexit. If they're not, they can get in the bin. 
Now consider the fact , admitted in Court last week by May's lawyer, that she actually knows that the 2016 Referendum leave vote was procured by multiple crimes,  Guy. Where does that take you - and us ? 
What are you going to do?  No,point just talking.  What effective action are you going to take?Including against your own leadership if we have understood Gardiner today.  Backing Brexit ..just Labour’s unicorn Brexit.Shame on the Tories.  Shame on Labour. 
We’re calling on Theresa May to put it to the people to decide whether her version of Brexit beats the deal we already have with Europe.The public should have the final say.With us? Share this   
There is now a nine-point majority (54-45) who believe the vote to leave the European Union was a mistake. 
Unless your alternative plan is either a complete revolution of Article 50, or a People’s Vote, it’s worthless. Drop the nonsense about a “Labour led Brexit”, or a “Jobs First Brexit”, and give MPs a position to get behind to oppose this folly. 
“Arlene asked me to bring back an ornament that plays the accordion and drums and I got some lassies to do my nails and my feet are like horses hooves” #janeygodleyvoiceover #brexit #theresaMay 
Craig Beaumont from @fsb_policy said: “We have simply run out of time to prepare for a #NoDealBrexit...Around 50% of impacted small firms say they need two months to get ready, but today’s news suggests they will get two weeks. Meanwhile, investment decisions are halted." #Brexit 
I hoped this was a Photoshopped image, sadly it is an image known the world over, showing how we Brits submit so easily to invading religions.#BrExit #Leave #NoDeal  
There is now a force to disrupt Brexit. MPs, it’s time to act | Matthew d’Ancona  
So May is going to wheel out her deal, unchanged in any way that matters, yet again on March 12. Just days before the deadline to leave the EU. A deal that secured the greatest loss in parliamentary history.Yet people still think the Tories act in the national interest? #Brexit 
In referendum asking Okinawa voters if they approve reclamation for US base at Henoko, the number of "no" votes having exceeded threshold of one fourth of eligible voters, Gov. Tamaki will be reporting Okinawa's firm opposition to PM Abe & President Trump.  
Pleased to add my support to this letter on risks to health and care of no deal Brexit  
I bet 99.99% of Remainers complaining that they will not be able to live and work in the EU after Brexit would have no chance of even getting an interview let alone a job.. 
How about an MP saying he would respect the Leave vote and not try to disrupt the referendum result in his Leave voting constituency. To then be elected in 2017 only to completely flip on what he had previously said? 
Mrs May knows that the leave result was fraudulent. She knows the ref was not free and fair and that it outages democracy. Yet she continues. Why?There is no mandate for Brexit, yet she continues. Why?One has to conclude that it is not about democracy at all. 
Oh yeah. So May has now said there will NOT be a Meaningful Vote next week, but by 12th MarchSo there is now Version 9 of my #Brexit diagram to take that into account!  
EU IS SAID TO MULL IDEA OF PROPOSING BREXIT EXTENSION TO 2021...wtf 
Why are Labour being so complicate - John McDonnell "high possibility” Labour might support reworked version of  @peterkyle amendment – but will only be tabled when meaningful vote on 12 March.Theresa May's Brexit vote delay: what does it all mean?  
...Making our celebration of the country’s birthday a referendum on your popularity reveals that you don’t understand or respect why we celebrate the 4th of July. 
Just a wee hello and invitation to progressives in England. May and her loopy crew are going to take the UK over the isolationist Brexit cliff edge. Move north to Scotland and help us take a *different*, internationalist path. You’ll be very welcome.  
In what way does telling the truth (that delaying #Brexit is just an attempt to prevent it altogether, given that MPs are trying to take #NoDeal off the table) insult our intelligence?Without the ability to walk away, she’ll get nothing. Which is what you want.You insult us. 
If the House of Commons fails to seize control of the #Brexit process this week to force a delay, it will be as culpable as the PM/UK government when UK crashes out at the end of March with either no deal or the PM’s very bad deal. 
Theresa May has zero interest in managing Brexit after the 29th. Her intention has always been to ensure we leave. After that, she’ll feel her place in history is secured and call a GE. Hers are not the actions of one expecting to have to deal with the consequences. 
.@theresa_may stop kicking the can down the road. You can’t pass your deal - it’s time to back a people’s vote and stop a hard Brexit, before it’s too late. 
Time for this pathetic charade to end. She is so clearly running th clock down and holding ALL of us ransom: "My deal or no deal" #meaningfulvote #Brexit  
Disgraceful - May has cancelled this week’s Brexit deal vote in a desperate attempt to bully MPs into voting for her disastrous deal by running down the clock. We will not be bullied Prime Minister, we will not back a deal that makes our constituents worse off  
Keir, we are edging dangerously close to a no-deal Brexit. It is now high time to support the Costa Amendment which mandates the Prime Minister to seek ring-fencing of the #citizensrights of EU citizens in the UK & @BritishInEurope. Time to end people being used as pawns. 
Decisions about Scotland should be made in Scotland. Do you agree or disagree with that statement?Please like, share and comment - Looking to hear views from all over the political spectrum.#indyref2 #NewScotland #Brexit 
UK's Labour is moving closer to backing second Brexit referendum -senior lawmakers  
Support for second referendum grows 
Society’s poorest will suffer the most from Brexit – which is why we should take to the streets to stop it - The Independent  
Friends! Good point!And as Jean-Claude Juncker, Guy Verhoftstadt, Donald Tusk and Martin Selmayr have all said, not merely is Brexit sexist, it is also deeply undemocratic, as no-one voted for it, apart from a tiny handful of 17,410,742 bigots!Talk about Our Wimmin's Rights!  
If you’re sick and tired of @theresa_may and @jeremycorbyn playing political brinkmanship with #Brexit this weekend - then you’ll understand our decision this week to establish @TheIndGroup #ChangePolitics 
.@JeremyCorbyn needs to table an urgent vote of no confidence. .@Theresa_May is being reckless and running down the clock to deliver a ‘no deal’ Brexit and blame the EU.I’ve been AGAINST a 2nd Ref. but if that’s what it takes to stop ‘no deal’ then @UKLabour need to offer it. 
Okinawa referendum rejects new US military base but Abe likely to press on  
Situation rooms. Stockpiling. Moving to another country: British companies are finalizing contingency plans for a disorderly Brexit 
Any continued insistence by the PM that 29/3 is going to be Brexit day would be hard to reconcile with the incontestable facts. 
These scare stories are getting utterly ridiculous!Whitehall fears ‘piles of bodies at ports’ after no-deal Brexit 
Join us in London this Wednesday to tell Parliament "You only had one job!" Brexit can't be delivered without serious harm. MPs must stop #NoDealBrexit & must #PutItToThePeople!#YorkshireforEurope will be there in force. Book your place on our bus here:  
The Meaningful vote will now be held 17 days before we leave the EU making it the most meaningless, meaningful vote ever. #brexit 
What you are trying to do is wrestle control of the Brexit process from the government so you can either stop Brexit altogether or deliver what you call ‘soft brexit’. Which means bugger all. All to suit your remain agenda. You’re treating people like fools.  
Why isn't any MP bothering to force a vote on whether to #RevokeArticle50? If enough of you go to the Speaker and demand time for a debate and a vote on whether to leave or #RemainInTheEU, he will allow it. May cannot be allowed to force CRIMINAL #Brexit through. 
Referendum was purely advisory,  you cant betray an opinion poll, even it cost more than 120 million quid of tax payer money to organise. That's the scam. @RobertCPalmer13 @NickBoles @abcpoppins @VesperUK @thomasbrake 
I haven’t seen any of those MPs criticising, only MPs who’d seek to overturn or delay the referendum result or those who would’ve voted for WA as a BRINO compromise.Brexiteer MPs support her continuing to find a way to deliver on the Brady amendment. 
Nothing will change as long as Remainer quislings in Parliament & the cabinet continue their capitulation to Brussels by trying to stop a no deal Brexit.  The EU will not negotiate as long as it thinks the UK hasn’t got the guts to leave with no deal.  
The Cooper-Letwin amendment is the Remain campaigns last attempt at thwarting Brexit. If it fails, and it must fail, the rejection of the PM's reworked deal on 12 March would see no-deal Brexit as the default option, rather than a Brexit delay or no Brexit at all. 
We’re so close to the Brexit finishing line — it’s time to come together with one final heave, says @andrealeadsom 
Do you still think another polite march is going to cut it? Do you think organising travel and being there on the day with a witty banner is doing 'all you can to stop Brexit'?! You my dear Remainer friends, are repeating the same unsuccessful tactic, a bit like May...  
Is Brexit sexist? You forgot to ask: Andrea Jenkyns Andrea LeadsomAnne-Marie MorrisAnne-Marie TrevelyanArlene FosterGisela StuartKate Hoey Lucy AllanNadine DorriesPriti PatelTheresa Villiers(list is non exhaustive obv)  
I just landed in London & I can already smell Brexit. 
On this #SocialistSunday once again @theresa_may is running scared of presenting her deal to Parliament for a meaningful vote.We urgently need @jeremycorbyn and his team in Number 10 to sort this #Brexit crisis out. #GTTO #JC4PM  
I knew if I did say I was British, sooner or later someone would tell me I wasn’t. And people have told me I’m not. Often. And so have our government, who have aggressively said as much with the Brexit campaign and Windrush, and so on. 
Theresa May has pulled this week's Brexit vote. As businesses seek certainty, the PM is unable to make any progress or take any decisions. Her tactic is to run the clock down and panic Parliament into voting for her already failed deal... #BrexitShambles 
Wouldn’t it be good if the impact on our wellbeing was factored into Government thinking? From uncertainty over Brexit to how we treat the poor, the sick & the disabled, all of us are effected by the incompetence & callousness of this Government.  
No Nick, what is REALLY insulting to people’s intelligence is your duplicity when the truth is your intentions are all about doing anything to delay and ultimately stop Brexit. You have been given the instruction from the people and that was to LEAVE!  
Opinion: Society’s poorest will suffer the most from Brexit – we should take to the streets to stop it  
Given that the EU referendum was explicitly advisory (and hence immune to any threat of it being vitiated), in what sense is it correct to say that it was a "mandate" except in the sense that it was subsequently accepted as being a mandate? 
Vaclav Hladky could save the UK from Brexit.  
As it happens, @OFOCBrexit are taking over Parliament this week!If, like us and Jess, you’re furious with May and the Brexit mess then why not come and tell your MP this Wednesday?   
Brexit is pushing sheep farmers to change breeding habits 
So @michaelgove you said easiest deal in history, we said no it won’t be, we were dismissed as “experts” and now you can’t deliver. I do seem to recall us telling you brexit would make people worse off. Own your mess.  
Legal papers lodged against Boris #Johnson for ‘lies’ told during EU referendum  
“We’re not trying to stop Brexit, we’re just trying to make it extra special for everyone! Trust us!” 
A parliamentary vote on March 12th for something that’s meant to take effect on March 29th.17 days’ notice for businesses, employees, investors and communities on what may be the biggest economic and trading change they face in a generation. Unbelievable. #Brexit 
Theresa May again delays Brexit vote, but ensures it will happen by March 12 
There was a 9 month delay in triggering Article 50 in the first place. You've had long enough to sort yourselves out. Another 3 months won't solve the stalemate. Besides, when do losers get to choose the kind of Brexit we get? 
Disingenuous from @JamesCleverly. MPs voted against the WA in January (a) as it tied us to everything voters voted against so was worse than Remaining, (b) was therefore not Brexit, and (c) was basically an unacceptable crock of shite   
"Ruling out trading on World Trade Organisation (WTO) terms would completely undermine negotiations because Brussels would know we could never walk away without an agreement."Email your MP to save Brexit @  
I am absolutely terrified by the damage Brexit has done and will do for years to come, but contemplating the extent to which Mrs May is now utterly out of control leaves me a gibbering wreck.  
Austrian leader, Sebastian Kurtz , tells us if there isn’t a majority in commons for deal by mid March there should be a delay to Brexit 
Daft to think if it all goes t1t5 up after brexit, with us being off grid, wood stove, generator, wind turbine and solar panels....we may be in an enviable position compared to many folks. 
Another week, another week of economic uncertainly being no further forward on securing a #Brexit deal with the EU. Still at least this guy has secured deals with the USA, China and other countries queuing up to do deals with the UK. Oh hang on, that was in my dream last night.  
776 hours left until we crash out of the EU without a Brexit deal, and our world turns Mad Max feral. Yet MPs still dither and wring their hands and watch and wait, rather than stepping up and acting. What cosmic signal are they waiting for? 
Pinochet overthrew a democratically elected government, tortured & murdered several thousand people, created hundreds of thousands of refugees, had an Allende aide assassinated in DC (Letelier),and left when he lost a referendum he bet on winning in order to legitimize his regime  
Parliament and opposition impotent as May continues to run amok.After admission in open court, that in full knowledge of illegality used to procure the referendum result, she's proceeding with Brexit unabated, she now delays the meaningful vote yet again. 
So Mrs May has moved the Brexit vote to March 12th, giving her 17 day's to the March 29th deadline. I am certain she can't get a deal with the EU, and after meeting with the Tory executive members last night, will go for the NO deal default. 
The people can prevent a no-deal Brexit – with a general strike  by @JolyonMaugham #PeoplesStrike 
Brexit is 800 hours away. #brexit 
LISTEN | Mogg hits back at Remainers trying to delay Brexit: "Everybody in the Conservative Party stood on a manifesto saying we would leave the European Union. [Brexit blockers] are not abiding by what they said to their voters."  Support us at  
Ploughing on when there is overwhelming evidence that the country believes Brexit is WRONG isn't respect, it's disreguard for people up and down our country.This week MPs will have the chance to put Brexit back to the country. It would be obscene not to take it.#PeoplesVote 
Despite the EU confirming that the time for talking is over, Theresa May is still trying to insist that Brexit negotiations are "still ongoing". History is mocking Brexit again. Another THREAD:  
I have a good friend here in Edinburgh. She's my barometer for more centrist thinking. She voted NO in 2014, but would vote YES now. She asks me regularly, why aren't the SNP doing more to protect Scotland from Brexit. I don't believe this is an isolated POV. 
Brexit is just a nasty scam which pushes up food prices, decimates manufacturing, pushes UK down the world rankings just so a few nasty little fascists can go short of sterling and make a few bob. I hope the courts are busy when the truth is out. 
Shameful. Theresa May’s decision to once again delay a second meaningful vote on her #Brexit deal is entirely self-serving and businesses and individuals across the country will suffer as a result. Hesitation is no longer an option. Parliament must now act.  
Brexit is a national embarrassment - take a stand with us and demand a People's Vote.Join our March to Stop Brexit 
Every time there is a postponement of the meaningful vote, she should postpone simultaneously the date of brexit day. Otherwise parliament should treat it as an act of contempt intended on forcing it to make a decision under duress. 
Strategically this would achieve two things ~1) It would force the Independent Group to pick sides and take an actual position on a political issue2) It would remind people that Labour does not have a majority and cannot stop Brexit by itself 
Cubans go to the polls in high-stakes constitutional referendum  
Remember when the meaningful vote was going to be October, November, December ...now it’ll be held with 17 days to go to Brexit and we are supposed to believe it’ll all be fine. Hope MPs of all parties now see the need for Parliament to get a grip  
Michael Gove’s warning that a second referendum would “damage politics” denies the huge damage already done by this whole #BrexitShambles. The PM’s dangerous game of chicken can’t go on, WE demand a #PeoplesVote 
The first ever EU Arab League Summit is getting underway in Sharm el Sheikh. Good opportunity to discuss a range of issues including migration, security and counter terrorism. Also a chance to discuss latest #Brexit developments with my EU counterparts, incl Italian PM Conte.  
Theresa May is playing the ultimate game of chicken. The economic and political and social well being of the country is being gambled for Tory party survival  just as it was by David Cameron in calling a referendum in the first place.  
1/ Whether you're for or against Brexit the delay of the #meaningfulvote should worry you.The government of the United Kingdom has gone rogue.If votes on Brexit cannot be forced, an immediate no confidence vote MUST be called, if only to force May to listen. 
The so-called "referendum" in #Cuba is another maneuver by the Cuban dictatorship to hold its grip on power. Today’s plebiscite is nothing more than a farce and a fraud of the communist party. #IllegalConstitution 
NEW: Business hits out at May. @The_IoD on latest Brexit delay:  "it’s clear the writing is on the wall. There appears to be little realistic chance of a deal being agreed and the necessary legislation getting through by 29 March". They call for extension to Article 50. 
Every MP who disagrees with any Brexit need to resign ftom any party facilitating it.Those who want Brexit should go join UKIP. 
Sarah Wollaston calls it. If MPs allow the Brexit can to be kicked down the road towards no deal disaster, they're nothing more than enablers, regardless of their political persuasion.  
Meaningful vote by March 12th - PM17 days before Brexit day56 days since deal was defeated 91 days since govt first scheduled MVAnd govt denies it is 'running down the ' 
Theresa May CANCELS the Brexit Meaningful vote AGAIN 'until March'. We ALL know where this is going boys and girls, don't we.@LBC @MrJamesob WILL AN AVAILABLE ADULT PLEASE INTERVENE. A POLICEMAN?A DOCTOR?A PSYCHIATRIST? 
Support the #PutItToThePeople rally.Join us in London on 23rd March for the ‘Put It To The People March’ to make the call for a #PeoplesVote on Brexit too loud to ignore. Let the people decide. Please RT:  Via @peoplesvote_uk 
if only i were shadow Brexit secretary and had the power to step in and actually try and do something about it. 
Polls show Brexit regret is so strong that 'Remain' would win a second referendum by 9 points - Business Insider  
Dictatorial, intransigent, sinisterly psychopathic. “May says Brexit 'will not' be blocked amid ministers' warning” - Evening Standard  
Question: At what point does evading ministerial responsibility, ignoring democratic process, attempting to blackmail parliament, and endangering the country become actually criminal?#meaningfulvote#TheresaMay delays meaningful vote on final Brexit deal  
You may think it is glamorous to fly with the PM to Egypt for make-or-break talks on Brexit. It’s not  
WTO is better than May’s current deal. Let’s see if she can fix it by 12th March - in order to win the majority support of those that backed the Brady amendment  - or we’ll leave without a deal. No such thing as no Brexit. Tic toc.#StandUp4Brexit 
Theresa May delays Brexit debate and sets date for meaningful vote but says 'it is still within our grasp to leave the EU with a deal'  
That is a delay of 12 weeks from the original plan.  With nothing achieved in 10 of those weeks and nothing remotely likely in the next two.   Only #Brexit solution is delay to Article 50 and a referendum.  
Refusing to bring her deal back to Parliament while continuing to threaten the country with the damage of a no deal Brexit is utterly irresponsible.  This is why on Wednesday Parliament needs to vote for a safeguard to prevent us from leaving the EU with no deal on 29 March.  
She is desperately trying to stop Parliament taking control of the #Brexit process until such a time as it becomes too late to avoid the UK falling of the cliff. #JustMakeItStop #PutItToThePeopleMarch #FBPE 
Your flip flopping on this has been utterly unhelpful.You were one person who could have crafted a unifying position on Brexit by pushing EFTA/EEA but didn’t do so.Bit late to whine about “radicalisation” nowYou should’ve made it the Vote Leave position when you had the chance  
#MeaningfulVote this is a democratic outrage. Governments cannot avoid parliamentary accountability. It renders all the Brexit claims about “return of sovereignty” meaningless.  
Another delay: Britain's May promises Brexit vote in parliament by March 12  
1/ Remainers have two main political tasks over the next few days, one is to convince MPs that if #Brexit is forced through without a #PeoplesVote there will be ever growing pressure to jail all MPs who colluded in a criminally corrupted Brexit. 
After the contempt May today showed for Parliament, it’s up to Parliament to treat that behaviour with equal contempt. Time for MPs this week to take power away from the PM on Brexit. Are they up to it? 
Lots of good petitions about.Let's focus on this one that is closest to 100,000Hold a second referendum on EU membershipTell May and her cronies what you want!Keep RTingSIGN this  Now RT it!#FinalSayForAll #PeoplesVote #FBPE #PeoplesVoteMarch 
Never forget that she (1) put herself forward for this, (2) said Brexit means Brexit when she didn't have to start down this path, (3) called Remainers citizens of nowhere thus dividing the country still further, (4) has acted negligently throughout. Deserves no sympathy at all. 
When are people at large going to accept Brexit is going to happen on March 29th and almost certainly without a deal. 
This is what Brexit is about, using the uncertainty to fleece the country and keep it's population subdued and disorientated. It's an assault on you, me and everyone we care about on these islands  
In office but not in power. Sacrificing our country, economy & future on the alter of a futile attempt to stay as PM & keep the Tory party from disintegrating. Shameful #Brexit  
May has postponed the #MeaningfulVote again. She won't let Parliament OR the public have their say on her #Brexit deal. This is not democracy, people - it's the very opposite of democracy. Make a noise - do NOT let your PM behave like a dictator. Britain's better than that. 
We must make it absolutely clear to the government that unless there is a #PeoplesVote, we will regard any #Brexit pushed through on the strength of the criminally corrupted 2016 referendum to be illegal and the government ministers responsible to be criminals. 
We're almost at 250,000 signatures on our campaign to Exit from Brexit! Help us reach this milestone with a quick retweet. Let's send a message to Theresa May that Britain will not be bullied into backing her broken deal. 
I can understand why three Tories *defected* - it was about #Brexit in each caseI really don't *get* why  Labour MPs defected - their reasons appear to be *diverse* - their only commonality appears to be a hatred of the Leader & a nostalgic *longing* to revisit the *third way* 
The government has exploited a legal loophole that allows it to treat an advisory referendum as mandatory even though a mandatory referendum would be voided due to electoral crime. This has violated the intent & purpose of our constitutional laws.#Brexit 
Politicians must not seek to delay Brexit or any further get in the way of our exit from the EU. There's been too many attempts to frustrate Brexit - it's time people got what they voted for.  
Another delay. Outrageous.Theresa May's recklessness is risking Britain's future, all for the sake of keeping her party together.Enough of this mess. Demand a People's Vote to end this embarrassing Brexit >  
Parliament this week MUST hold her IN CONTEMPT! No more soft-footing, finger-pointing & raised voices... She is the most dangerous & sociopathic PM this Union has ever had...and needs to be removed, for Parliament to be able to stop Brexit in its tracks... #TheresaMay 
I can’t believe I’m saying this again, but Theresa May is running down the clock to hold Parliament hostage.We must not enable her disastrous Brexit deal. It’s time to honour our conference decision and for Labour to back a public vote.  
While Labour have been shaken by events this week, the very real threat of a catastrophic no-deal Brexit makes the need for us to unite even more urgent. The people we exist to help need us to be a strong, coherent opposition to this reckless government.  
impressed that so many of you are managing to have any sort of feelings towards the latest Brexit developments, I seem to have reached some sort of higher plane of existence where it all washes over me and nothing ever matters 
Article 50 specifically gave 2 years. The Tories have already had 9 months extra on top of that.Brexiteers have waited, we've been patient. The 29th March is the day of leaving. We won't accept any extension. It's just a ruse by remainers to delay then cancel Brexit. 
May has put back the next meaningful vote again. Quick, blame Corbyn for not using his Magic Grandpa mind control ray to stop Brexit AGAIN 
PM confirms Meaningful Vote will not be held until 17 days before Brexit. So not meaningful at all if Britain is at the cliff’s edge of No Deal. 
May just gave British business 17 days to prepare for No Deal  Brexit - yet Allen, Soubry and the Labour splitters refuse to vote No Confidence in her? 
So: there was a referendum 2.5 years ago : NOTHINGS gone right / minds have changed / she’s had her crap deal rejected and wants to force it upon parliament to get it through at the last minute whilst denying the public a say ( who also don’t want it ) . It’s a disgrace  
#Brexit is a stew of sanctimonious colonialist tripe dreamed up by boarding school boys who will line their pockets while women and girls pay in rights and welfare. The only #meaningfulvote is a #PeoplesVote 
I'm in a beautiful cafe in Brussels right now and it's so disheartening to see what we're losing. Pulling up the drawbridge on Rainy Brexit Island to appease morons, sneaks and vested-interest skunks. 
Will someone please ask her, on record, why she progressed with Brexit knowing that the EURef result was corrupted and why she didn't share that knowledge with Parliament when she sought to activate Article 50? She alone has responsibility.#AskingForACountry#RevokeArticle50 
I love the Hotel California analogy - "You can check out any time you like, but you can never leave." This really sums up the #Brexit dilemma.  But, there is another Eagles song that relates to leading Brexiters - "There ain't no way to hide your lyin' eyes." #RevokeArticle50 
Theresa May postpones meaningful vote on final Brexit deal  The feeling that we’re being held to ransom by an incompetent person is growing by the day. When will the anger spill over? And when will people realise she has no clue what she’s doing? At all 
Theresa May says MPs will have final vote on #Brexit deal by March 12th  
As PM May confirms that a meaningful vote on the Brexit deal will not take place this coming week, reposting this story from last Wednesday on the status of talks, and the mismatch between some UK reports and reality  
Theresa May pulls this week's vote on Brexit - showing contempt for Parliamentary democracy and our European partners. Her grim team of self-serving officials clinging on, while our automakers flee and small businesses begin to panic. We need a vote this week. 
Pressure over Brexit is forcing a once-in-a-generation shift in British politics  
Another Labour affiliate GS calls for second referendum and party to back Kyle/Wilson amendment to ensure it...  
Said by an MP who clearly lacks any intelligence at all.  There’s no need for a “compromise” (ie sell out). Mays deal is not Brexit and is a bad deal. You and your fellow MPs have already legislated for us to leave on 29 March deal or no deal. You should respect that decision.  
Somewhere in the not too distant post-Brexit future, illegal immigrant Brits come flocking over desperate for any income  
Theresa May postpones meaningful vote on final Brexit deal - time for parliament to take control, past time.  
This is outrageous. We must hold Theresa May and her government accountable for the absolute mess they’ve made of Brexit negotiations, their willingness to hold parliament to ransom and the uncertainty they’ve created #BrexitChaos 
17 days before Brexit for a vote that might not pass the HoC.The recklessness is breathtaking.  
If ever a cabinet minister deserves to be sacked, it’s Rudd. But what’s worse is May’s duplicity in this sordid plot.  Trust in politicians may never recover from the way they’ve behaved over Brexit.   
May’s plan is pretty clear.Assuming Cooper-Letwin passes then March 12th will be the last day before “Parliament takes back control”.So the offer to the ERG and DUP is “back my deal or get a long delay to Brexit followed by something softer or even no Brexit”. 
Voters on the Japanese island of Okinawa have rejected the relocation of a controversial US military base, according to exit polls from a non-binding referendum cited by local media 
Blissful morning cycling along Thames: Teddington Twickenham Richmond. #Brexit free zone. 
Michael Gove says a 2nd referendum 'would do real damage to our politics'; whereas currently they are of course just hunky dory. 
As Theresa May signals yet another delay to the Brexit vote, I do hope this week is the one when parliamentarians of sound mind come together and call a halt to this (delaying) madness. 
Anti New U.S. Military Base Win a Majority in Okinawa Referendum 
We've consulted learned Cornish language scholars on the best translation of Bollocks to #Brexit.A literal version doesn't work so well alliteratively, apparently, but they have suggested this.Retweet if you think we should put it on a placard for the #PutItToThePeople March. 
Breaking!: live on @SkyNews: PM: 'No meaningful vote on Brexit until 12 March'Theresa May has decided there will not be a meaningful vote on Brexit this week, saying she will bring it to Commons next month. 
Theresa May heading to Egypt and postponing a meaningful vote one month before #Brexit is her very personal pyramid scheme at the expense of Britons and Europeans. 
JUST IN: Theresa May launched a last ditch bid to stop Parliament taking Brexit policy out of her hands by promising politicians a binding vote on her divorce deal by March 12  
Never knowingly modest Chuka Umunna reckons he massively increased his majority in 2017 because of his stance on #Brexit. Which was to honour the referendum result. Which he now opposes. Chuka's giving flip flops a bad name. I predict sales of flip flops will plummet this summer. 
Did you see that May's own lawyer admitted to the Court in London last Thursday in Wilson vs May that she KNEW the 2016 EU leave vote was procured by multiple crimes - and yet she STILL plans to proceed with "brexit" ? Do you actually know why she is doing that, Nick ? 
As predicted weeks ago by yours truly.May has a simple strategy. Kick the meaningful vote until mid-March and then push her toxic #withdrawalagreement with a meaningless legal codicils and honeyed promises.Hope panicked Labour and Tory MPs support it.Brexit betrayed.  
Now that the Court of Appeal (in the @UKEUchallenge) has given the green light for corrupt power politics to usurp democracy & the rule of law, what next?We must challenge the business as usual, antiquated 2 party system that gave us Brexit.#RevokeA50 
2. She is imploring Remain rebels to give her two more weeks to get a better deal. Announces a new Meaningful Vote on it will be held by March 12 (when there will be just 17 days to go until Brexit ). 
Anyone remember a while back the government put out a briefing note saying a second referendum would take a year as it would need to incorporate electoral reform beforehand?That was the ground being laid to make extension for a second vote unpalatable in Europe.Eyes up, folks 
The next meaningful vote on Brexit will be... 17 days before we leave the EU.  
This stupid government you have done everything you can to stop Brexit and then wonder why we aren't ready to leave on the 29th March. 
Many heroes have and will continue to emerge out of this colossal Brexit mess..... @NicolaSturgeon is certainly one of them. 
NEW. PM just landed in Sharm-el-Sheikh. Confirms on flight that there will be no meaningful vote this week. New date set for March 12 #brexit 
Completely fascinating that the National Conservative Convention backs motion it would be wrong to Brexit “beyond the European elections”. Minister tells me this sanctioned by leadership. Huge shift towards delay if so. Politics Home  
Sarah Wollaston embodies everything that is wrong with our political class:→ called for a referendum→ campaigned for Leave→ then Remain→ opposed a second referendum, ‘respecting result’→ stood on clean Brexit manifesto→ called for a second referendumAnd now this...  
Saying Parliament isn't respecting the Referendum result is nonsense. That's why we've spent past 2 years negotiating to leave. What's wrong with just checking to make sure the majority are still ok with leaving, now we know more? #RightToVote #C4PV 
For the fewer, not the most? 
I met a Brexit ideologue this week. And I realized why populists are so effective. He made no distinctions. Everything was clear and without nuances. That's why honest academics have trouble in public debate. We make distinctions between distinctions.  
Irish no-deal Brexit plans show talk of a hard border is just bluff, says DUP’s Sammy Wilson 
The only way to prevent a bad deal for Scotland is to extend Article 50, and put the brakes on Brexit. If @DavidMundellDCT can't ensure that, then he should resign from this UK government, which is clearly willing to plunge Scotland into a no-deal Brexit.  
5 Cabinet ministers have called on Amber Rudd to be sacked threatening to support extending Article 50. Delaying Brexit would be a complete betrayal, allowing for Remainers and the EU to try and stop Brexit altogether.  
Why has no one of political prominence, concluded that Theresa May wants a NO-Deal Brexit. Her husband's company stands to make a fortune from it. She's a Tory. She doesn't care about the country, only her own personal fortune. 
... and this in the week her QC admitted that she decided to leave the EU in full knowledge that the referendum was tarnished...Very dangerous indeed.  
There can be no such thing as a free press in the UK when the overwhelming majority of the press by circulation acts as the propaganda organ for a political axis linking the ERG and the far-right. #PeoplesVote #brexit #FBPE 
Wonder if Theresa May will have any Brexit meetings in this room?  #laseusummit 
Over 290,000 - a Quarter of All Eligible Voters - Against a New U.S. Military Base in Okinawa Referendum 
A welcome decision by @Paschald to review the #entrepreneur Tax Relief programme. Startups create jobs & add the innovation that makes economies resilient to external shocks like #Brexit Ireland & Dublin need policy leadership in this area to compete globally #MakingItHappen 
It's the same thing with Brexit..."They wouldn't dare doing this to us""If criminal activity had been involved, someone would have done something!"  
Not at all. 1. Millions were disenfranchised in 20162. Democracy didn't stop in 20163. The 2016 ref was procured by corrupt and illegal practices Time to realise we live in 21st century Britain not 1930s Germany or it's all gonna end in tears. 
33 days til Brexit and the rights of @BritishInEurope and @the3million are still in limbo.It does not have to stay that way.You can help #ringfenceourrights.Write to your MP today and ask them to support the Costa Amendment. Share this with a friend.#SundayMotivation 
Taking decisions based on evidence must be preferable to taking decisions based on ideology. After all Brexit is all about ideology and not the evidence! I’m willing to give the new group a chance to develop its policies. Marr’s gotcha journalism doesn’t help  
.@thomasbrake: "Continuous inaction and dithering from the Labour leadership has aided and abetted this #Brexit mess. It is time for McDonnell and co to put their money where their mouth is. It is time they backed their own Labour policy and delivered a #PeoplesVote."ENDS 
Exactly this! When Gove says a second referendum would damage our “politics” he means the Conservative party. Their biggest fear is the break off of the right to form a Brexit party.  
Look around at the chaos Putin has facilitated, from Brexit to France’s Yellow Vests, to imbedding anti-Semitic, racist xenophobes throughout Europe’s leadership.Now. Look around you on Twitter.Are you following trolls who create similar chaos among us?#BlockTheTrolls 
UK opposition Labour moving closer to backing second Brexit referendum: deputy leader  
And this witstful and basic (mis)understanding of Continental European politics is a fundamental reason why Brexit is the hot clusterf*** of the mess that it is.  
Is the idea of zero tariffs wiping out manufacturers meant to act as another threat to vote for the PM's Brexit deal? There really does seem to be no limit to the extent to which she's happy to inflict pain on business to get her deal  
New march for a People's Vote on Brexit receives £250,000 in matter of days  
This is the reality for working travelling musicians post brexit:-1. After decades of “2 up ye” to Europe, Europe might turn around with its own “2 up ye” &create expensive work visas for all touring musicians.2. Many of us play folk festivals Ireland &Europe3. My income stops 
EU will be our main competitor after Brexit. This shows our comparative weight as a global market. 1 flag = 10 million people.vsNo wonder no one wants to roll over our deals 
On Italy’s Canale 5 for a special TG5 Report on #Brexit - explaining why it’s such a terrible mess and why it’s time  to rule out no deal, and why remaining in the EU is still the best option open to the UK.  
What more do you need to know about the state of 'democracy' in the UK?@Suewilson91 #UKEUChallenge #VotesShouldBeFair @c_anne_richards @A50Challenge @RobertCPalmer13 @brexit_sham @Reasons2Remain @acgrayling @wolchover @BremainInSpain @BrexitBin @mrjamesob 
Labour must back a Brexit ratification referendum to end the UK’s crisis>Thus stopping a major source of political recruitment to TIG and giving us our best shot for ⁦a@UKLabour Govt⁩ #FinalSay 
Billy fails to mention that Erasmus is open to non EU countries too, including Serbia , Iceland and Turkey.  Some Spanish universities cancelled Erasmus applications. Brexit did not.  #Irexit #Brexit  
I've come to the conclusion that dirty Russian money is & has for some time been corrupting British politics, that those who are not corrupted are silent thru cowardice or confusion. That this is a reason for Brexit & why its self-harm is not stopped - Britain's greatest scandal. 
It's a huge problem that the Independent Group are not mentioning Proportional Representation. Even more than Brexit, it's the most urgent problem right now that needs facing. Our climate, the NHS & foreign policy all rely on a fair voting system & a fit for purpose democracy. 
Video: UK Foreign Secretary calls Slovenia, during his official trip there to gain support for Brexit, a former "Soviet vassal state". Slovenia was part of Yugoslavia, which was staunchly independent and co-founded the Non-Aligned Movement.  
‘It’s like Pompeii again if Pompeii voted for the volcano’ – US show takes down Brexit  
The Japanese are getting out of Brexit Britain — UK govt cannot be trusted. They ignore warnings, break their word, do not understand business. Japan intends to be ultra-tough in any trade deal with UK. They are incandescent with anger, and feel betrayed 
Gove et al clearly terrified that the public have changed their minds on #Brexit and will tell any available lie to avoid a #1stProperlyInformedUncorruptedVote  including the claim that more democracy will destroy democracy. 
If France has a social meltdown, it does not bode well for the rest of the EU. The EU is showing signs of mismanagement by the greedy. We need no part in this. #BrExit #Leave #NoDeal  
Brexit amendments/defection talk will dominate next week but anxious businesses are focusing on a statutory instrument which legislates to slash import tariffs in the event of no-deal Brexit. HMG is warned that doing so would decimate UK manufacturing. SI is expected on Thursday. 
Britain HAS reconsidered #Brexit.The majority is now very firmly for #RemainInTheEU.Two mad party leaders are determined to force #Brexit through.Tell @eucopresident and anyone else you can think of, we've been hijacked! 
Just a thought. It might have helped if the BBC had been properly analytical during the referendum campaign, calling out the lies and the unicorns that led us to this pretty pickle.  
Is this far enough down the rabbit hole for everyone?Church of England urges five days of prayer for poor as Brexit looms 
'Brexit is costing lives', say Derbyshire doctors and nurses   
BREXIT IN: 33 DAYS.Moggy CAN'T WAIT to leave the EU.#Brexit 
Following on from Brexit I fully expect Scotland to achieve independence, probably within 5 years maximum.I don’t like the idea of UK breaking up, but I understand why the Scots would not want to be led by the donkeys of Westminster. 
Babel: Adventures in Translation  A new @bodleianlibs exhibition is exploring the power of translation, from the ancient myth of the Tower of Babel to the challenges of modern-day multicultural Britain in light of Brexit:  
Brexit is 33 days away. #brexit 
The Benefits Of Brexit  
“Then there is a solid majority for that can be martialed behind the deal which will honour the referendum.”Gove on #marrHow can you honour a “mandate” of something which had it been mandatory would’ve been quashed as it is so tarnished by fraud and crime? 
“A second referendum could do *real* damage to our politics.”Michael Gove on #Marr The first frauderendum has literally ruined the country. How can another vote cause more damage. 
The Japanese aren’t daft – that’s why they’re getting out of Brexit Britain | Will Hutton  
REVEALED: Majority of MPs who backed amendments to prevent 'No Deal' and extend Article 50 are simply Brexit blockers.91 of the 92 currently-serving MPs that voted against triggering Article 50 backed the Cooper amendment last month.Full release here: 
So 59% of Scots would now prefer Scottish Independence to a #NoDealBrexit(and 53% prefer it to ANY Brexit!)#StopBrexitSaveUK 
The attack by Leavers further down is a perfect example of how differently they process information, how unimportant are facts, and what they are prepared to suffer for their Brexit.If I’m not responding it’s because I’ve blocked. There’s no reasoning. Just insults. 
Maltese PM Joseph Muscat swatted aside the idea that a last-minute British charm offensive could change the course of Brexit negotiations  
"I resigned from my ministerial aide 'bag carrying position' when I wanted to speak out & fight for Brexit.Those ministers who are threatening the PM with resignations clearly feel they are irreplaceable. I say the PM should stand firm and tell them to go."- Andrea Jenkyns  
It is her job, as an MP and particularly as the Prime Minister to represent the interests of her constituents, and of ALL the UK. Brexit doesn't do that, & her hardline stance on pushing to the brink of crashing out. doesn't either. @theresa_may 
Labour Deputy Leader @tom_watson "I think we are moving in that direction [of a second referendum]... What we would prefer is that Theresa May aligns around our red lines, gives us economic closeness to the European Union..."  
#Cuba |  This Sunday the Cuban people will vote in a #Referendum to on the country's new draft #Constitution. Here six things to know about Electoral Process.#CubaVota 
Has the EU27 fully digested that a Court in the UK has ruled that, had the referendum been binding and not advisory, it would have been declared null and void due to irregularities?There is no mandate and #Brexit is not the will of the people.@guyverhofstadt @eucopresident 
You should never take your eyes off Tony Blair Rich Branson or Supper  rich Soros as all are working behind the scenes to stop Brexit with  their Brexit propaganda like more than 50% want a second referendum,  what rubbish in truth 74% don't want a second referendum. 
Driving through #Brexit against the will of the majority on the strength of a narrow advisory referendum victory procured by crime, lies and hate propaganda would be such a grotesque abuse of democracy that it should be regarded as a crime or a coup.#PeoplesVote 
“We WANT a ‘People’s Vote’ on the outcome of a referendum that has already been held & voted onWe DON’T WANT a ‘People’s Vote’ in our constituencies because the election was held & the people have already votedWe are sickening hypocrites”@Anna_Soubry @ChukaUmunna 
I'm not the only person to have pointed out that Brexit has turned into a cult. Still depresses the hell out of me that otherwise sane people are displaying such antic cognitive dissonance. 
God, are you totally thick.Tariffs are imposed by the importing economy.We can declare zero tariffs & buy globally.Remove EU 35% dairy, 21% confectionary, 10% wine, 11% fish, 10% fruit, 40% meat tariffs.FOOD GETS CHEAPER ON BREXIT  
Anti New U.S. Military Base Win a Majority in Okinawa Referendum  #県民投票 #普天間移設問題・辺野古新基地 #okinawa #沖縄 
Second Brexit referendum important safety net to prevent 'no deal': Labour's trade spokesman  
For thicko journalistsThe EU is a cartel, its whole point is to favour producers over consumersBrexit can mean no food tariffs (Eu tariffs 35% on dairy, 21% on confectionary, 11% on fish, 10% food & vege  & wine, 40% on meat)BREXIT MEANS CHEAP FOOD  
The Office for National Statistics revealed the biggest fiscal surplus for a January on record. Last month, the government raised £14.9 billion more in tax than it spent. Just think how much better it will get once we end Brexit uncertainty & leave the EU.  
Michael Gove (with Boris) was the top figure in the Official Leave Campaign, and even he knows that a No Deal Brexit would betray the promises he made to the British people AND make us poorer! #Marr 
So Brexit at any cost? Even if it makes us poorer? Even if it wrecks our global reputation, causes jobs to be lost and chaos to ensue. Deeply depressing that someone of your standing and service should behave like the wide eyed follower of a palpably mad doomsday cult  
The Mysterious Finances of the Brexit Campaign’s Biggest Backer - The Electoral Commission concluded his referendum donations came from Rock Holdings, an impermissible company - yet still nothing from the NCA. 
WOW!! Michael Gove, who ran the Leave campaign, says a No-Deal Brexit was NEVER the plan and that it would make YOUR life harder! #Marr 
Why is Brexit crisis so hard to solve? Cabinet Remainers don’t trust the PM to stand up to the ERG ...who don’t trust the PM to stand up to Brussels ...who don’t trust the PM to get a parliamentary majority ...who doesn’t trust  Jeremy Corbyn ...who doesn’t trust ...(begin again) 
Over 290,000 - a Quarter of All Eligible Voters - Against a New U.S. Military Base in Okinawa Referendum 
Superb. Labour & trade unions making big moves on a public vote now. Might even outflank Independent Group?“Public must be given choice on whether Theresa May’s version of Brexit beats the deal we already have with Europe”Exactly right. #SocialistSunday #GTTO 
I went on holiday to France CHECKMATE REMOANERS, HARD BREXIT NOW 
#Labour must back a #Brexit ratification referendum to end the UK’s crisis says @Manuel_TSSA 
TIG are essentially the political wing of the senior BBC/Guardian/Observer: safely in favour of low taxes on the rich, reassuringly hostile to anything left of Tony Blair, pleasantly socially liberal, comfortingly anti-Brexit. Like re-immersing themselves in a warm bath of 2015.  
The American fund manager that employs Theresa May’s husband has said that it intends to use market uncertainty after Britain’s withdrawal from the European Union as a “buying opportunity”. #PeoplesVote #brexit #FBPE 
A quick glance through the @scotlandinunion twitter page reveals they are running terrified of a Scottish Independence referendum. Tweet after Tweet is a warning that Indyref is coming. Yet not a single tweet telling us why the Union is so wonderful. The game is up#ticktock 
It’s funny to hear @michaelgove talking about Brexit trade offs on #Marr.  Before the referendum he said people could vote for “all the advantages and none of the payouts”.   
For the next 30 or so days, your entire world is going to be full of disinformation about Brexit.If you don’t understand disinfo, this will affect you.Currently it cannot be stopped, but if you understand it the impact can be reduced.This film should help #MalwareForHumans 
My take on why the British public must have the final say over #Brexit - we must have a ratification vote!   
"Tough on Brexit, largely in favour of the causes of Brexit". 
Britain cannot afford any delay to Brexit.  
Delaying Brexit may be our last chance to prevent a historic mistake | Global | The Guardian  
‘Scotland can either choose to remain with a Brexit UK, and be one of the poorest countries in Europe, or become independent, and become amongst its richest. It’s up to you, the choice is that stark’.  
Michael Gove has confessed - there WILL be tariffs on food imports after Brexit. With no-deal, food prices will increase instantaneously as WTO tariffs would apply. This is Project Reality! Gove et al sold the UK a lie, there will be no benefits only a worse economy! #Marr #Ridge 
I can't get over this hypocrite Soubry. She brazenly ignores the result of a referendum, casts aside her party's manifesto, changes her mind on record so many times as to make her look stupid and then. . . . .wait for it. . . .says she wants to rule the country. What a lunatic !! 
Very strong from Tánaiste @simoncoveney this morning: MPs at Westminster need to realize that #brexit is about much more than just their own internal dynamics.  
There are no Brexit unicorns now  only real choices   and their consequences. Put it to the people to decide whether Theresa May's version of Brexit beats the deal we already have with Europe.@Tim_Roache on why the public must have the final say Agree? SHARE  
Michael Gove on Marr: during the referendum we always argued for a deal. Admitted in effect that ppl did not vote for a no-deal 
If you want someone banging on about Brexit, I'm afraid you'll need to look elsewhere. I'm finding following the news interferes with the digestion. 
Important thing being missed this morning. Unless I misheard, Barry Gardiner ruled out prospect of Labour endorsing People's Vote for anything other than a Labour Brexit. Which means even if a People's Vote were to become party policy, it would also be policy to vote to leave. 
This was a remarkable piece from 2016, and it's all the more relevant now: an ordinary voter tries to talk calmly and sensibly to her MP Theresa May about Brexit and the conversation is deeply disturbing.  
It seems the Brexit deal we're getting is that we leave the EU in return for getting sunnier, warmer weather. I'm tempted. 
We need you:Write to your MP today!There is an amendment going around Westminster to rescue, ring-fence, the #citizensrights part of the EU/UK withdrawal agreement no matter what Brexit outcome. It has wide support from MPs of all parties, both Leave & Remain1/  
When pressed on Article 50 extension, Gove seems to think asking the government to respect its manifesto promises is a ‘heresy hunt’. No Michael it’s asking you to be accountable. #marr  . Any delay to Brexit is an utter betrayal and we will be severely punished at the ballot box 
Because it’s not a ‘hard Brexit deal’ at all. It’s a #Brexit in name only capitulation & surrender to the EU. You know that it should/can never be a Treaty. You may as well resign now. 
A blip or a sea change? My latest Brexit Blog post analysing last week's developments including the foundation of @TheIndGroup and the news of Honda's closure:  
Luckily we have social media, so we can see first hand confirmation how Corbyn is working to get a practical Brexit deal to avoid a crazy Tory No Deal. On mainstream media this isn’t happening, the way he didn’t campaign for Remain, the way he hasn’t condemned anti-semitism...  
I read this as clearly in support of Tony Blair. I thought it was very cleverly worded to support him and his record in office against JC's support for TM's Brexit.#peoplesVote 
Brexit: Republic cannot 'compromise on peace process'  
Among many infuriating things, this is just one. Brexit is a program of inflicting real harm in retaliation for totally imagined injuries.  
Deputy Labour Leader Tom Watson on another referendum on #Brexit: “We’re moving in that direction”#Marr  
ANGER: 'Fifth columnist' anti-No Deal Remainer Rudd criticised by Ministers. “Amber Rudd is the fifth columnist of a stop Brexit bandwagon”  
Labour is moving towards a referendum? 'I think we are moving in that direction.' @tom_watson Deputy Leader of the Labour Party. Is the Labour Party's official position to overturn the vote of 17.4 million people? @Keir_Starmer #andrewmarr 
Ergo, the PM has committed Misconduct while in Public Office. Whatever else is acting on a known-to-be fraudulent result? Whose responsibility is it to initiate the charges? 
So many Spanish students have gained so much from being able to study in Britain - yet another ´Brexit Dividend´ ...  #RevokeRemainRebuild 
Easy way to put these words into concrete action:Extend the voting franchise for all local and Scottish elections and all Scottish referendums to ALL people resident in Scotland aged 16 and over.Do not allow Brexit to strip away the rights of those who choose to live here.  
Taking No Deal off the table could 'torpedo' Brexit, says Remainer minister John Penrose. Remainers trying to remove No Deal simply want to stop Brexit.  
Does anyone remember when Oct 2018 was the final Brexit deadline?Does anyone remember when Nov 2018 was the final Brexit deadline?Does anyone remember when Dec 2018 was the final Brexit deadline?Does anyone remember when Jan 2019 was the final Brexit deadline?#marr #Ridge 
wow Theresa May’s Brexit red lines finally leaked  
We warned this would happen, but they called it Project Fear."Erasmus has nothing to do with EU membership," they said. "Brexit won't stop it."Looks like they lied.  
Another thick muppet who thinks their skiing holiday gives them the Brexit solution.  
Brexit has become wanting things to stay the same while objecting to any form of Brexit that minimises change as being a betrayal.  
Correction: Brexit's biggest financial backer is Arron Banks and the source of his fortune is hard to track. We tried to untangle it  
I remember this fantastic speech by a labour leader who cared about democracy and people’s lives. Time for Corbyn to ask the people what they want, not say what he wants. Brexit has cost the UK £500m per week  Time for a peoples’ vote now we have the facts 
On Marr @heidiallen75 says she's not trying to thwart Brexit by backing so-called People's Vote. But the whole point of 2nd Referendum is to offer a way out of Brexit. That's literally what it's supporters wantIf it was about clarifying options you would offer Deal Vs No Deal 
In many ways reporting on #Brexit has been a journey - but I didn’t expect it to bring me here!  #EULAS 
With the Prime Minister threatening to pull the big Brexit vote this week again why don't we just rename the whole thing project shithousery. This would brake a clear promise & shows the only strategy the British Government have is to run the clock down to a high noon shootout 
Non EU Countries that participate fully in Erasmus: Iceland, Liechtenstein, Norway. Erasmus partner countries: Algeria, Egypt, Israel, Jordan, Lebanon, Libya, Morocco, Syria, Tunisia. If UK wants it can be full Erasmus participant or partner country.  Brexit totally irrelevant 
33 days to #StopBrexitBrexit job losses now 213,943 (plus multiplier effect on suppliers) & we haven’t even left yet!CATASTROPHIC for families/communitiesNO NEW JOBS coming#VoteLeaveLIEDJoin me to demand #PeoplesVote #OptionToRemain or #RevokeA50 
@eucopresident A legal question. It has become clear now that the 2016 EU leave vote was procured by major crimes. Does that not mean that ALL actions which flow from the crimes, including  "brexit", can and therefore will be undone ? After all, they do say "crime does not pay" 
So, some say a #PeoplesVote would be be a betrayal of the people who voted to leave the EU! No, they won't be excluded from voting and, if leaving is what the people want in 2019, they will win. The betrayal is a #Brexit that removes FOM rights from 65 million British people. 
Brexit isn't the end of the European Union. Brexit is the end of the United Kingdom! 
TM's one and only chance to save herself, her party, but most importantly Brexit and the country is to dig in and hold fast now The EU will not move on the backstop, her deal will not pass If she doesn't cave and takes us to No Deal she'd be forgivenShe'd be hailed a hero 
“We’re creating an economy that works for everyone*”*excludes the sick, the 14m in poverty, the disabled, the vulnerable, the young, the homeless including the 598 who died last year, those driven to food banks or losing their jobs due to Brexit etc etc 
Brexit PR man #marr says No Deal's quite popular in the country. Liar. No Brexit is what's popular in the country, No Deal is popular with the (very elderly) backwoods Tory membership. 
Coming to grief: the ten stages of Brexit (thread):1. It will be easy-peasy. With one bound we’ll all be free at last and living in the land of milk and honey. Democracy, sovereignty, patriotism and double helpings of cake all round. 
Which kind of makes you think that their primary objective is not Brexit itself but to maintain their supporters in a perpetual state of outrage and resentment: the lifeblood of right-wing populism. 
She admitted all the corruption in the vote last week!!  It was not a democratic or lawful referendum  
So Corbyn and McDonnell now being pressured by more Lab MPs - 2nd ref or we walk. The EU is so wonderful it's worth breaking up the Labour party for. Strange for a bloc in near constant economic and political crises. #brexit #RevengeOfTheBlairites 
Had the referendum been binding result would have been annulled? #Brexit is bonkers from every single angle  
Why won't Theresa May sack Cabinet rebels who want to delay Brexit to prevent no-deal? #FarageOnLBC @Nigel_Farage 
How the hell can she keep pulling stunts like this and getting away with it? Enough. She CANNOT be trusted. She is screwing the country just so she can say she saw Brexit through, regardless of the damage and the costs. FFS Parliament. STAND UP.  
A good leafletting session at Lincoln uni yesterday!Brexit presents a world of opportunity for young people!   Get involved with our youth campaign:  
Schrodingers referendum - it’s advisory, yet TM says as the will of the people, it’s binding; until wide scale illegality is exposed, which would void it if binding, so of course it’s back to advisory 
If as suggested @theresa_may does not being the promised Brexit vote this week she will have failed to deliver what she promised. She should do the honourable thing and go, she is incapable of showing leadership. We must extend article 50 this week and remove the cliff edge. 
Shadow International Trade Secretary Barry Gardiner has told Sky News he thinks it is "ridiculous" that Prime Minister Theresa May is trying to "wind down the clock" on Brexit with the option of her deal or no deal 
Listen carefully: The use of the armed forces after Brexit is NOT about food distribution. It is about controlling civil unrest.  
Labour are now publicly toying with offering a referendum on their renegotiated deal with Remain as an option. I wrote about this idea last month here >>  
Growl.“The largest democratic exercise in UK history”Untrue, but even if it were, it was then the largest fraudulent, criminal exercise in UK history.No mandate for this #Brexit madness.#RevokeA50 
There’s no better deal than the one we have now with the European Union. This is the one that won’t risk jobs, families’ livelihoods and our children’s future. It’s the one that keeps us as a progressive, outward looking nation. That’s why we need @LabPeoplesVote #Brexit  
The Brexiter cries of betrayal levelled at Theresa May are laughable if you consider that she has turned a blind eye to proven illegal electoral manipulation in order to push through a harder #Brexit than most of the leading Brexiters were advocating pre-2016. 
On #RidgeOnSunday, @BarryGardiner confirms the Japan/EU deal is the cause of Honda job losses. We know! It was created for Japan and the mainland. The EU doesn’t care about the UK. For them, #Brexit is just a loss of funding. I’d rather have a #WTOBrexit than “friends” like this. 
This. @GMB_union @Tim_Roache "It is the people who must be the ones to decide whether Theresa May’s version of Brexit beats the deal we already have with Europe...The people must have the final say if we are to settle the issue of Brexit once and for all" 
If the TIG's policies were:- Stop Brexit, no ifs, no buts- Proper proportional representationThat package would appeal to *far* more people than voted for either the Tories or Labour at the last GE.#Ridge #Marr 
Coveney - You can't ask Ire to compromise on something as fundamental as peace process, just to placate a group within Tories.#Brexit #Ridge 
There could be another reason, Anthony.Her husband's US employers investment fund increased in value by over $100 BILLION on the June 2016 EU leave vote, and they will make more HUGE sums from May's "brexit".Maybe the simple explanation is correct - she is just doing it for money 
While @AmberRuddHR has had the courage to speak publicly about her opposition to a no-deal Brexit, the Cabinet critics demanding her scalp remain anonymous. What is the point of these pathetic invertebrates?  
This sounds very much like Barry Gardiner ruling out Labour backing a referendum if May’s deal is on the ballot paper... that’s a whisker away from Labour ruling out support for any immediate referendum #ridge 
WHAT CABINET MINISTERS SAID:-1 ‘My colleagues are totally undermining the PM . . . they should be sacked now’2 ‘Rudd is the fifth columnist of a stop Brexit bandwagon’3 ‘It’s astonishing disloyalty' 4 ‘Too many egos are being flaunted around.' 
Sorry TIGs, but post-Blair Britain will not be duped by the pernicious lie of a 'centrist paradise'  Its not centrist its anti brexit - if u are pro brexit would u be allowed as an MP into the TIG ? 
Dear @BarryGardiner, @UKLabour won support in 2017 because people thought you would oppose Tory Brexit. You cannot rely on that support again. You must now follow Conference policy, the wishes of many CLPs, and push for @peoplesvote_uk. Get on with it! @SkyNews @RidgeOnSunday 
Shame you don’t have such high regard for the manifesto promises you stood on at the election. Confirming the outcome of the People’s referendum...  
Planning a #brexit weekend away with friends in #Finland. We thought we'd go to mökki, light a bonfire then I could burn my passport because it will be quite useless after 29th March! 
Delaying Brexit may be our last chance to prevent a historic mistake  
Who wants to entrust Brexit to Remain campaigners? Who thinks 3 month delay would lead to further delay and be exploited by 2ndRef campaign?  
Its beyond 'clear' Corbyn/Momentum have total control of the Labour Party & that clearly Labour is now a racist hard left party ... time for moderate Labour men & women to leave ... sadly TIG is not available unless u are anti brexit ... they have gone from 1 extreme to another ! 
Another devestating reality of a hard Brexit. Erasmus allows young people to live & study in other European cities. To engage with people of different backgrounds & experience other cultures, to learn in a different way. It creates opportunities. #BrexitReality 
Why I'm sceptical about a new anti-Brexit liberal party | my piece in @thesundaytimes  #SundayThoughts 
You really don’t get it, do you @jeremycorbyn?The size of Labour’s victory was almost entirely attributable to people’s belief that you would deliver them from Brexit. Don’t believe me? Get back on that Glastonbury stage, I dare ya! The wave of dislike for you would be palpable 
And here is the queue of trucks at the border approaching Basel from Mannheim a couple of weeks ago. These “I took myself or my private car to Switzerland so Brexit is solved” tweets are tedious.  
Put it to the people. They must be the ones to decide whether Theresa May's version of Brexit beats the deal we already have with Europe.@Tim_Roache on why it’s the public who must have final say on #Brexit  
UK Cabinet Ministers prepare for 'managed' No Deal #Brexit  #photography via AwardsDarwin 
The Electoral Commission handed @theresa_may a trump card with its criminal activity findingsA rational PM would have taken it back to Parliament to annul the Referendum and ask for a re-runBut not her-she has her own agenda! 
Every Prime Minister, party leader or delegate I spoke to over the last 2 days at the @PES_PSE Congress in Madrid said to me that they hope that #Britain will reconsider #brexit. 
Parliament has reached an impasse on Brexit and that's why we need a @peoplesvote_uk. The main party leaders need to stop conspiring to rob the British public of the ability to actually sort this because it is the only way that you are going to be able to do it. 
33 days till brexit and these bellends still think they’ve solved Brexit by going on a skiing holiday to a Schengen country (without a massive lorry load of goods) whilst we’re still in the fucking EU pic.twitter.com/I0QuoZNoYs 
“I was shocked. I had set out to tackle the Prime Minister but I hadn’t expected she would lose her temper and jab her finger at me”.Someone complained about #Brexit to her local MP – Theresa May –. But the encounter did not go quite as she expected. 
Hard to think of anything more insulting to people’s intelligence than the argument that a decision to delay Brexit from 29th March to 29th June (so that MPs can find a compromise deal that a majority can support) is tantamount to betrayal of the referendum. 
The FT of all places is reporting that EU asset managers are actually considering moving TO the UK BECAUSE OF Brexit! 
So the “Kyle compromise” referred to by broadcast media is a referendum between May’s deal and Remain. That’s a betrayal, not a compromise. 
Why are the remainer classes so desperate to take "no deal" off the table?BecauseA. They failed in the referendumB. They failed to stop Article 50C. They've failed with a people's voteThey know that "no deal" is the Brexit people voted for.It's their last chance 
Thornbury & Corbyn amongst many @UKLabour & Tory MPs 'betraying' their constituencies over Brexit But, no! In @EmilyThornberry's opinion the #TIG are the traitors. How have things become so utterly surreal? #RevokeA50 and #PutItToThePeople again. 
Funny how none of those advocating Brexit are doing too badly out of it...  
I’ve told @SunScotNational that with 3 Cabinet ministers in favour of an extension to #Art50, which @theSNP have been advocating, it’s looking likely that’s what could happen as a result of next week’s #Brexit debates and amendments  
Massive from @GMB_union The people should have the final say between the Brexit deal and the EU deal we currently have #FinalSay 
Hundreds of thousands of ordinary people marched in London on two separate occasions in 2018 against a destructive Brexit. Corbyn couldn't be bothered to attend.The moment some of his MPs quit, & join with pro-EU Tories, he's free to organise a bitter rally.Go figure. 
Brexit is providing an opportunity to boost UK business & the UK economy. Firms have already started switching from EU manufacturers & we should encourage more to do it. For example, why import car components from the EU when they can be made in the UK..  
"Whether you are someone who can’t wait to see us leave the EU, or whether you wish the result of the referendum had been different — we all, each of us, just want the best for the UK,"  @andrealeadsom in today's @TheSun 
'Test of democracy': Okinawa votes in referendum on US base move  
Amber Rudd should be sacked for Brexit delay threat, furious Cabinet colleagues demand  
There is something starkly sinister about May’s monomania on Brexit. In the face of its illegality & profoundly undemocratic nature, & the fact that the majority of the country is against it, her persistence is pathological. 
Please sign and retweet. A little known fact is that @theresa_may ‘s #Brexit #Maysdeal will mean that defence contracts have to be tendered across the EU, damaging British security, employment, manufacturing capabilities and the economy. 
As a Brit living in Switzerland for 5 years. I’d politely ask you stop over simplifying massively complex and nuance topics like Brexit. Switzerland is not Britain, Norway is not Britain etc etc. culturally, geographically, socially - it all matters. 
It’s just struck me - if we No Deal, we still have to agree a post Brexit trade arrangement with the EU.And there’s still zero consensus on what that should be. This is going to rattle on for years. 
"Crashing out of the EU with either Theresa May's bad deal, or with no deal at all, is a false choice that would be disastrous for Scotland”- @IanBlackfordMP calls on David Mundell to finally back an extension to Article 50 and put the brakes on Brexit:  
Great to see @Tim_Roache backing call for a second referendum. Labour front bench needs to commit unequivocally to that this week...  
#IDontUnderstandPeopleWho think the country will ever heal if the Brexit vote leads to people losing loved ones who would otherwise have been saved, which (as shown above) is what the UK's medical community is saying would happen.The only way to avoid that is a People's Vote. 
792 hours until Brexit We are leaving the EU, the most audacious fraudulent scam ever perpetrated against British taxpayers.43 years of lies, deception & swamping our proud island nation with cheap East European immigrant workers & violent criminals.Onwards & upwards! 
Today I reached 8k followers and I want to thank everyone who has taken the trouble to follow me.I always follow back.Let’s hope that this week we have good news on Brexit.This week is crucial for this Govt and our country.Any backsliding will be punished by us leavers 
The new Japanese consensus is that British conservative ministers do not understand business and worse, break their word. Brexit UK is locked in an Imperial mindset. The decision has been taken to go. The first of endless reverses ahead.  
Honda, Brexit and the collapse of Japan's love affair with the UK"From Swindon to Sunderland, from automobiles to insurance, Japanese companies are suddenly turning cold on the UK."  
No government would implement these tariffs. It was the biggest remain lie of the referendum campaign. NFU knows it and warns consumer prices will fall.  
Trade between Ireland the UK after Brexit  
If Parliament is adamant it does not want May’s atrocious deal, and the EU are adamant they won’t reopen negotiations - then what is the point of delaying Brexit on the 29th? WTO let’s GO  
So Ireland wants to ensure the UK cannot do trade deals with other countries? This shows why the EU is scared of a full Brexit. It will mean we flourish and THEY hate the idea of that. Yet many of our politicians AGREE with the Irish. So many traitors and enemies abound.  
Rather naive.She has grouped together all her conservative parliamentary supporters & begged them to threaten her so she can claim postponement of Art 50 is not of her doing.Do people really not get this?SHE HAS NO INTENTION OF DELIVERING BREXIT  
Voters are watching. MPs who listen to their constituents know there’s “mounting anger at the mismanagement, delay, even sabotage of Brexit – so they must vote against any attempt to weaken Britain’s position or to dilute our withdrawal”#StandUp4Brexit 
Theresa May has spent two and half years ensuring she sucks all the life out of Brexit by frustrating all the main benefits. Now she issues a statement saying we must not frustrate Brexit. The sheer CYNICISM of it all! 
A grubby Westminster stitch-up to meet the needs of internal Tory party politics rather than the best interests of our country will not settle Brexit for a minute, let alone a generation.The public must be given the final say, says @Tim_Roache 
Thank you! About sums up everything to do with this Brexit nonsense. Logic, fair play, reason, decency all out the window.@UKEUchallenge @Bremaininspain 
From News Thump.“There are two types of people who loudly celebrating the prospect of a no-deal Brexit; the very rich and the very stupid. If you’re not sure which one you are, take a look in your wallet.” 
The Japanese aren’t daft – that’s why they’re getting out of Brexit Britain | Will Hutton  
‘Delaying Brexit may be our last chance to prevent a historic mistake’  
Where They Stand - a Guide for English VotersConservativesHard Brexit. No challenge to existing UK power structuresLibDemsNo Brexit. Minor challengeIndependent GroupNo Brexit. No challengeLabourSoft-ish Brexit. Major challengeGreensNo Brexit. Major challenge 
Quite right, @andreajenkyns. If the prime minister had anything about her, she'd sack those ministers blackmailing her into delaying Brexit. A cynic might claim they're doing her bidding... Support us at  
AMBER RUDD is facing calls from five Cabinet colleagues for her to be sacked after she threatened to delay Brexit, according to reports..  
Chuka Umunna has told Sky News he believes the Labour Party has "betrayed his community" on Brexit - and said this was a driving force in his decision to become an independent MP  
As @DominicRaab says, we won't be able to move on from Brexit until politicians deliver a successful Brexit that's faithful to the referendum result. Without a way to get out of it, the Backstop would make that impossible.  
I was lied to simply to get them to be able to do whatever they want in the name of Brexit & that's wrong!  I NEVER voted for any of this & I want to #remain. EU citizens & Britd abroad have been treated & used as bargaining chips. #PutItToThePeople or #RevokeA50. #StopBrexit 
Every media person who thinks they’ve solved Brexit on their skiing holiday should be made to transport a lorry full of insulin back the other way and livetweet the process  
May faces Tory annihilation, her cabinet split, calls for her to stand down, crunch Brexit votes - so what does @ObserverUK choose to print?Article after article bashing Corbyn. Why is he such a threat to their cosy world?  Because they know he'll win!#IStandWithCorbyn 
Why delay Brexit? Simple, it's better for Remainers than leaving on March 29th. Otherwise it achieves nothing except to give Remainers even more time to engineer Brexit reversal. Fight Brexit extension, it's just another ploy to keep us in. 
“If we say we will never ever leave without a deal, the EU would know for certain that they can stop Brexit in its tracks simply by refusing to agree a deal with us. Or, if they’re feeling subtle, by offering a bad deal they know Parliament will turn down”  
Gordon Brown, the man who signed the Treaty of Lisbon without giving the British people a Referendum on it, has called for Article 50 to be delayed by up to a year, according to the Mirror. 
Taking no deal off the table would torpedo Brexit completely explains ⁦@JohnPenroseNews⁩ 
If the Prime Minister is confident her Brexit deal does the job, she doesn’t have anything to worry about. Trust the public to give their verdict. Let the people have the final say. 
There are no Brexit unicorns now  only real choices   and their consequences. The people must be the ones to decide whether Theresa May's version of Brexit beats the deal we currently have with Europe. 
Iain Duncan Smith moaned that the EU is acting like a bully over Brexit - he's the architect of Universal Credit which has literally taken money away from school dinners for poor chldren...AND #IDS cheering disability benefit? Standard bullying behaviour... #Marr #Ridge 
SNP Westminster leader Ian Blackford has urged Scottish Secretary David Mundell to resign if he does not oppose a no-deal Brexit. 
Um, so you remember the next Brexit-related vote Theresa May pledged to hold at the end of the month to buy off rebels who were going to put down an amendment forcing her to act? Yeah, you guessed it... looks like TM's gearing up to cancel it.  
I left the Conservative party it has been taken over by the far right ERG group and sank to a new low with zero morality when serial liar and cheat Johnson was made Foreign Secretary. Sacked twice for lying once by Michael Howard ex leader of party. Brexit is Putin’s 5th column.  
And, yes, I know Switzerland is in Schengen. But we aren’t now, and we won’t be after Brexit, so why does anything have to change if the British and EU leaders are sensible and agree that it doesn’t need to? 
There will be no new deal in the desert. Theresa May will get a few minutes, presumably to say ‘Brexit means Brexit.’  
The beginning of the end of Erasmus for UK Universities. This is what Brexit has done. It is taking away the freedom for our young people to study in 27 different countries.  
Louise Mensch was a very active campaigner for #brexit. However, whilst she is not a #remainernow, she is now calling for #brexit to be delayed as the UK is not ready and that doing so now threatens national security.Good to have some honesty from #Brexiteers 
Again, this should be of interest to you, @BBCPolitics @BBCNews @MirrorPolitics @Independent @ObserverUK @guardian @thetimes. Our PM proceed with pursuit of referendum result, knowing that it was won unlawfully. This is huge. Why aren’t you covering this?  
If Theresa May is serious about delivering #Brexit, she has no alternative but to:Stop charging around Europe trying to get minor changes to the unacceptable WA;Sack Remainer ministers; andFocus on #NoDeal.No extension to A50; no 2nd referendum.  
Sharm el Sheikh bound - EU says there will be ‘no deal in the desert’ - but can the PM make any progress on Brexit ? 
British Steel may face a $130 million financial hit within weeks over carbon costs if Theresa May can't seal Brexit deal  
This hasn't happened by accident. May brought Toxic Rudd back into cabinet knowing exactly what her feeling towards Brexit were.  
Brexit news: Fisherman begs UK to quit EU NOW - 'Don't want to be ordered around!' | UK | News |  
The time interval between the last two general elections - when we were allowed to change our minds on the basis of new info - is greater than the time difference between the EU referendum and now - when we are not allowed to change our minds on the basis of new info. Democracy? 
Final stages? This is just the beginning. We haven't even started debating in Parlt/negotiating the 'final' deal, which - if a comprehensive FTA - will take best of a decade. If you're sick of talking #brexit , it's time to #RevokeA50 and get back to running this country. 
Michael Gove was offered but turned down the role of Brexit Secretary. He really doesn't want to take any responsibility for the chaos that he help to cause... There's a possibility that an expert advised him not to take the job! #marr #ridge 
The bottom line is simple: Brexit has been, is, and will be a disaster for Britain. The 2016 vote was manipulated through lies, writes @NYTimesCohen. 
This “clean Brexit” is a dangerous & powerful lie. People want this to stop. They are sick of Brexit. They’re being told “just leave with no deal” would end it cleanly. This is a lie. It would embroil us in negotiations with the EU for years, as the supplicant. #RevokeArticle50 
BBC news headline - ‘grassroots Tories warn against betraying democracy’ - a straight Brexit political broadcast. There are hardly any ‘grassroots Tories’!  The mass ‘grassroots British public’ want a second referendum, as every poll shows in the face of growing Brexit crisis 
Amber Rudd should be sacked for Brexit delay threat, furious cabinet colleagues demand  
We must take the opportunity of Brexit to return to the great British tradition of civil liberties, says @ThinkEmily @con4lib 
What a laughing stock this country is. We have a PM whose hubby might be profiting from brexit. That aside, we know the EU referendum was interfered with and that money laundering and Russians may be involved, that brexit is dangerous and @metpoliceuk and @NCA_UK sat waiting  
Here's more evidence that our Prime Minister suffers from #delusionaldisorder.Fourteen million in poverty, debt still rising, homelessness & a #brexit catastrophe.Will someone @bbcpolitics @itvnews @SophyRidgeSky, @bbclaurak or @MarrShow, please tell Theresa May where it's at! 
For importance of history just look across the  Sea. Brexit is based essentially on a failure to understand  and  history and on a wish to return to a fictional version of the past.  
Welby prepares for five days of prayer after BrexitWhat a pious plonker! 
The U.K. not being able to execute the “Irish goodbye” is why Brexit has failedsend tweet  
May funks Brexit vote as cabinet splitsRudd the Remainer. Should Never have been Allowed Back in the Cabinet! She is Deviously Dangerous, yet she only had a 346 Majority at GE when elected as MP! 
“If the referendum was binding it would have to be annulled and Brexit stopped, but as it was only advisory, you can’t have it annulled, so you can use it to Brexit.”“That's some catch, that Catch-22," he observed."It's the best there is," Doc Daneeka agreed. 
Trump Climate Change Brexit Trump Brexit Climate Change. And here, to complete another perfect tweet, is a baby cat.  
SCOTTISH EXPORTS: Exports to the EU27 rose by £1.7bn to £14.9bn in 2017, the year after the Brexit vote. But exports to England, Wales and N. Ireland surged by £2.2bn over the same period to total £48.9bn – fully £34bn more than the rest of the EU combined, reports the Telegraph. 
Vote Leave cheated! The campaign headed by Boris Johnnson & Michael Gove is guilty of breaking electoral law on 4 counts. Brexit is a lie, it is not the 'will of the people'. We need to recognise the illegality of the referendum! #StopBrexit #marr #ridge 
There is a new video of Theresa May preparing for a soft Brexit.  
Theresa May insists Brexit 'must not, will not' be blocked  
The only reason any MP wants to take No Deal off the table is that they want to stop brexit altogether. These MPs are frauds and liars. 
It will drag out longer than Brexit 
Difficult decision for #5Eyes if #Britain so distracted by Brexit fudges & allows Beijing’s Telco Huawei to operate #5g @SenatorCardin @jmohanmalik @StephenMcDonell @jennymcallister @afneil @JohnHemmings2 @RosieBlau @mcgregorrichard @ASPI_org #auspol 
Tobias, I am a lifetime tory voter and a member for s decade. I will never vote Tory again if May’s deal happens or Brexit is delayed. I will never trust you again. The betrayal will be massive. If this is what I think, imagine what millions of less loyal leave voters think. 
This will finish the Conservative party. How can you be that ignorant, that naive, that out of touch that you can’t see this. May’s withdrawal treaty is NOT BREXIT. We all know it. You know it. This deal or a delay in brexit and the votes will flood away. WAKE UP YOU MUPPET. 
THOUSANDS of ex-pat Brits face hefty fees to live in Europe after Brexit – despite their citizens being allowed to stay here for free.This is the way our “friends” in the EU treat us We should immediately do the same then for EU citizens here   
We wants it. We must haves it. Our precious. Our... Brexit.It's quite something to see how well Andy Serkis got her. It makes me wonder who he'd been talking to... 
Hey Steve, Andrew Bridgen is out of his depth and is lying...Eisman of ‘Big Short’ fame says he’s shorting U.K. banks because nobody has ‘any idea’ about ‘economic impact of Brexit’A more informed view... 
"Shh! I think Brexit can hear us!" May added with a shudder. 
"You wouldn't like Brexit, when Brexit is frustrated," she explained nervously. "When Brexit is frustrated, it... does things. Bad things." 
From the Mexican border to Brexit, framing an issue as an "emergency" where time is of the essence helps bypass the much slower civilian world of deliberation and facts  
People like you, Soubry, Woolaston, Allen and the rest of them will never be forgiven if Brexit is betrayed, which is what your weasel words amount to.  
Church of England urges five days of prayer for poor as Brexit looms  
Trump or Clinton, Brexit or Remain, Maduro or Guaido? They are both worse! (Op-ed by @Slavojiek)  
Yes Tim. The UK constitution relies on the two party adversarial contest. When both main parties are broadly aligned, as they are with Brexit, there is little to restrain the executive. This is a dangerous moment. TM is authoritarian in any case. She's off the leash now. 
"PM’s hard Brexit deal"??????Who are you kidding?We're not stupid - May's deal is crap & keeps us tied to the EU & you know it.That is not what we voted for. 
They've decided that it's Putin brainwashing that's caused #Brexit.  
As the Brexit debate grinds toward a climax, Ireland is getting a familiar feeling: “The British,” as one person said, “are about to kick us in the teeth again.”  
Three ministers throw weight behind Brexit delay to stop no-deal  
a democratic exercise would have been a fair referendum, actual information on what it meant exactly for either option and a parliament that then voted to invoke article50. Not a Pm who decided an advisory referendum was no such thing and who took it upon herself to then A50. 
The lie about "having" to do #Brexit at the risk of enabling the far-right is like smoking more to defeat lung cancer. 
Best Brexit ever 
Could an LA beauty shaman cure a severe case of Brexit face?  From @1843mag 
Today is the Referendum in Okinawa! I hope that all eligible voters will vote! Please vote either yes or no. Please do not vote undecided, since it is not helpful at all. 
Five cabinet colleagues have called on the PM to sack Amber Rudd as the ringleader of a cross-party plot to stop Brexit. One cabinet minister referred to her as a fifth columnist. Too true. Brexiteers are advising May to keep her nerve and ignore the Remainers. 
Opinium is owned by @ChukaUmunna's centrist mate.TIG isn't a party. You can't vote for them in 99% of the country.In 2016, Chuka said a Labour split would keep the Tories in power for decades. That's why he's doing this. It's nothing to do with stopping #Brexit. #Marr 
You betrayed Honda, Mr McClusky, with your brexit. Honda begged us not to break their business model.  
People are tired from Brexit and sick from @theresa_may and @jeremycorbyn lies!ALL polls show majority now wants to stop Brexit and #revokeA50! ONLY 12% support May/Corbyn hatred of foreigners: 
Remember that stupid referendum we had on changing the voting system in British Columbia? What a giant waste of time that was. 
Remarkable how the spectre of #Brexit has energised not only the worst but also the best of British opinion on Europe. Indeed, other countries would be fortunate to have such passionate and compelling advocates of EU integration as eg @MadeleinaKay @Andrew_Adonis or @RCorbettMEP 
This is almost as silly as Brexit itself.One thing I can't understand is how God told Welby we should Remain, whereas he told May we should Leave. Surely it's the same god, as they're both CofE. Is God perhaps 'avin' a bit of a laff? 
"A 'Brexit' for Italy? If you do it to close borders, then it becomes something racist and I would be completely against that."  
There's a lot of excited media talk about the Yvette Cooper amendment, and how it will take a no deal Brexit off the table. As far as I can see, it does no such thing - it just moves the cliff edge modestly into the future. But the cliff is still there, waiting to get us. 
The No No Dealers not only betray the PM & UK’s negotiating position, but if they succeed in reversing 2016 referendum decision all hell breaks loose in U.K. politics, indefinitely. Taking no deal off the table could torpedo Brexit completely. 
Residents of Japan's Okinawa go to the polls in a closely watched referendum on the controversial relocation of a US military base to a remote part of the island  
Ah yes. That strong & stable stable full of blinkered horses with tunnel vision. Vision so tunnelled that it fails to notice the near half that voted for Remain; vision so tunnelled that it is oblivious to corruption & ignores its own reports that state that Brexit means damage. 
Um, so under the lurid tales of Cabinet splits, there's the story of how church leaders are planning to lead the nation in public prayers the day after Brexit. That's how bad things will be - they're already gearing up to call on divine intervention to save us.  
#TheresaMay and the @Conservatives promised that the #UK would leave the #EU with #nodeal if a bad deal was the only alternative. She must keep that promise or the #ConservativeParty needs to be vanquished for their LIES!  #StandUp4Brexit #Brexit #Tory 
So @theresa_may went ahead with @Conservatives #Brexit knowing that it was unlawful. The moment a British citizen dies directly as a result of Brexit she should face criminal proceedings. If the death toll is significant she should be prosecuted for crimes against humanity. 
Here we have ironic look at the future of #London roads where the elderly and infirm and any one else who can’t ride a #bicycle can no longer get to their destination,either by bus Taxi or car.The @MayorofLondon doesn’t want any of the above in London #SundayMorning #BBC #Brexit pic.twitter.com/scXnLszaey 
CAPTION CONTEST : #Brexit  
When even Louise Mensch thinks Brexit is a bit much you know its got problems  
Once Brexit is achieved the next phase will be the ‘stab-in-the-back’, how Brexit could have been glorious if it hadn’t been betrayed by a conspiracy between the socialists, liberals and Jews. They will tell the angry masses that we must rid society of these ‘evil’  (1/2) 
Blistering from former Tory MP on Theresa May... no wonder a current one told me the the day that she’s been driven mad by Brexit, others have said a lot worse...  
The Brexit unicorn still evades capture, but the choice is clear. Chris Riddell on the pressing need for a people’s vote #Brexit #TheresaMay #BrexitExtension - political cartoon gallery in London  
The PM and the grassroots of the Tory party are closer to the view of the country as a whole than is Parliament itself. Oh. come on, let's get on with it...#Brexit  
So the Green lobbyist demonised diesel cars which caused a collapse in sales which led to mass job losses Honda closes a U.K. factory Jaguar Land Rover job losses then they attempt to blame #brexit now the pollution LIES are exposed  
THIS!! people are so done with scaremongering; even when it's fact it's still just dismissed as negativity!! instead of "Brexit will destroy the NHS," show how the NHS benefits from EU membership! could even tie it in with EU citizens: doctors, nurses, cancer research scientists! 
What utter waffle "hard Brexit deal" stop treating us like fools. You had better think twice about blocking no deal. The membership are behind the PM on this, and those trying to sabotage her better have another job to fall back on. 
So the government's legal argument would seem to be that if not caught within a few months criminals should be allowed to enjoy the proceeds of crime, but only if the criminals are in government. #Brexit is a coup. The orchestrators must be jailed. 
Taking no deal off the table wouldn’t just massively weaken the Prime Minister’s negotiating position. It could torpedo Brexit completely, leaving us in a ‘Hotel California’ Brexit, where we’d checked out but could never leave..  
"And if there were a second referendum on British membership of the European Union, how would you vote?"50% ~ Leave50% ~ RemainVia @DeltapollUK, 8th-11th Feb 
“The PM’s hard Brexit deal” ...Nick is desperate to paint the ERG as “hardliners” to justify his position.The fact is that they’ve always backed a deal and have worked with Nick Morgan and others to help the Prime Minister deliver a deal that honours her manifesto promises.  
Is #Brexit a good idea? 
Sadly, I have said this over and over and over and over and over again.But nobody listens to me.We need a pro-EU #remain campaign that makes the POSITIVE case for Europe.Demanding for a People's Vote without making the case for the alternative to #Brexit is futile.  
SMH. "Delay Brexit" writes Louise Mensch, one of the most odious vocal & rabid fear mongering shills for Brexit.  She allied with Breitbart, FoxNews & Nationalists to propagandize false & vile nativist rhetoric that paved the way to the UK disaster.  
There are no upsides to Brexit. There are no sunny uplands. There is only penury, hardship and entropy. Brexit was and remains the single, greatest delusion in human history. It is the greatest lie ever told. It is the folly of all follies & it must be stopped before it too late!  
When do you suggest 2050 perhaps! ... even with a deal and transition period it will be nearly 5 years after the referendum!!  
Do you know what we are? We’re fucking Brexit destroyers aren’t we babe? Brexit. Fucking. Destroyers. pic.twitter.com/VbCPxbARhJ 
I am I lived in Britain I have British Friends  I have family born in Britain I remember the 'troubles' in the North of Ireland & across our islands. PLEASE just #RevokeA50 We *all* know it makes senseTogether UNITED #brexit 
This is from an editorial in the Nikkei, Japan's leading business newspaper. It leaves its readers in no doubt that #Honda's decision to leave Swindon was indeed very much about #Brexit. #StopBrexit #RevokeArticle50 #PeoplesVote 
Three ministers throw weight behind Brexit delay to stop no-deal  
Brexit is just a bonfire of money... ...in the hope that the bonfire will conjure up a unicorn.[We really should have spent it on the NHS instead] 
I resigned from my ministerial aide 'bag carrying position' when I wanted to speak out & fight for #Brexit. Those ministers who are threatening the PM with resignations clearly feel they are irreplaceable. I say the PM should stand firm and tell them to go. #IdleThreatsNoBackbone 
And this is why #brexit must be stopped. She's doing it for her benefit, not yours or mine. #RevokeArticle50 
I wonder if those trying to ignore the fact that UK has changed its mind about Brexit realise how many angry people there are in Manc Leeds, Liverpool, Newcastle, Edinburgh, Dundee, Belfast, Bristol, Cambridge, Oxford, Cardiff,  Aberdeen and every other City that voted Remain.  
#Brexitgate: Did May block an investigation into Brexit bankroller Arron Banks in spring, 2016? Govt won't say, claiming it “would impede the future formulation of government policy.” @thomasbrake describes it as "a touch of Yes Minister with a pinch of Kafka.”Explosive scandal 
Why oh why do the press and media not follow this up.... is there something sinister here too? Why did press and media not even mention the court case that happened Thursday? Judges stated that had the referendum been binding it would have been null and void. 
It’s obvious that removing the no deal option would kill Brexit. Any MP that votes for the Cooper amendment is betraying the referendum result and our democracy. They must be voted out at the next election.  Brexit must be delivered.   
Good to see that @LeaveEUOfficial finally advocates the benefits of the single market, EFTA and Schengen membership, free movement of people and a whole range of bilateral treaties that would make a large share of EU law applicable to the UK.#Brexit  
But patience never my strength. Thing is, if there's something I'm not sure about it, I'll scurry off and do a bunch of reading, try to understand, come to a view. It seems to me a big bunch of folk right now just stand outside howling "why won't Corbyn stop Brexit!?" at the moon 
Thank you @Tim_Roache and ⁦@GMB_union⁩ for your support Corbyn told: change course before it’s too late for Labour | Politics | The Guardian ⁦@peterkyle⁩ #Brexit  
They condemned us for years and years for "banging on about Europe" but the *moment* they lost the referendum the Remainers have done nothing else. 
Again, found myself explaining to a French friend what #Brexit is, and how it was procured. 'It's crazy! Why would people do that to themselves? Do they live in the past? We don't have an empire anymore and neither does Britain! Why do they always talk about the war?'Quite so. 
The BBC has committed suicide with it's biased anti-Brexit coverage. A project in people engineering and fake news gone horribly wrong.  
Taking no deal off the table could torpedo Brexit completely  via @Telegraph 
The front page of The Sunday Telegraph: Brexit delay 'an elephant trap that we can't escape' #tomorrowspaperstoday 
Indeed, the reason we're in this mess is because Brexit doesn't follow the facts, it's illogical, like a religion....in fact it is a religion, promoted by zealots with nothing to offer but empty promises.  
SUNDAY TIMES: May funks Brexit vote as Cabinet splits #tomorrowspaperstoday 
I won’t allow Brexit vote to be frustrated, Theresa May promises 
Brexit must not be frustrated, Theresa May vows  
All the remain MP's care about is delaying Brexit. It really is Parliament vs the people now...  
We need to keep no deal on the table otherwise we are sending team Captain into crease whilst breaking her bat before she gets onto pitch. #Brexit @LeaveMnsLeave @SkyNews @ShropshireStar 
I can second that! My Wife and I were one of the thousands on the Brexit Betrayal march ending at White Hall.  There was not one violent incident the entire day but the left wing ANTIFA counter demonstration of just a few hundred people spent the day fighting the Police!!  FACT!! 
The further you look towards the far-right the more you see deceit, chicanery and criminality. Fascism is a perverted liberation ideology. It aims to emancipate the worst members of our society from the constraints of law, morality and decency.#PeoplesVote #brexit #FBPE 
We will only defeat Brexit by being passionate & strong in our commitment to Europe - not defensive like Cameron in 2016EUROPE WORKSTHE EU IS THE BEST PEACE PROJECT IN THE HISTORY OF EUROPEDON’T SHUT OUR CHILDREN OUT OF EUROPE 
Brexit is optional.Brexit is a choice.Brexit is the result of cheating.Brexit is the culmination of lies.Brexit is hate.Brexit is not conducive to morality.Brexit is sinful.Brexit is evil.Brexit is embarrassing.Brexit is stupid.Brexit is the end of the UK as we know it. 
Tory Europhiles are plotting to side with the Labour party in order to, de facto, overthrow the government.This is clearly a co-ordinated Remainer coup against Brexit.They really are playing with fire.  Leave supporters will not take this lying down. 
Taking no deal off the table could torpedo Brexit completely  via @Telegraph 
When a relatively safe liberal/centrist dude like John Kerry loses an election to a terrible president like Bush, why is that not a referendum on electing future safe establishment liberals?Let the scraps in “the middle” go. The win are millions of non-voters on the left 
Corbynistas feeling betrayed by those who left for the Independent Group? Now they know how we feel about Corbyn's betrayal over #Brexit.Hurts, doesn't it? #PutItToThePeople #RevokeA50 #StopBrexit 
In this week’s episode of Young People Getting Shafted By Brexit:  
This former Remainer is right when he says, in effect, that Remainers who talk about taking No Deal off the table really mean they want to take Brexit off the table. 
“If we say we’ll never leave without a deal, the EU would know that they can stop Brexit in its tracks simply by refusing to agree a deal with us. Or, if they’re feeling subtle, by offering a bad deal they know Parliament will turn down” @JohnPenroseNews 
Cuba's constitutional referendum: What you should know  
Judge @JoaquimBoschGra: "Holding a referendum is not a crime under the Spanish Criminal Code". #FAQSstrubeltv3 
Just in case it went over your head, Slovenia is one of the EU27.Any decision to extend Article 50 at the request of Britain is by unanimous agreement of the remaining members.You should also see Belgian PM’s recent comments.No deal remains the only surety in Brexit.  
Super colleague and Northern Ireland Minister @JohnPenroseNews puts his finger on the disingenuous attempt by those trying to reverse the Referendum result (often having voted for every enabling Act) to sabotage the UK's negotiating position.   
On the rocks: Can the Scottish whisky industry survive Brexit?  
What would happen to our democracy were #brexit to be pushed through only for it to be revealed that there had been electoral crime and a #BrexitGate cover-up on a far greater  scale than we are currently aware of? 
2 years ago Colum Eastwood calls for a post Brexit Border Poll, today he tells FF ard fheis that he and others who call for poll should go to hell. This alliance is going to be fun to watch as FF further destroy the SDLP  
Why don't we just leave?No deals.Just leave.Brexit delay 'an elephant trap that we can't escape'' | via @telegraph 
“Taking no deal off the table could torpedo Brexit completely”, writes ⁦@JohnPenroseNews⁩ 
SUNDAY TELEGRAPH : Brexit delay ‘an elephant trap we can’t escape ‘ #tomorrowspaperstoday 
My colleague @JohnPenroseNews is absolutely right.  It would be a mistake of the utmost seriousness to seek to remove no deal.  We were elected to deliver Brexit, not to sign up to whatever deal the EU might seek to impose. 
As suspected, #Brexit was a red herring in the #ConfidenceAndSupply deal, so what are the real reasons behind @fiannafailparty’s unwavering support for @FineGael?Why are they so intent on alienating the electorate?Who’d vote for a party that shirks all responsibility? #FFAF19 
#Brexit has turned out to be a #scam from start to finish. People promised great returns from leaving the #EU only to find its cost them lots of money and left them poorer. #Brexiters still have no plan for recovering losses after we leave. 
If @TheSDPUK got prompted by a polling company explaining our position on Brexit and public spending/tax we'd get a lot more than 11%.  
EU expects UK request to help avoid food shortages under hard Brexit | The Jerusalem post  
You are pathetic- it is not the ERG blocking Brexit, it is people like you. Tory remainers have NEVER been prepared to allow any form of Brexit that is not the same as remaining. YOU will get the blame. YOU are in breach of ghe manifesto and your promises, not the ERG. 
Gordon Brown calls for MPs to delay Brexit for up to 12 months :  postpone Britain's jump from the EU and "avoid hurtling over a cliff edge" by gathering evidence from people across the country to tell if they want a second referendum on the move  
Theresa May's #BrexitGate cover-up.Nov 21: Home Office refuses openDemocracy’s request for information about investigation into Banks – saying this “would impede the future formulation of government policy”.#PeoplesVote #brexit 
Please rememberWhilst Labour MPs are splitting from their partyAnd Conservative MPs are splitting from their partyAnd we are constantly bombarded with news about political infighting over BrexitRemember the NHS is undergoing the LARGEST EVER sustained reduction in spending   
Spurs,  England  and , Cambridge United all lost.  If Brexit wasn’t going so swimmingly I’d feel like checking out  
We strongly condemn actions by repressive police in Stgo de #Cuba to intimidate & silence activists calling out unfree & unfair so-called constitutional referendum. We hold authorities responsible for their safety & well-being. #UNPACU & all Cuba must have peaceful #24F. 
Half of all the members of Mrs May’s government were appointed to their offices in the last 14 months - ‘and virtually none are doing anything except preparing for No Deal Brexit or trying to stop it,’ says one 
While Labour have been shaken by events this week, the real threat of a catastrophic no-deal Brexit makes the need for us to unite even more urgent. The people we exist to help need us to be a strong, coherent opposition to this reckless government. 
Second Brexit referendum motion to be tabled in parliament next week  
So Jeremy Corbyn is upset about this week's various defections, but instead of going to the constituency of one of the Labour defectors, he targets the most high profile voice in the Remain campaign. Killing off resistance to Brexit comes before saving the Labour Party. 
Erasmus UK on its way out with a hard Brexit.  
It's time to end the #BrexitBetrayal of our generation.@LukePollard, @JohnnyMercerUK, @garystreeterSWD please don't sell our futures down the river without first putting the #Brexit deal to the people in a #PeoplesVote with a #Remain option. pic.twitter.com/L6g7TvddaN 
Take Brexit off the table. At very least, ask the people if they want to go on with it. #PeoplesVote 
Johnson lied about new money available for the #NHS during the #Brexit referendum campaign. Now someone is taking him to court. Please retweet if you think politicians should be made to pay for their lies  
Great canvassing session this morning for Adam and @labour52rose in HoveI was on #LabourDoorstep with a junior doctor who had only just joined the Labour Party yesterdayShe said she is sickened by the cuts and shortages in the #NHS and EU staff leaving because of Tory Brexit  
I was right all along - From the day Corbyn whipped his MPs to vote for Art 50 to be triggered Labour lost my support. At every juncture he supported Tory Brexit.  Then came the sickening constructive ambiguity to string remain voters along and keep them paying their membership  
I feel that when Brexit is over and our final destination is arrived at that Politics will be dead to meThe dishonesty of Politicians, MSM,Power brokers and the Arch controllers of our destiny, the Globalists have shown that fairness and the belief of the individual don’t matter 
Sadiq Khan blasted for 'complete Brexit OVERREACTION' - 'He should worry about CRIME!'  
This is interesting > Church of England urges five days of prayer for poor as Brexit looms  
This is what Brexit is all about.Destroying opportunity.Trashing learning.Cutting off connections.Pulling up the ladder on the next generation.Cruel, ignorant, vindictive, self-defeating.No one wins.Everyone loses.Everyone loses.This is what Brexit is really all about. 
I’ve been trying hard for ages, and I’ve *finally* thought of a positive about Corbyn’s leadership. The despair and disgust at his racism and support for Brexit has done what I never thought possible - united Blairites and Brownites. 
EUROPEAN Union Brexit negotiator Michel Barnier and Brexit coordinator Guy Verhofstadt are facing growing pressure to deliver a no deal Brexit to keep under control Euroscepticism across member states,  reporter Tony Gosling claimed. 
So Mundell saying he won't resign if the Tories official policy becomes hard Brexit. That's what? 4th or 5th time he's reneged on his promise to resign? Now he's saying #Brexit is somehow good for Scotland?, we can't trust him to resign, so why should anyone believe that? 
The Brexit nightmare, coming around the bend at you faster than you think.....  
Quite frankly I see no difference between the communist moron Corbyn and the morons demanding a second referendum. They are both very bad for Britain.  
Lib Dem leader predicts no-deal Brexit will be 'killed off'  
Somehow this will get blamed on Brexit, rather than on the European politicians who imposed the tariffs.  
The vote is beginning to fragment as the strain from Brexit finally takes hold.UKIP must capitalise by continuing to set itself apart as the only party fighting on all levels for a real Brexit & against our politically correct status quo.  
We have only 35 Scottish MP’s defending our interests in WM.Why would our MP’s vote for something Scotland doesn’t want! There in WM to protect Scotland from our dominant neighbour!Scotland’s message has been very consistent on Brexit.We want to remain within the EU. 
Jean-Claude Juncker says he has Brexit "fatigue" and describes Britain's split from the EU as "a disaster"  
In tomorrow's Sunday National ... @Feorlean on Scottish Tory actions in the face of a catastrophic Brexit for Scotland  
How many has he had? Sinn Fein 'no'. Does he 'know' anything about Brexit?  
If our Party is to retain the support of Conservative voters and the faith and trust of the electorate in general, then it is vital that we abide by the pledges we made in our 2017 General Election manifesto.We MUST deliver Brexit IN FULL and ON TIME. 
Sadly my Conservative MP here in Rugby, Mark Pawsey, also wants no deal taken off the table. This makes it very difficult for me to ever vote for him again. Rugby voted strongly for #Brexit 
Good point in this thread: those advocating no deal Brexit can't credibly also refer to a non-EU country which has a free trade agreement with the EU as an example.  
Indigenous peoples and towns of Mexico in struggle against illegal neoliberal referendum to impose ecocidal thermoelectric; after the murder of #SamirFlores, today there are burning of urns, there are also tortured and detained companions.The fighting continues#ConsultaCiudadana 
Corbyn discovers the EU is 'very worried' about a no-deal Brexit. But, instead of recognising that this places the UK in a commanding position when it comes to talks, he says Labour wants 'no-deal' taken off the negotiating table.This exemplifies why Labour is unfit for Govt. 
87% of the south seek unity in a hard brexit, nearly 50% of the north similar, yet the establishment refuse go be prepare and bury their heads in the sand. Then this from Eastwood. The self awareness of cheddar cheese.  
Look closer to home if you want to see the collapse of a party. You lost my support a few months into your Brexit betrayal, but I'm insignificant, it's the anger of your own members, campaigners, & traditional voters that should worry you.  
Not changing my policies now, says Corbyn.Hasn't changed them in decades, so why now? If it ain't broke, don't fix it. Except it is broke, & so will UK be if Brexit goes ahead!#OnlyWayForward 
3rdly - and this is serious - collected my Tamoxifen prescription yesterday from my chemist - couldn’t have the brand i prefer - ‘we can’t get it - we’re short of loads of tablets they aren’t sending them until after the end of March’  - #brexit #notfunny  #thishappened  
I sincerely hope the Cooper Letwin Amendment passes obliging HMG to take no deal off the table as the consequences of a Brexit no deal are destructive to UK economy, will cause risks to public security and absolutely pointless and not what Brexiteers remotely promised in 2016.  
"0ur consciences are all we have left" - me in @ObserverUK on breaking free from the far left and Brexit right 
Here’s a bloody great idea for a Brexit deal: Remain in the EU. 
A bizarre oddity of the tariffs we might face after a no deal Brexit is that they would make UK consumers poorer and HMRC richer. So unless the Government somehow kicks money back to the people, it becomes a new stealth tax...  
The Labour Party would do better focussing their efforts on providing leadership to save the nation from the Tories disastrous Brexit than attacking their ex-colleagues. It’s not a good look. 
‘Carry on up the Referendum’:A hilarious new film where the winners lose, the losers win, MP’s claim to ‘respect the result’, the same MP’s try to overturn the result. Leave means remain, remain means remain. On the table, off the table. In, out, in, out, shake it all about. 
Britain in the Crazed Brexit Vortex   - what a self indicted mess... not easy to self-sabotage but Brexit is exactly that.  
"Berger is leaving Labour because it is now partly run by people who hate Jews. Soubry is leaving the Conservatives because a large minority of its MPs want to uphold Parliament’s pledge to implement...the result of the EU referendum. I can’t see the symmetry." Charles Moore 
The language "Betrayed by Honda".Bullsh*t. Betrayed by their union leader and the party that is supposed to represent them in your support of Tory Brexit.  
Many Voters, Members, Activists & MPs will be leaving both the @UKLabour & @Conservatives Parties if the majority of #Remain MPs in the HOC betray Brexit, the People of Northern Ireland & the UK Electorate.I have to tell you James, I will be one of them!#TimeToWakeUpToReality 
A magnificent and empowering evening with @Andrew_Adonis, discussing all things #Brexit. A hugely well-informed man who wants nothing more than the best for the future of our country. #vivalareferendum 
I hope the ongoing #BrexitBetrayal will motivate #UK citizens to refrain from re-electing the hundreds of MPs across the political spectrum who continue to actively seek to block #Brexit in favour of #Remain aka #SoftBrexit aka @WA. #StandUp4Brexit #RespectTheResult #CleanBrexit 
To ban cruel caged farming we’ve set up a petition that's registered with the European Commission & we need to reach 1 MILLION signatures! Due to Brexit signatures from British citizens won’t be counted so please share with friends & family in the EU!   
The EOS Referendum: Q&A With The Most Influential People In The EOS Community via @forbes 
Too many think the #Brexit story will be over should May actually succeed in dragging it over the line on 29 March.No, it will have only just begun as successive governments negotiate our future relationship with the world, trying to make sense of something that makes no sense. 
Lots of energy being expended decrying, ridiculing and taunting a dozen MPs who have had the audacity to point out the obvious; our political system is broken and compromised. Why all the panic? Worth watching this for the answer..... 
It's cost at least £300,000 to £400,000 for the HOC to sit through the half-term recess and pretend to be working, just so that Theresa May can say she's trying to move Brexit forwards. 
Brexit means brexit got me lol 
The majority of Brits didn’t ever vote for Brexit. It’s as simple as that.  
John McDonnell says Labour are “moving towards a people’s vote”. @CliveBull asks do you support a second referendum?  
If Parliament does not approve the Prime Minister’s deal next week, Brexit should be delayed: this is the view of three senior cabinet ministers who have said they will defy their boss and vote to extend Article 50.@kemenzerem reports: 
Mr. Bernier, a government is obliged to protect a public so misinformed as to desire self-harm. See the Brexit public having a say in things it had no capacity or desire to fully understand. Leaders don't help harm the misinformed, nor do they boost misinformation. #cdnpoli 
Just to be clear, since the tweet I was replying to has disappeared, Eadie accepted unequivocally and in so many words that Mrs May proceeded with Brexit in full knowledge of the established criminality. Entirely black and white. No possible room for doubt. 
Amsterdam is winning so much Brexit business that its financial regulator needs a budget boost to keep up  
That mouthguard left quicker than the UKs future after brexit 
Jeremy will order his party to abstain, so it fails, and then deliver some drivel about how he is minded to begin to start thinking about a second referendum in a few years...  
The sheer arrogance of this shows that Ireland is now truly gripped by national derangement over Brexit. - UK must not be allowed ‘pursue cheap food policy’ after Brexit  
Ireland is terrified British consumers might enjoy cheap food after Brexit. Where will they sell their beef? But of course cheaper imports were always one of the benefits of Brexit. Time for us to go our own way.  
If ⁦@theresa_may⁩ wants to honour the referendum result, she will sack her cabinet rebels, Greg Clark, Amber Rudd and David Gauke and go ahead with #Brexit on 29th March, even if there’s no deal.After all, “no deal is better than a bad deal”.  
5/ But they don't advocate that. So we think they are just using a half-truth to convince MPs and the public to support a hard brexit. Maybe they will surprise us, but we doubt it. /End 
I think UK is in for a shock at the number of countries who will object or refuse post BREXIT  'Services Agreements'. Taiwan is just another one of what I think will be very many.  
Clearly the penny hasn't dropped with you Tobias, that if the #Remain majority of MPs in the HOC betray Brexit, the UK Electorate, every one of you will be voted out of office at the next General Election.People do not re-elect politicians who betray them.#BrexitBetrayal 
The story is breaking that the Archbishop of Canterbury will lead the country in five days of prayer for the poor who are about to suffer most from Brexit, particularly a hard Brexit. Will he pray for the greater numbers of poor and unemployed in the EU? A new Archbishop Laud. 
Living in Germany as a child and having German family taught Jane @localnotail that "Folk are folk the world over". Now living in one of the poorest parts of the UK, she knows that Brexit will make things much worse for her community. #BrexitIsPersonal /1 
MPs will “kill off” any prospect of a no-deal Brexit in crucial House of Commons votes next week, Sir Vince Cable has predicted.  
The things you’ve been wanting to say to John Redwood and fellow Brexit BS merchants.You’ll enjoy this  
This the governing body of the Tories voluntary structure.  They were addressed by the PM this morning.  The specific terms of this motion put party before country and confirm #Brexit is only being delivered because of internal Tory  politics.  
Want to know what it feels like to have prices go up by 15%?Ask a British pensioner living in Spain - their income has gone down 15% already, & in a no-deal Brexit, who knows how much more value the £ would lose.@BremainInSpain @InLimboBrexit 
My speech @EU_EESC event  #EUsupergirl"#Brexit is a backward step for the UK - a distraction from combatting the real issues... I will continue to fight for Europe because the future is Europe and we are stronger when we work together."Full speech:  
Putin plots to obliterate Europe!He’s deploying blackmail, espionage & bribery to steal elections.He offered Italy’s (Trojan horse) Salvini €3m to boost his EU campaign & did same with Brexit.Trump’s silence re Putin's threat to target the US suggests kompromat.  
If only today’s Welsh passion, identity, confidence & pride could be bottled up & dished out to all those so called Welsh people who voted for Brexit & fly the union jack we could be free to carve our own destiny. Being Welsh is for life not just for Wales v England #IndyWales 
Do I understand this right - all food and shoes will be free after brexit? 
Not only #NoDeal. *Any* #Brexit will make the poor poorer, yet your leader @JeremyCorbyn still supports it. 
Sir John Redwood and comedian Marcus Brigstocke clash over Brexit. Did you know what you voted for? We'll post the full debate shortly. Listen live ► @AlexisConran | @johnredwood | @marcusbrig 
Won’t happen Nicky @NickBoles - FYI 50 signatures on their way to your constituency chairman - remember you were elected on a brexit manifesto, you ignore it and you know what happens next. @LeaveEUOfficial 
Too many politicians are still in denial about the Brexit vote of 2016.  
Can you imagine Måns Zelmerlöw asking Michael Rice during You Decide which way he voted during the Brexit referendum? No. Totally pointless and irrelevant, shame on Jamala for putting Maruv on the spot like that. #vidbir2019 
You have zero credibility in this debate. Your economic scare stories before the referendum have proven totally false. Sir Ivan is a dyed in the wool EU fanatic. We’re not interested. Ok?  
Gordon Brown calls for MPs to delay Brexit to let people decide what they want  
Britain need a leader who isn’t going to quit when times get tough.When remain lost the EU referendum Corbyn didn’t quit.When many MPs were stabbing him in the back he didn’t quit.When MPs like Chuka Umunna and Chris Leslie left he didn’t quit.Basically: Corbyn > Cameron. 
Looks like @NickBoles has succumbed to Brexit Derangement Syndrome. May's deal leads inexorably to full BRINO, courtesy of the backstop. Brexit can't get any softer. Always suspected Boles whole #NorwayThenCanada schtick was a con. Dreadful charlatan. 
Lovely finish to the political day - sunset over the Channel from a Kent that is acutely aware #CrashOut Brexit is not an option but a disaster. That's France there on the left - our close neighbour & friends.  
It's ironic that the Independent Group MPs have all supported the divisive politics that helped create Brexit.Tip:To avoid more 'Brexits', you need to support policies that don't increase inequality & ignore the needs of the many.(The kind that Corbyn stands for, ironically.) 
Brexit Captains  
Looks like Wetherspoons is being graced by some anti-Brexit @ByDonkeys beer mats 
If ERG hardliners like Andrew Bridgen won’t vote for the PM’s hard Brexit deal, they only have themselves to blame when MPs of all parties legislate for an extension of Article 50 and then back a softer Brexit @BBCr4today from 1.14.30 
I fear this is exactly right. She seems to have an impenetrable ability to lock on to an idea, irrespective of bucket-loads of evidence that contradicts her position. We saw it with her policy of keeping international students in the immigration numbers, repeated with Brexit 
Why is #Brexit a mess??? My company received this letter today (Feb 23, 2019). See the date by which we need to respond if my company does not want to participate. What a joke. @HMRCgovuk @HMRCpressoffice @edvaizey #BrexitShambles #HMRCBrexit @IpsosMORI 
US Dept of State attempting to question #Cuba ´s Constitution & the right of the Cuban people to adopt it. We could invite them to discuss with their people the text of their Constitution, written by slave owners, & to try to vote in referendum. #YoVotoSi #SomosCuba 
Brexit: Cabinet ministers who cannot back government policy should quit, says Brexiteer Andrew Bridgen  
Bob Moran on #Brexit #TheresaMay #BrexitExtension - political cartoon gallery in London  
Don't worry, @theresa_may, if you do delay #Brexit, you'll face a far bigger revolt. It will be the betrayed British electorate. 
Where are you on constructive conversation with brexit'ers?1. Always try to make points reasonably & without personal insults. They could be borderline & open to a rethink.2. Get angry b'cos the ignorance is frustrating. 3. Mute the fuckers, life's too short. 
Good to spend the day with @Conservatives and our excellent councillors – talking about local elections in May, the work we’re doing to build a country that works for everyone, and how we’re focused on delivering the result of the referendum and the best Brexit deal for the UK.  
Spare a thought for the UK Guy . It emerged in Court last Thursday that May knew that the 2016 EU Referendum leave vote was not valid on the day she notified A 50 to Donald Tusk . Do you think that level of apparently criminal Misconduct is OK for a Prime Minister of the UK ? 
And for the avoidance of doubt......this was what Farage, Banks and his crew were telling voters what would happen if they voted Leave. 
.@foreignoffice Now explain why we are going through all this ball ache because of a non-binding referendum, which would have been ruled illegal and void if it had been binding. 
My piece does not advocate ignoring the vote Dr. @naomirwolf. It advocates #Brexit within this Parliament, but at a time that suits the British economy and our national security. Your 'study' of democracies should include reading articles before you comment on them.  
In other words, UK consumers face equivalent of our annual EU contribution in higher food costs, for literally ZERO gain. The Government saves £9 billion, we pay £9 billion extra. We're poorer, and we get hit with the thousands of negative consequences of Brexit. Infinitely daft! 
Brace, brace, brace! If the UK transposes the current WTO tariffs (we'll find out next week) that increases the price of imported food by £9 billion a year, or more than 25%, under a no-deal Brexit situation. 
And to those of you saying the referendum was only “advisory,” you’re wrong.  
This is Brexit Jihadist Michael Gove telling UK farmers EXACTLY what I said in this video:  ALMOST TWO YEARS AGO.It's almost like I was right all along... #BrexitIsSuicide 
Despite what some say, it is possible to oppose everything the Tories stand for and not want Jeremy Corbyn as PM because you oppose anti-Semitism, intolerance, bullying, apologism for anti-West despots and Brexit - opposing Corbyn doesn’t make you a Tory#CorbynOut #LabourSplit 
Conservative Chairmen at today’s National Convention voted overwhelmingly against any delay to Brexit.“It doesn’t change the problem but what it does do is support the Prime Minister in her efforts to deliver Brexit, on time, on 29th March” @WorldofDinah 
Preston, grand but empty! Six fellow passengers on the hourly train from Ormskirk trundling into Preston. Now to my second Brexit meeting today!  
I can assure you @KateHoeyMP that ppl are very angry in Scotland too about the Brexit shambles you worked for. That is why 1000s came down from to the People's Vote rally in October, and why even more will be there on 23 March @campbellclaret @brexit_sham  
This weekend some of our #Sodem regular protestors were on tour in Berlin to make sure that they know that we don´t want to Brexit and we're not gonna Brexit...Palky @1NQUISIT1VE et al#StopBrexit #WeAreSodem 
I support a Final Say on the Brexit deal, but it won’t resolve our divisions on national identity | The Independent  
Daughter had a fantastic experience with this Erasmus program, such a shame if this ends for young people!#Brexit 
All we really need now, Gavin,  is for one of those Civil Servants to blow the whistle on when and how May stopped the NCA investigating  Mr Banks , and it will immediately be game over for May's corrupt and obviously criminal "brexit" 
"i condemn austerity unless it's Labour Brexit austerity & then it's okay because we can build a brave new socialist world free of workers' rights or freedom & with a lower quality of life for all but the 1%""that's not socialism""shhh"#NotMyLabourParty 
Brexit: Motion for second referendum to be tabled in parliament next week - The Independent  
Very early results showing some surprising numbers from Oyo state. Seems the people there are using it as a referendum on one of the biggest assholes in Nigerian politics. But early days  
The Tories have a choice. Exploit the split on the Left and be in power for a decade, or allow Brexit to tear them apart. Time to come to your senses!  
Brexit Live: Barnier reveals May's plan to BETRAY Brexit and force MPs to accept her deal  
Don't you think you ought to apologise to the millions who believed what you and your Brexit chums were saying, that they'd be richer out of the EU, have more control and easy free trade with the world? Don't you think you were totally irresponsible? And you were an MP.  
So... the only reason that the referendum can’t be declared void, due to Vote Leave’s industrial scale illegality, is because it wasn’t legally binding....  So we’re only forcing ourselves to do this precisely because we didn’t have to do it in the first place. ARGH!  
I am absolutely ashamed that a British Foreign Sec doesn’t even understand he’s in Slovenia and not Slovakia. No wonder Tory Brexit is a mess  
Four 'Brexit refugees', who have chosen to leave Britain for Ireland, say perceived racism since Brexit vote is a factor in their move  
Jeremy Corbyn wants everybody to know that he and every Labour MP was elected on the same manifesto.That manifesto promised they would back Brexit. He must drop his Remainers' red lines and help deliver it properly.  
They're extremely angry Kate, mainly now that they've realised they've been deceived by the likes of you, Farage, Banks and the criminals that procured the referendum result.  
Justin Welby says poorest face biggest risks posed by Brexit uncertainty  
We have kept the #brexit debate alive for 2.5 years.We only have 35 days left to stop this.Dont give up now, we've come too far. We may lose but we go down fighting.Scream, lobby, debate and argue. Make some noise.Don't stop fighting. #stopbrexit NOW 
Donald Tusk urges Theresa May to delay Brexit for more talks rather than leaving with No DealDelay, then destabilise British politics in the hope there’ll be a GE and a change of heart.It’s the Greek model.  
man vs wall#brexit #isleofwight 
Brilliant reminder from @ByDonkeys of the flip flopping idiocy of the hard right.I was blocked long ago by #AndreaLeadsom , but perhaps someone not blocked might bring this to her attention:#Brexit  
NEW RedC/SBP PollFine Gael 31 (-1)Fianna Fáil 24 (+2)Sinn Féin 18 (+5)Independents 15 (+1)Labour 5 (-1)Ind. Alliance 2 (-3)Greens 2 (-1)SocDems 2 (-)Sol-PBP 1 (-1)Renua < 1 (-)Aontú < 1Polls on Harris, Children’s Hospital, Brexit and nurses in tomorrow’s paper 
Leavers who say another referendum would be unfair are really saying that they're not sure they'd win again. That means they're not sure #Brexit is still the will of the people. & if it's not the will of the people, it would be undemocratic to push ahead with it. #FinalSay - now! 
To be fair, three cabinet ministers have said they will resign if Theresa May continues her immoral journey towards a no deal #Brexit. I suspect there are others, but they haven't spoken up yet. This week is crucial. No deal must be taken off the table now! #RevokeArticle50 
Imagine believing that the overwhelming isolating ugliness of Brexit Britain is the best that Scotland could ever be. Never, ever accept that.  
The Tories has dished our contracts worth more £100 million to consultants working on Brexit. Not only should they be demanding our money back but it should also be asked exactly how many of these consultants have links to government? We might not like the answer. 
Theresa May is deepening a fracture not just in her own party but in the country.Polls now show a huge 12-point lead for #Remain, and growing.And Brexit is putting more jobs at risk.MPs must vote to #RevokeA50 and #StopBrexit. Write to yours today. 
Join us for "the biggest dog's dinner in history".To stop #Brexit, hundreds of dogs will be holding the biggest dogs dinner ever around a table outside Parliament on 3rd March.Time to bark out #StopBrexit #BrexitVote #BrexitDogsDinner #wooferendum #BiggestDogsDinnerEver 
If the Conservative Party frustrates or delays #Brexit in any way, the consequences for the party electorally and in terms of grass roots membership will be devastating. Let that be a warning to the three Cabinet members attempting to hold the government to ransom.#StandUp4Brexit 
UK food imports from EU face '£9bn tariff bill' under no-deal Brexit  
1861 - In a secession referendum, Texans voted to secede from the Union 46,153 - 14,747. #CivilWar #ConfederateTexas 
Today I spoke to a Labour audience in the West Midlands about the breakaway this week, anti semitism, Brexit and what this means for Labour.  Full speech on the link below.    
They've taken a stand on behalf of sanity and restraint. These days, that counts as progress (via @bopinion) 
Do you realise how angry those of us on the Remain side are that the referendum was won on illegality and lies. We may not resort to violence, but trust me we are furious. 
Editorial: At long last, the cabinet is rebelling against Theresa May to block a no-deal Brexit  
SDLP confirmed policy is now; NO to a unity referendum; NO to an Irish Language Act;NO to Marriage Equality;                           NO to funding for legacy inquestsSDLP have officially become part of the southern conservative establishment! 
⁦@campbellclaret⁩ explains the crucial timing of the March 23 #PutItToThePeople March and rally in London - our last chance to save Britain from#Brexit in #NewEuropean @peoplesvote_uk 
This this this!!!! Is hard evidence that @michaelgove now accepts #Brexit is deeply damaging. Beef farmers face tariffs of up to 86% on some cuts. It will decimate U.K. farming and the countryside will be changed forever with no grazing animals.  
 Another week of dither and delay from Theresa May’s Gov't, as the Brexit shambles continues at Westminster. This is your brief roundup of the key events and highlights from your SNP MPs, as they stand up for Scotland and hold the Tories to account. 
Whenever I get really depressed about the state of American democracy I google "Brexit".  It makes me feel much better. 
Sir Vince Cable says #LibDems will next week make a fresh drive to give MPs the chance to back a second Brexit referendum.  He has asked members of TIG for support aiming to lock a new public vote into law.  
That will help keep the car manufacturing companies here won’t it. Why isn’t he in Swindon campaigning against Brexit if he doesn’t want people out of work. 
Screeching u-turn from the Church! Archbishop of Canterbury Justin Welby said "life will go on" after Brexit 
You really are ‘thick as brexit’, aren’t you?  
34 days to #Brexit & all I hear from MPs is how they still want to thwart it.At what stage do losers actually move on from a loss?Perhaps UK has gone so far, we can now exist only as subservient?Or maybe we're simply killing time until we get an Election & clean house?  
ANNOUNCEMENT:We call for a referendum on the BBC. YOUR Money YOUR Choice! Retweet if you agree.  
A delay means just another opportunity to stop Brexit. ‘No deal’ is the best option by far now. 
Best thing I did was put all my money in XRP cause since the brexit vote the pound is down, and if Uk does brexit it will drop at least another 30% so I’m in a fantastic safe haven called XRP, what have you done to protect the value of your money ? XRP  added advantage of upside  
I walked away because Corbyn supports Brexit. I remain socialist in every way, just not able to stay in my party after it was hijacked by Brexiteers. I haven't left socialism I left @jeremycorbyn . #StopBrexit #Remain 
More high-profile Tory defections are possible, especially from among those determined to stop a no-deal Brexit  
2016: Turkey is joining the EU2019: Turkey wants free movement into the UKThanks, #Brexit.  
Nationalise everything. Jail the carpetbaggers. Celebrate the public sector. Restore local government. Fuck the Tories. Dismantle the academies. Protect the vulnerable. Pause Brexit. Put Corbyn permanently on tour as Labour's White Gandalf. Elect a new Leader. Punch Iain Duncan S  
Wow. A second @ByDonkeys billboard here in #Crewe, right next to Gresty Road ready for match day – featuring a damning quote from @andrealeadsom. Great to see anti #Brexit pressure here.  
Been at the small Corbyn rally in Anna Soubry's Broxtowe constituency. EU flags were banned and Corbyn was sneaked in in a car 2 minutes before his speech. Speeches were just inanely tribal and you'd never know a cliff edge Brexit was just one month away (!)  
Good @peoplesvote_uk day in Leave-y #Lincoln. Plenty of good conversations, no shouty people, almost 100% agreement that MPs have made a mess of #Brexit, 43 cards signed, half as many again given out. @lincolnshire4eu @EuromoveLincs @LincolnVote @Remaone 
Warm words but no action. You are complicit in a Brexit that will:- put people out of jobs- put public services at risk- make the whole country poorer. Shame on you. #StopBrexit. 
What an utterly ridiculous thing to say. Honda, among other car manufacturers, warned us about the consequences of a vote for brexit. We did it anyway so who exactly betrayed who? Since you’re pro brexit, this is on you. Own it.  
When an MP resigns from their political party should they resign from their seat to fight a by-election or serve until the next General Election? 
This incredibly thoughtful endorsement of our way through the Brexit nightmare is hugely significant coming from the PLP chair. It also means the world to me because @JohnCryerMP is someone I’ve looked up to and learned from since the second I became an MP 
You’re a bunch of hypocrites. The “many” will be poorer with your facilitation of Brexit. Less money for public services. Less money to fix the problems that the Tories have caused. Less social mobility and opportunity for UK citizens to work, live and love in 27 other nations. 
Brexit is on the brink of being delayed as Cabinet ministers split from PM May  
So let's be clear: illegality in the referendum doesn't count because it was only advisory.But we must leave because referendum gives an unchallengeable mandate (tiny margin)  for Brexit. So we can't debate whether it is good or bad for country - we simply must.Confused? I am 
Over a million Scots voted Leave. More Scots voted Leave than voted for the SNP. Are they not part of Scotland?And what of London, Manchester, Leeds, which had Remain majorities. Are they still to blame for Brexit?And why don't you mention Wales, which had a Leave majority?  
Jeremy Corbyn really wants to talk about issues the British public face, as long as they aren't relating to:-Racism (antisemitism)-Terrorism-Crime-Brexit-Russia murdering UK citizens.He'd rather tackle much more pressing British problems, like the Israel-Palestine conflict  
Remainers flocking to Labour in the false hope you would oppose the Tories on brexit is where most of these extra votes came from.Stop massaging you egos thinking it was Corbyn. The arrogance of Labour.You are now losing voters, members and even MP's.  
Can you imagine what it must be like being one of our many talented civil servants and having to clean up after Johnson Hunt Grayling & Raab (have I missed anyone?) - it’s like Beavis and Butthead leading us to their Brexit paradise. What a bunch.  
Meanwhile, Broxtowe’s heroic representative in Parliament, Anna Soubry, was at a People’s Vote rally in Nottingham. A credible opposition would have been right there beside her, helping us stop Brexit. 
This is also incredibly ironic because Corbyn is so reluctant to talk about *the most pressing issue that British people face* - which is Brexit. He prefers talking about things like Venezuela, the Israeli-Palestinian conflict, Saudi Arabia... 
Join us for "the biggest dog's dinner in history".To stop #Brexit, hundreds of dogs will be holding the biggest dogs dinner ever around a table outside Parliament on 3rd March.Time to bark out #StopBrexit #BrexitVote #BrexitDogsDinner #wooferendum #BiggestDogsDinnerEver 
Correct me if I'm wrong, but is the best argument for Brexit now that 'some grinding poverty will do us good'? 
This is why Brexit must be stopped.UK food imports from EU face '£9bn tariff bill' under no-deal Brexit.And ANY Brexit will make the UK poorer and put jobs at risk.Nobody voted for that. Write to your MP to demand they #RevokeA50 & #StopBrexit. 
It is not the brexit supporting MP'S who are the hardliners, they are supporting the referendum, the manifesto & core Tory voters. It's the ultra remainiacs who are the hardliners who will do anything to frustrate a true brexit. 
The clues were laid down a few mths ago...#Brexit Britain Taking Back Control for the EXEC from us & Parl but losing it to theEU27USAChinaAnyone wanting their lb of flesh in return for bad trade deals we're desperate for.#RevokeA50 #StopBrexit & #Remain in Control in EU 
Govt & Opposition seem to be avoiding this foreign state subversion...might it be they already know what they'll find? Might it politically & morally undermine the case for a #Brexit also based onLiesIllegalitiesLost MandatesRights Removed w/o ConsentThe wills of 37% Voters?  
UK food imports from EU face '£9bn tariff bill' under no-deal #BrexitThat's about 25% extra on family staples like cheese and tomatoes.#Leavers, you voted to make the poor even poorer. They can't spend sovereignty to make up for price rises. 
Brexit has silenced Britain. It is not just the unseemly, all-consuming chaos that it has unleashed. The sense of Britain as a liberal, outward-looking country has been reversed. It has gone from the world’s lecturer to its beggar, pleading for trade deals 
The argument for a delay to leaving 'for a few weeks' is as weak as my first filled nappy. If we are so close to a Deal then why not just Leave and have the Deal completed afterwards?  Delaying has eff all to do with a Deal, but everything to do with stopping Brexit @theresa_may 
Why do people never ask about the big issues of the day, says the bloke who spent months avoiding the topic of Brexit at prime minister's questions  
Killay Square for our volunteers this weekend, and local people were telling us the same thing people right across the city have been telling us - Brexit will be a disaster and we must have a #PeoplesVote 
To top off a great day, @LilianGreenwood MP and Nottingham Councillor @BridgeCllrMike have dropped by after running a surgery.Between talking to voters, Lilian was telling us heart breaking stories of constituents being driven from the country by Brexit.#PeoplesVote 
#WATCH & #RETWEET: 50 times @theresa_may said we're leaving the #EU on 29 March 2019. She must not allow #Brexit to get delayed!  #TheresaMay @ConHome @TheConWom @Conservatives @CCHQPress #Tory #Tories #ConservativeParty @BrandonLewis @DCBMEP @BrexitStewart 
We should stay!Thank you to @annettedittert of @tagesschau.My interview in English and German starts at 3 min 30. She doesn´t know what will happen next week.We don´t know what is going to happen next week. But we're not going to Brexit.#StopBrexit 
No, Len. They've been betrayed by your precious toxic #Brexit.In the Japanese press they're expressing their amazement that the British Establishment is in denial about the departure of #Honda being about #Brexit.#HondaSwindon #MiddleAgedWhiteMaleDinosaursInDenial 
Devonte, 13, Sammy, 14, and Shawn, 12.They saved a man from killing himself.I want these boys to have what I had & more: freedom to move; equality of education/ opportunity. peace, respect, a chance,no to #Brexitno to #MAGApic h/t & thks-@_SJPeace_ 
Delusional! UK Labour leader wants to be PM first, then new negotiations with EU, then new referendum. History will obviously move on without him.  
As Matt Hancock told Theresa May in cabinet, people may die because of a No Deal Brexit, but that’s fine because blue passports.  
Here's an idea Anna (I'm serious): why don't you lead a #PeoplesVote march in Corbyn's constituency (Islington North) next Saturday? Since 75% of Islingtonians who voted in the referendum voted Remain, you'd deffo get a much better turnout than Corbyn has in your back yard today! 
Theresa May must resign as British prime minister and Conservative leader later this year after delivering Brexit, according to politicians at the highest levels of her own government  
Tory voters need to be loudly willing to abandon the Tory party. Getting a real Brexit party into parliament is looking increasingly like the only way we'll make the UK an independent nation again. 
And this is the reality... haven't seen bomb scares in my home town for over 20 years, and then this today in Cookstown NI - a reinvigorated divisionalism and excuse for violence the like of which you've possibly never experienced. Brexit will bring bad things,  trust me.  
"There's a conspiracy to stop Brexit", insists a shadowy cabal of multimillionaires and hard-right extremists, funded by fuck knows who, to force a crazy no-deal Brexit that only this sinister cult and their predatory chums can gain from#ERGPredators 
Your firm’s making cuts? Sack the Brexit voters first. It really should be those who championed, and continue to champion, this disaster who get to suffer from it. So I say to them, as they are sacked: “You won. Get over it”By @terrychristian 
Corbyn with his mates at the Broxtowe for Brexit rally!  
Join us for "the biggest dog's dinner in history".To mark #Brexit, hundreds of dogs will be holding the biggest dogs dinner ever around a table outside Parliament on 3rd March.Time to bark out #StopBrexit #BrexitVote #BrexitDogsDinner #wooferendum #BiggestDogsDinnerEver 
Disappointing leadership from Corbyn, very disillusioned Labour member. Support 2nd Referendum. 
I just want this little dude and all little kids/ young people to be free to move and live where they can develop their potential as human beings.#Diversity &  encountering other cultures, expand our human capacity...our very brains.#Brexit -no#Humanity 
MPs expenses for the financial year 2017 - 2018 £116.8 millionThat's without wages and they can't even deliver the result of a referendum. 
Spurs are the type of club to tear Bundesliga leaders 3-0 in the champions league and then get absolutely shit on by Sean Dyches Brexit boys, you love to see it. 
Ignorance of the govt is stunning. A foreign secretary who doesn’t know the geo-politics of the country he’s visiting. Almost as good as ⁦@DominicRaab⁩ being #brexit sec and having never read the 35 page good Friday agreement ⁦⁦@Jeremy_Hunt⁩ 
I predict EVERY post #Brexit trade deal done by UK will be less favourable than the equivalent we have through EU membership. 
This is a fantastic opportunity to show solidarity with Highlanders who want to show the country they also are marching against Brexit@WandsworthEM @mikegalsworthy @TheNewEuropean @euromove @EUflagmafia 
Brexit will define our National Identity for decades to come. Will the world see us as Isolationist, even displaying Paranoia or will they see us as World Leading, Inclusive, Rational? The self-seeking #Brigden is doing irreparable harm to the UK now! - #Remain #RevokeA50 
Banks, money managers and other EU-based derivatives traders win formal approval to use British clearinghouses if there's no Brexit deal  
You might have missed this earlier...Version 8 of my #Brexit where next diagram, drawing the conclusions from the creation of the Independent Group, and looking at what will happen next week.High res on my blog:  
It’s good to see tweets now talking more about democracy as they should ! I have been banging on about this for a long time I see this as the keystone to Brexit all MP’s should understand that if you give a democratic vote to the people you MUST abide by it. 
#Newquay voted Leave in 2016 but opinion here has changed very strikingly, as it has right across #Cornwall.Positive conversations and lots of volunteers today. We almost ran out of dots for our #Brexitometer!#Brexit #RevokeArticle50 #PeoplesVote #PutItToThePeople 
Why did you reject his amendment that included provision for a 2nd Referendum? @James4Labour excellent question. Come on @Anna_Soubry tell the truth 
Left: Jeremy's rally to demand a by-election in StreathamRight: Jeremy's rally to oppose Tory Brexit  
Govt MUSTN'T re-agree current unfair EU Relative Stability shares post-BrexitMUST declare we're taking back control of ALL resources in UK waters & then lend some to EU until ratifing our rightful shares in Autumn at international talks  @michaelgove 
Two answers.1) Yes, he's afraid it would stop Brexit.2) How would he campaign? He couldn't campaign to Remain again, so he'd have to out himself as a Leaver. 
The tone @michaelgove  employs- is simply staggering in its hypocrisy. This is THE DIRECT result of his advocacy and his campaigning for #brexit. This is on YOU Gove! 
Such weapons caches have been around for years and have nothing to do with Brexit .  
On 16 March it will be just thirteen days to go until a catastrophic Brexit, which makes it more urgent than ever that we unite together to fight for a by-election in Streatham.  
"As a working class person, all I've got is my vote -- and that's something worth fighting for."As this great video makes clear, the attempts by both the Tories and the Labour Party to soften or kill off Brexit haven't gone unnoticed by Leave voters.  
With a month to go until this disaster, Labour’s leadership should be opposing Brexit and making the case to #StopBrexit.Instead, they’re holding rallies against Remainers. Disgraceful. 
So this must mean that the scale and size of the UK is going to protect Scotland from the economic shocks of Brexit. Right? I mean if not, then this is really all just lies.  
As a Remainer I never thought I would say this, but I am rapidly getting to the stage where i dont care about Brexit. Can we not focus on getting rid of this flacid and murderous government 
Reality continues to prove the dinosaur Brexit climate change denying cabal wrong. It’s the 23rd of February and it’s 15 degrees! This would be an usually warm day in April.Meanwhile Jeremy Corbyn won’t allow pro EU or pro peoples vote people join his rally. Reality bites.  
Is it possible to have “ I didn’t vote for brexit “ stamp in passport please ......PLEASE   
With Theresa May letting the Brexit doomsday clock tick, MPs must put their constituents' interests first.We are at risk of making an ill-conceived and masochistic exit from the EU.Write to your MP to demand they vote to #RevokeA50 & #StopBrexit. 
Training my arsehole to store 3 cans of original recipe Irn Bru for after Brexit x 
Would you be outraged if Brexit was delayed any further? RT for a larger size poll - like too 
I was thinking perhaps Brexit should have a theme tune, like The Archers, so its circuitous storylines would feel more like a compelling soap opera. Or so that I would know when to turn off the radio. 
MPs and ministers need to stop playing Parliamentary games in an attempt to delay or frustrate Brexit - it's not what the public wants them to do.  
"Turkey (population 76 million) to be given freedom of movement in exchange for a post Brexit Trade Deal".They could turn that into a poster. The design could look something like this:  
Remarkable ignorance of how the UK will trade post Brexit using WTO structures. Someone tell Jane we can choose zero tariffs if we want. That’s what real sovereignty means. The Times is mired in Remain. Quite disgusting really.  
This is sick and grossly offensive Leaving the EU is not appeasing the Nazis FFS. You may or may not agree with Brexit but genocide it ain't. Can't be bothered to listen to this vile invective and conspiracy nonsense from Adonis anymore Muted  
Brexit is going to be like appeasement - everyone associated with it, ministers & officials, will be blighted for the rest of their lives, & rightly so 
On the streets in the centre of Nottingham with @Anna_Soubry  and @NottPeoplesVote @TheIndGroup MP facing all views on #Brexit from shoppers...while down the road in her Broxtowe constituency @UKLabour rally with @jeremycorbyn 
On Merseyrail from Liverpool to Ormskirk on my 4 hour journey from London to speak at first anti-Brexit meeting of the day; then on to Preston for evening meeting. My first time in Ormskirk; really excited 
The beauty of Brexit is that all we have to do is leave the EU.We can then sit back and watch it implode.The fact that the quisling May is trying to stay in the EU is clear evidence that she is actually in its service. A mole and traitor at the head of the British Govt. 
If after two and a half years and billions is wasted tax payers money you don’t even have a plan then it’s time to admit the truth. We already have the best deal and Brexit is over. We also need unanimous consent for an extension. What an utter mess 
3 Indy supporting Stalls at the Haddington Farmers Market today.Folk getting really worried about #BrexitTime to stop that worry #UseTheMandate #indyref2 
Fuck this. Fuck this insane Brexit shit sideways with something covered in barbed wire. Fuck the way it's being handled. Fuck how it's taking away rights and dreams and connections. Fuck Brexit and every single person who has made it happen.  
Our protest in Birmingham today. Millions of voters demand we just leave on WTO rules. Email your MP to save Brexit @ RT if you agree! 
This is significant:Following the publication of its omnibus no deal Brexit bill yesterday, the Irish Government last night also issued a tender to carry out customs and regulatory inspections at border posts in Ireland in the event of a no deal Brexit  
Hate to say I told you so but I told you Jacob-Rees Mogg was lying when he said you'd have cheaper food post Brexit.... if you can get any at all that is! 
Why did you reject his amendment that included provision for a 2nd Referendum? 
Cabinet 'No Deal' revolt: PM facing prospect of a mass walkout after three senior ministers signal they are ready to help force a delay to #Brexit  
the @EuroMove_MK Brexitometer so far today! back to the usual; nobody wants a General Election, the overwhelming majority of people just want Brexit cancelled! @euromove @BrexitometerC @peoplesvote_uk #PeoplesVote #RevokeArticle50 
Jeremy Corbyn was the only MP who tabled an amendment that included provision for a 2nd Referendum. Guess what? Not a single Tory MP backed his proposal. After a year of making demands he do so. That includes fraudster @Anna_Soubry. Glad Labour are in #Broxtowe today. #ForTheMany 
I no longer read the @DailyMailUK, as it has a remainer as the editor. Apparently, it's percentage of sales has fallen drastically since the new editor has been in place. I am now a proud reader of the @dailytelegraph and the @TheSun, both of whom support #brexit. 
Meet Alexandra Tatton Brown, your @LibDems candidate for the Dalgarno by-election on March 21stDemand cleaner airDemand an end to knife crimeDemand better busses and transportDemand a People’s Vote on Brexit dealDemand councillors who listen#DemandBetter#DemandLibDems 
Here is the full motion from the National Conservative Convention this morning where grassroots members voted against a delay to Brexit and against no deal coming off the table  
This is so true.The British public is disconnected from the reality of Brexit  
Credit where credit is due. @NickyMorgan01 is working hard with people like @SteveBakerHW and @Jacob_Rees_Mogg to get a good #Brexit deal. It was a pleasure to be on a panel with her last night in #Halifax. Thank you @HxConservatives. 
"Brexit won't affect those with good connections and money, but those who are looking to build a new life."  
Sir Jame Eadie QC represented Prime Minister in Court of Appeals - Civil Decision 21 Feb 2019. He said the PM knows, & is proceeding regardless.File: for use in future public inquiry and/or criminal trial. Re criminality: read Section 1 of the Terrorism Act 2000.@brexit_sham 
EU PANIC: Barnier and Verhofstadt under mounting pressure to deliver NO DEAL BrexitTheir twisted thinking is that allowing a no-deal Brexit to happen would be punishment for the UK, and would dissuade Greece and Italy from leaving.Bring it on! No 39 bn  
THREADBrexit options are narrowing. Why? Olly Robbins leaked probably terminated May’s deal passing with Lab support. It pushed up hardline Tory opposition from ~40 to 62 because of admission de facto permanent CU was May’s long-term plan. Not enough Lab MPs to rescue it. (1/5) 
"Brexit: Motion for second referendum be tabled in parliament this week - The Independent" | This is a joke! People need to accept the result of the legitimate referendum and STOP acting so childishly... (I'm talking to you ⁦@LibDems⁩) 
Clark, Rudd & Gauke must all be sacked. TRAITORS. They are EU puppets trying to subvert UK democracy. They think they can overrule 17.4m Brits to impose a fake remainer #brexit on the UK. #Brexiteers must take them on, vote down #Maysdeal & go for no deal to secure a real brexit!  
With GDP growth at a 9-year low, the country is now fairly close to recession.Figures show the closer we get to #Brexit, the worse the impact is getting.We need the chance to #ExitfromBrexit in a #PeoplesVote. It's the only way to save our economy & give it the boost it needs. 
Corbyn, we are facing a national Brexit crisis so you are slithering down to Broxtowe to poach a seat from a brave remain MP who has shown more opposition to the Tory Government this week than you have in your entire time as Labour leader. You are a disgrace!  
No. You have betrayed Honda by supporting Brexit, you idiot.  
Should EU migrants who live and work in the U.K. have been allowed to vote in the referendum? #Brexit 
Matthew Parris strikes a chord in today’s times. But why wait any longer? Why don’t all Tory MP’s who share the same view leave the party now and bring an end to the Brexit fiasco? #RevokeA50  
Whatever the outcome of Brexit - the deal negotiated by May, a deal negotiated by Corbyn, a fudge decided in Parliament - the only way it could survive is if ratified by voters as preferable to staying in the EU.I’m pleased this principle is being recognised more and more.  
So if I was a Conservative MP calling for a Brexit delay with a slim majority in a leave voting constituency, I might be a bit worried @AmberRuddHR 
Delaying Brexit would continue uncertainty and doesn’t deliver on the record high democratic decision of British people to leave. Every EU negotiation has gone to the last moment, the discipline of no deal is essential in seeking an agreement. Britain expects MPs to respect this.  
The whole world knows that #Brexit was one massive con trick, driven by fraudsters. The UK’s international reputation is in tatters, will require decades to restore, if at all.Our nation can still be spared further humiliation:#RevokeA50 
Delaying Brexit will trigger unexpected consequences for the two main parties  
Fighting for the NHS means opposing Brexit. Start there 
The National Convention is the governing body of the Tory voluntary wing. So lots of on-the-ground activists and constituency members. Today’s vote is not binding in any way but sends a clear message from the grassroots that they don’t want a delay to #Brexit 
After telling us we were #BetterTogether Willie Rennie is now telling Scots they face years of torture because of brexit#sldconf #libdems 
Great to be out campaigning in Breightmet with @BoltonTories!When I asked if he had any local issues, one man said "Just do Brexit. Labour are wankers." pic.twitter.com/KltAOr7SZs 
NEW: At the grassroots National Conservative Convention in Oxford - 80% of attendees have voted for there to be no delay to Brexit and for 'no deal' to be left on the table. Clear message there and totally the opposite of what the Rudd/Gauke/Clark piece today calls for #Brexit 
Here’s how it goes...The establishment gives us a referendum in the name of democracy believing they could never lose itWe have the referendumThey loseThey piss their pants & do everything possible to overturn the result & democracyWankers  
What this graphic actually shows is how much UK consumers are ripped off on products like olive oil, bananas and garlic which we do not produce domestically and would be insane to put tariffs on after Brexit. 
Delaying Brexit would only destroy the certainty that British business is looking for.  
Try for whatever deal you like Mr Corbyn, but if you deny the nation a #PeoplesVote you will, like the Tories, be building your #Brexit on a foundation of right-wing electoral crime and right-wing hate and lies. Is that that the future you want to give to the British people? 
Where a no-deal Brexit would hit hardest:1. Germany2. China3. France4. Poland5. Italy6. India7. Spain8. Netherlands9. Ireland10. Belgium  
The Corbyn ‘left’ would like us to believe we only have two choices / the Tories and Corbyn, They are as much a part of the problem as the Tories, They symbolise a broken partisan politics that has not only led us to the Brexit abyss, but believes we should jump  
My first (and probably last) mention on a drill track! Do people still say "chooon"?DRILLMINISTER - NO DEAL BREXIT (Music Video) | @MixtapeMadness  via @YouTube 
"As a working-class person, all I've got is my vote, and when that gets diluted the power of my vote is lost... this is something worth fighting for."Inspiring stuff from @Warrington4B, fighting for a clean Brexit  
'EXCLUSIVE VIDEO MONTAGE of the evolution of Fianna Fail's position on Fine Gael's squandering of €500m on the National Children's Hospital... and, every other scandalWatch til end#FGAF19#ffaf19 #Marian #BillKenneally#twip #AnIrelandForAll #NCHBlame SF. Blame #brexit   
#libdems submit Second #Brexit referendum motion to be tabled in parliament this week.Will .@TheIndGroup support? 
Looking forward to addressing the @fiannafailparty Ard Fheis on Brexit and future relationships across the island. #FFAF19 
Brexit supporters need to keep our nerve and remain focused on delivering the massive mandate we have  
Absolute nonsense. The PM controlling the schedule and process of #Brexit would strengthen @theresa_may and relieve many on both sides. 
Brexit is 34 days away. #brexit 
This is the clear presentation of what a no deal Brexit will mean that all MPs should keep in their minds when they vote next week. Clear backtracking from no deal ERG MPs this week as Brexit day nears.  
"I have no fear of a second referendum," said the Brexit legend."Many people, including MPs, who voted Remain say they would vote to leave in a second referendum because they just think it is undemocratic [to reverse] the first vote."  
The reason TM wants Brexit In Name Only is because it makes leaving reversibleIt keeps us within the orbit of the EU so that after a later election we could rejoinIf we leave under these terms our departure will not be permanentWe *must* sever ourselves from the EU entirely 
The motion passed 5-1. @Conservatives MPs need to take note of this emphatic endorsement of our stated policy. Article 50 must not be delayed and they must avoid Parliamentary tricks which look like they're trying to thwart Brexit.  
The new #remoaninglosersparty are a bunch of hypocrites. They have frustrated #Brexit for 3 years demanding a #peoplesvote however won’t let their constituency vote on keeping them as their MP. They are cowards who sold out their voters & want to sell out the entire UK to the EU! 
I find it apalling that MPs who are trying to stand up for what the electorate have been voting about for almost 5 years are being cast as “extreme” - whereas those MPs who want to ignore the EU referendum result are somehow “moderate”. What on earth is going on? x 
The Conservative National Convention just voted by a landslide — 72-15 — to reject any delay to Brexit. Pointed reminder to MPs from the grassroots’ supreme body that they won’t brook any compromise.  
Hope somebody is stockpiling diplomats, we seem to be running low. And we are going to need the very best to clean up the mess once #Brexit has been buried. 
”Another referendum, a delay beyond the European elections, taking 'no deal' off the table or not leaving at all would betray the 2016 People's Vote and damage democracy and our Party for a generation” 2/2 
Motion wording:“The National Convention supports the commitments the Prime Minister has made to the country to honour the European Union Referendum result of 2016 that having triggered Article 50 we will leave the European Union on the 29th March 2019. 1/2 
The absolute #Brexit  mess we are in today was predicted my most Remain voters on June 24th 2016. It was not rocket science. 
This is typical EU red tape. Indigenous squirrels having their speed limited by Brussels whilst immigrant ‘funny tinged’ greys are free to speed as much as they like in their German built sports cars! #takebackcontrol #brexit  
Now that we know TINGE prefers a Tory Brexit to a vote on Labour's customs union etc - and will support Theresa May to get it - can we all just acknowledge that shouty continuity Remain is mainly just an anti-socialism thing and have honest arguments about wealth & climate etc 
Brexit was expected to trigger mass departures from the U.K.’s financial hub. But so far there are few signs of that happening.  
Why? You have no intention of delivery Brexit do you! Is this what you really call Brexit, we call it a total betrayal - Heath to May, no difference in the lies and deceit from Cons.  
While Labour and the Tories bicker amongst themselves, the @LibDems are leading the fight for a #PeoplesVote. Our amendment will give you the #FinalSay on #Brexit and MPs need to seize this chance to really #TakeBackControl and rule out a #NoDealBrexit. 
LibDem leader in the Lords, @RichardNewby3 (Lord Newby),says "it is literally inconceivable" that the government can get all its Brexit legislation through in time without either emergency procedures or parliament sitting all night and at weekends #WeekInWestminster 
Eight examples of dirty tactics employed by the Spanish Supreme Court at the beginning of the Catalan referendum trial.  
As a Unite member we know about this, as @LenMcCluskey is doing his best as the union leader to destroy as many jobs as possible with his support for a Hard BREXIT, this is not a mandate from the members who he doesn’t give a  about 
Andrew Bridgen calls for Anna Soubry and other Tory defectors to face by-elections in their constituencies for their hypocrisy in campaigning for a second Brexit referendum.@mattfrei | #TorySplit 
If the PM & #ConservativeParty Party DELIVERED the #WTOBrexit that the majority of the ppl voted for(17.4m) how would you vote in future #GeneralElections?**Please retweet after voting **#Conservative #Labour #LibDem #UKIP #ForBritain #SDP #TIG #Green #SNP #BrexitParty #Brexit 
I saw how the Scottish referendum played out. Frankie Boyle was dead on when he compared Scotlands relationship with England to that of an abused wife being told the husband will change 
So what now for the UK following the Wilson (@UKEUchallenge) decision in the Court of Appeal?With legal challenges against Brexit at and end, how do we move forward?'Last Post for Wilson but Reveille for Independent MPs’#RevokeA50 via @brexit_sham 
Second Brexit referendum motion to be tabled in parliament this week.Not sure of this one's chances. Some may wait for the Kyle/Wilson "lethal" amendment next month as that has growing support.  
After all the posturing, time is now against us. We have to stop the Brexit doomsday watch.  
I don’t expect ERG hardliners to listen to me but they really should listen to committed Brexiter Andrew Percy who speaks for a large number of sensible voices in the Brexit Delivery Group  
#Brexit supporters take note. Where did @Arron_banks leave millions come from again? Who stands to gain from #EU consensus falling apart? 
18 WTO member countries - including members of the Commonwealth (shock! horror!) - are currently objecting to the post-Brexit tariff quota arrangements proposed by the UK and the EU; that would take a few years to sort out even if the WTO was functioning properly.  
A desperately sad day for Britain. Michael Heseltine on #Brexit. via @krishgm 
Amber Rudd and David Gauke wants to delay Brexit. This is a betrayal of the British people yet they were voted in for their constituents to represent them but as usual they only represent themselves. There’s no such thing as delaying Brexit it will Be Betrayal! 
So Mr “Bollocks to Brexit” is backing Chuka’s and Anna’s Brexit-blocking Ltd Company. Quelle surprise!  
UK Businesses already trade WTO rulesWe ship products all over the world under WTO terms & have No problems.Tariffs vary from 0% to 4%It takes 2 minutes to fill form on internet.All shipping agents provide this service.There are No delays.#Brexit #EU 
Post Brexit prediction: All member-states to be fully integrated into an EU federal superstate, key sovereign fiscal powers taken away and taxation direct from Brussels.After all they can't fix Europe without more Europe.  
Conservative National Convention of senior party members has this morning passed this motion No delayNo 2nd ReferendumNo Article 50 revocation#StandUp4Brexit 
When it comes to Brexit debates, we must heed history  via @jewishchron 
So, 34 days to go, still waiting to hear from a UK Business sector who feel that we will be better off (or even retain current position) with any form of #Brexit! Certainly not #Agriculture, #Health, #Finance, #Engineering, #Automotive, #Science, #Aerospace… #RevokeA50 #Remain 
Get this folks @ITVEveningNews @SkyNewsBreak @Channel4News @Peston ?It's been proven in court that @theresa_may as @10DowningStreet decided alone to issue A50 notice in the knowledge of referendum corruption.With this knowledge, will @HouseofCommons now act properly ? 
Yes, that's interesting isn't it! #JeremyCorbyn's constituency voted 3:1 to #Remain in the EU in the EURef 2016. But, he is a #Brexit supporter. So, he opposes the views of his constituents, his party membership, Labour supporters and the British people in 2019. #RevokeArticle50 
Sadly, Brexit depresses me and makes me feel like running away. The imposition of Brexit - because the population of another country has decided that is what they want - crosses a line. It is a foreign fist crushing my soul.  
We now know which hard-core Brexiter is first to back off from March 29, as @LouiseMensch calls for extension to A50 or revocation.She also wants investigation by our intelligence services into role played by Russia in 2016 referendum. I predict other Brexiters will follow suit  
Using every illicit means possible, Eurosceptics have overturned a supermajority, Parliament has failed to protect our law-abiding electorate and the judiciary appear unwilling to intervene; Dr Robert C Palmer asks, can independent MPs’ offer a solution? 
A referendum is a general vote by the electorate on a singular political question which has been referred to them for a 'direct' decision.That'd be Leave then  
Yup. It’s real.This is a video of Michael Gove now telling farmers how no-deal Brexit would utterly, utterly shaft British farming - while New Zealand would get to send the EU a quota of meat tariff-free.Y’all been had.#LetsGoWTO #NoDealBrexit 
I recall you saying we shouldn’t have a second referendum, and if we did, you’d vote leave in protest, Aaron.  
Three members of Prime Minister Theresa May's cabinet have warned that #Brexit must be delayed if she cannot persuade the British parliament to back her EU divorce deal next week  
Remainiacs like @Anna_Soubry and @ChukaUmunna are a threat to democracy. They have no respect whatsoever for a vote as they refuse to honour the vote taken. There should be no more talk of referenda until at the very least the first vote has been implemented.#Brexit 
Can people please stop giving Andrew Bridgen airtime. The man thinks we can all just get Irish passports after Brexit. He has zero clue.  
Day Two of the #MENL meeting in London. Today ⁦@ForBritainParty⁩ leader Anne Marie will be speaking about life post #Brexit  
If we have a hero in British politics REGARDLESS of party it's @Anna_Soubry. She dared to stand up for UK against her ex-party, against her constituency vote on Brexit, often eloquently. That Corbyn chooses to attack HER NOW shows what he is.  #TheIndGroup 
Theresa May warned by ministers she has five days to agree to Brexit delay or face mass revolt 
@LenMcCluskey I hate to tell you but you‘ve got this completely round the wrong way again. #Honda warned us about #Brexit repeatedly and said it would create an unfavourable climate for businesses requiring frictionless single market access. It‘s business not treachery. 
Now this is a story all about how, Our land got flipped, turned upside down.And I ‘d like to take a minute so please do sit,I’ll tell you how I became the prince of a mess called Brexit...  
Where’s our #peoplesvote to stop the fascist, tax-avoiding, rights-stripping, criminally procured brexit? Why is @UKLabour FB siding with liars & criminals? Why does @uklabour ignore the polls which all say it won’t win a GE if it backs ANY form of brexit? #RevokeA50 
Cabinet at war Tories at war as they take the UK to the brink -Parliament has to vote to take EU crash out off the table #BrexitShambles Brexit: Rudd, Clark and Gauke should resign, says Andrew Bridgen  
#AmberRudd the #ProEU #SNAKE within the @cabinetofficeuk Do NOT trust her she is working for the #EU against the #UK like her brother @RolandRudd! #BBC #SKY @LBC #LBC @ConHome @CCHQPress #Tory @Conservatives #Conservatives #BREXIT @AmberRuddHR #ConservativeParty @theresa_may 
May would have it that the calamity of a no deal Brexit would be on the consciences of all those that fail to support her deeply unpopular deal. Her logic is twisted. She is wrong. All the blame would be on her shoulders. 
The only thing that could lead The Independent Group to become a viable party is Jeremy Corbyn literally forcing the sensible left out of the Labour party by continuing to condone Brexit & antisemitism. The trouble is, he is doing a very good job of this 
So, now both India and Turkey effectively wanting Freedom if Movement with UK once we've given up our Freedom of Movement with EU. Post Brexit we will be weak in negotiations on any trade deals. Brexit is not what was promised. 
No you chat to your @btbusinesscare team about this as made enough reports- I want to spend my time trying to help sort out Brexit and tackling knife crime, not repeatedly having to chase @bt_uk when you have concreted in phone booths and so are messing up Walthamstow’s streets… 
The most fundamental misunderstanding about the Brexit referendum was that it was a choice between 2 equally desirable outcomes, like having melon or soup as a starter.But the melon turned out to be rancid. Should the chef serve it anyway, because that's what the diners wanted? 
Welsh voters now give Remain a 55% to 45% lead over Leave. In 2016 Leave had 52.53% vs 47.47% for Remain. To block a #PeoplesVote vote would be a criminal violation of democracy. #Brexit #FBPE 
Petition to have Welsh independence referendum on the same day as Wales v England. Guaranteed 99% “yes” vote. 
The Britains should know: From the bottom of our hearts, we want them to  stay. And if you leave, you are always welcome to come back.#Brexit #Bundestag 
Our unicorn is about as convincing as the govt’s Brexit ‘deal’ itself! #RightToVote #FinalSay 
With Brexit fatigue turning to exhaustion, we must tackle this idea that if we Leave on March 29th, it's over & done with & we can get on with other important stuff. That's a lie! The only way to bring this nightmare to an end is to stop Brexit & attempt to heal the divisions. 
I mean, the fact Corbyn quite literally tried to have a second referendum put to the Commons and Soubry didn't vote for it is obviously quite irrelevant. Who needs journalism?  
*EU SIGNALS NO BREAKTHROUGH IN BREXIT TALKS IN BRUSSELS #Brexit ...U.S. TRADE REPRESENTATIVE LIGHTHIZER SAYS THERE ARE SOME GREAT HURDLES LEFT #China ...What's happening here !? Nothing but hot air...I don't have a good feeling about this. cc. @mcm_ct @StockBoardAsset 
Look!This taxi driver called at #Sodem this week to ask for some Bollocks to Brexit stickers for his cab.Thank you very much to him for making a stand.#StopBrexit#WeAreSodem 
Can you believe, we all thought Brexit was the biggest issue, when really it's Texit we should all have been worried about. 
“If our Party is to retain the support of Conservative voters and the faith and trust of the electorate in general, then it is vital that we abide by the solemn pledges we made in our 2017 General Election manifesto, in respect of delivering Brexit.”  
Listen to @Greg4Broxtowe on Brexit  
The thing is, Remainers DO talk about family. We talk about right wing family separation policies, how draconian immigration laws split up families, how couples are torn apart by the minimum income requirement... we talk about how family rights might be worse post Brexit  
A blip or a sea change? My latest Brexit Blog post analyses the quiet Brexit week that only saw the foundation of @TheIndGroup and the news of Honda's closure:  … 
Correct. Brexit was difficult but do-able. It took me a while too but this PM has made it much worse in every way, to the point that remaining is better.  
Milan Brglez,former president of the Slovenian parliament:“The British foreign minister comes to Slovenia asking us for a favour(to discuss with the foreign minister how to avoid a no-deal Brexit)while arrogantly insulting us. We were never a 'vassal state of the Soviet Union'."  
Exactly! Thanks @Suewilson91 and @JMPSimor !! What sends me incandescent with rage is not just that this case has been lost and the conspiracy of silence in the media but that the arguments about the ref not being ADVISORY underpinned the whole @brexit_sham @BrexitBin 
HS2 needs urgently to learn lessons from Brexit & collapse of the high speed project in California, in which Trump is revelling. I’m so busy I don’t have time to write this up properly, but 3 headlines: 1) building needs to start in the north as well as London IN PARALLEL (contd) 
@Fox_Claire @LovattMo @mollygiles2015 “This thoughtful, eloquent insight into why so many of us want a clean #Brexit, listen to working class people up north who wish to leave the EU. Fab video by ⁦@geggygallus⁩ Northern Brexit - 
Three cabinet ministers have promised to defy the prime minister and vote to extend Article 50 if she cannot get her Brexit deal through. @mattfrei asks: Should Article 50 be extended if May's deal fails? 
Perhaps they're NOT ignoring the referendum - the result was the outcome of ILLEGAL finance and ILLEGAL practice. That you ignore /suppress this is SINISTER & makes ME angry!#itsnotaboutbrexit it's about #democracy#PutItToThePeople@Suewilson91@Nealb2010@RobertCPalmer13 
To those who leaked an advance copy of my draft #Brexit day speech, stating it contained the phrase 'You Lying Effing Bastards you've Ruined the UK, Divided our Ppl, Betrayed the Young & Debased our Democracy"I utterly refute this!I know how to spell 'effing' properly!!! 
Three members of the Cabinet have threatened to support delaying Brexit if the Prime Minister doesn’t take no-deal off the table — madness.If the PM had any authority whatsoever she’d sack the lot of them — delaying Brexit is the best route to a Corbyn victory at the polls! 
Jo Swinson appears to think that the bad thing about Brexit is that the process is difficult. You decide to do something with a view to the outcome, not the difficulty, of the process. Independence and Brexit will be difficult. But there's no prize at the end of Brexit. 
Can I ask, politely, and reasonably, why no political reporters are asking Anna Soubry, "why did you vote 12 times against the right of EU citizens to remain in the UK after Brexit", and "why did you vote against Labour's amendment which offered the option of a referendum"? 
Your members haven’t been betrayed by #Honda, they have been betrayed by #Brexit & ideologues like you Len.  
Coveney: 'What's the new mega Bill? In simple language, it’s Irish Brexit law' (via @thejournal_ie) 
What are you all going to do if May helps Kyle pass and it goes to her deal or no deal as a question, taking into account about a third of people think no deal means no Brexit?Would be a fitting end to this folly.  
Matthew Parris is spot on - though he admits it took him a while - this PM has made a difficult Brexit situation much worse in every way, and is now only useful to MPs as they know they intend to blame everything on her after March 29  
How does delay improve the odds of Brexit being a success? They're dictated by the facts of our EU membership, nothing else. You can't vote for Brexit to be brilliant, any more than you could vote to win the lottery. Brexit isn't something that improves with time, like fine wine. 
Rudd, Clark and Gauke are hellbent on postponing Brexit to avoid No Deal. They're threatening to support Yvette Cooper's delaying amendment if Mrs May doesn't extend Article 50 and keep this depressing charade going on forever and ever. Get on with it and get us out of the EU. 
Thank you Senator @nealerichmond of Irish Parliament @OireachtasNews #Brexit Committee for confirming the widely held view that accession to #EU for an #independent #Scotland would be “straightforward & quick” #indyref2  
 Follow @MarcusJBall for progress of the case against Boris Johnson.“The prosecution believes that the evidence demonstrates Mr Johnson MP has lied to the British public ........ and in so doing has abused the public’s trust in these offices.”RT.#Brexit #marr #BrexitDeal 
Liberal Democrats to table motion for second Brexit referendum this week  
“Overall, there are unsurprisingly similarities & differences between leaving the EU & leaving the UK. The above analysis suggests there are..more differences than similarities both in terms of the issues, the process & the politics.” #Brexit v #Indyref2 Ends 
“Ironically, on trade, both countries could end up part of EU trade policy – but one, the UK, being a rule-taker.” @KirstyS_Hughes on #Brexit v #Indyref2 
Your firm’s making cuts? Sack the Brexit voters first, argues @terrychristian. 
Honda didn't ask for Brexit. But Lexiter Len accuses them of 'betrayal', and in the same breath claims he's fighting for the future of the workers - when in truth he's helped to fuck them over.Disgusting.  
I remain convinced that some Brexit extremists are betting on a sterling   crash, looking to make a fortune, buy a Maltese passport, off to Monaco etc....like to keep an eye on who makes big ££ post Brexit... 
With the utter chaos caused by the government over brexit and the massive divisions it has caused throughout the country it now stands out like dogs balls that our political system is not worth Jack Sh*t and neither are most of our MP's. We need a populist party now. 
Brexit should absolutely not be delayed, whatever the outcome of current negotiations.The Prime Minister has made clear, on many occasions, that we are leaving the EU on 29 March.Some Cabinet collective responsibility on this would be a good thing. 
No one can be surprised. The BBC is Remain Central. Ever since June 23rd 2016 it has pumped out anti-Brexit propaganda. It SHOULD be de-funded.  
We need sensible moderating cooperation back in our politics. We need conspicuous respect for democratic process. We need stability. We need legitimacy. We need less tribalism. May and Corbyn have both failed. Brexit has failed. We need to pause and reset. 
Here's something interesting. There have so far been virtually no attempts to justify Brexit on moral grounds. The first big attempt to come along is not only an egregious intellectual failure, but one that is itself morally bankrupt. I think that says a lot about the project. 
“Prosecuting politicians is the only way out of this Brexit mess”By @MarcusJBall - of the team who have just lodged legal papers against Boris Johnson.#Brexit #BrexitDeal #BrexitVote 
Labour MP Peter Kyle is calling for a second referendum, but that's not what he promised on the night of the referendum in 2016.  
It’s 34 days til Brexit. People are leaving Labour because of this and its bullying environment. So Jeremy Corbyn is spending today going after one of the strongest voices for @peoplesvote_uk, a female MP in a Parliament where women are outnumbered by men 2 to 1. What a guy. 
We Americans need our most important ally to remain strong, so a delay in #Brexit makes sense. Abritary dates and incomplete, untested plans are a bad combination.  
Dear Theresa May, your Brexit plan is doomed. Here’s a deal that will work | @thatginamiller writing in The @Guardian@LeadNotLeaveUK 
Anna Soubry says F.U. to her Brexit loving constituency. #TIG #IndependentGroup 
.@AmberRuddHR must go one step further and back a #PeoplesVote and a chance to #exitfrombrexit This is the only way to stem the blood-letting in British jobs, triggered by a self-imposed, self-harming #BrexitWill she, @GregClarkMP and @DavidGauke back the country interests? 
#IsItOK that the @TheLastLeg does politics and Brexit every week but has totally ignored the verticle spike to Leave in the polls at the exact time they criminally overspent by at least £10m in the EU referendum? (via The Economist)@AdamHillsComedy @JoshWiddicombe @Alex_Brooker 
There’s no Brexit way forward with majority support in Parliament or the country.So who decides what we do next and how, as a country, do we get to feel comfortable with that?Remain & Leave have both been SHOUTING VERY LOUDLY.But it shouldn’t be who shouts loudest who wins. 
Matthew Parris describes May, with her Deal imploding, as a black hole, the living embodiment of a closed door. Corbyn attacks Anna Soubry in Broxtowe because, in her obvious capturing of the popular mood, she threatens his plans for #Brexit. Neither of them is attacking the ERG. 
Current Brexit uncertainty & risk of a #NoDeal is already having a negative impact on UK #organic businesses who export to the . @michaelgove must act now to stop it getting worse. Read our CEO Helen Browning's open letter to Gove  
The British public is disconnected from the reality of Brexit"Of course if Brexit does decimate the entire car industry then Henry Ford himself will be blamed for inventing a machine that was so weak as to be subject to trade tariffs."  
Local reports say Labour voters are moving over to support Anna Soubry because of her stance on Brexit and resignation from the Tories.  
You know, it’s *almost as if* stopping Brexit was less important to this crowd, than justifying to themselves their hostility to Corbyn, isn’t it... 
Actually this got me thinking. Who would you most like to stand/campaign directly against Jeremy Corbyn in his seat in Islington North at the next election? A Martin Bell style anti Brexit candidate.  
You have GOT to be joking! These are our friends? #WTOBrexit now please.UK must not be allowed ‘pursue cheap food policy’ after Brexit  via @IrishTimesBiz 
There are TWO huge battles raging politically right now1. Brexit2. Stop the genuine Socialist Corbyn becoming PM 
Brexit CRISIS for Germany: 100,000 jobs face AXE if no deal agree, economic experts warn  
The people who lost the referendum are still running the country...  
First it came for Airbus and noone said it was BrexitThen it came for Jaguar and noone said it was BrexitThen it came for Nissan and noone said it was BrexitThen it came for Honda and noone said it was BrexitThen there were no jobs left and everyone said it was Brexit 
First we had the self styled "Three Amigos" bail out of the Conservative party rather than support Brexit. Now we have these three cabinet ministers threaten to derail Brexit unless May abandons "No Deal". Traitors abound as we approach D-Day 
Disgusting Conflict of Interest: Theresa May’s Husband’s Investment Firm Made a "Financial Killing" from the Bombing of Syria - Global Research -  #politicslive #LBC #bbcnews #skynews #brexit #c4news #itvnews @Conservatives 
Feeling frustrated about Brexit today.I am annoyed with Brexiters who can’t see beyond 29th March.I am annoyed with our constipated, immoral parliament.I am angry with the MSM spreading lies while passing around popcorn.I love the U.K. Can we keep it?#RevokeA50 
Tha Tory government is so paralysed by its own abject failure to sort out Brexit that it hasn’t been able to address any of the real problems facing the vast majority of the population. Labour is actively confronting these problems. We need a Labour government now!  
Non-entities Rudd, Gauke and Clark are the same people who warned before the referendum of immediate economic doom if we voted to leave the EU. They were proved spectacularly wrong then and they are wrong now. Just idiots getting in the way of democracy.   
The Brexit negotiation has been a disgraceful shambles. But the political panic does not seem to be infecting the country more widely, nor is it spooking employers.  
It's like my old mother always says, if goats can climb trees, Brexit can be stopped.Mother's are wise.  
Join us on Tuesday with @DavidLammy @AlexSobel @JoStevensLabour @mdbuckley @mikegalsworthy @RupaHuq to talk about how to make a public vote on Brexit @UKLabour policy before it's too late. As the Brexit clock ticks down it's time to act. Sign up here: 
Exactly.  All the far-right projects in the west - Trump, brexit, Orbán... They are all about scrapping rules, regulations & rights that protect us. These are efforts by the extremely rich to get even richer and damn the consequences for the rest of us. And blame  
BREAKING: Brexit and housing set to dominate Fianna Fáil Ard Fheis.‘We are also really looking forward to the keynote address from Taoiseach Leo Varadkar,’ Micheál Martin says. 
We need the checks and balances now more than ever.The PM has chosen to take an advisory referendum, proven to have involved unlawful activity, as the will of the people & must be 'delivered'.Government ministers have lied & continue to lie to us.They must be held to account.  
Is there anything that this fucking Government hasn't got wrong about Brexit?  
You want the country to have a 2nd vote on Brexit but no bi-election for you after you abrogated your 2017 election address and the manifesto you stood on. Democracy in action eh!? I think the lot of you underestimate the public anger. 
Disgraceful that the Guardian published this without even basic fact-checking. The government deserves some blame for not acting sooner to confirm and clarify the status of EU citizens post-#Brexit. But this is surely #ProjectFear at its absolute worst... 
Carrot AND stick : ERG being tempted with thought of Theresa May going soon after deal voted through and threatened by Brexit delay if it isn’t. Is it enough to get the deal they hate down their throats?  
Corrupt ERG member, Andrew Bridgen, is still peddling the fiction that a no-deal #Brexit would allow Britain to immediately trade under WTO terms. As the #WTO Director General pointed out in no uncertain terms recently, @ABridgen is speaking out of his fat arse...   #r4today 
Could there be a breakthrough in the Brexit negotiations next week? It might just be possible. Here’s my latest. Brexit: The narrow precipice to a last-gasp deal via @RTENewsNow 
So many of these hard right roads lead back to climate changedenial. From Trump to Tufton Street to a ‘low regulation’ Brexit, it’s all about removing all obstacles to rampant, toxic profiteering, regardless of the impact on populations or planet. It really is that simple.  
"We are setting up a new party to oppose Brexit and end the old politics!"Four days later."We are propping up the hard Brexit, pro-austerity, migrant-hating, benefits-slashing Tory government."  
What brass neck.Tories want to keep us in the EU for evermore, with no exit door & they criticise #Labour for betraying  the #Brexit vote ??????  
Three cabinet ministers have promised to defy the prime minister and vote to extend Article 50 if she cannot get her Brexit deal through  
Jeremy Corbyn who refused to meet with Theresa May to discuss Brexit.Jeremy Corbyn is pictured shaking hands with Shamima Begum's lawyer  
Brexit means Brexit. Brexit is divisionBrexit is fearBrexit is spitefulBrexit is angerBrexit is greedBrexit is intoleranceBrexit is the pastBrexit is dying#RevokeA50 
Well it’s a win win isn’t it? Unseat a Tory and a Remainer. With five weeks until Brexit, some might say our political leaders ought to have higher priorities.  
Trying to make sense of a week when party politics in the UK fractured... but there was little formal change on the #Brexit frontBut next week is shaping up to be significant - a request to extend Article 50 now very likelyHere's Version 8 of my Brexit diagram!  
Brexit: what happens the next day if there is no deal?  
What a naughty dog!!!  @AlbaWhiteWolfI know @theresa_may is being utterly irresponsible leading us to the #Brexit cliff edge & refusing to rule out #NoDeal in order to try and force her crap deal through...But she doesn't deserve to be dismembered!  @pethatestoys 
Come on Keir..Jeremy would prefer a #PeoplesVote off the table...it's time sensible MPs took #Brexit off the table & preventedRights Removed w/o Consent More Irreparable harm to UK & our UnionImpoverishment of Country & Ppl.#RevokeA50 #StopBrexit & #Remain in Control in EU. 
BREAKING NEWSTHERESA MAY'S DECEIVING BREXIT DEALTHE EVIDENCE IS EXPOSEDSIR BILL CASH. MP FULLY EXPLAINED@ACTIVEPATRIOTUK @trotman_deirdre @BarneyBrazil @crusaderkeif @psychickat22 @KWarrior6 @saramaye71 @BasedWelshman1 @dmark3808 @TomWho4 @RosinaFrance @realbasedamy 
Eadie clearly states that May does not care about the crimes she is taking advantage of to help her push her agenda through.This isn't democracy.There's something wrong with May, and she cannot be allowed to force #Brexit on us like this.  
‘Brexiles’ - ‘It became okay to make racial comments in the UK’ - with the xenophobia they believe has awakened in the UK, four ‘#Brexit refugees’ talk about why they have chosen to leave Britain for Ireland - another of my long #Brexit reads  @IrishTimes 
How dare they try to stop the vote of 17.4 million  Brits............   Brexit: Greg Clark, Amber Rudd and David Gauke issue delay warning - BBC News  
There is nothing ‘clean’ about No Deal, only a chaotic & expensive mess. Excellent long read on why politicians must stop sugaring the pill on hard Brexit choices  
What a pointless & damaging waste the whole farrago is. “Ministers spend £100m on Brexit consultant contracts” - BBC News  
Hell, invite the entire #TIG for a mass rally on Highbury fields every time Corbyn goes to any none anti Brexit event 
Can somebody explain to me how Labour were told to abstain when SNP raised their motion to take no deal Brexit off the table, but then their leader gets up at PMQs and asks Mad May if she will take no deal Brexit off the table? Asking for a confused friend 
Labour MPs are conspicuously shifting towards support for referendum - and the big question is whether @theresa_may would grasp the lifeline for her deal she looks likely to be thrown by the likes of Cryer and (after @johnmcdonnellMP interview with @chedwardes yesterday) even... 
.@JohnCryerMP letter to his constituents (attached) says he would back Kyle/Wilson initiative for MPs to support @theresa_may’s Brexit deal so long as it is ratified in people’s vote. This really matters because he was backing Brexit and he chairs Parliamentary Labour Party...  
Note for Clarke, Gauke, Rudd and HM Government: Brexit delayed is democracy denied. 
Brexit: The narrow precipice to a last-gasp deal via @RTENewsNow 
The referendum was 51.9 to 48.1.Don't you think that Russian influence in Brexit was at least 1.9%?The result is unsafe, at minimum.We can solve the problem with a new referendum, and now on the actual deal, as opposed to on a lie on the side of a bus. 
Esteemed Professor of Economics and expert in negotiations pins the blame for the impasse in Brexit talks firmly on the EU. He also criticises the bloc's obsession with "phoney issues". 
Greg Clark, David Gauke and Amber Rudd don't just want to delay Brexit, they want to prevent it. They have opposed it from the start and are determined to destroy it. They are the enemy within the Cabinet, intent on undermining the PM's negotiating position. #StandUp4Brexit 
First it was Airbus & noone said because of BrexitThen it was Jaguar & noone said because of BrexitThen it was Nissan & noone said because of BrexitThen it was Honda & noone said because of BrexitThen there were no jobs left & everybody realised it was because of Brexit 
So 100 or so MPs are demanding that “no-deal” is ruled out. But a no-deal IS #Brexit. So that's at least  traitors against the people and democracy #SaturdayThoughts 
Legal papers lodged against Boris Johnson. “The prosecution believes that the evidence demonstrates Mr Johnson MP has lied to the British public ........ and in so doing has abused the public’s trust in these offices.”#marr #ridge #Brexit 
She’s calling for a second vote on the referendum result, but denying her constituents a second vote as to whether or not she should remain as their MP now she is no longer a Conservative. #Youcouldntmakeitup 
Mensch's pro Brexit drivel in February 2016. Written from the safety of her New York home. I hope it comes back to haunt her 
German chemists refusing to sell usual meds to Brits, and cancelling existing orders, because there is no deal in place and they might arrive after Brexit.This is becoming life or death stuff. 
Sometimes you need a voice from the distance to tell you where you really are. | Britain in the Crazed Brexit Vortex - The New York Times  
Just when you think politics couldn't be more extraordinary up pops 3 Cab Mins publicly defying the PM to warn Brexit must be delayed if there's no deal. In the Mail too, a paper which only a few months ago would've denounced them as traitors & enemies of the people 
What an insult this is to leave voters. When May is allowing three Cabinet ministers to publicly argue for Brexit to be cancelled.Tories treating Brexit voters as total mugs.  
It's difficult to imagine a normal human being talking about #Brexit for 2+ years and casting as little light on it as @BBCr4today has managed. For me, their circular, personality-driven and expert-free conversations have been a conscious choice. 
Why can't these duplicitous politicians admit that what they really want is to stop #Brexit altogether?All this talk of "delay if we can't get a deal" fools nobody.Remainer ministers just want to frustrate the electorate's express will. 
"WANT BREXIT?  Arm yourself with the facts."  Fight on with the truth, using the biggest new index of #Brexit facts in the world :   A stunning resource for Brexiteers & MPs.#GoWTO 
Heidi Allen says the new Tigger group of anti-Brexit, “independent” MPs, would support Theresa May in any vote of confidence.  Tells you all you need to know, really. 
One of the signs of Brexit extremism is the way mainstream Tories kow-tow to the hard right. Jeremy Hunt accuses the EU of being the Soviet Union, Sajid Javid strips British citizens of their citizenship, Mrs May spends £4bn on No Deal planningAnd there is Chris Grayling 
Yes, the removal of the NHS has been a long-term Conservative plan. The economic turmoil of Brexit, however, gives the Tories the excuse to finish the job. We haven't got any money, they'll say. And, in desperation, to get a US trade deal, they will throw the NHS under a bus.  
...the adult world & away from the Brexit playpen where the screamiest toddlers appear to have been cemented in their stance by their own dried vomit as they scream again for more candy. As this point I’d accept special measures under a Kurdish army of occupation. Mxx 
There are fewer than 831 hours to Brexit.1/2 What on earth does Theresa May think she can accomplish that she hasn't managed in 2 and a half years?Withdrawal Agreement rejected.No time for extending.No more negotiations.No deal too catastrophic to consider. 
Theresa May must resign as British prime minister and Conservative leader later this year after delivering Brexit, according to politicians at the highest levels of her own government  
Having backed Brexit, fought for Brexit, flown to Britain to appear on news panel shows to make the case for Brexit, set up a hashtag called #BrexitHeroes hysterically insisted that if we don't Brexit  - Turkish people will swamp the country ...Mensch says STOP BREXIT...  
May I respectfully ask: If the Prime Minister is so confident that the deal she’s negotiated delivers on the narrow result of the #Brexit referendum that took place over two years ago, why is she so afraid of putting it back to back to the people in form of a #PeoplesVote? 
Keir, you know this is prevarication. As a principled man, you know there's a way out of this. Join @TheIndGroup  and fight for what you know is right without being muzzled or sidelined. Help us all end Brexit now! #ChangePolitics 
Heidi Allen has confirmed if it comes to a no confidence vote in this rotten government that she and her fellow careerists will back the Tories. It’s really not about stopping Brexit or changing politics, it’s about ensuring the elite stay elite and Corbyn stays out of power. 
“They are very worried about the consequences o no deal so we should take it off the table”He’s utterly clueless, if the EU are worried it means they’ll likely concede to the sensible requests for changes to the WA. Taking away no deal = No Brexit  
Glad to see some great rebuttals of Giles Fraser's tripe. Brexit will make it harder for me to look after my parents when they need it, for several reasons. And Mum didn't make sacrifices for my education so that I could live just around the corner, scraping to make ends meet.  
The lack of control and oversight of the £4bn being spent by the government, panic-stricken, on No Deal planning is a Grade A scandal - for the public inquiry after the collapse of Brexit 
‘The Government has issued eyewatering contracts worth more £100 million to consultants working on Brexit’ (BBC)Another one for the public inquiry after the collapse of Brexit 
Required reading from Sir Ivan Rogers today on where we are with the Brexit talks - demolishing the Brexiteer claims, exposing the splits among them and shredding this Government’s elevation of tactics over strategy. 
Next time you think of Brexit, don’t. Just look a this and you’ll feel a whole lot better. #brexit  
Met @jeremycorbyn who illustrated @UKLabour thoughts on #Brexit for the crucial next few days in @UKParliament. #Malta would obviously prefer a deal but will not depart from #EU common position -JM 
 how many Tories in Government does it take to deliver Brexit? None, because they think it’s the responsibility of Labour to do it from the opposition benches.We have Idiots governing this country. And they want people to join on the back of this tweet!! #Spanners 
If nothing else this shows what a peevish spiteful little man Corbyn really is. Going after the woman who has done more to stop Brexit than he ever did.He should never be permitted anywhere near Nr10 
Theresa May's hostile environment created the atmosphere & Brexit stoked the anger, giving rise to Tommy Robinson & his right wing extremism! He is emboldened to harrass Muslims and those who oppose his views. Stephen Yaxley-Lennon needs to be stopped #StandUpToRacism 
Surely at this point in the negotiations our MPs are not stupid enough to REMOVE No Deal??Three senior ministers signal they're ready to help delay Brexit 
How can anyone be an MP and hate their country enough to want it to fail. That is exactly what almost every Remainer prays for, that Brexit will fail. Thank you the ones who say I was a Remainer but I will now do everything in my power to make Brexit a success. 
It worries me that the House of Commons is on the brink of going it alone to stop Brexit. They have the numbers but not the authority. We promised to implement the Ref result not tell the people they were wrong. Dangerous times ahead for MPs  
"Theresa May has been warned by ministers she has five days to announce she will delay Brexit or she will face a mass rebellion that risks collapsing the Government"No. She has until 29March to deliver Brexit or face real mass rebellion from the populace! 
The British public is disconnected from the reality of Brexit, & that's how the government would like to keep it.@bremaininspain 
Brexit Party. But it's not ideal. I would prefer to belong to 'The One United Opposition Party'. It would be unbeatable!  
30/ And foreign hackers might have hacked a voter registration site before the Brexit vote as well.  
The "moderates" are the extremists. They're the ones who are chucking the result of the referendum and trying to keep us in the EU. The ERG are merely trying to enact the manifesto the Conservatives were elected on. Tom knows this, but Tom has his own narrative to push. x  
29/ PS. Similar to the voter data leaks caused by ES&S and United in Purpose & the GA Secretary of State’s office, the  election vendor that handled Brexit (IDOX) caused a massive voter data leak before the Brexit vote. @StillDelvingH 
‘Senior Tories from the “heart of the Conservative party” are poised to join the new Brexit Party if there is a delay to Britain leaving the EU’ 
Let’s hope so - ‘Barnier and Verhofstadt under mounting pressure to deliver NO DEAL Brexit’ 
Can we blame Brexit somehow 
OH!What a Shock!As three Tory Ministers Rudd,Gauke and Clark make veiled threats to the Country’s March 29th Brexit Leaving date instead of getting on with their respective jobs in Pensions, Justice and Business!“Strong and Stable Government?”....Mrs MaySack All Three!! 
The bottom line is simple: Brexit has been, is, and will be a disaster for Britain. The 2016 vote was manipulated through lies, writes @NYTimesCohen. 
So now we know, it wasn’t Brexit. Oh deary me, no! Heaven forfend!It was all Honda’s fault, apparently! Pull the other one, Len, it’s got bells on!  
What a load of rubbish! Honda was betrayed by those who are foisting a jobs-stripping Brexit on this country. No just the Brextremists’ poodle, May, but your complicit leader, Corbyn.No one is buying your lame deflection from the truth. 
My city was burned to the ground by the Black n Tans. Britain caused the death & suffering of millions here. Ireland is the only Western country with a lower population than in 1800. We're in no hurry to 'rejoin the empire' & kiss your self-inflicted Brexit boo-boos better.  
Trade deals, #Brexit bring major #deepstate pain....Update your score cards... 
To not delay Brexit as this stage would be akin to not delaying landing a jumbo jet until you aren't in the middle of the sea. Or not delaying open heart surgery until you are out of the car park Greg Clark, Amber Rudd and David Gauke issue warning  
Here, Naomi Wolf is supporting Alex Jones of @Infowars, saying that banning him from private company @Facebook abridges his free speech.Dr. Wolf was hugely opposed to @LouiseMensch's op-ed arguing @Theresa_May should press pause on #Brexit  
#Okinawa referendum: Will an anti-base vote change anything?  
Brexit: a license to lie - as long as newspapers feel entitled to lie, and there are no sanctions against those that do, we can never have a "serious, civilised debate" in this country...  #Brexit.  
Now is not the right time to #Brexit. Let's do this at a moment that suits GB, not the GRU  
Right, I’ll have a go at this one.Some of the cars Aviva insures are diesel, and they’re doing it at 1 minute before Brexit because they’ve got people coming to stay that weekend and want the money out the way so there’s room to get the sofa bed out?Or maybe it’s Brexit.  
It was in this same app someone called Rashford Brexit Lil kesh and BankyW Gorimapa Chris Brown. Now who is this costain Anthony Joshua and obioma Thanos nd what has he done?  
I’m not sure if Brexit would affect Trump, but Trump seems to have brought the rest of the world to their senses, at least a little.Example: La Pen getting thrashed in France, Brexit on the fence, etc 
Honestly Micheal, I'm a retired teacher & farmer who has ZERO police record I  62 YRS. I AM NOW ardently marching right purely by the deception I see daily. I WILL be stopping the streets wielding my sharpened pitchforks if @theresa_may kills off #Brexit  
As the Brexit doomsday clock ticks, MPs must start putting their constituents' interests first | @thatginamiller 
Betrayed by Honda?  That's epic gaslighting from someone who supports Brexit. 
It’s 34 days until Brexit, with no plan or agreement in place, but luckily some MPs are taking time to pretend they’ve invented a new form of politics that involves not having any political positions. 
i still don’t know what brexit is and now im too afraid to ask 
Shouldn’t all MP’s who voted for Article 50 and said they would accept the result of the Referendum and who are now wanting a 2nd Vote stand for re-election in a by Election .HoC this week have shown they should all be made redundant as they only care about their views . 
The PM's husband will not be the only Tory to benefit from Brexit  
Time for a referendum free of Bannon etc. influence! 
All three don’t want to delay Brexit. They don’t want Brexit. This is counter to cabinet responsibility and they should all be sacked. 
If by some means Brexit is stopped then the issue is not then the EU, rather it becomes one of the state of our so called democracy where a rabble of MPs can casually cast aside a major public consultation. That can only get ugly. 
I think Greg Dyke is grossly underestimating the extent to which trust in BBC News has declined as a result of its absurd reporting on #Brexit and other issues in recent years. Its credibly has been permanently damaged. #ThePledge 
The Referendum in Okinawa tomorrow is critical for the whole world. People around the world are watching Okinawa and eagerly waiting for the results. Please vote! And please vote either yes or no. Voting undecided is not helpful, so please avoid that. 
Your opinion, not shared by many British Columbians who believe we have a shared responsibility to our Alberta neighbors and the rest of Canada. Let’s have a referendum, then we will really know if your opinion is shared by a majority in BC: 50% +1 vote. 
German economists are warning that a no deal Brexit could cost Germany 100,000 jobs. Were it to coincide with 25% tariffs by Trump on German car exports to the USA, the economic repercussions could be disastrous. 
The 'Wisdom' of Brexit.  
A disastrous day for the Lib Dems. Forget the pitiful gathering or inability to gather support on Brexit, it was use of "odious" that said so much. Crass, unprofessional, wholly inappropriate, and hinting at a party riddled with entitlement, raging against their own irrelevance. 
A bumper tax haul in January has given Hammond the biggest budget surplus ever recorded last month of £14.9 billion—much larger than the forecasts of £10 billion predicted by economists. Borrowing for this financial year is now the lowest for 17 years—despite Brexit of course. 
Does the newly formed Independent Group tell us that British politics is broken? Should there be by-elections? Has Brexit changed Westminster irreversibly? Would you vote for the rebels? So many questions! But have you got the answers? Join me from 1 on @LBC 
There are only 34 days left until  #BREXIT and #FREEDOM for #BRITAIN ! #StandUp4Brexit #LeaveMeansLeave #NoDeal #WTO 
And this is why the Uk is not a functioning democracy. Whatever you think of Brexit, leaders "changing course" without the will of the people is not actually democracy. 
I have been for #Brexit all my adult life. As #LabourSplit, Conservative MPs quit and America faces turmoil, it's clear the UK needs to take back control, press pause and leave when it suits us - not Moscow 
Brexit was, and is, nothing more than a Russian plot designed to divide and conquer Europe. 
So Corbyn is literally now going after @Anna_Soubry, a brave pro-European MP who has resigned from the Tories.Mr Brexit just doesn’t get it. Millions want to #Remain.So he is doing everything in his power to stop that from happening. Disgraceful.#StopBrexit 
I've thought long and hard about this.  Britain now needs to delay departure from the EU. As a committed #Brexit supporter, I recognise changing the course of our country requires deliberation, not acceleration.  
A people's vote is not the same thing as not delivering Brexit you very silly, intentionally misleading people. The Tories hashed Brexit, not Labour. People, if you are sick of the Tories chat rubbish while destroying everything they touch,  join Labour, for the many, not the few 
I think the MPs who will vote for Cooper recognise that. The end-game is just beginning. Party allegiances are fraying. New leaders are emerging. MPs will end up choosing between May's deal, a softer Brexit or PV - or Kyle's combo of May+PV  
If @unitetheunion have run any economic impact assessments then you will know that any Brexit reduces jobs and living standards.So where are they? Are you keeping them from your members or have you been too incompetent to run them?Let's have an answer @LenMcCluskey 
'@NickBoles wouldn't want you to RT! Here's #NickBoles in November 2016 telling Remainers "it isn't good enough to just say you accept the result" & calls for an end to #SingleMarket & #FreeMovement. Now he defies his constituents & wants to delay #Brexit!  
You’ll remember there was backing for the No campaign in the Irish abortion referendum from the American Conservative catholic right....and Kanto, Thomas Borwick’s company. (Vote Leave Chief Technical Officer, and consultant on the Cruz and trump Camapigns working with CA/SCL. 
To be more specific, AND the unlawful referendum was May's only reason for proceeding with Brexit, and then only BECAUSE the referendum was advisory. Had it been mandatory, it would have been annulled. AND May has been claiming that is was a mandate.Thus spoke the court. 
Omg he’s more angry with Anna Soubry than Brexit?!He’s not been to a single People’s Vote March. But has managed to organise a rally against one woman?!This just looks bitter and is so off target.I’m genuinely really confused.  
#Brexit is the greatest neo-liberal project of all time — a Trojan horse to strip us of our rights, shred public services and widen the gap between rich & poor still further. For our #families' sake, it must be stopped.#StandUp2Brexit #StayAndHaveASay #Family #Peace #Solidarity 
BBC ..As the Brexit meteorite prepares to hit, we talk to the Great British Dancing on ice bakeoff strictly Spitfire gardening Eastenders guru about her opinion on trans gender semetics or whatever. .....and now, the weather.... 
You even end with:“Brexit seeks a reclamation of something we have lost. The ability to stay put and care for each other”WE NEVER LOST THATYou can still bloody do that!And in my case -with my Brit-Slovene family - Free Movement has helped our family do just that... 
Truly extraordinary read, this. How the social atomization of much of British life can be laid at the door of the EU is beyond parody. The EU is a flawed creature, like all other works of Man - but the causes of the problems outlined here lie closer to home #Brexit @giles_fraser 
The EU have said they’ll extend A50 for “a democratic process”. Not to allow more time for this useless shower of a government to get its act together. It’s coming folks #PeoplesVote Brexit: Greg Clark, Amber Rudd and David Gauke issue delay warning  
If the political classes delay #Brexit they will be responsible for the storm that follows  
I should have been so pleased to welcome you to the end of my road. I'm sad to say that I'm not.Like you, @Greg4Broxtowe and @broxtowelabour have had  nothing of interest to say on #brexit. This labour voter fully supports @Anna_Soubry. 
I said this at the referendum count. I then set about working with others to deliver a Brexit that maintained our trading freedoms and protected our economy.But Theresa May drove us into this dead end and we have to deal with the realities of today, not 2016  
It’s not extremist nor right wing to deliver the manifesto we were voted in on and to defend democracy by delivering #Brexit it’s just the right thing to do.  
Government issues estimated €4 million tender to station vets at border posts post-Brexit 
A month to Brexit and you have cucumber Corbyn playing political games . With him in power we’ll be dressed in sacks selling parsnips on a street stall trading in pebbles  
It's bizarre that we have to spell it out, but the n°1 reason we Remainers are fighting this toxic #Brexit is because we care about our families - our blood relations, our local communities, the vulnerable in our society, our wider European family and beyond. #StayAndHaveASay 
Fucking fills my heart with pride when I see Irish women call out @AmnestyIreland for their disgraceful betrayal of women after the referendum. pic.twitter.com/fGFU7iyWxZ 
Farage should have always been in the Brexit negotiating team! Nigel Farage to POACH senior Tories from UNDER MAY’S NOSE for Brexit Party  
Remaining (temporarily) is better than No Deal."It would be better to extend Article 50 & delay Brexit departure rather than crash out of the European Union on March 29."Signed by three Cabinet Ministers. Is this government policy or has Cabinet responsibility been suspended?  
ie - you develop a straw man to whip up your fury — and that justifies a crash-out no-deal damaging Brexit that will hurt countless families and livelihoods— but none of that matters next to your petty rage over a George Osborne headline that needs to be punished.Values? 
35 days till a possible No Deal Brexit catastrofuck.Tories: “Let’s discuss the layout of the deckchairs on the Titanic” pic.twitter.com/lJDpfMWrHC 
Three senior ministers say it is clear that a majority of MPs will seek to delay Brexit in a bid to prevent a 'disastrous' no-deal 
You start with an anecdote about an unknown person’s misbehaviour - then link to Remain-voting George Osborne (this is enough to make the whole “attitude” associated with Remain)Then use this to invoke the need for a “a full-on Brexit – No Deal, please” to teach ‘em all. 
Government issues estimated €4 million tender to station vets at border posts post-Brexit, inc Irish border @https://jrnl.ie/4508898 
bit late for talking about combatting the far-right jez, you've helped enable them with your backing of Brexit and cowardly anti-immigrant rhetoric. congratulations. 
It isn't articulate. It stereotypes Remainers as rich, but also carers. Headline is cheap ad hominem. Three random, disconnected anecdotes. Misses the *really* obvious point of Brexit's impact on family reunion. More here. Why not share the opposing view?  
No. Honda, and its workforce were betrayed by brexit, and by association, you and corbyn.  
So far as Ive been able to ascertain, there is no case of a nation attaining independence where the process had any similarity to Brexit. 
Wolfpack owner David Argyle linked with move for another top 5 global star, waiting on confirmation of clean brexit from former club.  
And I bet the Brexit-blockers who funded this did not expect a result showing more Leavers than Remoaners are looking for a centre-ground party. Great news for the pro-Brexit @TheSDPUK 
"We’re going in to an era now where we have to be able to talk up principles and values we genuinely believe in and that’s what I think Brexit has brought about.”Lucy Harris director of Leavers of Britain @Lugey6 | @KirstyWark | #newsnight 
I had the honour of representing the #Labour party at dinner of European socialist leaders(including 6 PrimeMinisters) tonight at @PES_PSE Congress in Madrid as stand-in for @jeremycorbyn All happy to help if UK needs an extension to Art50 to reconsider #BrexitAll hope we will! 
UK Labour leader Corbyn says he could back a second Brexit referendum  
If you thought the @unitetheunion cared about your job, it doesn't.  Unite wants Brexit instead.If you thought @jeremycorbyn cared about your job, he doesn't.  Corbyn wants Brexit instead.Cut up your membership cards & hit Brexiters in their pocket where it hurts.#LetsGoWTF 
Last time I looked you were in Govt.May incapable over brexitGrayling incapable of anythingFox incapable of trade dealsJohnson losing £? on the Garden Bridge Hunt failing to get Germany to act as killers over Yemen (luckily)Williamson losing trade dealsHancock & #NHS? 
Now ONLINE |  In case you missed tonight’s Mother of All Talkshows you can listen again at any time! Featuring: TIG/Tony Blair, Labour/Tory Breakaway, Asian Markets, Brexit/WTO, Ask Adam Garrie, Shamima Begum, Fifth Column #MOATS Link:  
There is a centre-ground party for Leave voters it's the @TheSDPUK - the idea that Leavers can be co-opted by Chuka's and Anna's Brexit blocking party is ludicrous.They think they can treat leave voters like total mugs.  
Brexit: Amber Rudd, David Gauke and Greg Clarke issue delay warning  
Brexiteers must now hold their nerve against Remain's desperate last stand:  #Brexit 
In blowing up parliament #Brexit seems to be succeeding where Guy Fawkes failed.Ironic that the EU has succeeded in maintaining peace in Europe for so many decades yet appears the most divisive of all forces in Britain.Best we #StopBrexit & revert to peace.  #newsnight 
Tory ministers say they will rebel to stop no-deal Brexit  
The idea crosses the Brexit divide. Both Remainers (51%) and Leavers (53%) think that a new centre-ground party is needed. 
Don’t pretend car plant closures have nothing to do with Brexit | Letters  
AnnaDo you believe that there has been illegal Russian funding in Brexit campaigning, especially in the light of revelations today about the Salvini Putin Scandal.  Is it OK for ReesMogg to benefit from a £60m investment in Sperbank, controlled by Putin?#guestiontime 
Nine years and all you've done is wreck the country. The global economic crisis was not Labour's fault. The Brexit catastrophe is 100% yours. Own it.  
The Japanese warned they wouldn't stay if they couldn't manufacture cars profitably due to brexit.The betrayal has been from idiots like you who thought it was acceptable to play politics with people's livelihoods.  
I resigned from Unite 6 months ago and resigned from the Labour Party 18 months ago on the grounds that both were led by Brexit zealots. It just didn't square up. 
Here we have it. The courts have found not only that the 2016 EU Referendum was unlawful but also that @theresa_may knew this and proceeded with Brexit anyway.As things stand the course of UK and European history is being changed without a legitimate mandate.May is corrupt.  
Anna Soubry #guestiontime #isitok  that people are dying whilst waiting for benefits to be paid, to have  enough money to live on, whilst you politicians are messing about with  Brexit and internal schoolyard politics? 
Let's be 100% CLEAR. You seriously can't get 37% of the electorate to Vote Leave based on cheating and electoral fraud then claim a hard-won mandate as if its a victory for lofty democratic ideals. Aaron Banks and Co have greatly damaged the credibility of UK democracy. #brexit 
So far, ⁦@jeremycorbyn⁩ has played #Brexit (a Tory abomination) perfectly. Britain is on the verge of getting some decent leadership and a chance to revoke Article 50 while simultaneously burying Tories so deep they’ll be out of power for decades.   
Erm, guys...you do know you bribed the DUP and that means it’s ‘your go’. Between losing files on suspected paedophiles and making dodgy deals in exchange for pierages, not to mention entirely shafting every man woman and child in this country. Brexit is kinda your thing. Own it. 
I won't join a union whose leaders support #Brexit either. I was seriously considering joining Unite. Not any more. 
No10 response to @AmberRuddHR et al 'The fact these Ministers hold strong views on avoiding no deal is scarcely a secret.The PM is working hard to ensure we get a deal ..that allows us to deliver on the result of the referendum. That's where the Cabinet’s energy should be focused  
If @theresa_may delays brexit or backs down to remainers, the signs are that we are going to see our country go the same way as France. Everyone is talking about it and it’s scary. 
The UK has plenty of opportunities to thrive outside the EU’s jurisdiction:  #Brexit 
Did you vote leave for the promise of great new trade deals? Well, sadly the reality is very different .But know it's ok to change your mind when facts change, be a #Remainernow Demand a #PeoplesVote #FinalSay on #Brexit  
About time. And either Number 10 cleared it or collective government is now officially over. .... Brexit: Greg Clark, Amber Rudd and David Gauke issue delay warning - BBC News  
Whatever happened to a no deal brexit is always better than a bad deal brexit? Just get us out of the EU ffs! 
All this #Brexit business has got a bit out of hand if you ask me. There’s no majority for anything in parliament . Time for a #PeoplesVote @peoplesvote_uk 
New march for a People's Vote on Brexit receives £250,000 in matter of days  
Is this your shtick now? Cause people to lose their job because of Brexit so you can pretend to be outraged & fight for them back? Cause people to lose employment rights because of your Brexit so you can pretend to be outraged & fight for them back? People should exit your union. 
One of the most informed British voices in the Brexit debate - it’s a pity that they didn’t listen to Ivor Rogers a bit more #Brexit  
Reading this totally infuriated me today. It’s the engine room of what is behind Brexit: a drive to imprison people, particularly women. It’s grotesque. 
This is today's news of substance: 3x Cabinet rebels reject government policy on Brexit. No Deal is not going to happen.  
That's rich coming from a member of a UK Government that is increasingly dancing to Putin's tune on Brexit and undermining the EU. 
Work and Pensions Secretary Amber Rudd, Justice Secretary David Gauke and Business Secretary Greg Clark have written an article in the Daily Mail saying they will call on Prime Minister Theresa May to delay Brexit in order to stop the UK "crashing out with no deal" 
Unite members have not been betrayed by Honda, they’ve been betrayed by you and the pro Brexit labour comrades. 
Ministers vow to back Brexit delay to avoid no-deal, defying PM  
After pulverising our economic well-being and isolating us from the world, Brexit is moving inexorably with its real agenda, which is to dismantle every last remnant of a progressive society and impose the ultimate in reactionary authoritarianism. Apparently we voted for it. 
'Just jump!' Investment boss calls for Theresa May to ACCEPT no deal Brexit WILL happen  
Polls show 53-59% support for indy depending on the Brexit deal.  SNP have 59% of Scottish seats at Westminster. There's a pro indy majority at Holyrood. Polls show 57% of Scots want Indyref2 after Brexit. But there's "no appetite" for indy apparently.#DissolveTheUnion  
This plot for a second referendum is NOT a compromise - it is simply the central demand of the Remain campaign.  
So pleased to see this from @JohnCryerMP, chair of our Parliamentary Labour Party. An important step closer to Labour finally and fully backing a public vote on the Prime Minister’s Brexit proposals.  
 READ: Councils are despairing of Grayling’s latest... I’d normally say “you couldn’t make this up”, but this IS Chris Grayling after all.In @HuffPostUK: Government 'may have relied on Google Maps' to draw up no-deal Brexit port plans  
The real headline that you won’t see on TV:Wales would now vote to #Remain in the EU by a 10-point lead, latest poll shows.Remain: 55%Leave: 45%That’s a huge swing to Remain since the referendum.Write to your MP to demand they #StopBrexit. 
Really important letter from Chair of the PLP @JohnCryerMP. We have different views on the EU but we both recognise that the only way forward is to take any Brexit deal that gets through Parliament back to the people to be ratified or rejected.  
“Inching closer” to a #PeoplesVote is not good enough.There’s a month to go until Brexit.Unless Labour starts campaigning to #Remain and fast, millions of Remainers will never forgive the party. 
An informative and optimistic discussion with Spain's Prime Minister Pedro Sánchez. We talked about next week's Brexit votes in the UK parliament and Labour's alternative plan, as well as the upcoming Spanish elections and how we work together to combat the far right.  
The idea so beloved of EU supporters  that 'Brexit is a disaster' is misguided.  Firstly , Brexit has not even commenced. Secondly , any political turmoil is a result of the reluctance of the political establishment to implement the will of the people.  #brexit #Irexit 
"Let the people be the ones to accept or reject Mrs May's deal". @JohnCryerMP on why the public should have the final say on #Brexit  
There is absolutely no difference between the so-called confirmatory referendum and a second EU referendum. Both are designed for one purpose only - to frustrate Brexit. 
jin dancing at heathrow airport border control to convince them to let bts into the country after they close the borders bc of brexit  
Ireland has fast tracked Brexit contingency plans through their Parliament. When we did that the UK took us to court then shifted the goalposts to make it retrospectively illegal. Is the penny dropping yet? WM drags us down at every turn. #scotref 
David lammy is a self obsessed man who is always repeating himself. I really hope he resigns from Parliament. We have no place for people who want to destroy democracy by yet stopping Brexit and just going on about things what doesn’t exists. Does he live in a fantasy? 
Senior Conservatives say Theresa May should give way to new leader for next phase of Brexit. I agree, it's time for a Brexiteer Prime Minister.  
of all the people who are disappointed with Labour over Brexit, there is literally not one person who would consider the solution to be joining the Tories lmao good god read the room 
I will never ever ever forgive @jeremycorbyn for not opposing Brexit. 
I said this on @novaramedia a few months ago. Ultimately it’s the only way we can have democratic closure on the issue of Brexit. A referendum on a deal negotiated by a Labour government.  
Mr Corbyn — you’ve definitely lost the plot. You’re the opposition, you’re supposed to be battling the Tories, not going after an independent MP who opposes Brexit (which any normal opposition leader would do). @jeremycorbyn @UKLabour @annasoubrymp 
Brexit is what's betraying Swindon #Honda workers + causing car manufacturers to leave. 
Today I got an email from a customer asking to move their business from the uk to the EU The email said “ I want my stuff moved before brexit - sometime in the middle of March “ As boris said : fuck  business 
Brexit may be playing it's part but many people are also looking at the safety of their families when choosing where to go on holiday. Many places in Europe are effectively no go zones. This isn't because of Brexit but because of the insanity of the EU, importing 3rd Worlders.  
Wow.  Another subgroup of Leave voters.Our exit poll of 3,242 UK adults, commissioned by Linda Woodhead immediately after the referendum, shows that exactly 66% of the Anglicans in England who cast a vote, voted to leave the EU.Catholic 55%. Leave  
Brussels in Panic Fearing more EU members will Leave"71% of Greeks want to Leave EU & 68% believe 'things are going in the wrong direction' in #EUIn Italy, they’ve got a left-wing party & a right-wing party BOTH wanting to Leave in an alliance."#Brexit 
Hmmmmm Ill take Scottish independence thanks! #Brexit #indyref2 #DissolveTheUnion 
Significant intervention from Leave-voting chair of PLP... recognises @peterkyle @MPphilwilson amendment could help break #Brexit deadlock & bring people together  
I was a huge supporter of a #PeoplesVote. I thought it was the most democratic solution to this #Brexit mess. And it probably is! But, why prolong the inevitable when there is a cleaner and more immediate solution. Let's just #RevokeArticle50 now and get on with our lives. 
Corbyn/Milne/McCluskey/Murray - My belief is that they are a pro-Kremlin axis at the top of the Labour movement and they will do anything, even destroying Labour at the polls, in order to deliver the Brexit Putin craves. I very much hope I'm proven wrong. 
"THREE Cabinet ministers go public with their threat to delay Brexit if Tory hardliners vote down Theresa May’s plan for a new EU deal"These ministers aren't going rogue, TM is behind thisAll designed to strong arm Brexit MPs into voting for her deal  
So you're happy that a hostile foreign state interfered with something as important as the Brexit referendum? Very patriotic. 
The so called 'liberal democrats', are some of the nastiest, intolerant, deceitful and mendacious individuals, I have ever came across.  As Anna Soubry said recently, in a context which was supposed to be flattering, "They're just like orange Conservatives".  #Brexit #Indyref2 
Mr Corbyn the UK is facing a national Brexit crisis & you are trotting down to Broxtowe to chase after the seat of a brave female MP who has singlehandedly shown more opposition to the Tory Government this week than you have in your entire time as Labour leader. Pathetic #TIG 
I’ve thought for ages that the European elections are the other big complicated Brexit nightmare nobody’s talking about, so here’s @IanDunt saying that, but with a far better understanding of the situation than I’ll ever have 
Honda closure. Several factors appear to be behind the decision &, apart from a very slight nod towards current uncertainty, Brexit was NOT among them. However, the EU definitely IS, having just signed a FTA with Japan, rendering UK production obsolete. 
Please see an open letter to my constituents, explaining why I intend to vote for the Kyle/Wilson amendment on #Brexit.  
Many European banks own stakes in Turkish lenders or made loans to Turkish companies. As the lira plummets, it becomes less likely these borrowers can afford to pay back these loans. The defaults could severely impact the EU/Eurozone. Brexit will be a sideshow...just watch. 
Breaking - three Cabinet ministers go public with their threat to vote for a Brexit delay if Tory hardliners block PM’s new EU deal; 
Regardless of Brexit happening or not the UK has shown itself to be reckless and flakey to say least, therefore an independence referendum for Scotland is required and @theSNP will have to use the mandate for #Indyref2. (Note #Indyref2 is only ref with a mandate too); 
Theresa may handling brexit  
No mention yet of the fact the referendum has been found to be legally flawed, and if it had been legally binding, the EC would have to declare it void #bbcaq 
Are the Independent group going to push for answers as to why a fraudulent referendum stands, on a technicality, because it was advisory? Had it been mandatory the result would be voided. @theresa_may is going ahead with a result she accepts was won through criminality 
Wait, what?Govt 'may have relied on Google Maps' to draw up No-Deal Brexit port plans... 
With more Brexit votes in Parliament next week, what path do you think MPs should take?How would you answer Mike's question? We may use your comments.#bbcaq 
Any Conservative MP who votes for deferring Brexit should be deselected. Let the Government collapse if necessary. The anti-democratic MPs will be voted out at the subsequent election. This is now about upholding democracy more than it is about Brexit.  
Seems Ireland has more of a relationship with USA than the UK has ... looks like Ancestry beats "special"  #Brexit 
How can May be impartial when her husband will make huge £££ from brexit? Also how is this not insider trading?! Do they never talk about work? Same with Mogg. Even if you make the huge leap that they are honest, they have a massive incentive to cause disruption  
BloggedFamily values and BrexitA reply to Giles Fraser:  
Honda have been betrayed by Brexit and those who support it.Consequently so have the workers. #StopBrexit 
Postponing Brexit day would stave off the threat of no deal but prolong the country's limbo  
as I suspected ... which means that Brexit is now Some of England vs the Other Three Nations ..  
Childrens 'BREXIT IS BONKERS' StickersWe recognise that a kiddies party might not be the best place for Bollocks to brexit stickers.... but these are perfect for even the youngest children. Order yours now. Profits go back in to fighting brexit #FBPE 
US Congress will not support trade deal with UK that undermines open border - Varadkarvia @IrishTimes #brexit 
LOL. No one apart from the (wealthy, criminal) Disaster Capitalists really wants to deliver Brexit.They just don't want the blame for not delivering it. 
Wales voted leave in 2016, but the latest @YouGov shows its now significantly #remainernow as more and more people realise that #Brexit  is not in their interests and they become #remainernow.Respect to them, it's ok to change your mind. (Source - ) 
BREAKING: Wales backs #Remain with 10-point lead over #Brexit, new poll shows.Time to give the people the #FinalSay.#peoplesvote @peoplesvote_uk 
This won’t work - there has to be a straight option for the public to stop Brexit. But if it gets Jeremy into referendum terrain, ok as as a rite of passage  
I imagine Nicola has been cheered up by the Brexit negotiations, I certainly have. Nicola will be negotiating with the same bunch who have proved so useless in Brexit. Scotland will end up with the border at Hadrian's Wall & the rUK will think it a victory if they keep Newcastle.  
Betrayed by @uklabourFB, your support of brexit & the lexiter MPs who voted with the Tories twice - saving the Tories from defeat. ANY brexit loses jobs - even the gov’s own figures show that. Where’s our #PeoplesVote to #remain? 
A prosecution against Boris Johnson for the “lies” told during the EU referendum campaign has taken a step closer after legal papers were lodged. 
Barbara voted leave in 2016, like many it was as a protest against @David_Cameron. However, she now thinks we now need to listen to business about the damage #brexit is & will cause. She is a #remainernow & wants us to think of our kids & have a #PeoplesVote Cc @Devon4Europe 
If you love Brexit then you hate #Honda #Swindon workers. Which bit of that do you, @unitetheunion and the pro Brexit Swindon and Wiltshire MPs not understand? You’ve sold out your members and you’ve betrayed UK manufacturing. Luckily @Swindon4EU are fighting for @Honda workers. 
Ever since I criticised Jeremy Corbyn’s approach to Brexit, I have been subjected to a flow of abuse from certain Corbyn supporters. I’m pretty apathetic to it, but, perhaps they should have a word with themselves. They are vindicating the claims of militant bullying. 
Oh god I'm so sad about Brexit, more so than ever before after living communally with Europeans from all over on this holiday. What a total shame, to have been lucky enough to be part of this, and for the UK to turn its back. I won't ever forgive those who voted for it. 
I've just read the Giles Fraser piece. Christ on a bike. The man is literally arguing that Brexit will be good for family values because it will force people to stay at home & wipe their parent's arses! No Deal Anglican 'socialists' are proper mad cunts. They are Puritan nutcases 
Theresa May must promise to delay Brexit next week or risk being forced into it by a revolt in Parliament  
My dad, who served in the UK forces as it happens, asked me whether there’s a growing anti-Irish sentiment over Brexit. Nah, I said. Turns out, I might be wrong.  
Labour are deliberately targeting a leading Remainer who isn’t a member of the governing party. They couldn’t make it any clearer that their priority is to deliver Brexit and not to force a general election. Even the Tories aren’t targeting Remainers. You can’t trust Labour.  
Obsessive Remainers invariably characterize themselves as exasperated adults, the only mature cohort left in politics, shouting into the wind like King Lear. Everyone opposed to reversing the referendum result is cast as a knuckle-dragging clod. 
Any #Leavers out there care to provide examples of the benefits #Brexit will bring to them and their families in a tangible, measurable way. Something they'll be able to show the whole world on the 30th March 2019. 
Government 'may have relied on Google Maps' to draw up no-deal Brexit port plans.Plans described as "simplistic".With Grayling involved, surely nobody can be surprised. 
Putin's dirty deals:After #DarkMoney for Brexit (UK), Le Pen (F) & Trump (US), next in line is #Salvini (IT).The Kremlin's ultimate goal: undermining our democracies.High time to update electoral laws & start #DefendingDemocracy !#EUelections2019 
Behind the headline chart there’s a HUGELY significant 10-point Remain lead in the latest Wales YouGov poll. A massive shift since June 2016 and the biggest ever Remain lead since well before the referendum. “Will of the People” this is not.  
People who voted remain are equally angry, especially since Leave cheated and acted illegally during the referendum campaign. The activity of Russia and the US Alt-right *must* be investigated. Don't underestimate the sense of injustice or the rage that Remainers feel. 
Theresa May will consider axeing the Human Rights Act after Brexit, a minister has revealed. The government will decide once “the process of leaving the EU concludes”, a letter to a parliamentary inquiry says. 
TERRY CHRISTIAN: Your firm’s making cuts? Sack the Brexit voters first  
Yes, your members have been betrayed by you and Corbyn pushing for Brexit. I hope they soon realise they have been sold down the river 
Speaking at the Good Friday Agreement Committee in Leinster House, Sinn Féin MP @ElishaMcC_SF the people of Ireland did not vote for Brexit & the Irish government have a responsibility to uphold the Good Friday Agreement in its entirety, & that includes the principle of consent.  
Whenever you are ready... Fed up watching the Torries absolutely destroy the UK.  @NicolaSturgeon @theSNP #IndyRef2 #Indyref #Scotland #brexit #IndyRefNow 
Worried about your #health? With  #Brexit coming, you should be: (via @NHSvBrexit) 
For this violation of our constitution Theresa May and her Cabinet ministers must be put in jail. What they are orchestrating is a partial coup, and it must be treated as such. There is no place in our constitution for a huge change like Brexit being grounded in electoral crime. 
Jo Swinson. A walking political dichotomy that believes in a "peoples vote" and democracy for everyone..........except Scotland. Pushing for a second vote on #brexit while simultaneously arguing against the democratic right of Scotland to do the same on Independence. #Hypocrite. pic.twitter.com/ySNzpQxLNW 
Problem with this of course is that it presupposes Labour negotiating a form of Brexit and then what happens in the ensuing people’s vote? Do they back their own negotiation.. or argue against it?Still - I haven’t heard Corbyn say this in this way before...feeling TIG pressure? 
I enjoy watching France 24's English service and pleased to see them emphasise Scotland didn't vote for Brexit and Nicola Sturgeon talking up the 'auld alliance'.  
After Britain, the country with the most to lose as a result of a no-deal Brexit would be Ireland   
Well, this is interesting isn’t it. The stench of corruption around #Brexit gets worse with every passing day#StopBrexit #RevokeA50 
The Tories used to claim to be competent on business. This Govt’s awful handling of #Brexit has destroyed their claim, losing the support of parliament & the public.Now they’ll be known as the party to crash the country out of the #EU, forgetting to pack emergency parachutes. 
1 thing Brexit has rammed home is that millions think that ppl like me - 1st gen mixed, immigrant parent(s) & all variants - shouldn’t exist bc ‘immigration is bad’, but that these morons are too stupid to twig that we’re all descendants of immigrants GIVE ME STRENGTH   
Had a few lagers, so:. You’re not stupid for voting Brexit. If the promises could be kept, it’d be worth a go. However, if you’re still stood there shouting BREXIT MEANS BREXIT knowing full-well it’ll cripple the country, you are a honking dafty. Thick as mince. Pure Grimsby. 
This is a critical initiative, however Brexit ends.  
Wow is this really your choice -labour tribalism over stopping THE most damaging policy - #brexit - for all the people you profess to care about the most.  How many other potential voters are you trying to deliberately alienate whilst you are at it?  
Like a Mafia gang with expensive lawyers the government has cynically exploited a loophole in the law. Our Constitution is riddled with such loopholes which we have trusted governments not to exploit. That trust has been shattered & with it our constitution.#PeoplesVote #Brexit  
English translation: EU is running scared. A No Deal WTO Brexit would shakeup EU control to its core. Other nations would queue up to follow  lead in taking back control.EU ready to use Corbyn to hoodwink UK with meaningless tweaks to political declaration.  
#brexit No they don't!!! People want a proper Brexit, NO customs union NO single market, a clean break.We want our country back 
Ben Jennings on the Tory and Labour defectors joining the Independent Group #tiggers #Conservatives #IndependentGroup #Brexit #LabourSplit #TheresaMay - political cartoon gallery in London  
Just heard @jeremycorbyn on @SkyNews saying Labour is considering putting their Brexit plan to a public vote. How the heck can they do that? There’s only one Brexit plan on the table. Time to back the @peterkyle amendment before it’s too late! 
A Labour Brexit Deal? Does this fool mean after an election? The only Remainers still buying this line are the same people who send bank account numbers to the Nigerian Prince via email.  
You are never going to win a GE. But you are going to transform communities - for the worse - by facilitating Brexit. #JC4P45 
Well, this seems pretty significant. Jeremy Corbyn tells @lewis_goodall that a Labour government could re-negotiate the Brexit deal and then put it to a referendum.  
Bradshaw made the point today on Radio 4 that failing to uphold the policy to call for a second referendum will lead to a flood of people leaving Labour - he does seem to think Corbyn will uphold it. 
He can’t join Independent  group because glue that binds defectors is blocking Brexit. He backs  Leave and is in Leave constituency  
I wonder if those MP’s trying to stop us Leaving the EU on March 29th and ignoring the referendum realise just how angry people are away from Westminster and the London media @LabourLeave 
Jeremy Corbyn showing his true colours, by attacking Soubry rather than May. He wants #Brexit and he will trample all over the overwhelming majority of Labour members and voters in order to get it. #PeoplesVote 
Brexit has affected many people's  sense of identity & belonging.Thousands of EU citizens who thought the UK was their home have lost that sense of security & are taking stock if they still want to live in a country that has become more hostile towards them. #InLimbo #InLimboToo 
.@DUPleader Arlene Foster has called for 'continued neighbourliness' after #Brexit. She was speaking at an event in Leitrim with Minister for Transport @Shane_RossTD |  
#Brexit broke the Tories #Brexit broke Labour #Brexit broke Democracy #Brexit broke Britain 
Corbyn is making it ever clearer that he wants #Brexit. He is standing on a #Brexit mountain of right-wing lies, hate, crime and chicanery and is striving to obtain a #Brexit which will harm the poorest and most vulnerable only a bit less than May's deal. 
' Because for all their stand up and fight rhetoric , when it comes to Brexit all Corbyn is is wishy washy crap same for the other mediocrities surrounding him.I wish he'd take his £3 Islington hippies and do one, He had a chance he's ****d it, a chance of socialist labour blown 
' never mind the rallies , start being an actual opposition and stop brexit 
1) To the numerous corbynites attacking @TheIndGroup on austerity etc#brexit is 35 days awayWhat happened 5 years ago is irrelevant right nowYou're not defending the vulnerable, the NHS, Labour voters You're defending Corbyn, so you don't actually care about any of the above 
Legal papers lodged against Boris Johnson for lies told during EU referendum  
A shit argument for Brexit  pic.twitter.com/OrbwYT5E5m 
I hope you will join me on 29 March for a @petriefriends lecture at the @UCLarchaeology. I will discuss mummies at the Musée du Louvre in the nineteenth century and some contemporary perspectives on French mummy studies. Also, free wine (on Brexit day), what could be better?  
Jeremy Corbyn tells ⁦@Lewis_goodall⁩ Labour is considering a policy where it would put its own Brexit deal to the public in another referendum  
Ruling out No Deal would be a national humiliation and disaster. It would mean the EU could wipe us out in the negotiations. If the Government did this it would be a Brexit betrayal and against the national interest. 
“Let us not break faith with the British people by trying to stage another referendum,.. which would do irreparable damage to the integrity of our politics, because it would say to millions who trusted in democracy, that our democracy does not deliver."PM Theresa May Dec 2018.  
In an exclusive interview, @jeremycorbyn tells me: - there is no “widespread culture of bullying” in Labour and he’d be “talking to @tom_watson” about his claim that there is.-he didn’t try and persuade MPs to stay- he’s considering putting a Lab Brexit deal to a referendum.  
The Economist built a demographic model to calculate an individual’s probable attitude to each of three possible Brexit options  
Umunna's chief upset with #Brexit is that he's so wonderfully bland and so beautifully tailored to pre-2016 politics, he had every chance of one day becoming a senior politician, perhaps in PM, making him the UK's own Obama figure. Instead he finds he is near universally despised  
One of the leaflets that Sophie Scholl and her brother Hans were executed for distributing foresaw the European Union as a force for peace in Europe after the defeat of the Nazis.Which is exactly what is has proved to be.#Brexit #StopBrexit #PutItToThePeople #PeoplesVote 
Brexit can, and must, be stopped. It’s time now for hard work and real actionWe need every single one of you to join our fightWe need you to come on the Put It To The People march next month and make our voices heard 
Someone's trying really, really hard to hold Boris Johnson to account for his referendum lies. I'd be amazed if it works, but I'm keeping everything crossed that it will.  
The poor little rich boy is faking astonishment as is Irish resident, Guido. She said she’d try to “ make the best of Brexit.” Having watched a two year cluster fuck which won’t make Zac head for a food bank she’s changed her approach. Plenty have. Remain now 10% ahead, say some 
One for brexit voting snowfalkes whining about being made redundant first by their employers due to the down turn and weak pound caused by brexit . The moral case is clear , don't invite others to own the consequences of your choices, first you must own them. 
BIG problem for #TheIndependentGroup saying they won't restand in any by-elections is they sound an awful lot like Brexiteers refusing a second referendum... 
Opposition leader?Zero opposition and arguably less than zero leadership. "Tory stooge" would be closer to the mark - I can't think of one Tory MP who has single-handedly done more to deliver Brexit or to ensure the Tories will win the next GE than St Jeremy! 
Well said Keith. Khan is not responsible for #brexit but he is responsible for all the things going wrong in London. He should concentrate on his day job!!  
Bright days await us after a no-deal Brexit, as long as we keep preparing for it  
Brexit has made Britain fear defeat or retribution on the world stage. Britain now champions fewer, less difficult causes at the UN  
Please, all my followers, link in any people/groups nearby this event, in the comments, we need a counter demonstration on this. Corbyn, determined to deliver Brexit.  
Listening to @Jacob_Rees_Mogg on @LBC on my commute home from my financial services job in Leeds. An industry that is leaving the UK in droves. I would be interested to know how his Brexit would protect my job, bearing in mind he has moved all his money out of the UK. 
I see Alex Massie is already trying to blame No-Deal Brexit on @theSNP. That wasn't at all predictable.  
Anyone else baffled? If the #Referendum had been legally binding it could have been challenged but because it wasn't, it can't be. Yet the outcome of the flawed poll will be imposed. Help! Might the Strasbourg Court come to the rescue?    via @brexit_sham 
I’m really proud of the leadership my friend @peterkyle has been showing - on Brexit and on this. One of the smartest, most decent and principled people I know. On this, and so many other things, he speaks from the heart and speaks for me.  
#Brexit is a Dog's Dinner - and a Cat-astrophe for. So come and bark out on Sunday 3rd March at Parliament with #Wooferendum:  #peoplesvote #stopbrexit 
It's vital to understand that, at every stage of Brexit, the default outcome is the catastrophe of no-deal, because by definition we're starting without a deal, and have to negotiate one.If the deadline passes, it's too late, like hooking the tripwire of a landmine. And boom! 
12. Just think about that number for a second. Out of over 600 MPs in the House of Commons, only 12 are willing to back the 52% of us who voted to Leave. Only 12 support the 17.4 million of us.Politics really is broken. Who do these people claim to serve..?!?#Brexit #NoDeal 
CCTV footage of me and my Brexit binders has been leaked from the BBC Brussels bureau.  
Previously forced to perform in a circus , Vigo and Kumba are currently at a rescue centre in Alicante, Spain before heading to @IsleofWight_Zoo before Brexit can thwart plans . Read the story here and please help raise funds to get them here if you can :  
#bbcpm Poor journalism. Why is Marcus Fysh not challenged when he says "the referendum result was very clear"? 51.89% of the 72.2% who were allowed to vote and did so was a marginal victory 3 years ago in a flawed, advisory poll, financed by illegal donations and won with lies.  
“It’s time for an honest conversation about what’s wrong with this country, which can bring together all sides of the Brexit debate".#FFS supporter @jamielewis016 joins @bphillipsonMP & others at the #PeoplesVoice event tomorrow! @peoplesvote_uk  #FFS 
Join us on the @UKLabour bloc on 23 March to march on Westminster to demand a public vote on Brexit vs our EU membership. Sign up here:  Donate to support the march here:  
No, no, no! No deal is the default option. It’s the only thing we have left to stop you and other remainer MPs from frustrating Brexit. Your agenda is not about unity and delivering what ppl voted for. It’s remain by another name.  
We've spent nearly 3yrs obsessed with Brexit, on top of 4yrs consumed by the issue of independence.All this energy wasted on ideologically-driven crusades against our neighbours@LibDems have always said that Scotland's better off in the UK & the UK is better off in the EU. 
exactly. i wouldn't want her as PM, and i resent being put in a position where we have to choose between a pro-Brexit Labour party and a pro-EU Tory. Brexit would damage us for a generation, Tories can be voted out in 5 years or less. 
Tory ministers' secret No Deal Brexit plot to slash tariffs on imports would be devastating for the UK ceramics sector. @GMB_union#StopZeroTariffs 
Post #brexit you do realise that the wealthy will still have freedom of movement.It will be just plebs like us that don't. #stopbrexit NOW 
Hi @Conservatives why do you think a #PeoplesVote would not deliver brexit?It's almost as if you know that that the UK is #remainernow and your government's terrible brexit deal will be rejected or something?Surely, if it is what the people voted for, it will be endorsed?  
Fake news abounds on Brexit and the Russians , there will be a lot of humble pie to be eaten all round !  
It is outrageous that, due to Cameron setting is as an advisory referendum not binding, @theresa_may and @Conservatives can ignore the proven dodgy dealings by Leave and dark money skulduggery. How can any of us have any pride in the U.K. after this farce?#PutItToThePeople 
Irish politicians are trying to play hardball with the UK over Brexit.All strings being pulled by Brussels. Be careful, if they are willing to try and destroy a net contributing country like the UK it wouldn't hesitate to throw a tiny country like Ireland under a bus either 
Think of it in football terms. In the first half a brave real Labour team played a blinder on anti-semitism. In the second half there was a pitch invasion by a bunch of showboating fanatical anti-Brexit Tories, ruining it for everyone else. Sick as a parrot, basically.  
So you are mobilising your energy to try and unseat one of the few people fighting tooth & nail to stop this country heading down the road of a Brexit disaster. You are pathetic, no wonder the Labour Party is dieing under your watch. #brexit #corbyn 
We were told today on Jeremy Vine show on Radio 2 today that  Margaret Thatcher disliked referendums. News flash. Most politicians don't like them because they hate giving power to the people.The referendum was held. It cannot be undone. It's legacy will remain. We are leaving. 
Don't miss #marr this SundayEnvironment Secretary @michaelgove Labour Deputy Leader @tom_watson@TheIndGroup MPs @heidiallen75 & @lucianaberger@KelseyGrammer talks #Brexit & @LaManchaLDNPlus all the Sunday news w/ @Kevin_Maguire & Amanda PlatellBBC One, 10am 
Wow! Brexiters are insisting that Theresa May step down within 3 months so they can install a hardliner (paraphrased) to oversee the next phase of Brexit. But that means if MPs enable TM's deal, we face catastrophe all over again, with no way to stop it because we're already out.  
"it is possible to find a way through this, of course it’s challenging, of course there are difficulties but there is a solution."Foreign Secretary @Jeremy_Hunt has visited European capitals this week to press for progress on #Brexit negotiations  
What a cheek #BrexitChaos is Tory responsibility@theresa_may spent 2 years prevaricating, Brexit Secretary @DavidDavisMP 'forgot' having zero impact assessments,  @DominicRaab voted against what he negotiated whileChris Grayling did deal for non-existent ferries etc etc etc 
DEVELOPING: Theresa May must resign as British prime minister and Conservative leader later this year after delivering Brexit, according to politicians at the highest levels of her own government  
A British parliamentary committee lays out proof that Facebook was used to surreptitiously influence the Brexit vote:  
Astounding that there has still been no mention of Honda closure affecting 10,000 in the supply chain and their families by the PM or any ref at PMQs by Corbyn. It’s all about self preservation & self interest now in the face of #Brexit disaster #FBPE 
BREXIT HAVE YOU HAD ENOUGHOne thing for sure with brexi, t the quickest way to get it over with is to demand a peoples vote and then vote to remain.   ALL other options incl WTO mean years of negotiations and the country standing still on everything else as per last 2.5yrs 
Bright days await us after a no-deal Brexit, as long as we keep preparing for it - The Telegraph  
Brexit, the collapse of the Labour Party and the formation of this new elitist, anti-democratic group, presents the Conservatives with the opportunity to be a champion for British national and cultural identity, democracy and independent self-government. 
Last time I looked we were not living in a dictatorship. How is it possible for May or anybody else to suppress investigations into potential criminal offences committed in connection with the referendum?#RevokeA50 
Milan Brglez,former president of the Slovenian parliament:“The British foreign minister comes to Slovenia asking us for a favour(to discuss with the foreign minister how to avoid a no-deal Brexit)while arrogantly insulting us. We were never a 'vassal state of the Soviet Union'." 
We really do have some outstanding civil servantsThese 3 articles are an excellent companion to a further reading of the Withdrawal Agreement and Political Declaration as we #Brexit  
Yesterday Jeremy Hunt was in Slovenia,one of his stops on the Brexit stalking tourncharm offensive.He was at his most charming:  he saidused to be a vassal state of the Soviet Union. Add to the long list of pissed off countries! #brexit 
There’s been a lot of coverage in the news today about our #ThisIsYourHomeToo campaign to reassure non-UK EU citizens dealing with the uncertainty of Brexit. We’d like to tell you a bit more about it...  
With #Brexit looming, there's a new type of German in town: They like milk in their tea and don't leave the pub till it closes.@ConnollyBerlin, @KBrady90 and @JonWorth join @DamienMcGuin on #DWStammtisch as they swap their scones for sauerkraut.  
Astonishing the modellers of that data have been passed off as “a group of west coast American academics” and astrophysicists when we all know they were based much closer to home, a fact an inquiry could establish, along with what they did and what those at 'Catbrain Lane' did. 
Sorry, I just can’t laugh this off. What he wrote is vile and cruel on many counts, and the fact he came out with this horrible, hurtful stuff just to stan for his disastrous Brexit is the icing on the shit cake. I’ve blocked him now. 
The Conservative National Convention - the supreme body of its voluntary wing - meets tomorrow. Its members are likely to approve a plan to reject any delay to Brexit: a warning shot to MPs ahead of the next vote on Cooper.  
No ifs, no buts, no second referendum: MPs like Peter Kyle were very clear during the referendum that if people voted to leave, we would leave. #RightTheFirstTime 
EU’s Barnier 'more concerned than ever’ about no deal BrexitWhose fault is it, Barnier!  
"Three weeks lost, for no reason and to no advantage. Just five to go. And the government quietly admits that it has completely failed to do what it set out to do." @IanDunt on why there is no DExEU Machina coming to save Brexit.   
Let's deal with real problems facing Kenyans; NOT a referendum that selfish politicians intend to use to steal billions of public money that should be spent on job creation for the youth who earn nothing, live in slums, but must scavenge to pay exorbitantly on basic needs. 
DUP leader Arlene Foster wants to see the border remain open, but in a situation where Northern Ireland is outside the EU and the Republic of Ireland is staying in. #brexit  
Our ⁦@Adamstoon1⁩ ⁦@EveningStandard⁩ as PM considers Brexit delay  
Putin's Playbook?1. Secret Moscow Tower deal with Trump, 2016 USA (@JasonLeopold @a_cormier_)2. Russia’s secret gold deal with Arron Banks, Brexit vote (@lukeharding1968)3. Russian bank's loan to Marine Le Pen’s party, French presidential race (@PaulSonne) Now this 
Brexit & why the Japanese are disinventing from Britain. My ⁦@TheNewEuropean⁩ column 
Confirmed line-up of great speakers Transforming Britain After Brexit, 5 March:@C_Lapavitsas Kim Bryan (SLP)@EddieDempsey Martin Hall (@counterfireorg) @DrLeeJones Phil Whyman (UCLAN)Tickets: More dates in Coventry Livpool Durham#LeftBrexitTour 
I'm dimly aware that only a dozen people will ever read this, but as someone with some inside knowledge of the car industry I think it's very important to explain in some detail why #Brexit MUST have been a factor in the closure of #Honda's Swindon plant 
As much as I’d love them to be they literally can’t deliver Brexit while you bunch of incompetent power drunk fools are at the wheel of this country. However if you’re offering to hand over the keys and fuck off then I’d be happy with that. 
Can’t believe Mayor has cancelled all staff leave because if Brexit  
As Google launches its new recruitment tool in the UK, with Brexit only a month away, its head says "the UK is no doubt a very, very attractive market for us." #BackBritain 
I've tweeted this previously and make no apologies for doing so today, or tomorrow, the day after that and every day  from then on until the result of the referendum is respected. A reminder that #17.4millionbetrayedPlease retweet if you feel the same, thank you  
"Judges have confirmed categorically that had the vote been mandatory the referendum would have been quashed."So the government is thereby proven to be acting outside the law...   
Hopeless. Labour STILL talking about POSSIBLY implementing a conference policy made a year ago.We’re a month from Brexit.We need action now to campaign to #Remain. Millions of Remainers will not forgive Labour for stringing us along for so long. 
To all Conservative MPs looking to block No Deal:We know what you are doing. We know you are trying to stop Brexit, full stop. May won't get the EU to move on the Backstop without the threat of No Deal.We members are watching. You WILL pay in the polling booths.#Cooperboles 
EU rules out Brexit 'deal in the desert' on upcoming Theresa May summit trip.Seems an appropriate place to go to stick your head in the sand. 
Sadly, based on our conversations in Westminster, there more than a grain of truth in this...#brexit #Betrayal 
Just been contacted by my car insurers telling me if there is a No Deal Brexit I will need a "Green Card" if I want to take my car outside the UK after March 29th. If I don't have one I may not be allowed entry to my destination.... Here we bloody well go. #totalfuckup 
Anyone seen all the media coverage for the important @UKEUchallenge case in the court of appeal yesterday? Or the MPs speaking out about the outrageous decision to just ignore a rotten referendum result because we've started so we'll finish? No, me neither.@BremainInSpain 
Bankside Commercial has today filed a request for summons at Westminster Magistrates' Court on behalf of @MarcusJBall and Brexit Justice Ltd. Boris Johnson MP: Private Prosecution Press Statement #privateprosecution #brexitjusticeltd 
Theresa May's withdrawal treaty is not brexitIt keeps us locked into the EU, and paying them billions. Whatever way they dress it up, it is a wolf in sheep's clothingIt is a remainer's deal for remainers@Conservatives voting for this are voting for the end of the Tory party 
Brexit, Scottish Independence and Leaving a Union - Lessons to Learn? Timely report by the Scottish Centre on European Relations @SCER_eu @KirstyS_Hughes 
REVEALED: 100 Tory MPs warn they could force Theresa May to delay Brexit /#EU #Brexit #PeoplesVote #FinalSay 
Are you rightly appalled by the current state of the Labour Party?Do you believe that the wishes of the British people in 2016 referendum result should be supported and respected? If yes to both then come and talk to us at the SDP -the kettle is on!  
This is no cause for gloating but it provides the broader context which is so often missing in the media’s Brexit-obsessed coverage of the UK’s economic performance  
This "#Brexit doesn't benefit me, it doesn't benefit my friends and it doesn't benefit my family."Daniel is at university in Nottingham and in March he'll be marching at the #PutItToThePeople march to demand a #PeoplesVote on the #Brexit deal. Join him:  
"Like all Brexit options, the Norway model is far from perfect. But it'd clear away a whole gallery of disruptions raising concerns in the NHS. It'd be nice to see considerations like this come to the fore." Health experts @NuffieldTrust #CommonMarket2.0 
If we had a second Referendum tomorrow how would you vote? Just interested to see if there has been any dramatic shift, bearing in mind all the shenanigans of the last couple of years. 
In preparation for Brexit Fray Bentos have released the grenade versions of its pies to compliment the traditional and familiar flatter land mine version. Get stocked up before @Coldwar_Steve fills his subterranean mansion with them. 
#BREAKING: Federal Reserve warns that #Brexit and trade tensions pose dual risks to the US economy  
W4EU’s @LPrivileged has put together a letter asking Theresa May to #RevoleA50If you or your group would like to add your name, you can do it here:We won’t keep your data or pass it on. All we care about is stopping Brexit Pls sign and RT xx 
And now we get to the heart of what Brexit is really about.  Axing the Human Rights Act.  Axing employee protections.  Axing consumer protections.  Lowering standards.  #PeoplesVote 
Andrew Percy told the BBC more than 30 Tory MPs may try to block no deal.  Good.  Because with Tosser May still refusing to rule the disaster that is no deal Brexit out, our Mr Corbyn needs any and all the help that he can get. 
Exclusive: The Independent Group could prop up Theresa May's government in return for a referendum on her deal  
That article by Giles Fraser is trending, claiming amongst other things that pro-EU people don’t talk about family.I wrote this article last week. It’s about Brexit and family among other things.Perhaps it should trend to show what talking about family really looks like.  
What’s wrong with Brexit?NOTHINGWhy do we want brexit?WE WANT TO BE INDEPENDENT When do we want Brexit?NOW!! 
Great piece. #4 - losers' consent - is where Brexit has totally failed, & has lessons for Scotland. Whether independence wins 50.1% or 75% of a future vote, those who disagree need to be brought on board & feel included in building the future state.  
Absolutely right.We had a referendum, endorsed by parliament it must be carried out without delay.No more time is necesary, the EU have made their position very clear & we must respect it.  
The 2016 referendum was supposed to be a 'wake-up call' for politicians. Sadly too many of them just want to go back to sleep  
Promising comments, but we need to see action next week from Labour. Liberal Democrats have led the fight for a People's Vote for two and half years. During that time the Labour frontbench have helped May deliver Brexit. 
Brexit is a national embarrassment - take a stand with us and demand a People's Vote.Join our March to Stop Brexit 
This is excellent.The real Brexit cliff edge is not on March 29th - it's July 1st  via @politics_co_uk 
This is shocking if not surprising. Proof that Putin is doing in the EU what he did in the US. The probability is Brexit is made in Moscow. Or at least parts are. And May, suppressing investigation, is at best defending *her* Brexit, at worst colluding  
I'm really proud of my late grandad and his generation that voted for #Brexit, they set us on the path to winning greater democratic control for the British public – young and old.  
HT to @J_amesp On Facebook Leave is still dominating the discussion of #Brexit. That’s the power of dark money and dark data  
Okay, here’s my chat about family life.Kill my half-Italian, 7 year old daughter with Type 1 diabetes via Brexit and there’ll be consequences.Good chat.Now put your elitist shite away and fuck off. Then fuck off some more.  
Political lines are shifting so dramatically I think it's time to start renaming things:Conservative party - Fuck Business partyLabour party - The Corbyn Teenage Fan ClubQuestion Time - UKIP TimeBBC News - ERG State TelevisionBrexit - The Great Tufton Street Ponzi Scheme 
WATCH | @NickBoles wouldn't want you to RT this... Here's Nick in November 2016 telling Remainers "it isn't good enough to just say you accept the result" and calls for an end to Single Market membership & Free Movement.Now he defies his constituents and wants to delay Brexit!  
UK politics is infested with unaccountable think tanks who won't reveal their funding. Some are now influencing top ranking MPs and the Brexit agenda. It's an utter disgrace  
Zeno’s Brexit paradox: Labour is always moving towards backing a 2nd referendum but somehow never arrives at this destination.  
Brexit; Trump achieved.While we look away, Putin's war continuesNow Italy: Evidence of collusion: Kremlin to fund Italy EU electionsBritain fought valiantly against fascism in WW2. Why are we rolling over to Brexit? It is not democracy. It's a crime. And perhaps also treason  
So 100 or so MPs are demanding that “no-deal” is ruled out. But no-deal IS Brexit. And if successful, they will destroy the UK negotiating position. 
It’s amazing isn’t it, how the EU - who aren’t pumping lies into the British conversation about Brexit - keep eventually arriving at the same position as me as regards no deal.“Today I am more worried than before.”@MichelBarnier, welcome to my world. 
More likely to be because they are a bunch of Remainers trying to stop Brexit ?  
We would far rather that senior Tories resign if a #NoDeal #Brexit 𝙞𝙨𝙣'𝙩 delivered.The electorate (especially @Conservatives party members) know the Withdrawal Agreement (in any guise) isn't leaving the EU at all. 
We're almost at 250,000 people backing our campaign to give the people the final say on Brexit.Help us get there with a retweet > 
Neither do you lot! May’s WA isn’t Brexit! Not in any way shape or form! And now 100 imbeciles say they won’t countenance what would actually be Real Brexit! WTO No Deal which is what we actually voted for! So tell us what the f*** you do intend to deliver apart from vassalage?  
This opinion piece belongs in the trash next to the other shit. Thanks to FOM my mum-in-law lives with me and her daughter. Brexit will mean she may have to leave us. EU supports families. UK does not. 
Supporting a wrecking bill against their own government to stop brexit and threatening to make the government collapse is unforgivable. These 30 MPs are the real extremists. They are EU zealots. #StandUp4Brexit 
Dear Mainstream Media,MP's resigning from the two main political parties is not the biggest news. You should be reporting about record levels of poverty, our #Brexit crisis and the failures of this terrible government.We want change! #GTTO #JC4PM2019  
Because the behaviour of many Brexiters and right-wing commentators shows all the characteristics of brainwashing, including total denial of facts and of reality. There has to be some way of talking them down off the no-deal Brexit ledge, don't you think? 
I'm not exactly sure how it would work in practice, but I can't shake the feeling that we need a Brexit de-radicalisation programme, much like there's a programme to rehabilitate those who have fallen under the influence of terrorist organisations. 
. UNITED KINGDOM - BRITISH ECONOMY SETS RECORDS w/ BREXIT LOOMINGContrary to the Narrative that Socialist Leftists Fantasize - Britain's Economy is Booming on BREXIT Anticipation - While Socialist EU is Quickly Dying. 
"Daddy where is Mommy?" "She got deported back to Germany, son. We had a vote for Brexit, which was really about supporting families." 
No one who truly understands how the customs union works would ever suggest that it is a viable option for the UK post-Brexit: huge swathes of the earth would have tariff free access to our market and British business would have no preferential access in return! Madness! 
NB Any Commons vote that stops us leaving on March 29 does not just stop "no deal" Brexit, it stops Brexit.Two years ago the Commons passed a law that says we leave on March 29, 2019. If we don't then this Govt will never take us out. 
I know that Brexit has driven us all mad but this is so crazy. Would you say this to a kid who has one parent who’s an EU citizen? To parents and grandparents where one is an EU citizen? Freedom of movement has enabled family life and its removal threatens actual families. 
If you want some more analysis, specifically around what would happen in the event of a second referendum on Brexit, you can find it here:  
Ignore the headline (it’s the FT)...The real story is: 30 Europhile Conservative MPs, from the ironically named “Brexit Delivery Group”, are threatening to rebel against the PM by backing Cooper’s amendment which aims to block ‘no-deal’.#StandUp4Brexit 
"Britain would go to the bottom of the international pecking order in the case of a no-deal Brexit"The hard question: who wants that; somebody does, but why?  
35 days until Brexit.Similar to the gestation period of a grey squirrel.Here is one photographed in Dublin recently by @ClodaghKilcoyne for Reuters. The squirrel's views on Brexit are unknown.  
Giles’ Brexit will very likely make my family life impossible, obliging me to choose between spending time with my young children and earning enough to give them a decent start in life. I don’t have the words to convey my contempt for Giles Fraser and his callous hypocrisy. 
If you were, say, Scottish, and your referendum organisers were facing 25 years in gaol what would YOU do?"Protesters who are backing Catalonia’s secession from Spain have blocked major highways, train tracks and roads across the northeastern region."  
The UK’s post-Brexit visa system could ‘lock out’ technical specialists due to an arbitrary salary threshold warn @TheCrick, as they launch a new exhibition celebrating technicians:  @Beth_Thompson | #TogetherScienceCan #craftandgraft 
"The three Tory MPs who have defected to the Independent Group all promised to respect the EU referendum result and all got elected in 2017 on a pro-Brexit manifesto. Yet now they’re trying to thwart Brexit. These people are hypocrites and liars."-  Brendan O’Neill: on Sky 
So, very often when I’m making comments about the Leave side of the Brexit debate having the better machinery, it’s based in fact.I hope you’ve found this snapshot of Britain’s life online interesting. 
Here are some interesting facts about the shape of social media and the national conversation over the last month in Brexit Britain.Might be a surprise to some of you... 
In addition to rice, we're also stocked up on veg stock as we can pick fresh mussels here. #paella #Brexit 
According ti the Telegraph *Moderate Tory MPs say they will force May to delay Brexit*. I looked up moderate in the dictionary and it didn't say 'undemocratic nannying self-important tramp sausages' so imagine it is an error. 
Britain is better than this Brexit mess.Enough is enough. It's time to stop this national embarrassment. Demand a People's Vote >  
Labour MPs must stay and fight – the country needs strong opposition to stop the Tories. Only the Labour movement can deliver the change our country needs to mend the longstanding divisions highlighted by Brexit  
Every conversation on the EU ref should begin “The illegal referendum...” until that is fully investigated and understood there should be nothing else to discuss. 
7. The TIG group have already said:a) They will support May's govt. in a VONC;b) They want an agreement that is almost identical in every way to the Labour Brexit policy.  Why are they doing this now, with barely 40 days to go? One reason: to stop a Labour govt. doing it. 
Important impartial analysis concludes that #independence for #Scotland wd be a very different process from #Brexit & there is no automatic reason to presume that #independence divorce talks would face the perfect & chaotic storm that is #Brexit #indyref2 
Meanwhile "Last month Irish motorists learned that to drive in Northern Ireland and  Britain after a no-deal Brexit they will need “green cards” to prove they are insured." What an out and out horror show this is turning into! 
Driving licenses belonging to UK holders living in Ireland will no longer be valid for driving there after a no deal Brexit, and will need to be exchanged for Irish ones before 29 March 2019. 
Is Brexit Sexist? just ask:Mr Farage Mr Ian Duncan Smith Mr Reese MoggMr Dann HannonMr Boris JohnsonMr David CameronMr Owen PattersonMr Michael GoveMr Liam FoxMr David DavisMr Bernard JenkinsMr Bill CatchMr Bannon (list is non exhaustive obv) 
We're almost at 250,000 signatures on our campaign to Exit Brexit!Sign up and share to help us get past 250k, and send a message to Theresa May. 
2. Why is Corbyn being destroyed this week? Because for some, like Blair and Mandelson (and let's not get started on the TIG-ers) preserving the neo-liberal austerity way for their corporate funders is more important than Brexit. They will sell us all down the river for it. 
#Brexit is like when #MrBlobby got to Xmas No. 1. We all bought the single over Take That's "Pray" because that's what we thought we wanted. It didn't represent the whole country, but it's what the world saw. We all regret that decision. We saw the damage. Learn from history. 
1. And yet the Labour soft-Brexit plan is lauded by the EU and is the only thing that can get us out of May's mess and keep us as closely-aligned to the EU as possible. Which is why the media is desperate to do what they can to trash it. Including Blairites at the New European. 
READ: Labour 'moving towards #PeoplesVote': Shadow chancellor John McDonnell tells of party shift on Brexit  
My children have been getting more concerned hearing adults talking about this thing called Brexit, so last night we sat them down and had *that* talk.In what order shall we eat our pets? 
Anyone know what the @Conservatives are up to today? Have they sorted out Brexit? Are they any nearer to dealing with the 'burning injustices' in society? Are the media asking them difficult questions or are they too busy taking photos of TIG? 
Here's a letter to @theresa_may, signed by 75 leaders, professionals and engaged individuals, warning of the risks of No Deal Brexit.  (via @NVTweeting).Help us expose the Government's planning as unlawful and inadequate:  
Can I please make this very clear! A soft #Brexit (ie. one where we remain in the CU and the SM) is better than Theresa May's so called deal, which is in turn far better than no deal. But, remaining in the EU is the very best option available - by miles!!! #RevokeArticle50 
How can any government ever consider a No Deal Brexit when the Royal College of Radiologists says it will be forced which patients receive cancer treatment?Has Theresa May no decency or humanity? This is the ultimate dereliction of duty & responsibility. 
The WA stinks, only WTO honours the Ref. and the manifesto. If no proper Brexit, the Tories are toast with their voters.  
Ian Austin's exit shows Labour's woes are a lot bigger than Brexit  
Off to the farm supply shop today. Dad's doing a 4 month stock supply of dog food....jist in case. #WeComeFirst #Brexit 
The nine ministers who told May they'd quit if she doesn't rule out no-deal Brexit — Another minister says he won’t resign next week but will stand his ground and fight.Which might be Rorke’s Drift. Or possibly the Alamo. 
A map of where all those Brexit Job losses so far have happened. Should we call it the Short term pain map of Britain. If You're a leaver this is what you voted for  
The Independent Group: this is a huge statement against Brexit tribalism that could really change British politics  
That makes more sense as a way forward - though, of course, in @theSNP Scotland already has a party that wants to stop Brexit. His explanation for why Labour lost though is way off the mark IMO 
Brexit latest: France issues fishing warning and says UK fishermen face EU ban  | World | News |  
LOOKING for a chef for my new Brexit cafe, menu will be pretty basic tbhmouldy jam sandwicheswaterbendy banana splitfray bentos piespam frittersspam spam and watertinned peaches (vegan)spam piecorned beef and spamin fact just someone who can open a tin LET ME KNOW  
Over 300 hedge funders represented Vote Leave and they ALL took the highly risky and unusual 'short-position' over the ref outcome. Some invested EVERYTHING when they placed their 'bets' on the 23rd June 2016. They all made substantial profits. 
Science and the EU: how Brexit will impact astronomy by @joramasawmy   
London’s Brexit Exodus Is More of a Trickle: Mass departures from U.K.’s financial center so far haven’t happened  
Students across Nottingham clear that they want a #PeoplesVote - whether because they didn't get a vote in 2016, to counter the Leave campaign's lies, or like below, to find out if Brexit is still actually the will of the people.  
Labour could ask Parliament to vote on its #Brexit plan next week. If MPs say no, as seems likely, the party may then make the big shift and call for people to have the final say on whether we quit the EU. 
Well, have I got news for you! I've been chatting with Ian Hislop about his new play "Trial by Laughter", Brexit, HIGNFY, living in #Kent - everything! He's a top chap into the bargain. Watch @bbcsoutheast 1830 tonight. 
@theresa_may has absolutely no intention of delivering Brexit either!"What's proposed would leave Britain with all the duties, costs and obligations of membership, but with no voice, no vote & no veto"! "worst imaginable outcome"! #BrexitBetrayl 
All of this money we're wasting on Brexit would be better used on research into time travel so we can send the gammons back to this mythical past they want so badly, and the rest of us can get on with the challenges of the modern age. 
Brexit was expected to trigger mass departures from the U.K.’s financial hub. But so far there are few signs of that happening.  
Labour’s continued “moving towards a peoples vote” is mere procrastination to try and stop a rebellion. Corbyn has voted against his own party hundreds of times. He’s not going to compromise on his core fundamental belief that Brexit could deliver his fantasies. 
I'm thinking of starting a political website so I can publish articles like "Why centrism is the new nazism" and "Alfred the Great would have supported a no deal Brexit" and people will take me seriously and retweet me BECAUSE I HAVE A WEBSITE. Any name suggestions appreciated. 
talking about brexit vs talking about jordyn woods and tristan thompson scandal  
David Mundell pledges to do 'everything I can' to stop no-deal Brexit in veiled resignation threat 
Check out our new website for EU citizens in the UK. You'll find info about EU citizens' rights & #Brexit, free events and support for EU citizens aross the UK with immigration lawyers. Link:  
'Forget the Dutch!' Fisherman says 'best thing' for fishing industry is NO DEAL Brexit! 
"#Brexit was a working-class revolt, but it has not delivered anything  approaching a working class victory. It’s like declaring independence  from paddles when you’re halfway down shit creek." - Laurie Penny (@pennyred) #BrexitChaos 
Forget the struggling companies looking at #Brexit as an excuse for poor performance. The companies and leaders of the future back the UK Tiny little companies like Google for example "The UK is no doubt a very, very attractive market for us" 
Comical CCHQ puff piece , I don’t know why you are so concerned. We have been urging people to get involved and save Brexit! They are generally ex UKIP & conservative voters, who believe in Conservative values. You know , like the Conservatives used to believe in !  
Health and care voices unite against a ‘no deal’ Brexit. Read our letter to @theresa_may, signed by 75 leaders, professionals and engaged individuals:  
i did point out to him all the human suffering that has happened as a result of Brexit already which Labour has been complicit in, eg. failing to oppose the Immigration Bill (which removes EU citizens' right to stay here) until the last minute. he just said 'that's a shame.'  
Dear @jeremycorbyn,I am a council member of @BremainInSpain.I have so many concerns about Brexit stripping me of my EU citizenship that I am temporarily living in London in order to protest against Brexit at #Sodem with Steve Bray.8am - 6pm.Please do get in touch.Thank you. 
Never like to miss an opportunity...... 
Freedom of movement and social mobility undermine family life?There we have it folks - the Brexit dividend will be incest.  
I love the constant British delusion that there’s some way around the formal process of negotiating Brexit.And I love every response from the EU, for example “there will be no deal in the desert.”La classe non è acqua. 
Exeter MP @BenPBradshaw on @BBCRadio4 today: if Corbyn doesn't honour Labour members' unanimously agreed policy to support a second referendum, the trickle of members leaving will turn into a flood. 
20 race equality orgs call for govt to plan for responding to racism post-Brexit, including responding to hate crime, but also more proactively to build better support for tackling racism in institutions and in public attitudessigned by @RunnymedeTrust, 
I'll tell you what undermines family life Giles - a Brexit policy that is dividing families and forcing them into impossible choices. 
Imagine there's no BrexitIt's easy if you tryNo Hell in AprilAbove us only skyImagine all the peopleLiving for todayYou may say I'm a dreamerBut I'm not the only oneI hope someday you'll join usAnd the country will live as one 
There are some disagreements so fundamental, so rooted in incommensurable predicates, that no discussion, no argument is even possible, just mutual belligerent incomprehension. And here is the stay-in-your-place case for Brexit.  
It gives opportunities to working class people they won’t have after Brexit. Posh people tellling ordinary people what they need. No thanks   
AN OXYMORONIC, "BREXIT DELIVERY GROUP" of approximately 100 MP's have written to the PM demanding "No deal Brexit" is taken off the table!So how is this delivering the Brexit 17.4 million leave voters voted for?This is merely a Eurobrit remoaners club.  
And let's not forget who else has been active in Italy during this period...... 
Tories already blaming Labour for #brexit wait for the real shit storm on March 29th 2019.... Its all Labours Fault .... 
UK tariff announcement delayed by a week to prevent outrage before next week's Brexit votes.What should cause outrage - business may now have less than four weeks to prepare for the tariffs because the PM thinks she is more important than the country.  
UK driving licences will not be valid in Ireland under no-deal Brexit  
Just when did we pass through the looking glass?  We have an executive driving us to disaster claiming  legitimacy from an advisory referendum the result of which, if it had been binding, would have been quashed.  
I've had enough of dodgy think tanks, phoney institutes and the undue influence they exert. And so should you. Me on the Brexit layercake.  
Three years into this debacle, only today have I encountered the very worst argument for Brexit (Either that, or it’s the winning entry in the 2019 Dickens-villain tribute competition)  
Every UK trading partner: We legitimately need to know how we are going to trade with you. What tariffs to apply, what borders will exist, what will not. Brexit is just 35 days away.Tory Cabinet:  
I think this needs a qualifier. The past was much better, but only if you were a white Englishman of a certain class. Ladies and Gentleman: the Brexit "philosophy" in nutshell.  
Here are a couple more slides from the Government’s no deal Brexit briefing on data transfers.Data sharing is going to be a problem for many businesses in the event of no deal:  
The Tories have refused to reveal how much funding hospitals, like #StHelier, will receive in the event of a no-deal #Brexit. The Govt. is either incompetent or doesn’t expect it to happen. Either way they’re cutting it dangerously fine. Time to rule out no-deal once & for all. 
It is now less than 850 hours to #Brexit. 
Instant trade deals were always impossible & claiming them was deceiving the British public. Government admits deals with Japan or Turkey won't be ready in time for Brexit  
Don't think much need be said other than yet another #Brexit "result". #indyref2 
The Icelandic Parliament (Alþingi) admits a resolution proposal that condemns "the response of the Spanish government to the independence referendum of Catalonia, including the arrests of Catalan politicians" and the #CatalanTrial . 
Reaching crunch time on #Brexit. Will PM have the guts to sack cabinet members when they support no deal next week? Meanwhile, Corbyn forced toward #peoplesvote as Labour party disintegrates before his eyes 
Today’s ⁦@EveningStandard⁩ exclusive as John McDonnell tells us Labour is ‘moving towards’ a second referendum & latest shocking London housing figures  
Christ alive, only read this piece if you have the stomach for it. A virulent pro-no deal Brexit argument against free movement and people having ambitions, bigging up the sort of 'traditional' values that have kept women under the tyranny of their husbands for centuries.  
So here we now stand. Four cabinet ministers and five junior ministers could potentially resign if Theresa May fails to rule out a no-deal Brexit. Well well well Prime Minister. If it isn’t the consequences of your own actions... 
The three Tory MPs who have defected to the Independent Group all promised to respect the EU referendum result and all got elected in 2017 on a pro-Brexit manifesto. Yet now they’re trying to thwart Brexit. These people are hypocrites and liars.Brendan O’Neill on Sky  
Scottish independence divorce negotiations over the share of assets and liabilities would be “different and much tougher than Brexit”, a report published today has found.  
Govt plans on cramming 45 laws in a few weeks for Brexit despite having 2 years to prep, and they still have time for a five star trip around globe. I think this is literally how Leo, Simon and Murphs also did their Leaving Certs. 
The Brexit referendum was based upon misinformation, dark money & Electoral Law being broken.  .@metpoliceuk - what is the progress of this investigation?  
BREAKING: Putin agreed to request from Lega Nord leader Matteo Salvini to covertly finance his Euro election campaign, concealing payment behind a "normal" business deal.Here's Salvini with his pal Nigel Farage. Arron Banks is a fan too.#Brexit #Crooks 
enior Tories ready to resign unless May rules out no-deal Brexit 
Brexit is like demolishing a magnificent country mansion and using the rubble to build a leaky shack. 
Better agree No Deal now than accept the weakness and humiliation of the Withdrawal Agreement  #brexit @John_Mills_JML 
The latest edition of Private Eye is on sale now, priced £2, or 0.00001 per cent of a Brexit ferry contract.  
“We are not holding the government to ransom…there is I think only one person in the ERG who wants to leave with no deal, the rest of us are absolutely desperate for a deal” Conservative MP @NadineDorries on #Brexit deal vote#politicslive  
People who voted to stay, voted for something codified by 2 treaties and decades of legislation, and fixed by the UK'S EU Act of 2011 which says that no new power can be transferred to the EU level without a new UK referendum.So 16 million people voted for something concrete. 
It's unlikely Theresa May will be able to bring a revised Brexit deal back to Parliament for a so-called meaningful vote next week, British official says  
'Universities are propaganda powerhouses for EU membership. The false claims that Brexit will mean that students can no longer study abroad are often used to terrify us into staying silent on the Brexit debate. It's time to speak out.' | @RobertHlangley  
Some said we were a fringe movementThey put us as an outside chance at bestBut as high noon approaches more & more people all over the UK are demanding that any #Brexit deal is put to the public in a #PeoplesVoteOur time is now. March with us.   
“She does not even have confidence in her own deal, because she is trying to change her own deal” Labour MP @peterkyle on PM’s #Brexit plans, as he calls for a ‘confirmatory vote’ from the public#politicslive  
I’m backing the Costa amendment - we need to stop treating people as pawns in this #Brexit shambles @the3million 
brexit  
I don't want a second #Brexit referendum.I want a first one, without all the cheating. 
Whilst the neoliberal establishment media joyfully broadcast the relentless smears.... This may have slipped through the net. Corbyn meets EU and let's us know that the EU think that Labour's Brexit plan is credible.That's leadership.#FBPE #JC4PM2019 #IStandWithCorbyn 
Theresa May has systematically followed Goebbels' script on how to treat a referendum victory. It is shocking and deeply disturbing that we have a PM who prefers plebiscitary dictatorship to parliamentary democracy.#PeoplesVote #Brexit  
A no deal brexit means an almost infinite amount of new bureaucracy. Everywhere you look, there are new rules and regulations to follow, new documentation to complete, new costs to incur. We will *never* dig ourselves out from under the onslaught of home-grown red tape.  
Ulster Unionist Peer Lord Empey has accused the DUP of “falling asleep at the wheel” over the backstop: “the way Brexit has been handled - especially by the DUP - has radicalised Irish nationalism, and... driven the idea of a border poll up near the top of the political agenda” 
To delay cancer care for "brexit" does sound like a further argument for a Misconduct in Public Office criminal action 
Anti-democratic MPs not keen on their own #PeoplesVoteMPs looking to thwart Brexit & the opportunity it provides for communities such as ours should remember we will have a peoples vote called a General ElectionCoastal MPs who fail fishing won't be forgotten by their electors  
Sadly our #Brexit Mix for @BBCSounds is only available in the U.K. For international friends here’s a list of the songs so you can do your own version. (Remember to do bad puns with your mates inbetween for the full experience.) 
It’s a tough competition, but I think this may be Giles Frazier’s worst piece on Brexit. Ignorant, regressive, hypocritical and depressing. The reverse of the truth in almost every way.  
Of course the EU would be delighted if No-Deal is taken off the table. That way the UK remains trapped indefinitely in the customs union, cannot negotiate bilateral FTA, has to accept all the rules with no say. That’s not Brexit. We should offer Article 24 of GATT and #GoWTO 
Labour is 'moving towards' backing a fresh Brexit referendum, John McDonnell says  
 The Catalan government is looking into the possibility of going to court over "the digital repression before and after the October 1 referendum."   
Thought provoking model of No deal Brexit in Swedish Army Museum, Stockholm. pic.twitter.com/olGiFzl8H5 
Re Giles Fraser: even leaving aside the disaster communitarianism approach to Brexit and the highly gendered question of who ends up obliged to do the looking after, I just don't like a politics so clearly rooted in telling people what to do and how to live all the time. 
But in the case of no deal, the official POLICY is to take that right away from me.So much for the benefits of no deal brexit that you're so keen on.I guess your answer would be that I should've stayed put in Berkel, and not have had the temerity to take that uni offer./End 
Some UK Conservative lawmakers warn PM May they are ready to back Brexit delay  
After the Brexit vote, one of the things I campaigned very hard for, was to safeguard those family reunion rights.They were included in the withdrawal agreement.4/ 
How can Brextremists sleep at night?I hope all those who still support them can afford private health insurance. Selling off our NHS is, of course, one of the glittering prizes for the many Brexit MPs who have money-making links to companies that flog it.  
1. The ERG are not patriots. They're incompetent zealots. These fanatics are never able to imagine how the other side will react. A no-deal #Brexit would hand the EU enormous power. The EU would decide how and when to introduce new frictions between the UK and the single market. 
EU expects Theresa May to request a three-month delay to Brexit, with no sense in Brussels of any other breakthrough  
Theresa May will consider axeing the Human Rights Act after Brexit, despite promising she is “committed” to its protections, a minister has revealed. SO MORE LIES FROM MAY 
I hope this is true on both counts. A decision on Brexit is urgent - we literally have days left - and as for action on antisemitism, to say it’s overdue would be an understatement. We’ll be judged by actions, not words. Inaction risks breaking our Party completely.  
Rubbish.  Brexit is now making my family choose between our kids and our parents, so for the kids sake we will be moving to Australia and leaving our parents behind. 
Mr Jones I love my country, that’s why I’m fighting to save it. My constituents did not elect me to cheer lead. I am in opposition and this government, austerity and Brexit are making it harder for my constituents to put food on the table, pay the bills, keep their children safe.  
Opportunism. The Liberals had a long & honourable tradition as a Home Rule party. But they now campaign at elections as if they’re the DUP. Their rabid unionism places them in the absurd position of supporting a 2nd #Brexit referendum but promising to oppose #indyref2 
**We have been campaigning for this for 14 months. It should not have taken this long, but we are nearly there**#Labour must embrace a #PeoplesVote and campaign to #Remain in the EU.#Brexit is not inevitable.  
If there was ever a reason to ensure we execute #Brexit it is this.... what a pair of f**king weasels   
Thread.  The Japanese business news saying "Of course It's Brexit, stupid!"  
Honda's 2018 briefing undermines claim plant closure not Brexit-related  
So: totally in keeping with wanting to ‘remain & reform’, which was @UKLabour’s official position during the referendum.You really will have to do better with your ‘gotcha’ politics!The ‘Get Corbyn’ project has failed.  
The PM is, yet again, underestimating the public's wholesale opposition to her Brexit deal. Write to your MP @  
Brexit is 35 days away. #brexit 
It's obvious by now that Putin is trying to destabilise the west by indirectly funding idiots like Farage and Trump and by using social media to divide countries. The worrying part is thet we *still* don't have a Mueller style investigation into the growing Brexit scandals. 
Our incompetent opposition strikes again as John McDonnell spills the beans on Labour's intentions to back a second referendum.Labour, more positions than the Kama Sutra. Support us at  
The revelation was in this fascinating article on Five Star & how debate can be massaged & manipulated invisibly on online platforms. Bilney said the meeting 'planted the seed of the idea' that would help them win the referendum 
Conservative MPs ran on a manifesto to deliver Brexit. Should those joining the 'Indy' (anti-Brexit) group call a by-election?  
If any version of Brexit actually happens, it will be a Brexit that has less democratic legitimacy than staying in the EU, because it will not be what all of the 52% wanted.Not by a long shot! 
Now I was about to follow this tweet up by saying "and those who want Brexit have have 3 years to agree among themselves what Brexit they want", but it's worse than that!They've had  20 YEARS to agree on some kind of Brexit that respected the Good Friday Agreement! They haven't. 
Members of Chuka's new Remain group say that the Prime Minister should have pursued a Norway style deal.But during the referendum they rubbished that model because it wouldn't let us take back control.  
Labour’s Shadow Chancellor John McDonnell confirms the party is “moving towards” a People’s Vote to give us all the final say on #Brexit. It’s time to #PutItToThePeople:  
Correctly re-stated: “Next week will be the moment when all MPs have the chance to crawl on hands and knees to Brussels to beg for an extension that may postpone a no deal Brexit. We in @UKLabour must take that chance and betray the majority of British voters.” 
The Government has put out a jaunty video covering the 10 steps (yes, TEN!) businesses will have to follow to import goods from the EU after a no-deal Brexit. 
Jess @jessphillips, I'm listening to you on @LBC. How do you square your support for a second EU ref yet you oppose Scotland having another #Indyref? How is a referendum in 2016 up for a revisit yet a 2014 one isn't? How does that work? #LBC 
We agree - our opposition to Brexit is not separate from our wider leftwing politics, it's part of it. We fight for workers' rights, for migrants, economic and environmental justice. Stopping Brexit is not the ultimate goal but a key step in the struggle for a fairer society.   
If you voted for Brexit the current mess is what you voted for. Nobody promised it, but many people predicted it.You know what you voted for, own it. 
From a tactical standpoint, the persistent rejection of ‘no deal’ is staggering in its absurdity. The only way to have any genuine leverage in a transaction is by being prepared to walk away:  #Brexit 
Great @guardian visualisation of Commons fragmentation shows why we need an election - parties manifesto pledges are falling apart in face of Brexit reality...  
There will be no tearing it up later.This has been the plan all along.Shes worn you down. She’s already moved from ‘no deal is better than a bad deal’ to ‘my deal or no brexit’. Stand strong.We leave on 29th with no deal & then watch the EU scramble to offer us a proper deal.  
Now the EU are taking the p*ss. They are offering the UK a 20 day Brexit extension, but it will cost £7 billion. Added to that they now want £45 bullion to stay in the EU on May's remain deal. Does it get any worse? We are getting our faces ground into the mud under Junkers boot. 
NEWS! Simpletons getting increasingly giddy at prospect of no-deal Brexit  
》frankly, of all the rubbish takes on Brexit that I've heard, this "take away kids freedom of movement so they are trapped looking after their elderly parents" has to be the absolute bloody worst! 
That time I debated Peter Lilley on Brexit about a year ago and he has been proven wrong about everything.  
Thank you, & to everyone, for all the wonderful messages.At least now I have more time to work on stopping Brexit!@UKEUchallenge@BremainInSpain 
That's great Barry...selective hatred is OK...Good to know what the 'modern' Labour Party stands for..#Brexit Britain FUBAR 
Brexit, Farage, Banks, the Tories, Trump, Le Pen, Orban, Salvini.......  
It means that there is no mandate for Brexit, though! In the first place because the 2016 ref was only advisory. In the second place because had it been mandatory it would now have been annulled. NO MANDATE for any of this nonsense. #RevokeArticle50 
Great phrase by Jess Phillips on @LBC any Brexit deal is Remain minus. That's Brexit in a nutshell, nothing is better than membership, everything else is damage limitation. 
.@jeremycorbyn to European socialist leaders: we can negotiate an alternative Brexit plan and then take on the tax dodgers together  
So brexit is now officially the government exploiting a legal loophole to ‘respect the result’ of a fraudulently influences opinion poll? 
In the face of all this #brexit malaise, we must remember that faced with so many dire prospects, our continuing membership of the world's biggest economic bloc is our most improtant contingency.  
massive frustration is wholly understandable, but I explain why – in its own interest – EU should resist the temptation to 'just get Brexit over with…' #brexit #MSC2019 
BREXIT LIVE: EU's new no-deal deadline REVEALED - Brussels demands £7BN to approve it. Oh dear God, the theft of our money is now right out in the open. no one cares. From £39 to £46 billion. What next. That OK remain? We cannot be blackmailed like this.   
Absolutely not.  The ERG must stand firm and deliver the clean Brexit voted for.  Any dilution will see the last section of voter respect disappear.  The swamp needs draining, and the ERG are the seedlings to rebuild Parliament. 
Appeal court says Brexit ref would be overturned if it was binding, but it’s not, so it can’t beAs this unfolds, remember: nobody made the government do this. It could have been stopped, perfectly legally & democratically, any time. They did it because they wanted to do it 
Be amazing if politicians were as prepared to leave their parties over climate change as they were about Brexit. 
Dr: Mike Galsworthy: "Given that the future of the UK’s economy should lie in jobs from science, innovation and technology, Brexit is clearly undermining the very fabric of our future wealth, before we even start the thing." 
WATCH | @Steven_Woolfe calls out @Anna_Soubry who only advocates re-runs of democratic votes when it suits her.She should trigger a by-election on her anti-Brexit ticket and he will challenge her as an independent should the @Conservatives continue to block his membership!  
Entryism by UKIP on one side and Momentum on the other is now dismantling both the Conservative and Labour Parties.Could we at long last be witnessing an actual Brexit Dividend?We'll have to wait and see what fills the void. 
Getting trounced by the worst government in living memory, betraying the membership on an informed referendum & haemorrhaging MPs? You make an excellent point. 
How can @theresa_may possibly threaten a No Deal Brexit when the Royal College of Radiologists says NHS trusts may then have “no choice but to prioritise” which patients receive cancer treatment.Delaying cancer care for Brexit? Seriously?  
This is just the absolute pits and demonstrates all too painfully why we should never have put something so utterly complex to a binary referendum .  
A blip or a sea change? My latest Brexit Blog post on the quiet Brexit week that saw the foundation of @TheIndGroup and the news of Honda's closure. Just up, now:  
BETRAYAL: EU 'expecting May to request three month Brexit delay'. Must not happen!  
In three years light can travel about 30 trillion kilometres. What does that tell you about Brexit? 
Add this to Trump, Brexit, le Pen, Yellow vests and who knows how many more “interferences” for lack of a better term 
Loving this hostel. So many different languages and accents - been blethering about #Brexit to a Singaporean - worldwide the UK is seen as a suicidal shitshow. Go us  
Brexit: most doctors and nurses now think NHS will get worse  
Take over of another iconic British company because of Brexit. Dairy Crest being bought by Canada's Saputo at a knock down price. Since the referendum the Pound has gone down in value making British companies a bargain basement.  pricehttps://www.bbc.co.uk/news/business-47329330 
Long but fascinating thread.Not putting Brexit back to voters for ratification is the real affront to respecting democracy.  
“No one is really sure what this Independent Group believes in, we know what you don't believe in and that's Brexit and the will of the people!” @Ella_M_Whelan smashed it last night when it was put to her that voters are too thick to understand Brexit   
Important Brexit: ⁦@AMCarwyn⁩ Jones calls for second EU referendum - BBC News ⁦@peoplesvote_uk⁩ ⁦@LabPeoplesVote⁩ ⁦@JoStevensLabour⁩ ⁦@AnnaMcMorrin⁩ ⁦@ToniaAntoniazzi⁩ 
Historians will look back at this period with shame at what is happening in the UK right now.  This level of intolerance is toxic "I'm afraid to talk to mum in my language:' Italian woman tells of abuse after Doncaster Brexit vote  
Well seeing as you only exist to want to second referendum I would be shocked if people at your event didn’t want a second referendum. Who on earth thought that this tweet actually highlights anything we didn’t already know  
Another senior Labour figure comes out in support a People's Vote.Former Former First Minister Carwyn Jones now backs a public vote on the Brexit deal, having initially argued that Labour should seek a general election. 
Another exciting day in Sligo following from a packed audience @itsligo with @simoncoveney last night for a Brexit discussion. Today @campaignforleo turning the sod on the N4 and further jobs for #Sligo under Project 2040 @OceanFmIreland @sligohub1 @SligoChampion 
British people have snobbish ways,hypocrisy ways,racist ways.White woman does something it's fine,woman of colour does it's a problem what is that,Whole world let boycott Britain,let them suffer with their Brexit mess #MeghanMarkle #DuchessofSussex 
Thanks for the chance to talk to your members about the huge challenges #Brexit presents to the vital work you undertake for us all.  
My dog could have negotiated a Brexit deal by now and I don't even have a dog. 
Sheep farmers are guaranteed compensation for a crash-out Brexit. But England's wildlife regulator receives a killer body blow. Is this how @michaelgove shows his support for the environment? @TonyJuniper may become chair, just in time to preside over NE's funeral. 
I think the would-be joke might be that there are trivial differences between Austin and the Tiggers. But then the joke still doesn't work, since Brexit is a big difference between them. (Plus "Austin and the Tiggers" sounds like a small child's name for a band) 
BRITAIN ENJOYS record budget surplus as EU Faces BLACK HOLE in coffers.  We defied scaremongers to post  largest monthly budget surplus since records began.  EU on brink of recession.  @borisjohnson #borisjohnson #boris johnson   #Brexit  
"I have something of a #Brexit fatigue you know" @JunckerEU reveals he's 'not very optimistic' about a #BrexitDeal and slams a #NoDealBrexit situation for having 'terrible consequences'. 
Yesterday in court, it was established that electoral fraud in the 2016 referendumwas notorious and regardless, Theresa May, not parliament, took the executive decision to start Brexit process.@Suewilson91 @A50Challenge#UKEUChallenge 
Because sensible minded people would like to prevent people like you from having access to a low skilled labour poll that can be used and abused to artificially repress wages of the working class.Post-Brexit you will have to employ what we have in this country at a decent wage! 
Hi @SophyRidgeSky the next time a Brextremist nut-job like @MarkRecklessMP starts talking about "respecting democracy" could you please mention his side's £10m of criminal electoral fraud that swung the EU referendum? #SkyNews 
Ian Austin MP has left the #Labour Party, but - revealingly - won't join The Independent Group because they are anti-Brexit.  What's the betting they will form an alliance with the Lib-Dems who are also anti-#Brexit? 
#Brexit: Irish government hopes no-deal plan 'sits on shelf'  
I've been reading "Heroic Failure" from @fotoole and it's an absolute masterpiece. Extremely recommended to people that want to understand the Brexit issue a bit more in-depth. Can't stress enough on how good this book is. 
There's a special place in hell for the people who promoted Brexit without even a sketch of a plan. You sir, are a charlatan, a carpetbagger and you've enabled division, xenophobia and long lingering damage to my country.My advice is make a run for it or keep very, very still.  
Brexit causing headaches?ERG being a pain in the neck?Try New, Codicil (TM)  
We’re attending the ‘Beyond Brexit: Uniting Ireland’ event this morning in Maghera, hosted by @GUENGL and @M_AndersonSF @sinnfeinireland.Excellent turn out to hear keynote speakers and panel discussions regarding #Brexit and #Ireland(Thread to follow ) 
THE POUND is tipped to finish the week “strong” against the euro after triumphing over predicted finance figures. Experts have suggested sterling will also benefit from potential progress in Brexit talks, which continue on Friday.. #DespiteBrexit 
Announcing the launch of our new exhibition celebrating technical staff, our director Paul Nurse warns that the UK’s post-Brexit visa system could ‘lock out’ these specialists due to an arbitrary salary threshold.Read the full story:  #craftandgraft 
In Wales, we are taking steps to prepare for any disruption to the supply of medicines and medical supplies in the event of a no deal. Chief Pharmaceutical Officer, Andrew Evans, explains more here. #Brexit #PreparingWales 
Thank you to the @A50Challenge team for their massive help and support with the #UKEUChallenge.Very valuable issues about the Brexit process are now on the official record.We await the written judgement.  
A lot of people are going to hate this but...8 years of Tory rule:> Record high employment> Record inward investment ("despite" Brexit)> Wages rising> Record surplus> Deficit falling> Higher growth than France/Germany> Low inflation> Low interest ratesR U OK Jeremy? 
Important that we politicians honour promises made in our manifestos and also respect the referendum result.  
WATCH: It’s time to put our country first. In the midst of the political chaos it’s ever more important we focus on the biggest crisis since 1940 - #Brexit - which will make us poorer, less safe + ruin our international reputation - it’s time for @peoplesvote_uk #FinalSay pic.twitter.com/CAcxYVVoXd 
In an "Informal consultation on urgent changes to the Human Medicines Regulation 2012 (sic.)" Government itself recognised that No Deal Brexit could deliver "multiple large shortages."Please support @GoodLawProject's challenge to these measures.  
Coveney - "EU could not be any clearer on the issue. The backstop is fiercely supported by the ppl it is designed to protect." #EU #Brexit  
I can tell you that hard core Tory voters blogging on the Telegraph, are all outraged at this massive betrayal by Tory MPs. That is an indication, that if we don't get a Brexit, or end up with May's Brexit which  means we remain, then the Tory party is finished. The party's over. 
When you say "I want the Brexit I voted for", despite knowing that others voted for different ones, you're saying "I know that my Brexit version was probably voted for by fewer people than voted Remain, but I want the country to do it anyway." 
So much silly talk of extremism when it is just about leaving the EU and honouring manifesto and Referendum promises.  
Says it all that Ian Austin - who believes the referendum result must be honoured - is choosing not to join Chuka's ultra-Remain protest group. It's elitist, London-centric and not united by any ideology beyond blocking Brexit. 
Massive logical flaw in Brexit no one has focussed on:*the UK only has trade deal negotiating leverage if we buy lots from the countries we want deals with*BUT - many leavers screaming that Brexit will reduce our trade deficit with the EU* the two are antithetical! 
Ian Austin believes in implementing the result of the 2016 EU referendum, so he chose not to join the Independence Group. He should form his own centrist party for MP’s who aren’t a one issue anti Brexit obsessive   
We’re preparing the @Coldwar_Steve Brexit Survival Kits here at @thamesandhudson #brexit #brexitsurvivalkit #coldwarsteve #ThamesandHudson 
Last night @StandComedyClub Edinburgh a woman in the audience from The Netherlands agreed to post me over insulin and migraine tablets so in seven seconds I got a better Brexit deal that Theresa May did in two years 
Another senior Labour figure supports a #PeoplesVote - Former Former First Minister Carwyn Jones backs a public vote on the #Brexit deal:  
Department for Transport confidential report reveals queues for Eurostar train services at London’s St Pancras International could reach up to 15,000 passengers each day in the event of a no-deal Brexit. 
Watch this space.Once he's helped deliver Brexit, Austin's 'no plans' to join TIG will mutate into 'I've decided TIG's my best option'. Principles don't come into a 'new' style of politics. TIG = home for stray Blairites with old neo-liberal policies. 
Brexit deal or No Deal, the NHS will be worse off. This is how it will affect black women in BritainThis Is How Brexit Will Further Damage The Health Of Black Women In Britain Lauren Pemberton-Nelson 
The LibDems have chosen narrow inward looking #Brexit Britain rather than a partnership of equals with Scotland fast tracked back into the #EU What a depressing lack of ambition for our country. 
The far right are using #Brexit to push their divisive, hateful agenda 
Proud to have added my name, on behalf of @TheGreenParty, to this cross-party amendment by @AlbertoCostaMP Theresa May’s use of @the3million & @BritishInEurope as pawns in her reckless #Brexit game has been an utter disgrace.  
Important point that @TheIndGroup at the moment are all anti Brexit. There are a large number of Lab MPs who are fed up but not necessarily in that camp. They could still quit though.Corbyn could be a backbencher by Xmas at this rate  
What is worrying the #IrishinBritain about #Brexit? We asked Brian Dalton of @irishinbritain, Catherine Hennessy of @icap1, Breege McDaid of @IrishCommCare and @SarahOw3n of @irishmigrants  via @ITabroad 
Attn All Brexiteers!If we could get all of the Leading Leave Politicians and Populists from In and Out of Parliament to agree to “Bury the Grudges!”and “Forget the Egos!”and form a ‘Grand Brexit Alliance’to Save the Country would you be in favour?I’m included obviously! 
And we still don’t know the truth about Kremlin interference in the #Brexit referendum or Putin support for far-right parties in Britain because Theresa May refuses to countenance a proper investigation here. #BrexitShambles #FinalSay #PeoplesVote 
A man who: 1) believes Brexit is bad for the UK (but won’t block it)2) thinks JC shouldn’t be PM (but won’t join any of the forces tryna stop it)3) opposes racism (when it isn’t a prejudice shared by the people of Dudley)Truly, a giant of our times. 
830 hours until Brexit.If we leave with no deal, it will be a disaster. No deal doesn't mean the status quo. It's as far from the status quo as it's possible to be. Right now, no deal is the default outcome. It will happen on 29 March 2019 at 11pm, without us doing ANYTHING. 
That you guys see Brexit as analogous to a war is one of the main reasons you have misjudged this so badly. 
Brexit: UK financial services sector moves $1 trillion in assets to EU  
The time they have wasted will not be measured. The opportunity costs of Brexit - the projects not launched, the investments not made, the reforms not carried out - will never be counted. 
“Jeremy Corbyn inching closer to backing a second #Referendum”   
And there you have it...who really stands to gain by the break-up of the EU...wake up Brexit fanatics and realise who is pulling the strings 
The snip is from the explanatory notes to the Human Medicines (Amendment) Regulations 2019 (). It is evident from this correspondence that Serious Shortage Protocols are designed to address drug shortages on a No Deal Brexit () 
Brexit is...actually happening. Next month. They said we could keep our cow or have a unicorn, people wanted the unicorn, and now there's no unicorn and they're taking our cow away.*stares sadly at bowl of Shreddies with no milk* 
The Government is adopting measures to deliver cost savings for the NHS on a No Deal Brexit even though "there may be some risks to patients".Please help @GoodLawProject protect patient care.() 
This is a new departure from the “it’s not as bad as” category in which we’re invited to conclude that the admittedly dire preparations for Brexit are worse than killing a million young men.  
Ian Austin quits Labour but won't join the less-than-a-third-Tory IG [as with most Leftists, maths isn't Paul's strongest suit] because he believes the 2016 referendum result should be honoured.NB: for Far-Leftists like Paul, respecting democracy is now a 'Right-wing' position.  
Thank you all for tryingNon-Binding = Binding26.5% of the Ppl = 100%37% Voters = 100%Lost Mandate = Cast Iron MandateIllegalities LegitimisedRights Removed w/o Consent Flawed Ref must be 'Honoured'#Brexit Britain FUBAR NOTHING TO RESPECT  
"It's really extraordinary that with 36 days to go we don't have clarity on some of these things... but that's where we are" Ireland's Foreign Minister Simon Coveney sets out no-deal #Brexit contingency plans  
Theresa May's scare tactics of No Deal are not working.The British people will not be bullied into this botched Brexit deal. We demand the people have the final say on the deal and option to remain.Demand a People's Vote>  
Those politicians who voted against the result of a referendum so clearly explained by Cameron and then betrayed their party manifesto are not only not fit for purpose, they are dangerous. Without democracy we have nothing. These people must be deselected for the sake of us all. 
@Suewilson91 The outcome of your case is a big step forward. There is no longer any doubt that the referendum should have been declared null and void and would have been had it been mandatory.  This makes it clear there is no mandate for Brexit.#StopBrexitSaveDemocracy 
The #IndependentGroup has a splinter group already.Well done to @IanAustinMP for making it clear that he will honour the referendum result.#StandUp4Brexit 
I’m not for one second suggesting that all Brexit voters are unintelligent. I’m just saying that 99% of them are fucking stupid! pic.twitter.com/uPa7mu6CsJ 
Yup. For the Liberals staying in the economically disastrous, isolating ugliness of Brexit Britain is the best Scotland can ever aspire to.  
.@IanAustinMP not spoken to @TheIndGroup (very diff views on Brexit - he is pro-leave). But damning of Lab leader > “I think Corbyn has completely changed what was a mainstream party into a completely diff party with very diffvalues. The hard left is now in charge of the party” 
Say no to a Brexit midfield tomorrow. Klopp went with it Vs City & we went in 1-0 down. Came out 2nd half and gave it a real good go but fell short. I’d rather lose the league going for it than trying to nick it. Keita, Wijnaldum & Fabinho for me #LFC 
++BREAKING++Massive story breaking in Italy. Putin worked with Lega Nord leader Matteo Salvini to covertly finance election campaign.Plan involved concealed payments via "normal business" deal in a similar move to how Putin funded Brexit & @Arron_banks 
There is no plausible Brexit deal that is acceptable to both the ERG and the EU. No-deal has little support beyond the ERG. Therefore a deal to leave the EU can only pass with support from Labour MPs. Since Chequers the PM has simply been playing for time to avoid this truth.  
Truthful Answers Only!!For those of you fellow Brexiteers who honestly placed their faith , their votes and their trust in the Main Parties in Parliament to fulfil their Referendum wishes I have Two Questions! How’s It Going So Far?Would You Ever Vote For Them Again? 
I welcome young people, from whatever party, standing up for their future and calling out this Brexit disaster which will impact them most. Power to you   
"A disorderly #Brexit will be a lose, lose, lose for the UK, for the EU, and for Ireland"Irish Foreign Minister Simon Coveney says no-deal Brexit is "worst case scenario"  
They infiltrated in the same way I infiltrate a mate's house when they invite me round for dinner. The Labour MPs in The Independent Group all opposed Brexit.  
He is not joining the Independent Group - who he disagrees with on 2nd referendum (he has voted to deliver Brexit deal).This seems to show @TheIndGroup are the anti-Brexit party as I wrote on the day it formed  
Why does anyone think abuse is a justified, let alone effective, means of persuasion?! The Labour Party has some problems we need to deal with - Faiza isn’t one of them. Also, architect of Brexit, IDS vs Faiza... Come on!!! I’m proud to campaign for her.  
Reading the piece, he’s not going to join TIG. Which given his Brexit votes makes sense. Which raises the intriguing possibility (cf Mann’s remarks about “the real split coming and being bigger”) of being *2* distinct splinter groups.  
Incredible that there's so much tantrum throwing around the impact of Brexit on the manufacturing sector, when we've lost 600,000 jobs in a decade, while being in the Eu UK manufacturing has lost 600,000 jobs in a decade, says union  
The same arrogance and myopia that drove David Cameron to believe he could control a Eurosceptic rebellion in his party with a EU referendum motivates those who are against austerity to support the neo liberal austerity loving #IndependentGroup b/c they think they  can control it 
Ian Austin becomes the ninth Labour MP to quit the party - although he hasn't joined the Independent Group (he has very different views from them on Brexit) 
Chester is a remain city yet the first 3 or 4 commentators including this man  from the audience did not reflect this.  Our group @chesterforeu campaigns there and nobody feels the audience was what we would expect (or at least chosen to speak).  Also no brexit questions later  
“This landmark piece of legislation is the work of nine Government Ministers and their Departments.”Tánaiste @simoncoveney and Minister @HMcEntee launch the #Brexit Omnibus Bill this morning #BrexitReady  
The ninth MP to quit Labour this week. @ianaustin resigns from the party. A dozen MPs in five days. How respective leaders handle Brexit in coming weeks and days will determine if the trickle turns into a much bigger flow  
In our case, the government hid the fact that brexit was in fact an executive decision of the PM alone for 14 months. This made it all very hard to get the tr arguments of principle when there were outright lies about the facts to apply them to.  
Brexit will leave Scotland the backwater of a backwater. Independence is now unarguably the only way Scotland can opt in to the world. I want to opt in, not out. 
Tory rebellion brewing25 members of gov willing to vote for a Brexit delay, unless May rules out no deal. They are not planning to resign. A source says May would have to sack them. Reminder: May’s working majority has fallen to eight this week. 
If only Labour MPs could have had a way of stopping Brexit other than when they voted for the referendum, voted unconditionally to trigger Article 50, stood on a pro-Brexit manifesto and refused to support moves to get “no deal” off the table.  
'At the moment we're looking at a no-deal Brexit, and nobody was arguing for that two years ago' 
The EU strategy is now to run down the clock and confront UK govt with a final additional document shortly before 29 March. If the country threatening suicide to get what it wants then pulls the trigger, so be it. The EU is prepared for no deal #Brexit and knows the consequences 
Development for the upcoming Yorkshire attraction Sausage World (SAUSAGE WORLD!!!) has been put on HOLD because EU funding has been withdrawn due to Brexit, and if that doesn't make you a radicalised remainer I don't know what the fuck will.  
The 11 MPs who have defected to the #IndependentGroup claim to be in revolt against the old politics. Pull the other one. They are in revolt against the people. This is an elitist campaign against Brexit and against democracy.Brendan O’Neill on the IG: 
How would you vote in a second Brexit referendum?Vote and RT 
By the end of next month, we will have had around two thirds of the entire time it took to fight the First World War to prepare for Brexit. If we're really not ready, what does that say about the state of the government machine? 
Brexit will cost the poorest the most and hurt the richest the least. 
Theresa May reportedly facing threat of mass Tory rebellion to prevent no-deal Brexit  
We began this process thinking the EU was the sole thief of our democracy. We now see that the whole UK political architecture is in a joint enterprise with it. No way genuine Brexiteers will abandon our mandate and accept fake Brexit to sustain the establishment. 
A confidential UK government report says queues for Eurostar train services at London’s St Pancras station could reach 15,000 passengers each day in the event of a no-deal Brexit  
As EU continues to refuse to undermine Brexit guarantee for NI, British papers say UK is being ‘rebuffed’. If you keep asking your bank manager to give you all the money in the bank and he says no every time you ask he’s not rebuffing you, he’s telling you to cop yourself on 
Brexit vote: Theresa May urged to take no-deal option off the table or face major Tory rebellion - The Independent  
Your worse than any of them playing Race Card all the time. We voted leave the EU. All you do everyday try to derail Brexit get over it stop crying you big baby .Stop tweeting guardian news everyday. The crap guardian same as you Brexit bashing all the time. Give it a rest.  
If Parliament votes to stop Brexit we learn we don't live in a democracy Dan. Will usher in sweeping change: end of Cons, end of Lab, end of BBC, end of FPTP and carnage for the EU every day we are forced to be an illegitimate member. And at the end of all that - Brexit. 
And perhaps all those statements about “the wiill of the people” should include the words “in an illegal, flawed referendum”. 
This isn’t just Brexit, this is everything. ‘Why isn’t Universal Credit working?’ they say. ‘It worked when I came up with it in my bedroom last night.’ 
John Barnes straight talking and honest. Had the guts to say that people didn't understand the EU referendum. Something no politician dares to say.  
ERG MP: “If she said she’d extend Article 50, there’d be 20-plus MPs who would just take their bat and ball home: no domestic legislation, no Brexit legislation, they just wouldn’t be showing up any more. . .there would be carnage.”  
If the Conservative Party votes to extend Article 50 for months and months, to see this country cower in the corner for Brussels by taking no-deal off the table, securing a Brexit in Name Only, they will be punished in the polls - and deservedly so.  
We are asking members of our group In Limbo Our Brexit Testimonies @inlimbobrexit too to write to their MPs to to support @albertocosta’s amendment. Please do. It’s extremely important! 
Forget work, forget Brexit, forget the looooong to do list... if anyone needs me in the next two days don’t bother as I’ll be skipping on the Pennine Way  #pennineway 
Joining @bricksilk @LesleyRiddoch @AdamRamsay & others today at @BonaveroIHR #Oxford. I’ll argue #Brexit shows the UK Constitution is broken, only solution for Scotland is #independence but #Indyref2 could be a catalyst for constitutional change across the UK 
Ok, so I’ve finally caught up with ‘Fyre’, the Netflix doc about Billy McFarland and his disastrous drippy-tent and no-music festival. Obviously, the similarities with Brexit were striking. A lot of people who thought they were amazing planning a clear piece of shit, but ... 1/ 
I quit the ERG because they weren’t robust enough about wanting an EU referendum.  I hope they don’t now scupper a revised deal. Provided we aren’t locked in the backstop, I think we should approve it. Being in the CU is such bad policy, it won’t survive an election cycle 
“I’ve yet to find a single Association officer who’s seen evidence of #BLUKIP“The Conservative party grassroots is strongly anti-EU. There’s reason to believe they, not UKIP, were the single largest source of Leave activists in the referendum” @wallaceme 
The sad truth is I get more abuse from those using #FBPE tag than racists. This is despite voting for remain, consistently saying Brexit is a mess & if snap election Labour should offer second Brexit vote + using my free time to fight the arch Brexiteer IDS  
Got young people's voices on Brexit with me at the @UN in Copenhagen today.  Discussing how to include young people during development of the next World Health Organisation @WHO European youth strategy. 
We needed the cleanest, most honest, most unimpeachable referendum there was to approve something as drastic as Brexit. It needed to be an exemplary democratic exercise, fully informed and duly compelling. Was it? 
Putin funded Salvini and LePen, Maduro funded Podemos and Syriza. This on top of online assistance, Wikileaks, bots, etc. in Brexit, Trump and elsewhere. Is foreign support the biggest omitted variable in the study of the rise of populist movements?  
Could the swing to PC be accounted for by Labour under Corbyn being pro Brexit whereas PC are pro EU Remain party. Or am I indulging in effort after meaning  
.@IslingtonLabour members have voted for a #PeoplesVote! Islington South & Finsbury CLP last night approved a motion backing a democratic say for the public on the #Brexit disaster. @EmilyThornberry - please listen to the people who select you & the people who elect you 
He is a legendary footballer, the most famous sports broadcaster in the world and, at the same time, a pain in the ass for both ex-defenders and Brexit dads on Twitter. @GaryLineker is the guest of my very first international episode of #COMMANDOS  
The unified argument from the Labour and Conservative parties against the TIG MPs is that voters should be given a chance to change their minds in light of new information, except in the case of the referendum. 
Deal or No Deal, the damage has already been done for the Pound. Brexit is already damaging economy, to weigh on sterling. Median pound forecast for end-2019 has been declining.   
Revolt and RevokeThe people want to #RevokeArticle50 We march on 23/3/19, 12pm, Park Lane, #London#StopBrexit #FBPE @StopBrexitMarch @LoubinWally @lunaperla @RemainingKind @remain_central @dontbrexitfixit @Sime0nStylites @sonofr @MHookins @MarieAnnUK @Brexit @LeedsEurope 
If we crash out of the EU with no-deal we’ll have to negotiate 27 bilateral agreements to ensure healthcare abroad. Worrying considering Fox’s snail pace in signing deals so far!We clearly can’t trust the Govt to protect us from the impacts of #BrexitWe need a #PeoplesVote now! 
The Republic of Ireland will publish its no-deal Brexit legislation today. It addresses citizens’ rights, healthcare, transport, education and energy; including ensuring people from Northern Ireland could still access hospitals in the Republic 
How do we want Brexit?TO LEAVE WITH NO DEALWhen do we want to leave?NOWIs no deal a problem?NO DEAL NO PROBLEM!! 
My five year old son to me just now: “Dad - I don’t like it when @theresa_may is here in Brussels.”“Why?” I ask.“Because it means you be at work for ages for Brexit”. #Brexit even in the mind of a 5-year-old...  
The City may thrive despite Brexit, but the rest of us won’t | Simon Jenkins So, as per usual, banks get special treatment while the rest of the country can go whistle. 
#Mexico | #Indigenous activist and community radio reporter, Samir Flores Soberanes, was shot dead in his home in #Morelos just days before a government #referendum is to take place regarding the construction of two thermoelectric plants. #AMLO 
There a many willing to accept a deal but it would be a madman that takes May's deal that puts the United Kingdom in a very dangerous position just because she says this is the only Brexit possible 
Theresa May warned dozens of Tories could rebel over #Brexit no-deal  
The UK trying to Brexit with no plan.   
Just by existing the @TheIndGroup have put pressure on both Labour and the Tories over Brexit. Remainers in both parties are using it as leverage. Let’s hope it works. 
With each new day, new chaos in Westminster.UK politics is broken, Brexit is all but finished.Hold on to your hats! It's going to get a lot worse yet & it'll go right to the wire.  via @PoliticsHome 
EU expects Theresa May to request a three-month delay, with no sense in Brussels of any other breakthrough 
Here ⁦@alexebarker⁩ confirms what ⁦@jdportes⁩ and I have long argued. If there’s no deal, the EU will wait for the UK to come back to the table and demand agreement in the backstop and Brexit bill.   
Good meeting of the @scotfooddrink Partnership Board. Brexit dominated discussion. Thanks to @BenMacpherson for the discussion on future migration policy, critical to food & drink sector growth (photo). And to @MetabolomicMan & team for driving the debate on food authenticity 
What a cheek. I did know what I was voting for. Anna I never gave you my consent to speak for me so desist. You manifestly have tried to sabotage Brexit since 2016 and can'tspeak for 17.4 million Brexiteers either. You're unelectable. Call a by - election please.  
The City may thrive despite Brexit, but the rest of us won’t | Simon Jenkins  
Michael Howard still repeating the lie that Parliament ‘delegated’the power of decision on #Brexit to the electorate.‘They ‘ constitutionally can’t and didn’t ....  the referendum was ‘advisory’ ... Parliament is sovereign. 
This is an interesting argument. Is it also the case that everyone who believes that there should be by-elections also thinks there should be a second referendum? Presumably so as the arguments for the two are argued to be identical.  
'There needs to be an alternative.'With only 35 days to Brexit, both May and Corbyn could face a slew of MPs leaving the major parties to join the Independent Group.@ChukaUmunna and @heidiallen75  discuss how this new cross-party movement works. 
Call me a dreamer, but I'm holding out for a Clinton/Clinton ticket in 2020:Chelsea and George.And considering the disaster #Brexit's been to #England so far I think all Members of Parliament should be replaced by members of #Parliament ( #Funkadelic ) 
Before Theresa May finally departs the political stage, let's all remind ourselves of her racist values and antisemitic friends in Europe. #r4today #skynews #TorySplit #LBC #GMB#ToryRacism #Brexit #GetTheToriesOut 
When FF and SDLP call for a coalition of parties opposed to #Brexit and their key demand is that Sinn Féin take seats in Westminster it is not really about Brexit.  
Many of your reasons to stay are my reasons to leave. #Brexit  
More lost jobs and revenue for #Britain : the #Brexit contingency plans of the #Pharmaceutical industry: 
Bloody experts. Anyone who thinks that “we’ll be fine” if the UK crashes out of the EU with a no deal Brexit should watch this video and reassess their opinion.  
A damning assessment of the impact of Brexit from US Embassy representatives. 
Labour defectors have left their party as a result of institutional racism, corruption & anti semitism. I hope they win their battle on behalf of democracy and us all The three amigos, they just love a bandwagon, a camera and apparently, hate by elections and referendum results  
About the only thing you can say with any certainty about #Brexit is that the Conservatives own it. It was entirely their decision to open the box. They will be held responsible for the consequences now, and long into the future. 
I didn’t know Aviva were something something something global turndown/diesel/blah blah blah. But nothing to do with Brexit, right?  
So any MP that doesn't support the vote of their constituents is an extremist and undemocratic. Interesting. You'd better have a word with all of your colleagues who were in remain voting constituencies, but support #Brexit. They must all be extremists too. Start with the PM 
As a Vote Leave Co-Ordinator and advocate of Brexit I have a confession to make!I have just received the results of my Family DNA  and Donald Tusk was right I’ve come straight from Hell! 
So, your referendum cannot be declared illegal, purely because it was never legally binding in the first place.But it was, we hear constantly, politically binding. Should it not, therefore, be declared politically invalid?  
Martin Wolf: The UK 'taking back control' through Brexit also includes the right to be stupid.  
Torn to pieces by audience, panel and host.Watch & enjoy as shifty Remoaner hypocrite Chris Leslie MP & his breakaway group are eviscerated on #bbcqt for their “double standards”, “dithering” & “disingenuous” conduct over Brexit & refusal to call by-elections.  Brilliant.  
"How the EU can turn off the UK's lights, under Mrs May's 'deal'."A 2-minute read, like most of our articles.  This one's #Brexit dynamite.Read it here: #GoWTO 
Downing Street delays an announcement on no-deal Brexit tariffs to avoid backlash from MPs so that the report comes after the next Brexit vote in parliament 
Heidi Allen pretends to be caring but actually supported all of the Tories cruel attacks on the poor & underprivileged whilst being two-faced over her views on #brexit.She is a tory & will remain so within @theindgroup We desperately need #JC4PM and the @uklabour brexit plan.  
.@Anna_Soubry demonstrating with crystal clear clarity that she has no idea what Brexit is, or what being in the single market and the customs union means. She’s just playing the race card to try and hide her own ignorance. Absolutely hopeless.  
I made the same point just after the vote: in a 52-48 vote, the "median" was a "liberal leaver". But to pursue that would have meant taking on the "hard" Brexit plurality of Leavers, and May was unwilling to do that, as she made clear at the Con conference and Lancaster House  
“It takes a genius of obstinacy and incompetence to fail to lead the national opposition to the coming cataclysm” @pollytoynbee on Corbyn and Brexit 
So the courts say Wilson v. May that the referendum result was advisory and therefore not legally bound to null and void the result through its illegality, as I understand it. However Cameron stated that the result of the referendum would be carried out, not might be, mandatory?  
It is absolutely clear that Remainers will do all they can to ramp up the fear of leaving.THIS is the broken paradigm, that they can manipulate a whole, proud nation to become a moribund, rule-taking irrelevance.THIS is what Brexit has the chance to fix.No-deal is the ONLY way 
.@JordiTurull VIDEO censored. ENG SUBTITLESSOS RTPresidency Minister's statement at being asked whether he knew that #1Oct #Referendum had been prohibited by SP Constitutional CourtHE lists JUDGEMENTS breached by #Spain  via @YouTube#CatalanTrial 
Earlier this week I was talking to some Labour and Tory MPs from England who all thought Brexit was likely to mean Wales would be the only country left in the union with England. Or maybe not....  
How is it a second referendum on the Lisbon Treaty didn't destroy Ireland's faith in democracy? That they are happy & prosperous?Gov't is pumping out propaganda, keeping the public stupid & stupefied.May's *DUTY* to delivery Brexit, like it's taking bitter medicine, is a lie. 
BBC Sweaty - "Jo Swinson to slam Brexit and independence in conference speech"This is the party that propped up the Tories and led us to Brexit. This is a political prostitute. 
This is a very good day for Kenya. I congratulate the judges for not allowing this subversion of the constitution.If they want to force gaysim & lesbianism on us let them go the people with a referendum.Proud of the judges.HAPPY DAY FOR KENYA. #Repeal162 
This gentleman certainly speaks for me and I would say he also speaks for many like me...! #Brexit #Leave 
.@BBCBenWright suggests PM might push her rotten Brexit deal through next week if she sees ‘a break in the weather’RT if you think this political brinkmanship is a disgraceful way to make the most important decision our country has faced for a century#StopBrexitSaveBritain 
#brexit With only just over a month to go & Theresa May still running down the clock, Jeremy Corbyn's plan is now being seen as the only sensible & workable solution. #politicslive 
Here is @TheIndGroup's @Anna_Soubry on @lbc yesterday explaining how she has been contacted by many constituents that voted leave in 2016 but, now they have seen realities and ramifications of #brexit, they have changed their minds. They are #Remainernow Indeed. #PeoplesVote 
Four cabinet ministers and five junior ministers could resign if Theresa May doesn't rule out a no-deal Brexit.@richardgaisford has more. 
The City may thrive despite Brexit, but the rest of us won’t | Simon Jenkins  
Crystal clear the vast majority of people across Britain just want to get on with Brexit now & leave the EU.17.4 million people voted for Brexit, more likely 25 million Brexiteers now, see our economy strengthening & golden global trade opportunities opening up #LetsgoWTO 
A former senior adviser to the Canadian Minister of Trade has stated that #Canada will be keen to strike a #Brexit trade deal immediately after the #UK leaves the #EU.#CANZUK #cdnpoli #auspol #nzpol #ukpolitics 
He shouts about 'honouring democracy' his lot criminally cheated in the 2016 EU referendum.He was revealed last night >(by @Otto_English) as former UKIP parliamentary candidate Stephen Ingram. 
Aviva to move £9bn worth of assets to Ireland in preparation for no-deal BrexitWhen they say our exports are mostly services, insurance is one of the sectors they’re talking about. This is a massive loss to our economy, jobs and tax yields#StopBrexit 
Shortly after the #Brexit vote, Fitch downgraded #UK’s credit rating from AA+ to AA in ’16. It has suddenly put rating on negative watch owing to uncertainty over #Brexit. A ‘no-deal #Brexit’ can endanger the sovereign bond rating of the #UK. 
840 Hours Until Brexit Britain was taken in under false pretenses and kept in the EU under false pretenses. Brexit is the truth. Brexit is how people across Britain really feel about the unelected undemocratic sinister EU dictatorship. 
The Independent Group is made up of hypocrites and liars. These MPs promised to respect the referendum result and yet now they’re agitating against it. Their aim is clear: to thwart Brexit and sell out British voters.  
Last week, lots of news outlets suggested Mark Carney said Brexit could usher in a ‘golden era’ of free trade. Theresa May was even asked a question about it in PMQs. But he didn't say it.  Here's what went wrong—and why it matters: #brexit #PMQs 
We cannot allow Liam Fox’s post-Brexit trade plans to go unscrutinisedRemember TTIP and anti-democratic #ISDS clause, empowering corporations to sue governments?Fox planning to sign up to similar deals behind closed doorsSpread the word! #StopBrexit 
No one wants to knock the BBC, but their political programming & biased coverage of Brexit has been, and is, contemptible. 
The EU43 years of lies, deceit and betrayal to take Britain in and keep us there.Brexit is the response to that burning injustice.  
Report on no-deal Brexit tariffs delayed by Downing Street - The Sun  
That bloke in the audience demanding that Brexit be delivered is Stephen Ingram  - former UKIP parliamentary candidate for Chester, and this week’s winner of @bbcquestiontime’s “spot the plant” competition! 
ALL ABOUT BREXIT. TIG was the last baby-throwing-toys-out-of-pram option for sore Remainiac Anna Soubry when it dawned on her that the only other option was a desperate act of public nudity. #csm #brexit #TIG 
‘You have a duty to dance to the tune that was given to you in 2016, get on with it’ This audience member says that politicians are failing to carry out the result of the EU referendum in 2016.  #bbcqt 
British voters are as split as their Parliament is on Brexit  
No-deal Brexit risks Eurostar chaos at St Pancras, says report  
CO State House passes terrible #NationalPopularVote bill. @jaredpolis will prob sign it. I'll support effort to stop it by "veto referendum" & any recall effort with a decent chance of success against any CO politician who voted for it. Dems just sold out CO. @630khow #copolitics 
No such thing as a Hard Brexit. I’ll never forgive the remoaners who have messed this up. Bring on WTO EXIT Brexit news: Jean-Claude Juncker admits TIRED Brussels preparing for HARD BREXIT | Politics | News |  
No-deal Brexit would take a chip off UK home values: Reuters poll  
Since the #Brexit vote I have read Japan media. It's easy to translate on google. Japan no longer trusts the UK and have been saying for over a year they will pull out all industry from UK as it UK promised it as their entrance to EU. They are scathing in being cheated by UK. 
May faces ministerial revolt over no-deal #BrexitCan they pls just bloody well get on & do it...you can't trust her...Bring her & her #BrexitShambles down.#StopBrexitSaveBritain#RevokeA50 & #Remain in Control in the EU with our Best Possible Deal. 
“Political antidotes to the sinister pathologies unleashed by Putin, Erdoğan, Modi, Brexit and Trump require a reckoning with the bad new days”-just this sentence alone is enough to give you pause in the long read below.  
Seeing brexit unravel and now especially watching @gracefituk new video explaining brexit is just making me mad at our country that so many people voted leave and many of the reasons why they did will now likely backfire and get worse (NHS) or were of racist origin 
actually, it was ~13%. At the start of 2016 it was closer to 5%Only 13% of us thought that Brexit was "the most/other important issues facing Britain today?" when the referendum was announced. So why did we have it in the first place?  
Quiz! What % of British people asked during the UK National Attitudes Survey said Brexit was the most important issue facing the UK in 2015?(when the referendum was announced)#BrexitDebate 
Brexit happens in 35 days. 
Ummm. So you voted for a Party without reading its manifesto first, in particular the part headed: "NEGOTIATING BREXIT".Speaks volumes I'm afraid to say @Femi_Sorry.Come on you have to be cringing. That's a howler. 
Official 62-page list of "Brexit Unknowns" was published by the HOC in September 2018. Five months later, pretty much none of the questions have been answered. No wonder businesses are sweating bullets, and multinationals are calling removals firms! 
In Brexit, could Ireland wear the crown?  
Brexit is going to ruin ESCAPE TO THE CONTINENT!!!!!!!!!!!!! 
How Brexit is working!ENGLAND: voted Leave, getting what it wantedWALES: voted Leave, getting what it wantedNORTHERN IRELAND: voted Remain, getting special treatmentGIBRALTAR: voted Remain, getting special treatmentSCOTLAND: voted Remain, getting nothing & being ignored 
Late night meme  #IndependentGroup #brexit  
Leavers have persuaded themselves that the unilateral contingency measures taken by the EU are sufficient to avoid a catastrophe - but avoiding chaos on day one does not let us off the hook by a long shot.#Brexit  
Brexit: no-deal fatigue - analogous to metal fatigue, fracture occurs after it has been weakened by repeated stresses, far beyond design tolerance. Even the strongest steel can give way once fatigue sets in and Brexit looks to be no different...  #Brexit.  
A sold-out event! @ucalgaryalumni enjoying wine and cheese pairings from Argentina, Canada and UK, paired on TOP of that with an expert panel talking about economics, immigration policy and Brexit! #UCalgaryAlumni 
"... a ‘Bachelor of Western Civilisation’ seems at best redundant and at worst regressive, an echo of the colonial triumphalism that cost millions of lives and still produces such bizarre sequelae as the Cook voyage and Brexit." @patstokes 
PM facing fresh rebellion by Conservative MPs opposed to no-deal Brexit  
Author is News-watch founder David Keighley. News-watch is a front media company for hard right-wing anti-EU 'think tanks.' It has been commissioned for reports by the likes of Hoey & Ian Paisley. And has been funded by Arron Banks.cc @PeterKGeoghegan 
"He says he will do all he can to avoid a No Deal Brexit"Did anyone bother to ask him to elaborate on what action he would be prepared to take to do that?All he ever does is spout whatever empty rhetoric he thinks will earn him brownie points...pointless gutter politics.  
It is stupid, or underhanded of Parliament to get rid of no deal before May is able to secure a legally binding time limit to the backstop. Can only assume they are thick, or they are trying to stop May getting a deal in the hope they can stop Brexit full stop. 
Former British Prime Minister John Major demands immediate halt to #Brexit, as is every sane person in the country - yes, there are still a few of us left, #JohnOliver! #RevokeArticle50 
We must have a ratification referendum once the final deal is known so that the electorate have another opportunity to reconsider the issue in the light of what we know now and can choose either the final deal or remain 
According to the Telegraph, 100 Tory MPs will block a no deal Brexit by voting to extend Article 50should May’s deal fail. Clearly the Commons will betray the people despite its earlier votes to leave on 29 March. 
Okinawa referendum: everything you need to know  
Brexit: Theresa May warned dozens of Tories could rebel over no-deal  
Former Greek Finance Minister warned the European Union is to embark on a path of "great decline" after Britain officially leaves the bloc on March 29. Yanis Varioufakis insisted Brexit is "one of the symptoms" signalling the union will slowly disintegrate  
@ChrisLeslieMP says there isn’t time for By Elections because Brexit!  Yet found time to set up a new Group and leave the Lab Party when Brexit is days away! He also thinks there is time to hold a Peoples Vote! What a hypocrite he is . #TheIndependentGroup #Democracy #BBCqt 
According to the Guardian 25 members of the government will next week defy May and vote to extend Article 50 to prevent a no deal Brexit. 
“And it’s Barnes to Lineker, back to Barnes, Lineker again, both Centre Forward, back to Barnes - quick têt-a-têt on proportional representation and the stinging idiocy of brexit - back to Lineker - Waddle going mental out on the right-wing here - but sensibly back to Barnes...” 
Why haven’t I seen this before? The soundtrack to Brexit.  
And the facts of Brexit point to it being a disaster. Not because MPs don't believe enough, or are dragging their feet, but because of the inherent nature of our EU membership and what we're obliged to give up by leaving. 
I wonder if it has dawned on Conservative voters that the sweeping dictatorial powers the May regime has seized to bully their precious Brexit through, dispensing with parliament, will be available for any future Corbyn Govt to apply freely across a Lab programme too?  
Revealing tweet.This isn’t about a “new politics.” It is yet another shiny new attempt by the same old establishment figures to try and block the democratic wishes of 17.4 Million Voters.We won. Brexit must and will mean exit. Anything less is betrayal. #WTOBrexitNOW 
Brexiters promised “trade deals on day one” in the referendum.In fact, trade deals with major markets like Japan and Turkey won’t be completed in time.Brexit was sold on a pack of lies.Write to your MP to demand they #RevokeA50 & #StopBrexit. 
Sorry I used my 2017 tweet. Just hunted down the full clip.She said this at a time when the country needed (still does) politicians to stamp out the racism that Brexit 'legitimised'. Instead she dog-whistled, by mixing the legitimate need for change with the above Nationalism.  
Hi there #bbcqt - You keep giving prominence to Pro-#Brexit individuals who have undisclosed history. This time the man you promote in this video clip  is a former @UKIP candidate named Stephen Ingram. Why has @BBCNews become institutionally dishonest? 
There is no doubt that the referendum was illegal. But because it was *advisory* there is nothing we can do about it. We have been well and truly conned.  So much for democracy. #StopBrexitSaveBritain #PeoplesVote 
This kind of arrogance is why Brexit has been such a shitshow. Over estimating Britain’s importance to the EU . You can have belief in your country, but don’t allow it to blind you to reality . EU will never abandon Varadkar nor ROI.  
It's not a win. It's a triple lock worse than Remain deal. It's designed to stymie Brexit, sacrifice yet more sovereignty & pave way for associate membership / eventual rejoin. I;d rather a clear betrayal by political class, than death by a 1,000 cuts w/ May's deal. 
Well said John Barnes The smartest people know their limitationsIt’s only idiots who think they know more than the experts - as we’ve learned from brexit 
My wife thinks I am autistic because she considers me to be obsessive about #brexit. No my dear, I'm not obsessive, I just feel betrayed by what @theresa_may and her remainer friends are doing to my beloved country. I will never give in, unless we get what we voted for, #Brexit. 
I can't help but note parallels between Brexit and election 2016. In a vote tinged with racism and misinformation, folks in the UK voted to take leave of the EU. Similarly, in an election tinged with racism and misinformation, folks in the US voted to take leave of our sanity. 
Brexit-Lovers Twitter is easIly the most fucking embarrassing thing you'll ever set eyes on.  
I'm 5'6 in socks. Wear man boots that should but don't fit. And I will wear a Yellow Jacket and fight for Brexit. I can't believe 17.4m people are allowing 650 corrupt slugs the right to fight in defence of their gravy train over Sovereignty.Knowing how that was won  
22.02.19 propaganda machine. in all honesty, i’m just having as much fun as i can before brexit kicks in 22.02.19 
Brexit is 863 hours away. #brexit 
What do we want?BREXIT When do we want it?NOWRT & LIKE if you WANT to get on with a NO-DEAL BREXIT!! 
It's a myth to say that Labour only won 40% of the vote in 2017 because of anti-Brexit tactical voters.In reality, only 8% of Lab voters named Brexit as the most important issue, compared to 48% of Tories & 31% of Lib Dems.Source: Ashcroft, June 2017  
NO-DEAL INEVITABLE: Fuming EU condemns Brexit talks as POINTLESS as FATIGUE risks progress. The bullshit and the pretence continues but carry on - we're pretty thick and believe everything.   
#bbcqt ABSOLUTE GEM OF AN AUDIENCE MEMBERI absolutely f*cking LOVE THE BLOKESpeaking for every one of us patriotic brexiteersWE DEMAND OUR WINNING LEAVE VOTE IS IMPLEMENTEDNext week WILL RESULT IN SERIOUS CIVIL UNREST, if MPs vote to EFFECTIVELY KILL OFF #Brexit  
John Barnes is completely correct in that the majority of people do not understand the complexities of Brexit. Which begs the question... why did we rely purely upon democracy to determine our future relationship with the EU? #bbcqt 
Such a silly thing to say. i didn't take a view on #Brexit & never have. I agreed with John Barnes the electorate is poorly informed. I have long thought the electorate have been badly served by both sides of the argument in setting out factual evidence supporting their case.  
You @bbcquestiontime have a duty to point out that:51.8% Voting= 37% Voters= Just 26.5% of the PplExpressing a Non-Binding opinion for several versions of #Brexit, none of which existed at the time.Will you mentionLiesIllegalitiesLost MandatesRights Removed w/o Consent?  
I wish we could offer Irish passports to all remainers - that would ease the brexit blow on the sensible half of the population 
Removing citizenship...In that this govt is master!Everyone born since 1993 was born an EU citizen.And #Brexit removes their EU citizenship.Sajid Javid's removal of British citizenship is but continuity.None of this is acceptable.Not now; not ever.  #bbcqt 
BREXIT: It’s all about looking on the bright side, you see.  
Chris voted leave in 2016 but he changed his mind a long time ago & is an active #remainernowHe has written this great little article for @pmpmagtoday about why an ‘informed consent vote’ on Brexit is now the only option.@chrisoram1990, top work. 
Fed up with this #Brexit nonsense?Don't just sit there muttering at the idiocy on #bbcqt. Make sure you're in London for the #PutItToThePeople March on 23 March! Seats are going so fast on ours from #Cornwall we may have to book more buses. 
Remember this, the next time you’re watching Brendan O’Neill of @spikedonline .....How US billionaires are fuelling the hard-right cause in Britain | George Monbiot  #brexit 
The UK's Post Brexit tariffs remain unannounced, but the public has strong assurances from cabinet ministers that they will be completely eliminated and remain fully in place. The weather remains shitty. 
Theresa May's response to the sharp rise in hate crime after the Brexit vote was to basically say "Hey Racists, ALL ABOARD!" Really moderate... #bbcqt 
I would vote for a No Deal Brexit rather than No Brexit. But a majority of MPs in the House of Commons won’t. And they never will. So Brexiteers have to come to their senses. 
I refuse to respect a referendum that was vitiated on illegality.The result of a referendum is only legitimate when all parties adhere to established laws.Why can't people see that the biggest betrayal of democracy is breaching electoral law to achieve an agenda #bbcqt 
John Barnes says he’s an ordinary person & doesn’t overly understand all the machinations of #Brexit or wider politics. Funny that, as he’s coming across at the smartest, most clued in panelist on #BBCQT by far. 
John Barnes was right, the average voter does not understand as much about the ramifications of Brexit as the experts warning against it. I don't know why that was so shocking to say?, for example the average person has teeth but it doesn't mean they are dentists #bbcqt 
Chris Leslie spent 2yrs trying to get rid Corbyn by slagging him off in the media. Then Labour gained 3.5m votes in the 2017 GE because of Corbyn's brilliant manifesto and Leslie realised Corbyn was untouchable. Since then, he's been itching to leave. #Brexit is an excuse. #bbcqt 
So the Brexit guy in the audience demanding that Brexit be delivered is Stephen Ingram  - former UKIP parliamentary candidate for Chester. You don't think that merited a mention #bbcqt 
#BBCQT Getting sick of anybody supporting Brexit being associated with the right wing or far right. Even Fiona Bruce on BBC Question Time is attempting to reinforce that interpretation. Meanwhile Independent Group who oppose Brexit are referred to as "centrist" and "moderate"?! 
WATCH | @Ella_M_Whelan to @TheIndGroup MPs: "You claim the facts have changed on Brexit so there should be another vote. Well surely the facts have changed in relation to your standing as a politician. By your own logic, you should stand yourself up for a by-election!"  #BBCQT 
I was a Remainer. I lost the argument. I understand the dangers of not delivering Brexit. But if Brexiteers aren’t prepared to accept a deal on Brexit, there’s nothing anyone can do. Because a No Deal Brexit just isn’t happening. Whatever anyone may want. 
I get it that Bertie Ahern has quite a lot of baggage. But where it comes to Brexit, our relationship with the EU, the UK and the effects on NI, there probably isn’t a more qualified former officeholder in the land to proffer a view 
#BBCQT @officialbarnesy makes the perfectly valid point that very few fully understand the complex economic and political nuances of #Brexit and is belittled by others on the panel. 'Forgive them, they know know what they do'. Mr Barnes was telling it like it is. 
Brendan O'Neill of Spiked Online on @SkyNews preaching the virtues of a no-deal. What viewers haven't been told is that Spiked Online is a mouthpiece for Kremlin propaganda, and what O'Neill is doing on the show is spouting the perfect Kremlin line.#skypapers #skynews#Brexit 
John Barnes quite rightly points out most ordinary people do not understand the full ramifications, the legal and economic ramifications, of Brexit. MPs cringe but he's clearly right on that #BBCQT 
#bbcqt Sorry, don’t know who you are, but John Barnes is right. Most people don’t understand the complexities of #Brexit . It doesn’t mean you’re thick - it’s a big issue  
Can't we just stick all the No Deal Brexit wankers in a little corner of Kent?Let them live out their fucking deluded Empire fantasies there?Better that than giving them star billing in your audience.#BBCQT 
"Just get on with it" means " I havent paid attention to how complex this all is and still believe there's a simple answer to the over simplistic referendum question. 
Thank God for @Ella_M_Whelan & articulate audience members- real question of democracy less by-elections & more betrayal of democratic vote for #Brexit & double standard of demanding #PeoplesVote to overturn one vote but avoiding winning mandate from voters for themselves #BBCQT 
Well done John Barnes. At last someone speaking truth. The average person absolutely does not understand Brexit. On both sides. The real elites hate anyone daring to mention that because it risks unearthing their precious, ridiculous fantasy #bbcqt 
The ballot paper said "Leave the European Union". The Deal takes us out of the EU. Yet Brexit voters almost all hate it.That proves the Brexit question wasn't specific enough to be a clear mandate FOR ANYTHING.So stop saying "Get on with it".... WITH WHAT?!#BBCqt 
Does QT audience really not realise that the outcome of the referendum doesn't affect the outcome of Brexit. There's no connection between the two. A vote can't make Brexit a success, any more than you could vote to win the lottery. Cause and effect don't work like that. #bbcqt 
I mean Brexit is all very well but wait...what?  
Friday’s Guardian: “May faces ministerial revolt in move to head off no-deal Brexit” #bbcpapers #tomorrowspaperstoday (Via @AllieHBNews) 
@bbcquestiontime “I don’t understand the results of the referendum but listen to the nonsense I spout!” #bbcqt 
#BBCQT surprise surprise, nonsense already spouted about the new @TheIndGroup being anti democratic and trying to stop Brexit and gone unchallenged. What is undemocratic is claiming a remain voice has no place in the debate especially given the mounting evidence of Brexit damage. 
Brexit: Japan trade deal will not be completed by deadline  
No one normal still wants Brexit 
Further thoughts on today’s court decision:1. Anyone including foreign powers can buy our democracy using fraud and dark money. 2. Extreme constitutional changes can be implemented by advisory referendum with no checks or balances but stuffed full of fraud.  
Chris Leslie is such a hypocrite. Supports a ''Peoples vote'' on Brexit yet wont even give his constituents the chance to ratify his decision to leave the Labour Party in a by-election.Completely epitomizes the undemocratic nature of this IG none party. #bbcqt 
The Economist has built a model that calculates an individual's attitude to Brexit  
The #Brexit blame game has really taken off now.One thing's for sure: none of the leading Brexiters will *ever* accept responsibility for this absolute catastrophe they have brought about.#StopBrexit #PutItToThePeople #PeoplesVote #bbcqt 
‘You have a duty to dance to the tune that was given to you in 2016, get on with it’This audience member says that politicians are failing to carry out the result of the EU referendum in 2016.  #bbcqt 
ahhh, just settling down for another balanced Question Time Brexit debate featuring Mel Stride, Andy McDonald, Chris Leslie and John Barnes for Remain versus Ella Whelan for Leave. Should be another informative episode. 
Will any of the defectors who want to re-run the #Brexit referendum re-run their own elections? Their inconsistency of principle is spectacular.#BBCQT 
“Take off the table a no Deal Brexit “ are code words for Remaining in the EU and betraying voters... No Deal premise is the guarantee that the EU will give us a crap deal forcing us into submission.They do think voters are stupid!!! 
In the last election I know a lot of people here in Exeter voted for pro-EU Ben Bradshaw while reluctant to give their vote to a Brexit-supporting manifesto. The only alternative was a Tory Brexiter and Ben is a fine MP.Sometimes people do vote for the person and not the party. 
Brexit  
I can't believe my eyes. @itvnews have just done a piece on Graham Hughes, the well known remainer and people's vote campaigner, stockpiling food for brexit. 
Brexit has been THE topic for 3 years now. If you're only just attempting to understand why 17.4 million people voted differently to you, your disregard for their views might be part of the problem?  
.@ToffTalks getting it bang on re BrexitI know loads of people who voted remain who don’t regret voting that way, but now are happy we are leaving   
I initiated each of the three Brexit cases to succeed. That's a matter of public record. 
Its vg to see such broad cross-party & cross-referendum support for @AlbertoCostaMP amendment to ring-fence citizens rights for @BritishInEurope & @the3million Please ask your MP to back it. Hope govt & MEPs will work to help to build EU27 support too. 
How is it the @TheIndGroup can say by-elections would be a distraction from the #brexit crisis after the storm they caused? Do the democratic thing and let all of your constituents decide if they wanted you or your party #Independantgroup #ByElectionsNow 
I was going to make a decision on my @Conservatives membership at the end of March but this devastating analysis of the #Brexit political declaration is clear evidence that May intends to deliver #BRINO . It’s a huge stitch up so why wait? 
Japan has a trade deal with EU. Singapore has a trade deal with EU. Britain does not have a trade deal with EU from 30 March. Dyson. Honda. Nissan. Panasonic. Sony.... etc ... nothing to do with Brexit. Nothing to see here....  
“Nothing has changed! Nothing! Has! Changed!”May is unable to deal with a crisis on her own party, let alone Brexit.  
It refers to HER QC in the Twitter write up. She knows it's in all but name an illegal act to accept the referendum. The term "cannot be accepted as the will of the people" was used. Damn right it cannot. But she IS!  
*This* is the kind of target that a cohesive, ambitious, world-leading, small new country should adopt. Responding to the greatest demands of our era. Not footering about in the sub-imperial ruins of Brexit.   
Remember those Brexit impact assessments, in excruciating detail, that suddenly didn't exist?I've found them...  
Thousands march against Catalan referendum trial during general strike  
An Indigenous environmental activist, organizing against a gas pipeline, was murdered yesterday in the state of Morelos just days before a referendum on the project. The government is not postponing the vote, which the state prosecutor claimed was unrelated to the murder.  
None of it is necessary. Stop calling it a process. It's not a process. It's completely, utterly, madly unnecessary #bbcnews #Brexit 
A third of the cabinet could walk out if Theresa May steers the country towards a no-deal Brexit.  
Friday’s GUARDIAN: “May faces ministerial revolt in move to head off no-deal Brexit” #bbcpapers #tomorrowspaperstoday 
That's because Juncker and the European Union have known all along that a No Deal Brexit would be devastating for them.  
Former Greek Minister, Yanis Varoufakis: EU will embark on a path of "great decline" after Britain Leaves on March 29.#Brexit is "a symptom of the disintegration of the EU"Brussels "underestimates" the risk Britain Leaving poses to the Eurozone.#EU 
Over the line and straight into a long transition where the British state enforces EU laws the UK parliament has no influence over. Because by this point Brexit has become reduced to an end in itself  
Yes, all the Swedish MPs hoped that post-Brexit, the EU will grant the UK a special, bespoke, very close relationship on security, foreign policy and defence - and that it will think less about precedent than it has done in Brexit talks hitherto. @CER_EU 
Jeremy Corbyn inching closer to backing a second referendumGive him a nudge Kier.   
We’ll be thrown under the bus by the EU. They won’t forsake their divorce settlement from Britain for our sake. The change of narrative points to this despite platitudes from Leo & Coveney #RTEPT #Brexit 
Theresa May faces ministerial revolt over no-deal BrexitSomehow, she must be stopped.  
“On Thursday night, members of the Islington South constituency party voted in support of a second referendum with the local MP, the shadow foreign secretary, Emily Thornberry, in attendance.Thornberry had urged members not to pass the motion”  
Thousands march against Catalan referendum trial during general strike. @I_CSC #21F 
Brexit, Gove and the renunciation of cheap food.  Martin Wolf demolishes the Leavers’ sloppy thinking  via @financialtimes 
Anna also didn't realise that, whilst most of us have very serious issues and disagreements with Mrs May on Brexit, she is still a decent, courageous woman who has earned much respect for those qualities - and NOT A RACIST. As for you Anna... 
I want a Chris Grayling Brexit.Think about it 
Soubry understand this.People dont like liars.People don’t like ppl who fail their Party.You have now left the Tory Party twice.Heaven knows why they took you back.Lastly the majority of ppl can’t stand being told by you what they think about Brexit.  
Finally some bikes back on the TV this weekend, had enough of seeing Gemma Collins face planting and hearing about brexit  
Former British Prime Minister John Major demands immediate halt to Brexit like everyvsane person in the UK. 
There are two good reasons to abandon Brexit altogether.The country is not reconciled to it even after three years of trying, and  if you force it and it fails, it'll tear the country apart. 
Brexit is beyond politics. Adversarial point-scoring political rhetoric can no longer can solve the issues. It’s a matter of morality: how much we care about its effects on poorest and most vulnerable 
Dear MPs,We’re now just 5 weeks from a disastrous No Deal Brexit. Perhaps it might be worth spending the weekend reflecting on whether you want to part of that, or whether the time has come to work for your constituents and your country, rather than for Labour or the Tories. 
Brexit means never having to say you're sorry 
I love how many of you have started podcasts, YouTube channels etc etc.So proud of everyone thriving regardless of how shambolic Brexit is looking  
I'm a loyal and dedicated #FBPE member. I know your new party is our only hope. I don't care about people starving and dying. I just want to be able to still eat avocado's. I love that you will sacrifice everything and everyone just so there's no brexit 
...Companies like Honda, with long standing connections to the UK, are withdrawing their production. Political leadership is needed to calm the worries common to many companies of what the future will be after Brexit...3/ 
....It is difficult for foreign companies to accept that in addition to the  threat of a no deal Brexit, the lack of clarity as to the future of the  business environment continues in the long term... 2/ 
Gloves off at the Nikkei, Japan's main business newspaper, owner of the FT: Editorial reads: "It is a problem if the UK government takes Honda's statement that their decision to close Swindon had nothing to do with Brexit at face value ...1/ 
EXCL: Group of 100 Tory MPs have warned Theresa May they will rebel against the government to force her to delay Brexit if she cannot reach a deal. 
This is the most constructive level-headed piece I’ve read on The Topic for some time There’s only one way out of this Brexit nightmare – revoke Article 50  
Those who have repeatedly claimed to be "politically homeless" who are now rallying behind MPs who have willfully made themselves politically homeless and are advocating Labour's Brexit policy is peak #FBPEpic.twitter.com/QvhGalRj30 
BARKLEY OH MY DAYS!!! PRIME DECO STUFF! BREXIT RONALDINHO! ooh yesss 
This puts the UK in such a weak position. There are ships full of containers already on their way to Japan, due to arrive after Brexit day. We will have to grovel for an extension. “All deals will be ready one minute after midnight”, said Fox.  Shysters.  
Jeremy Corbyn inching closer to backing a second referendum  
Brexit: Thick people telling smart people what's best for them 
Sinn Féin Faughan representative Conor Heaney has urged people living in the Claudy area concerned about the impact of Brexit to attend the ‘Beyond Brexit What next for Ireland?’event taking place in the village next Monday night (25th February)  
Jeremy Corbyn and Labour should stick to their guns on Brexit and make sure a 2nd referendum is an absolute last resort.Corbyn’s five demands are sensible, Parliament could back them and senior EU figures have said the plan is promising.Also, don’t give the splitters an inch.  
The best #Brexit video yet @David_Cameron 
No-deal Brexit could cause food prices to soar by 45%, retailers warn  
#Brexit is going to wreck our country, and you’re happy with it. You’re a mess.  
I understand nine cabinet ministers are threatening to resign if Theresa May doesn't rule out a no deal #Brexit next week. So, what does this mean? Well, it could mean Theresa May is forced to extend Article50. And, if Article50 is extended, a #PeoplesVote will come into play. 
labour back stabbing scab traitors  want to let people have another vote on the referendum but dont want people to vote again in a by election? 
5 things that might happen after Brexit. Brecession. Bretaliation. Brethink. Breferendum. Breentry. 
So in court today it was found that the referendum would have been immediately QUASHED due to illegalities...IF it was MANDATORY. As it is ADVISORY it CANNOT be. Let that sink in. @UKEUchallenge are heroes for trying as far as I'm concerned. 
Corbyn wants Brexit for himself, and his own motivations - the country is secondary. Supporting Corbyn IS supporting #Brexit, the two cannot be separated.  
When I speak to ordinary folk with only a passing interest in politics about Brexit, 2 things become clear: - People had no idea A50 was supposed to be 2 years and consider the length of negotiations/process itself to be a sign of policy failure - Most people are tired of it. 
In all the debate on citizens’ rights post-Brexit let me be clear: I don’t want to be accepted as Irish, I don’t seek to assert myself as Irish or be identified as Irish. I AM Irish. It is as innate and unchangeable a characteristic in me as my curly hair.  
Jean-Claude Juncker says he has Brexit "fatigue" and describes Britain's split from the EU as "a disaster"  
No deal does not mean no Brexit!No deal does not mean no Brexit!No deal does not mean no Brexit! No deal does not mean no Brexit!No deal does not mean no Brexit!No deal does not mean no Brexit!No deal does not mean no Brexit!7 times lucky? 
Brexit  
I still find it beyond belief that an illegal advisory referendum is still considered to be a legitimate basis for jeopardising the future well being of our country. 
Brexit 2016:“Cheap food thru no tariffs, roll over existing EU trade deals, get better trade deal elsewhere”Brexit 2019:“We keep food tariffs, states refuse to roll over EU trade deals or give us better deals”Still, leavers knew exactly what they were voting for.... 
Of all the positives of Brexit, the most telling, is how it smoked out the duplicitous politicians, willing to thwart our referendum result to leave the EU. And they wonder why we have zero trust in our politicians. Shameless and in plain sight. 
My taxi driver from the Madrid airport to my hotel pointed out correctly that #Brexit is both stupid and crazy. 
#Mexico | #Indigenous activist and community radio reporter, Samir Flores Soberanes, was shot dead in his home in #Morelos just days before a government #referendum is to take place regarding the construction of two thermoelectric plants. #AMLO 
The message seems to be that rules don’t matter if a referendum is advisory. In other words the whole thing was founded on lawlessness. 
Does anyone else get annoyed when they say on Question Time "now we have to move on from Brexit" as if anything else in the political world matters right now. It's like ignoring an impending asteroid strike to talk about bin collections. #BBCQT 
Definitely worth a read Revealed: How dark money is winning ‘the Brexit influencing game’ | openDemocracy  
And equally less surprisingly: "The EU signaled on Thursday that talks between Brexit Secretary Steve Barclay, Attorney General Geoffrey Cox and EU chief Brexit negotiator Michel Barnier didn’t reach a breakthrough" via @bpolitics 
Theresa May faces ministerial revolt over no-deal Brexit: Up to 25 government members could vote for delay rather than allow UK to crash out  
Anna Soubry was roasted royally on LBC today because> She demands a second EU referendum but refuses to stand for re-election herself> Her veiled allegations of racism against Mrs May are unacceptable> She has betrayed her constituency who voted LeaveWhat did she expect? 
Things we'll KNOW in a 2nd referendum that were disputed in 2016- UK trade deals after Brexit will be worse than before - UK has weak hand in negotiations and 'Cake and eat it' is off the agenda- NI peace process is destabilised by hard Brexit - £350m for the NHS is a lie 
BBCQT has had many panels with only one Brexiteer, despite a 52% win for Leave in the referendum, and it definitely highlights the disproportionality of views held by people who have a career in politics and the ordinary citizens who live with the consequences of their decisions. 
Ireland is more exposed than any other EU country to the impact of Brexit. 37% of all Ireland's food exports went to the UK in 2018.Ireland exports 51% (253,000t) of the beef it produces to the UK, worth €1.3bn to the economy.  
You won’t get a better video than this explaining Brexit.  
Look around the Western world. If you want dysfunctionality, there are only two places to go: London and Washington (via @bopinion) 
The European Union expects U.K. Prime Minister Theresa May to be forced to request a three-month delay to Brexit, two EU officials said  
Yet another iconic British-made brand threatened by #Brexit.Aston Martin CEO: "A no-deal Brexit is frankly madness.”#StopBrext #PutItToThePeople #PeoplesVote 
Spain welcomes provisional Brexit airline deal  
Oh dear. We need to somehow link this to Brexit. Any thoughts? 
Random middle aged person on Twitter: "I have voted Labour all my life but I can't now because of Brexit"Labour's 1983 manifesto literally pledged to take us out of the EU without a referendum, so I strongly suspect you're talking directly from your rear end. 
Sorry to hear that! This unfortunate decision may be legal, but sure as hell is not just! @theresa_may Brexit self-coup, with @jeremycorbyn's political help and 3 lined whips, has literally made the UK banana republic: 
I've tweeted this previously and make no apologies for doing so today, or tomorrow, the day after that and every day  from then on until the result of the referendum is respected. A reminder that #17.4millionbetrayedPlease retweet if you feel the same, thank you  
May's Brexit is worse than no Brexit. Bring the house down before caving to this.  
Thank you for your unwavering support!We're down, but that's only temporary while batteries recharged, & we're certainly not out!I haven't lost my voice yet & I'm not stopping until I'm hoarse!We've still got a Brexit to get cancelled!@UKEUchallenge @BremainInSpain 
#Brexit Republic Ep 28 OUT NOW: What will Tory and Labour defections mean for Brexit? Will the Middle East bring peace to Europe at this weekend's Sharm El Sheikh summit?@tconnellyRTE & I discuss as the sand in the glass runs out. 
WONDERFUL when Brexit date comes:  UK HAS NO INTERNATIONAL TRADE AGREEMENTSUK HAS NO INTERNATIONAL TRADE AGREEMENTSUK HAS NO INTERNATIONAL TRADE AGREEMENTS(I have lived in a forest before - how about you?)  
The world is now witness to the facts about the unsound referendum.We'll make sure to put that knowledge to good use.@UKEUchallenge 
Remember everyone, nothing to do with Brexit!  
So @Brexit did this poll, but it seems to be tainted so let's redo it: Brexit is a "disaster," Jean-Claude Juncker says  what do you think? RT & Share. 
Coming home in the car, listening to a one-hour News programme and was delighted to hear long in-depth discussion and analysis of Brexit with no Labour people involved. Fave moment: two Tories discussing Labour's position. Carry on. 
The parliament of #Iceland (@Althingi) passes a resolution proposal that condemns "the response of the Spanish government on #Catalonia's independence referendum including the arrests of Catalan politicians and the trial against the movement."  
An indigenous environmental activist was killed in Morelos, Mexico Wednesday, three days before a referendum on the construction of a gas pipeline and two thermoelectric plants that he had organized to oppose.  
“If the data we have is confirmed, this is the second most successful general strike in 15 years, only surpassed by that of October 3 (right after the referendum). We ill not let them destroy our rights!! #21FVagaGeneral #MakeaMove #FreeCatalonia #PeoplePower 
I’ve had an email from one of my Wool suppliers telling me how they are navigating Brexit which is far more than the actual government has communicated  
Another broken Brexit promise  
'Brexit is a SYMPTOM!' Yanis Varoufakis warns European Union 'DISINTEGRATION' is coming- @theresa_may 
There’s something deeply disturbing about the insistence there is little more money for schools and the millions already spent (without question) on the administration of Brexit. 
BBC’s pro-EU partisanship returned with a vengeance after the more balanced referendum coverage and debate.BBC regulator ⁦@Ofcom⁩ has now dismissed a Newswatch complaint whose research showed a clear bias by presenters and in their choice of guests 
Can I just say from the off, I'm really not into the framing of this Brexit show on ITV as the "Border blocking Brexit". I'd see it as more a "Brexit that the people of NI DIDN'T want" or perhaps "The Brexit jeopardising the GFA" or maybe "UKG didn't consider NI in Brexit"..... 
The #Brexit haemorrhage continues: #Britain’s largest insurance company, Aviva, to move £9,000,000,000 worth of assets to Ireland: 
In response to a substantive question put forward by @NiallSF at today's #GFA Committee hearing Tánaiste Simon Conveney recognised the identity provisions of the Agreement but failed to acknowledge the NI citizens having their GFA right to be accepted as Irish ldenied #Brexit  
Really exciting event in Dalymount Park on Feb 28th. ‘Brexit, Borders and Why we can Never go Back’ is  organised by @1GaryGannon with Truth & Reconciliation campaigners @MiamiShowband and @EugeneReavey1 as well as our own @CarlyBee25 Join us for this really important event! 
Anna Soubry: I want a 2nd referendum, a 'People's Vote', a vote for democracy!Well, l must say Anna, i'm touched. In that case, how about a 'People's Vote' in your own constituency of Broxtowe, albeit a tiny 839 majority? I'm sure they'll back you!UTTER SILENCE, she's done one. 
BBC News - Brexit: Japan trade deal will not be ready by deadline  What a total disgrace, a useless Dr Fox, working alongside Mrs May who hates immigrants. Of course we all know there is another name for what Mrs May is. #FBPE 
If you're in any doubt that Brexit & Trump aren't the same problem then the Court of Appeal decision in the @UKEUchallenge today should stop any confusion.It's ok for politicians to use corrupt & illegal practices for political gain, apparently. 
So as MPs are the Sovereign body Parliament they could "decide the Ref was illegal and call it Null & Void" They could also Vote to Revoke Art 50Can we send a copy of the case notes to all MPsWe will then have to hold MPs Responsible 
The EU had more positivity towards Corbyn's trip today & his ideas for #Brexit, than they've had for the Tories in 2 years.May's deal is a stinker, leaving us weeks from the cliff. So let's remember the Tories' "do you really want Corbyn handling Brexit?" campaign back in 2017 
This cannot be said enough. May’s QC saying an advisory referendum cannot be fraudulent and judges saying referendum would have been void if it wasn’t advisory. MPs still feel they must be bound by such a fraud !!!  
Angela Smith was elected by Labour voters in a Leave constituency. She's now an Independent MP and a very vocal Remainer. What legitimate argument does she have to refuse a by-election? #Brexit #ByElectionNow #PeoplesVote 
Can’t believe this. If I read it right, the Court of Appeal has ruled that had the referendum been mandatory, the result would have been annulled, but since it was advisory the result stands, despite all the illegality by the Leave side. Insane.  
Dave Brown on the Tory and Labour defectors joining the Independent Group #Chuka #Conservatives #IndependentGroup #Brexit #LabourSplit #TheresaMay - political cartoon gallery in London  
Long term followers will be familiar with my Brexit as bad software deployment analogy. We've now reached the point at which half the staff have left or are leaving and the deploy date will inevitably get extended but nobody will admit it yet 
I’m afraid you’re stuck with it, Carrie, because you have helped unleash far right forces which may devour you too. It’s a bit like saying Brexit has nothing to do with Trump-ism ( as some do), but it does, both expressions of populist nationalism articulating anti-globalism 
"Ultra right-wing." I'm glad the UK press has kept its integrity throughout the Brexit process.  
' Many brexit voters sadly soon to hear . " Here's your P45 , get over it , you won ". 
So we need just 3 more Tory defectors for the government to collapse, who should we be working on? #FBPE #XenophobeMay #StopBrexitSaveBritain #Brexit #REVOKEArticle50NOW 
The SNP say a no deal Brexit would be a disaster for the economy therefore they voted no dealStupid fuckers. 
This man was made Brexit secretary to strike a deal with 27 European countries. He doesn't even know the geography or dynamics of his own country or the other 3 countries in the union his party governs over.  
I met up with @GraceFitUK and we answered Danny Dyer's question: What is Brexit? 
Nobody knows how this brexit is going to pan out...nobody.Yet we're told that this mystery outcome , definitely "is the will of the people."Like f*** it is. lets just check eh?#Peoplesvote 
Excellent! : Two senior Tories ready to resign if May fails to change Brexit direction  
Can you imagine if ever since the referendum @bbcquestiontime had 4 Brexiteers to 1 Remainer?Remainers would be apoplectic, Ofcom would interveneThis is exactly what's happened in reverseBBC bias and prejudice against leave voters is so undeniable they've given up caring 
Great to have @TSSAunion and @IWGBunion organise a meeting of Trade Unions Against #Brexit - thanks to all our great speakers and all of you who turned up!  
Using a mixture of scattered crow bones and salt, the Conservative Party’s Chief Brexit Shaman further divines The Will of The People. Whitehall, 2019.  
A delay beyond the EU election would very likely mean the U.K. participating in the poll and electing MEPs. If this is the case ⁦@Nigel_Farage⁩ will lead The Brexit Party to a thumping victory. Think very carefully before you betray the voters.   
I've been against Brexit from the start.But looking at our leaders today, I'm starting to think Britain would be doing the world a favour if we left the entire planet. 
In the period since Christmas I’ve been tweeting less than usual - the Brexit stalemate left me deflated and with nothing new to comment on. Now @TheIndGroup have broken that. I’m back!!!  
Paisley expects EU to pressure Ireland to ‘move aside’ in Brexit talks  
Next week will be the moment when all MPs have the chance to stop a no deal Brexit. We must take it.  
*POLL* Constituents of #Broxtowe, who would you vote for if @Anna_Soubry honourably resigns & calls a #ByElectionsNow?Retweet for a Larger Sample!#TorySplit #LabourSpilt #Brexit #IndependentGroup #PeoplesVote #StandUp4Brexit #FinalSay #WTOBrexit #FBPE #WTOLetsGo #StopBrexit 
Brexit Commemorative Art Print - As banned from Facebook 
This is a lie.  The Tories are using lies in an attempt to distract Scots from the impending economic economic disaster of Brexit.  It's the sort of nasty little trick someone like Trump would use.  
These parliamentary defections indeed generate a major shift in British politics. Away from a clean Brexit.I now have grave doubts that the UK will leave the EU cleanly on 29 March 2019.If that happens, I do not foresee anything other than the words 'revulsion' and 'revolt'. 
Watching the #c4news interview with Jess Phillips one could almost feel her pain. So many sensible MPs forced to face up to the toxicity of Labour & Conservatives. It might not all be about #Brexit but Brexit has brought it to the fore.We so urgently need a #PeoplesVote. 
I’m getting promoted tweets from Labour Leave.They are panicking that Brexit is dying.Question is, who is funding these promoted tweets? More Tory donors or is it straight from Putin or Trump?  
Huge Brexit billboard erected in Brussels for Theresa May’s visitPity May can't see past the end of her nose  
Don't miss the best moments of Mundó's statement! #MundóAcusa@CarlesMundo: “The referendum wasn't financed with public money" #JudiciALaDemocràcia 
URGENT APPEAL: Wanting to get as many posters and leaflets printed as possible to distribute at demos and across the UK! We need WTO Brexit on the 29th of March! Any donations we receive goes to direct campaigning so please support us now:  
I see folk still think that "No Deal" equals "No Brexit"No Deal means the absolute worst. It means no imports/exports, food/medicine gone, no chance of a holiday abroad, industries bankrupt from day 1 etc etc 
At this rate we might be celebrating #Brexit at the same time we celebrate #Trump2020 victory.The globalists must not win. 
Also tonight - Theresa May faces ministerial revolt over no-deal Brexit, with up to 22 expected to vote for plans to extend Article 50. Cabinet sources insist they would have to be sacked.  
Meeting senior staff at Peterborough City Hospital.  Very professional and well-prepared, they’re taking Brexit risks in their stride. But recruitment is the major issue, and the vacancy rate of around 8% could get worse if Brexit causes a large exodus of staff.  
Corbyn inching closer to backing a second referendum under intense pressure from senior figures including Starmer to prevent more MPs from leaving the party and spike the guns of the TIG-ers  
You voted for a no deal Brexit when you handed the Tories an unopposed Art50 activation.This entire crisis is as much your fault as it is the Tories. Incompetent, inept, second rate politics #WeDeserveBetter 
Even more daft that we should just continue because we've started, & we're nearing the end! That might be more of an argument if we were in any way ready!I'm a completer/finisher by nature but I could die happy knowing Brexit won't be completed!@BremainInSpain @UKEUchallenge 
BRITISH BOATS BEACHED BY MAY’S NON-BREXIT BREXITAnother example of why PM’s Withdrawal Agreement is not fit for purposeRead Why Here  
"Contrary to some wonderful articles circulating on the Twittersphere, there is no revolutionary socialist pro-migrant Brexit on offer. The Brexit we are facing is reactionary, and history won't judge it kindly." @MoyerLee 
So neither May nor Corbyn accept any personal fault. Both of them believe they are perfect politicians at the top of their game. It's such vanity, arrogance and misguided self-certainty is why we have this Brexit shambles.  
Theresa May faces ministerial revolt over no-deal Brexit  
I’ve spent all day on a course about setting up a Customs Warehouse to mitigate some of the impact of Brexit. They should have made everyone go on it prior to the referendum. 
Juncker has said that he has Brexit fatigue and is not optimistic that Britain will leave the EU with a deal. Great. 
The past three weeks have just been a complete waste of time as Theresa May panders to the Brexit ultras in her party, while running down the clock.(As I noted back then while the Tories were still 'united' around the 'Malthouse Compromise,' and 'Alternative Arrangements.')  
Filming with @sleafordmods at the @100clubLondon for BBC #PoliticsLive. Discussing their new album #EtonAlive, #Brexit and the @TheIndGroup 
Valiant effort on a legal challenge to the validity of the EU referendum but it was never going to fly. 
Dominic Grieve and Justine Greening say they will quit the Tories if there is a no deal.They will be deselected anyway. But a NO deal would suit us, if not their perverted form of honouring the peoples referendum. 
Nothing that happened today takes away from the fact that #VoteLeaveBrokeTheLaw & that May's decision to trigger A50 was based on an unsound referendum result that did not represent the will of the people.The next referendum cannot be conducted in the same way.@UKEUchallenge 
#Brexit is 869 hours away.  We must leave. No strings. #Brexitmeansexit #ClimateDerangementSyndrome 
It has been categorically found that the referendum would have been annulled had it been mandatory - therefore the result is unsafe.We have been hustled.#StopBrexitSaveBritain 
I’m leaving after Brexit. ( I’m born and bred English ) But helping patients who are responsible for my kids future and rights being removed .... (Most of my patients are 50+) No, I’m off to Scotland and campaigning for indyref2 
If Brexit is Delayed I Will Stand for the Brexit Party! Reece Haynes stood up to say that if Brexit is delayed he will stand for the Brexit Party in the European Elections. Fair play. Please RT! #BrugesGroup #GreatBrexitDebate 
And with me tonight Anna Soubry former business minister under David Cameron, now a back bencher campaigning against almost any form of #Brexit 
Being part of the EU, real solidarity, is better than the half baked Brexit schemes of Corbyn and May. @MichelBarnier @simoncoveney 
There’s only one way out of this Brexit nightmare, says Paul Collier: revoke Article 50  
This news has huge positive implications for jobs, prosperity, balance of payments, energy security. It could be North Sea Oil all over again. Imagine Germany still depending on Russian gas while Brexit Britain has its own domestic supplies!       
BBC-SKY NEWS - BREAKINGIt has emerged that MPs are stockpiling vast expenses so they can continue to cause utter chaos in the post years Brexit era too. 
Join us on Tuesday with @DavidLammy @AlexSobel @JoStevensLabour @mdbuckley @mikegalsworthy @RupaHuq to talk about how to make a public vote on Brexit @UKLabour policy before it's too late.As the Brexit clock ticks down it's time to act.Sign up here: 
Well done Sue, exposing shady manipulation & getting it on record will all help expose the politicians who are knowingly leading the people into a poorer post #brexit life, hopefully MP's will have to justify these selfish decisions under @cpsuk misconduct in public office. #FBPE 
"Jeremy, Brexit destroys jobs, it's making us all poorer, and it's destroying our party."Well done @mccanntb! 
The EU has 40 trade deals that cover 70 countries - that's around 37% of the  economy. All of them are better than WTO terms no-deal would force on .  49 days out from Brexit most have not been replicated by the UK . To protect UK trade we need to avoid no deal at all costs  
'I thought he before the referendum he said he was going to sort out a better deal with the whole EU over a cup of tea in an afternoon . It's almost as if he's a bit of a fibber. You'd have to be a bit simple to be taken in by him 
I was talking to a woman the other night in the pub. Saying I was thinking of getting some extra food supplies in just in case. 'Oh don't be daft' she said. 'Brexit won't happen. It'll be a No Deal and things will just carry on as they are'. Nearly fell off my chair.... 
Statement from Brexit department: ‘Yesterday, the Prime Minister reiterated that the simplest way to get legally binding changes on the backstop is to reopen the Withdrawal Agreement. That remains the Government’s position.’Which bit of the EU not reopening WA does PM not get? 
.@Telegraph cartoon#tiggers #Conservatives #IndependentGroup #Brexit #LabourSplit #TheresaMay 
Tory ministers' secret no deal Brexit plot to slash tariffs on imports would smash our UK ceramics sector to pieces.We're fighting to #StopZeroTariffs  
Need to ask, what does "No Deal Brexit" mean to you?A: Staying in the EU, nothing changes, everything stays as it is now.B: Leaving the EU without an agreement in place, everything changes. 
This is the level of interest in the Free Trade Deal debate in parliament today...#Brexit pic.twitter.com/RormfTjAX2 
As with @adamboultonSKY anyone who believes in Brexit is far right , it’s new narrative as we get closer to leaving.  
Mrs May (to the Tory TIG group):" I have sought to bring people back together."Of all the sordid, purulent, toxic untruths of Brexit this one undoubtedly walks off with the Custard Cream. 
In the midst of Brexit chaos and climate breakdown literally ALL the Tories can talk about is a discretionary power on car park charges which has existed in England for years. It's probably the most dishonest, infantile campaign I've seen in 30 years.  
The #IndependentGroup confirming they'd offer a supply and confidence deal to the Tories for a second EU referendum, actually sickens me.People are dying under austerity and they want to help it continue.Shame on you @TheIndGroup. 
I'm sick and tired of BBC News openly celebrating MPs who have reneged on their manifesto promises.I understand that it's institutionally against #Brexit, but these politicians are  self-serving bigots whose only interest is to keep us in the EU. 
EU BETRAYAL: How Gordon Brown 'SURRENDERED Britain’s sovereignty and REJECTED referendum'  
I don’t agree that @TheIndGroup is just a remainer revolt. In my view, the #IndependentGroup is much worse. They’re the most revolting of all remainers. They have no belief in our country and no respect for their own voters, let alone those who voted for #Brexit.  
I warned you. Oh, how I warned you. But no, you wouldn't listen. You knew better, used pithy phrases like, "We want our country back." You were hypnotized by the hate bus. Well, look at you now. The reality of Brexit is happening before your waking eyes.  
'TWO FINGERS UP!' EU DESTROYS May's plan to save Brexit deal - 'UK tearing itself apart!' No Problem, Leave No Deal! Bonus we will lose Grieve, Greening& Hammond! Not long to go! Champagne is on ice!  
Patrick Stewart says he's 'alarmed, concerned and scared' about Brexit  
The U.K. Department for International Trade has confirmed it won’t be able to roll over the trade deal with Japan that it benefits from through its EU membership in time for Brexit, nor with Turkey, Algeria, San Marino, Andorra.  
The Costa Amendment on #citizensrights of the 3.6m EU citizens in the UK & 1.2m @BritishInEurope featured in tonight's @EveningStandard. Over 100 cross party MPs from both sides of the Brexit debate already signed the @AlbertoCostaMP amendment. 
We don't have money to pay nurses but we have money to conduct a referendum.Fucked up country!!!! 
The UK is now officially a banana republic. Provided a referendum is labelled “advisory” the result stands even if illegally procured. That the result of it is subsequently treated as inviolable is neither here nor there. Don’t expect anything but advisory refs in future.  
President Juncker says he is experiencing 'Brexit fatigue'. He could make it all go away very quickly by offering us a better deal.  
#angelasmith arguing that a #PeoplesVote for #Brexit and a people’s vote in the form of a #byelection are not the same...#Hypocrite #SplittersCoup #IndependentGroup 
We have urged MPs to honour their manifesto promises and deliver Brexit. You stood on those promises , ratted on them , switched parties and won’t give the voters a chance to either back you or sack you. We don’t need any lessons in democracy from you !  
Jon Snow was talking about this quite a while ago. I was amazed then that so many people thought ‘No Deal’ means no Brexit. It’s frightening that even now people still don’t understand. If May allows it to happen, much of Britain will literally ‘not know what’s hit it’.  
The £39 billion we owe for Brexit *includes* €9.75 billion in pensions liabilities. So when Brexiters threaten that we could "walk away without paying a penny" they're willing to stiff people out of pensions, as well as demonstrate our untrustworthiness. 
Far from making Javid look strong, it manages to make Britain look both callous and weak. A government that thinks it can take on the world with Brexit can’t take back a bereaved teenaged mother with fundamentalist delusions.  
You are a far right, nationalist, ERG extremist.You threaten the nation with a #NoDeal BrexitYou don't like #FoM, Customs Unions or the #SingleMarketYou are don't like business, frictionless trade or immigrationYou are a complete loony.#PeoplesVote#FinalSayForAll 
The Independent Group's position on Brexit is exactly the same as Corbyn's  
Wow @BBCPM you surpass yourself. Inviting Tom Harwood from Guido Fawkes on to discuss whether the Hard-Right has taken over the Tory Party. Harwood was "head of media" at Beleave - remember? the dark-funded fake Brexit campaign that led to Darren Grimes being fined £20k for fraud 
Labour and Tories are now combining. If 3 unionist parties are formed, none will have the interests of the Scottish electorate in relation to Brexit or Independence. We need a Yes.  
Colorado just voted to give our Electoral votes to whoever wins the Popular vote in a Presidential Election.  Goodbye Constitution. We have a bunch of Anti-Americans running this state. #Recall #Referendum #Colopolitics #CoSenate #CoHouse #CoLeg #CoGov 
Ros Altmann: Brexit was sold under false pretences and is much worse than every pensions mis-selling scandal   
The British people should get the final say on the Brexit deal, with the option to remain in the EU. Agree? Add your name:  
I admire you so much more now than ever Mr Corbyn. A calm rational brexit shadow team to break this awful Tory deadlockThank you allKeir Starmer Emily Thornberry. All of the labour MPs who have shown loyalty I thank you as well. @UKLabour  
If the British people were being told the true implications of a NoDeal #Brexit on their lives they'd be shocked and horrified. Parliament being asked to ram through new laws giving powers to any minister to empower anyone they like to spend taxpayers money. I kid you not! 
The Brexit delusion of creating Singapore-upon-Thames — Far from offering stability to global businesses, UK is busily blowing up the basis on which they went to UK. Far from guaranteeing favourable access to its main free trade bloc, UK is leaving it 
Brexit: ‘It’s like Pompeii again if Pompeii voted for the volcano’That’s what US TV is saying about Brexit.If only there was better reporting of this disaster in the UK.Write to your MP to demand #RevokeA50 & #Remain. 
Only sensible thing to do is to revoke article 50, which should never have been triggered so hastily without careful consideration of the effect of Brexit on Britain.  
Labour's alternative Brexit plan could break the deadlock, command the support of parliament and bring our country together.After meetings today in Brussels, it’s clear that our alternative is credible and could be negotiated with the EU.  
European Commission President Jean-Claude Juncker complains of 'Brexit fatigue'  
No Tory Leave MPs doing reverse Grieve by saying they will quit party if Brexit isn’t delivered, I note. What are we to make of that? 
What a brilliant, principled and erudite woman Toff is. Not easy being a young person and supporting #Brexit amongst the groupthink (just ask @Brexit4Students). Even harder admitting you voted #Remain and have now changed your mind.#Respect  
HUMANITY vs INSANITY #113 - 7.30pm TONIGHT The 21st Century WAR CRIMINAL now using Israeli funding to undermine BREXIT & finance his return to British Politics ... to represent the interests of Israel and the Global Corporatist Agenda. #TreasonousMPs 
You cannot be liberal and a member of the ERG. Your version of hard-Brexit strips us all of our rights. It is the antithesis of liberal. Nasty, unkind, un generous, xenophobic, blinkered, unfriendly and economically disastrous both for us and our friendly neighbours. 
Rupert the bear - brexitPaddington bear - remain 
No exaggeration, this is absolutely horrendous.The full analysis of the #Brexit Political Declaration confirms that May’s deal truly is Remain-in-all-but-name.Send this to your MP and demand they vote against it.#StandFirm #BRINO 
"Can a new centrist party appeal beyond political journalists thrilled to be writing about something other than Brexit?" @janemerrick23 
BREAKING: In reaction to Colorado House approving National Popular Vote bill today, local elected officials in Mesa and El Paso counties have filed a referendum petition with Secretary of State's Office to bring the measure to the voters in 2020. #coleg 
May’s claims on the political declaration are false. They are an attempt to obscure the decisive difference between her deal and Corbyn’s policyMy piece on Brexit in the @IndyVoices 
Oh. My. God.People really do no understand that “No deal” means EXIT with no deal.  They think it means No Brexit.  
No-deal Brexit 'could disrupt London commuter trains'  
It’s insane we are pursuing Brexit like a rabid dog after all you have exposed. Honestly Sue we are so grateful for your efforts. We are on the right side of history and you proved that x 
These Honda workers are furious and they’re right.Where is @theresa_may? Where is @GregClarkMP? Who is heading to Swindon to explain why Brexit is good for them? Who is reassuring them that the government will help them find new, skilled, well-paid jobs?#JustMakeItStop 
"Brexit is a symptom of the disintegration of the European Union."Former Greek Finance Minister Yanis Varoufakis says Brexit will cause "no great discontinuity, just a great decline both of the European Union and Britain."  
The Government is trying to sneak investor-state dispute settlement (ISDS) mechanisms into future trade deals by waving the whole thing through Parliament when it's overloaded by Brexit. ISDS would allow private companies to sue the Government for losses. 
Liam Fox admits Japan trade deal will not be completed by Brexit day  
Brexit Lil Kesh. Can't get that stuff outta mi head.  
Young people at Warwick Uni don’t want Brexit. (Just like young people everywhere across the UK.)  
Ireland is hugely reliant on the UK market and more exposed than any other #EU country to the impact of #Brexit. 37% of all its food exports went to the UK last year. There are around 100,000 farmers involved in beef production, all reliant on the UK.#NoDeal #WTO 
"I do think the majority of people in Britain, however they voted in the referendum, didn't vote to see their rights torn up, didn't vote to see jobs lost and didn't vote for disruption on the day we leave the European Union."Jeremy Corbyn#Brexit #JC4PM 
Irish goods exports to the US continued to surge last year, despite trade tensions.The American market is now worth three times more than the British one. #Brexit  
UK government says it won’t be able to roll over the trade agreements it has with Japan, Turkey, Andorra/San Marino through EU by #Brexit day if there’s no deal + and Algeria unlikely –  
Nice try @theresa_may but your Conservative Party is neither "moderate" nor "open-hearted." You have spent your time in office appeasing the hard right ERG, threatening hard Brexit and demonising migrants to win votes. You have caused irreparable damage to the UK.  
Did you see in the High Court today the referendum was deemed "unsafe" and if it was binding rather than advisory then it would have been annulled? If you still support it, you don't believe in democracy, you believe in Brexit. Nothing more. 
The UK Government has confirmed that existing systems for horse import to the UK from the EU will remain in place for a No Deal, a measure which British racing fully supports. #Brexit #BritishRacing 
No Deal Brexit  
Packed meeting @CambridgeLDs to discuss Brexit and the threat of No Deal. Unbelievable incompetence that we’ve got this far with nothing resolved. Climate change, health, social care, and more - all sacrificed to dominance of Brexit. The only way to proceed is a People’s Vote.  
Maybe @ChukaUmunna or @Anna_Soubry could use their new-found exposure to raise a question for the PM along the lines of "given the referendum wouldve been declared void had it been legally binding; why does the PM continue to pursue policy based on an unsafe election result?" 
 @ScotParl has passed a #ScotBudget that provides stability and protects our public services in the face of a damaging Tory Brexit.  
If the referendum had been a mandatory vote and not advisory, the referendum result would have had to be declared null and void because of illegality. The reason the win for leave stands is because of its advisory nature only. There is nothing democratic about a corrupted vote 
Michael Gove accuses Philip Hammond of failing to prepare Britain for no-deal Brexit 
The referendum result was unsound. This has been evidenced in court today. But because the referendum was only advisory it cannot be declared null and void. #StopBrexitSaveProbity 
I swear on my son this just happened.My wife (Sarah) on phone to her mum.Sarah: "I need your marriage cert for my Irish passport."Mum: "You won't need an Irish passport anyway."Sarah: "Why?"Mum: "Brexit won't happen. It'll be a no deal." 
Brexit Britain is like an amalgam of -Kafka - much of what he wroteAlice in Wonderland'1984'Invasion of the Body Snatchers (film)Parallax View (just as ultimate consipiracy thriller, also film)Bleak House (just the court bits)Catch-22The Scream (painting)Anything else? 
Remember this moment. Our Brexit plan, that the media call “fantasy politics”, would likely get us a deal with the EU. No more uncertainty. You’ll probably be lucky to get a few seconds of this clip on the news tonight. #BBCQT 
Very unsatisfactory outcome which sounds like a Catch 22 parody.  If Referendum Act had made the result binding it would have been voided. But because it was not binding but still treated as binding, the principle of its legality must be ignored ? Makes a mockery of our system. 
me preparing for Brexit  
Liam Fox said an EU free trade deal would “be the easiest in human history”.He promised 40 deals to be signed the “second after” Brexit.He’s failing even by these terms, and instead is pursuing quick agreements without adequate scrutiny. Yet more shambles from the Tories. 
My timeline seems to be full of bad stuff that Brexit is causing and/or contributing to. What are the best accounts to follow for all the tangible benefits? 
Gov't rhetoric sounded like it was a mandate. People believed it. But when it came to a safeguard in legislation, Gov't said no!'Cause It's advisory.Then PM treated it as mandatory: just delivering the result.Schrödinger's cat's BREXITPig's breakfast 
Looking forward to an open and honest conversation with people on all sides of the #Brexit debate in #Brighton tomorrow.This is a chance to listen to each other and find shared solutions to entrenched problems. #PeoplesVoiceFor tickets:  
The smartest/ most democratic way to leave the EU would be to vote Leave, negotiate the deal, then have a referendum to make sure people actually approved of the deal. BUT, so it doesn't affect the negotiations, not tell anyone there'd be a ratification referendum until after. 
Of course we're bitterly disappointed with court ruling but so glad we came this far. The court thought our case of significant importance to grant a full day & live feed.Now the world has witnessed our strong legal arguments - the referendum result was unsound.@UKEUchallenge 
Good to see @JonathanPlaid calling for reopening the Aberystwyth to Carmarthen line in Parliament this week, pointing out that north-south rail links in Wales are terrible. I’m in Carmarthen campaigning against Brexit on 10 March & will back his campaign! 
I think that when TM sat down with remainers after the vote to work out how to overturn the result they expected this war on Brexit would make us give up That Project Fear 2.0 would work. That we'd change our minds. That we'd surrenderProblem is. We haven't. Far from it 
As usual Sir Ivan Rogers slays the unicorns.. I’m always impressed by this wise man’s restraint ( albeit mixed with incredulousness) when he has to confront egregious delusions about life after Brexit  
THAT BBC BIAS AGAIN pt 4256Shouty right wing Brexiter makes stuff up "60% Labour voted for Brexit!"Host does not challengeBrexiter says thing againHost fails to challengeBBC later corrects "66% Labour voted Remain"Host says Brexiter has retractedBrexiter hides apology  
“To break manifesto pledges now would risk dangerous electoral consequences. A happier approach would be to take account of the clearly expressed wishes of Parliament & deliver the Brexit British people voted for” @patel4witham @annietrev @mariacaulfield 
Sick of #Brexit? @AndrewCooper__explains that whether voters like it or not, we can't "just get it over with".The truth is that Brexit hasn't started yet and it will dominate our political discourse for years to come - at the expense of all other issues  
I'm genuinely confused as to why No-Deal Brexit doesn't constitute a national emergency. 
The word 'colony' does not feature in either the Withdrawal Agreement or the Political Declaration. Nor, for that matter, in any of the Brexit documentation concerning Gibraltar. The Parliament's opposition to the Spanish footnote yesterday was led by a Czech liberal MEP.  
No you won’t. You’ll facilitate the hard-right wing coup that is Brexit in the hope that the people of this country suffer enough to turn to you in desperation.  
One of the great myths of Brexit was that we could instantly sign new trade deals whilst seamlessly rolling over the existing deals we already have with over 70 countries as a member of the EU. This has been shown to simply not be true. 
Significant Corbyn is still focussing on blocking a No Deal Brexit. If he wanted to begin rolling the pitch for a embracing a second referendum this was the moment to do it. And he hasn't. 
Don't miss the best moments of Bassa's statement! #BassaAcusa@dolorsbassac: “The referendum was not a crime because it was expressly decriminalised in 2005” #JudiciALaDemocràcia 
The magic grandpa act has given way to Angry Brexit Man.  
That is unless you consider that Im a human being worried for my fellow Countrymen rather than an alright Jack! Interestingly most hauliers are very very worried about Brexit.  
What makes me laugh, is that the 11 have been calling for a public vote on Brexit, but refuse to let the public vote on their decision! #hypocrites 
Corbyn insists second referendum is central to Labour's agendacould've fooled us!!  i guess that means we'll see you on the #PutItToThePeople march next month then eh @jeremycorbyn? 23.03.19, 12pm, do make a note of it.  #PeoplesVote 
I’d like to put on record my support for Rory McIlroy who has decided not to play the #IrishOpen this year so he can concentrate on the British Open Championship.After Brexit, Ireland will become a sporting wasteland cut off from the rest of the civilised world. Rule Britannia! 
We're running a people powered campaign to win a People's Vote.Britain deserves better than a botched Brexit forced through by Theresa May. The people must have the final say on this mess, and the option to stay in the EU  
From bumblebees to wildcats, our nature is in trouble. #Brexit puts at risk environmental protections that Scottish #wildlife and landscapes depend on. Join us and @ScotLINK in telling @scotgov we need a #ScottishEnvironmentAct!  #WTScotland 
Life after Brexit.  
(shop checkout fixed now) To mark this week's historic Brexit contretemps between @DrPhillipLeeMP and @CamillaTominey, we present this unique commemorative mug made by craftsmen of the Remainiacs Mint. Yours for a tenner.  pic.twitter.com/DpxyZgDiOu 
I have a long-standing theory that the Lib Dems would be polling double what they are now if they'd said: "Fuck the referendum, we're staying in," rather than mimsying about with a second referendum. Combo of the WaitroseFBPE and those who just want a simple answer. 
I've said it once and I will say it again. None of Brexit's backers are doing badly out of it.  
All this drama & unnecessary chaos could have been sorted by a robust public inquiry and a second referendum based solely on the reason that the first one was won illegally. British politicians have failed us. 
Confirmation from the trade minister in summing up today's debate: Parliament will *not* have a meaningful vote on any future post #Brexit trade deal. There will not be a written mandate. There not be a meaningful consultation based on objectives and impact assessments. 
#UKinEUChallenge what we found out today is that breaking the law is fine because despite having a regulatory body finding the Leave campaigns guilty of electoral fraud, and worse, that decision can be ignored by the Prime Minister whilst parliament sits there and does nothing. 
Since 1990 we have had 5 centrist Prime Ministers all of whom supported remain in the referendum.The idea that it’s time for a new centrist party is laughable. They have been in power for nearly 30 years and are now trying to frustrate the will of the people over Brexit. 
So buying a referendum is OKIgnoring cheating is OK.Too bad if regulators are slow to act.Where does this leave British democracy and the rule of law?Major reforms necessary. 
What people need to understand is that if we leave, this Brexit debate will go on for years to come due to ongoing negotiations about our future relationship with the EU. So there's still time to speak up about how brexit concerns you. Demand a #PeoplesVote #PutItToThePeople 
We are delighted by this news. AFB has long called on the government to simply commit to funding the existing arts programs currently funded through @europe_creative post-Brexit. It's a shame this has only just been announced, but better late than never.  
  *EU SIGNALS NO BREAKTHROUGH IN #BREXIT TALKS IN BRUSSELS - BBG*EU SIGNALS NO BREAKTHROUGH IN BREXIT TALKS IN BRUSSELS*COVENEY: DON'T HAVE BREXIT DEAL YET, COULD GET ONE BY END-MARCH 
We have a new CHILDREN'S STICKER                                                     BREXIT IS BONKERSOrder yours now, all profits go back in to EU flags for events and flagbombing.  
Luciana Berger, Chris Leslie, Gavin Shuker and Angela Smith are on record as opposing electoral reform. Mike Gapes voted for AV in the Referendum in 2011 but opposed PR.  
The plan? Spend years propping up an austerity government, in exchange for a Brexit referendum that said government will inevitably expand huge energies undermining us over, and which we will therefore almost certainly lose  
That is a contradiction in terms. Respectfully Jeremy Corbyn, whose Labour  party has no workable policies that deliver Brexit unconditionally, is stirring up trouble. He is not in a position to negotiate! He is NOT part of government! 
Brexit SOLUTION: Copy Australia on trade and enjoy 'YEARS of economic growth'THE AUSTRALIAN High Commissioner has argued that the UK should seize the opportunity to trade with the rest of the world once it loses its “EU constraints.”  
BBC bias against Brexit is off the charts.  
"Forget the Independent Group's marketing spiel about how it stands for a "different culture". What unites its members is Brexit, and their desire to stop it in another referendum. " 
Brexit is stripping 65 million citizens of their EU citizenship irrespective of whether individuals want to or not. If someone wants to forgoe their EU citizenship then fine but it is an act of totalitarianism to remove if from those that want to retain it. Future generations ? 
It’s being pushed because it’s a nice distraction for the government from there shit show known as Brexit 
Oh come on Guy! You NOW KNOW that the 2016 UK EU Referendum leave vote was procured by multiple crimes and paid for with DIRTY MONEY - why not stop playing politics and state the true position? No EU State can use a criminally procured vote to leave the EU. That's not democracy 
Pre-referendum ad issued by ... & what’s transpired since. But, although irreparable damage has already been wrought by the referendum result, we don’t need to prolong our agony by making things worse. We can still #StopBrexit via a #PeoplesVote. 
Labour today admitted that their option of Brexit will also damage the economy, not as badly as Tories but almost as bad with 4% damage to GDP ... All options of Brexit are bad hence I ll be tabling the #RevokeA50 ammendedment again for next Wednesday. 
Brexit and a hard or nodeal is 100% the responsibility of the tories...how on earth has any of this been blamed on Labour? Oh wait..THE TORIES CONTROL ALMOST ALL THE MAINSTREAM MEDIA 
GV: "We reiterated to Mr Corbyn, that in our view, the solution to the current impasse is an upgraded political declaration. The Brexit outcome now depends largely on whether UK's political leaders can put cooperation and the national interest before adversarial partisanship." 
A video showing the leaders of  #Brexit as the 29th of March is closing in.  
Sadiq Khan blasted after anti-Brexit campaign chief given £9m contract to oversee London elections  
Today I am in Brussels with @jeremycorbyn and Shadow Cabinet colleagues.I had meetings discussing how a No-Deal Brexit poses a threat to our justice system and security.Theresa May's approach to Brexit is reckless and irresponsible.  
A message to all MPs (please RT if you agree).If you resign because of a no-deal Brexit AFTER we leave the EU, it's a futile, empty gesture adding insult to injury. At that point, you will ALREADY have failed to act in the best interests of your constituents, and of the nation. 
Jim Allister: Brexit backstop is so damaging to Union with Great Britain it cannot be tolerated for a day, let alone five years - Belfast Newsletter  
Wow! This document lays bare the yawning gulf between Liam Fox's ambition for post-Brexit trade deals, and the reality of what has and will be achieved. Like promising to cater for a wedding, then turning up with an individual-size bag of crisps and a four-pack of Coca Cola.  
The Independent Group offers to prop up Theresa May's government in exchange for another Brexit referendum.  
This is right. Brexit won’t stop on 30 March, even if we crash our without a deal. UK’s relations with the EU will be a central feature of our politics for a long time, eg. with an on-going argument about “soft” vs “hard”, customs arrangements, FoM of people, Irish border etc  
British voters are unimpressed by Theresa May’s Brexit deal. The people most likely to support it are also the least interested in politics. 
The long-standing argument that the UK would really struggle to rollover 40 FTAs in time for Brexit day - which Liam Fox described as “absolute rubbish” for “faint hearts” and promised to prove wrong - turns out to be completely correct.  
My dad suffers from vascular dementia, type 2 diabetes and heart problems. He takes 12 different pills a day. Our GP can't guarantee supply.My mum will be talking about the emotional trauma that #Brexit is causing for carers such as herself on @ITVNews tonight at 6.30pm. 
Brexit will deprive 65 million UK citizen's of their EU citizenship, irrespective of whether indivdiual citizens want to loose that citizenship or not. First time in UK history that a UK government will deprive all its citizens citizenship rights. Totalitarianism. 
Hey, "trade with the Commonwealth" folks! As it stands, a no deal Brexit could interrupt free trade agreements with Cameroon, the Caribbean, Canada, Ghana and other African countries including South Africa. Not to mention Cyprus and Malta, obviously.Toodle pip, chaps! 
To all those saying the new TIGer group of MPs are too late to affect Brexit - whether the UK crashes out w/o an initial deal or on some variant of May’s deal, there are years of “Brexit” to come - the EU isn’t going anywhere and the UK will still have to come to terms with it. 
Schools. health service, migration, grooming and rape of children, roads not fit to drive on, lack of housing, citizens living on the street, hungry children, food banks, rising knife crime and what do our MP's do. . . .they ignore all of it in favour of squabbling over brexit ! 
EXC The Independent Group could prop up Theresa May's government in a confidence and supply arrangement in return for a referendum on her deal, one of the leading defector MPs, Gavin Shuker, tells me on the @HuffPostUK Commons People podcast. 
Dominic Grieve and Justine Greening ready to resign if May fails to change Brexit direction.   
Corbyn insists second referendum is central to Labour's agenda  
As morbidly fascinating as the slow motion crash of British politics is to watch, a Hard #brexit was baked in from the beginning. But with the EU destined to dissolve, now, at the end of the beginning, the Brits get a head start on whatever is next.  
Claims that all these treaties would be negotiated on time - and the wider claims of David Davis - have turned out to be untrue. Now certain that a no deal Brexit will, at least initially, reduce UK trade not only with the EU *but also non-EU countries*.  
Today is #MotherLanguageDay. Many people and organisations are celebrating the beauty of diverse languages. For EU citizens at home in the UK #Brexit only comes in a universal language: that of anxiety. Anxiety because we all have to apply to stay in our home. #RescueOurRights 
#Brexit, the Corn Laws and the Common Market: Professor @kevinhorourke charts the history of Britain’s trading agreements and explains why they have often proved divisive… 
Full status of Brexit roll over FTA talks in the link. In addition to Japan and Turkey, Algeria is "unlikely" to be ready by Brexit day, and most others seem uncertain ("engagement ongoing")  
Got a .eu domain? UK owners being warned they may not work after a no deal Brexit 
When the lineup gets announced on Sunday and you see the Brexit midfield starting.  
Britain's Parliament is in complete chaos with Parliament members quitting over @theresa_may Brexit deal. Mr. Brexit himself @Nigel_Farage is joining Stuart later this hour to talk all about it. #Brexit #BritishParliament #VarneyCo 
Who funds you?Why do you have no disciplinary procedures for dealing with your racist MPs?Will you explicitly condemn ruinous Tory austerity dogma, wage repression, public service cuts?Would you back Corbyn if Labour voted to stop "no deal" Brexit? 
whoooooo's ready to find out wtf is going on with brexit in a video today 
.@LiamFox's post #Brexit trade deals could hold future govts to ransom.By including ISDS clauses that would let corporations sue ministers, they threaten our environment, health, workers’ rights & democracy.MPs must defeat them.My @guardian piece: 
Britons may need £52 visa to visit Europe after Brexit. 
There’s literally no evidence to back up your statement, apart from anecdotal.Here are the reasons why people voted Labour in 2017 according to YouGov.‘Stopping Tory Brexit’ is not on the list.Stop misleading people for your own agenda, @Femi_Sorry. 
Ask yourself this would the 1% and the ruling British Elite be happier if Scots are spending their time debating shitty referees and sectarianism, car parking charges or questioning them on the impending Brexit abyss and the implosion of the British Union? 
Berlin is re-nationalising private rental housing, planning a referendum on banning mega-landlords, and considering a 5-year rent freeze.Calling all this a revolution is not hyperbole. It could completely transform an increasingly unaffordable city.  
Oh horror, Brexit has killed our economy! There is literally no money left.... oh.... hang on.... there is some.... best month on record... but it's all meant to be falling apart... it's as if the doom and gloom predictions were just supposed to scare us?  
Lib-Lab-Con is cracking up. As they implode debating their various methods of betraying the people; only UKIP is standing up for a true Brexit & standing up #ForTheNationVoting LEAVE was the beginning. Join & Support UKIP now and let's finish the job! 
Yet more good news for Brexit Britain. Our country continues to defy the expectations of those who talks it downWrite to your MP:  
Justine Greening: "I will quit the Conservative Party & join the Independent Group if May goes ahead with no deal Brexit."Me:  
THE BREXIT PARADOXEadie for the PM: *Nothing wrong with treating [the referendum] as a mandate*IF the MP is treating it as a mandate, she cannot be selective. It cannot be a mandate when it suits her and not a mandate when it doesn't, like Schrödinger's mandate.#UKEUChallenge 
.@SDoughtyMP – Brexit is costing us global trade deals  
Good grief! Murdo Fraser’s ENTIRE BUDGET SPEECH is about the powers given to local authorities to put in place levies for CAR PARKS! 36 days til a hard Brexit that could take Scotland into recession by the way..... 
Finance Sect @DerekMackaySNP on fire  rightly lays into Tories for the economic catastrophe  they are about to unleash on the country be it with a No-Deal or Tory Hard Brexit - both of which Scotland didn't vote for. #Budget2019 
British voters are unimpressed by Theresa May’s Brexit deal  
Judge did raise the fact the manifesto pledge to implement the result changed the advisory status of the referendum. 
Official figures paint a better than expected picture... #Brexit  
4:1 Question TimeOn tonight's edition of "Let's Bash Brexit" expect Anna Soubry to be allowed to dominate and bash the Conservative party AND Brexit for most of the hour.The lonely token Brexiteer may be allowed to speak for 8 seconds before being shouted down. Let's see.  
In the wake of Brexit, it may be up to Scotland to write its own future.  
Someone has been mapping Brexit job losses...Not a pretty sight. 
"We need to respect the result of the Referendum as if it was binding!" -knowing that, if it had been binding indeed, it would have been quashed because it would have been found illegal."But we can ignore it since it was advisory, while pretending it was binding!"Pure scam art.  
BREAKING: Govt Document Confirms A Trading Deal Will NOT Be Reached With Turkey (1.4% trade) Or Japan (2% trade) By 29th March. #EU #Brexit  
During the referendum Brexiteers repeatedly promised that a raft of trade deals would be fully negotiated and ready to be implemented by exit day. Now Liam Fox has admitted it won't happen.  
We cannot allow Liam Fox’s post-Brexit trade plans to go unscrutinised | Caroline Lucas  
If it’s No Deal, there must be an immediate announcement of an independence referendum in Scotland. People must be able to choose between economic oblivion in an isolationist, sinking U.K. or a bright future as an outward looking, independent EU state. 
A Government document has confirmed a trading deal will not be reached with either Turkey or Japan by 29 March when the UK is due to leave the EU in the event of a 'no-deal' Brexit 
The claim that EU only looks out for big business crumbles under scrutiny. EU competition law protects consumers and stands up to corporate giants. @JoelBaccas explains here#Brexit #PutItToThePeople #PeoplesVote 
Mayor Khan  - a cry from the wilderness! Could you please bring your influence to bear with TfL? District line has been all but out of commission all day! Not good enough- Perhaps a little less anti-Brexit and a bit more transport and crime fighting might be the order of the day 
Where do you get this rubbish? Meeting never happened. It would be a ‘cunning plan’ to secure the Party leadership by following the path I have on Brexit in order to get the support of Tory colleagues & the wider membership. Baldrick would be impressed #Blackadder #WestminsterBS 
The Independent Group is made up of hypocrites and liars. These MPs promised to respect the referendum result and yet now they’re agitating against it. Their aim is clear: to thwart Brexit and sell out British voters.Brendan O’Neill in today’s Sun 
The answer to that is the gov used an advisory referendum to cheat so the law couldn’t quash it. 
In case anyone is confused by British politics right now, allow me to explain:Here we have a Brexit-supporting Labour MP defending the ex-Remainer-cum-Brexit-with-a-deal Tory Prime Minister against comments made by a Remainer ex-Tory who's just joined a not-party. pic.twitter.com/A4QBklXyji 
Senior Tory warns she won't stay in a 'Brexit Party'Goodbye, Good Riddance Hammond, Grieve & Greening!  
Under the Lisbon Treaty, animals in the EU are recognised as sentient beings whose welfare must be protected – but because of #Brexit, animals in the UK are in danger of losing that legal protection.  
F. Brexit, Let's Dance  
The endgame is upon us.Labour have proved a soft Brexit is possible (possibly even softer than what they're currently presenting) and May is rejecting it.Something will have to give. Get ready..  
We cannot allow Liam Fox’s post-Brexit trade plans to go unscrutinised | Caroline Lucas  
The three Conservative MPs issued a joint letter to the Prime Minister on Wednesday blaming their departure on a "shift to the right of British politics." They said the "final straw" was the government's "disastrous handling of Brexit."  
Attention boys and girls, there is a possibility the court case (happening right now) could find PM Mrs May guilty of misconduct regarding Brexit. 
.@UKLabour's Customs Union proposal confirmed as "credible" and "could be negotiated" - @JeremyCorbyn following today's #Brexit meeting with Michel Barnier.  
Jeremy Corbyn does more to sort a Brexit deal in a letter an a couple of visits to the EU than Theresa May manages in over 2 and half years. He's unlikely to get any praise for it of course  
So Honda have said they’re off. This time it’s BMW, also in Swindon. Spin this how you like, but it is Brexit-related. No deal will bury my town for a generation. 
I’m sat in the court of appeal listening to the PM’s QC say there is no basis to find the frauderendum illegal because it was advisory. Judges have confirmed categorically that had the vote been mandatory the referendum would have been quashed.  
#AnnaSoubry basically calls Theresa May a racist. We voted to leave #EU, we vote to leave #SingleMarket! Anna Soubry manages to insult both the PM and the British people who voted for #Brexit in one short speech.#IndependentGroup #TorySplit 
@theSNP has opposed and fought #Brexit from the start.  Or do they not count because they're not an 'English' party? 
“@MichelBarnier⁩ has told a French newspaper that Brexit talks remain at an ‘impasse’ and repeated that Brussels will not consider reopening the Withdrawal Agreement or renegotiating the backstop”  
This is who we need negotiating Brexit — The real Prime Minister and his team.Thank you for all that you're doing to stop a disastrous no-deal Jeremy.   
Post-Brexit EU control over UK Defence  
Revealed: How dark money is winning ‘the Brexit influencing game’ | openDemocracy  
Spare a thought for our poor media, today having to report on Corbyn's constructive talks in Brussels with Barnier and other EU leaders which doesn't fit comfortably with their preferred narrative that he's silent on Brexit. 
Official Scottish government report on the Economic impact of ‘No Deal’ Brexit: —GDP drop of up to 7%—Export drop of 10-20%—10-30% depreciation in Sterling—Rising unemployment—Scottish economy in recession during 2019, with sharp contraction likely 
They want a 'People's Vote' on Brexit, (we had that, 17.4 Million voted to leave...) but Chuka and the newly formed 'Anti-Democrat' Group of MPs don't want to face the people in By-Elections. Why would that be? Perhaps they know that they would lose!  
“We are well prepared if there is a No Deal situation. The important thing is that passengers can book their flights with confidence, they will still be able to fly after Brexit. We have good plans in place and we will keep you moving” John Holland-Kaye - Heathrow CEO  
We've posted this because May's counsel, Sir James Eadie, has just informed the judges that Parliament knows all about the proven referendum illegality and has chosen to ignore it, they haven't, May has, there's been no vote on the subject of referendum illegality; more lies.  
A lot of people have been asking me why I don’t have an opinion on Brexit, Theresa May and Jeremy Corbyn? Well, I have far more vital things to worry about. I have two yogurts on their sell-by date and that is far more important to me.  
Brexit 
Even though we're 17.4 million people & the clear majority in the referendum, we're still the underdogsThe whole of the state machinery, media, big business & establishment against usIt's become David and GoliathI like that. It will make it even more glorious when we win 
"Leavers didn't know what they were voting for"One slide from my talk at Oxford today, summary of what we know about the Brexit vote. Lots more in talk obvs.  
EU PANIC: 'Reality' dawns on Brussels as German MEP admits Brexit 'very bad' for EU. Hans-Olaf Henkel claimed EU countries are coming to an “increased realisation” that a “special” Brexit deal should be made, as Britain is their “largest single customer”..  
 Fact check: the SNP have consistently opposed Brexit in Scotland and at Westminster, since Scotland overwhelmingly voted to Remain in the EU in 2016.  
FBPE should take note - because if your real aim is stopping Brexit (and not simply attacking Labour) - these guys should upset you as much, if not more, than Labour.They are actually making Theresa May's Brexit more likely. 
While May runs down the clock in a desperate bid to save her doomed deal, Jeremy Corbyn has presented a sensible plan, that the EU finds credible, to deliver a Brexit protecting the interests of the many, not the few. Time for the grownups to take over .  
I fail to see that there is any argument for the SNP to support Brexit in any form. Scotland voted to remain remember. 
Just announced that the House of Lords will next week be asked to approve 23 ‘decrees’ for No Deal, covering everything from air traffic management to the regulation of vets. There is also a ‘Waste (EU Exit) Order’ - which sums up Brexit! 
Surely we have reached peak Brexit?! @daraobriain 
Here’s a thought: Don’t turn Zion Williamson’s injury into THE referendum on the amateurism experience. It’s a mild knee sprain. If he’s cleared to play again soon, he’s probably going to be back in a Duke uni.And if he opts otherwise, that’s OK too.  
EU WARNING: Brexit to be 'game changer' for future of EU – 'no doubt others will follow'.  Hence the UK must fully leave the EU.. #GoWTO 
If you're not watching #UKEUchallenge court proceedings live, you can follow it via this thread. No-one on either side is denying that the referendum was conducted illegally but whose legal responsibility it is to deal with that. The PM or Parliament?... or can it be ignored?  
Fuck sake.  I was 20 yards away when @jeremycorbyn & Kier came out of the Berlaymont and I didn't get there fast enough to tell him "The British youth don't want #Brexit!!!  #StopBrexit #WeAreEurope 
Not gonna stop listening to people who say terrible shit happened to them on this terrible planet, no matter how this CPD story pans out. Supporting accusers is not a crime. Whatever happens in this case is not a referendum on how and if we should. 
Calling for a Peoples Vote because she believes peoples opinions about #Brexit have changed, but obviously doesn't' believe the opinions of her constituents may also have changed..... the callers seem to indicate otherwise.  
The American fund manager that employs Theresa May’s husband has said that it intends to use market uncertainty after Britain’s withdrawal from the European Union as a “buying opportunity” #PeoplesVote #Brexit 
Lets see what happens next week which needs to be seen as the absolute deadline ...The nine ministers who told the PM they'd quit if she doesn't rule out no-deal Brexit - ITV News  
The second referendum camp is responsible for Corbyn being pro brexit and not moving towards a second referendum?  This is superb gaslighting.  
If the UK leaves the EU without a deal, there could be changes to how #equine owners move #horses to the EU. See latest guidance:  #Brexit #prepareforEUexit 
Great discussion with students from (disclaimer: my old College) ⁦@collegeofeurope⁩ ⁦@coenatolin⁩. Plenty to talk about, sadness about brexit, huge interest in Scotland   
EU's Jean-Claude Juncker says he has Brexit "fatigue" and describes Britain's departure as "a disaster"  
So, if the referendum had been binding it would have been illegal and stopped but because it was only advisory it can continue.Advisory.Binding.What kind of sick joke of the law is this? #ChangePolitics  
Stockpiling for Brexit? I have a 'Brexit Cupboard' for tinned and dried food a second freezer, I've bought gold bullion and toiletries, a wood burning stove and a wind-up lantern for power cuts and diesel for my car. Anything I've forgotten? 
And they've made no such decision, May has unilaterally decided to ignore the findings of the Electoral Commission; people appear to have forgotten neither she or the executive are sovereign, parliament is. 
The UK ran a £14.9bn budget surplus in January, the largest since records began. We're a little over a month away from a clean WTO Brexit & the economy is going from strength to strength: record employment, wages rising, Project Fear busted!Support us at  
We have the only viable exit from this impasse.  That the TIG "New Tories" quit their respective parties under a hint of "People's Vote" then end up demanding precisely the same thing Labour has proposed since 2016 makes clear they want a Labour brexit with May in charge.  
The latest Brexit meeting between Theresa May and Jean-Claude Juncker was thin on detail and no new requests were submitted, EU officials say  
Jeremy Corbyn says he strongly believes the Brexit proposals put forward by Labour are credible and can be negotiated after talks with EU leaders.#Bexit #JC4PM 
So why aren't the Lib Dems calling for the Labour splitters to call by-elections?If you really believe in a 2nd referendum, you should believe in holding by-elections too.  
 @ScotGov Economy Secretary @DerekMackaySNP visited D R Collins - a Scottish fresh fish retailer trading around the world - in #Eyemouth this morning to hear first-hand about the impact a 'No Deal' #Brexit will have on the company and their future trading capabilities.  
Please retweet this as much as possible.It’s a powerful tweet by one of the most effective pro Brexit campaigners in public life.His methods are unorthodox but highly effective. He stiffens Leaver resolve and makes Remainers feel deeply embarrassed and ashamed.He’s a genius  
"Did Barnier say it was possible to have an extension to #Article50?" asks @Stone_SkyNews. @jeremycorbyn responds with: "It is a complex and difficult question to answer at this stage".Latest here as Corbyn sets out his Brexit vision in Brussels:  
It was within @theresa_may‘s remit to exercise a careful eye on EU immigration.But instead, she failed to implement the regulatory tools available to her, and channeled Farage, UKIP, and the ERG’s xenophobic and racist rantings, ultimately leading us to the disaster of Brexit.  
My wife @VereneNicolas who is French and has lived with me as an EU citizen in Scotland for over 20 years, including voting in Scottish elections, is grateful to have received today this letter about #Brexit and her immigration status from our MP @ChrisStephens. 
Whilst the Wilson case is currently being heard, where Sir James Eadie is talking about binding elections, RPA, Common Law & advisory referendums, it's worth remembering what the Electoral Commission told Parliament regarding who makes the decision over the proven illegality... 
.@HicksPolitics sits down with Carl Benjamin (Sargon of Akkad) to discuss the slowing eurozone economies and the effects of Brexit.WATCH:  
I'm so bloody sick of the hypocrisy of brexiters.These people banging on for years that a peoples vote is undemocratic are now saying the MP's that left their parties should face another vote.If they were brexit MP's you wouldnt be saying that! Like when MEP Farage left UKIP! 
Nigel Farage was right - we have indeed come to a breaking point. It is, however, the breaking point of patriotic, decent, moderate citizens and MPs who're now sick to death of the chaos of Brexit.   
The European Commission president really has had enough of #Brexit  
Your daily @DealBook Briefing:• Trade talks progress, with fears of overcompromise. • Wall Street sees profits in helping Main Street.• Theresa May could be making progress on Brexit. 
Revealed: How dark money is winning ‘the Brexit influencing game’ | openDemocracy  
Government borrowing now at lowest level for 17 years. Record levels of employment etc etc. On so many levels Project Fear lies in tatters. So when will our idiot remain politicians stop peddling their nonsense and get on with Brexit?  
Scary (obvious) thought: Sajid Javid suspects that, after Brexit, Theresa May is done (leaving the EU is her one-trick pony). He also knows in a head-to-head of radical economic ideas, Labour trounce him. So “security” is literally the only card he can play to be PM. Buckle up. 
The current UK Government plans will water down animal protections post-Brexit. Speak up for animals who can’t speak for themselves - please ask your MP to support a #BetterDealForAnimals  #ThursdayThoughts #ThursdayMotivation 
ECB meeting "minutes" out.Mentions ofInflation: 64Growth: 52Brexit: 0 
Absolutely. Its incredibly galling to have my tactical vote touted as a show of support for Brexit'.  
If Ian Austin quits, where is he going to go? He doesn't want a second referendum, so the Hypocrisy Party won't have him. Maybe he'll join the Tories. Given his subservient attitude to Saudi Arabia and Israel and his hawkish attitude to Venezuela and Syria, he'd fit right in. 
Saying Brexit is nothing to worry about and that we should embrace a “jobs go first at Honda” Brexit is the disturbing cry of a middle-class left-wing journalist, who can’t see Corbyns obvious faults. @OwenJones84 
The SNP is "contriving" to bring about a No Deal Brexit because it will hasten the demise of the United Kingdom, David Mundell has claimed.  
Breaking: Independent Group copy Corbyn, shocker!'The #IndependentGroup are demanding of #TheresaMay on #Brexit, is that she drop her "red lines" & explore a permanent Customs Union...'That's Labour's position?pic.twitter.com/GqGP0jVZdQ#jc4pm #IStandWithCorbyn #Byelectionnow 
Further evidence that TInGe is little to do with Brexit and more to do with derailing Labour's current leadership and their project. 
A third of Theresa May’s cabinet would resign if the UK prime minister opted for a no-deal Brexit — according to one of the three MPs who already quit the Conservative party  
I'm not an automatic by-election demander, but @ajcdeane making an excellent point that you can't argue for the So-Called People's Vote based on people not knowing what they voted for while defecting from your party, jettisoning your manifesto and refusing to re-stand #Brexit 
Michael Gove and Philip Hammond’s spat over food tariffs tells us two things. The first is that the government still doesn’t know what #Brexit means. The second is that we’re better off inside the EU. #PutItToThePeople #PeoplesVote 
Remain or leave? Carmakers confront hard Brexit choices  
On the rocks: Can the Scottish whisky industry survive Brexit?  
Opinion: Theresa May is lying to get her Brexit deal through – even if that means thousands more job losses - great piece by @HackneyAbbott 
Two former Conservative cabinet ministers today warned that they too would quit the party if Theresa May fails to rule out a no-deal Brexit  
This morning our Chair, @DrPhillipLeeMP met @theresa_may in Number 10 to discuss #righttovote. Talks were open and we are encouraged she listened to our case. We continue to campaign for a #timeout in the #Brexit process  
FM: "In the face of Brexit it's never been more important to demonstrate Scotland is an open, outward-looking country, and that we're open for business." #FMQs 
“I have to go to bed at night and think have I done everything I could to keep the country safe” says man who refuses to rule out a No Deal Brexit which would massively compromise everyone's security. 
Looking for a non-technical survey of the economics literature on #Brexit?Just out @iza_bonn DP "B for Brexit: A Survey of the Economics Academic Literature" (written for New Palgrave Dictionary of Economics) Comments/suggestions/criticisms welcome! 
I agree completely with Tim BUT not with the label. There is nothing “centrist” about key views of Chuka-Wollastonism:Over-turning a referendum result;Open borders with the EU;Accepting over-financialisation of the economy;Unilateral climate change policies;State childcare.  
So true .They cannot argue for a 2nd referendum “Peoples Vote “ whilst ignoring the fact they should put their constituents democratic rights first and call a by election.Or are they happy to piggy back on the parties names they are now trouncing?..  
Brexit is about taking back control from the bully boys in Brussels. Join the fastest growing Brexit campaign @  
I’m starting to suspect that Brexit is in fact not going well.  
She wants a 'Politicians vote' for Brexit. We had the 'Peoples vote' in 2016. Remain was REJECTED. No Peoples vote for her though.        HYPOCRISY. 
With 37 days until Brexit and hundreds of statutory instruments still to pass... the House of Commons is off tomorrow. Because Friday. Dereliction of duty on an industrial scale. 
Pleased to read this clarification today but I don’t think anyone in @theSNP has ever used the language of #HardBrexit re our vision of #independence. Our policy is #independence in the #EU. A union if equals cf. Ireland, Denmark #Brexit #indyref2 
.@JunckerEU says he is not very hopeful about UK avoiding a “no deal”  and tells Committee in #Brussels this morning that he is suffering from #Brexit fatigue, adding “Brexit is deconstruction, it is not construction. Brexit is the past, it is not the future”.  How right he is. 
Having a bilateral EU/UK agreement on #citizensrights would make the 28 unilateral 'guarantees' as proposed by the UK Govt as a solution for no-deal Brexit unnecessary. It would provide strong protection of rights for both us EU citizens in the UK & @BritishInEurope 3/ 
We need you: Write to your MPAs reported yesterday there is an amendment going around Westminster to rescue, ring-fence, the #citizensrights part of the EU/UK withdrawal agreement no matter what Brexit outcome. It has wide support from MPs of all parties, both Leave & Remain1/  
Columnist Leo McKinstry writes in the Express, referring to the 3 defectors “fanatical worship of Brussels is the real motive here”  whatever gloss they put on it they’ve attempted to thwart Brexit & can only be deemed as betrayers & cowards for not calling by-elections. 
Revealed: How dark money is winning ‘the Brexit influencing game’ | openDemocracy  
From literally the start of watching BBC news this morning. There has been no hang up of hosing every opportunity with BS. Brexit hysteria in no short supply, now is suddenly we face a 40% rise in food because of Brexit. And the UK faces 'Crashing' out of the EU. No we don't! 
How pollsters helped hedge funds beat the pound's Brexit crash  via @BW 
The paperback of my book is published by @cambUP_History next week! Looking forward to the launch event on "Referendums in the Age of Brexit", with @stephenkb @sarahobolt @dfarrell_ucd & Meg Russell of @ConUnit_UCL. Monday 25 February @MileEndInst.  
Elected on a manifesto to Leave the SM & CU.  Demands a second referendum.  Won't allow her constituents to vote in a by-election.Some people are thoroughly dishonest & untrustworthy - & Sarah Wollaston is one of them.  
The electoral consequences of May's deal will be in another league of destruction to no deal. No party could or should survive May's deal. It is a colony agreement, backed by endless lies to the public and her own party. #brexit  
Geez, the Tories still on 'car parks'. We are 32 days from Brexit. There may be food shortages, medicines might run out, civil unrest might be a feature of our cities and they have spent a week on a proposed responsibility that councils may or not exercise. #FMQs 
Millions voted Labour last GE hoping Brexit policy would shift or out of lack of choice. Still didn’t get into gov’t. This should have convinced Labour to broaden its appeal. Instead it claimed all those votes as a personal endorsement of Corbyn and Brexit. Huge strategic snafu. 
It's almost like they want to talk about anything but Brexit. #FMQs 
The BBC’s pro-EU partisanship has reached crisis proportions but Ofcom have dismissed my complaints  #brexit 
Very proud to be part of this movement. Fighting the narrative that @Conservatives are the party of Brexit. All young moderate Conservatives should join @YoungTories4PV 
"It's a new spanner in the works, the PM needed this like a hole in the head" says @georgegalloway who talks to @InQuestionRT's @ManilaChan after 3 @Conservatives MPs quit @theresa_may's party over #Brexit.  
Absolutely that is the tragedy of Brexit: it's saying loudly and clearly to the world we hate foreigners, but it necessitates us then having to beg foreigners to do trade deals with us.  
This is only the beginning of the great political realignment which Brexit has forced.The cosy Lib-Lab-Con consensus is cracking up.We now need proportional representation to serve the full range of political opinion in our country. 
NEWS NOW: Junker says that after talking to Theresa May he is not sure 'No Deal Brexit' can be avoided. Oh dear. He is a straight talker. I wonder who May will blame.  
There are two Brexit outcomes that would be electorally disastrous for the Tories: no Brexit and no deal  
Public disgusted with hardline Remainer MPs calling for a second referendum whilst refusing by-elections.   
We may disagree on the type of house we want to build for our society to live in. But we all agree we need bricks. That's why we're standing side-by-side now in the face of this Brexit disaster.  
Decent MPs see their parties have gone bad.We’re a #Remain country now,  but Ma and Pa Brexit are in control of the two major parties.Every MP must consider their position - and vote to #RevokeA50. 
Breaking: Drone pests relocate to Ireland, decline to say whether it's Brexit-related  
This is thanks to the bovine way we have handled these negotiations. The early 'go whistle' rubbish from Johnson, the complacency of Davis as Brexit Secretary, the fact that Mrs May, even at the best of times, is not good with people.  
A credit downgrade would make it more expensive for the UK to borrow money and put additional pressure on British businesses."In the event of a no-deal Brexit, the UK faces a recession similar to that of the 1990s" 
The BBC’s blatant pro-EU bias in the Brexit domain is in clear breach of its Charter, and has reached crisis proportions:  
#Brexit itself isn't the reason for #BrexitChaos. It didn't break British politics, it has exposed the rotten system. Politicians following their own agenda and ignoring the people is the core problem.#ThursdayThoughts 
The perfect tweet. Climate change. Brexit. Climate change. Brexit. Brexit. Climate change. Brexit. Look at this dog  
In other news ,Adam Boulton has gone full FBPE on his timeline.. each day towards Brexit these EU luvvies lose the plotSad to see someone I used to enjoy watching & trusted with my news become such a big baby  on @SkyNews Once we leave the Media needs to look @ themselves 
If you're in and around the Preston area this weekend get yourself along to this event with Lord Andrew Adonis for an insight into the current Brexit situation.'Healing the Nation'- Saturday 23rd Feb- 18:00 - 19:30Sign up and full details below. 
 This was the moment when Jean-Claude Juncker described Brexit as "a disaster"  
WATCH : Young Conservatives across the country are demanding a final say on our future.Brexit is tearing our country and party apart.With high noon fast approaching, we must take a stand.RT  if you agree.  
If Corbyn went on national TV & said something along the lines of "it's not just about black people but you know.. a funny tinge mmm hhh ssss... BAME community". D'you think he'd be on LBC talking about Brexit 2 days later?I think he'd be deported to a Cayman Island prison. 
Audio exc: Top Corbyn ally Lloyd Russell-Moyle brands Labour splitters “scabs” in fiery speech - recording obtained by talkRADIO. He suggests Labour leadership tacking to remain/second referendum “behind closed doors”  
A Hate Video about Our Heidi, which features clips of her saying the referendum result should be upheld, and that there shouldn't be a second referendum. Her comments have, unfairly, been taken totally in context.I beg you not to watch this Hate Video. 
Aha - The May's are eagerly waiting to bag their Brexit dividend whilst US vultures circle overhead ready to pick-up UK businesses at fire-sale prices & buy-up the NHS and public services. 
You never hear pro-EU supporters make the case for why the EU is brilliant. They just call Brexit voters idiots.  
Today’s ⁦@EveningStandard⁩ as Chancellor now pledges to stop a no deal Brexit  
We now know EU Defence Union is policy of Tony Blair. @TheIndGroup therefore set up under his helping hand to help drive through @Conservatives Brexit without the Exit as UK army navy air force nucs industry procurement signed into EU single point control  
#IndependentGroup  admission by @annasoubrymp they don't need  policies shows its a party without any purpose but stopping Brexit. single issue movements don't win elections ask @niugelfarage 
Given the looming economic disaster of Brexit and the corruption around the campaign in the first referendum, the polls show Brexit would be soundly defeated of another vote were held. I think the Brits deserve a second chance to save themselves  
Austerity: You have a full fridge, your neighbour’s fridge is empty. That’s an issue.Brexit: Both houses start burning down - but don’t forget your neighbour still has no food in the fridge, don’t make it all about the fire - that’s so entitled! 
David believes young people deserve an opportunity to vote on their futures. That's why he'll be marching on 23rd March at the #PutItToThePeople March to demand a #PeoplesVote on the #Brexit deal. Join him:  
International Trade Secretary @LiamFox "...if we're to deliver on the referendum result instruction given to us by the British people, we must also remember that there is a world beyond Europe and there will be a time beyond Brexit."  
Labour increased its voters in the last general election because of remainers flocking to the party in hope Labour would fight to stop brexit after Labour led them to believe they would.Labour have since ignored those people and those people will not vote Labour again. 
UK and Ireland retailers warn of 40% tariffs on food in no-deal Brexit.Brexiters promised more money for the NHS.Instead, Brexit looks set to hit hard-working families hardest. Unforgivable.Write to your MP to demand they #RevokeA50 & #StopBrexit. 
Yes, there’s Brexit. But the inaction on the fit-for-work scandal is shamelessBut we must also remember that this deal or even worse no deal would be devastating for disabled people - whatever party is in power. 
Good to see that far from running down the clock, the Government is now inserting extra days into the calendar to ensure that we will never reach the #Brexit deadline. #Feb29 
At the moment, next week’s Brexit vote is down as a motion not a meaningful vote  
And the argument that a *presidential election* can be turned into a referendum on something other than the president, well, you know, good luck with that. 
There is no logic to say by- elections are not necessary b/c people vote for the candidate not the party but also say in the same breath a people's vote for brexit is  necessary b/c it's the Democratic thing to do. #IndependentGroup 
Public net borrowing actually recorded a January surplus of £14.9 billion, the largest since records began in 1993!Remember that post-Brexit warning of mass unemployment, a DIY recession and a significant increase in public borrowing...   
After meeting Theresa May in Brussels on Wednesday, EU's Jean-Claude Juncker made these remarks on the current state of Brexit. More:  
The public are fed up with Ma and Pa Brexit arguing over which flavour of disaster to go for.56% want to #Remain - and growing. It’s time for MPs to #StopBrexit. 
If there has ever been a more ridiculous sight than the “People’s Vote” zealots denying their own constituents one it is the fat-cat “journalists” defending it. Lord make me chaste, but not yet! #Brexit #IndependentGroup 
Lib Dem MP @LaylaMoran on the opportunity to work with the new Independent Group to fight for a People's Vote. Our campaign has 245,000 supporters - join them now to demand the final say on Brexit and option to stay in the EU >  
Government received £14.9 billion more than it spent in January.The highest monthly surplus since records began.Brexit Britain's economy getting better as we leave the EU.#brexit#NoDeal 
Brexit is a smoke screen. It is the ultimate bad news burier. The pension cuts, further austerity measures, council budget cuts. All these things have been passed while the nation wrings it’s hands over brexit. I voted remain but that doesn’t matter anymore. We need Labour 
A centrist party made up of establishment politicians is about the worst possible face for the anti-Brexit movement.But Labour needs to realise it can't take Remainers for granted. With 5 weeks to stop Tory Brexit, it's time to wake up and take the lead. 
Don't be absurd. It's like arguing that saying "I'm starving" is a middle-class entitlement. The only issue that matters to someone with a loved one in surgery is thier welfare, but Brexit impacts everything it matters in an over-arching way. 
Tory rebel Dominic Grieve says he would quit the party if the government pursues a no-deal #Brexit 
It’s just the brexit voters we hear from constantly are in the most depressed places. Dismiss the more reasoned arguments about sovereignty etc by all means but it’s such a mistake and mischaracterisation to just blithely dismiss it as a group of “left behind” angry people. 
May’s claims on the political declaration are false, they are an attempt to obscure the decisive difference between her deal and Corbyn’s policyMy piece on Brexit in the @IndyVoices 
The narrative the main reason people voted for Brexit is because they feel “left behind” is just so patronising and cliché. I know lots of people who voted leave and they don’t feel left behind at all. A third of graduates voted leave. For many it was just about sovereignty. 
The former attorney general Dominic Grieve and the former education secretary Justine Greening both said they would leave the Conservatives if there was a no-deal Brexit, as the three ex-Tory MPs said a third of the party could be willing to join them.  
Michael Gove says he’ll protect British food after Brexit – but powerful US companies have other plans. | @Kath_Dalmeny 
On Brexit day, Britain’s 73 MEPs will pack up their offices and send their assistants home  
With 11 MP’s leaving the Labour and Conservative Parties to join a Centrist / anti Brexit Group Would you vote for a new party?Please VOTE & RETWEET this poll 
A new report from the Scottish Govt's Chief Economist warning of the impact of a No Deal Brexit on the Scottish economy, is nowhere to be seen on the main BBC Scotland news page. Neither is it on the politics page or the business page. An online blackout. 
BROKE: Eric Joyce punching someone in the Sports and Social led to Brexit.WOKE: The Scottish LibDems introducing STV for local elections led to Brexit. BESPOKE: Robert Cunninghame Graham's championing of Scottish Home Rule in 1888 led to Brexit. 
.@SkyNews are so funny. "Yes, Jeremy Corbyn, and Kier and Shami, are meeting Barnier today, and yes, the EU has said that Labour's Brexit plan is a runner, but that's not the important meeting today. The important one is Barclay and Cox turning up for the Tories this afternoon". 
But what really hurts is when friends & family who cited "too many immigrants" as a major reason for voting #Brexit, then tell my wife "Oh we don't mean you".It's breathtaking, if not for arrogance, then stupidity. She will have to apply for settled status after nearly 30 yrs. 
Before Theresa May finally departs the political stage, l like to remind myself of her racist values and antisemitic friends in Europe. #PoliticsLive #wato #TorySplit#ToryRacism #Brexit #GetTheToriesOut 
Brexit it not the #WillOfThePeople but the #WillOfTheElite. 
6/ I got to meet @JunckerEU at the @EESC today  I asked a question about #Brexit ... But he said he had "Brexit fatigue" This I can sympathise with!#StopBrexit #WeAreEurope #EUsupergirl 
Anna Soubry - All these men calling & telling me what I think.. I do find that slightly offensive. I can't stop Brexit.. the only people who can stop it are the British people through a #PeoplesVote. #LBC #FinalSay @Anna_Soubry 
.@jeremycorbyn meets EU leaders today in Brussels to discuss options to break Brexit deadlock  
Last year, residents and I put together a petition calling for a ban on the importation of puppies & kittens below 6 months old after Brexit. #AnimalRights I have now received a response from @michaelgove. For the full response please go to my website: 
'I am not optimistic' Juncker says No Deal Brexit likely  'terrible consequences for EU'   
.@TheIndGroup were;Elected on manifestos committed to #Brexit Now they’re #Remoaners Elected  as Labour & ToriesNow they’re not.They want a #LosersvoteBut don’t want #PeoplesByElectionsThey hold us in contempt & believe we have the memories of Goldfish 
Heathrow CEO: We are well-prepared for No Deal Brexit. “Passengers can book their flights with confidence, they will still be able to fly after Brexit.”  
“if you explain [EU Defence Union] properly it doesn’t help the Brexit case”#TonyBlairKnows why defence must not enter Brexit debateWhy are you helping him? #DavidDavisKnows #NigelKnows 
All those hard Brexiteers who trolled me for suggesting #Swindon #Honda closure is connected to #Brexit should read this. #brexitshambles #finalsay #peoplesvote 
IMPORTANT: For an Article 50 extension to go beyond July 1 (needed for a #PeoplesVote), the UK has to take part in the European Parliament elections. Labour & Tories are opposed. We must launch an #EUVote campaign.  Article by @IanDunt PLEASE RT.#Brexit 
Live  Brexit latest news: Dominic Grieve and Justine Greening say they will quit the Tories if there is a no deal.They will be deselected anyway. But a NO deal would suit us, if not their perverted form of honouring the peoples referendum. 
Very disappointed with this. There are many expert women who could speak on Brexit and the GFA, none of whom come with the atrocious baggage of this gombeen man #notobertie 
Remoaner Caught out again talking utter nonsense. #Brexit #TIG #Nonsense 
Hello @Anna_Soubry, just wondering considering during the 2017 General Election you said you would absolutely respect the 2016 EU Referendum result and you had to because your constituency of Broxtowe voted Leave. Will you be holding a People's Vote in Broxtowe? #FactsHaveChanged 
What @dolorsbassac said on #CatalanTrial“there were legal regulations that covered our claim, UN resolutions, reports that said that if there was political will a referendum was in accordance with article 92.1 of the Spanish Constitution and 80% of the population in favor of it”  
A timely reminder that the Political Declaration, the starting point for negotiations on the future UK-EU relationship, is about BRINO, not #Brexit. It is a turkey.  
Someone has come up with a "spend a penny on Brexit" hashtag which I can only apologise for #SpendAPennyOnBrexit 
When you hear the words Northern Ireland & #Brexit, we know you automatically think ‘backstop’. But today for #BrexitCountdown, Cathy Gormley-Heenan takes a look at another big issue: Brexit's impact on #HigherEducation in NI.  @psaitweets #36days 
Jean-Claude Juncker on Brexit this morning: “The worst can be avoided, but I’m not very optimistic when it comes to this issue” 
Judge: can the courts declare the advisory referendum to be unlawful even if breaches were substantial but the result could still be trusted?JS says legal position if there is substantial non compliance with rules, PM must show real basis for sufficient confidence in result. 
Justine Greening: “If we simply become the Brexit party, then I do not believe we have a successful future ahead of us …. I don’t think I would be able to stay part of a party that was a Brexit party that had crashed us out of the European Union.” 
No matter what #Brexit eventually emerges, we have plans in place to safeguard @welfare_ie entitlements between ourselves and UK. Pleased to update Dáil colleagues earlier on these. 
Have a look at all the rights we will loose after brexit.  tell everyone. People don’t talk about this nearly enough. 
There are millions of Remainers. We will defeat the Brexit parties in seats across the country.  
Russia interfered in the US election & UK Brexit vote. Are the stars aligning?Feb 27 is the same day:- Michael Cohen testifies before the US Congress &-The House of Commons votes on Brexit if PM May gets no deal. The wheels of Justice turn until justice is served. 
Why do Labour and Conservatives cling to the idea that people still want Brexit?THEY DO NOT!2016 referendum is out of date #stopbrexit#ExitfromBrexit @RevokeA50 
I'm a big fan of @JustineGreening but surely she can see the disconnect between calling for us to ignore the 2016 referendum result by remaining in a distant, unaccountable EU & addressing the concerns of voters outside London who feel let down by the globalist elite & staus quo? 
This is the truth of Brexit. Why is this insider dealing still going on? Please put a stop to this. She must resign #conflictofinterest #changepolitics @ChukaUmunna @Anna_Soubry @joannaccherry @joanryanEnfield @angelasmithmp @KenClarkeMP @joswinson @heidiallen75 @mrjamesob 
 A ‘No Deal’ Brexit could mean: 7% drop in GDP 10-20% drop in Scottish exports Net migration turns negative Unemployment rising by 100,000 Recession in 2019Read the @scotgov Chief Economist’s report here:  
It isn't true that Leave supporters have hijacked the Brexit process or bullied the Prime Minister into changing her position. The reality is that they've had to accept enormous compromise - but Leave MPs are fighting to ensure that people get what they voted for.  
You always to have to remember that the last thing Corbyn wants is an effective multi party democracy, The whole basis of Corbyn’s ideology is that the voters must be forced to choose between the left & right, between anti semites & Islamiphobia, between Brexit & Lexit1 
#IndependentGroup This is what 17.4 million who voted leave the EU think of the Independent  Group new Party. What a bunch of Brexit bashing REMOANER BORES all 11.  
Who profits from a no no deal Brexit? Spoiler  - it isn't you.  
The real Brexit cliff edge is not on March 29th - it's July 1st  
Always money to be made in times of 'uncertainty' .....just ask our 'Nige'....#BrexitBigShort#Brexit#Kerching 
I assumed this was a spoof at first. But no, @BBCBusiness really is trying to create a food panic over Brexit. One reason why you now have a common sense centre party like @TheSDPUK calling for the licence fee to be scrapped. Viewers should not have to pay for propaganda. 
BBC reports on what British people are stockpiling ahead of Brexit  
Jean-Claude Juncker ends speech with this line: "Now should I talk about Brexit? No,no, no I think I’ll stop there."Speech was about climate change: covered his love for Europe's diverse landscapes, trade and EU harmonisation of toilet flushes (he is against). 
Mayor of London has awarded the contract to count the next London election votes to a Venezuelan-owned company at twice the price of the last count. CEO is also a Labour peer & head of anti-Brexit campaign group  @LdnConservative @ShaunBaileyUK 
Yesterday Anna Soubry clearly demonstrated why the ‘People’s Vote’ campaign is currently failing. She spoke about Brexit & then defended Tory austerity since 2010. This means that a significant section of the British public, Leave or Remain, will never listen to a word she says. 
The absolute joke of describing people as ‘politically homeless’ when over 300,000 people in the UK are actually homeless, and all of this political splitting is doing NOTHING to help the most vulnerable & NOTHING to help sort out Brexit #victorialive 
Remainers, Bregretters, and those who were too young to vote in 2016 have been abandoned by both main parties.Brexit is, and was always going to be, a disaster.I will back ANYONE who fights Brexit.THEN we can reshape our dire UK politics and all the reasons that lead to it.  
European Commission President Jean-Claude Juncker says he is "not very optimistic" about the UK's chances of achieving a Brexit deal and says a 'no-deal' Brexit "would have terrible economic and social consequences in Britain and on the continent" 
Today I demanded Michael Gove explain why one of Scotland main shellfish exporters DR Collin have been refused every single ECMT haulage permit they’ve applied for and what this would mean for Argyll & Bute shellfish producers. He seemed totally unaware of the situation. #brexit 
Imagine if Mrs May wasn't an implacable, lifelong racist. The crazy clown car of Brexit might have been steered on a much safer course. But as soon as her blind, unbridled bigotry got behind the wheel it was doomed. 
No idea if Independent Group will come to anything, but I hope the positive effect of Brexit will be a destruction of the two party system in the UK, a fairer electoral system and I’d much rather see people trying to find common ground rather than heading to the Brexity extremes. 
Check out JRM's father's book for more insight into why they would want to manufacture a situation like Brexit for their own benefit. Two words. Disaster. Capitalism. 
Leading credit rating agency Fitch has said that in the event of a no-deal Brexit, the UK faces a recession similar to that of the 1990s, with a 2 per cent decline in GDP over 18 months. 
I tabled an urgent question yesterday to ask the PM to make a statement on the economic impact of her gov's proposed deal for the UK exiting the EU. She ran from the chamber to avoid answering. The PM can't run from her Brexit bourach forever, it's time for her to face reality.  
It's barely gone 10am and the bus is already drawing a crowd! Head on down to New Canal Street in Birmingham to sign for a #PeoplesVote on Brexit.Can't make it? Join the fight online:  
Theresa May’s Brexit plan seems to be a contest of who’ll blink first - her or the whopping great train hurtling towards her at 100mph. Trains don’t blink. 
Anna Soubry urges Tories to put their country first and thwart a no-deal Brexit 
And this is a matter of primary national concern. Her personal hatred of immigration has driven the country down the worst of Brexit blind alleys. 
Paper published this morning by @ScotGov - essential that people understand the crippling implications of the current Tory @UKGov #Brexit  chaos & dissembling: No-deal Brexit: economic implications for Scotland -   
Utterly devastating analysis of the Withdrawal Agreement but mainly the political declaration that comes with it. Designed to achieve EU’s aims of total vassalage of UK. How is this ‘negotiated’. No 10 & Robbins, cripple Great Britain! #Brexit  
Am I missing something here?, by publicly taking no deal of the table would she not be significantly damaging her negotiation strength  #justsaying #brexit 
Patrick Stewart says he's 'alarmed, concerned and scared' about Brexit  
Another party political broadcast for the Brexit Party brought to you by LBC. Assume you'll have to give @Anna_Soubry or @sarahwollaston their own show now, LBC, to be Ofcom compliant? 
Great to see Leavers adopting the  as the best way to refer to Brexit  
New: Theresa May urged to set up £7.5 billion emergency fund for no-deal Brexit job losses  
The nine ministers (Clark, Gauke, Rudd, Mundell, Newton, Buckland, Ellwood, Harrington and Brine) who in two separate meetings told @theresa_may they would quit if she does not take a no-deal Brexit off the table  
Tory MPs are lining up to say they're going to quit the party in the event of a no-deal Brexit. But that's like pledging to work in a parachute factory only after jumping out of a plane without one. Does nothing to prevent the strawberry splat of the UK economy. 
Telegraph View: Whatever the splitters say, the Independent Group is about Brexit and very little else 
You stood on a Conservative manifesto to deliver Brexit. Do the honourable thing and call a by-election and put yourself to a People's vote. 
Telegraph..Tory defectors vow to destroy the Tory party & seek a second referendum. IMO May's only option is to close parliament & go for the default NO deal. This would, boost her rating and save the Tory party. Voters are looking for an act of courage, in the face of adversity. 
To BBC positively salivating at the prospect of more MPs joining the Independent anti-Brexit/anti-Democratic group.Got to maintain their EU funding at any cost it would seem! 
Why isn't Nazi supporting Philip Hammond in jail for War Crimes and Treason?Neocon Globalist Fascist Hammond is a Mass Murdering Psychopath who is working directly against UK's best interests to sabotage #Brexit and keep us as permanent slaves of the EU.  
This is a must-read piece on Brexit Central today. The implications of the Political Declaration are just as bad - if not worse - than the Withdrawal Agreement.Remainer May is determined to replicate nearly all the restrictions of EU membership and add some new ones in too.  
Breaking: Brexit & The Houses of Parliament, Westminster by JMW Turner (1834)  
The way both labour and conservatives have conducted themselves since the brexit vote has been insane. Makes you realise politicians are a rare breed. For people so highly educated they could not be further from normality & common sense if they tried. 
If you've never been subjected to Steven Woolfe's Brexit poem it's never too late. Might be worth having something strong close to hand #BrexitArt 
EXCL Tom Watson no longer being invited to key Labour Brexit meetings 
Sad that my colleagues have decided to leave the party but more convinced than ever that we have a bright future post-Brexit. We're working on the economic reforms to unleash enterprise and opportunity in Britain. 
Can we put the pin back in yet?If the aim of voting Brexit was to improve the lives of the people in the UK by shaking up the political establishment: job done. Those who are capable of listening have heard.  
Remain-voting @ToffTalks: Now I back Brexit. “So for me it’s leave as quickly as possible deal or No Deal, I’m not bothered. Get us out so we can move on.”  
Soubry today claims she speaks for the majority when she says Britain does not want Brexit. Hello, the majority voted for Brexit and after EU insults this majority has risen. Brits do not like being pushed about, by anyone Soubry, or being manipulated by you and your boss Soros. 
In case you needed any more reason to despise Gove with every atom of your being, here is Gove (leading liar of Brexit campaign) attacking Hammond (campaigned against Gove’s lies) of not preparing the country for the consequences of Gove’s lies.  
I think this is my favourite Guardian piece ever. "MY Grandfather was a Nazi. I love the EU. The EU is not an economic project. It enhances national sovereignty. Decades of nearly unopposed anti-EU rhetoric led to Brexit, parallels to Weimar Germany" 
Not be a snowflake, but the implied comparison between Momentum and the ERG is way off the mark and definitely offensive: Labour’s far-Left is accused of antisemitism; all the ERG is guilty of is trying to defend the referendum result and the 2017 manifesto. 
The fact I’d die in a ditch for a #CleanBrexit does NOT make me a hard right @Conservatives Why would so many #Leave voters come from #Labour areas if this was true?#Brexit transcends ideas of left and right. It is about self-determination and democracy.#StandFirm 
LETS BE CLEAR - -Since people are calling for the MPs who resigned from Labour and the Tories to face by-elections, I call for every MP who’s constituents voted remain but supports Brexit in parliament to face a by-election, I DONT THINK THIS IS UNREASONABLE 
HONDA CLOSURE: 'Fanciful' to think Brexit didn't play a part, says former Japan ambassadorMost people understand this. Those that don't are desperate not to feel a bit silly.   
Scathing article on BBC pro-EU bias:David Keighley of News-watch, which monitors BBC’s EU-related output speaks out about the blatant pro-EU partisanship in the Brexit domain suggests that it is in clear breach of its Charter, reaching crisis proportions.  
Dominic Grieve - "I regard no-deal Brexit as catastrophic for our country, so bad that I must take every step to to prevent it happening"  
CEO of Heathrow Airport says they are “well-prepared” for No Deal Brexit and “planes will not be grounded”. Will those who tried to scare people with inaccurate Project Fear garbage now apologise?  
I bet you're disappointed. You probably already had the headline "Meghan Markle splurges $200 000 of taxpayers money on luxurious baby shower amidst Brexit troubles" in your drafts  
I don’t believe for a second that Theresa May is driven by personal profit (fwiw I think she’s driven by xenophobia and stubbornness), but what this shows is that she won’t personally suffer from her nightmare Brexit policy.  
Labour folk: There’s a choice on what we tweet about reacting to our opponents thereby pushing their narrative or pushing what helps us.Items for OUR agenda today:- Jeremy meeting Barnier today & the Labour Brexit plan- The quitters have no new polices, Labour has a manifesto  
Corbyn is in coalition with May & the ERG on Brexit. Acting against Conference resolution. But that’s ok, eh?  
No wonder the Tories are in mess over Brexit when political punch ups are breaking out in their cabinet meetings. This infighting at such a senior level in government is putting our economy at risk.  
In a thread yesterday, someone admitted Brexit was a terrible idea, but thought we still had to do it because of the referendum.If democracy is used to force people to accept what's worst for them, hasn't that completely defeated the object of democracy? 
This touching comment has made my day! Thank you. I owe it to my constituents in London, my country & in particular my children & future generations to tell Brexit truth as I saw it from the very start when HMG decided on the hardest Brexit policy landing us where we now are!  
Cameron opened *Pandora's Box* when he unleashed EURef.I wonder what he's thinking ?He certainly didn't contemplate *leave* & the chaos flowingfrom it.The entire Country is in turmoil !Will #Brexit see the demise of the Tory Party ?Probably not - but it is seriously wounded. 
Last week we put up a blank @jeremycorbyn poster & Labour members wrote  on it what they wanted the party to do on Brexit. The Council said that was graffiti & ordered it covered up. So we printed a photo of the original, framed it & posted it on the same site.  
just ordered 2 rolls of capillary matting from Denmark, no problem, they were very helpful. maybe I was lucky. hands up, I voted for Brexit, but I've changed my mind and I want the chance to vote again. come on independent group, we need a moderate outward looking party to vote 
I fear that by the end of the month, the #IndependentGroup could be the government.Pulling in anti-democratic elements from 3 main parties.A party/group elected by no one, whose primary aim is to overturn the democratic decision of the British people in the EU referendum. 
As Anna Soubry apparently said: The referendum was only allowed on the certainty that Remain would win.  What's extraordinary is how many people voted Leave depsite the entire Establishment telling them otherwise. Imagine the landslide for Leave if we'd had an objective campaign! 
“The arrival of three Tory Remoaners confirms that the Independent Group exists for one reason only: to thwart Brexit, to frustrate the largest vote in UK history. This will be a political party that stands against the people”, says Brendan O’Neill 
An anonymous civil servant has written a piece explaining why the Brexit deal keeps us in massive parts of the EU. This is a Brexit betrayal.Email your MP to save Brexit @  
If people vote Labour, people want a Labour MP - Not someone who says they're Labour, but when they get elected, they turn around and tell people that Labour policies aren't worth fighting for and Labour supporters are too tribal or tingedIG are Tories minus Brexit 
#Brexit: What happens to the Erasmus student scheme in a no deal?  
If you want opposition to Brexit AND an end to the politics that contribiuted to it, @TheGreenParty offers both. 
People voted for Brexit for more than just narrow, economic reasons. Politicians must respect and honour that vote, or else the disconnect that already exists between them and the electorate will be widened.  
Just to remind everyone, in 2017 May held an election to seek a mandate for her hard #Brexit & she lost her majority. She blundered on regardless. That’s why we’re in this mess. #Brexitshambles #FinalSay 
Deeply worrying research from @openDemocracy revealing the extent of dark money finance and influence behind the #brexit right-wingers:  
The @Conservatives party has always been a broad church - and will continue to be. We must get on and deliver Brexit so we can continue to tackle the injustices @theresa_may spoke about on the steps of Downing Street. 
I've got 24 bloody good reasons to #Remain... I want to know if there is even 1 reason to justify #Brexit?(And I'm sorry "Democracy," doesn't count - because #VoteLeaveBroketheLaw!)Time to #stopbrexit#24ReasonstoRemain #EUsupergirl 
Because of Brexit. 
Whilst the Brexit chaos distracts, disabled people are dying. Few things are a starker judgement on the failures of the political class. >> Today’s col.  
I'm sick of being persecuted and demonized for voting Brexit by all and sundry from Donald Tusk to SKY News presenters and even my own MP.It was MY vote and I knew EXACTLY what I was voting for. How dare these Remain zealots slag me off. 
Two senior Tories ready to resign if May fails to change Brexit direction  
‘@ToffTalks voted Remain but now backs Brexit, deal or No Deal. Many Remainers will agree. Let’s get on with it and leave on 29th March.  
So, now #JeremyCorbyn and many Tories want the defectors to resign their seats and force bi-elections in their constituencies. In essense, they want to go back to the people to see what they think. Gross hypocrisy from two parties that refuse to go back to the people on #Brexit. 
Avoiding a no-deal crash-out won’t stop Brexit wrecking our economy | Peter Mandelson | Opinion | The GuardianMay’s deal will also wreck British economy. We must stop Brexit all together. #StopBrexitSaveBritain 
Jaguar Land Rover faces the threat of American tariffs and a hard Brexit, as well as problems of its own making  
Labour “cannot simply take for granted the votes of those remainers for whom Brexit is a key priority” @OwenJones84 on Britain’s “new times”  
JUST IN: Two senior Tories ready to resign if May fails to change Brexit direction  
Theresa May is trying to kick the can down the road on Brexit, forcing MPs to back her deal.We're not letting her off the hook. Be part of the fight against Brexit and help us stand up to Theresa May >  
No it does not, you’re quite right.Supporting Brexit does however put you in league with the far right, and it’s up to you to balance your conscience with that fact.  
The breakaway Conservative MPs have yet to articulate exactly what they want to stand for or why they have moved away from the 2017 Conservative Manifesto w/ its clear pledge to leave the EU & its customs union & single market in order to fulfil the mandate of the EU referendum. 
Something bugging me. Some of the Labour MPs being cited as likely tIGger defectors believe Brexit is what their voters want them to deliver. They’re not that likely to join a group that wants to stop Brexit, are they? 
Media release: Call for action on EU funding & opportunities to work, study & travel abroad as young people reveal top Brexit concernsThe Children & Young People's Panel on Europe report 'Listen to us: A report on Brexit' launches today at #scvogathering. 
So the PM @theresa_may is in the High Court this morning at 10am defending the legality of the Referendum and no opposition politician is talking about this? Not one?! Correct me if I’m wrong. Neither have the newspapers / media reported it. LIVE STREAM  
For four decades, America and Britain stood for open markets, globalization and personal freedom. With Brexit in motion and Donald Trump in the White House, it's worth asking: Is this the end of "the Anglosphere"?  
This picture comes as close to capturing the House of Commons in these days of Brexit as anything I’ve seen. Ian Paisley’s face, the grinning SNP man. Brilliant...  
.@jeremycorbyn says he plans to discuss options for breaking the #Brexit deadlock with EU leaders as he heads to Brussels  
4 remainers sat around the table discussing how to stop Brexit.It’s time for Grieve to leave the Party.He says a No Deal would result in him not taking the whip and no longer being in the Tory Party.No thought about what the country wants only what he wants.Give him his wish  
Tory Chancellor Philip Hammond says a ‘No Deal’ Brexit would be "bad for Britain" but nevertheless confirms it could happen anyway. So he’s complicit in harming the country. #r4today 
You have no inkling of what Trust means #Grieve @BeaconsfieldCCA .. u stood on a Tory #Brexit Manifesto, represent a #Leave constituency and you have truly shafted us all ... we want u out of our constituency .. we want someone who  sticks to their word and puts democracy first 
I wrote a piece for @WiredUK on what Brexit means for UK startups and why I’m optimistic about deep tech investing post-Brexit  
#Brexit has turned our politics toxic, it's putting women  in danger + discouraging young women from going into politics. A #PeoplesVote provides an alternative: let's have women's voices heard, end this mess and take our opinions to the ballot box. 
JAVID: Not possible to rule out No Deal Brexit. “That date is set: March 29th.” 
Former Tory Minister on BBC Radio Scotland - "There's nothing right wing about wanting to govern yourselves in an independent country". #Brexit 
Pickled strawberries and leeks - perfect food for the stockpilers of Brexit Britain  
Thank you @WeyandSabine for important exchange on state of play in #Brexit process. Full agreement on EU position regarding #WA and backstop. @EU_Commission continues to have our full support. 
Break away Remainer MP's look like an elitist political cult. They were all elected on party manifestos which guaranteed Referendum result would be enacted. So, forget the PR and People's vote bs. they are not democrats but wannabe EU elitists. Back to your electorate, ask them. 
They have an 8 point lead despite being awful , the only thing propping them up is Brexit ..  
@Feorlean  "In Scotland we need to take the next and final vital step away from Brexit dependence, which can only be done by choosing the normality of independence."  via @theSNP 
Mexican environmental activist Samir Flores Soberanes has been murdered just before a referendum on a controversial thermal-electric plant and pipeline that he opposed  
The Independent Group will at last give us real opposition to Brexit | Gina Miller | Opinion | The Guardian  
It’s nearly three years now since that Brexit referendum.And a month till we’re supposed to be leaving.If there was a great Brexit to be had, wouldn’t we have found it by now?At what point do we say enough is enough?Tell me what you think? RT for wide sample, please 
Most Labour voters understand that Brexit, any Brexit, will make everyone poorer but especially the most vulnerable in society. In not seeking a #peoplesvote, you've lost support. Voting on what's on offer is just common sense. Time to rethink Dianne. 
Some British ministers tell May: delay Brexit if no deal or face rebellion: The Sun  
Deffo reckon this Shamima Begum story is blag and to distract us from brexit for the time being. If them videoing her opening the letter like it’s her Hogwarts acceptance letter doesn’t give it away nothing will 
Economic impact of ‘No Deal’ Brexit published today: Scotland  should know of the economic slowdown, inevitable recession and soaring unemployment predicted. All forms of #brexit bad for the economy. UKgov must listen.  
Prepare your company for #Brexit with our guide for businesses.#Prepare4Brexit  
So Anna Soubry Chris Leslie Chuka Umanna are all against Brexit except they’d back a Corbyn’s Custom Union to Unite the country but they or the media can’t say that Corbyn is right  oh and Theresa May’s a racist   
Businesses always close for a number of reasons. They can survive one or two problems, but three or four might be fatal.If Brexit is the (extra, entirely needless) problem that takes a company over the edge, then yes, several factors are at play; but Brexit is still to blame. 
Brexit is getting nearer. And the list of blunders is getting longer.  
Why did Government not tell businesses until recently that most EU trade agreements would not be replicated in the event of no-deal Brexit? Why have few negotiating updates been provided and will this be improved? 20/ 
Economy Secretary @DerekMackaySNP has warned that a ‘No Deal’ #Brexit will have severe impacts for the economy, people and businesses across Scotland and these impacts have the potential to push the Scottish economy into a recession  
You set up an 'advisory' referendum to avoid all the safeguards a binding referendum woud've given us and then made it binding despite astonishing illegality. That is quite possibly the biggest scam this country has ever seen. No surprise you disagree with an example of integrity 
Going off Brexit for a moment...What the fuck is it with this cold that’s going round, I’m on week three and this fucking cough will not fucking die!?!!Is this bastard immortal or something? 
As TM uses the menace of No Deal to try to get her version of Brexit through; Jeremy Corbyn tries to do precisely the same thing. They are as bad as each other - awful.  
I think, personally, one of the best things we can do for the next five weeks, to avoid the whirlpool and create some kind of historical record in case of the worst outcome, is to each document the best and worst of Britain before and after Brexit. Our observations have value. 
Michael Gove accuses Philip Hammond of failing to prepare Britain for no-deal Brexit 
There's at least some truth in this. I voted Labour in 2017 DESPITE its Brexit stance, not because of it (although I have always been Labour leaning).I'm tired of the trope that 80% (or whatever) voters voted for Leave supporting parties.Anyone else out there? 
"I'm trying not to do that awful interrupting thing""You are doing the awful interrupting thing"Philip Hammond put under pressure on @BBCBreakfast over #Brexit talks  
Yes. I wanted to vote for the l D, but voted labour, believing they cared about the workers, and would never facilitate a Tory Brexit.  
Tells you exactly what Brexit is all about!! Wake up folks we are being conned so the Tories can hide their "Tax Haven Wealth"  
Arrived in Dublin for the launch of a partnership between @AmgueddfaCymru and @NMIreland. A new chapter for Celtic connections, which will be even more important post Brexit. Looking forward to working with Welsh and Irish colleagues over the coming years to bring ideas to life!  
‘A distillation of Brexit’ Britain already disengaging from Europe as UK government pulls funding from unique European research institute  
Japan now has a deal with the EU which means they can export tariff free. Why would any Japanese manufacturer stay in a Brexit UK?The exodus is going to continue. Brexit recession is coming followed by Brexit depression.We CAN stop this madness. 
864 hours until BrexitAt 11pm on 29th March 2019 we leave the corrupt, blackmailing unelected undemocratic EU dictatorship.It swamped Britain with cheap  East European immigrants, drove down Brits wages & destroyed our fishing industry. Hail Brexit Britain 
It is important remember that The #IndependentGroup is anti brexit but also pro austerity. So voters be warned of what you are signing on for. 
There are only three things that unite the so called Independent Group of MPs.They all oppose BrexitThey all support a third referendumThey all stood on manifestos that backed Brexit.Oh, and a fourth, they all won't put their principles to a by-election! 
LISTEN: Ian voted leave, but he has done a U-turn and yesterday he called @Nigel_Farage to talk about @TheIndGroup and his #brexit views. He explained how noone had enough information in 2016 and how many lies were told. He thinks we must now have a #PeoplesVote #Remainernow 
Labour's 2017 vote-increase was because many voters (inc me) were desperately anti-Brexit and voted tactically to stop Tory Brexit.If anyone is unfairly profiting from the 2017 manifesto, it's not the MPs who represent the very pro-European feelings that helped Labour succeed! 
Newsflash: today @UKEUchallenge will go to court over the EU Referendum.  Time the Leave campaign’s illegal activities were taken into account  #ExitfromBrexit #StopBrexitSaveBritain 
Too late looks like #TIG just stepped in to provide some real opposition. The Maybyn party of Brexit is slowly disintegrating from the rot of a corrupt, lawbreaking, racist project. #StopBrexit 
A thread from my husband and business partner, written one year ago. Not one of the challenges he's listed here has been addressed. This list is not exhaustive.There are 36 days until Brexit.  
Anna Soubry is right. Theresa May is the author of her own demise on Brexit because of her anti immigration fetish. pic.twitter.com/ErGu6N0eoo 
Understandably! She is a liberal Conservative being cut adrift by a hard right, Brexit Conservative Party.Justine Greening’s commitment to social mobility, her work in International Development & her support for a People’s Vote are deeply impressive. #ChangePolitics 
What should worry the Tories is that many of their most articulate & passionate women MPs have quit or are flirting with quitting. “I couldn’t stay in a Brexit party” @JustineGreening tells @BBCr4today whilst @AmberRuddHR has promised to continue working with those who have quit 
To review… Brexit started as a fringe idea of the far right.  It was not an issue for 95% of the UK until Cameron mainstreamed it to appease Tory extremists.  Labour adopted this far-right idea.  The only question about the new party splits is why they took so long.  
I strongly support a single term of 6 years for all political office holders. When hard reforms are needed, re-election concerns prevents those reforms from happening. To prevent bad governance, a recall referendum can be held after 2 years. 
The SDP's Patrick O'Flynn MEP "Independent's Group was setup to Hijack & Derail Brexit" - interview with Toby Young on Talk Radio 
“A second referendum..is a direct incentive to get the worst possible deal”.Who said this?  2nd referendum campaigner Sarah Woollaston MP.  When did she say it?  Before the last election when seeking re-election in her Leave voting constituency.  Disgusting.  
Just chatted with a former colleague who attended a talk given by Mervyn King and she said he was very relaxed about a no deal Brexit and saw significant benefits in leaving.I wondered why we not hearing from this well respected former Governor of the B of E on TV or in the press 
Justine Greening on @BBCr4today is damning on the future of the party and her future in it. “We need to be more than the Brexit party or we have no future” (I really must stop listening to Today in the morning, it leaves me so depressed at the state of everything) 
BREAKING: Clear @JustineGreening will quit Tories if there’s a No Deal Brexit. Party system falling apart at the seams. 
The UK’s former ambassador to the EU has warned that attitude towards Brexit in European capitals have hardened “quite markedly” in the last two or three weeks.  
Sarah Wollaston @sarahwollaston was right on #r4today. The major parties have veered to left and right tied together in a Brexit death pactThis is bad for the country and possibly fatal for the parties which have become dominated by unrepresentative cabals#Timeforanewpolitics 
Justine Greening: "I dont think I would be able to stay part of a Brexit party." #r4today 
Adam  @adamboultonSKY - you don’t have to be a genius to know your Labour to your core, anti-brexit, pro a people’s vote and wear your political bias heart on your sleeve. Nothing wrong with that but for crying out load be honest about it. @SkyNewsHead 
You need to get on with resigning your seat and fighting a by-election. You are in Parliament under false pretences. You were elected on a manifesto that promised to deliver Brexit. You lied. Have you ever really been a Conservative? Just an opportunist really. #liarMPs. 
Labour split 'scabs' will 'regret it', says Corbyn-ally amid claims party may shift Brexit stance.If Labour really are edging towards a 'remain & reform' position on Brexit, they need to pick up the pace! 
MPs like Sarah Wollaston should stand by the promises they made to the voters at election time and work to honour the referendum result in full. 
I used to think Theresa May only took on the role of Brexit Grandmaster out of some misguided sense of duty - or even to stop us crashing out with no deal.Now it's clear she saw an opportunity to shut the door on our European friends.The British Prime Minister is a xenophobe. 
Meanwhile, of the 440 political Facebook ads currently running under Brexit, 240 of them are being paid for by Britain's Future, taking two very different approaches to using constituents to influence their MPs.They are targeting the blue and red sides of politics differently:  
Jeremy Corbyn heads to Brussels to give EU his vision of a Brexit deal: Still chasing unicorns, still ignoring his party members, still yesterdays man.  
Weren't you elected on a manifesto to uphold the referendum result and deliver Brexit?If you were why are you now touting opposing Brexit without being elected with that as your stated aim?This is utterly corrupt. If I was a remainer I wouldn't trust you as a politician.  
And this is the perfect time to try such an experiment. The two main parties are in a shocking state with appalling leaders. Libdems are bombed out. Brexit has also helpfully revealed the true state of Westminster party politics. /3 
Tonight (Thursday, 21 Feb) at 7.30 at Christchurch, The Grove, Ilkley: “Let’s Talk About #Brexit” with Labour MP, John Grogan. All welcome. Admission free.  
A no-deal Brexit could lead to tariffs of 40% or more being imposed on food such as beef and cheddar cheese, driving up prices in shops and squeezing household budgets across the UK and Ireland, retail organisations from both countries warn. Thank you Brexiteers.  
"British boats beached by May’s non-Brexit #Brexit."  Our fishermen and  coastal communities are being sold down the river.  Read : #GoWTO @fishingforleave 
This chap from Broxtowe was asked his views on @Anna_Soubry resignation from the Tory party to join @TheIndGroup. He suggests he voted leave but as we did not have full facts and understanding about #Brexit we should look again in a #FinalSay. He appears to be a #remainernow 
This poor guy perfectly encapsulates @UKLabour confusion and dishonesty over Brexit  
Trying hard not comment on Brexit but...Corbyn going 2Brussels - EU already negotiated w UK GOV, (won't open negoce again)- doesn't negoce w each party n alrdy said it months ago - So this courtesy visit (aimed at UK voters really) is also wasting other ppl's time n money. 
WATCH: Last Week Tonight perfectly explains Brexit, the backstop, and how it could all be saved  
Independent Group is a space for anti-democrats to war against #Brexit, they have no legitimacy to be sitting MPs.  
Brexit - it's in the Conservative Party interest, the DUP interest and the disaster capitalists interest - not the national interest!... #GroundhogDay #BrexitShambles 
UK and Ireland retailers warn of 40% tariffs on food in no-deal Brexit  
About 1000 adolescents participated in a referendum to #EndChildMarriage in #Chennai.The result – No to child marriage: 1000 | Yes to child marriage: 0These changemakers are part of an initiative that empowers, engages and enables adolescents against early marriage. 
Yanks should shut up about Brexit Brits should shut up about Obamacare Europeans should shut up about policy Australians should shut up about most everything Canadians should be jailed 
Michael Gove is correct here. Hammond has operated on the principle he is in control and Brexit couldn’t happen. The end result is everyone being left at risk.  
"The American fund manager that employs Theresa May’s husband has said that it intends to use market uncertainty after Britain’s withdrawal from the European Union as a 'buying opportunity'"How opportune.#Brexit #TheresaMay #StopBrexit#RevokeA50 
‘If you had to create a party that embodied why it is that Britain voted Brexit, Umunna’s groupuscule of bloodless, centrist, technocractic, dreary, remote, Europhile losers would be it.’ #Brexit  
‘The hardline EUsceptics May indulges can’t claim to speak for everyone who voted for Brexit, let alone the whole country.Yet the PM accepted their narrow interpretation of the ref result & thereby accelerated their ideological capture of her party.’  
WATCH: The realities of #Brexit hit #LondonFashionWeek 
Theresa May's arbitrary 'red lines' are what's lead to this risible impasse.Nobody voted for those in the referendum. She made them up, plucked them from thin air..they're hers alone, and rooted in her own personal xenophobia.When asked, people aren't opposed to FOM. 
On what Planet does @SpeakerPelosi think she is in anyway on power with @POTUSLooks like she was trying to appease the restless cabal in EU. Not surprised the head of EU is unelected just like Pelosi. This is why BREXIT , gilets Juanes etc is happening  
#Trump to #PenceYou think #DemomRats are flipping out now, just wait until I move to #EndTheFed.It will be #Brexit and the#Kavanaugh Circus rolledinto an Apocalypse. 
Theresa May holds fresh Brexit talks with the EU  
We are proud that the #CatalanPoliticalPrisoners use #Canada on their #declarations as an example of a #democraticCountry, a region where the #selfdetermination is a real right and a country where a #referendum is consider the best way to know the #opinion of the #citizens. 
British PM Theresa May addresses #Brexit, party defections in Brussels  
Three UK Conservatives quit party in protest at 'disastrous Brexit' in blow to PM Theresa May  via @ReutersTV 
When Brexit disasters are in the news, David Cameron’s face pops in my head. Yeah, that guy who cosied up to bigots and dictators. The UK should put up a statue of him in a pigeon-infested spot. 
This brilliant article pertains to the UK as well as the US. Just replace ‘Border Wall’ with ‘Brexit’ and ‘frontier’ with ‘empire’. The conclusion is spot on for both countries too.   
Anyway, sorry to witter on, but the upshot is that, because of all you marvellous bloody people, I am going to keep fighting the obscenity that is Brexit on here. OK, OK, so it’s not in the league of the magnificent 3, Soubry, Allen & Wollaston6/ 
Has Brexit broken British politics? - podcast  
Independent Group is a space for anti-democrats to war against Brexit, says Brendan O'Neill  
Jez is hoping we won’t notice the biggest betrayal of the poorest and workers.  His support of Brexit.We see him.  The people polled see him.He is washed up. He’s lost his credentials as a man of honour.Take that up with Milne.Brand damaged beyond repair. 
Over 100,000 jobs, over £13billion investment on the line, with a Brexit we refused, it’s time to wake up & tell our representatives to get real,stop fighting for the irrational UK & leave them to it. #usethemandate 
Kent's farmers fear 'catastrophic' Brexit  
When Brexit and Trump’s autocracy is over, I’m taking a brief vacation. 
If Brexit actually goes through, these 250 companies may ditch Britain for the Netherlands  
Come on Sam..abandon the Party & their frightful #Brexit which Removes Rights w/o Consent & will leave us Far Worse off..We've already sustained irreversible damage.#RevokeA50 #Remain in Control in the EU with our Best Possible Deal 
Just discovered that David Coburn MEP has officially joined the Brexit Party.  Whether that makes him "leader of the Brexit Party Scotland" is frustratingly unclear. 
British PM Theresa May held “constructive” talks in Brussels as she sought concessions on #Brexit from a skeptical EU  
YOU CALLED THE REFERENDUM YOU CAUSED THIS  
My god, ain't the #Referendum brought out the trash in #Parliament! Makes one wonder what have we been voting for, for all these years?I think we need to put our #Politicians under a Lie Detector before the next #Election! 
“Fort Trump,” #NordStream2, and Polish #Brexit—I interview @Anna_M_Anders, #Poland's Secretary of State for International Dialogue on American Thought Leaders . Watch Full:  
Anna Soubry claims that the Tory Party “is run from top to bottom by hard-line Brexiteers”. If only it were so!  We have Remainers as PM & Chancellor, a sell-out Remainer as our key Brexit negotiator, and an apparent determination to steer the UK into a permanent Customs Union. 
I agree. I posted the photo just to establish that JB was indeed in the UK the day & the night of the Brexit vote. Many notables like Hannan, in the Brexit example, & others, in the example of the US Election, were genuine & subsequently learnt of election f*ckery treason later 
The only progress to be made would be if you #revokeArticle50 on a fraudulently procured referendum result. 
Passing almost unnoticed amidst the excitement of Tory defections is the news that the EU is moving forward with no deal Brexit mitigation plans for air travel, but with a HUGE number of caveats. It won't be the end of the world, it will just feel like it. 
Brexit Britain has surpassed Trump as the global paramount laughing stock 
To be fair to the splinterers, they don’t even try to hide any of this. They’re talking about a 10 year plan. It’s their career. The only reason they’ve chosen to launch it at this moment is to dupe People’s Vote supporters into thinking it’s about Brexit, when it’s about vanity. 
And as for getting a 2nd referendum without a general election, splintering doesn’t make that any more likely. They could have proposed and voted for that before, but they were too chicken. The only difference now is they’ve got slightly less sway over their old parties. 
UK Labour leader Corbyn to discuss Brexit impasse with EU's Barnier  
At last, at last. Someone in a prominent public role calls out the Prime Minister’s personal problem with immigration. Brave and necessary, @Anna_Soubry. Thank you for calling May out on this, & thank you for calling out the card that has been running Brexit, & ruining us.  
Who resurrected this disgraced serial liar & repackaged him as a #Brexit “expert”?No-one knows what Brexit will bring - it’s all just speculation!But, in fairness, Bertie IS an expert in speculation - look at all that dosh he “won” speculating on the gee-gees#MoneyForNothing 
Questions have been asked in parliament about reports that MI5 requested a probe into Banks Russian links in 2016 prior to the referendum but the Home Secretary Theresa May turned them down 
Brexit 20/2/2019: A blog & public lecture given at the University of Iceland "All imperial countries and their leaders have problems when their empires disappear, and they no longer have the forced tribute or inequitable trade deals they have depended on."  
I'd die happy if Pete was allowed onto the Question Time panel & dispensed this kind of reality check. A critique of Brexit & the political class. As with Pete, I'll take any type of Brexit to escape an anti-democratic EU, but we can't ignore the fact our politicians failed us.  
**Newsflash** Buckingham palace to relocate to Frankfurt due to brexit....  
The Independent Group will at last give us real opposition to Brexit.A 56% majority of the country now wants to #Remain - a 12-point lead, and growing.⁦@TheIndGroup⁩ must give us a louder voice in Parliament, and make the case to #StopBrexit. 
Aviva, NatWest to join 'Brexodus' of business to EU.Tragic to see jobs, money and taxes lost to Brexit.Write to your MP to demand #RevokeA50 & #Remain. 
“Have you ever heard Theresa doing rap? It would give you the clattyboakers” #janeygodleyvoiceover #swearing #brexit #SplittersCoup 
It's absolutely wild that a bunch of opportunist chancers have decided that 4 weeks out from a cataclysmic no deal brexit is the perfect time to launch their madcap shenanigans and capture the attention of a media seemingly utterly incapable of holding them or May to account 
Brexit is a turd. Only it came wrapped as fruit pastilles. We’re being told we have to eat the turd now as we’ve bought it, even though we wanted fruit pastilles.Blame the people who wrapped a turd as fruit pastilles. Not the people who wanted fruit pastilles. 
Been reading into the report by Gary Gillespie, one of Scotlands top economists which shows that Scotland will be hit up to 40% harder by brexit EVEN WITH A TRADE DEAL WITH THE EU than the rest of the UK  | #brexit #scotref #indyref2 
MP calls Brexit a “turd” live on air.Tory MP Phillip Lee causes an argument on BBC Politics Live show after calling Brexit a 'turd'.It’s hard to disagree with his description - and MPs know it.Write to your MP to demand #RevokeA50 & #Remain. 
Anna Soubrey - the real problem behind Brexit is May's personal aversion to immigration.  
Another great brexit benefit from AAA to AA, next will be BBB borrowings will get tougher, interest rates increase and credit terms get bad, yes another great benefit from brexit  
Disagree with @Theresa_May on Brexit all you like but @Anna_Soubry owes her an apology after her comments on #Newsnight. The Tory party has been nothing but gracious towards her today. In vowing to ruin the party and calling its leader racist, she’s let herself and #TIG down. 
The most important thing The Independent Group has created in British politics is not a hope that Brexit can be overturned by Remainers, that looks like a battle sadly already lost. Their achievement is reenergising a hope that demagoguery & populism can be defeated. 
No, PM. Membership of the EU has been a source of disagreement in YOUR party for a long time. 90% of the public couldn't care less.This is a crisis manufactured by the Tories for Tory gain. #Brexit = #epicfail. UK is being routed & will be raped by disaster capitalists. 
Brexit backer Jim Ratcliffe is not the only British billionaire looking overseas, but his plan to could save him an unprecedented $5 billion  
Will @annasoubrymp who wants.a 2nd  referendum give her constituents a by election?? Of course not 
"I would certainly cease to take the whip if I thought the Government was about to take us into a No Deal Brexit.I am absolutely clear about that" So you would leave the party? "I would have to leave the party-yes."Former Attorney General Dominic Grieve tells Newsnight  
Public should get chance to sign off on deal.. at moment they're facing prospect of a #Brexit that inflicts huge damage to jobs/livelihoods.  
Tonight local residents told Leave supporters across #Lincolnshire & #Yorkshire that they havn't forgotten our vote. They created a voice for themselves & for all of us who want to see #Brexit through. Ordinary people are coming together & making a stand.  
Brexit has ALREADY destroyed the Tory party...!!Do catch up @Telegraph....!@VesperUK @smilinglaura @10DowningStreet @BrexitBin @lynnesandgate @EuropeanPenguin @kmqkatie @atatimelikethis @KimSJ @peterjukes @MatthewGreen02 @Doozy_45 @Kean1S 
Are you kidding? You plan to inflict medical shortages, food rationing, energy outages, travel restrictions & martial law on us in the name of toxic #Brexit. You're stockpiling rubber bullets and body bags.This isn't a democracy any more; it's a dictatorship & you're a tyrant.  
You were voted on a manifesto and your constituents deserve opportunity to decide if they still want you or not. Sheer hypocrisy to deny them that but demand a 2nd vote on brexit. Hindsight would have been a wonderful thing on brexit. Wonder how many voters feel same about you? 
Had a conversation today with a Welsh, Lab & remain voter who is exasperated with Jeremy Corbyn and Brexit. I said @Plaid_Cymru are a left of centre liberal party in favour of EU membership. "Fair point" was the reply. If you want a better future for Wales vote Plaid. 
The UK may claim Honda closure is not Brexit related, but in the Japanese Financial Paper is saying "growing possibility of No deal" triggered their decision. Also reported that Toyota, Panasonic & Sony are also reviewing their strategy for the EU& the UK. 
Super excited to demo #ProjectEirini (Cloud Foundry with #Kubernetes as the container scheduler) on the keynote stage at CF Summit in April, straight after Brexit does or doesn’t happen... come find out if I manage to leave the country!  >> 
When will anyone in #MSM when discussing #Brexit actually mention Bernier talks with #Corbyn after his letter to May with proposals 4 a solution based on @UKLabour conf incl #PeoplesVote? Last time I looked Labour weren't the govt, unless I missed something at #GE2017  
Just to remind you that the Lib Dems BLOCKED the Tories having a Referendum during the 2010-2015 Coalition. It was when the Tories gained a clear majority that the Referendum came about, and set this whole mess up. 
wtf. I've actually just seen someone dismiss the SNP as a party because "Brexit is about more than Scotland, it's about people."I'm sorry, when did we fucking lose 'person' status? Was I asleep? 
David Cameron is a very perspective person to say that. Check what he did for his country. #Brexit 
On any decent society, this would be the end of her. But... 
Exactly. He is performing to a crowd, puts himself on member's lips, and gets to say to May 'did you like my Brexit distraction?'. 
Was not aware that the ERG are working with Remainers.  Can you detail this cooperation?  Is this the same broadchurch Tory Party that are pushing to deselect MPs that are pushing for another referendum on the deal on the table? 
Labour MP @SDoughtyMP says that moving forwards, the party has to take a clear position on Brexit, root out anti-semitism in the party and demonstrate that they are a broad church.Watch the show now on @ITV |  
So after the fuss with @TheIndGroup & @Conservatives/@duponline majority potentially slipping away, it now looks like TIG have made @theresa_may SAFER than she was before- the only MPs who want an election less than Theresa May are TIG  #Brexit #GE19 
Can you understand that people don’t like being triangulated into Brexit by the 2 big parties, and this story is a refreshing change, offering a new direction for the debate? 
Anti-EU right wing has taken over Conservative Party - Soubry The #Tories offered a referendum to placate the #right - now they are the #right #NastyParty #Nazis 
Peter Mandelson on @Peston - Wow. No messing around there about giving up our control & leverage without negotiating our future deal. Crystal clear thinking on Brexit. 
In the country. I had to used full beam (can't remember the last time.) Everywhere is fairly muddy. And the water doesn't work. Was this what made them vote Brexit? 
Get a load of wot Britains RWNJs Farange & Co have done to Britain with Brexit  Hopefully Australias RWNJs have their arses poised in the right position for the big boot placed directly right up there right now 
Ricky Ross: I don't mean to depress you Mrs May, but there's only 35 days left on the Brexit clockMrs May: Shut up Ricky Ross and eat your mouldy lincolnshire sausage. 
Jeremy voted to issue Article 50 with no view of the government plans, so he is as much to blame for thus mess as the Tories......and ditch that jobs-first Brexit crap too, unless he meant jobs would be the first casualties of Brexit 
Brexit is 887 hours away. #brexit 
Why? It’s a sunlit uplands, so this is at worst an empty threat. It’s only a problem if the Brexit voters believed lies and did something supremely idiotic. Oh, wait... 
Statistics also show Leave voters were most likely to:Be dissatisfied with incomeBe unemployed in last 12 monthsHave a lower life expectancyHave no education qualifications4 out of 10 declared to be without a paid job or to not have worked in the seven days prior#brexit 
Hi David,Wonder if you can help?Last year, we employed 85 people. We now only have 25 and 20 of these are from Eastern Europe. No one can tell me what will happen after Brexit?Can you help?I have written to you before.Know one seems to know what is going on. 
